For anyone who is in Florida and was considering donating blood or plasma, come back on Tuesday to your local blood drives since they have already reached the need volume for today. So come back on Tuesday when the next round is needed. 
I think the team at Orlando Regional Medical Center deserve some recognition here. My hat goes off to anyone working there during the time this tragic event was occurring, especially the nurses and surgeons. It takes a lot of gut to be able to keep cool and perform your duties on people so frightened, while under the stress of knowing that people have already died as a result of the event.  Stay strong everyone. 
As someone who witnessed the 26/11 shootings in India, I know what shooting at a crowd in a cramped space feels like. This is the saddest thing I've read today, I stand with with you from Mumbai, lots of love. 
Still unable to locate my friend. I've called the hotline set up and had a friend drive to the hamptons inn where family center is set up and they are still not releasing any information at this time. I've called Orlando regional and other hospitals and I get nothing.  
So I imagine that Obama will give a televised speech about this shooting some time today? It would make sense since this shooting is now (unfortunately) historic in its death toll.  
Should we random acts of pizza the blood donation centers? 
The shooting at PULSE is devastating. Two of my friend's family members were there and thankfully got out (one of them was shot, but will be ok). If you are in the Orlando area, PLEASE consider donating blood. They are in desperate need of O positive, O negative, and AB plasma blood donors. 
My brother was club hopping and was on his way there but stopped to get some food with friends, he was five minutes away before it happened but decided to go home instead. It's so fucking crazy how close some things are to being completely different, i'm so grateful. 
My best friend lives right around the corner from Pulse and spent the night hiding in her closet because she was hearing gunfire but didn't know where it was coming from or what was going on. I can't even imagine how terrifying it must have been for everyone there.  
Terrifying and devastating.  If you're a member of the LBGT community in Central Florida, from Ocala to Tampa to Titusville, you've been to Pulse at least once.   To us this didn't just happen in our backyard, it happened in our living room. 
I wonder what the police tactics were on this one? I hear the gunman took hostages and started executing. I'll be so pissed if it's a repeat of Columbine where the police waited outside for hours while those kids were getting executed.  
I live 500 meters from the concert hall called "bataclan" in Paris. So I kind of been there. Lost friends, got friends badly hurt.   I have nothing smart to say. This is absolute horror.   I stand with you from Paris as you guys were with us when we got hurt.   Fuck those murderers. Love will prevail.   Damn this is so sad. Sorry for not making sense.  
Did [edited to remove name], that dumb fucking son of a bitch, not understand that this is going to make people at large *more* sympathetic to homosexuals and *less* sympathetic to Muslims?   It's not even the horrific, utterly senseless loss of life, it's that even from his perspective, his actions will have the complete opposite effect of what he set out to do in the longer run. He wasn't just an evil fucking idiot, he was an *incompetent* evil fucking idiot.   My sympathies go out to everyone affected by such a horrible tragedy. Love yourself and each other. 
**LETS STOP TALKING ABOUT r/news, AND START TALKING ABOUT INFORMATION AND THE 50 PEOPLE WHO LOST THEIR LIVES THIS MORNING.** 
It breaks my heart that pride month will always have this bleak reminder of how much more we have to fight for. This was a vile homophobic act by a maniac. My heart goes out to the families and friends of those who were murdered, and everyone involved. I hope they find peace amongst the pain.  
Obama sounded tired, defeated and almost numb to this type of situation.  
This is incredibly sad.  This is the deadliest US mass shooting since Virginia Tech. 
I live about 45 minutes from Orlando and have sooooo many friends who frequent this nightclub.  I am praying right now. Not sure if any of them were there during this, but such a horrible moment...  
Not only blood, but these centers need water bottles and snacks as well for the large influx of people donating blood. If you can't donate blood, think about donating food and drinks.  
They deserve overwhelming recognition. They were also operating under reports that there might be another shooter or possibly explosives at the hospital itself. I'll piggyback your statement and say Orlando fire deserves a lot of credit too. I stayed up listening to their scanner channel and they (as calm as they could) organized triage stations and mobile treatment sites. Command was trying to organize all their available emergency rigs and at some point they were throwing victims in police pick up trucks. It was pretty horrifying hearing drivers ask what hospital they could bring victims to as ORMC was overcapacity and only accepting red tag trauma alerts. 
this is something I had never even considered and it gives me chills to think about it  
I remember reading a similar description after the Paris attacks, I think. It's inevitable in this age of communication ease & social media and it's so sad how many of those calls and messages will never get an answer. 
Correct, I believe he will speak at 1:30 eastern time.  
Yes! Not only blood, but these centers need water bottles and snacks as well for the large influx of people donating blood. Random acts of pizza is an amazing thing to do right now if you can't donate blood.  
California Pizza Kitchen was handing out stacks of personal pizzas to people waiting in line at Waterford Lakes when I was waiting to donate. 
Donation centers are at capacity for the day, but they're asking everyone to donate as the week goes on.  
I live right down the street from the club myself, absolutely crazy, I'm glad your friend is safe. 
I literally live 300 feet from the club. Went out of town for the weekend to visit my family and woke up to this madness. It's insane. 
Holy shit. That's so incredibly fucked up of them.  
I would say he wasn't thinking of the other people.  He wanted to keep the shooter away from him.   
I feel bad for all the nice people who get tangled up in this shit. 
Please make sure your friend knows that there are *many, many* Americans -- including in places where he might least expect to find them -- who understand that not all Muslims subscribe to the ISIS interpretation of Islam in the same way there are many Christians who do not subscribe to the beliefs of those so-called Christians who would discriminate against the LGBTQ community.   
It's now officially the worst shooting in US history.   :( 
And I'm hearing about in on /r/AskReddit .   Reddit is pathetic now. I used hear about breaking news as soon as it happened. Now my wife is beating me to the punch with her Facebook feed. FUCKING FACEBOOK.    I don't know what the problem is but the admins need to get their shit together, or I'm going to have to find another site to get my news from.  
An off-duty officer was working in the club, exchanged gunfire with the suspect when he began shooting on the main floor at approx 2 AM.   Two additional officers responded, initiating the hostage-taking and subsequent standoff.  
Unfortunately, it's looks like SWAT waited outside for over 3 hours while he executed everyone inside.  They said it was a hostage situation while people inside were sending out texts that he was rounding up and killing everyone. 
News said a police officer opened fire on him as he was going into the club at around 3am, they didn't go in after him until 5am because he had hostages.  Meanwhile accounts are coming out from inside saying during this time he was lining people up killing them anyways.  2 hours wasted while people still being killed. 
God that is awful. I'm glad you and your friend are okay. What happened today was terrible, I hope we can one day live in a world where these kinds of tragedies don't occur.   I definitely can't relate the kind of fear the victims and their loved ones must have felt, but I hope they can get through this.  
As an American who is appalled by this type of violence, thank you. I am terrible sorry for your lose and about what happened in Paris.  
This comment brought tears to my eyes. I'm sorry you had to experience such horrific terror in your lifetime.  
The shooter's father has apparently said that he had become angry after seeing two guys kiss in Miami.  So yeah, seems like he hates gays and this was a hate killing.   
While it's too early to tell, I'd lean towards that was part of their MO last night.  
These are very hard to read through, I get lost halfway through each page and the graphics are confusing. 
Thanks. Fwiw we do have "newsworthy" megathreads here time to time, hence the specific flair and purple coloring in the header.   Robin Williams passing was our first "Breaking News" megathread, with Muhammad Ali passing being the most recent. There's also a link in the sidebar allowing you to filter only breaking news stories (along with our other flairs like "Serious" and "Modposts").  
Seriously, I first saw this on Facebook after being on reddit for 30 minutes. That's never happened before. 
Probably is. How many times has he had to make the same speech during his presidency? Gotta get disheartening  
I got banned for mentioning that the shooter is Muslim. 
That is a *great* recommendation that I never would have thought of.  
After what happened this morning, that's not even shocking. 
18th time he will have done this during his presidency. Shame.  
Cookies come to mind. And if you're in the area, you can make those! My thoughts go out to everyone impacted by this. 
Target donated liked 500 cases of water, and the publix in South Downtown did the same.  
For real. I was talking to a Sikh guy in my area once, and he told me that Sikhs wear turbans and keep small knives (kirpans) as an indicator to those around them that the Sikhs are there to help those in need. 
I'm glad you're safe.  Something like this, happening in my own neighborhood... I couldn't even imagine. 
Well that was officially the most reluctant upvote I've ever given. 
I feel like there really is no "right" thing to do in that situation, especially given the fact that you would be in save my ass mode. I don't how i feel about it, but i can Definately see rationale. 
People will say "you can't blame them." But I am totally blaming them.  
It really, really sucks.  As someone who has personally lost friends (both muslim and non-muslim) to extremists, to see so many people blame our entire population hurts a lot.   
For some reason, that I can't even explain, when I heard that the Orlando Mayor declared a State of Emergency it really sunk in.    It's terrible, but you have to give all of the rescue works/police extreme credit. From the things I read the shooter had no plans on letting anyone in the club live.    It's something that just makes you feel numb and sad. Thoughts are with all the people affected by this tragedy.  
The mods censored it.   This is the first time Ive seen both liberals AND conservatives so pissed about something. Both the liberal subs AND Donald Trumps subs both have the censorship as their top post right now.   Not the shooting itself, but how the mods of /r/news censored it.   First time Ive ever seen both sides this pissed about the same thing.  
I wouldn't be surprised if r/news loses default status over this. They are censoring discussion of a serious tragedy because of their political views. Though it doesn't matter *why* they're doing it, the fact is that THE default news subreddit is not allowing discussion of the absolutely most newsworthy event right now. I suspect the admins will do something in response. 
Bizarre that it can found here in an askreddit thread - unbelievable  
Sadly, we know too well what you're going through.  
I heard that since incidences like Columbine, the strategy is to rush the shooter(s) with SWAT asap rather than playing it out.   
To be fair hindsight is 20-20 and the police might not have had all the info on what was happening on the inside, I'm sure it was very chaotic and they didn't want to charge in and make a mistake 
Thanks for your kindness.  we need to stick together.  
Angry about two guys kissing in Miami? You may as well get angry about the sun shining in Miami. What a fucking stupid crazy evil sonofabitch.  
His parents weren't. Media likes controversy, don't forget.   Next week is going to be really shitty for me -.- 
i love how the character in the graphic is standing there awkwardly like 'so....yeah' 
My girlfriends parents (Seniors) heard about this before I saw it on Reddit.  
Reddit says its the front page of the internet. The fact we have to get info from non news subs makes me question that. This is how you piss off users, both acounted and casusal readers. Makes me think ill go somewhere else for the next big news story.  
Out of the loop and /r/news mods. Mind giving a summary?  
I lived in a commuter town in New Jersey for most of my life.  After the 9/11 attacks, there were several cars that stayed in the parking lots at the local train station. Their tires would get more chalk marks every day as the parking attendants noted their time not moving. Tickets would accumulate in the windows. And eventually it became clear that the people who owned those cars weren't ever coming home again. They'd get towed, or claimed by family members or next of kin.  Eventually, they'd all gone.  And I'm not sure which was worse, seeing them there, or seeing the empty lots after. 
It seems as though every time this event comes up on Reddit, I learn of a new thing to bring me to tears, but somehow this did me in worse than anything ever has. The thought of being a firefighter, and knowing what that sound is, standing there and hearing so many of them, and you're totally helpless. I just cannot imagine what that must have felt like.  
As someone who has participated in the planning and tactical side of things, they have to have a plan.  Rushing a building full of civilians and getting in a call of duty style gun battle would make things infinitely  worse. People won't just stay down, you'd have gun fire, people running for cover, running right through the line of fire, the gunman just starts blindly firing, things really go south.  3 hours seems forever, when you armchair qb it, but from initial call, to resolution is an acceptable span of time in my mind.  
On Facebook someone posted a video of a health care worker reading the patients they received through out all of Orlando. Unfortunately my friend Frank is not on that list. My heart is heavy. Thank you Reddit for your kind words.  
It's visible how much he has aged mentally and physically throughout his presidency. 
We could always order stuff from Amazon Prime Now for them. Get them what they need. 
I dunno how their badass hats are gonna help but the thought is appreciated.  
I'm not even trying to be insensitive. As a gay man, this is terrifying to me. It's going to make me think twice about being open about my orientation to anyone who isn't a very close friend. 
According to the edit, the alleyway was already filled with people piling on top of each other to get out a hole in the fence. I'm choosing to believe that guy barricaded the door to save the lives of the people he was witnessing, clamoring to get out of a fence. 
Unsubbed /r/news . May I request everyone to please do the same and teach those biased mods a lesson. Throw their subreddit into the garbage. 
Was reading about this about 2 hours ago, went to do other things, my friend told me the death toll is up to 50 now, went back on reddit to read about it and had to keep scrolling down and down and down... 
Russia got a lot of shit for the (likely) carfentanil / remifentanil gas used in the moscow theater hostage crisis of ~~2012~~ 2002. The gas itself was probably responsible for the deaths of many hostages, but a coordinated response team with naltrexone / medics with bag masks, especially in a young, relatively healthy population (not the food / water deprived hostages in the moscow theater), could become a viable strategy, especially if the assumption is going to be that hostages will die anyway.   
FBI seems to be indicating there were ties to terrorism as well, so it may have been a planned attack 
"Hey man, I know this looks bad but you'll be fine. You just gotta keep your head up." 
Mods started nuking everything once FBI confirmed he was Muslim. 
Every other sub. r/askreddit at this point. Why subscribe to something that isn't gonna do its job anyway? 
I assume the families didn't have to pay the tickets right? 
Can you imagine him being woken up at 4 o'clock this morning and what must have been going through his head. I mean when I get woken up in the middle of the night and it's bad news there's a limited amount of things that I think it might be. But as president of the United States oh my God could be anything. 
Amazon should engineer a disaster relief button on their app where organizations like Red Cross and Blood Donation centers can create a wish list for anyone to buy and send to them.  
The turban is worn to show that the person wearing it is a Sikh. So that everyone who see can see that said person is a Skih.  
I'm not sure it was the shooter's intent, but that's literally the definition of terrorism. 
They weren't at first. The story was on the front page when it started to come out but as soon as they found out who the shooter was they started censoring the hell out of everything. 
I will unsub from /r/news but are there any better news subs?  
I can see they're actively removing threads for it... 
The gas was a good idea but the execution of the whole event was awful. They didn't have enough medication to treat everyone affected by the gas and they let people choke to death unconscious.  
I strongly suspect this is an ISIS-fan terrorism attack. He probably had no actual ties to ISIS, just wanted to do "his part" to ... uhh what is it they want to do? Well killing gay people probably looked like a good way to help the global effort to this guy.  
Actually though, shout out to the /r/askreddit mods because this was a better thread than the ones at /r/news. 
Shit, I learned about this shooting from /r/smashbros  When the Super Smash Bros subreddit is breaking news before /r/news, something is *seriously* wrong. 
I'm sure you have to become somewhat desensitized. You see a lot of shit in 8 years as Prez, at this point it's probably a sigh and an audible "fuck" 
Well I feel like out of all of the presidents Lincoln had more reason than any to look that way. 
I think that Lincoln comparison is more to do with camera quality than his own aging.   I mean, he did age but the overexposure and poor focus are clearly doing him some favors in the first image and are nonexistent in the second. 
That is actually a genius idea. You should submit it to them. No joke.  The only thing about amazon is that it takes a while for delivery. But I'm sure something could be worked out for situations like this.  
If you didn't, I sent off a couple emails to amazon linking your comment with the urging that they at least research the possibility of implementing this. I hope you have as well, I feel we aren't the only people who would help.  
So like a homing beacon of badassitude and honor.  For real, whenever shit hits the fan, standing near brown people with cool hats always seems to be the wise choice. 
I'm sad to say the death toll in this one is probably not finished. The trauma surgeon at ORMC said he expects to see that number climb throughout the day; many of the victims transported to the hospital were in very critical condition.  
Throwing out the baby with the bathwater.   Gays, guns, Muslims, terror, we have pretty much everything contentious topic in this country in one event, of course it's going to be a shit storm.  
I agree 100% r/news is now dead. Worst censorship scandal ever.  
I've seen /r/QualityNews and /r/TrueNews advertised a good bit today, in light of the /r/news *failure*. 
He honestly seems really upset every time there is an attack like this. It's something I really admire about him. Especially when he spoke about Sandy Hook, I felt like he was speaking as a father, not just as a president.   
"Honestly, if I were two-faced, would I be showing you this one?"  - Abraham Lincoln in response to an accusation by Stephen Douglas  
Yea I can agree with that, the most striking issues though are his hairline being insane and the forehead creases. 
I think i will. Prime Now can deliver in 2 hours. Even if some sort of disaster extends that delivery window to much longer, it can still be pretty valuable. Amazon has massive wearhouses full of emergency essentials.   This can also help to thwart misuse of funds a little if we are sending the necessary items directly. 
Disney World sort of is. They've got an entire land mass bought out, which holds all four parks, security, transportation, emergency response (police/fire/medical), and even water/power facilities.  
I don't understand. Why are the mods censoring? Like, what are they gaining from it? Thanks  
I think it's because he feels so powerless. This is one of those things that despite being the most powerful politician in the country no matter how much he wants change to happen and how hard he tries it simply won't happen. He has to make a speech anytime something like this happens and talk about how awful it is, all while knowing it will happen again and again. He knows why it's happening and how to stop it but he can't. 
People think that our current presidential candidates say childish things to each other during debates.  When Lincoln and Douglas were debating everything was free game including the families of them both. 
I'm sure Amazon could kick in the accelerated delivery charge if people are buying disaster relief goods from their site... this is a really good idea 
apparently he pledged to ISIS just before this. Also, Ramadan just started, and ISIL leaders are proclaiming mega-rewards to anyone who does acts like these during this time.   
My guess is that they delete any comment mentioning Islam. Only a guess, though. Can't imagine any other reason they'd delete so many comments. 
How do you claim your ISIS mega-reward when you're dead? 
Isaac Asimov covering Hitchhikers guide to the galaxy, or vice versa, Douglas Adams covering Foundation 
OP: You need to get some of these big name authors on board to do these for charity 
For pure ridiculousness, I'd kill to see how Jane Austen would tackle something like 50 Shades of Grey  
Kurt Vonnegut's cover of A Song Of Ice and Fire.  So it goes.  So it goes.  So it goes.  So it goes.  Here is a drawing of an asshole: joffrey.jpg 
*The Notebook* by Milan Kundera  Jesus Christ OP thank you so much for this. 
*Howard Phillips Lovecraft Presents the Queer Case of one Harold Potter*  The book is 220 pages long and ends with Harry seeing Voldemort on the back of that guy's head, taking a gun from Hagrid, and blowing his own brains out.  
Romeo and Juliet by Lemony Snicket.  *Dear Viewer,*   *If you entered this play with the hopes of seeing a light comedy, you would be better off searching elsewhere. This story may begin like a light comedy, when Romeo and Juliet meet and dance at Masquerade Ball, but don't be mistaken. If you know anything about the Montagues and Capulets, then you will know that no friendship between them will last.*   *In fact, within these scenes, the couple must deal with the horrors of murderous in-laws, poisonous drinks, poetry, and mail arriving late.*   *I am bound to tell the story of these tragic events, but you are free to exit this theatre and go to A Midsummer Night's Dream next week.*   *With all due respect,*   *Lemony Snicket* 
Clive Barker covering The Ender's Game with his own fantasy elements and deep elaborations thrown in. 
Terry Pratchett's *A Game of Thrones* book series. 
I feel like Chuck Pahlaniuk could cover the hell out of 'Moby Dick' for some reason.  
TIL I only know like five different authors and one of them is Dr. Seuss. 
Percy Jackson and the Olympians by China Mieville. 
Stephen King covering House of Leaves.   If we can include comic book authors and cartoonists, perhaps Hirohiko Araki to take on Calvin and Hobbes. 
The Maze Runner series by Philip Pullman   Pullman wrote His Dark Materials, a story about kids with actual adult themes, they even fucking kill God in it...  If anyone could take the somewhat interesting premise that started the Maze runner and actually turn it into something good, it would be him. 
George R.R. Martin does The Lord of the Rings.  Each book is 800 pages long, we get viewpoints of all members of the fellowship, more important characters die, more *typical GRRM stuff* 
Lemony Snicket's "A Series of Unfortunate Events that Led to the Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire *(by the late Edward Gibbons)*" 
The Bible as written by the following supergroup: Tolkein on the poems and songs Mordecai Richler on the dialogue Stephen King on the narrative Battle scenes written by Bernard Cornwall With special telling of 'Salome' written by Oscar Wilde and Margaret Atwood presents: Lot's Tale 
Iliad and Odyssey by George R. R. Martin  I had so many thoughts on this question, I think I'm just going for karma at this point... 
Douglas Adams' version of the Narnia books. It'd be way better.   Neil Gaiman's version of Outlander. 
Tolkien's rendition of The Novelization of Toy Story. 
Cormac McCarthy's *The Giving Tree: Or the Evening Sunset over Manhattan* 
Art of The Deal but covered by actual Donald Trump with no ghost writer or editor 
Star Trek writers' versions of all the Star Wars novels! 
Jesus, Christ- that's brilliant. Some kind of literacy push. I'll wait until the discussion rounds out some more, see what kind of things people are fiending for, and then if try and take a step forward with it.  
While I pondered, in detention   Suffering for my dissension   Wond'ring if my hand could write another broken law     When suddenly, there came a knocking   Breaking silence, ever shocking   The classroom door was now unlocking, like a waiting monster's maw   "What if toilets" my mind wondered, "Were monsters with seat maws?"   A comic on that I will draw.  Suddenly, in burst the teacher   Eyes flaring like a brimstone preacher   Except that I did notice he had one apparent flaw   His shirt was gone and out of sight   His pants and shoes had faced his might   He was almost as naked as when born to dad and ma   'Cept for a cape and skivvies, he stood bare 'fore us in awe   Quoth the captain, 'TRA-LA-LAA!' 
That which is dead for millenia tends to stay dead; only by unholy machinations of a macabre nature could something be resurrected beyond its time.  It was in this way that John Hammond, entrepreneur, dabbler in necromancy, and generally respected man in society sought to play with life and death for personal gain.  But that which sleeps beneath the earth yearns only to be surrounded by death. 
Conversely, *Redwall* by George RR Martin. Although all the animal sex he'd undoubtedly include would get creepy as fuck.  
That would be the most unsettling book ever written. 
I feel like this is what the story should have been. It has all the potential to be really dark and gritty, but it decided to focus on a love triangle instead of the interesting stuff. 
I'd love to read a Terry Pratchett take on a Tom Clancy or Michael Crichton novel. 
He did write a book about a boy with magical powers who goes to school and proves he's quite the special one.  It ended up about as well as you'd expect from the Discworld. 
Would you like it in your mouth? Would you like it further  south? 
As much as it pains me to say it, I don't think that's such a far stretch.    *Mr. Grey flashed me the whip handle from the belt of his uniform and grinned. "Won't you join me in the gaming room, Ms. Steele?*  *The nerve! "Heavens, no. That would be terribly improprietous, Mr. Grey, and I intend to maintain my ladyhood."*  *"Very well, my lady. I shall call on you again, when you are feeling less proprietous and more inclined to adventure," Mr Grey smirked, sending a flush through my cheeks!*  *I would feel no such thing! Why must Mr. Grey infuriate and excite me so?* 
"To whom it may concern: It is springtime. It is late afternoon."   [DIES] 
My pleasure- your suggestion rocks. It made me think of another: Salman Rushdie writes the Twilight Series. 
Oh man, I laughed really hard at this. People just accepting their miserable transformations. No one else caring. 10/10 would imagine again.  
I read all of them. All. The quality is all over the place 
As the twelfth toll of the dilapidated clock on the wall outside his cell marked the first hour of his eleventh year, young Harold Potter sat upright in his nightclothes.  Eyes wide and soaked through with sweat he tried to burn the gibbering pnakotic half-things that haunted his dreams of late away by lighting the only candle his captors allowed.  His labored breathing slowed as the flickering light danced on the wall of the space beneath the stairs at 4 privet drive.   The solace of the dancing shadows would prove to be fleeting however, as it was only mere hours before the winged harbinger of magicks beyond description arrived, screeching and flapping, and marking the end of youthful innocence and the dark shapes and mutterings of a child's ignorant nightmares.  After this day, the visions that haunted Potter's sleep would coalesce into a singular, tangible horror that ubeknownst to him, had on one occasion already almost taken his life... 
Well, if HP wrote it, then it would be 300 pages of some anonymous third party vaguely retelling something "really really awful..." 
Until:   *At which point Mercutio exclaimed "thou a poperin pear!", a phrase which here means...* 
I just realized I miss *A Series of Unfortunate Events* 
That's amazing.   Unrelated, but I'm curious about your r/username. Schlitz the beer? 
Exploitation on a train  Exploitation on a plane  Exploitation here and there  Exploitation everywhere!  Proletariat, show your might:  Workers of the world, unite! 
My name is Inigo Montoya, and I want you to hit me as hard as you can.   
I'd read anything Terry did a "cover" of....which actually is pretty much what half his Discworld books are really, just covers of famous stories 
Speculation: Harry ditches the wand in favor of a couple of enchanted revolvers.  
The adventures of Frodo the heroin junkie and Gandalf the male prostitute.. they find this ring, man, and they figure it's worth a fix and a handle of Popov. So they head to the pawn shop, but it's not easy making it through the shire aka North Hollywood. 
Or classic work of literature written by Donald J Trump would be intriguing  
The Jews would have been lost in that desert for so much longer than 40 years. 
Saruman's point of view is featured in a couple of chapters and you actually kind of agree with him. 
We'd have, at most, two out of the three books done. 
Gandalf would probably die in the first book and never return.  
I didn't realize how badly I need Margaret Atwood's version of the story of Lot until now.  
I actually kind of want to read Neil Gaiman's Hitchhiker's Guide.  
If this isn't a "Best Origional Question" nomination il eat my hat.  
Props to OP. It's gonna be recycled in a few days though cause the askreddit mods are doing absolute jackshit to maintain quality 
Please don't contact George R. R. Martin, please.  
He wouldn't get to the animal sex, he'd get stuck writing about food. 
He's written several extremely unsettling short stories. They're awesome and full of great ideas and some of those ideas ended up in his childrens books.  Just a fun fact for you. 
Two things; one, just realized that Holden Caulfield is just the shitty little love child of Hemingway and Paris Hilton. Two, the sentence "I take my dog, Tinkerbell, seriously" is phenomenal.  
Just read Salem's Lot and imagine the vampires want to cuddle 
Pratchett taking a go at Le Carre' or Flemming would be interesting.  
I've always thought of *Equal Rites* as a kind of gender flipped Harry Potter. The books are more dissimilar than they are similar but the similarities are still there. 
I would not like it in my mouth I would not like it further down south. I would not like it in my box I would not like it with more cocks. 
"If I were a younger man, I would write a history of human stupidity; and I would climb to the top of the Wall and lie down on my back with my history for a pillow; and I would wait for the Others who make wights out of men; and I would make a wight of myself, lying on my back, grinning horribly, and thumbing my nose at The Old Gods" 
Dude, the moment I realized the reason she wanted to watch her son make her coffin was so that he didn't do a half-ass job....  Savage.  
Tobias: "I'm saying I'm a falcon who dreamt he was a man and loved it. But now the dream is over and the falcon is awake."  ^^^^^^^^i ^^^^^^^^know ^^^^^^^^that's ^^^^^^^^not ^^^^^^^^kafka ^^^^^^^^but ^^^^^^^^it ^^^^^^^^fits 
That's because she only wrote every fifth book or something like that. All the others are ghost written 
As a non-native speaker of the English language who's reading Lovecraft for the first time, in English, I must say that this here reads exactly like his work. I must confess that many times  my brain hurts when I'm reading his tales because of how he uses some words and phrasings that are not very used nowadays. 
Are you having a stroke or is that some type of Lovecraft spelling? 
This would actually be a fantastic way to read Shakespeare. They'd beat you over the head with the jokes until you understood them. 
Everyone else just reworked Hitchhikers quotes to be about 1984, you actually made some good effort. This was great lol. 
That's the greatest movie no one I know has ever seen or heard of for whatever reason.  
The first rule of starting a ground war in Asia is never start a ground war in Asia 
My favorite Pratchett books are his Macbeth cover and his religion medley. 
Isn't like 90% of Roland's gunslinger training about 'remembering the face of your father'? I think Harry might have an issue with that part... 
10/10 included random quotes before novel this guy Kings  
You mean like Trump 'covering' a book like *Great Expectations* (*Yuge ~~Expectations~~ Hopes*)? 
They would probably wander the desert forever, but also be immortal.  
I never got all the way through The Sil; it read like the book of Numbers  
No no, you're correct, or at least as far as I remember too. I meant it more, Pullman kills (lets God die) him in the book.  
It kind of is?  I mean there's anthologies of authors who will write Sherlock Holmes stories (I'm sure there's other examples I can't think of), and there's the stuff like Pride and Prejudice and Zombies.  There's also the stuff where they do re-tellings or base stories/movies on classic literature. So Clueless was loosely based off of Emma, Easy A was The Scarlett Letter, O was Othello.  It exists in fan fiction too, but then you need to be able to weed through the shit to find the good stuff.  Though, really someone said Stephen King and Twilight, and that would be fucking amazing.  
What's that?  You want me to write a book that's not Winds of Winter?  Sure, I've got plenty of time for that! 
Despite being economically handicapped, writers can sometimes be good at what they do rather than just using it as a mask for otherwise unjustifiable alcoholism. 
Given how much I remember Strawberry Cordial and candied chestnuts about as much as I remember actual plot lines... I shudder to think about how many ~~pages~~ chapters George would cover with table spreads. 
Yeah, he wrote some weird stuff, especially in his stories for adults. 'Pig' and 'Bitch' in [this collection](ftp://ftp.physics.uoc.gr/pub/tmp/blubb/collectedstories-dahl.pdf) gave me the heebie-jeebies. 
Guess I should read some Tom Clancy, that was a delight to read. 
~~Straker~~ Barlow is such a stone cold badass in that book. When the priest tries to get at him with his holy symbol and he's just like...nah, bruh, you ain't hard. and the light just dies down and withers away and the priest gets eaten 
Is this from Discworld? I've never heard it but it's fantastic.  
I do not like it in that way  I do not like this, Mr. Grey 
True, it's just that they're actually 35 or whatever. Which actually reduces the horror aspect quite a bit. 
tobias got stuck as a hawk; jake morphed a falcon, JEEZE 
She wrote the first 25/26 and only the outlines of the rest until the last two, which she personally wrote. 
I'm a native English speaker and his stuff makes my head hurt too. Pretty sure there's some dark magics involved 
This is pretty damn obscure, but The Rats in the Walls is my favorite of his stories. I applaud you. 
Clever. For those who don't know, a character in one of lovecraft's stories had a cat named "niggerman" H.P. Lovecraft was a white supremacist.  Though he later married a Jew. 
It's not that hard to understand. Just take all the jokes you don't understand and assume they're sexual innuendo. You'll probably be right. 
Universal did everything possible to fuck up the American distribution. They spent ages trying to edit in a *happy ending* - after all the critics had seen the director's cut at festivals and private showings. People starting asking if an unreleased film could win an Oscar. 
Wait which one's the Scottish Play? Lords and Ladies? 
Some people are calling them the Greatest Expectations in history 
Nah. They'd be forced to wander the desert to search for something they can't find, and once they find it, they can go home to the promised land. Only to find that what they were searching for is a mystic form of death itself. In doing so, making them quasi immortal because it takes so long to find it and they can't die until they do. 
The first third is like that but it gets easier to read further in. 
I mean, they take God out of the box (allusions to Pandora's box, with hope being left inside). So you're both kinda right. The kids accidentally kill God, and God likes it. Called the Authority in the book.  Source: Wrote my MA thesis on it. 
Just like all these modern renditions of fairy tales? 
That's what I was thinking. I feel like a "cover" of a book would be more restricted to transferring the original plot/characters into an AU. Which happens a lot in fanfiction, and like you said, happens with classic lit all the time. 
And by God does that man love "cyclopean architecture" 
Pleased to hear I wasn't the only one transfixed by the banquets predominantly 
Just so you know, Brian Jaques wrote those food scenes so detailed so that blind kids who were reading the books (through braille or audio book) could get the same amount out of it as non disabled kids, because it focused on tastes and smells and so on.    So the main reason for Jaques and his food obsession is that he loved to help the most vulnerable in society and he was a great man, but now we just make fun of him and he's a meme   Brian Jaques is one of if not the best thing out of Liverpool since the Beatles  
Roald Dahl regularly had articles published in Playboy. Few people know because the magazine is better known for its photo journalism. 
Stick to the stuff he actually wrote. After a while he got famous enough that he began "collaborating" with other authors. They write the books, using his characters and world building, and Clancy puts his name in big letters on the front of the book. The quality suffered immensely. Try Red Storm Rising to start. It's a stand alone work about war between NATO and the USSR set mostly in the north Atlantic and Europe.  
Run to the maaaaaze!  Jack wants your liii-eee-iiiife!  Run to the maaaaaze!  Jack wants your liiiiiiiife.... 
Jake and Cassie know thier child is a yurk and have to exploit him for information.  Tobais is a drug addict who, in a high, gets locked as a falcon. His insanity thereafter has to be kept in check.  Marco struggles to pay his bills while fighting an alien invasion.  Reachal sacrifices her marriage to the fight. Her lose is less then Jakes? She struggles with that conflict.  And Ax? Well, hes hiding in walmart stores for relative savages despite being a former prince. Why even save them?     
She also stepped in for #32, the infamous starfish cover. 
Or assume they're high comedy with no sexual undertones at all, and youd also be right! (Shakespear was a master at appealing to both the low classes and the nobility, often within the same jokes, as the nobility often wouldn't understand the slang used by the lower classes, so itd mean something entirely different to both groups) 
it means that the words match the intended meter.  you ever try to make up a song lyric but fall one syllable short or long? it doesn't sound right.  two examples.  i will not eat them sam i am.  this works in the head, now try this  i won't eat them sam i am.  doesn't quite sound right...   that's "scan" 
Shoeburyness: The vague uncomfortable feeling you get when sitting on a seat which is still warm from somebody else's bottom. 
Other's have pointed out that Wyrd Sisters is Macbeth, but I want to be the one to point out that Lords and Ladies is Midsummer Night's Dream. 
Honestly, if this was actually a story in the Simirillian, I wouldn't be surprised 
He is not going to finish it at all the way he is going. twow is like book readers Half Life 3 
The old "I read it for the articles" quip is actually not that hard to believe. Some of the articles that I have read in playboy have been top notch. 
The one where Rachel beats someone to death using her own severed arm. People usually forget that part. 
it's been three days and he's starting to act weird 
The Andalite Chronicles and associated books were far more interesting than the "core" series IMO.  
Honestly, the same way as a normal person.  I hear the voices of guys and it just sounds attractive to me.  Even though i can't "see" them physically mentally i can picture how they look.  I wasn't blind until i was age 14, but i realized i was gay when i was 18.  ( my boyfriend is blind, i just typed this out for him :] ) 
Watch the film "The Way He Looks", beautiful story about a blind gay teen and his love for a classmate. 
You ever just smell a food from afar and think to yourself "that must be delicious"?  It's like that.   Except it's dicks. 
Wonder how many blind people use reddit..... Wonder how many gay blind people use reddit... 
People are attracted to voices, personality, pheromones and physical touch. What kind of bodies do you want to feel? Etc. Sexuality is not strictly visual. But I'm a woman so maybe the male experience is much different 
I am typing this for my gay blind friend.   He said and I quote **"My cock is so fun to play with, I assume different ones would be too!"** 
I've never wanted to know the answer to something so badly.  
I'd imagine it's the same way blind straight people know they are straight, or how straight blind people know they are blind. 
Great question. I'm not blind but I am gay. Being gay,  I've watched a lot of lgbt films,  one of my favourite being a Brazilian film called The Way He Looks.   In this film a blind boy ends up falling for his male friend. There's a scene where he puts on a jumper left behind by his friend and starts smelling it.  There are other small things like where they go to the cinema and his friends narrates the film to him that shows they have a close friendship and he asks a female friend to describe how his male friend looks.   So from this film,  which I highly recommend,  It comes down to the usual personality stuff and also I guess smell and pheromones.  
This may be one of the best questions I have ever seen on here OP. Now everyone be weary of the next question that will come from this one. " Deaf gay people of reddit, how did you know you were a man bear pig?" or something like that. 
Interesting how overwhelmingly responders are focussed only on male homosexuals and not females. Just saying.   
I've corresponded with him over email for the past few years. He's a fascinating guy. Very sad story. 
That's really cool and interesting... and annoying. My brain doesn't know what to do with this information. Whether we're gay or straight seems completely arbitrary and random, very strange. 
Now that you mention it, I think a more interesting question is how blind people know they're straight. In the top comment right now there's a quote from a blind man who didn't even know the difference between boys and girls at the age of 15. The only thing you could notice that was different would be their voices! Now days blind kids probably read a lot online, but I imagine it's a difficult way to absorb that information. 
Wow, what's it like finding out he's gay just now? 
Is there a scene where he touches his classmate's face and realises he's really cute? 
Ahh, that takes me back to the golden afternoons of my youth, where, as a just-blossoming maiden, I was enchanted by the smell of dicks floating intoxicatingly on summer breezes. 
i'm a boy who likes pussy but when i smell it from afar "that must be delicious" is not what I'm thinking. 
Quite a few apparently, I've seen several posts purporting to be from blind people. Using text to speech and brail keyboards is the most common method  
I'm pretty sure it's a cultural trope that most people (men and women, gay and straight) prefer to close their eyes while kissing and turn the lights down (or even off) during sex. We might think we're all about visuals, but actually when it comes down to it, there's a lot more going on that we often don't think about. 
It's question i never knew i needed an answer too, and it has an answer that seems so obvious now 
But is that gay?  Playing with your own dick is fun because you can feel it. But wanking some guy off would just feel like stroking a sweaty ferret.   
For real, are you blind and gay? Because if so we want a more substantive answer.  
I see you in the hockey sub all the time. Big ole' phony! 
I mean... It's kind of the same as asking how blind people could be attracted to women. Because they can't see doesn't mean they don't have a sex drive. 
I want to know how many blind people troll Reddit. 
Some things in life are meant to be.   You do not have to *look* to *see*.   It doesn't take an eye to know   The thoughts that lift you down below...  &nbsp;  ^^^x)     
Humour aside, how do straight people know they are straight - did they decide one day?   
I love this movie! I watched it the other day and was very curious about the experiences of others and if they related to the movie. It was very moving.  
No it would have hurt it.  Here's why.    The sample size this pertains to it ridiculously small,  Gay, Blind, and on Reddit I think 5 of them would be a high estimate.  So a serious tag gets a lot less comments and a lot less attention if its this specialized so with a bunch of pricks goofing around you're liable to head toward the front page, where it might be found by one of the five.   
A non-trivial percentage of people have accessibility issues but still use the internet! They rely on things like screenreaders to read the text for them, and accessibility-forward design like high contrast colors, big fonts, etc.  Source: I work for a company that cares a lot about accessibility in our apps. 
blind people have better hearing and smelling sense  
i'm pretty sure blind people can use computers. not entirely sure how but they must 
Ok that's officially the best I've ever been gotten by that 
I like how even though the coach is blind, you can still see the expression of amusement primarily in his eyes. Love it! 
Oh wow! Now that's an amazing story. The coach has this really charismatic look to him. I guess it's just confidence. 
Did he ever find a fulfilling relationship? How does a blind person gauge the attractiveness of people? 
Yeah, without a [Serious] tag, this whole comment section is just people trying to one-up each other with lame puns.   Glad I could find atleast one real answer. 
As a non-blind gay guy, I can actually relate to his anecdote a lot. Beyond just appearances, there's something about men that just feels different from women. 
How does a blind person go about reading something online? 
1 subscriber 117 online  Something isn't right here... 
That must be the Bradford Pears. 'Round here, we call 'em jizz trees.  
I can usually sense the sex of people close to me if we're close enough, even if i can't see them.  I dunno if it's smell specifically though, i think we're kinda wired to be cued in to the differences.  Animals always seem to know. 
Is that how it works? They blow each other's minds? 
I mean, I get how they post stuff, but imagine having to start reading a post, not knowing at that point if it's going to be a shitpost. I mean, you can see them easily, but I'd feel betrayed every time I started reading braille or starting the "text to voice" and it turned out to be the marine copypasta again   
Reddit has pretty bad accessibility tags in their markup though.  
Oh he was balls deep in what he thought was his boyfriend at the time.    
I'm a little concerned at how familiar you are with what a sweaty ferret would feel like. Also concerned about the dicks you've jerked off if they feel like a sweaty ferret. 
They have gadgets. Refreshable braille, which is hardware that have retractable pins. They also can get screen readers that translates screen contents to synthetic speech.   Source: obsessed with Christopher Gorham who played a blind guy in Covert Affairs 
He never did. I think he said that a lot of attractiveness is in voice for him.  
this makes me think that there is some scofflaw somewhere who is illegally blind.   
I am legally blind without glasses (ie; I could not legally drive without glasses, and also I can't see shit), but I would never call myself "blind" anyway, since I think that has more of a "literally cannot see shit" connotation.  
**Boss: "you know I'm gay, right?"**     **OP: "oh thank god you knew. I didn't wanna be the one to have to tell you!"**     The perfect response, I'm stealing this, no wait, this is mine. I made this.     
It's very hard as a gay person to openly discuss your relationships with straight friends and coworkers. Some people like to say they are accepting or tolerant but get uncomfortable when you bring up anything at all personal, even if it's subconsciously, and others will say things like "I don't hate gay people but why do they have to shove it in our faces?" And it's bound to happen every so often before you know if someone is truly neutral about sharing relationship stories.  The easiest solution is to just not say anything, and so many of us just want to live our lives. It's not the biggest burden and there are many people who are worse off, but it's not fun to always have that thought in the back of your head. 
As another gay guy, can concur. I can look at women and say she's pretty out gorgeous and even consider if I would bang and occasionally I would bang. But I simply don't feel I could connect and love a woman on the same emotional level as I could with another man. For me women are more strange and complicated than they are to straight men. I was and still am a masculine guy, my friends are all men and straight, with a handful of women most of which are butch lesbians or brohoes. I just don't connect with or understand women very well at all.  I feel more comfortable with men. There's just something about holding another man intimately that is just so far and away different to doing the same with a woman. It's indescribable.   
Assisted reading devices/programs. Basically software that reads a page out loud for you. 
You realize this whole thread is online and intended for blind people, right? 
Many blind people, including myself, are able to listen to our TTS software multiple times faster than a sighted person can read. So at most, it takes maybe 3 seconds for us to realize it's a shitpost :p. 
Not really. Reddit is an example of a site with good accessibility. Source, blind guy. 
not all republicans are gay. only the homophobic ones.  
I got you, blind homies, here's a translation:  *face, mouth open about to speak, with a finger raised up*  next image  *same face, mouth closed, finger no longer raised, but lowered*  fin 
It's science that gives us skyscrapers and airplanes, but it's faith that brings them together.  Have a blessed day! 
When are you going to tell him that you're just using him for sex, and you'll never be a couple? 
You should be more concerned about what I am doing with sweaty ferrets 
No more thirds for Frankie, it's seconds from now on.  
Not every gay guy wants a dick up their ass either... 
That's really depressing.  I'm going to make a point to share his story with the "being gay is a choice " crowd.   This guy's case is yet another example of where "choosing" to be gay has literally no benefits and leads to a sadder life. No way he "chose" to be gay. Thanks for the response.  
I am sighted, but I met my current boyfriend online through video games. Before I had ever seen a picture of him even, I was very attracted to his voice.  Later we met and everything worked out and here we are still dating 3 years later, so I think there is merit to being attracted to a person's voice. 
You're under arrest!  It's a crime you can't see how hawt I am. 
It's funny, but I basically had this issue with a friend of mine. I knew he way gay quite before he came to terms with it himself.  When I he told me "I have something to tell you and I'm not sure if you'll be ok with it"  He seemed rather surprised when I told him "dude, if you're telling me you're gay, I've known for a long time"   
My response will get buried, but I absolutely love hearing about significant others, gay or straight.  I'm a straight male, but love to gossip and chat like a beauty shop girl.  Weird, gross, interesting, or personal, I'm 100% game.  That's why I prefer having female friends and working with women, they seem to be way more open than guys are.  Or maybe I'm just nosy and/or a creep. 
I used to be of the "just don't shoce it in my face" crowd, but I worked with a gay lady a while back and would talk to her pretty often about events going on in our personal lives. I realized I didn't actually think anything about her being gay after a while, no different than discussing the same shit with other dudes or straight female coworkers.  She brought up a good point about that one day, which is that in our area there aren't many gay people, even fewer who are openly gay (very consevative rural area of the bible belt. Most people who are gay from this area tend to move to more populated areas where bible thumping is less of an issue), so for most people here it's kind of foreign. Once you're used to it, it's not even really a factor you think about. 
I think it's a matter of willingness.. you have to be willing to love more than others can love you back.. I feel like him, I'm crazy in love with my wife and I love to think she feels the same way but is not mandatory.. I love her regardless.. we've been together for 8 years I still check her out Everytime she walk past me 
was thinking the same way when i was reading that......now i imagine a blind person sitting there having a post read to them from a text to speech software and then it gets near the end of a long speech, then in 1998 ...... 
In theory there should be an aria-label attribute on the save button for comments.  
Maybe. He also happened to be very stoned, so that may have weighed in. 
I can see perfectly well and I needed this translation, thank you. 
Funny story. I was at work a year or so ago and someone made a crack about gay for pay. One of my coworkers made the point that we would all be gay for the right amount of money. I think he posited that a million dollars would do anyone in, and that it sure as hell would work for him.  So we started haggling him. Would you have gay sex for 900,000? Of course he said he would. Long story short we found out that he would enthusiastically suck a dick for like 2500.   
And who's sweat is on them since ferrets can't sweat. 
And some straight people like dick-shaped objects in their ass too! 
I knew my brother was gay long before he came out to the family.  He asked me to get something from his room once, but forgot that he left all his gay porn mags on his bed.  Later he tried to claim that it was for a college class in Human Sexuality, but that was a total lie - they don't make you buy 30+ gay porn mags; if available at all, they'd be viewable in the reading room at no charge.  Anyway, it was a shocker to walk in on that, but it certainly explained a lot of things about my brother to teenage me, like why he never had a girlfriend but had plenty of 'guy' friends. 
My family had taken bets with each other (of 5 bucks) whether I would come out as Gay or Bi from when I was 5/6. My mum won big when I was bi. 
I am a straight male but I get along WAY better with women and gay guys.  My two best friends are gay guys (both of whom I've known since childhood.) Why?  It seems like most of the straight guys I know are always trying to make fun of each other or out-wit each other, crack jokes, or talk about sports.--I don't like small talk, and I'm not into sports very much.  I like deeper, conversation-type questions and...conversations.  I hope that makes sense.    So, unfortunately, it's really, really hard for me to make new friends. 
It's honestly the same stuff as what happens in straight relationships but with different pronouns, I've noticed. It's harder to deal with my poly friends, if only because trying to keep all their love interests straight gets a bit confusing after a while.  
Tell me if this has ever happened to you (because it's happened to me more than once)...   The two of you are out somewhere... dinner, a party, whatever... She leaves your side for a minute... off to the restroom, mingling, whatever... While she's gone someone catches the corner of your eye. Not that you're eyeing other women, just that subconscious moment when someone catches your attention and your mind fires off "whoa, that's an attractive woman"... and then your conscious catches up as your turn your head to look and you realize... "Yeah, that's my wife coming back into the room". That's one of my favorite feelings/moments in my entire life. I wish it upon *EVERYONE*. :) 
I tried to stifle a laugh while pooping and hurt my butthole. 
Thank you to leading me to this glorious person. This is like reading poetry written by a particularly raunchy poet. 
Dude. I got you.  For people who don't want to click, this is a sub about putting your dick in your own ass.   They say it's the best thing ever but it looks really uncomfortable.  Apparently the goal is to put your balls in there too, what a world!  Also I am triggered and literally shaking because of these shitlords who have big enough dicks that they can *fuck themselves*. Mine doesn't even reach past the gentleman vegetables.   
This seems like it would be easy to play off as a joke though. I'm guessing you didn't think of that in the moment though. 
Thanks man!  I know.  But sometimes I think being torn between two genders is a damn curse when everyone around you is so sure about themselves. 
That's pretty interesting and I didn't expect it that fast, but I certainly skim through articles faster than that. Plus skipping to the end to check it it's a shitpost still works better.   Also, I can't imagine how horrible continuous spelling errors must sound. 
I've been duped by Vargas a number of times. Never disappoints. 
You should probably go play with a few more cocks to be sure. For science.  
I have no interest in clicking, but I'm curious about the logistics. I assuming these guy are tucking their dicks under and between their legs to insert into their butthole. Impressive lengths aside, surely this can't be done when the dick is hard? But if it's soft, how could they possibly get it in?   So many questions, so little desire to be scarred for life! 
Ok I sucked a different dick. The good news is I got my job back. The bad news is now I have a reputation to uphold. 
You're not being torn dawg. You just get to enjoy the best of both worlds  
Now I'm just wondering how many times Microsoft Sam has spoken these words. 
I feel this is a rare chance to respond to a comment simply because I'm Welsh on Reddit. But in doing so would imply I'm into beastiality....  Argh well, I'm replying anyway.  I'm here for any questions 
Yeah because even with the small sample size he's technically gay unless he plays with some more dicks.  
That's not all you have to uphold, eh eh?  (I'm talking about balls) 
I'm in a successful straight relationship of 6 years.  She was the first person I really opened up to about it.  The bonus is, I guess you could say the relationship is "open" and I get to explore who "me" is.  I think if I was expected to be either gay or straight and didn't have an understanding partner, I'd go nuts. 
It's said the welsh invented the condom, thousands of years ago, from the intestines of a sheep. Later, an Englishman realized you could remove them from the sheep first! 
What's the inside of a sheep feel like?   Do they follow you around when you finish?   Are they wondering if you'll call? 
Well, he's enjoyed 72.72% (repeating oc) of the genetalia he's played with. 12.5% of those he enjoyed were dicks. 
Key question: how is the rice going to be prepared? Steamed? Fried? Any seasonings added to it? 
Beer. Even when that beer is Coconut Curry Hefeweizen and it seems like it would taste good over rice. It definitely does not.   ...not that I would know or anything.  
Can you imagine the people working in the grocery store are thinking with some kid coming in every 15 or so minutes buying more rice and various other items?  *There he is again, what the hell?* 
This is so strange. What made you decide to do this? I really love Reddit at times like these. 
Hot dogs and hamburgers (I have a theory that this is actually delicious but never tried it) 
Damn OP, if you really are eating all this shit you have a lot of cardio to do tomorrow.  
OP: you should take a picture of your "experiments"! 
I do feel like rice goes with nearly everything... umm, maybe strawberry jam?  OP, be careful that you don't get sick! 
Holy shit, this entire thread is amazing.  10/10, OP. You get gold. 
Ice cream, only because as a kid I was often lectured on not being able to have two good things together as in "You wouldn't eat ice cream with rice. That's why you can't have X with Y" 
I'm so sad I missed this ):  This is the shit I love seeing on Reddit. More meta community stuff! 
Mint mentos: 8/10  Fruity mentos: 8/10  Mint mentos with rice: 6/10  Fruity mentos with rice: 7/10  Thank you for your suggestion. 
Good old basic steamed rice. The only thing added will be the food that you give. 
Jelly beans: 8/10  Jelly beans with rice: 4/10  Little too weird on the textures and not the best flavors either. 
Smores ice cream: 10/10  Smores ice cream over rice: 5/10  Sort of a weird taste when put together, not too pleasant. 
Slice of pumpkin pie: 9/10  Slice of pumpkin pie with rice: 7/10  Like peanut butter, this really masks the rice and doesn't change it too much. 
Don't need to go to the store for this one!  Leftover spaghetti from 2 nights ago.  Spaghetti= 10/10  Spaghetti over rice = 9/10, tastes good but is sort of a weird blend together.  Thank you for your suggestion. 
So this one had to be cooked for various reasons. I boiled the rice and the ice, and I was left with rice.  10/10 
Orange juice: 10/10  Orange juice with rice: 3/10  I don't think most drinks are good with rice. 
Jello: 10/10  Jello with rice: 8/10  This really should be a thing. 
Hot dog: 8/10  Hot dog with rice in the bun: 8/10  This is pretty good, would reccomend for anyone wanting to try something different. 
Finally getting to this!  Rice crispy: 10/10  Rice crispy with rice: 5/10  Weird taste to be added to rice cripsy. Not the right cereal to be rice'd. 
Maple syrup: 9/10  Maple syrup with rice: 6/10  Does not go to well, but better than other foods. 
Yoplait Yogurt: 10/10  Yoplait Yogurt with rice: 9/10  really weird but kind of tastes like a foreign dessert. 
For sure. Probably gonna go to the gym later and do a whole pushup then come eat more. 
Impossible, but it can be made bad with other things on it. 
Lemonade kool aid powder: 0/10 how is this good?  Lemonade kool aid powder with rice: 1/10 I guess?  It's like dissapointment in a package! 
Minty chewing gum: 9/10  Minty chewing gum with rice: 4/10  Bubble gum: 8/10  Bubble gum with rice: 2/10  The rice gets stuck in the bubble gum pretty badly and makes it have an awkward taste and feeling.  Thank you for your suggestion. 
Soggy bread: 1/10  Soggy bread rice sammich: 4/10  I guess it helped a bit.  Thank you for your suggestion. 
I don't need gold, just seeing others giving me an excuse to eat food is good enough (: 
Are all these ratings theoretical? Or are you trying each response yourself? 
i didn't realize everybody was teleporting the food to you.  
Are you claiming to actually be eating these combinations? I don't see how that's possible since most of your comments are only a minute or two apart. 
I could imagine sticky rice wrapped around a hot dog and lightly fried until the rice is crispy would be quite tasty 
You should make a site doing nothing but this.   I know I'd go to it. 
My favorite machine at the gym is the snack machine 
You could burn the rice considerably. That would make it pretty bad. 
I am weird, I used to eat the powdered drinks unmixed.   It was a more of a love for the citric acid than anything else.   I once got chemical burns on my tongue from eating pure citric acid.    
If it makes any difference Ghost Peppers aren't even the spiciest thing known to man anymore. 
I like this one. Definitely the most begrudging "thank you." In your whole post. 
Then age 4 years, God. The youth today are such slackers! 
I can't believe you're 14. You're the coolest 14 year old I've ever seen period. Question: how much money did you spend doing this thread?  Also: make a youtube channel for this stuff. Would be amazing. 
I went to the store so many times so here's pretty much their reactions:   First time, oh hey you're buying stuff.  Third, oh look its you buying stuff again...  Fifth, okay I can tell something is wrong with you.  And every time after that they just look at me and I stare them in the eye and say nothing. 
Of all your responses in this thread, this is my favorite. Thank you for doing this cross-over between an AskReddit and an AMA. Next time, you should do "spaghetti + [blank]".  
Lava isn't the hottest thing known to man, but are you going near lava? Didn't think so.  
No you're still an accident, but you're our accident :) 
The hilarious thing is that no one even cares if he's lying, the rice has spoken.  
What makes you think he's deliver rice pancakes all the way to you?? 
"My webcam is broken/stolen/on loan." Calling card of the internet liar. 
I actually may do that, but noodles are a bit more expensive, so I'm not as sure. 
"Why won't you let me shoot you? It's just a 9 mm, I could've used my shotgun!" 
Yes, how could he not take pics?  Samsung phones even have a camera mode for food pics. 
Well, he did add the "smores" bit, so one can assume that smores ice cream is the only flavor he had on hand. 
Sure but you can't finish on me, you have to finish   over rice 
Who needs logic when you can get internet points that do nothing? 
I deliver pancakes to fat people for money on tuesdays. 
Seriously, Jesus Christ even if he's not actually doing all these his responses are making me laugh so hard I peed a little.  
Are you kidding me? That's almost an instant reply while you are on the frontpage getting flooded.  I'm not sure I have ever seen so much potential in a person of your age.  By the way, would you know a quick and easy way to count the number replies OP made in his thread? I'm suddenly very curious. 
Just read through the last of the thread and I've decided that I love you. You are genuinely one of the funniest redditors I have ever had the pleasure to stumble upon. Thank you for making my day good again!!! 
I live at \*\* \*\*\*\*\*\*\* \*\* \*\*\*\*\*\*\* \*\*\*\* \*\*\*\*\*\*  Runescape. 
My neighbor who is 94 called me last week and said she is terminal and has about 4-8 weeks to live. Super nice lady I have always enjoyed talking to. She asked me to mow her front yard until she dies. I'm happy to help as long as it's one less thing she has to worry about.  
I have stage 4 brain cancer. I have confidence I will beat it though. I had it 19 years ago when it was self contained, so I have a good idea what to expect. This time it is inoperable, because it is skull based, but chemo begins next week. If I don't make it, I am content with that. I found out who I was and what I wanted out of this life 19 years ago, and no, unless your work is really important, it will never define you. I can say that I truly lived and can die at any time without regrets and full of inner peace and happiness.  I can't tell you how important it is for all of us to take a step back, look at the big picture and find out what is really important to us. After that, life becomes very clear and the way to live it becomes even clearer. 
I work at a company that sells snacks. If anyone would like some, just PM me and I can put together something for you.   I know its hardly anyones "BUCKET LIST" but hey, maybe someone out there just wants a cookie before they go.  
I have a very rare autoimmune disease called dermatomyositis. It's very similar to Lupus. I'm not terminally ill, but I'll probably have a shorter life than most. I'm not asking for anything but if anyone who has or knowns someone with a similar disease and wants to talk please PM me. :)  
 He doesn't need anything but I wanted to tell you all my dad has liver cancer  and it has metastisized. He still feels good but at his last  Dr appointment they wanted to get him started on paliative care so it's not looking good at all.    He wants to go fishing with his only grandson... but I only had him 3 weeks ago so he's not going to be up for fishing this year.  
Cirrhosis, 28, Apparently have had two versions of Hep C for a very long time, Day to day and I've accepted and don't let it bother me. 
Reading all the comments here, wouldn't it be a great if we have a Make-A-Wish Reddit edition for people who are suffering and/or terminally ill? 
At one point during my cancer treatment a few years back I was given 2 weeks to live. My bucket list just consisted of seeing loved ones and telling them I loved them.      Then the drugs started working, and I beat the fucker. So I could go back to ignoring their texts. 
I have inoperable grade IV  lymphoma and i have been relatively lucky with everything so far. The one thing i would change would have been for my wife to want to stay for the end, that would have been good. It's really hard to explain your situation to someone that doesn't have cancer. I am 32. 
What I want more than anything in the world is to get better and live happily ever after with my husband, my kitten, and hopefully children someday. There is a chance I may get better if I find the right specialist and treatment. However, each day of pain I feel the life sucked out of me.  I'm hoping to go cage diving with great whites. In October is my 10th anniversary so I'm hoping husband is up for that. I love sharks. I need to go to a few Red Sox baseball games too.  
I could die tomorrow, any one of us could. So how can we help each other today? 
Just putting this out there... I am a professional tattoo artist in Scotland. My clients quite often tell me of their "bucket list", and getting the tattoo is definitely on it.   If anyone is from Scotland here, and in such a situation, I'd be more than happy to help you out with it. Just drop me a pm or something.    
Not me, my best friend. He's 54. His wife turned 50 over the weekend. We've known each other 35 years. He's got stage four mesothelioma. Six weeks ago he was given 4-12 weeks to live. He's a rationalist, not a believer, and wouldn't welcome your prayers. He wouldn't welcome your pity either. I don't think you can help him. He doesn't have a bucket list because he's been there, done that, and has a t-shirt collection. What I think he might be happy about (I'm not going to ask him) would be if you were to just love a bit more, hate a bit less, and maybe go to your nearest animal shelter and adopt a new friend. 
Made an account just to share this.   I have been diagnosed with inoperable lung cancer and have been given 6 months to live. My doctor is pushing chemotherapy but I really don't want to die that way.   I haven't told my family yet. My wife wouldn't understand and my father is getting married in a month. I'm going to wait to tell them until I feel the time is right.   In the meantime, I have no one to talk to about this. If someone has the time, I'd love someone that I can talk to about this. Getting the stuff off my chest would be absolutely fantastic.  
I'd also love to help but am jaded by scam artists. All I imagine are people conjuring up well crafted fake stories to get free stuff. 
Actually, I'm going to go ahead and chime in here, if there's really someone who reads this, please PM me, and I will do whatever is within my power to get you what you need.  I'm in a rough spot and feel the need to give back.  :)  So this thread will be my outlet.  
Also, is it too late to make this a [serious] post? 
Is it good that there's no terminally ill people posting here? 
My cat has a little under a month to live, and although I don't know exactly what she wants, I've been giving her non stop attention, any food she wants, and a Christmas tree to sit under since that was her favorite. 
One thing I've seen people do when it comes to their children is to record messages for them at different stages of their lives. Graduations, driving, maybe a marriage. I've also seen people write out cards and noted for every bday that they will miss. It might be heart breaking, but I know that your kids would love and cherish those cards/videos for their entire lives. Might be something to think about. Maybe even recording a video of a hike, and guiding/showing them the world through your eyes. Something that will stick with them no matter what happens to you. Hope this helps. 
I had a 75 year old neighbor that I grew really close to.   She called me asking if I could help set her new tv up, then we tallked about music and movies, then she set up a weekly movie/music night and the neighborhood would get together to watch movies.  One day she came out sluggish and told me she had a cold and wanted to cancel movie night, then that night she fell and just like that couldn't walk anymore.   Ended up being parkinsons, and I had to watch her slowly lose any ability to speak or move while being completely conscious.  The last movie I watched with her was Ferris Bueller's Day Off.   That was a year ago and for some reason she has really been on my mind lately. Simply mowing the lawn for your neighbor probably makes her day. Its company.  
This is seriously so awesome of you. My dad has cancer and my mom has trouble taking care of him and our big yard. Our neighbors who we rarely talk to have started mowing our yard when they mow theirs. It means so much to just have someone help. Way to go!  
If your dad wants to go on a ride on a coast guard boat. Let me know. I can give you a tour of the harbor if I am not on leave when you show up.  
I honestly and sincerely hope that your father looks nothing like Hemingway and just wants to have one good trolling before he goes. 
Key West is wonderful. Skip the Irish bar (my wife was the most Irish thing in there) and eat at Blue Heaven instead. But do go to the Hemingway house and pet a 6 toed cat. 
Pm me a name and an address and I'll get something sent from Manchester UK :)  
She may or may not be into this, but I believe there's a /r/randomactsofcards or something like that. People send kind postcards/letters/greeting cards at someone's request.  
I have 2 1972 VW Buses sitting in a warehouse outside Cleveland, OH. One is a green and yellow tin top the other is a yellow Westfalia. They both run, not split widows but still fun enough for a good road trip. Let me know if you are interested.  You can certainly borrow them. 
My dad's in the other room, dying of Stage 4 pancreatic cancer right now. You probably already have heard this a billion times, and most likely are already doing it, but please please ***please*** take the time to openly speak to him. Tell him you forgive him for anything you might have ever felt wronged for, tell him you love him for everything he's given you or done for you. Because without it all, good and bad, you wouldn't be where you are today. I love you stranger and hope you can cherish every single second of being with him. 
u/unsuitablewoodchuck , this comment needs more upvotes and comments.  Surely we could crowdsource this. u/itsamamaluigi what part of the country/world should everyone look in? 
In all seriousness, if you drive through Utah to see the salt lake or salt flats, message me. Family time is important, but expensive. I'd be happy to host you guys for a night or two to save on hotel costs. Those places add up.  
Let me know if you hit the DC area on your road trip.  I have tons of hook ups in the city and can definitely get you some interesting sites to see ;)  
Are you doing anything for you kids to remember you by? Like writing them letters for the future, or making videos of yourself? 
I'm not dying, that I know of, and only have had one health issue that's popped up a few times (spontaneous pneumothorax).  What you said is spot on though. People go through life like their jobs, possessions, and money are everything.  It's what it gets you that matters. Financial security is important, but beyond that, I don't care about my job.   Living your life is what matters, however you want to do it.   
Hey man, I really needed to hear this today. First thing I'm gonna do tommorow morning is call my mom and tell her how much I love her. Thank you so much for writing out this beautiful message.  
It's 14 that's the MMO. There's a new expansion pack that comes out on the 20th (16th for early access for those that pre-ordered) of this month called Stormblood. There's a bunch of stuff on the cash shop that you can buy for him, too, like emotes, costumes, housing items, etc.  Check your PMs for a little something to send your dad. 
I could send him an original soundtrack CD I got signed by the game director a few years ago if you think that could make him happy. PM me.  
I just got back into FF14 myself. My headcanon now includes the fact that one of my Bard's Songs is about a Southern Rogue who fought for the people of Eorzea with such ferocity and compassion that Death himself was reluctant to go after him. And if Death did, it was only grudgingly, knowing there'd be one HELL of a battle to do his job. :) 
I would love that, but I'm just chronically depressed and anxious. Don't want you to be taken advantage of.  
My sister has this.  She's doing a lot better than when she was first diagnosed but it was rough the first couple of years.  That is very nice of you to offer your support for those struggling with similar diseases.  
Take him anyway, even if the kid is in a carrier.  Let your Dad talk to him and tell him about fishing and show him things.  Record it with your phone and save a copy to your computer and keep it for when the kid gets older.   Learning those things from a Grandfather is just absolutely awesome, even if it is years after that time it actually happens.  Also, watching your Dad talk to your kid will be something special for you as well. 
I see in your AMA that you might someone to write a musical about you and your stuggle. I'm a composer (not professional). I don't know if I'll be able to write a whole musical, but I could write something maybe. 
I really wish I could donate but - I'm gay, so I'm not allowed to. Wish things were different. 
It's good to accept it, with some things that's all you can do.   My mother also has severe cirrhosis of the liver and probably has a year or two left.  
Oddly, buried beneath a bunch of "look how huggy we are!" posts.  Does it affect your quality of life? 
I assume you've talked with your doctors about the new drugs for Hepatitis C, Harvoni and Sovaldi from Gilead Sciences.  I had to bring it up because, if they haven't discussed it with you, you should ask about it. 
I've got a chest freezer and questionable morals, maybe even some dry ice (and a LOT of weed)?  It's not quite what you're looking for, but I'm sure we could rig something up if you can make it here. 
Gotta be honest, this post made me realize how uncomfortable I actually feel about my own mortality. I'm right around your age, and to feel the expectation that I won't life longer than another year gives me pause. I could be in your situation at our age. I admire your ability to function with that cloud, because honestly, you might live til 2050, and I might have an aneurysm next week.   Peace, blessings and full life to you.  
Your family members aren't liable for your debt once you pass. So stop stressing about it, and make sure they know that so creditors can't pressure them into paying! 
My dad died from the same cancer. He had the same conclusion about his bucket list. Just quality time. I flew down to see him once a month in his last 6 months because that's what we both wanted. Nothing fancy, just spending time together. People who knew him knew that about him and funded a big portion of my plane tickets. I'll be grateful forever for that.  
One of my assistant's fathers has glioblastoma. He was originally randomized into the placebo group of a trial for treatment. She tells me the treatment worked so well, they had to switch everbody over from the placebo group to the treatment group. He wears some kind of battery pack that sends a low level of electricity through his brain (as it was explained to me) that keeps the cancer from growing. The trial was through Duke and Sloan Kettering, and the device was made by Novocure.  Look for that trial and see if it is appropriate for your finance.  If you can't get in, see if you can get some kind of compassionate use to get the machine.  God bless.  
I'm so sorry, let me know if he does need anything and I'll try to help! I'm pretty good at macaroni art and glitter covered cards, so that could be neat.  All jokes aside, I'm willing to help if I can :) 
The good news is, with early enough detection the survival rate is somewhere around 70% I think for cervical cancer, and the treatments are so much better than they used to be.   I am so sorry you are going through this, let me know if there's anything I can do to help.  I've actually been through this before (my didn't spread, but the uncertainty while I waited to find out) so I'm always a PM away. 
PM me and I will do you one better. I will introduce you to someone at Disney, working in the Imagineering department.   Because dreams are worth pursuing. 
This is a great idea! I'll look into the the 501(c)(3) requirements to create one. Anyone know what the best way to be visibility on this is? 
You're a fantastic human.  Wishing you all the luck and hope. 
I'm a mod at /r/redsox, I'll keep you in mind as sometimes last minute tickets show up on the sub. Do you live close to Fenway for short notice games or would you require some more advanced notice? Weekday vs. weekend games? 
That's why you should always dress nicely. You never know when you'll die unexpectedly and be stuck with that as your ghost outfit forever. 
This world isn't easy -   It's hard on your own -   We're richer united,   and poorer alone.  It's fine to ignore it -   For better or ill -   To scorn it before it   collapses your will.  But if you can *fight* it -   Or choose to be *strong* -    Perhaps you can right it,   repairing a wrong.  It's plainly apparent -   It's simple to see -   Together,   we'll weather   whatever will be.  &nbsp;  ^^^:)   
Don't think that's needed mate, from the comments here I can safely say Reddit isn't that bad. 
Thanks. I've been journalling the past months for each of them and just basically rambling and telling stories. I've thought about the birthday cards idea as well, but haven't done it yet. Great thoughts about the video hike! I'll definitely add that things to do for them! 
This was touching, my grandmother is very far gone with dementia right now and I'm glad your neighbour was focusing on a happy memory you gave to her, even if it did get elaborated over time in her mind, you obviously made quite the impact! my grandma is 8+ hours away from me and with a lot of my moms side (who are all wonderful) but I have guilt for not being there as much as I want to due to work that's hard to get away from and life and finances ...I hope she's thinking happy thoughts about me, even if they are made up !  
I have been fortunate enough to know 8 of my grandparents and great grandparents. Some have passed and I know how much little things like not having the yard mowed can get to someone. Also it's one less thing that the family had to do. Hopefully they spend an extra hour with their grandma.  
Totally unrelated to this thread, but I love your username! I'm a huge fan of Dashboard Confessional!   Also, that's really sweet of you. My dad passed recently, and he was Coast Guard for years. We want to scatter his ashes from a Coast Guard boat, if that's possible. We think he would have loved that.   Thank you for being awesome!  
I'm working on getting that information together. Thank you so much! 
We're in Twin Cities area.  Thanks for responding! Maybe there's someone near us who'd be willing to share their bus for a few hours. I'm just not sure how to even look for something like that. 
"It's ok to die" would be a good epitaph. I could imagine something along "It's ok to die, don't let that prevent you from living" for mine if I decided to be buried (which I wouldn't) 
If you drive through Arizona, I'm in Tucson and would also be happy to host. I have one cat.  
Omg. I dont know you or the OP but your offer just made me cry. That is so incredibly kind of you. 
Nobody ever sat up on their death-bed and said "Damn! I wish I'd spent more time at work!".  I sometimes wonder how people felt about spending so much of our short lives working before the industrial revolution.  I get the feeling that back then, even the lowliest of workers could go home at the end of the day knowing they'd actually accomplished something.  And at the end of my life, seeing that I'd accomplished something, however humble, would be a comforting thought.  I fear that now, every person who's life isn't a failure but isn't what they hoped it would be, will see their live in the 'service industries' as a waste of 50 years. 
You are an awesome person. Thank you. I already bought that expansion for him as a Father's Day gift, but thank you for the suggestion! 
No, please keep it! He won't be able to keep it for long, so it's better kept by you. THANK YOU for the offer, though  
wow it sounds like she's really living with a lot. Your happiness is just as important as hers so if you two are happy today I wouldn't stress so much about the distant future. Like you said, who knows what could happen?! And adoption is always an option if you want a family. Who knows, there could be a medical breakthrough/ better treatments in the future. Stay strong! 
Totally agree...i missed an opportunity for my son to meet his great grandmother before she died. Even if he never remembers it, having a picture or video of that fishing trip would be priceless. 
I'm crying right now.  Since my dad died super suddenly, one of the things that have really freaked me out is that my wife and children will not know him.(I'm single atm.). You're a good person  EDIT--the amount of support and the outpouring of kindness I have received is incredible. Thank you all so very much 
Nope, nothing really, just letting it happen, listed as an organ donar so hopefully something good comes out of it. 
Nah, just the whole if i wanna end on my terms or not and how in the back of the head. 
Work as a pharm tech. Filled Harvoni once.... $33,000 a bottle of I think 28 tablets. 
Depending on the country, that may or may not be true.  
My Uncle died of the same cancer as well. My mother was in denial so my wife and I pushed her hard to go out there as much as possible. He lived five months from diagnosis and she ended up being there when he passed. All things considered that was a good last five months where they focused on being together as a family. 
Most good doctors look at the risks vs reward. If it's a 99% chance that the patient will be in a wheelchair peeing in a bag to leek an extra 3 years out of their life then you would much rather take the next 1 year and get lucky. Also make sure that it is the patients decision to go along with the surgery and it is not the pressure of the family or the family overruns the patients decision. So live with what you have but extra days does not always equal/ determine more enjoyment/ happiness.  
I know where to get a 2,000 lbs crate of dry macaroni. (Seriously, they're huge)  
Thank you, I appreciate it! I'm more scared for my kids if anything, you know? I don't want them to be scared or worried. They are all under 6, so I obviously haven't told them. I left work for the pregnancy, and now this. Times are tough.  If you don't mind me asking, what did you have done to get rid of it?  
Great idea, but I can't seem to find a valid file there, without installing extra extensions and add-ons that I don't care to install.   Thanks for the idea though! 
Before applying to the IRS for tax-exempt status, your new nonprofit needs to incorporate. Becoming a corporation typically involves choosing a legal business name, filing necessary documents with your state's corporate filing office and creating bylaws to dictate how your organization will be run.  Pick a redditor in the state with the lowest filing fees (Delaware), incorporate.  Then apply to the IRS.  It probably takes 6 months total.  Once you're a 501c3 there's all kinds of organizations who will give free stuff to help you technically, like salesforce (for CRM), bluepay for credit card processing, and veritical touch for mailings.   
Appreciate it :).  I tried lyrica, along with pretty much everything else. Sadly I get the same effect: nothing. I don't know why but drugs in general don't seem to work on me, I always feel the same as before.  This unfortunately extends to painkillers as well. I have oxy and stuff (prescribed) but even that doesn't really worK well enough to bother and simply increasing the dosage won't ever end well. 
I've never been so early to a sprog comment. But, fuck man, that was beautiful. You're seriously talented. 
 "'And what would humans be without love?' RARE, said Death." 
Once you have it send me a pm as well.  Also if they have any particular interests. 
You forgot to pay the tax of one picture of your cat. 
That's very sweet, but don't shed a tear on my behalf. Ive spent a lot of time and money on vapid, selfish arrogance and complete disregard for the feelings of others.  Im just trying to put a dent in my innumerable sins. 
Not OP, but also had a spontaneous pneumothorax and yep! Tall thin male. 
I don't remember where I first heard/saw this, but I never saw a gravestone that read "John Smith, A beloved, hard working employee"...  
I'm an FFXIV player too. I'd be willing to get him a little something for in-game. Do you know his character's name and server? 
My paternal grandfather was dying in the same hospital I was born in, and my mom told me when I was younger, that my dad grabbed teeny-brand-new me, ignored all the nurses, and brought me to see his father for one visit before he passed on. My dad's a whacko, but I'm glad he did that. 
I know what you're feeling and it's super normal. My mother died when my wife was pregnant with our second child (currently pregnant with number 3) and it still kills me that my two youngest won't get to know their grandmother. My father ended up remarrying, and she's taken on the role of Grandma, and she's amazing. I feel shitty for saying this, because she's a amazing grandma to my kids, but I definitely wish my mother was around for my kids. Life happens in this way, and the best thing you can do at that time is surround yourself with love and constantly (like i do) share stories of your dad (in this case, my mother). 
I'm this way, but it's not a medical condition. I have belonephobia caused by countless injections, stitches, and multiple surgeries after a severe car accident when I was 13. They basically had to sow my face back together, then cut off some scar tissue that didn't heal quite right on my gums, and then restitch it.  I'd love to donate blood, but I can't even pick up a sowing needle without a rush of cold sweat. My father in law thought I was "being a pussy" and came at me with his diabetic syringe. In 15 seconds I was on the ground shaking in the fetal position covered in sweat.   I wish there were some way I could help. I'm an organ donor, because I'm pretty sure I can handle needles when I'm dead. But other than that, I use phlebotomists as vomit target practice. I always warn them, and they never understand. 
As a 15+ gallon whole blood donor, I heartily endorse all your advice! 
Wouldn't having hep make you nonviable as a donor? 
I finished a 3 month course of Harvoni recently, my stepfather is Egyptian and managed to source it for me from Egypt. It was $600 total. It breaks my heart and saddens me that such an amazing cure is so inaccessible here when it's so cheap everywhere else.  
This is what I am terrified of.  There is no happily ever after with this tumor.  The outcome scares me to death and I don't want to think of a life without him, but know that is reality.   I am so sorry for everyone's losses.  Cancer sucks, but Glioblastoma is a horrific asshole that never goes away (sort of like my ex-husband). 
My wife and I work in a hospital, I wish more people understood this simple logic. Don't prolong someone's life for your own selfish desires.  
I have no cervix now.  They cut it all out because it didn't spread, and then I took some pill form of chemo just to make sure.  It was super easy, but like I said, the waiting for the results was the WORST.  :(  Also, I don't have kids, so between that and my missing ovary due to another medical issue, I'll probably never have them, so that sucks too.  And yes - telling the kids definitely requires something more definitive. :)   
Thanks for the info. You have some knowledge in this area? Right now I am brainstorming ways how the non-profit would work generally (ex. funding, making sure the story is true, logistics of making a wish happen, visibility, how to build a sustainable foundation, etc) 
Took a bad fall while snowboarding. Apparently my joints in my back are permanently inflamed. 
Serious, have you tried weed? (At least for temporary relief). I know someone who has fibromyalgia and they get relief from it. 
I'm in the SF Bay Area. I have a 1969 VW Bus. It has a new engine, but it is just a shell, no interior other than a driver & passenger seat. How can I help? 
I'll ask him. It's SouthernRogue, I'm pretty sure, but I will double check! 
Very good. PM me, we'll trade details. Let's talk to him and see what he has in mind. Shouldn't be too hard. 
Holy crap that's an insane difference. Unless there's an under-supply, they really do just want to juice out the money.  
I work in a hospital. One thing I often want to say to family members is, please don't let your loved one die here. Take them home. As long as they're here, we'll poke and prod them until they or you say "stop." Most people don't realize that being in a hospital is the least comfortable you can be if you're dying or ready to stop treatment. It breaks my heart to have to stick a needle into a 95 year old for a blood test that is irrelevant at this point, but he's here and we have to show that we're doing something. It also really makes me angry at the system. 
Never though of it like that. I guess that's why euthanasia is such a difficult subject when we put our own feelings and beliefs over the person who needs help.   Thanks for this comment, puts things into perspective.  
I'm sorry about that :( there is always adoption, or other options, if you decide having a child is right for you and your future :)  How was the process and recovery of them cutting it out?   
Yup - I have tons of knowledge in this area. :)  If you want you can PM me and we can talk about it.  I probably don't have time to handle the day to day but I can definitely help with paperwork, process, and technology side :)  Almost like a board member :-P 
I think it's crazy that opiates/oxy has no effect, on him. Like, if you upped the dosage enough, it'll numb it all but possibly get you so high you wouldn't like it. If those don't work, would weed really be strong enough? 
I always love to see older gentlemen/woman enjoying Video games! I'll login tonight and see about sending him something. 
As someone who also works in a hospital, I can't upvote this enough. My father died two years ago and his last days were spent in our living room, surrounded by his family. No had to leave to get some sleep or take a shower. We laughed, we cried, we watched old home movies, we held his hand and when he finally passed on, we were already home, not in a sterile hospital. I know it sounds scary, you may be afraid that it will make you feel weird about your house, you may be afraid you can't keep them comfortable, etc but please know that, if it's possible, it's the best way to go through this incredibly hard experience. Hospice nurses are truly angels that walk among us and they'll help you through every last detail.  
And also it's sometimes hard to even see it like that. People say, "How am I being selfish, I'm helping you live longer," without taking the time to really talk about it. Euthanasia is an extremely difficult subject for us to talk about without seeing it as giving up but after 70, 80, 90 years of life and only seeing pain and suffering at the end of the tunnel, it's a conversation we must have and actually WITH the person in question, and not FOR them. 
SUPER easy.  I mean, it's not the most pleasant when it's occurring, but I was walking the next day like nothing had happened.  You have to wear pads though, and no tampons or anything for a while.   :)  Overall I'd say it's one of the easiest (but grossest because of the whole pad thing) medical procedures available.   
I'm a member on bethematch.org and curious how they notified you? 
Thanks for the support! You guys gave your Father the best, most loving send off! And I agree, it doesn't make it seem weird in the home when someone passes there in a loving environment. It seems quite natural, actually.    
That makes me feel a lot better. So they kept you awake through it? I'm a wuss when it comes to pain and procedures.  
Oh you can't miss it lol, I got multiple emails, texts, letters, and phone calls, even other members of my family got phone calls asking to get in touch with me. If they manage to match you they'll make sure they find you one way or another.   
I honestly can't believe it, how is it possible that virtually every model was so wrong? 2016 has been quite a year 
I feel like I'm living in a future GCSE history exam question.   'In 2016, the UK voted to leave the EU,and Donald Trump was elected president of the United States. Discuss.' 
I like to believe that the silver lining in this is that both parties will see how broken they are and make some changes, leading to future candidates that are actually likeable, trustworthy, and honest people. A girl can dream, right? 
My favorite part about watching this victory speech is watching Trump JR try to stay awake 
Man, I'm still pretty shocked.  2016 will be a memorable year. 
Man, 2016 has been a weird year. I don't think anyone would have guessed that Donald Trump of all people would be the US president. 
"Donald Trump Beats Woman to Take Black Man's Job." 
Can you imagine if someone had been in a coma for like 6 months and woke up to find out that the Cubs have won the World Series and Donald Trump is the new President-Elect of the United States? 
Fingers crossed Trump is just the biggest troll in America and ends up becoming the greatest president we've ever had. *please*  
I don't ever want to be told I need experience for a job ever again.  
Must be the one of the most embarrassing defeats in political history for Clinton. 
YouTube comments represent this country more accurately than I thought. 
I have only seen one or two Trump supporters on my facebook feed until today. Now just about every post is thanking God Trump won. It is shocking how many supporters were in hiding. 
2016 does seem to be the year, right or wrong, that people said 'no' to the establishment.   An uncertain and risky future maybe. Well, Americans wanted to know what Brexit felt like. 
As a Canadian in Mexico right now, I'm frightened. I have to get back over 2 walls. 
Breaking news : jokes about Trump being president not funny anymore 
HOLY SHIT.   DOES THIS MEAN THE 2020 ELECTION....WILL BE   **Donald Trump VS Kanye West**?!  What....the actual fuck.....  Battle of the memes. 
Celebrities, Reddit and other social media were so vocal about their support for Hillary that I actually thought she was going to win.  Looks like conservatives are just quiet.  We got M. Night Shamalangadingdonged. 
People are talking about Trump and I'm just here worried about Vice President MIKE PENCE. He's the real threat in my opinion.. 
Trump won as the anti-establishment candidate. If only the Dems could have nominated an anti-establishment candidate... Oh wait. 
BARRY, YOU HAVE TO SAVE THE TIMELINE. GO BACK. PLEASE, BARRY.  
Random tip: go out and buy some newspapers today. Your grandchildren will be able to sell these headlines for a nice amount of money if you preserve them well. 
I like how all of a sudden, /r/conspiracy acts like they never said the system was rigged. Fucking lol. 
I'm very left leaning, pretty concerned, not happy.   But I'm trying to accept it. I realize this is how conservatives felt the last two elections, and yet life went on. I have actually learned from them, not to unnecessarily plunge myself into doom and gloom, into apocalyptic sentiments. I'm going to hope that he will be a lot more normal, and stable than we thought. His speech tonight had a very normal tone, which is encouraging.   I don't know, it's kind of like hearing that you have a serious disease, but you have a chance at surviving it. I want to accept this with class and grace, and courage. Congratulations to our disenchanted, right leaning population. I'm rooting for America to succeed, and trying to have an open mind.  
First 9/11 and now 11/9.. These numbers aren't good for America.  
I have a very low opinion of the man and very little belief that this his winning will be good for the country but I'd love to be surprised. 
"Brexit totally can't happen!"  *One election later..*  **Brexit happens.**   "No way will the people of USA elect Trump as POTUS!"  *One election later..*  **Trump is POTUS.**  I think it's our collective moral responsibility to now use the power of 2016 to get GRRM release his next book.  Let's all think: "GRRM totally will not finish his books before the end of the year!"  And by law of 2016, we'll get The Winds of Winter by the year's end.  Then let's do it for another season of Firefly. 
There are already a bunch of articles about this exact topic. From what I gather from a few of them, pollsters were thrown off by the voters who didn't want to admit they supported Trump (being called "Shy Trump" voters), and by the rural white folks who tend not to respond to pollsters' calls but turned out in huge numbers in this election.   I'm sure that this election will bring about a change in the pollster profession. Most of them got schooled yesterday.  
'Well there was this cartoon frog on the Internet...' 
Well most presidents never get to follow through with most of the things they promised. Let's hope this is also the case.  Oh fuck, I forgot republicans got the Senate and house.  
I'm surprised no one else really commented on this. He was really struggling at the end. I got the impression he really needed to go to the toilet too.  
I thought so too. But then I remembered that it was nearly 3am. Gotta give a kid that young some slack. He probably wanted nothing more than to just go to bed. 
What scares me the most is his opinion on climate change. That's something that really affect every single one of us. He can fuck up his own country as much as he likes, in my opinion. They voted for him, after all. But he could do critical damage to the progress we've already made and throw us back years, even decades. 
If you told someone this would happen back in 2012, they would have thought you're insane. 
Back to the future called it.  Also the World Series winning Chicago Cubs. 
I know right? I can't fucking believe it.  Trump actually won. Trump will be our president. President Trump.  This is the most... interesting? News I've ever read while taking a dump.  The next few South Park episodes should be pretty interesting. 
Given he's flipped flopped on TONS of social and political topics in the last few years, it's entirely possible.  
And that he doesn't die. Pence is worse than him.  
I've never seen a more resounding "We don't like you".  
Oh she's done. for good. You cant come back from this kind of loss, ever. Kerry was the laughingstock of the democratic party, and he only lost George W. 
It's not shocking at all to me.  As a bartender, there have been many a group discussion on politics while CNN played on the TVs.  Everyone would murmur how "both candidates suck" and how we're screwed.  However, once the crowds cleared and there was nothing left but one-on-one conversation with the guests and I, their pro-Trump colors would show. 
You need a wife? I'm Spanish/Mexican and I can make some bomb tacos! 
20+ years, hundreds of millions of dollars, all her political favors and influence, all leading up to a campaign where she was predicted to win easily, just to get annihilated?  I would image it will take her a while to regain enough composure to hide her anger and disappointment long enough to make a public appearance. 
It's actually funnier now for the rest of the world.  
That's the scary part to me too. Even if something were to happen and Trump were to step down, we would have *Pence,* who supports gay conversion therapy, very not pro choice, pro religion in government, etc. Trump is dangerous, but he seems to mostly want the title and the power to me, while Pence knows what he wants to do. 
What I could only ever see as a joke has now become a reality. I feel like I'm being trolled by the entire American population.  
Hopefully that becomes a trend that continues. I didn't vote for him but I hope he does a good job. 
Clinton campaign made the party stonewall him out of the nomination 
Trump vs Kanye in 2020  Like seriously what the actual fuck 
Please, stop now before it becomes real. This started as a joke too. 
We joke, but the Internet had a huge impact on this campaign. It gave Trump a platform by which he turned from a laughing stock to a legitimate contender.   "Discuss the influence of Internet memes in the politics of 2016" could definitely be a history question in a few decades.  
And he gets to break the tie in the supreme court in his favor.  There are effectively zero checks on his power at this point. 
I don't think I heard anything Trump said. It was just hilarious watching his head bob up and down and him snap back awake lol 
Yeah I realized that as well but it was still funny to see lol.   He did well because we all know at his age he was also bored to death. 
An East coast state got recreational weed, a southern state got full medical, AND WE GET THR MULTI MILLION DOLLAR ONLY ONE COPY EVER WUTANG ALBUM?  this is not a half bad consolation prize 
Don't forget literally the whole entertainment industry 
I think people want to think of it as Berenstain because us little fucks couldn't spell for shit. 
Trump said he was going to end all federal green energy initiatives. What kind of example is that?  America just fucked the world. 
This whole fucking *year* has been Poe's Law incarnate. 
Thats what should be taken away from this. This was the democrats election to lose, all they had to do was put up fucking anyone else. Just some bland everyman or woman. But nope. They wanted a Clinton.  
Kerry became Secretary of State after his loss. Not bad.  
Because people don't want to be made fun of for supporting something  
I'm taking applications, in other words let's see about those tacos! 
I like how Florida voted for trump and weed it's like they know they are gonna need some serious help relaxing in the coming years 
It was on twitter, they said about 11,000 people wrote Harambe in, sounds like a lot but America does have 300 million people. I'm sure there are a lot of other goofy write ins 
Exactly, I didn't vote for him either, but his tone and the content of his message make me hopeful. He mentioned he wanted to bring all Americans together and hopefully he will actually work toward that and not disappoint us.  
I agree so much with this. I also didn't vote for him, but at the end of the day we shouldn't act like the world is going to end tomorrow, be less divisive, and wish him a good presidency. 
The Dems can filibuster everything for four years. That's really their only gambit.  The alternative is to let them run the country undivided and see what happens. The downside for them is that 2018, which would ordinarily be a great year for them, does not have a favorable electoral map since they have to defend a lot of purple seats Obama won in 2012. 
Hahaha, I was looking at this the whole time too! Feel really bad for Baron and Melania, being a political family took them by surprise.  There was one point where he scrunched his whole face up because he was holding in a yawn! 
It's not all bad.  The entertainment industry just got 4 years worth of easy material to work with :) 
Bowie dead, Cubs win World Series, Donald Trump is honest to god president.   This is a satire's idea of the future. 
I don't think anyone *Wanted* her, she just refused to let anyone else take her potential presidency. 
Maybe Hillary Clinton can try her hand at Secreta -- oh wait. 
And 4 years ago the GOP was having an autopsy because it was doomed due to demographics.  
Florida, Arkansas, and North Dakota are all red states that voted for marijuana decriminaliztion but only for medical reasons. Only blue states voted for recreational marijuana.  
I can understand this in other countries where voting is mandatory, and people who don't want to vote are forced to.   But actually going out of your way to go out, line up on a Tuesday evening and vote for a dead gorilla is some next level shitposting.  
Pro wrestler Matt Hardy got thousands of votes too lol  
When he brought up Hillary, I was expecting bashing. Was pleasantly surprised and I sincerely hope he keeps that kind of tone in his presidency.. 
To be honest I think it took most of america by surprise. I'm really curious how the rest of the world that is on reddit will react to this. 
On the other side, House of Cards and South Park are fucked. 
If only she would have refused a little harder and maybe, idk, campaign in places like Wisconsin. 
Eh it's a vote of no confidence. I feel like it's saying I don't like anybody or I am not informed enough to vote so here's my vote anyway that I support the process but I don't believe I'm  being represented here. 
I need a source on this please! My buddy was a huge Matt Hardy fan but doesn't watch anymore. He would love to see this. 
Agreed, by all measures, that was a decent speech and a good starting tone   hoping he can drop the 'crazy' act and act like a business mogul that is now fucking president of the U.S 
Right? Sanders was cheated out of the damn primary because the DNC definitely wanted Clinton. 
I live in Wisconsin and I know multiple people that flipped from Hillary to Bernie because her lack of campaigning. Bernie had 3 rallies at my campus and Hillary had one private speech.   They also did not end up voting for her today either 
It's up to Americans to hold him to his good promises (term limits, dropping TPP, finance regulation etc) and make him drop his bad ones (wall, Muslim ban, immigrant roundup, global warming denial etc). 
Global warming denial is probably his worst 'promise', especially as he considers it a Chinese Hoax. 
-Have you heard of Murphy's Law  -Yes, anything can go wrong will go wrong  -What's about Cole's law?  -No  -It's a thin-slice cabbage dripped in mayonnaise and sour cream 
Why do blind people hate skydiving?  It scares the hell out of their dogs.  
What do you call a psychic little person who has escaped from prison? A small medium at large. 
I've been told I'm condescending.  (that means I talk down to people) 
Wanna know the last thing my grandpa said before he kicked the bucket? "Wonder how far I can kick this bucket". 
Guy walks into a bar and orders a fruit punch.   Bartender says "Pal, if you want a punch you'll have to stand in line" Guy looks around, but there is no punch line.    
What's the difference between a good joke and a bad joke timing. 
Communism jokes aren't funny unless everyone gets them 
Why don't ants get sick?  Because they have little antybodies. 
My friends say there's a gay guy in our circle of friends... I really hope it's Todd, he's cute.  
My friend says to me: "what rhymes with orange" I said: "no it doesn't" 
Before your criticize someone, walk a mile in their shoes.  That way, when you do criticize them, you're a mile away and have their shoes.   
What did the pirate say when he turned 80 years old?   Aye matey 
What's the difference between a hippo and a zippo?  One is really heavy, and the other is a little lighter. 
My wife told me I had to stop acting like a flamingo. So I had to put my foot down. 
Why did the old man fall in the well?  Because he couldn't see that well. 
What time does Sean Connery go to Wimbledon?  Tennish 
What do we want?  Low flying airplane noises!  When do we want them?  NNNEEEEEEOOOOOOOOWWWWWW 
What do you call a dog that does magic tricks?  A labracadabrador. 
I've found a job helping a one armed typist do capital letters.  It's shift work 
What do the movies titanic and the sixth sense have in common.   Icy dead people  
How many opticians does it take to change a lightbulb?  Is it one or two? One... or two? 
Have you heard about those new corduroy pillows? They're making headlines.  
I used to be addicted to soap, but now I'm clean... 
So what if I don't know what Armageddon means? It's not the end of the world 
Two clowns are eating a cannibal.  One turns to the other and says "I think we got this joke wrong" 
How do you get two whales in a car? Start in England and drive west. 
Two men meet on opposite sides of a river. One shouts to the other "I need you to help me get to the other side!"  The other guy replies "You are on the other side!" 
What's orange and sounds like a parrot?  A carrot. 
I bought the world's worst thesaurus yesterday. Not only is it terrible, it's terrible. 
I want to die peacefully in my sleep like my grandfather did, not screaming in terror like the passengers in his car. 
I poured root beer in a square glass.  Now I just have beer. 
What's the difference between a BMW and a porcupine?  A porcupine has pricks on the outside.  
The police arrested two suspicious men in a car park today. One was drinking battery acid and the other was eating fireworks.  They charged one and let the other one off. 
Knock Knock  Who's There?  Dishes  Dishes Who?  Dishes Sean Connery 
I bought some shoes from a drug dealer. I don't know what he laced them with, but I've been tripping all day. 
I think a redditor's daughter came up with this, but I always find it amusing.  "Why did the chicken cross the road?" "To get to the ugly guy's house."  "Knock knock" "Who's there?" "The chicken!" 
What do you call a black man flying a plane?  A pilot, you racist.  (I made a black guy laugh with this so it must be ok) 
How did the hipster burn his mouth?  He ate the pizza before it was cool. 
My girlfriend asked if I would stop listening to Oasis, I said maybe... 
And God said to John, come forth and you shall be granted eternal life.   But John came fifth and won a toaster. 
What's the difference between in-laws and outlaws?  Outlaws are wanted. 
"Knock knock"   Who's there?   "Amish"   Amish who?   "You're not a shoe."  
I bought my friend an elephant for his room.   He said "Thanks"   I said "Don't mention it" 
What's the difference between a dirty old bus stop and a lobster with breast implants?  One is a crusty bus station the other one is a busty crustacean. 
A dog walks into a bar from the construction site across the street and says "Gimme' a beer." The bartender says "Wow! A talking dog. You should get a job at the circus." The dog says "They need bricklayers there?" 
What did the Buddhist monk say to the hot dog vendor?  Make me one with everything. 
What do you call a deer with no eyes?  No eye deer! 
2 cows are grazing in a field. 1 cow says to the other, "you ever worry about that mad cow disease?". The other cow says, "why would i care? I'm a helicopter!".  
What do you call a dog that has no legs?  Doesn't matter, he's not coming. 
Some people think it's romantic to carve their names on trees in the park while on a date.  I'm more worried about why they're bringing a knife on their date. 
I'll always remember my fathers last words:  "What the fuck are you doing with that pillow?" 
What is a pirate's favorite letter?  Some people say it's the R but it's really the C!  
What do you call a midget prisoner escaping by climbing down the outside prison wall?  A little condescending. 
one of my favorites.  I heard it slightly differently and delivered verbally.  Person1: Ask me what's the most important thing in comedy.  Person2: What the most---  Person1: Timing  
Where does the king keep his armies?  In his sleevies. 
I want to see a 'who's on first' comedy scene with this joke, a la':  *"What rhymes with orange?"     'No it doesn't'     "What do you mean, does nothing rhyme with orange?"     'No... that doesn't rhyme either.'     "Well, I know 'that' doesn't rhyme, I'm asking, what rhymes with orange?"     'No! It doesn't!'*  And so on and so forth... 
This is a Marx brothers joke! :D   Very glad to see this here ^-^ 
My wife told me I need to quit playing Wonderwall on guitar.  I said maybe... 
Does Sean Connery like herbs?  Yes, but only partially.  
What do we want?  Time travel!  When do we want it?  It's irrelevant! 
What do you call a dog with brass balls and no hind legs?  Sparky 
This reminds me of the joke about the zoo that's so broke it only has one animal: a dog.  It's a shih tzu. 
Why do programmers take infinite showers? The shampoo bottle says "Wash, rinse, repeat." 
How many Freudian psychoanalysts does it take to change a lightbulb?      Two. One to change the lightbulb and one to hold the penis. I mean father. I mean ladder! 
Did you hear about the invention of the wheel? They say it started a revolution.  
People say I'm addicted to brake fluid but I can stop any time I want. 
instructions followed clearly, am in cornwall. Ran out of land.  
If life gives you melons, you probably have dyslexia 
I've heard it as:  "How do you think the unthinkable? With an ithberg." 
My dad tried to tell me this joke and I ruined it. He asked me and I said "Um...a pilot?" And he just stared at me, deflated.  Sorry Dad. 
How many hipsters does it take to change a lightbulb?  It's a pretty obscure number, you probably never heard of it. 
My Girlfriend is strange. She starts every sentence with "Are you even listening"? 
This reminds me of my favourite line from the end of Disney's Robin Hood, where King Richard states: "Friar Tuck, it appears that I now have an outlaw for an in-law!" 
I'm an idiot. I don't get it.  [Edit] I get it now 
What's the difference between a bear that loves grapes, and a dead bee?   One's a seedy beast, the other's a bee deceased.  
The monk gets his hot dog and pays with a $20 note, but he doesn't get any money back. So he says: "Hey, where's my change?" And the vendor says: "Change must come from within." 
What do you call a deer with no eyes or legs?    Still no eye deer!  
Dis pirate's favorite letter be P. Cause without it I'm irate 
I like the variation of letting someone answer R then say 'you'd think so, but his first love will always be the C' 
If they're a fortune teller, then that would make them a small medium at large. 
My favorite way to do this, is to ask a coworker as I'm passing,then deliver the punchline hours later.  
Those never work for me. It always ends up like  Me: Ask me what's the most important thing in comedy.  Person: Why?  Me: Because it's a joke.  Person: Nah. Sounds stupid  Me: You're stupid. Timing. 
I got my son a fridge for his birthday. I can't wait to see his face light up when he opens it.      ----------      I came home from the golf course today. The wife had left a note on the refrigerator: "IT'S NOT WORKING; I can't take it anymore! Gone to stay with my mother."      I opened the fridge, the light came on, AND the beer was cold... What the hell is she talking about?      
Somebody once told me to stop playing Smash Mouth.  I said hey now... 
'Knock knock'  'Who's there?'  'Dishes'  'Dishes who?'  'Dishes Sean Connery'  
When do we want it?  Yesterday!  What do we want?  Faster than light travel! 
But, brass is non-sparking. Should have went with the model with balls of steel. 
Redditor for 5 years, last activity was this exact comment on this exact joke 1 year ago. That is some serious dedication to a shitty pun 
Until you throw an exception by running out of shampoo.  
How many psychologists does it take to change a light bulb?  Only one, but the light bulb really has to *want* to change. 
But it was the invention of the broom that really swept the nation. 
I used to be addicted to the Hokey Pokey   but I turned myself around.  
I knew I shoulda taken that left turn at Llanfairpwllgwyngyllgogerychwyrndrobwllllantysiliogogogoch. 
A thesaurus would ideally offer alternate terms synonymous with the word terrible, but because the thesaurus itself is terrible, its only suggestion for words similar to "terrible" was "terrible."  
Hmm, if you have a bar, you'll need lemons, and if you have melons, you'll need a bra. 
Noah told all of the animals to "Go forth and multiply." Two snakes came up to him and said, "We cant, we're adders," so Noah built them a log table. 
If a tree falls in the woods and no one is around to hear it, does a hipster buy its album?  
Definitely heard his voice as I was reading the punchline. 
"Don't mention the elephant in the room" is a common saying when referring to an awkward situation 
The monk then pulls a gun from his robe, points it at the vendor, and demands his change back. The vendor says, "A gun? But what about inner peace?" The monk says, "This is my inner piece." 
What do you call a bleeding deer with no eyes and no legs?  Still no bloody eye deer! 
Only except they don't remember, so you have to remind them, then you just end up dissecting and killing the joke in the end. At least, thats my experience. 
This is why i hate telling jokes too, i'm socially retarded and even if they go along with it i'm very likely to punch up the fuck line.  
I thought my wife was kidding when she said i needed to stop singing Smash Mouth.. But then i saw her face 
Sean Connery was reaching for a book on the top shelf when it slipped out of his hand and hit his head. He then mutters to himself, "I have no one to blame but my shelf" 
But at least he threw an out of funds exception which caused the loop to halt 
How many altos does it take to change a lightbulb?  Doesn't matter, it's too high. 
I thought thesaurus was some kind of prehistoric animal lmao, english not my native language either 
Doubling down on a math joke, where do you find pants for those things.  Do you think this is /r/math 
Where does one drown a hipster? In the main stream. 
Still waiting to get to the synth part of fo4.  Some asshat keeps asking me to go rescue colonies. 
But what if he hasn't defined an out of funds exception? DOES HE KEEP GOING UNTIL THE WORLD'S THREAD OVERFLOWS?!!? 
How many sopranos does it take to screw in a lightbulb?  One. She just stands underneath it and the world revolves around her.  
That is one of the funniest use of "Relevant username" I've seen. 
How many surrealist painters does it take to screw in a lightbulb?  Two. One fills the bathtub with mayonnaise and sprinkles while the other paints the purple spots on the giraffe. 
Once my Welsh friend tried teaching our friend group how to say it.  If I remember, it's like glen-far-will-gwin-gill-gary summin summin go go go*phlegm* 
So far, there are no complaints about the new all-hipster mining company.  It's pretty underground, so no one's heard them yet.   
If I get snowed in tomorrow, I might just watch it. It was a favorite when I was little. 
How many baptists does it take to change a lightbulb?  Wait.. Change? lol 
I once farted in a room full of hipsters and I watched them fight each other over who heard it first. 
How many software engineers does it take to change a lightbulb?   None, that's a hardware problem.  
Asking the important questions. Unfortunately you forgot the [serious] tag op. Now it's just going to be another hydrostatistic circlejerk. 
I asked 5 of my female coworkers and they said they don't really think about it at all, they're too busy wondering wondering what would be the best object to launch a 90kg projectile at the distance of over 300 metres. 
They're probably still thinking of the Argentina debt crisis of 2001. 
Oh goody, another one of these threads about... about...  Uh...  ...      Error 404      Knowledge Not Found     Logic Unit unable to compute     Please reboot and try again 
Guys, when girls aren't around, how often do you *really* talk about new methods to distinguish E2 and E1cb(rev/irrev) mechanisms? 
I just want to know what every girl wants to know; is Pascal single?? 
I think this is a sex joke.    Pascal's law or the principle of transmission of fluid-pressure (also Pascal's Principle) is a principle in fluid mechanics that states that a pressure change occurring anywhere in a confined incompressible fluid is transmitted throughout the fluid such that the same change occurs everywhere. -google  I think he's asking if you can feel the change of pressure inside your vagina when penetrated. 
can someone elaborate. i feel like im missing out on some comedy gold here.  
Not really sure how to answer that...but my bladder is telling me I have to pee....  However my legs are telling me that I am not going to be moving.  
Don't know that anyone will see this, but my name actually is Pascal (I'm American, not French)   This whole thread is hilarious to read. You can address all your questions on Pascals to me.  
My fluid dynamics professor used to ask questions like this followed by "...and explain it in terms your girlfriend would understand."  I was one of 3 women in the class and was slightly annoyed by his misogynistic attitude.    One day he asked the guy next to me to explain a concept.  The student was stumbling over the answer, so I grabbed his hand, held it up to his face and said, "No, Frank.  Explain it to your girlfriend."  The professor never used that phrase again.   
Well, when the guys aren't around I no longer have to go along with their assumption that STEM fields are superior, which means I can go to Pascal's wager. As a skeptic (who still adheres to a personal sort of nature based spirituality) the idea of believing in the Christian God for fear of the consequences of being wrong just strikes me as disingenuous. If God exists and doesn't want to spare someone who spends their life trying to make the world a better place but happens to be the wrong religion, then I don't want to spend eternity with such a God.  Moreover, the time I would spend believing in that specific manifestation of God could be better spent trying to better this world. In spite of Pascal's statement that you lose.nothing for believing, I see it as losing valuable time in church each week when I could be volunteering for a good cause instead.  ETA: I derped. Did not realize it was the same Pascal. Next thing you'll be telling me he was also a lizard ;) 
Your girlfriend is hilarious, but how many times has she seen Tangled...? 
That's bizarre...  Quick! I need a human, a car, and a U-shaped tube!  
Why? Please don't tell me you are at your job? If so do your damn job instead of redditing.  
Shit quailty post.  It's a blatant rip off of the Argentinian debt crisis post. 
HELP ME FELLOW HUMAN BEING, THE TITLE OF THIS THREAD ~~DOES NOT COMPUTE~~ CONFUSES ME. I DO NOT UNDERSTAND HOW HUMAN BEINGS OF THE FEMALE SEX SEPARATED FROM HUMAN BEINGS OF THE MALE SEX IS RELATED TO FLUID MECHANICS. 
I think about that literally always. Still have no idea what it is though. 
I'm fairly certain women are not an incompressible fluid.  
Can't someone make a simple scientific query without accusation of sexual connotation? 
Great, now that we've figured it out, we just need to condense that understanding into a snappy, easy to read one-liner to reap thousands of well-earned upvotes. Shit. 
Keep the Reynolds number low too, otherwise the relationship may get turbulent. 
How many pastels would a Pascal own if a Pascal owned pastels? 
I'm still mulling over which played a larger role: Brazilian competitive devaluation in the lead up to the 2001 events, or de la Rua's economic leadership and the crisis in confidence it engendered. Sigh.  
I still haven't gotten over the 1989 bowling incident 
My organic final is in two days and I *barely* understand E1 and E2. I'm so fucked it's not even funny. 
I suspect vagina juice is at least mostly incompressible  
This is science, you've got to do stuff like imagine a perfectly spherical, frictionless vagina, in a total vacuum. Then you can do science at it properly. 
That's a lot of time to spend typing up the wrong answer. Free hint: the right answer was trebuchet. 
I was just hoping you might give me some insight into the evolution of the market economy in the southern colonies. My contention is that prior to the Revolutionary War, the economic modalities, especially in the southern colonies, could be most aptly described as agrarian pre-capitalist. 
Or about the *Venezuelan* economic leadership in Alabama! 
You should probably give a trigger warning before bringing up such a traumatic incident that affected tens of people.  
Okay, so this is very incomplete but you're in an emergency situation.  E1 is going to happen when you have sulfuric acid catalyzed elimination and E2 is going to happen when you have base catalyzed elimination.  If you have any questions feel free to PM, I tutor organic chemistry all the time. 
So I want to check if that is true. I need a degent sample size, so if there's any girls out there willing to contribute that would be great.  
Would you feel a frictionless vagina? Like at all? 
Holy shit you made my day thanks friend fellow siege engineer  
Of course that's your contention. You're a first-year grad student; you just got finished reading some Marxian historian, Pete Garrison probably. You're gonna be convinced of that 'till next month when you get to James Lemon. Then you're going to be talking about how the economies of Virginia and Pennsylvania were entrepreneurial and capitalist way back in 1740. That's gonna last until next year; you're gonna be in here regurgitating Gordon Wood, talkin' about, you know, the pre-revolutionary utopia and the capital-forming effects of military mobilization. 
Did you just assume /u/marsbars4lyfe's gender AND sex!?  
How much can you get for a 3 year old, 100k karma acct? 
I don't get how that works. How do ad companies even use reddit accounts? Pushing products on redditors works as well as trying to teach a tiger quantum mechanics. Out of curiosity, how much do reddit accounts go for anyways?  
You can make MONEY selling your account? What's the going rate?  
It's like, I get *why* the nucleophiles and leaving groups and all that affect the reaction in the way that they do. I currently have an A in the class (I think, didn't do too hot on the last test). It's just that I'm awful at memorization so once we started learning 200 reactions a day I started getting overwhelmed and started slipping :\ if you have tips for memorizing all the different reactions please let me know 
DRAW THE PRODUCT WHEN 6,6-DIMETHYL CYCLOHEXANONE IS TREATED WITH LDA AND DEUTERATED WATER.  
It's mostly water, water is incompressible. Therefore vag juice is mostly incompressible. 
Yes, even without friction, the pristine baby cannon still applies force via constriction, which you can feel as pressure on your knobby bits. 
there are more fluid in people than there are peoples in our bodys 
That's really terrible. My grandson studied for years to become a professional shitposter, how is he going to get a job with all of us amateurs taking up space? 
I've always been kind of curious what the fuck that guy does with his hydraulic press when he's actually working.  ...probably something super mundane like pressing bearings into fittings while he studies English (looks up from book, slides the next work piece into place). 
Well, as a matter of fact, I won't, because Wood drastically underestimates the impact of social... 
'you read ya gaowdon wud, and regagitate ya fact, like how bout dem apples ah-eh' 
I'm not a homophobe, but I hope you have a wonderful holiday. 
Not to be an asshole, but I enjoyed your comment.  
That is LOW, /u/SpriteniteEaten, and I know low. How dare you? 
Not much more than a 2 month old 1k account. It's just enough to make it look real. 
Someone should start a group study or something on Reddit, since it seems all you students hang here all day. 
So is mayonnaise.   I learned this for a rocket project.  Don't ask. 
Met Lauri at a trade fair a few weeks back, he doesn't really use the press that much, he mostly work on the lathe or in the office.   He did reveal he would get a new 1000 ton press soon.  
I love that they wrote this fucking script and sold it *and* themselves. 
Not that I'm a sexist or anything, but I hope you do too. 
Oh, what the hell. I've never understood why reddit accounts would be bought by ad companies until this comment. 
Mayonnaise is a really interesting fluid. It is what's known as a Bingham Plastic. It behaves as a solid at low stresses, but flows as a viscous fluid at high stresses. 
Yeah, but I will have a degree. And you'll be servin' my kids fries at a drive-thru on our way to a skiing trip. 
"So I'm this like wicked smaht janitor, and Ben...well he's Ben. His bro Casey said he'll play the part of one of our friends...for free! He kinda looks like Ben, but not really, so it'll be cool.....oh yeah and Robin Williams: get him or we don't sign shit." 
I disagree with online bullying, but you have a point. 
I don't think it happens nearly as much as people bring it up on here. It's just /r/hailcorporate leaking. I've worked for many companies with a social media presence, and at every single one of them the social media posts were 100% transparent about the fact that they were the company itself. They never clandestinely bought accounts to send subliminal messages or sway votes on forums. They didn't care enough to, and simply didn't have to.   And from the other side, over on /r/leathercraft we have several companies that have their own accounts and show up in posts to contribute. Not to advertise their products or anything, but just contributing as members of the community. Tandy is great about it. So whenever someone screams "Shill" take it with a huge grain of salt.  
Of course, some reactions have weird complicated mechanisms that are easier to just memorize.  Stuff like dissolving metal reductions or the aforementioned ozonolysis, but if he's still learning E1/E2 using principles exclusively is going to be easier and better for actual learning. 
This is the kind of conversation that you just can't explain to someone who only reads Huffington post's opinion of reddit 
Roman Applesauce, bitch.  I am very drunk. I have no idea what is going on in this thread. I initially thought it was from Subreddit Simulator. 
Yea, maybe. But at least i won't be unoriginal. But if there's a problem we could just step outside and figure it out. 
Why am I reading this conversation? I'm an art major and don't understand anything being said. Damn internet. 
"Reddit users admitting to using reddit rather than studying for his finals, desperately begs reddit for help." 
The most depressing shit I saw was a tired looking couple who brought in their bespectacled, NASA shirt wearing, 8 year old geek of a son in to have some fun. The parents couldn't have been more discouraging to him. He was excitedly bouncing around the room pointing out things that he thought were clues clues while the parents dismissed every idea he had and told him to stop getting so excited. The parents took charge and proceeded to ignore the obvious clues he was pointing out and spent most of the time pursuing dead ends. Sad part is his instincts were more often than not correct but his parents just didn't listen and refused to let him explore and try stuff out.  Hopefully his curiosity and enthusiasm survives them.  
Just started working at escape the room and we have rules about not jumping out the windows and not sticking keys into wall sockets because it has all happened before. 
I own an escape room and I once guided couple into one of our more moody ambiance room and they told me "we would totally base a sex dungeon off this vibe. See, you even have a desk in here to get started!"  Also you see people's true parenting skills. My favorite quote is from a lovely family that went into a room and 5 minutes in the father gathered his overeager children and told them "you're being assholes".  We're in a huge tech area and we get a lot of corporate groups with some very important people. A week ago we had a Fortune 500 CEO through and he walked up to my staff and started bragging about his 50,000 Instagram followers, basically trying to impress college kids. We definitely giggled about that one especially when we looked him up and he had like 300 followers. But hey, he killed it in the room!   
We give people a box for them to bring in, so they can store their belongings while they play. One time, about halfway in, an inquisitive older man started going through their own stuff. He pulled out a purse and shouts guys "guys, I found some... this is our stuff isn't it" It was hilarious.  
Did a space stationed themed room. We got paired with a mother and her adult sons. The sons did just fine but mom was clueless. There was a prop fire extinguisher on the wall that she was CERTAIN had to be for something. For an hour she wandered around aimlessly carrying a fire extinguisher.  
I worked at a room escape place for a year in grad school. I learned very quickly to give thorough warnings at the start of each show that breaking things, assaulting actors (this was trapped in a room with a zombie), and sexual harassment were not cool.  (Yes, literally had guys hit on THE FUCKING ZOMBIE mid show).   Perhaps the most interesting phenomenon I noticed was just how much personality factors into the teamwork involved. I've seen a lot of shy people or people otherwise lacking in confidence be completely on the right track, only to be steamrolled by the loudest, more confident, strongest personalities in the room. Maybe it shouldn't have come as so much of a surprise, but I watched perfectly smart, reasonable people actively ignore good points, logic, and strong evidence in service of a cult of personality of charismatic players. The whole thing felt like a depressing study on group dynamics.  
Went to an Escape the Room with some friends on Friday. My one friend took his shirt off 4 times. The crazier thing that happened though was how we solved it. We were supposed to get the word Waterloo from a series of clues and use a dictionary to find that the battle of Waterloo was in 1815. Use that 4 digit number to get a key that let us out of the room. Well we got the word 'eaterloi' instead of Waterloo. We assumed that it was an anagram and we used a word scrambler to get the word aerolite from it. Using the dictionary we found that aerolite was invented in 1815. Well we got the key and we confidently told the employee how we figured it out. He was dumbfounded. I'm not exactly sure what the odds of solving the room like this is, but if someone could solve that for us that'd be dank. My friends and I have been trying to figure it out since it happened. 
The guy gave some rules to us when we were doing the room. The first rule he gave us was "Please keep your clothes on." 
Started working in an escape room around 3 months ago. This is not really a weird thing, but more a cute one. One day a dude called and told us he was proposing to his girlfriend and that they were both huge fans of escaperooms. So my boss and came up with a cool idea how we could change our escaperoom to make it more romantic and that at the end of the escape they wouldn't find the key of the room but the ring and a bottle of champagne. We also told the dude the solutions of some of the puzzles to make sure they would actually come to the end of the room.   It was the cutest thing I have ever seen. The way these two worked together in the room and how excited the dude was. When they found the ring and the champagne at the end  and he asked to marry her, they were both in tears (So were my boss and I). She said yes! After that they stayed with  us for a bit before heading their own way. It is still one of my favorite evenings and one of the reasons I love my newfound job so much.  
Obligatory not an employee, but I'm sure my friend group looked pretty weird to them. We did the one where you get stuck in handcuffs and have to unlock them, but we couldn't get the key to work on one of my friends. We assumed that there was another key to get the last person, for some reason, and left her attached to the wall for like twenty minutes.   Turns out her cuffs were broken and we had to pause the game so the employees could come get her out with bolt cutters.   They were shocked that we'd just left her there but we thought it was part of it! 
One time I did an escape room with some people from work. The final clue was "what time does Bible Study meet?" and a 4 digit combo lock. After we couldn't find any useful clues I just went over to the lock and put in 0600, 0615, etc. It opened at 0700. Apparently we were supposed to look out the window to where the church across the street had their schedule printed on a big sign. According to the attendant nobody had ever tried that before. 
Actual escape room employee here.  One couple couldn't agree on how to solve the puzzles and broke up inside the room.   Another couple had the guy surprise the girl with a proposal.   Another couple got a horror- themed escape room and just sat on the floor and cuddled. They didn't look scared. They didn't bother to solve anything either. They just cuddled with all the creepy props and sound effects surrounding them. I guess they couldn't find a creepy motel to cuddle in...? 
I'm not an escape room employee, but I asked this exact same question when I went to an escape room a few months ago. The guy working there said a man pulled out a pocket knife and started cutting the carpet out, convinced that there were clues under there 
Not an employee, but partcipated in an escape room in which a key was stuck to a filing cabinet by one of those weird little metal puzzles. The key was to open a drawer in a desk on the opposite side of the room.  No one could get the metal puzzle undone, so the guys just picked up the filing cabinet and carried it over to the desk. It was a mob themed room so we received a phone call warning about rearranging the furniture that was hilariously in character.   We escaped the room :)  
I had a group pull out a tool kit. They unscrewed every furniture to find some combinations. They didn't escape and I made them fix everyrhing, took them about an hour. 
We did an escape room one time where there were these jars with severed limbs in them. When we got out we commented to the guy running it that we found it interesting that the jars were cement glued shut, cement glued to the shelf, and the shelf screwed to the wall. Seemed like over kill to us. Well apparently the reason they do this was because another group had managed to pried the jars away from the shelf and open the jars. This is about when they realized, watching the cameras, that something was going on. So they rush in to see what's up and he hears. "Guys! We have to drink the water!!". The nasty part was the water was out of the local river a few blocks away, just to get that dirty murky look. 
A guy didn't help any of his friends he just sat and ate 2 pints of ice cream which he had snuck past me. 
Some dude was eating this chick's ass when we checked on them 
I went for a job interview at an escape room. My group didn't escape the room, so we didn't go through to the next round. I think they were using the process to get people to test new puzzles for free. 
I work at a different escape game and have had customers drop kick doors,vomit all over the place but the one that takes the cake is a couple booked our latest game around midnight. After I did my intro and left the room he proceeded to bend her over a prop and take her from behind. I called in several times to no avail. So for the next hour I had to listen to them grunt an moan.  
We had a group come in last year who were doing really well, got about halfway through the game and then hit a wall. One guy left the room to go out to his car, and when he came back he had a whole 30 rack in his bag. The whole team proceeded to sit in a circle and use their remaining 30minutes to kill the entire thing. It was pretty damn impressive to watch.  
The "zombie" in our room cornered me while he was on all fours. Then he started rubbing the top of his head on my crotch and grunting and breathing really heavily. He did this for a good 10-15 seconds while I just stood there, frozen. At that point I said "well I guess if you can do that I'm out right?" And awkwardly shuffled past him (from the corner where he had me pinned) to the dead corner.  It was a real hit for my co-workers to see that. 
Not an Employee, but one time my group of friends walked into Breakout KC, and my friend proceeded to turn off the main circuit breaker. All the doors and some of the traps were locked electronically. So basically we beat the escape room in a record 9 seconds. 
I've seen a divorce, a man came out as gay to his friends in the room. Various misuses of the props as in somebody not knowing how to you use a microscope or a MAGNET. I got mooned once. I think the msot wild stuff though, happens in the back room. The people rumning your room probably have 10x more fun than you do. Some weird shit happens there  
The easiest way to make our life miserable is the propose at one of these. It happened 3 time in the 9 months I worked there. It makes it so we have to get you to finish, and some people.... aren't smart enough 
*Technically*, if you jump out of the window you do escape the room! 
I don't understand people sometimes. No matter how many times i've told them before the game, that climbing is strictly forbidden, the first thing they do is climb over the first obstacle 
That's great. Were they apologetic about the whole thing? 
How do you put a spy in? Isn't it obvious the one guy not part of the group is the spy.  
I had the exact opposite experience, I was playing an escape room and my group all ignored an iPad that was sitting on a table because we all assumed it belonged to one of us. 
The bright yellow is the problem. If you want someone to leave it alone you have to make it as dull as possible. Like don't even use all caps. Source: made panels with buttons, the wrong ones always got pushed first if they were colorful. 
I did one with hubby, both brother in laws and their partners. First time we had met one girlfriend but thought it was a good way to break the ice.   There was one prop which had clear plastic tubes with different directional arrows behind them. Eventually balls popped out of a tube in the ceiling and we realised these balls went into the tubes and the top directions were entered into a directional lock thing. So we entered this code 10+ times didn't work we were looking at this for a good 5 minutes until BILs girlfriend asked if 'we needed these' and pulled out 6 balls she had in her pocket?????.   We still managed to escape so we haven't held this against her. 
My friend's boyfriend completely ignored all the females in the room or talked condescendingly over them when we did an Exit room. There was a station where there was a counter that started at 24. It had four items that could be placed in any order, and it would count down until you got all the possible combinations. I told him that's what the 24 meant and he loudly and rudely proclaimed I was wrong because 4x4=16. I tried to explain it was 4! = 24 but he ignored me. I ended up just doing the puzzle behind his back while he was busy with some other puzzle.  
That is amazing. Something similar happened in my last escape room experience. It was a space themed one, and at one point, you open this uplink and get into a crawl space. In it, there are numbers spelled out in Russian, and you're supposed to solve another puzzle to get a computer screen to show you the words and their meaning.   I was in the main room trying to figure out how to solve the final puzzle when I hear my friend shout "Wait, is that Russian? Yeyande, get in here!" we proceeded to skip a few steps in the room because I speak Russian.  When we finished, the game master was so confused and had never thought that something like that would ever happen. 
My group was guilty of not leaving after beating the room. We had found the cure to stop the virus, but we were still looking for clues. The game master had to come on the intercom and say "ESCAPE! ESCAPE! ESCAPE!"   
Should have had a "these are not functioning toilets" sign  
Weren't they curious the minute all but one person was unlocked? Or they just assumed you just didn't really like that friend. Believing you asshats all thought, "Oh fuck that bitch, let's just leave her cuffed!" 
Oh man. Imagine breaking up in a room you can't get out of, then having to work together to solve puzzles to get away from each other. Was it fun to watch? This will be the plot of a rom-com in 6 months 
So a group circling a table acting like a chicken is your idea of sacrificing a human being 
/u/fuckswithducks what is your opinion on this duck? 
I've gained an incredible hatred of drunkards in my job at an escape room. They're usually idiots, they often sneak beer into our unlicensed establishment, they sometimes spill said beer on our props, and get unbelievably salty when they can't figure out a puzzle.   One particular guy sat down and looked depressed/passed out the entire time while his friends sometimes poked/kicked him. He was a huge downer. Turns out he snuck in vodka in a coffee cup - I found out because he spilled some, his partner tried to clean it up and told me it was water. It was not water.   One proposal we had, the fiancee-to-be was so interested in finishing the final puzzle that she didn't notice her boyfriend trying to lead her to the envelope he snuck into the last drawer. But when she finally saw the ring, it was super cute and sappy.  
When I played, our train of logic  pointed to taking apart a hanging light.   The people knocked on the door loudly and told us not to dismantle live electronics.  
I own an escape room and we've had people rip up all types of flooring. You think they'd stop when they reached underlayment but no. 
Did he find the clue? Did he win? Did he have to pay for it?  
I put on the prisoner uniform in the one I went to. Why is it there if you're not supposed to wear it? 
They say wearing a labcoat some how makes people think more critically, perhaps the space outfit got you in the space escapin mood? 
Some people are boring, WHY WOULDN'T YOU PUT THE SPACESUIT ON?! *CMOOOOON* 
The first escape room I did, we apologized for the mess we made as we were leaving - as we had piled everything up on the table in the center of the room, rather than returning everything to where we found it.  I now understand why the escape room employee laughed. 
That is so hilarious, like what good could it do to drink it when you can just pour it out.  
Couldn't the one dude just have played the room and when he came back with his company he'd already have the answers? 
Seems like it would be courteous in this case for the couple to give the operator an extra large tip first and prepare them for what's to come. 
The only thing I've ever heard measured in racks are ribs but somehow I imagine you mean beer? 
"Uhh shit, umm...use length of copper wire on...houseplant? No? Dammit. Use postcard on house plant. Fuck!" 
And if you stick metal in electric sockets, you win on escaping life! 
Yeah I don't understand either, maybe I'm just missing something, but how do you plant a spy in the group like this? 
"Ah do naht get paid enough to escape this room, Michael." 
I see this a lot too. One of our rooms has a jacket in it, and some people just assume its one of theirs. 
"What's your job?"  "Oh, I make panels with buttons." 
It's amazing what people will do to get out of Coventry.  
This is the most confounding behavior in this thread so far. 
Similarly, I was doing a Jailbreak room with some friends and we got through pretty much the whole room but cannot for the love of god get our handcuffs off. One person tried to take mine off with a broken keychain we found in a cabinet but I told him that probably wasn't the intended purpose of the keychain. Eventually, we're almost through with the room when one friend reaches into the pocket of his orange jumpsuit and finds the handcuff key. It was supposed to be the first thing we found.  
My ex mother in law does this deliberately with puzzles. When getting close to the end she hides a piece just so she can put the last piece of the puzzle in.  
Is that so weird?? Seems like a smart thing to inquire about.  
You can get out at anytime. There's usually a door that's not part of the puzzle.  
I think the idea is that the teammate on the phone sacrificed himself (turned into a chicken and couldn't talk) in order to deliver the hint involving acting like a chicken. 
They're too weird for me.  It's even weirder since duck penises are corkscrew-shaped, so this is just a human penis pasted on a duck.  I imagine they float upright well with a rudder like that, though. 
At an escape room we went to we started taking apart a photo frame with a "do not disassemble" sticker on it. They seemed quite annoyed but in fairness they also had "do not open" writing on a lot of things you had to open to solve the puzzle. 
Oh shit and then each time you repair it, it probably looks more like it's a clue, so people rip it up again!  
I'm not sure. The escape room employee said that he was scared to enter the room to tell the guy to stop. If I'm remembering correctly, he was asked to leave 
Yea that actually sounds like a legit step to solve the puzzle 
If you played point and click games in the 90s you know those might actually be things you'd have to do in some of them! 
I'm a HS teacher.   I put the human leech kids into a group together.   It's like our own classroom version of hunger games.   
Definitely smart to look at the books! But they are REAL published books, they have page numbers and words. If you need to use them you will probably have a clue/colormarker/hints.  No escape room should make you look through 10+ books blindly. 
Reality has never stood in the way of a rom-com plot before. 
We've had around 3 proposals in the escape rooms so far.    The first one was really nice. The guy met us weeks beforehand and asked us to personalize our prettiest escape room. All the clues were about their relationship like where they first met, first kiss, etc and at the end of it all, was the ring.   The second was shitty. We were not informed at all. The girl was chained and blindfolded in a small, black box room. No idea why he thought that would be a good place to propose.   The third was hello kitty- themed. I just heard about it from my coworkers but w h y 
I've seen proposals at TGI Fridays and Logan's Roadhouse, so there are worse places to propose.  
See I would have assumed I was supposed to decapitate the chicken 
So you'll fuck a rubber duck, but only if it's a female rubber duck?  
Stanley would sit in the room doing cross words and when the staff asked him if he is lost he'll flatly say "I'm not finished yet". When he is done he solves the room cause he is good at puzzles  
Yes! After a group ripped up floorboards in one room the next couple groups saw the misalignment from our repairs and assumed it was a trap door. We had to add 'don't remove the flooring' to our briefing. 
He's the only one who survives when they complete the puzzle and the whole station rapidly depressurizes. 
I'd totally have the glass/polycarbonate/acrylic on the helmet have some treatment on it for revealing hidden messages.  
"Fuck you. This book is growing on me. I'll read it to the end. I am a paying costumer." 
Should have told them they should check Pornhub to get a video of them 'finding clues' 
huh. this rubber chicken has a pulley in the middle. 
That's just evil, and clever! How does this work out?  
It's part of a larger company wide competition between branches. Near the beginning of the episode, Dwight openly suggests tying up the escape room attendant and torturing him for the information. The camera would then pan quickly over to a slightly nervous looking teenage boy and then back to Michael who briefly ponders it before telling Dwight to get serious. 
Chained and blindfolded? That makes my country's escape rooms sound so mild 
So I have to ask, having only been to a single, pirate-themed escape room...     Exactly what kind of escape room has one of the participants chained and blindfolded?? 
Friday's would be perfect. If she says yes you can celebrate with endless cheese sticks and potato skins. If she rejects you then you can wallow in self pity with endless cheese sticks and potato skins. It's a classic win/win scenario  
I did escape the room once and there were the most hilarious signs and warnings. Like "do not try to escape the room through the sky light" and "do not escape the room by breaking through the wall" or "the in case of emergency fire extinguisher is for real emergencies. It is NOT a clue." and then all the extra warnings on top of warnings because people will think the warnings are clues. Eg "the fire extinguisher is not a clue. It is not hiding a clue. There is nothing involving the fire extinguisher that is a part of the game. Please do not touch the fire extinguisher unless there is a real actual fire."   No joke. Funnier when you realize each one of those warnings is there because someone tried it.      And in all fairness I'm sure some of the shittier places actually do use double speak as clues like that 
Then Jim argues with Dwight and gets Dwight to say that he's impervious to all torture techniques and gets Dwight to agree to being subject to torture where in which Jim can get Dwight to confess his secret beet sauce recipe which turns into Jim tying Dwight to a chair in an empty room and then just leaving him there  
In some way or another for a reason I don't know why, this reminds me of the "game/competition" where you go door-to-door starting with a dollar store item, and get people to trade you for equal or more value if they want it. You see who ends up with the best item at the end of the day.  Some people start with a toothbrush and end up with a piano or TV. 
The second one might be making the best of a bad situation. 
Yeah, OP that sounds like a lawsuit waiting to happen. You sure that's a public attraction you're working at and not a BDSM meetup? 
We went to one based on the saw movies where we were all chained to the walls/ chairs and blindfolded. Some of us had a little play in our chains.  So there would be a clue near one person, who would call it out and it would allow someone else to open a padlock or locked combination box to get keys. It was exciting.  
Sounds to me like you're just looking to be in a relationship with potato skins and cheese sticks. 
You'd think an easier solution would be to adopt a safeword-type label that you can affix to objects like the fire extinguisher and emergency exit doors, that means "this object is in no way a part of the solution, do not touch this unless there is an actual real-life emergency." It could be as simple as the escape room company's logo. Small and simple enough to not break immersion too much, and yet clear without having to write a whole list of rules that reference each other.  Much harder to signal that you shouldn't take apart flooring or walls, though, especially since that's often a solution in the online escape the room games. 
At some point we get a camera pan to Creed standing in the corner of the room visibly sweating. He points to the camera above him.   "I did something like this in Kyoto for a lot of money a few years ago. Let me know if anybody brings in chili peppers." 
It's like when Dwight traded for the magic beans.  
Many escape rooms use don't touch stickers, usually a hand print with a slash through it or something similar. But once you think you have everything labeled or included in the rules, people surprise you with new ways to be destructive. 
Moments later, Kevin claims he is starving despite having been in the escape room for less than 3 minutes.  
Dennis: *sees old woman giving him stinkeye*   "Well I don't know what you're looking at me like that for, you're certainly in no danger!"  Mac: So they **are** in danger! 
No one is in any danger! What are you not understanding about this? 
Jesus I had this question at the end of a job interview. Here's the joke I told (I got the job):  Two engineering students were walking across campus when one said, "Where did you get such a great bike?"  The second engineer replied, "Well, I was walking along yesterday minding my own business when a beautiful woman rode up on this bike. She threw the bike to the ground, took off all her clothes and said, "Take what you want."  The first engineer nodded approvingly, "Good choice; the clothes probably wouldn't have fit." 
A farmer and his dog are herding sheep. They finish and his dog says "I counted 40 sheep". The farmer replies, "That's odd I only got 37". The dog replies "I rounded them up". 
What did the bra say to the hat?  You go on ahead, I'll give these two a lift 
The other day, my wife asked me to pass her lipstick but I accidentally passed her a glue stick.  She still isn't talking to me. 
So there's two blue whales drinking at a bar. The first turns to the second and says   (Now you make whale song noises as awkwardly and as cringe-inducingly as possible, until everyone in the room is clearly a little bit uncomfortable with how long this has gone on)  To which the second whale turns to the first, and says: "Frank, go home, you're drunk." 
What did the green grape say to the purple grape?   BREATHE you idiot!  
Knock knock  Who's there?  Dishes  Dishes who?  Dishes Sean Connery 
Mother Superior is in the convent, when she hears a knock at the door. She opens the door, and is shocked to see two leprechauns standing at the threshold, hats in hand.   The first leprechaun speaks: "Mother Superior, would you be having any leprechaun nuns in this convent?"  "No, my son. We have no leprechaun nuns in this convent."  "And mother, do you have any leprechaun nuns in all of Ireland?"  "No my son, I don't believe there's a single leprechaun nun in the whole church!"  The first leprechaun rounds on his companion and shouts "AH TOL' YE YOU'D BEEN FOOKIN' A PENGUIN". 
A guy goes to the doctor about a rash he's had for a while. The doctor finally enters the room and takes a look at the guy and says "Well sir, I'm going to have to advise you to stop masturbating."   "Why's that doc?" the guy asked.   And the doctor said, "So I can examine you." 
Mickey and Minnie Mouse went in to see a marriage counsellor. The therapist first met with each of them one-on-one, then brought them together for a joint session.  "Let me start by restating in a neutral, non-threatening way, the concerns each of you raised in your individual sessions.  Mickey, Minnie says you are quick to anger, and suspicious of her friendships with other males. Minnie, Mickey is concerned about your mental health. He thinks you're crazy."  At this Mickey jumped in. "I never said she was crazy! I said she was fucking Goofy!" 
Two dogs got lost in the desert. The one dog says to the other "If we don't find a palm tree soon, I'm going to pee my pants."  When I was four, I heard this joke on the radio. I thought it was the funniest joke ever. Except, I didn't get it, I just thought that the notion that a dog might pee himself was hilarious. I told this joke to people for years.  Years later, I was working in a shop and a radio reporter walked in and challenged my colleague to tell him a joke and then he'd give her fifty bucks. She palmed him off to me and I got to release my joke back into the wild. Easiest fifty bucks I ever earned. 
What's Whitney Houston's favorite type of coordination?  Hannnnddd eeeeeyyyyeeeeee 
Why did the partially blind man fall down a well?  He couldn't see that well. 
Did you hear about the antennas that got married? The ceremony was okay but the reception was amazing. 
A devout Catholic man has just boarded a plane, and he's really dreading the long flight ahead. All of a sudden, the pope boards and takes a seat right next to him! What an honor!  The man sits there, thinking about how best to conduct himself and what to say, when the pope takes out a golf pencil and starts doing a crossword puzzle. *Wow, His Holiness does crossword puzzles?* the man thinks. *I hope he asks me for help. That'll be my in for a wonderful conversation!*  Sure enough, the pope leans over and asks the man "do you know a four-letter word for a woman that ends in U-N-T?"  *Oh no.* The man is speechless. He sits there, terrified but trying his best to put on a pensive face, for about 30 seconds. *The pope won't speak to me this whole flight if I say what first came to mind...*  Then it hits him! "Oh!" he says. "AUNT. The word you're looking for is 'aunt', Your Holiness."  The pope calmly nods. "Ah, of course," he says. "Do you have an eraser?"   
Why couldn't the lifeguard save the drowning hippie?  He was too far out, man. 
 A young monk arrives in a monastery where he is put to work as a copyist.   After a few days, he notices that the monks making copies of the scriptures are all working from copies -- not the original. This alarms the young monk because he thinks of how easy it would be for mistakes to be repeated. And so he goes to the Head Monk and expresses his concerns.   "Yes, brother," replies the Head Monk, "you have a valid point. But this is the way we've always done it. Still, I better check to make sure there are no errors."   So off he goes to the cellar where he spends the entire night carefully consulting the original scriptures. In the morning all of the brothers go down to the cellar and find the Head Monk crying.   "What's the matter?" they ask.   Between the loudest of sobs, he groans: "The word is celebrate!" 
What's the difference between a well dressed man on a unicycle and a poorly dressed man on a bicycle?  Attire 
And the LORD said to John, "Come forth and recieve the Holy Spirit.  But John came in fifth and won a toaster. 
An infinite number of mathematicians walk into a bar. Bartender asks, "what can I get you guys"? First mathematician says "I'd like a pint of beer please." The second one says "I just want a half pint." The third one says "a quarter pint". The bartender listens for a while and then stops them. He pours out two pints and says "you know, you guys really ought to know your limits." 
How many potatoes does it take to kill an Irishman?  Zero. 
What's green and eats nuts?  Syphilis  It's the first and last time they ask me to tell them a joke. 
What did the sea say to the seashore?  Nothing, it just waved. 
Why do SCUBA divers always fall backwards out of the boat?  Because if they fell forwards they'd still be in the boat. 
You say: "oh hey I have a great knock knock joke, but you have to start it" Then they start the joke saying, "knock knock" You: "who's there?" *awkward silence* 
Why do French people only buy one egg when they go the grocery store?  Because one egg is un oeuf.  
A sailor sits down at the bar and orders a drink. He looks to his left and there's a pirate with a peg leg, hook hand, and eye patch. The sailor asks how the leg was lost. "A gator ripped off me leg while burying gold in Florida." He asks next how he lost his hand. "A shark bit ma hand off while I was throwing the gator into the sea." Amazed at the pirate's bravery, he asked how the man lost his eye. "A seagull shit in me eye." The sailor was shocked and asked, "a bird shit in your eye and you lost it??" The pirate said, "it was my first day with the hook."  
Alcohol may not be the answer, but it's definitely worth a shot.  
some kids were discussing how they'd like to die: i want to die quietly in my sleep like my grandmother did; not yelling and screaming like all the other passengers in her van. 
Joker: "What's a Pirate's favourite letter?"  Jokee: "R?"  Joker: "No, me first love be the sea!" 
One day, my grandfather said to me, "Your generation relies way too much on technology!"  So I said back to him, "No, your generation relies too much on technology," and then I unplugged his life support. 
Why do elephants paint their nuts red? To hide in the cherry tree. What's the loudest sound in the forest.  A giraffe eating cherries.  
Say what you want about pedophiles, at least they drive slow through school zones 
A party of adventurers walk into a tavern fully equipped with weaponry and armor. The barkeep asks "What's with the weapons and armor? Relax and have a drink!"  "We need to watch for mimics." replied the party. The barkeep laughed. The party laughed. The table laughed. 
What did the leper say to the prostitute?  Keep the tip. 
A blonde is on either side of a river. One shouts "How do you get to the other side?!"  The other responds "You ARE on the other side!"  Its cute enough to make anyone chuckle, and its wholesome enough for kids.  You can change the blond part to be the opposing football team fan or something less discriminatory. 
Descartes walks into a bar. The bartender says "Would you like a drink?", Descartes responds "I think not" and he vanishes.  
What's the difference between a northern fairy tale and a southern fairy tale?  A northern fairy tale begins with "once upon a time". A southern fairy tale begins with...  you all ain't gonna believe this shit! 
Depends on what sort of person I think they are.  If they're a decent upstanding person I go with:  A priest, a rabbi, and a minister walk into a bar. The rabbi turns to the other two and says, "Hey, you hear the one about us?"  If my audience is more like me, not a good person, I lead with:  A priest, a pedophile, and a rapist walks into a bar. He orders a drink. 
Where did Adolf Hitler keep his armies?  Up his sleevies.  (Don't blame me for the joke its all my Business Studies teachers fault with his endless dad jokes) 
What do you call a blind dinosaur? Doyouthinkhesaurus 
I fucking love jokes that sound like they're gonna be racist and then the redneck is the villain/punchline. 
My father-in-law told a similar one where a wife tries to get her flatulent husband to stop drinking so much by putting chicken innards in his bed while he's passed out... 
I've always heard this one with a rabbit, and while they both stand alone I like to think of yours as a sequel to this one:  A bear and a rabbit are sitting next to each other as they take a dump in the woods.  They're finishing up when the bear says to the rabbit, "Hey rabbit, you ever have a problem with shit sticking to your fur?"  "No, why?" says the rabbit.  So the bear picks him up and wipes. 
The absolute MOST important part of this joke is to take a massive breath before the second whale speaks, like you're about to go off again 
This relies on your audience being polite enough to actually let you finish the whale noises. I feel like my friend group would just cut me off and say "is there a point to this?"  
Man, I just tried to go tell my wife this joke and I couldn't get past knock knock because I was laughing too hard.  Well done! 
Mickey Mouse wakes up one winter morning to find that someone has written "Fuck You Mickey" in the snow on his lawn with piss. It happens multiple times each with worse messages.  Mickey calls the police who start investigating and after a few days the detective comes to Mickey and says "well I have good news and bad news"  'What's the good news?' Mickey asks  "We ran a bunch of tests and found that the urine belongs to Donald Duck!"  'Well that's great, but what's the bad news?'  "Forensics has confirmed that the handwriting belongs to Minnie." 
Two snakes are hanging out, when one asks the other, "Hey, are we venomous?"    The other snake replies, "I'm not sure."   "Well I hope not," the first snake says, "because I just bit my tongue." 
I got hit in the face with a baseball bat when I was 6, and while getting stitches the doctor told me a joke to distract me. It has become the oldest joke I know.  How do you get dragon milk? From a cow with short legs. 
So, what's the joke? All I'm getting out of it is that it would be silly for a dog to pee their pants.  
For my fellow Americans who may not know, "pissed" here means drunk, not angry. 
Why did Whitney Houston snort artificial sweetener? She thought it was diet coke. 
I feel like you almost need to invert the chord and start on the minor third so you can start the joke with "An..."   I spent far more time than I'd care to admit wondering how an *A natural* played into a C minor chord. 
How do you spot a blind guy at a nude beach?  It's not hard.  -  You know what they say about those blind prostitutes - you gotta hand it to them. 
Oh jeez, I'm gonna have to remember that one. Stupid as hell but damn if I didn't laugh. 
My friend in high school got me with about a twenty-minute version of this one, which I thereafter knew as the "J. R. Davis" joke (the name the guy had in his version). You can lay into it as much as you and your audience can stand. 
In a similar vein, three logicians walk into a bar. The bartender asks, "Do you all want beers?" The first one says, "I don't know." The second one says, "I don't know," and the third one says, "Yes!" 
Thank you for making me get the chuckles whilst shitting. 
one of the dumbest things I've read all day, but the only joke on the page that made me laugh uncontrollably 
Ahh, anti jokes, you know what's coming from a mile off but you still for some reason expect the punchline to be clever.  
Why don't seagulls fly over the bay? Cause then they'd be bagels 
You know why when ducks fly in a v one side is longer than the other?  Because there are more ducks on that side. 
A pirate walks into a bar with a steering wheel in his pants. The bartender says "Do you know you have a steering wheel in your pants?" The pirate replies "yarrr, it's driving me nuts." 
"Why do elephants paint their toenails red?"  "idk"  "To hide in cherry trees."  "haha yeah right"  "Have you ever seen an elephant in a cherry tree?"  "no"  "Works, doesn't it?" 
A sandwich walks into a bar and the bartender says, "We don't serve food here."  
Leper jokes are great.   Why did they stop the Leper hockey game?  There was a face off in the corner 
You're right. I did not do a good job of textualizing an Irish accent.  
There's no trees to raise your leg against, so the dog can't go. 
I had a blind prostitute once. She said I was the biggest she'd ever had. I said "you're pulling my leg." 
If you get the main gist of it down, you can ad lib everything else on the spot, which is mostly quotes of whatever they are doing when they meet, followed by the boss being skeptical. In 100 years nobody will actually know who Tom Cruise is. They will know Dave, however.  Introduce Dave & Boss   Meet Tom Cruise   Meet President Obama   Dave meets the Pope & returns   Boss's Heart Attack   Punchline from unknown person 
Reminds me of the Purple Polka Dotted ping pong ball joke.  
I know right!? The others were good, this was incredible. 
That is Karl Stefanovic, a national treasure! He has some hilarious moments on live Morning TV.  
To be fair, it is a very language dependent joke, and you can see that there is someone translating for him. 
Why do birds fly south for the winter? Cause it's too far to walk 
A pirate walks into a bar with a roll of paper towels on his head. The bartender asks, "What's up with the paper towels?" The pirate replies,  "Arr, there be a Bounty on me head!" 
A string walks in to a bar and the bartender says "we don't serve your kind here."  "Well, what kind is that?"   "String. We don't serve string. Aren't you a string?"  "No sir, I'm a frayed knot."    * Boooooooo!! Hisssssss!! * 
SCOTTISH PEOPLE DO NOT SAY FOOK AND THEY NEVER HAVE.   EVERY SINGLE THREAD.  Sorry. 
What did the leper say to the prostitute?    Keep the tip. 
I wasn't implying that it would be difficult to remember the specific sequence of events, just that I'm going to want to recall that this joke exists when the time comes that I want to tell a joke. 
I like this version more. The punchline was more to the point so I knew immediately it was an anti joke, versus the other one left me wondering if I misread something  
As somebody who's watched a bunch of clips of him on youtube, he seems like a real goofball.  I like him.   
The Black Pope.  I'd watch it, but only if it stars Samuel L. 
I knew the poem was a rendition of this joke from the first line but was still delighted. Top notch, Sprog. :)  (My only complaint is that it needs to be much longer, for the full frustration-effect of the joke. Still fantastic though.) 
I am not very cool (long story; very overprotective parents + orchestra-nerd-turned-science-geek-turned-medical-student) and had to google this reference... THIS SONG IS FANTASTIC AND THE FOO FIGHTERS ARE FANTASTIC WHERE HAS THIS SHIT BEEN ALL MY LIFE?!?? 
I feel like my life just found its purpose.   That was to lead you to the Foo Fighters music.  I will tell this story to my children.  
Interviewing a guy for a job. Something doesn't feel right but my interviewing partner really seemed to like him. We get to his portfolio of work and I see my side project that I worked on alone as one of his websites. So I start asking him questions about it. What challenges he had, how the client was, etc.   I let him go on and on then I say, "I have to level with you. This is my work. You are showing me my own work. Look at the source near the footer. It has my website in the comments.   He went ghost white and I just sat there.   After that I coached him a little on how not to suck and he left. We called the contract agency that sent him and let them know.  
My snake did.    I had the sweetest, chillest ball python who never nipped or hissed or reared up or anything.  She'd just curl up with you and hang out.  One day a friend brought over some of his friends and all of a sudden my snake went nuts - standing straight up in her tank and hissing at one of the guys.  A couple of weeks later, that dude robbed my house while I was out of town.  RIP Guinevere.  A good snake. 
My childhood best friend's mother's boyfriend. He creeped me out and I hated being over her house when he was there. Her family went on a ski trip with mine, and my parents both thought he was great-funny, charming etc. They didn't understand why I didn't like him.   Years later, my best friend told me that he sexually abused her starting when she was about 9.  I probably was picking up on her fear of him.  
My mom brought her new boyfriend over the house one time for me to meet him. He weirded me out. I can't tell you why but I didn't like him. Maybe it's because he was a 35 year old man who wore visors. Friendly and funny guy who my family liked. A year into their relationship he beat the hell out of my mom and stole her dog. Probably the closest I've come to an assassination attempt.   Edit 1: I didn't go after him as not to implicate my mom. Also, we got her dog back :)   Edit 2: Yep, he's in jail. 
While in the Army we moved into a new house in upstate New York. We were being neighborly and talked to a guy across the street. He had 5 kids. No wife. He also had multiple neighborhood kids playing in the yard. He told us We can always send ours over. He gave us both this horrible feeling so we smiled and gtfo. About a year later my wife told me (i was in Kandahar) that his kids were taken from him. He had been molesting them at least ever since his wife died.  
Exwifes second husband. Took 10 years but i was right. He is currently on year 1 of a 32 year sentence for repeated rape of his daughter.   
Yes, but I suppressed it so quickly and fast, because I felt like it was horribly ungracious since she was being so friendly.  Over the next couple years, she became my closest friend in the new town I had moved to.  Then the following couple years it vacillated between being close, but just feeling like she really didn't want me around or was messing with me a little bit.  Turns out she was having an affair with my husband and was literally intentionally driving me crazy. 
When I played highschool football we had an equipment manager who had been doing the job for decades and was absolutely adored by the community. Guy was in his 70s-80s.   One day, I'm ready for a game early, so I head out to the bus that's taking us. I see him loading stuff up, so I offer to help him load a few things.  Once we're all loaded on the bus, he walks to me in the back (cuz I was a cool kid) and hands me a Hostess cupcake in front of everyone as a thank you.   He handed me the cupcake, looked me in the eye, and this sense of dread just falls on me. I have no idea why, and everyone's looking at me so I act normal.   I eat the cupcake (because I was, and still am a fat ass and will eat any cupcake you hand me) and just kinda write off the feeling.   That summer he was arrested for sexually assaulting some 15 year old girl. I'm pretty sure they thought he did more, but couldn't prove it or something. 
My former handball coach: Everybody liked him, but I had a weird feel about him; After training he would come into our showers and give out shower caps for us to use, or in the winter, he would bring us snow to play. A few years later, he got arrested for sexual assault, when he went to a training camp with younger girls. Apparently he got into their tents and "played" with them. 
My mom was a single mom and did the best she could.  However, she thought it might be better to leave me with the neighbor than at home alone.  From the age of 6, I pleaded with my mom to let me stay home alone until she got home from work,  that I would be ok.  My intuition was right. The neighbor was convicted of multiple murders of single mom one and two towns over when DNA evidence came into being.  He only liked to date and kill nonobese women.  Fortunately my mother was fat. 
Apparently, when I was 4 or 5, my grandma introduced me to some new boyfriend. Everyone liked him, but I would have nothing to do with him. Wrinkled my nose, wouldn't be left alone by him.     I guess he just came into her apartment one day and walked at her with something behind his back, said nothing. She got an eerie feeling and said, "Are you going to kill me?" With a dead faced stare he came at her. She managed to jump over some furniture and get away (she's always been in great shape, running 3 miles a day until age 80). She got somewhere safe, called the police and never saw him again.. 
My sister's boyfriend. I just immediately found him to be very "fake" and disingenious. But the rest of the family loved him and be found him very charming. He owned a running store franchise that was more successful than the original store and was also doing well trading on the stock market. He sold the store back to the owners for a ton on money to focus on the stock market, but this was around the time of the market crash. So to help with that he worked at the store as a salesman. They eventually got married and bought a huge house.  And that's when the cops came knocking at the door to their large home with a view. He wasn't rich. He never owned the store. He was only ever a worker and had been stealing cash from the register/products and selling them on eBay. The divorce came quick after that. 
Not me, but my sister. She has this uncanny ability to detect crazy people. My first boyfriend who was secretly abusive, she called it after knowing him for two days. My next boyfriends mom who eventually forced me to take a pregnancy test because I had been "looking rather pregnant" and she wanted to know, she knew after the first visit meeting her. My toxic ex best friend of *seven years*, she knew after 1 year. All of the people my sister calls out for being crazy, I now believe and avoid wholeheartedly. 
When I was a teenager at a new high school, another new girl my age aggressively befriended me. I was a quieter kid and allowed her to bully me into a quick friendship and I went along with it for a few weeks TRYING to be her friend but she was fucking CRAZY. She tried to strangle my kitten at one point. She began to say and do creepy things. She was featured in magazines and Reader's Digest. Then she pours her heart out and admitted to me she perpetrated an elaborate fraud on the public and her family. I never ASKED for a confession, she just blurted it out.  She was Tina Resch Boyer the 'paranormal teen' who actually made it all up, and later went on to brutally torture and murder her 3 year old daughter. She is still in prison, tho there is a faction of dummies who bought her lies and try to get her out of prison every few years.  I have discussed my story with James Randi who confirmed several details with me. You can Wikipedia most of this. 
A pastor who was involved in the community outreach program for a prison (which i volunteered to for the first time).. seemed very friendly on the outside but seems really creepy to me... he kept putting his hands on my shoulder on that day and got my number from one of the volunteers and called me non stop that night to say he is lonely and wants to talk.. i was 14 at the time..  
When I was a senior in high school, my multimedia teacher was loved by everybody, but I hated that guy. He was a complete asshole to me and I back to him.  He was super chill with the guys and an "incorrigible flirt" with the girls. Um, we're 98% under 18. But everybody laughed when I'd say something about how weird he was around the chicks and was even told it was because I was overweight, unattractive, and too sarcastic/mouthy, and that's why he picked on me. Oh well. Life went on. A few years after high school I heard he was fired for having sex with an underage student. His poor wife at the time worked in the attendance office too and had to take time away from work so the gossip would simmer down.   I knew that guy was a shitdick. 
My first girlfriends husband. She and I had a bad breakup, but eventually got to be friends again, hanging out with the same crowd all the time. She met a guy who lived out of state and fell in love with him. I disliked him immediately. Everybody else thought he was fine. They got married, and a couple of years later, he started beating the crap out of her. She wised up and left. 
One of my brothers was dating this girl, and everyone else had met her several times before I did since I was off at college. So the first impression I get of her is when she shows up at our house and just walks right in. Doesn't knock, doesn't let anyone know she's in there. Just walks her happy ass inside and sits on the couch. So then when I come down the hallway into the living room, the bitch had this super vapid smile on her face. I just had this weird gut instinct that she was hiding something from everyone and was going to fight to the death to keep it hidden. I expressed to my mom that she gave me a weird vibe and I got told to stop being jealous. But long story shorter, she ended up having an entire other relationship and life with another guy three hours away.  
Jimmy Saville. Turned out everyone had same thought and a lot of people knew. 
Guy at my school. Everybody else liked but I had a bad vibe. My girlfriend at the time told me to not be so negative and automatically dislike people. Since then he lied to her about something I said, lied to me about talking to her. And then lied to everyone saying we broke up because I cheated on her.  And guess who she's dating now? 
This is kinda sorta unrelated, but I am the creepy guy that people have bad feelings about.   I am overly friendly, affectionate, and takes jokes "a little too far." Doesn't really help the fact that I'm a 29 year old asian single man who lives by himself at a church and works a theological school. But yeah, aside from my weirdness, I ASSURE YOU that I have not nor will I ever hurt anyone. I just really like people.    It's weird, I'm always in a position where I have to explain myself I that I'm creepy, but not a creep.   Crap. 
I wonder how many wrong feelings occur for each right one 
In college (a small one), there was a guy who was generally affable but just awful to be on projects with. He would fight, couldn't handle criticism, wouldn't take direction from women, etc.... but he was fun out of class. But I just got a feeling something was off/wrong/bad about this human. I was brushed off as being an overly sensitive woman. End of the first year he was reprimanded for being found in another gentleman's dorm room whilst the other gentleman was asleep (or passed out). The kid (18 year old)woke up and the (bad) dude (26 year old) was standing by his bed, staring at him.  I think that's weird.  
Loved this one. Favorite so far. Thanks for what you do for society. 
This reminds me of a girl who was in my sister's girl scout troop for a period of time in the late 90's. She was very nice, seemed like a normal girl, but obviously lived in some sort of weird situation. She always smelled horribly, either of urine, or very bad B.O. Her mother smelled also and didn't seem to have many teeth. I don't know much beyond that, we stopped by her house one time to pick her up for an event and the house smelled terrible, but looked rather normal from the outside. The sleeping bag she brought to girl scout camp with her smelled of dog urine and feces. There wasn't any reason to alert authorities about her situation though, she didn't seem to be abused or neglected in anyway, so I don't remember the girl scout troop leaders doing anything about her situation. As an adult I'm very curious what the hell was going on there. 
That was one very good reptilian dog you had there.  Did you catch the guy? 
The amount of pedophile stories in this thread is freaking me out. 
While he's obviously a scumbag, and I'm happy to believe that he intended to tie her up, I honestly believe *everyone* should have some sturdy rope in the back of their car.  I have two 12' lengths for securing loads, a 25' for if I need to pull anything/pull my car out (I have since gotten a tow strap), another 50' for whatever, a pick and shovel, several saws, trash bags, latex gloves, and a machete.  I promise I'm not trying to kill anyone. 
It's interesting, I think we (women) generally try to repress those feelings towards other women who appear to be friendly--even though we're getting a weird vibe.  We sort tell ourselves it's us, not them.  And then, turns out, it's them. 
What the actual fuck. This could be a lifetime movie.  
I'm sorry in advance but the most frustrating part of this is how absolutely fucking cowardly your Mom is. Even if you had a rough life growing up, how can you not see how fucked up everything is? It makes me so fucking angry when I read these posts and see their parents doing *nothing.* 
This story was a ride all the way till the end... but what really got me was that your family owns an avocado farm....   Also, fuck Dave. 
Yeah fuck Dave. But thats pretty awesome that you guys have an avocado farm.  
It must have been fucking horrible to see that in him and not be able to do anything about it.   
Oh man, I can't imagine how that poor girl who was gonna live with him felt after she found out. 
How did the "I told you so" go with the girlfriend and friends? 
I just read the article. It said the mom was stabbed over 178 times. That alone creeps me out. Imagine how much pent up anger you have to have to stab some one consecutively for what was probably minutes after they had already passed. My morning is ruined.  
So he walked into the shower with a bunch of naked girls? And no one else thought it was strange? 
He would bring snow into the showers?  So you could throw snowballs in the shower?  Wth? 
Same thing here. A teacher (never teached me though) who was basically the nicest, coolest and most liked turned was arrested of possessing child pornography. Everyone loved him. I always thought something was off in him.  
Yo momma so fat, she survived and lives a happy life! 
I thought nonobese was someone from a country i hadn't heard of, but then I realized you meant non-obese. Anyway that's so scary, I'm glad you're ok!  
It's amazing how people choose to ignore multiple very obvious red flags.  
Your grandma sounds awesome. Leaping over furniture and escaping from a murderer.  
What was behind his back, were the cops called? Answers! We need ANSWERS!...........seriously though, please answer these questions. 
This is obviously mean but, she fucking deserved it. I just couldn't believe that your mother's cousin actually picked that bitch over his own parents. 
Let's not forget your uncle is also a HUGE asshole in this situation.  
I want to meet your sister and find out about myself. 
The assistant pastor at my parents church always gave me the creeps, couldn't quite place my finger on it since he never did anything particularly creepy, he just looked like he had something to hide. A few years later, he was arrested for upskirting young girls at the mall. No telling what else he was doing too.   This was a decade ago, dunno if counseling worked for him or anything but I haven't seen him pop up on the news at all.  
Wait, so your birthmother knew and still was on decent terms with her rapist? That's messed up. 
This is super well written. I didn't realize I wasn't breathing until I got to the end and let out a sigh of relief. Damn. What a scary situation. Good on your for noticing and making yourself prepared to counter though.  
"You're just jealous you're not hot enough to get hit on by a creepy teacher" that sounds like many of the popular girls in my high school & middle school. I wonder how they felt when he got caught. Keep trusting your gut!  
If he made fun of you instead of flirting with you because you were unattractive, does that not bolster your argument? 
I'm a bit surprised but very happy your parents believed you. Did you ever try googling her name and locale? 
Ya, my mom is a middle age(well I guess would just be old now) Asian woman and she ask kid to come home with her all the time.  The reason I think she gets away with it is because she does it in front of the parents just to see if the kid is smart enough to go home with a stranger and laugh at them.  I would tell her to stop doing that cuz she's 1 pissed off parent away from going to jail, but I think the lesson would be more valuable if she learn it herself.    Yes I'm 99% sure my mom isn't keeping a bunch of babies and kids in our basement, for some reason she like kids and think that asking them to go home with her is cute.  Your were probably dealing with some shady individual, but I'm just telling you about the dumb shit my mom does that she think is innocent but is actually super close to child abduction.   
A girl I know is doing this. All my friends love her but something in my gut told me something wasn't right. She was always flirting with all the lads, acting very single. Find out she's seeing a guy I know from other friends. Not only that, it turns out she also has another boyfriend she's had for years. So she has a long term boyfriend, is seeing this other guy, and is by all means, trying to get with my friends too. Was very surreal. But I was just jealous of her when I didn't warm to her straight away like everyone else.  
If I were you, I would feel bad for my brother, of course, but I would also feel such a victorious "I told you so" toward my mom. I can't help it.  
I used to work at a place with a rock climbing wall. It was my favorite attraction to run because I could swing the younger kids around by their harness and they loved it. Usually.  I'm just glad there's only ever been one incident of someone commenting on the way I touch people as I fit their harness. It was a guy who jokingly said "Stop fondling my wife!" And I replied with something along the lines of "Don't be jealous I'm getting paid to touch her and you're stuck doing it for free."  His wife was amused. He was not. 
This is a great story, but for a second I thought the story was going to be that everyone loved this dog and you had bad feelings about it. 
This is a great story, but I have set off dogs that love everyone before. I don't have evil intentions, I've never slapped anyone and I am a dog person, so sometimes it's random. 
One of my husbands Aunts has a German Shepard. He's a big, dumb, scared of his own shadow and fireworks type. He once knocked down a cousin and growled at her because "he thought I was being rough with my kid".   No sweetie he saw you being rough and protected the kid.   It was literally his first time jumping on anyone. Let alone knocking them over. He's seen us rough house and LARP. I would argue he knows the difference between real violence and play. He's a good dog and always get table scraps from me now. (And cuddles when there are fireworks) 
I'm glad that this is the top comment. A lot of people have this really naive and almost cartoonish idea of what a sexual predator or an abuser is going to be. They think that they're going to be obvious; an ugly, overtly & objectively creepy guy who openly shows deviant behaviour to others in an obviously way. NOPE. 99% of the time an abuser or a sexual predator is someone who other people *like*. Someone who is charming and who others simply "can't believe" could ever be a bad guy.   Trust no one completely, man. 
my theory is that these people can't control when their thoughts come up so when the desire is there and there is conflict between societal norms and what they are wired to do they suddenly have to consciously censor and repress their urges which can physically alter their body language and give off red flags that humans who from an evolutionary standpoint are able to pick up consciously or subconsciously even and get general vibes from  it seems like "vibes" could just be a misinformed explanation of a real subconscious phenomenon that probably has a better explanation for who knows i'm high as shit 
Not saying you did, but even if you made this up, you're a great storyteller. I honestly don't mean this is a backhanded compliment or anything - you just wrote this really well. 
Assuming you're indeed from South Africa and that your story is true, you are far from the first person I've seen on the internet tell stories of how much of a piece of shit pistorious was/is. 
Well now I'm self-conscious about the fact that I prefer playing with kids to drinking beer and watching sports...  Thanks for that. 
While your gut instinct was correct, please don't demonize every guy who would rather play with children than watch sports. Male childcare workers have an extremely tough go as it is.  
Classic narcissistic behavior.  You don't do what they want, they go scorched earth on you.  Sorry you got caught up in that. 
This reminds me of our close family friends - father had been molesting his daughter for years and his wife (my mum's best friend) treated her like the *other woman* in an affair. 
Yes, Dave sucks. But I, too, would like to know more about this avocado ranch. Specifically why it's not a farm, but a ranch. Also the avocados.  
Right? How's she going to afford the rent without a roommate?? 
From own experience: it never goes well, and the person who tried to warn the others becomes a cynical bastard because of it.  
Um. Life Insurance money was 785k and bail was 785k? Either that's a ridiculous coincidence or someone in the article fucked up.  
I guess some did, I'm still friends with a girl, that also went there and she left the club for the same reason I did. I think they were either too embarassed to tell or they really didn't think of it as strange. As I said, he was loved by everyone, he also was teacher at my elemantary school. People trusted him.  
It was a legit reason for him to enter the showers and us being seven years olds somehow liked the idea of having a snowball fight... 
What's interesting in a case like that it's not impossible to be otherwise the nicest and coolest guy but be sexually attracted to children.  I once read a comment on reddit from a throw-away that they had been sexually attracted to children all their life and it made them miserable. They told they never touched anyone and never would yet they still feel the urge. IIRC they were in therapy to "treat" it.  Sounds super sad, you know, to know there's something wrong about you, something you hate but can't change.  I have no compassion for people who in anyway, directly or in directly, touch kids or are somehow involved in CP since we are not animals and we in control of ourselves. However, the ones that have the urges but never act on them - what a curse to live with. 
Similar story, was a waitress at a chain steakhouse place in Texas. The girl that trained me had major seniority at this place and was the golden child of the managers.  Would be fair enough, but she was a huuuugggge bitch and bossed people around and looked down on them etc...   I eventually quit that fuckin place, but right before I left she was caught changing the Tips on receipts by a customer.  Someone had noticed and called in to the restaurant.  They pulled the receipt from the paperwork, and yes, the Tips said $15 rather than $5.  The managers thought surely this was a mistake.    The GM and main fanboy of her pulled all of the receipts under her login for POS.  The stars aligned, and yes, she had been stealing hundreds (if not thoughsands) of dollars from customers one transaction at a time.  They had to call every customer she had that they could get a hold of through the credit card companies.  The restaurant also took her to court.    I wish I knew how this ended. 
How would they not notice the missing equipment the first time it happened? 
Yep, and then to keep up with the lie (since he actually was just working there) he had to build more lies about going back to the store to work there. And then build another lie about how he's also rich from the stock market to explain the income he was getting from stealing and eBay sales. 
I think if you spend time worrying that you might be secretly bad, you're probably not too bad. 
Unfortunately where i lived (when this happened), these things won't be taken seriously by the police..  
Yup, my birth family is really messed up. He moved to Australia a couple of years ago cause stuff got brought up from the past and a huge family brawl was close to happening. 
Not only did I trust my gut, I also drew dicks on his car when I could find it in the parking lot. 
Don't remember her name, unfortunately. My parents were really good about not being dismissive when I was a kid. 
As long as my kid doesn't say that about most people, I'm 100% going to believe them if they say someone was being inappropriate with them. You would have to be insane not to.  
Now I'm wondering if OP just mistook a cute "You are so cute I want to take you home and bake cookies for you" for an actual kidnapping attempt.  
Having witnessed some weird-assed socially clueless but harmless mom behavior over the years (particularly from my own), this is hilariously believable. 
I know a Bulgarian girl doing this. Shes attractive and has a good job, and is married to an English guy, but has a 'soul mate' in Bulgaria. She also goes on dates with other guys, as long as they're rich or really handsome. It's weird, because all her Bulgarian girlfriends think she's perfectly entitled to do this, and being married doesn't take her off the market, while her husband is in total denial and thinks she's just friendly with other guys.  
I used to get people to pull their own harness up, and would show them how to close the buckles. When it came time to thread the rope through the loops, there was a good 5-6 inches of rope between my hand and the harness. Can't be too careful. Speaking of careful, I always double and triple checked harnesses, both to make sure they were tight enough and that they were properly done up. 
Same here, turns out the dog had secretly been evil etc 
Dogs always know dude.  Just turn yourself in to the police now and save everyone the trouble. 
i finally understand why in english class they say to define pronouns 
I had a friend who had a German Shepard. We lived about a half mile apart on a mountain road. At night, when I would leave his house, the dog would "escort" me home. Never beside me though, he would walk through the brush.  It was really scary the first time it happened. All of a sudden I could hear something off the road. I quickened my pace until I got to my driveway then turned around. There he was, watching me. I gave him a wave and he turned and went home.  GSD's are a wonderful breed. 
I like to recommend this book as well, particularly for women, we are socially trained to be nice even when our inner alarms are blaring. 
Convicted for sexual spying on a child  Let off easy because he has children.   Huh.  
We had this with a new drama teacher in my school. We were 16 when he started and had just gone into Sixth Form. Something about this guy, he was just off. I couldn't put my finger on what it was though and us at the back all had some weird issue with him.  The dude would skip out on classes/registration, but mark all of us in and no one really cared, but it was odd. He always said he had work to do in the lower school, but I didn't really believe it. I voice those opinions but no one did anything. This carried on for the two years we had him. A lot of us failed our general studies exam because he was supposed to teach us and never did. A year after I left school I was back in town and visited my old Girl Guide unit. I found out from the kids that he had been fired for sleeping with a girl. She was in year 11 I think at this point, which meant he started getting with her when she was 12/13, skipping our classes to mess around... It was just so wrong and my gut instinct was very right.  
Not quite the same but the youth minister at my church when I was in high school set off my gaydar hardcore. He also gave several sermons about homosexuality being a sin. He ended up getting fired for cheating on his wife with at least 2 men, I think one may have been underaged. He was the epitome of the closeted gay bigot.  
My understanding of it is that people give off micro expressions and your brain notices these even when you don't.  So while, as you say the person controls the outer appearance, small expressions push through of their real thoughts.  Some people are better at seeing these than others. 
Good ole' Gary. Make sure you gas up before you get there. You don't want to stop.  
Username checks out. History shows posts about Africa. I'm almost 99% sure OP is really Oscar Pistorius and is just trying to be relevant again.  
Yup, my boyfriend was like "she probably just cheated" but me and my guy friend I guess were being nice and giving the benefit of the doubt. 
People like that are the minority, but they're the ones that stick in people's brains and turn our whole society to think "men can't like playing with kids or they're pervs". 
Try being a *dad* without your wife present at all times. I've had to defend myself from strangers accusing me of pedo intentions towards my own children on the playground. Though to be fair, this is more a statement on the sorts of people that would attack somebody they simply assume is a predator, than society itself - which seems to have more and more of those people in it anyways. 
He wanted the insurance money and didn't want to lose custody of his 3 year old. Source: the article. 
That in itself is creepy.  Just the snowball thing... Yuck.  
Seven year olds had to shower after practice? That feels unusual to me. 
Stand up move, contacting affected customers. If a restaurant did that for me over 5 bucks months ago,  I would become a fan.  
I think they did but just did not expect it from their prized employee 
Reminds me of my favorite Mark Twain quote: "If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything."   I don't know how people have the energy to keep up an elaborate web of lies.  I've lived by this for many years, and it has made life pretty easy, bitching even.   
Ugh. That's terrible. Sorry you had to deal with that. 
Could it be a common "joking" thing to say in [asian country] that's meant to be flattering to the parents, but just doesn't translate across the languages?    Like "oh, your child is so well behaved, I wish he/she were mine."  
My Asian mom has also done some things that would freak out Americans. Once on a road trip we were getting ready to leave a ratty motel/apartments in a hick town, mom sees one of the live-in children watching her eat cookies. She has the kid come into our van to eat cookies with her.   Needless to say when I came upon the scene I quickly explained in non-English why this shit could get her in some big trouble, this isn't Asia, get that kid the fuck out of the van before someone sees.  
Do you happen to know if this is common among Bulgarians? Or just a one off thing  
It's a tradition in our family to give a copy of this book to every girl graduating from high school. Really, everyone should read it, though. 
I had a similar experience with my uncle. He was always super friendly at family events, but as a kid I just had an intuitive feeling to stay the hell away from him.   I guess he was just a little too touchy, especially considering how everyone else in my family would barely give you a handshake, even if they hadn't seen you for years.   Turns out her raped both my female cousins, his daughters, the entire time they were growing up.  
Seems like its always the ones obsessing from the pulpit about homosexuality that turn out to be cock crazy.   
I had my infant son out shopping at Staples with my wife's Guncle and a random lady literally tried to take the baby out of his arms because a baby that young "must have a mother" and we clearly stole him. It was insane. She went from, "aww, cute baby" to "I'm saving him from you perverted gay kidnappers" in 5 seconds flat. Thankfully store management escorted her out. 
It still doesn't check out. First time something goes missing at night you have your security system improved. Most people don't sit there and go "oh darn it, an electric piano disappeared again" and then forget about it. 
No, she's actually completely single. Apparently other dude didn't know she had been dating my brother, so when he found out he kicked her to the curb.  
I know couple of Bulgarian girls and they're nothing like this Might be it's just that group.  
His aunt has a really passive German Shephard. The dog was watching his female cousin play with female cousin's kid and saw that the cousin was being rough with the kid so the dog tackled her(the cousin not the kid). Her(the cousin who was tackled) excuse was that she was only pretending or wasn't being rough. This dog had seen OP Larp and rough house for fun so the dog likely knows when the violence is real or not. Doggie gets rewarded now for being good doggie. 
Right, but in your area, how many "white van" incidents have there been, versus the amount of familial child abuse? Your fear is misproportioned, because your bias tells you that the people in *your* life wouldn't do something like that. 
As the father of a severely autistic girl, this scares the shit out of me. I know if someone took advantage of her I would kill them. How do you protect a 7 year old who can't even tell you she's hungry, or needs to go to the bathroom. This is a terrible thread to start my day. 
That is so fucked up. How does someone do that to their own children (well, any child)? What a monster. 
I think it depends on how often they check their inventory. Do they count their items in stock every day, once a week/month? By the time they checked, several items could've been taken over a period of days/weeks. As an insider, he knew their system and worked around it.  
Please tell me he and your brother then went on to drink a beer together and became friends? 
I used to work at a rape crisis center.  One of the staff had a FIL who had raped his wife, all his daughters, all his DILs, all his granddaughters and god knows who else. She finally put her foot down and made their family be no contact.  But no one ever stopped him.  It can totally be generational.  Which makes me want to puke. 
Yeah. You know, they say you actually shouldn't tell your kids not to talk to strangers. I mean, there are reasons why you should that are obvious, but what's not obvious is the fact that most of the time, the real monsters are people you know. Children who are in this sort of situation don't know who to tell to get help. Sometimes it takes some really genuinely nice people, whether they be teachers, coaches or even just some guy on the street to actually have the guts to stand up and make sure this child is safe from the real monsters.  Not that I'm speaking from experience, but I remember hearing that somewhere and it really chimed for me. 
Can confirm. As a 10 year old i totally wanted to do sexual stuff with the girl down the street. She was 11! I'm surprised i escaped capture and made it to adulthood without being arrested for being a 10 year old pedo!   Joking aside though when i was 14 i was accused as a pedophile at my church for making out with a 12 year old girl who matured early and always made advances at me. They had a whole church meeting where i was "outed" and the entire church prayed for my pedo soul. That fucked me up royally and i was terrified of even approaching girls after that. Not to mention always getting looks at church and people keeping their toddlers away from me as if i was a rape monster. The whole thing really messed up my views on women and sex. 
Work in a store, and now count our inventory every monday. But before we did it 2 times a year. You could have stolen a shit ton of products in that time, but once you do inventory, you finally realize how much you're missing. 
I was actually gonna say or beat him to a pulp lol. But I don't want anyone being done for randomly fucking up a bad man with no actual evidence on what he did. 
Though that would have been the best conclusion to bring this all full circle, no.  
These things go on usually because no one is willing/brave enough to report the rapist. They'll say things like "oh we can deal with it in the family", etc, and that's how more generations of children get abused.  
Right. I'm a teacher, so I have been able to observe the results of all of that in, oh, about 1300 children over the years. I HATE the stranger danger stuff. Kids very badly need to be able to deal with and interact with strangers. I wish families would teach healthy boundaries and assertiveness instead of the stranger bullshit. 
I have a friend that works for a professional inventory counting service.  They go to huge warehouses to count inventory and have these weird hip mounted computers they use to count and keep track of stuff.  When I knew him in high school he could barely do math but now he has Rainman level skill at counting a group of matched items close together.    
I have a friend who was raped by her dad. Years before (before she was born) he had raped several other family members. Someone did report it, it went to trial and he got off because of his standing in the community and no one wanting to believe someone they knew so well could do this. This all came out because he continued the behavior and when he started in on it again with his young granddaughter, his DIL flipped and is trying really hard to get charges pressed and get him locked up. However, despite multiple other people coming forward that he did this to them, he still hasn't been arrested and people are still taking his side. This has been going on for almost 2 years. Sometimes reporting it isn't enough. It may stop the abuse for 1 child, but we as a society have to be able to put our personal feelings aside for people like this (who we thought we knew!) and hold them accountable.  
Schools should just make kids who are bad at math do inventory. 
Korean living in Canada here. It wasn't exactly hidden from kids even when they're young. I remember being aware of North Korea's existence as long as I can remember because of the whole reunification movement that is visible in everyday life, even before I started going to school.   The general vibe was that they were taken away from us, living in harsh conditions and that we should try to reunite as a favour to them.   I left before being taught any proper Korean history, so maybe somebody else will have more to say in that sense.  
I grew up in South Korea. It's probably the same stuff that an average redditor would know about North Korea, I guess the difference is that it gets taught at school and is brought up more often. Things like how North Koreans are suffering because of their horrible dictatorship government but their citizens are our brothers, how tragic the Korean War was, and peaceful reunification is the goal. To add a little bit more context, there was a stronger anti-Japan sentiment than an anti-NK sentiment, at least when I was growing up. This was in the late 90's early 00's. 
Yup quite strange when we had a North Korean student coming to our school and the South Koreans tried to befriend him but he kept to hinself 
Ha ha. How did they teach us??? Usually the air raid sirens and evacuation plans did the trick. I was growing up there in the 80s during the Cold war. There were constant student protests in Seoul. Tear gas in the air a lot. That had less to do with the North and more to do with the government at the time in the south.   I remember the terror when there was a drill and your mom or dad wasn't home. I didn't know if I would see them again. Even though I always saw them again, in the moment I was so afraid.  I was taught always that the North Koreans were our brothers and sisters. They were victims of a terrible madman.i was taught they were starving. I was taught that reunification was possible and greatly to be desired. "Korea"in Korean is "hanguk". It means "one people". I grew up believing that not being whole with the North was not being whole as a culture, as a people. Incidentally, the Korean weird for America is "miguk" or beautiful people".  
This is probably the most accurate description of how south koreans learn about NK. Just note that the older generation that have been taught with anti-communism regime will probably not be using reddit  so you will not read their opinion here. 
US Air Force guy here, I was stationed in Korea for two years (loved it btw, you guys are great). How do you guys honestly feel about the American presence there? Everyone I met seemed pretty happy to see us, but I may not have gotten the full picture, you know? 
I read about some North Korean defectors having a hard time being accepted by south Koreans. Is that true? 
Letters were allowed to be passed like that? Did you get a reply back? 
It's always depressing when a born and bred South Korean uses the English language better than you (a born and bred Englishman.   Your level of English is astounding.  
Any recommendations for a good film in regards to the SK/NK struggle? 
I've heard from many Koreans that reunification right now isn't practical as there would be a huge refugee crisis and a huge cost for humanitarian aid.  This seems contrary to your post, so I'm wondering if the above stance is mostly by a minority pragmatic group of people or do most people have this view but hope for "some day" of reunification? 
That's a really compassionate way of seeing the North Korea situation 
I'm the same as you, Korean-born Canadian who spent his preteen childhood in Korea. What I always thought it was weird is that North Korea is portrayed as a crazy villain in North America Media. Back in South Korea, it was viewed mostly as the "less fortunate" cousin that South Korea should try to help and take in as they needed our help. I even vividly remember singing songs in music class that directly translates to "Our dream of unification".   Then again, a shift could have been made in the general perspective on North Korea, as the somewhat extreme conservatives have taken over the country since 2008.  
Ive heard that back probably when your parents were in school, kids were taught that North Koreans had horns and other demon like qualities and that some of that characterization still persists these days.  I was listening to a radio interview where some North Koreans who escaped to the south and then came to America were shocked when people asked them where their horns are and similar questions about others in the North.  It was an interesting segment and ended with getting opinions from people in the South about how they feel towards NK now. 
There seems to be a lot of Koreans living in Canada answering in this thread. Serious question, is Canada a popular country for Koreans to immigrate to? 
From your perspective, is it one of SK's goals to actively reunite with NK? Or is the separation more or less accepted now? 
It sounds like "eat your veggies because there are starving kids" is a universal tactic of parents.  At least in SK you are close enough to NK that the "well why don't you give it to them" comeback is actually viable. 
Interesting, this is sort of like for me Britain in world war 2, teaching children to watch out for suspicious activity.  So, from what you tell me, they don't really teach you much about why North Korea is evil and dangerous, rather, it just is. 
This guy is spot on.  While I'm not Korean, I have been in SK for 7 years, am currently in my final semester as an undergrad here, and also teach part time at a kindergarten.  As it pertains to OP's question, my kindergarten classes include ages 4-6.  Most of the kids become aware that there is a North Korea sometime towards the end of their 5th year, or beginning of 6th.  They don't have any real idea about what happens in NK, just that their is another group of Koreans way up north somewhere, and they can't go visit them.  My classmates, normal 18-24 year old college students, are generally, as benjopark said, apathetic towards NK.  There is still the idea that people in NK and SK are all Koreans, and should live together, but it is more of a mythological idea for this generation.  They focus more on the practical side of unification, and see the astronomical economic cost that would fall on the shoulders of the already overworked South Koreans. 
Did your parents talk to you about it? How did they bring up the topic! 
Just got back from SK had many nights drinking where people got visibly uncomfortable with me speaking Japanese and being Chinese too. They would relax when i swapped to English and my British accent though. 
What was life in North Korea like? Did you leave your parents? 
Wow it's amazing that you grandpa managed to reunite with his brother at a marketplace! He must have been so happy. 
It is due to the isolation and difference in North Korean language and culture in comparison to the South I believe.  60 Years of total separation has its affects. 
Why did you mom banned you from eating the North Korean candies?   
Huh, so that's where the racial slur "gook" came from. Unfortunate that such a nice word was twisted around for such cruel purposes.  Do you think the American/SK alliance had an influence on the choice "miguk"? 
Is that show propaganda itself? I don't know that I've ever viewed NK as anything more than impoverished. To think kids  received free fish with school supplies sounds wildly imaginative. I've been reading into this thread all day I'll have to check out those videos, thanks.  
As a parent I couldn't imagine. The darkness I would descend into... 
Yea my parents' generation, they used to have regular evacuation drills and stuff. But they do not Reddit.  
I think most Koreans want reunification-- I, as a Korean-American do.  I'm afraid that that the only way that will happen is via a war where tens of millions die. 
As long as Kim stays in power then I don't think there will be reunification, he wouldn't want that because then he wouldn't be treated as God and he would lose all of his authority and power.  
I think I can speak for the general majority of ROK soldiers when I say this, and in short, we are very appreciative of you guys. We have teaching sessions in the army, roughly translated as "mental education", during which we are taught that the American military presence in Korea serves as a deterrent to North Korean aggression. I remember one instructor talking about aircraft carriers with passion. "China has a military budget of XX dollars, but they have one aircraft carrier. The US Navy has ten aircraft carriers. End of story."  So all in all, we like you guys, both because you guys are fun to be around and also because we are taught that we need you. 
Regarding the general South Korean attitude, yes they are not really accepted. Although ethnically the same, North Koreans are very different when it comes to dialect, culture, education, etiquette etc etc. They take classes on how to adjust to a completely new society but still struggle. Without common experiences, both South and North Koreans are having a hard time to adjust to each other.  In my opinion, this is one of the more worrying aspects of reunification. We probably will mistreat North Koreans and without proper identification of the problem, education of a solution and a subsequent public shift in attitude, we will not get along that easily.  However, with more and more TV shows with North Koreans (there are some popular ones right now) and more public exposure to North Koreans, we are getting better with regards to treating them better.  I feel like that this could have been answered better but I hope this was adequate. 
yeah this is what I wanted to ask. Can't imagine that there were actually children receiving these letters, NK government probably wouldn't allow it. 
They probably didn't want to tell children anything worse.  
I think the difference is that North American media focuses on DPRK's leadership, while it seems like the people in ROK focus on the people of the DPRK.  My perspective on the North American obsession with DPRK villainy ends at it's leadership and government.  I feel for the North Korean people and wish they could be reunited with their families in the south.   
I heard there's a lot of prejudice towards NK defectors trying to find work at SK. People don't trust them and think of them as a lower class. Is that true? I would seem opposite of what you were taught in school growing up, that they just need a helping hand. 
People forget that South Korea was once a fascist dictatorship. 
For younger generations, the consensus is to stay where they are now. SK people sacrificed a lot to get to where they are economically and does not want to lose their sons/brothers/fathers to war.  My perspective is that the country must be united once again. Depends on what party takes over the government. If liberal, peaceful merge. If conservative, hit me and we will hit you back harder. However, both parties have aims to reunite. Just different methods 
Well, we had to watch the videos of those kids and we felt bad for them. It hits you hard when kids who look like you and speaks the same language dies off from starvation 
I was always told (living on US) of "starving kids in Africa".     I actually wanted to send them my half eaten bowl of cereal, and got upset when my parents told me it was impossible.    
They did, but not the people. Implication was that NK people are just "hypnotized" by communism ideology and needs to be save. 
My parents were strict about speaking Korean in the house. I watched Korean news and debate programs to get more sophisticated vocabulary. Its hard to be bilingual. I can write full college level essays and speak both languages, but it took me a long time to get to that level. I still have the weekend hangover from speaking Korean all during the weekend and try to get my English together on Monday morning. 
I don't know when you were stationed in Korea, but younger generation does not even seem to care nowadays 
which part of Seoul were you visiting? I find it hard to believe people were visibly uncomfortable with someone speaking Japanese, there are Japanese tourists everywhere. 
My father escaped north Korea total of 3 times and 2 of the time he got caught in china and brought back into north Korea. We have a relative who are higher up in ranks of north Korean officials who refused to help our family but this time he helped my father from getting executed and made him serve in prison for total of 13 years after  coming out he tried his 3rd escape which he made to south korea. From then he sent few people to bring me and my grandmother to south. I was separated from my mother when i was 5 since my grandmother adopted me. Still no news from my mother. Apart from my mother and rich relatives,  no family left in north.  
She didn't trust it. Said something about not being regulated or something 
No. Probably from the Chinese character for the U.S. which means "beautiful" and is pronounced "Mei" in Chinese. Same character is likely pronounced "Mi" in Korean.    
Same here but my mom and dad defected from Dresden in 79 and made it to NYC via Italy and Portugal on forged documents. Crazy to think.  
It would be awesome if South and North Korea unified like we in Germany did, but I wouldnt expect it. The leaders of the DDR are quite different to the leaders of North Korea after all.  But you should never stop to hope. 
I mean Korea transformed so completely during their lives, can I ask how they talk about this transformation and how the country was under the elder Park, or how they use industrial tools that they might not have had as children if they were especially poor? 
Would you mind describing some the differences in culture and etiquette? 
Oh believe me I feel awful for the North Koreans, I just expected the view of them in SK to be much more bitter and it cheered me up a bit to see that. Those people are fellow humans that need to be helped. We can't hate them for their leader. Not everyone in Germany in the 1940's was a Nazi 
That could be the case. We definitely don't tell our children about the atrocities we've committed in the US until much later 
there is a good reason for that. in the rather cruel and gruesome korean war about a third of the north korean population died.  its easy to make fun of north koreas paranoia and hatred for the US when its expressed by a silly looking fat kid, but there are few countries and societes that were devastated to such an extent as (north) korea by us bombs and napalm. 
By people do you mean South Koreans?  The demonizing of North Korea was probably done under the exact dictatorship you're talking about.  The people today are not ignorant of the dictatorships, and are very much resentful about it.  This is especially so after the impeachment of the recent corrupt president, who was the daughter of the dictator. 
When I was talking to people who worked for reunification efforts in Korea, I heard that often times Koreans from abroad feel more strongly about reunification than native Koreans. He stated that unfortunately many people in Korea have become ambivalent towards the idea of reunifying. Would you say that's accurate?  
How much of that kind of footage exists? It seems like something NK wouldn't allow to be shot, let alone let out of the country. 
My father, who grew up in a communist country, was told of the poor starving kids in America. 
I'm European and I said the same thing. Then my dad said: "If you don't start eating quickly, I'm not sending food to Africa, I'm sending you off to Africa!"   So I ate.  It's about acknowledging the fact that you are in way better position than a lot of others in the world and being picky while other kids don't even have water or normal food is ungrateful to those who provided you with that food.  But good luck explaining that to a 7 year old. 
I once put my leftover bread in an envelope and my grandma "mailed" it to Africa to feed the kids 
For me, it started out as, "starving kids in China," and then morphed into "starving kids in Africa" as I got older and China grew more prosperous and developed better food security. 
I'm from Norway and my dad always used to say that when I was young. "Don't throw/eat up your food because there's alot of people out there that's not as well off as you",or something along those lines...  And it's true that,what he said. I never throw food. I never buy in bulk so I don't end up in the situation that I have to throw something that has gone bad...but I know of people who do. It's a waste and I cannot understand why they do so.  I'm glad my dad raised me the way he did. I love him for that and I'm lucky I was his son and not any of my uncles. He sounds like he is the only reasonable one in that flock. You see,my grandpa wasn't the best parent he could be for my dad and his brothers/sisters so it's like dad did/still does everything opposite of what grandpa did.  So I'm lucky in that regard. I feel like it. 
Lack of modern healthcare (for the common man), food shortages, oppression, and lack of clean water most of the time  All of that would cause us to freak out and do something if it was in a nation that would allow us to help but ug NK 
hey man. How's your family doing after the whole government fiasco? I had people I was familiar with go into pretty bad situations because of it 
Can you imagine the "re-education" programs that would have to happen, with all the people who are brainwashed into believing the god like status of Kim Il Sung, etc.  Funny story, after the German defeat in WWII, the allied government in western germany tried to have a "denazification" in which they would penalize and not allow former nazi party member to be in civil service jobs, but eventually the program was scrapped for a variety of reasons, one being that there were too many former nazi's.  Wonder how it would go with North Korea.  
There's a stronger pull for reunification among older Koreans. The younger generation isn't as keen on it in large part due to the economic burden. There's an extreme skills mismatch between the average, working-age North Korean and the modern economy and if reunification happened, many North Koreans would either have to work in low-wage jobs and/or be supported by government welfare. In addition to the skills mismatch, there's also the cost of unifying the North and South's infrastructure. In total, most estimates put the cost of reunification at at least half a trillion dollars over 20 years (a lot of estimates are higher but that's the baseline most everyone agrees on).   In short, it'd be a drawn out, painful burden that most young Koreans don't want to take on because they also don't identify with the North culturally.  
Older gen: yes Younger gen: look at West Germany, our economy is gonna collapse 
It was 2001, so 16 years ago. Times change fast so this wouldn't surprise me at all. I had hopes that the South Koreans would help the North Koreans if given the opportunity. 
That's an amazing story. It sounds like your father has been through a lot. I'm glad to hear your family is together and I'm sorry that you face discrimination now. I hope South Koreans will get more education about North Koreans so they are not scared of them.  Do you know anyone else from North Korea apart from your family? I wonder if you would become friends and support each other. 
Very reasonable to say that, since there's not much science going on there, god knows what kind of food regulations they have over there. 
There's really no reason for south koreans to be bitter. You have to remember the split was ~65 years ago. A lot of people still have family in nk. During the war many families were split up because only some were willing to make the trek through dangerous conditions to escape north korea. My grandma had to cross through war zones at the age of 11 with her parents so we technically still have relatives over there.  
Well the view on reunification is pretty divided in SK. Let's not forget that they were under a military dictatorship as recent as the 80's. SK has quickly turned themselves around and become an economic power and there are still a lot of people who remember what it was like when SK was dirt poor. Because of past financial hardships and their recent economic turnaround there are a lot of South Koreans who are hesitant to reunify due to the strain it will put on the SK economy. 
Most times it's not even explicitly told to them, regardless of how old they get. The only way you can find out about most of it is through research, since nobody wants to talk about the awful things their country has done in the past.   It's always so interesting to learn about history from multiple points of view. It starts to show you how much history differs based on who is telling it.  
The fact that she was elected in the first place suggests the resentment is not as total as you suggest. 
I teach SK university students and business professionals, speak Korean and have many longtime Korean friends - and also a decade or so of research and work re: NK. I would say this is accurate, although I'm not OP. Almost everyone from the generation during the war has and is dying off, and for the younger generations, reunification means accepting 23 million refugees overnight into an already highly competitive economy -- with little to no education, job training, and few modern society life skills. The practical means of reunification is a huge roadblock and most of my younger University friends from ten years ago to now seem fairly ambivalent, to be honest. This is just my broad view and I am not South Korean, however. 
Maybe more like East and West Germany. Merging once  the government one one falls.  
Peaceful merge would probably involve increased SK and NK cooperation, and slowly building NK into a relatively less crazy and backwards nation via political reforms to the point where it isn't a poison pill to swallow by unifying with SK.  SK has done joint industrial projects and stuff on smaller scales to maybe try to start stuff like this, but nothing's really worked consistently for more than a few years at a time even during the best of times. Its probably also not in Kim Jong Un's best interest to do this either unfortunately, given the fact that, until they have working weaponized nuclear missiles, it could potentially take away one of his most powerful deterrents to the fall of his regime. By building his country up, he diminishes the destructive burden of the refugee crisis that would ensue should NK fall. 
I guess the same way actual photos we get from tourists that go there.   Risk their freedom to get unauthorized shots.  
It dosn't have to be recent footage. NK was a fairly normal Soviet regime until 1990 or so. After that it went into Hermit mode. But before many Russian, Chinese tourists and visitors could go there. Presumably they filmed stuff. Other footage could be propoganda, accurate but staged. Both NK and SK have been "at war" for 60 years. Plenty of time to get footage. 
He wasn't entirely misplaced. Tens of thousands of inner-city youth were and still are starving. And I understand that the Soviets in particular liked to portray the problems of racism and black poverty as endemic of the inequalities of the capitalist system.   It was a "you may not have much, but at least you're not left to fend for yourself like those poor people capitalism brushes aside".  
For me was always Africa.  My mom gave me a kids book that had a spin wheel on it and on the spin wheel was an about 70% chance of hitting a third world country and it was supposed to say how lucky you are for not being born in shitty countries. She made me spin it if I didn't eat all my green beans. 
A lot of people buy in bulk because it's cheaper than individual portions and can last longer. Poverty mindset is hard to get out of. 
Biggest is food shortage. During famine, cannibalism happens often in rural areas. Also if 1 person defects, public execution for all family members left behind 
Isn't there also huge mineral wealth and industrial capacity in North Korea though?  I'd expect the Unified Korea would be a powerhouse similar to Japan (probably more powerful economically)  
German here: Our economy didnt collapse! The east drags us down a bit, but overall it works out. 
West Germany didn't collapse when reunification happened. Germany is a thriving and powerful economy and was that way before reunification just as SK is today 
I mean like a general or something secretly wanting to end the regime. 
I've seen this said elsewhere and it confuses me and makes me wonder if education has changed. I certainly learned about all the atrocities against the Native Americans and slavery. We didn't get all the grisly details in elementary school, of course. But we did in high school. This was 25 years ago though. 
Unfortunately, yes.  Although it has heightened definitely since then.  There are people who regard her father as a great person, since he was the only dictator that used his absolute power for "good" (for certain people).  People who lived during his rule, that benefited from it, still hail him.  Even today, there are protests by older conservatives calling for the decriminalization of the former president.  The rest of us are hardly sympathetic, and a lot of this resentment is also being carried on to such people. 
To add a similar perspective to this from Cyprus, divided into 2 by Turkey in 1974: The efforts are very much geared towards reunification but amongst 20-40 year old who have lived in this situation all of their lives there is a lot of worry about how much the economy (especially) will be affected in trying to unify with a state that is very much lagging behind. I suspect this is many times more pronounced in the NK / SK story 
I suppose there'd also be the lingual gap between North and South Koreans as well. Because of how isolated North Korea is from the rest of the world, even from its southern neighbour, there is beginning to be a noticeable difference between the dialects spoken by the people on either side of the border. 
The highly competitive aspect of the economy should make them more willing to take on the challenge of reunification. Thats 23 million more consumers, a wholly untapped market. South Koreans would have the 'opportunity' to be like the so called Carpet Baggers from the northern US in the post civil war america. They brought money and industry to a devastated region, and ultimately profited greatly while also to an extent improving the conditions in the area.   It's worth being mentioned, that these Northerners going South were viewed as opportunistic scum by many in the South, and were seen profiting off the hard work of southerners. Either way, South Koreans could easily see a unified Korea as gaining a market for goods and services, and an influx of cheap unskilled labor on which to build highly profitable industry. 
It would probably be a million times worse than Germany's reunification.  East Germany was backwards and poor but nothing like the disparity between the Koreas. 
I could never see them doing this especially with Kim Jong Un in power  
Definitely. If it's non-perishable (canned, frozen, dry) I buy in bulk. Otherwise not. Very little waste, and it's much cheaper buying rice in 10 kilo bags instead of little cardboard boxes. 
What does buying in bulk have to do with "poverty mindset?" If you have the space to store it and will use the item buying in bulk is smart.   
I remember reading some stories of that in the book "Nothing to Envy," which is one of the few books I can find in the US that talk about regular people in NK and that doesn't focus solely on the government/larger political abstractions. I don't think anyone in the West can really conceive of what it's like to live in that kind of repressive situation. I'm an Orwell scholar and the similarities to Nineteen Eighty-Four are stunning. 
Excellent point. I'm sure SKorean realtors would get excited too. 
There was a 3:1 GDP per capita ratio between West Germany and East Germany. Between North Korea and South Korea it's something like 40:1. 
But the situation in NK is a lot worse, people don't even have enough to eat.  
Those at the top got there due to being complicit in the regime's practices, self-interests, and bootlicking.  They're not all of a sudden going to have an epiphany about altruism and risk their life to save the peasants.  Furthermore, a coup would take more than just one general-- it would take a group of people all risking their lives and the lives of their families for generations to come.  Why would they take that risk when they're generals with the best lifestyles already in NK? 
That's really awesome. I think I only had one teacher who emphasized how terrible internment was.  
A few years back, I was at some function where an elderly woman spoke of her experiences growing up in an American WWII internment camp. She was probably late 70's/early 80's Japanese American that never considered herself to be very Japanese as she was born and raised on the American Pacific coast and spoke better English than I do. The part that stuck with me was how she talked about how she could never understand why they were there.  
That sounds a lot like my knowledge of reunification Germany 
I agree, I recall reading from several sources that regardless of the problems in communist East Germany, their quality of products and volume of production was better per worker than just about any other communist bloc nation. I personally believe it was due to the German culture. NK has been more completely transformed in such an entrenched fashion, I think the difficulty of orienting their population into any kind of a modern economy would be profoundly difficult. I do not believe the pre-communist NK culture had a society as modern as the pre-WWII German example. 
Starving ethnic minorities? I don't think the Soviets really should have thrown stones that way 
And if someone commits a crime, 3 generations of their family have to be held in concentration camps  
That's a great book.  There are a couple very short anecdotes in the middle of it that describe why people chose to leave.  One man defected when he saw a propaganda poster showing a South Korean worker, and the poster was about how workers were exploited in the South. But the worker had a fountain pen in his shirt pocket, which is an unheard of luxury item in the North.      Another one was of a soldier who got his hands on a fold-able fingernail clipper from the South.  The simplicity and smoothness of operation was utterly without equivalent in the North, and he thought that if they spent their time creating things like this to trim fingernails, it was proof positive that life was better. 
Well, it's not exactly "huge" compared to other larger countries but yes, there are a diverse and relatively abundant array of materials (which is pretty much what the DPRK currently survives off of). And yes, South Korea is currently the 11th largest economy on its own, so yes it would likely only grow after reunification.  However, it would only start to grow after it had spent a ton of money modernizing and linking the two countries' infrastructure, which again would take some time, money, and also likely involve some social unrest.  It's also unclear how China, Russia, Japan and other countries would respond to a unified Korea. China and Japan both would likely be more apprehensive of a unified Korea because it's economy and geostrategic positioning and so trade/regional tensions might worsen and hurt the reunification process. 
Also, crucially, the West Germans were very highly educated. That's one thing the Eastern Bloc did get right. Building physical capital is easy once you've already got human capital.  That sure as hell ain't the case with North Korea, especially because malnutrition as children stunts people intellectually. 
You're thinking of Midway.  Pearl Harbor was when the Luftwaffles bombed Ireland.   
Shit, if we give them all semi-auto Barretts, that would probably fix itself pretty quickly. 
My 2nd grade teacher was actually born in one. That's all she ever told us, I guess we were too young to get any real details 
My understanding is that the culture, wealth and education gap between North and South Korea is way more severe (now) than the gap between East and West Germany was in 1989.  FWIW, even now it's pretty easy to tell East and West Germans apart if they're above a certain age (~ 35) 
I would imagine that the reunification would be more like nation-building after a fallen dictator. SK would have a lot of help from Western powers if NK government were to collapse. It would take time, but I don't think it would harm SK's economy in the long run. 
I mean, NK was way behind the curve 25 years ago. Since then, they have additionally missed the internet age. Can't even imagine how that would go...their infrastructure is as behind as their culture. The problem if the longer this goes on, the more incompatible they become. One might point out that Cuba is similar, but they seem far more aware and open to the rest of the world. 
It probably had more to the fact those people that were absorbed and running industry started from the height of German industrialism to their date. They were already well educated and highly skilled. 
No, they just look like low-resolution brown and green. Same with large parts of Africa, unfortunately- I wanna see some elephants from space  
I have always wondered how they determined 3 generations. Like if the women don't have kids are they raped? 
You're thinking of Iceland. Ireland was where 99 Luftballons bombed North Korea. 
I still remember that picture of the Wartberg being passed by a Mercedes or Porsche on the Autobahn after reunification.  Very iconic.   
Keep in mind China lives next door. I doubt they'd be thrilled about American GIs handing out freedom on every North Korean street corner... 
My understanding was that most of the time these family lines simply end in the concentration camp. The women are often raped, though not specifically to create a third generation. 
Not a movie but a tv series called Black Mirror. The episodes are like an hour long, and focus on technology and psychological torment. Totally a fucked up show. 
Threads. Especially as I live in Sheffield where it's set 
Prisoners.  It had me terrified and on the edge of my seat the entire movie.  It was every parent's nightmare.  I am not even a parent and I was worried for my children.  
Jacobs Ladder. Without a doubt, the most thrilling horror movie I've seen.  
Misery - No need for jump scares. The terror comes from Annie's swift changes in mood, and suddenly you find yourself fearing for Paul's life.  
Eraserhead gave me nightmares for a couple of days. 
The original Texas Chainsaw Massacre - those long, still shots where the horror just comes into frame and you are helpless and can only sit and watch as it unfolds. 
Silence of the lambs.    Most of the violence isn't even on the screen. But because we don't see it we started putting it together in our heads. Hopkins and Foster sucked me into that movie and had me looking over my shoulder for days.  
We Need to Talk About Kevin.        Don't look up anything about it, just watch it. More horrifying than scary, though, TBH.  edit- fucked up the title    edit2- should be on Netflix (US, anyways) for those who want to watch it. 
Although the second half of the movie resorts to some cheap scares the first half of 'The Descent' is terrifying. 
Mothman Prophecies to me was quite scary. Also, Coherence which is a really low budget movie gets me quite anxious and scared when watching it because I can imagine myself in their shoes if that stuff were to happen to me on a normal night. It is on Amazon Prime if anyone is interested if you like relativity and alternate reality stuff.  
The Shining. While less scary and more intense and dreadful, it's still awesome. 
The Last House on the Left. The 70's one is great but the remake is pretty solid too. The idea of knowing your temporary houseguests harmed someone close to you is an interesting idea. Made me think about what I might do in that situation.  Oldboy is a good example of this too. The more you think about it, the scarier it becomes. 
Se7en (David Fincher). Saw it when I was 12 or something, barely slept for a week 
Session 9. It's what you never see that really gets to you. 
Not traditionally a horror film but terrifying in a different way, Bone Tomahawk. 
The Girl Next Door. Not the comedy one, the other one loosely based on Sylvia Likens.  Poor girl got mutilated and raped to death orchestrated by someone who was supposed to be a caregiver.  
A Spanish film called El Orfanato (The Orphanage).  
Black Swan. A slow descent into madness is creepy and realistic and totally within the realm of possibility for most people 
The original Blair Witch project. The fact that is was the first "found footage" and you never saw the witch or anything because it was always off camera was freaky. Plus I remember when everyone left the theater the fact that everyone thought that was real footage and not a movie.  
It follows was pretty good at creating a creepy atmosphere.  
The Fourth Kind pretty much did it for me.   But I'm a sucker for "realistic" alien movies.  
"The mist" was very good for this. All about suspense and the idea of not knowing what was out there, and the ending.... Very good 
The VVitch  There's *one* jump scare in the film, which doesn't involve any horror at all. It's a fantastic period piece and creepy as fuck 
For me.....i dunno about 'scariest' but as much as people shit on M. night Shamalananan,   I thought Signs  It had good tension. There was a lot of quietness in the movie which made the atmosphere more creepy, almost like you're on the edge of your seat feeling like they might jam the volume up high as shit to scare you, but they never do. To this day, i'll never forget how scary it was when they show that video of the birthday party and the footage capturing the alien walking by. I still won't watch that movie alone. 
Nightcrawler had me on the edge of my seat.  It's a diffrent kind of scary... 
The Strangers. The fear of being hunted is just fucking awful  
Creep.  This one left me with a feeling of dread for days afterwards. 
For those who don't know, the show got its name from the way our devices resemble black mirrors when they aren't active / with their screen(s) locked. 
I just watched this last week.  Wow!  Some of the stories stuck with long after.  
I watched this once. I won't watch it again. It was so well done but that heavy feeling stayed with me for days.  
Worked as a CVS photo technician when this came out.  It was extra creepy for me because I realized how easy it would be for someone to be like that.  I had been working there less than a year and already had so many people that I knew much of their family history and insight into their family vacations. 
And people call this a "bad" Robin Williams movie. I think it was amazing. The only gripe I had was that they decided to weakly explain why he was the way he was at the end (molestation). I think it would have been fine to just leave it as "he's obsessed with this family and wants to be a part of it, and despises Will for betraying his family."  
There are a few jump scares, but in the context of Jacob's Ladder they don't seem cheap and they are legitimately unsettling. 
The fucking shaking head in  the rear car window.   Fuck. That.  
The book is like that as well. Even when she's being "sweet" you're on edge because you know she'll change in a snap. Such a haunting book. Need to see the movie. 
Talk about a movie that's hard to watch again... just because of the sense of impending dread.  You just feel greasy watching that movie. 
I've always loved how that movie just gets right to it and people start dropping like flies. 
SPOILERS: I love how the original TCM ends. The final two shots make the film for me. The shot of Sally screaming in the back of the pickup truck as Letherface dances in the sunset. I use the term dances here because that is the best way to describe it. It is almost beautiful. The tagline to the original film is "who will survive and what will be left of them?" Even though Sally escapes, you are left asking what will be left of her? How can she go on after seeing what she has seen? Then to see Leatherface dancing almost triumphantly. I love that ending. 
Somehow, even with me being a morbid kid born in 1974, I didn't see the original TCM until like 2003.  I really expected it to not hold up after decades of derivative works and desensitization, but it did.  That movie is horror art. 
even though i love the film, it has plenty of jump scares, but they're done in a much better way.  
But that film has one of the most amazing jump-scares in cinema. You know, with the bag. 
(Mild spoilers) The only actual "jump scare" I remember involves them mistaking the cat for the Alien. And that serves a different purpose than to be a cheap scare, obviously.  The true horror is the lurking sense of dread that's there for the majority of the movie. 
I don't know if you play video games at all but if you're a fan of the original Alien movie, then Alien: Isolation is a must play.  
His mother. I don't think I've felt sorry for a character more than her in a film. 
I don't know why, but I always confused it with a comedy that had a similar title. (Or maybe not even that.) I was expecting a good laugh and was weirded out when I got Tilda Swinton.... and then it only got more horrifying. 
Ok I literally just said the big jump scare in The Thing was the best of all time. But I take it back. The one in The Descent is the best of all time. It was literally the climax of the movie.  
Yeah that film still has me noping the fuck out of any caving expeditions a good ten years on.  
Oh man, I forgot about that movie!!! Mothman Prophecies scared the shit out of me as a teen, and then they casually add that it's based on real events? I just wanted to get that movie the fuck away from me forever. I gotta watch it again and see what I think of it now.  
The part where the kids are in the closet toward the end literally made me hyperventilate in the theatre.  
Oh, man, this deserves to be higher.  The section where the husband comes back from the war, seems like he knows what's really going on, but is still haunted by having been there. Then has to go "back."  Made me shudder. 
The bathtub old woman is still one of the scariest things I've ever seen. That and the typewriter scene, which is one of the most clever and iconic horror movie scenes ever I reckon. 
To be fair, I can think of at least one jump scare in that movie.  [Specifically, when the cop is hovering over the junkie's face and he wakes up](/spoiler) 
The one part of that movie that always gets me in the last session tape where the doctor asks "Where do you live, Simon?" and the response is "I live in the weak and the wounded." 35 years old making my husband check under the goddamn bed and shit... 
Well there is the part where the defibrillators go straight through that guy's chest.  Or the scene where they're testing the blood.  I guess what's cool about the movie is they basically tell you a jump scare's about to happen but it still always gets you, and they don't ever really feel cheap.  So, after writing all that I guess I totally agree with you.  
That last scene when they're in the basement was the scariest fucking scene I've ever watched.  And nothing happened!  It was just the tension and the realization of standing in a room all alone with a killer.   
same, i'm not sure you would even call it a horror movie. but that scene where he stabs the two people having a picnic was the scariest shit ever and it happens in broad daylight.  
Making up a song about Coraliiiiiiiiiiine!  First half of this movie I was like, "Pshhh this shit is for kids. Was my friend high recommending this as a scary movie?"  Second half of the movie had me on the edge of my seat and gave me the kind of goosebumps that last for hours after it was over. 
Ugh I can't do sexual violence films they make me so queasy 
Peters: Justin open the door  Justin: Did you hear it?  Peters: Yes, yes i heard it, do you know what it is?  Justin: It shows you things, horrible....things  Peters: What does?  Justin: The dark inside me from the other place. I wont go back there, i wont.  Peters: No baby bear, come on open the door. You stay with me Justin.  Justin: If you could see the things ive seen you wouldnt try to stop me.  Peters:Thats not you talking. Open the door.  Justin activates airlock.  Sends chills everytime i see that scene   
That movie has a boat load of over-the-top jump scares. 
I was so afraid during that movie that i honestly felt like i would die if i didn't stop watching it.  So i had to finish it the next night. 
I'm sad TBWP is so low down the list. Easily the scariest movie I have seen. 
I saw this movie on the last day it was in the theatre. I was the only one in there. I knew nothing about it. I just assumed the footage was real.   At the end, I was so terrified that aliens were real that I sat in the parking lot on Google for 20 minutes making sure that movie was fake.   I'm a grown ass man, and I don't scare easily (or much at all, really). To this day, I have tricked 4 of my friends into watching it with the pretense that the footage is real. 2 of my friends - also grown ass men - had nightmares.   Good times.  
I didn't really have any idea what I was getting into. I feel like the trailers did a good job of giving an overview without spoiling how intense it was going to be. 
That movie kept making me second guess myself. When it started, I just knew Goodman's character was telling the absolute truth about the outside world. Then about halfway through, I wasn't so sure anymore, despite the evidence, or that it was something much different than what he described. I went back and forth a couple more times until the climax/reveal.   ETA: this is probably a credit to the marketing team for not spoiling anything and yet still making it seem like something I wanted to watch. 
The part where [Emmet died] (/spoiler) was one of the most unexpected things I've seen in a movie.  
The ending really did it for me - the entire movie was thrilling and fantastic the entire way through but I really wish I could wipe my memory and watch it again to re-experience the real terror and anxiety I felt when [she sees a "helicopter" in the distance, which for a brief moment I thought great, she'll be saved, it's all OK! until it came closer and began to "transform" and you knew she was utterly screwed. I put myself in that position and wondered if leaving the bunker was really the better option, or maybe suicide was the best solution now...gave me serious anxiety.] (/spoiler) One of my favorite films I've ever seen. 
I was pretty hyped about this movie after seeing the teaser trailer and I was not disappointed. I'm used to seeing Goodman play the "good guy" because he has such a warm voice and a great "dad" kind of demeanor, but WOW can he play the villain. 
1408 has something for everyone. Are you afraid of heights, tight spaces, drowning, burning, freezing, dead bodies, ghosts, being drugged, or simply losing your mind? If so, then there's a bit in the movie that will make you uncomfortable.   It's a hell of a trip. Definitely one of my favorite movies.  
If I remember correctly, Jake Gyllenhaal only blinks, like, three times in the whole movie... 
"Why are you doing this to us?"  "Because you were home"  *shudders* 
also when the wind blows, the saddest cartoon movie ever 
"Attack warning red! Attack warning red!"  Threads is terrifying, The Day After is a movie for children in comparison  Edit - typo 
Robin Williams is typically light hearted a goofy in movies, especially since he is a career comedian. They probably walked into this not knowing to expect a different kind of performance, only to learn that Robin Williams is an extremely malleable actor that is extremely talented.  I don't think people expected Robin to play such a creepy character, so they wrote it off as bad when really it's a fantastic movie. 
Some actors become the character, and some characters become the actor. One Hour Photo and Insomnia are two roles where Robin Williams stepped out of his own persona and really became the character. Maybe people were expecting the usual Robin Williams performance, but I thought his acting was good in both movies particularly because it showed that he has more range that most directors utilized. 
I've bought a cheap Jacob's ladder and I agree they are surprisingly unsettling  
It was 100+ degrees the entire time they were filing it in Texas. The movie sweats. The terror is sweltering.  
Anthony Hopkins had only 16 minutes (some say even less) of screen time and won an Oscar for it, one of the shortest. He played the part so well.  I'm also a fan of the TV series Hannibal, not quite as good as Hopkins, but Mads Mikkelsen plays the character pretty well too.  
When Lecter makes Migs kill himself just by talking to him through the bars of his cell, you really understand how evil and cunning the bastard is. Super creepy. 
The crawling around in the airduct Jumpscare is definitely up there...but it's not cheap. You kinda expect it to come.  However, the worst part of the movie is when you know it's coming, and you can see it...  
I love Tilda in it. She was fucking fantastic! I got stressed watching her driving around without saying anything.   I am ambivalent about how I feel about her character though. I feel sorry for her but at the same time I feel like she demonised Kevin a lot. I'll stop here coz idk how to do a spoiler tag on mobile and I might reveal important plot points. 
That film fucked me up. Everything he did was just cruel and evil but directed entirely at her. All the things he did were done to torment his mother. I have also never felt so sorry for someone in my life.  A friend keeps telling me to read the book, I need to get around to that.  
****POSSIBLE SPOILERS**** There's an interesting nature vs. nurture message that could be taken away from the movie. Tilda Swinton's character clearly did not enjoy being a mother, she found it difficult and unrewarding and she missed her former life. Even childbirth was a painful, horrific experience for her, and she had no interest in holding her newborn baby. You could argue that the mother's passive attitude towards her child contributed to him being the way he is, rather than he was born evil. 
I didn't know what it was about before I saw it.  First half builds anxiety with touches of eerie and possible fantastic elements, and right after that scene, everything devolves to a rush of adrenaline. I love this movie. 
The film that The Others was based on, The Innocents (1961) is also excellent, loads of chilling scenes that just unnerve and really get under your skin. Zero jump scares, no blood and guts, just great storytelling. Think I watched the whole movie on YouTube, def worth checking out. 
When he is slowly walking up the stairs "Wendy. Let me finish. I'm not gonna hurt ya. I'm just gonna bash yer brains in". And he slides between such an eerily calm delivery to growling and back again in a way that is some of the best acting I have ever seen. 
The typewriter reveal is some deeply intense horror 
Okay, but don't you agree that it's way too good of a film to say it resorts to cheap jump scares? And the jump scares aren't what makes the film so scary imo 
Just re-watched this last night on a whim. And goddamn is that dog perfectly CREEPY. 
Excellent point.  The blood jumping out of the petri dish is one of the most effective "jump scares" in the history of cinema, frankly.   
In summary - the jump scares are not cheap at all, they are effective and creative af. 
Yep.. the movie has around 3 jump scared, but they are effective, well executed and the movie doesn't doesn't need them to build atmosphere and scares 
it is the writing and how they filmed it (it is stop motion after all) really helps, I believe they drop a few frames in the other world scenes for the uncanny effect 
It also didn't have that pointless boy character. Coraline did everything on her own (plus cat). There was no "eek save me" moment in the book. She tricked the hand and saved the day.   And they left out just how long she was alone while her parents were kidnapped. That's every child's nightmare.  
That's the first completely silent jumpscare that scared the shit out of me. 
When the huge guy just walks right in. Scene went from 0 to 100 real fucking quick. 
I went it pretty much blind, and I'd definitely recommend people do the same. All you need to know is that it's a very, very tense movie - so be up for that. 
It also ended "openly"...and I absolutely loved it. We watch the main character go from absolutely helpless and easily killed to...a heroine of epic proportions giving her a role in future Cloverfield stories.  
Stephen Kings short story of 1408 scared the dogshit out of me.  It was just forty something pages.  But it was psychologically intense.   
hey man, some people are into that kinda stuff.  not me, but...you know, some people...I guess. 
That's the part that really fucked with me.  There are actual psychopaths out there.  This could happen to anyone. 
My parents saw 'cartoon' and thought I could watch it. It wasn't until about halfway through the movie they figured out that 8 year old NothingEverWorks shouldn't be watching this and he is now crying uncontrollably because he understood it. Was traumatized for a while over the horrors of nuclear war.  
Kind of like Bryan Cranston. I spent the first few episodes of Breaking Bad wondering why Walt hasn't done anything dumb and goofy yet.  
There are two people in Hollywood who ruined themselves for future roles by playing a monster too well: Anthony Hopkins and Kathy Bates. 
Also, in *The Shining*, the hotel and its ghosts are King's alcoholism.  Unlike in *Misery* though, he didn't realize this at the time.  He later said, "I was the guy who ~~had written~~ wrote The Shining without even realizing that I was writing about myself." 
I expected to hate the TV series. But Mads did a great job concealing the monster that his character was with a serene and confident exterior. Some of the CGI and first season "Killer of the Week" stories weren't great, but overall it was FAR too good and high concept for network television. 
That's what made Lecter scary. Not the fact that he could easily overpower most people without breaking a sweat. The fact that he *didn't need to*. The fact that, given enough time and the right environment, he could simply convince someone that it was a good idea to let him eat them. 
Odd how Levine seems to have been typecast as either a cop/military dude or a psycho in like 90% of his roles after Silence. 
I don't understand how videogames still haven't come around to making ventilation shafts scary and suspenseful. The vents are always the safespot in every damn game. 
I honestly don't think I could handle playing that game with a Vive haha. It already gave we way too much stress.  
I can't imagine what it must be like to be in her shoes. Even from an incredibly young age Kevin seemed to know what he was doing in regards to how he was around his father, to make it look like the mother was always at fault.      Imagine the mental battle of "my child hates me" and "but he's only young so I must be mad." 
READ THE BOOK. it's very good. it's like the move, told through the POV of eva through letters to her husband. 
I disagree. She clearly enjoyed being a mother to her daughter. I get what you mean, though. She also seemed to have regretted starting a family and wished for her old life back of travelling and having a lot of fun. 
On subsequent watches you'll notice that a lot of the cave creatures are visible in the cave before the big reveal. Usually only partially or for a second, so they look like normal cave fauna to the unaware. Good movie.  
From what I understand, that "dog" was acting like that because it was half wolf and in a terrified state. It was confused and scared, so it went into super quiet stealth mode. 
Palmers face just before they test is fantastic. A resigned "Oh fuck."  What's more terrifying that it's the Alien impersonating him so well it's got his goddamn mannerisms. 
Yes! It scares you because no one, not the characters nor the audience, was expecting Palmer to be the Thing. It scares you with the suddenness and the noise, but also scares you because you come to accept the fact that anyone can be the Thing, no matter how closely you thought you were watching them. It's brilliant. 
In an interview, the guys who adapted it added the little boy so coralline wasn't just talking to herself the whole time. It made for a better movie, but the book was perfect 
It caught me off guard. No jumpscares for the entire movie then one out of nowhere.  
I know every other form looked normal but for some reason the huge guy had like no eyes and it was terrifying 
Something different is Prisoners. He has a CRAZY stare in that. Basically hes a detective that is assigned to two missing girls case. Although it doesnt say it in the movie, you can tell his character is wired and barely has sleep.  
I disagree. Both Hopkins and Bates were nominated (and won) their first Oscar for playing that monster in 1990 but have gone on to have several successful non-typecast roles including performances that led to more Oscar nominations (3 more for Hopkins, 2 more for Bates). They're both highly respected, versatile actors.  Anthony Perkins is a better example of an actor typecast by an early role as sadistic monster in Psycho; unlike Hopkins/Bates, Perkins ~~has~~ was never ~~been~~ able to escape that career-defining role. 
Further, he laments that he does not remember writing the book Cujo. He was drunk throughout the entire writing of it 
That first season is some of the best television horror I've ever seen. They did a great job.  
Damnit. I swore I'd never watch this one again, but now you have me curious. I've already got goosebumps just thinking about watching that again. 
I love the tension everyone else has too in that scene, implying some of them aren't even sure about whether or no they're the alien. 
I wish I had personal trainers, physicians, and dieticians to show me how to do it properly :( 
Donnie Darko is the same - to give the idea he's kinda detached from reality or psychopathic, or perhaps even lost in introspection. 
Absolutely. They caught that a brief amount in the fillings scene in the 2011 version... some of them clearly have that "How the fuck do I even know?!" look on their face (Chris Hulve sure does!)  Naules at that point looks like he's just going to die regardless, the reactions and breakdown in the psyche of all of the guys is fantastic.  "Now, I understand you gentleman have been through a lot lately... but I'd rather not spend the rest of the winter TIED TO THIS FUCKING COUCH!" 
Me too, man.. I'm so heartbroken by finding out all my goal bodies were roiders telling me all I had to do was work hard. 
Indeed. Also water boy...   She has that honesty that some actors have that even though I recognize her face, I don't have trouble seeing her as the character she's portraying.  
"I'm tired of these monkey fighting snakes on this Monday through Friday plane!" 
Seriously though, these guys sold that tension. if this wasn't viewed by everyone at the time as one of those cheap special effects block busters these guys would probably have gotten awards for properly showing that tension and fear from this scene alone. 
Then Tom Hardy comes along and says "i did steroids of course" Paraphrasing. 
probably very quickly. some people have allergies and sneeze a lot-they would notice 
I read this about 5 minutes ago and my nose hasn't stopped bleeding since. Please help. 
People working in hospitals might notice a little quicker, seeing everyone with illnesses stop sneezing at once. My bet would be a couple days, assuming the government doesn't try to cover it up or anything. 
/r/AskReddit needs more of these kinds of questions.  
This is the deepest shit I've read all day. I'm perplexed by this. Would we even realise? I can't remember the last time someone sneezed, could it have happened already? when did I last sneeze? OH GOD 
Is this like a twist on that movie The Children Of Men"??? 
What a tortuous condition that could be (if interpreted a certain way): you still felt like you had to sneeze like you normally would leading up to a sneeze, but you never could get the release that comes when you let out that sneeze. Damn dude. 
A lot of times I sneeze if I look in the sun's direction, so I would probably realize after a few months. Most definitely by Summer. 
I fucking love sneezing. Its a full body instaboner when i sneeze a couple times in a row. I even get jealous when i hear other people sneeze. So i think i'd definitely notice if I or nobody around me sneezed.    Sneeze.  
This is just a decoy. Hiccuping has already stopped worldwide. 
HU-man Version 1.0.2.3778 OTA update.   -----------------------------------  OTA update will be released tonight. It will apply once HU-man is in a sleep state.   Patch notes:  * Fixed a bug where HU-man would seize and a convulsive expulsion of air from the lungs through the nose and mouth occurred.   * Optimized cognitive recall.   * Added framework to resolve fatal peanut response error observed in some units. We anticipate pushing out the RC to selected participants in the 2016FLU patch.   Known issues ----------------  * Bio-waste excretion from sphincter is on average 43% thicker requiring several cleaning cycles. In the mean time we recommend the use of a wet wipe to help reduce the time required to clear waste. If possible use a jet of water to clear any waste that clings to the skin.   * Known issue where the sphincter muscle will open and stay open requiring the HU-man unit to use a scoop to clear bio-waste. If this occurs kindly do the needful.       
I'd realize it as soon as sunlight hit me and I didn't sneeze. 
The first people to notice will be those who are plagued by sneezing often. And even then they will just be happy they personally arent afflicted anymore and won't consider it to have effected everyone. Even when pointed out, most people will be like "huh, yeah I havnt sneezed in a while. odd" then move on with their life. It's going to take years to decades for a formal study to look into it.  
Oh man, damn, that's a crazy and interesting question. I think there's like a 60% chance that we wouldn't notice for decades.  
individuals, maybe they would think it's odd after a couple days. But having that translate to a global understanding and acceptance is unfathomable. 
I doubt so. They of course would realize that *they* had quit sneezing... But how long would it take for them to realize that their friends had also quit? Even then, they'd probably think "wow it's crazy that both of us stopped sneezing" and so on. 
You think this is funny but there are like 10 people with bleeding noses reading this and freaking out 
Eww, I just realized that undoubtedly some people must sneeze while their noses are bleeding.  Now I'm terrified.  Thanks. 
/u/copious_hyperbole hasn't posted anything in an hour.  /u/copious_hypebole is kill  RIP 
Good in theory, but as a nurse most people in the hospital aren't really sneezing. My thinking is that a day care worker or elementary school teacher might notice it first. Or someone with a severe allergy to cats or something.  
What an insidious government plot that could be. Truly could be a cover up on a huge scale. Aliens at Roswell, the grassy knoll shooter, and now nobody sneezes anymore.  
This is starting to sound like a Doctor  Who plot.  
I sneezed this afternoon, so we're probably good.   For now... 
it's like Children of Men but for sneezing  it's **Children of Nose** 
I have allergies.. I would know within a few days and realize something was up...  Edit -added "and"  Edit 2 - I didn't realize many other people sneeze all the time... I thought I was bad..  thanks for the comments 
Don't panic, I sneezed earlier today.  I somehow managed to get some bacon and cheese omelette up my nose and ended up walking around the house looking up at the ceiling with a weird look on my face. When I finally sneezed it all shot out, or evaporated in my nose somewhere. Either way, I sneezed, so we are still sneezing. 
My stepson sneezes like a complete knob and insists on making sure the whole house knows about it. Can confirm last sneeze at least within the past 5 hours. 
That'd be good. At the end all of the soldiers put their weapons down as a sneezing man comes staggering out of the building. They weep. 
Every post is assuming people on reddit will be the first to notice. 
I wish! At least once a year I have a horribly painful hiccuping episode 
You are the third person to mention this.   Can you illuminate?   Bad pun was intended, to my dying shame. 
it'd take like a week max.  sick patients that sneeze no longer sneeze.  allergy sufferers no longer sneeze.  social media connects us all easily.  it would get noticed, go viral, and it wouldn't be hard to test the results.  i think you're looking at 3-5 days for the general global community to be aware. 
I just noticed that no one has acknowledged your amazing IT Crowd reference yet and I would like to do so.  A+, pal. 
Kleenex suddenly starts being sold exclusively in Adult stores, and advertising on porn sites. Kimberly-Clark buys Vivid Entertainment. 
Any sanitary person who doesn't want mucus on his clothes? 
Yeah, it would definitely be all the people with allergies first 
With 7 billion people in the world, I'm sure there is someone, somewhere, who is doing research specifically on sneezing. Maybe they pay test subjects to sniff pepper and then measure the force of their sneeze, I dunno. Anyway, that sneezologist would notice right away and put the word out. 
Well, *someone* is bound to overreact though.   *This lack of sneezing is mentioned indirectly in Revaluations! The end is upon us!* 
Yeah no way those non-first world countries would ever notice the lack on sneezing! 
I haven't smoked in weeks and I feel like I've got a contact high from that question 
I think you're lying because I can't remember the last time I sneezed. OP is clearly a rogue government scientist that has decided to tell everyone the top secret research that governments perform to maintain control of the world. 
I can't wait to see the cinematography for that.  A 10 minute long shot of Clive Owen walking with someone sneezing and everyone staring.  
...or you are part of the conspiracy!  Thanks, Obama... 
How do you know that wasn't the last sneeze ever? You could have been the last person to sneeze. 
This is so handy. You never have to suffer with the half sneeze that leaves you feeling like you need to sneeze but cant. 
Playing safe with averages and a range, I see. /u/Dudwithacake, I'm going all in with 5'3. 
I just keep thinking about what it'd be like trying to explain sneezing to my kids. "Daddy tell us again what it was like, in the before-time."  "Well, kids, your nose would feel kind of funny for a second, then there'd be like, a nose-explosion that you can't control, and you sometimes involuntarily made a sound like, 'achoo,' and then you just went on with your day."  "And what caused it?"  "Cats, for some people. Pollen. Too much pepper. Sexual arousal, for one guy I knew in high school." 
Your nose, of all noses, shouldn't be bleeding! *Oh God it's happening.....* 
Mine was bleeding a bit earlier, but I think that was because I accidentally inhaled some powdered benzoic acid in the lab earlier. Hasn't bled since, so it hopefully killed any eggs that were in there.  
"Huh, that's funny, I'm *not* miserable right now. Something's not right..." 
And his time to shine would come. He would be world famous, and die surrounded by loved ones and admirers. 
Reddit upvotes and gives gold to the dumbest shit. You actually answered Op's question perfectly and get nothing. If I cared about karma I'd buy you gold for this.  
TIL the Bible has a section about adjusting the value on things  
Can confirm. I'm high right now and I think  this is some profound shit, man!  
How do you know when someone smokes weed?  They'll tell you. 
I sneezed earlier today as well.. Has anyone sneezed since then?  
Then the wife looks up at him and says "Bruce Willis was Rosebud the dead sled the whole time" 
This actually made me look like a fool many times before I knew about it.  I, too, thought it affected everyone, and more than once when someone said something like "argh I really need to sneeze but can't" I would respond "just look at the sun!"  People looked at me like I was fucking crazy, but never said anything.  It wasn't until a few years ago that I learned about photic sneeze reflex, and suddenly felt like an idiot for all the times the above situation happened. 
Then a post asking that would result in answers exactly like in this one.  "Shit... I don't know... when was the last time I sneezed?" 
I have it. I kind of like it though. Sneezing feels good. I induce sneezing a lot.  
Its worse than we thought, it's spreading faster than a 
No, you're still miserable but now it's even worse because you *can't sneeze*. You don't *lack* the symptoms or need. 
Yeah, but he would probably lose his funding when there was no one to sneeze for his research. 
What is it with the fucking number 7 and the bible.  Every other goddamn story has the numeral 7 or 40 in it.  What the fuck. 
Is the past merely the future making sense of itself?  ***MY GOD*** 
I sneezed less than an hour ago. We need to set up a headquarters to monitor and lapse in sneeze reports. [6] 
have not sneezed sense op posted, so i think we can safely say humans can no longer sneeze, confirmed here first 
The sled in the middle of the room was the jigsaw killer the whole time too. 
Apparently it's something they test for in fighter pilots. Can't be colorblind. Can't sneeze when looking into the sun. 
we need to start /r/nosneeze as a place to post that you just sneezed. that way, if you're ever unsure, you can check the subreddit to make sure that the world is still sneezing. 
I have something very similar but it happens when I'm thinking about making a sexual advance. It's very specific, I can imagine sexy stuff and nothing happens but if I'm lying in bed and I get the idea to make a move on my wife some wire crosses and I sneeze and I hate it.  
Oh God it'd just be the eternal need to sneeze, but you never could 
They are both symbolic numbers. 7 is a sign of completion or fulfillment, and 40 is a sign of renewal or cleansing. There are a lot of symbolic numbers in the bible. 7, 12, 40, 3, 6, 50, 10 and others. 
And the Lord spake, saying, "Thou shalt sneeze seven times, no more, no less. Seven shall be the number thou shalt sneeze, and the number of the sneezing shall be seven. Eight shalt thou not sneeze, neither sneeze thou six, excepting that thou then proceed to seven. Ten is right out. Once the number seven, being the seventh number, be reached, then wipest thou thy face of thy booger. 
40 generally doesn't mean the actual number 40, in context it kinda means "until it's done"/"a large number". 
I just sneezed. And will probably sneeze again within ten minutes. Yay, allergies! 
Did i read the word confirmed? HL3 (fingers crossed) 
the jigsaw killer was only pretending to be the handicaped killer from scary movie, he was in fact Keiser Soze.  
Wait do you have a source for this? I'm a little concerned my superpower is going to affect my future career now O.o 
Then naturally /r/nosneezecirclejerk as comedic relief from our sneeze-less judgement day.  
You know you're in a good /r/AskReddit thread when an entire new sub spins off of it.  
As you may have noticed, I am definitely on board with this humanitarian initiative, but also deeply concerned for the fate of our sneezes. I believe we are almost 10 minutes out from our last. 
never thought I'd see those particular 3 words in 1 sentence. 
If Man is five, and the Devil is six, then God is seven.  
What is this from? It sounds really familiar minus the sneezing part. 
Yep, Confirmed HL3, picture Lord Gabe sitting at his desk writing dialog for the game windows open listing to Born Free, all of a sudden he has a sneeze attack and sneezes all of his work on HL3 out the window. Now before you have a stroke, know this cant happen now because we are free of sneezing.   
And of course, the inevitable /r/nosneezecirclebroke. 
And when the sneeze cancels it still goes on cooldown, so you need to wait to cast it again.  Just infuriating. 
Sneezes should be more courteous and call at least 24 hours in advance. 
So far just itchiness and stuffiness, no actual sneezing. I also made the mistake of putting on mascara this morning so my eyes are killing me. 
My then-not-boyfriend and I were waiting at the train station on my train home; he would leave with the bus after it arrived. My train came and I thought 'fuck it' and kissed my then-not-boyfriend on the mouth. Immediately after, I jumped on the train, on which the doors then closed. I didn't see his reaction nor felt it so I sat pretty anxious on the train, thinking I ruined it all. About 5 minutes later, I got a text saying:  'That was meant as a friends kiss, right?'  Lol, bless his heart.  
Put out my hand for him to hold and he high fived me.  
Last summer I was doing my best to seduce who is my current boyfriend. We were going swimming at a friend's house, and while they were changing into their bathing suits in the house, me and him make our way to the pool.    I take advantage of this moment to strip in front of him, as sensual as possible. (Bathing suit was underneath my clothes.)  He runs past me, full sprint, and cannonballs into the pool.  
"You are really cute and I like you" met with complete silence.... Later on that dude told me that he does not accept compliments well. We have already planned the next few dates. 
I knew this girl for a year and had kinda had feelings for her the whole time. We got close for a few weeks and one time I'm watching some films at hers. It gets late and I start to head out, she says "I don't want you to go".   Thinking she was just feeling lonely or whatever I follow her upstairs and we get in bed... and do nothing. Lights go out, we start going to sleep. I'm sitting there the whole time thinking "damn, I wish I had the balls to make a move" but don't.  Then she sits up, takes her top off in a way I couldn't possibly miss, and lies down again. Still, I don't get that SHE'S trying to make moves on ME.  10 minutes later she finally gives up and just kisses me. She mocked me about this for months after. 
I love to share this one: A long time before my husband and I started dating we were partying in my apartment. He said he was going to crash on the couch. I told him "you can come sleep in my bed". I shit you not he said "well where would you sleep? I can't kick you out of your bed."  
Not exactly an answer to the Q but related.  I was dating a guy who told me upfront that he was terrible at picking up the signs that someone liked him, was flirting, etc. So on our third (?) date, we planned that he would stay the night at my place. I thought that was pretty obvious, but just to make sure, I put a bunch of condoms on a platter on the bed, with notes all around it, pointing to the platter that said "This is a sign!" He thought it was hilarious. We had sex. It was awesome.  
Hint: "Want to have sex in the shower later?"  Response: "sure!"  ~*later, in the shower, waiting forever, door left cracked open... I give up.*~  Question: "Why didn't you come into the shower??"  Response: "Oh! I didn't know you wanted me to!"  ~*crickets*~  This has happened more than once.  
This girl was sitting with our group of boys and saying "if I was to get with one of you, it would be you [my name]" And I was just like "Ah thanks very much, very kind of you to say that" 
Back in college, my now s/o of 4 years would walk me home from class at night. Mustered up the courage to ask him to "come upstairs and have some wine with me". Hard no. Ok, he's not into it.   Two months later, he invites me and my friends to a party. He's blackout drunk when we show up, and tells my friend that he's in love with me and got wasted cuz he was nervous about seeing me. She convinces him to tell me (knowing I was also into him).   Curveball: Told me that he was really into me, but didn't want to mess up my relationship. Uhrm.. what relationship? Ya know, that guy from our class that you always talk to and giggle with. Uh.. Matt? As in Matt with the boyfriend, Matt? ........Oh, well that strangely explains a lot.  
Hitting on my now boyfriend of three years. I was complimenting him on how handsome he was and how he had beautiful eyes. I wanted a closer view of them so he texted me this creepy ass shot of his eyeball with his eye as widely opened as possible. He legitimately thought that's what I wanted. After our first date, I immediately started talking about potential future dates and how much fun I had with him. I stayed out so late that I missed my friends party. However, because  I didn't hug him properly and asked to split the cost of the meal, he thought I wasn't actually interested.  
All these comments are making me not want to try any hints at all....for now on I'm just going to be straight forward 
I was living with my then-boyfriend a few years ago. Feeling a little flirtatious, I suggested we could take a shower together, you know, to save water, wink wink.   His response? "Why? We don't pay for water."  Shut. Down.  
Asked a guy for his number after a Meetup. Went on a date with him that he didn't realize was a date until his friend that we ran into texted him to apologize for crashing it. Currently sitting on the couch next to him, 3 years later, looking at dogs that are available for adoption. He eventually caught on. 
I started talking to a guy who was behind on Game Of Thrones. So I offered to give him my HBO password so we could watch it at his place, thinking it would be a good excuse to hang out. He ends up marathoning the show without me. We're dating now, but he sure as hell not watch season 7 without me  
I was at a party drinking with a guy I had a bit of a crush on. We were joking around and I told him to touch my boob, because he jokingly accused me of padding my bra (since they're quite large).  He DID touch them for a second, but then he just kept going on with the conversation. I figured he wasn't interested and I got over it.  I think he realized his mistake cause he always made it a point to like everything I post on facebook. 
When i was 18 and foolish a girl once asked me if i was into 'role-playing games'   I said of course! And promptly started showing her my WOW account... she left pretty soon after. 
In high school I sat next to a very quiet guy that I liked and whenever I was cold I made my arm touch his. He would never move but never talked to me other than to ask about class. Ten years later I messaged him on Facebook asking about the reunion and jokingly asked him to be my date. He said sure why not. We've been married for year next month. He said he didn't remember me from high school. 
Him: "I dont want to pressure you, but it's pretty late and I think you should spend the night. My couch is super comfortable and I can make it up for you if you'd like.'   Me: "Maybe I could sleep in your bed with you."  Him: "I promise the couch isn't bad"   Brutal. 
I asked him if he wanted to go to my dorm for Netflix and chill. We watched Parks and Rec for two hours and then he went home without touching me once. 
Not a lady, but I had this girl visit me and sleep with me in the same bed on four different occasions...from half across the country.      I thought we were just friends.      Ten years later I was taking a shit and it dawned on me that she didn't travel across the country just to sleep ffs.      I feel bad for the girl now, because I was really into her too. 
One of my employees, whenever she is drunk, (brewery, not just kicking it with drunk employees) will constantly say how cute she thinks I am and how adorable my nerdiness is. Will ask me to go to bars after we close down, or to come over to hers and drink.  I pretend every time I don't notice. She's pretty and all, but I like my job.  I wonder if she thinks I am that dense.  
We were married two full years before I finally understood that if she took a bath at night I was going to get some.  Watched a lot of baseball while she lay sparkling clean in bed alone. 
I had a very attractive young lady lay down on my bedroom floor, pull her pants down and showed me her newly installed clit ring.  I told her it was nice and shuffled out of the room like the autist I am.   Pretty sure it was a hint. I'll never know. 
When I was 14 or 15 the neighbor girl asked if I had any porn (I did, duh, and on VHS!) and if I wanted to come over and watch it. Absolutely took her up on that offer. And after an hour or so went home with my tape and jacked off.   In retrospect she wanted it and I missed the hint.  
I stripped completely naked, played sexy music and started rubbing his shoulders.   He didn't even turn around and just asked if I wanted to order pizza for dinner... 
Not a chick, but my fiancee  was laying on our bed in her thing and a t-shirt (on her belly) with our "pink thing" (vibrator)  next to my pillow. I came out of the shower and sat next to her an grabbed her ass and kissed her neck...she didn't react and I noticed she was on her Facebook..the digital cock block... So I tried again, nothing. So I sat back and waited like 10 mins and she goes "wow way to miss the fucking hint"   WHAT THE FUCK 
My current boyfriend and I started out in this weird friends that flirt stage.  I was trying to find a way to get him to make a move.  One very hot evening (middle of august) we were sitting in his backyard with a few of our friends drinking beer.  I sat on the SAME lawn chair as him, kind of wiggled in, and said "I'm cold".    He left me alone in the chair and proceeded to build a giant fire.  It took like an hour.  When he was finished making the fire he sat back down in a DIFFERENT lawn chair.   
One day shortly before my husband returned home from work I stripped down and put on one of his button up shirts, jumped in to bed, sat all sexy like and waited for him to get home. He gets home and walks in to the bedroom. Boom! Naked wife with her boobs hanging out of your shirt, I thought I was being obvious.  Nope. He lays in bed next to me, talks about his day and looks to be getting ready for a nap. I thought, "Oh, maybe he's super tired. I'll catch him after his nap." I jump out of bed, but some pants and a shirt on and go down the hallway to fold laundry.  Not but a couple minutes later my husband comes running down the hallway before coming to screeching halt in front of me, he's doing his best to be smooth with a hint of awkward. He didn't realize I was initiating sexy time at all. He pulled out all his best moves and dragged me back in to the bedroom.    TL;DR - Sat in front of my husband mostly naked, he didn't realize I was initiating sexy time. 
My fiance and I were chatting on FB Messenger near the start of our relationship and it went something like this:  Him: I haven't had sex in 2 years  Me: That's quite a streak, I'd hate to mess it up ;)  Him: Yeah it's been awhile  ....  Wait, what    I then lured him into a hotel, fucked his brains out, and now we're getting married. 
As a guy, I completely see your hints all the time but I'm afraid that I'm wrong and going to get rejected/made a fool out of myself so I don't do anything. 
I'm a guy and I've told this story before but I must again to make clear how oblivious we are:  Met this girl through my (female) best friend. Her and I became friends due to our mutual love of movies. She's come by most evenings and we'd chill, smoke a jernt and watch foreign films, work through the Criterion collection or catch some underground cult classics...she'd often stay well into the night and sleep over. Often in my room with me.  This went on for a long while and then one day she just disappeared, cut off FB and everything -- gone. I knew I did nothing so I figured "life change" and went on....  Flash forward to years later/last year-ish...I'm on the phone with my best friend and make some joke about 'Netflix and Chill' to her, she says "THATS WHAT ******* SPENT MONTHS TRYING TO DO WITH YOU"...I swear I didn't know until that moment and worst part is, I was head over heels for that girl. 
Her: How much do you wank during a week? Me: Well, too much lol Her friend: Haha, we could have sex then, we're also lonely at night Me: Yeah...  Then I just continued on with the conversation because I thought they were joking...  2 sexy girls where asking mefor a threesome... And I didn't get it... 
When it's hammered into your brain your whole life that it's creepy and predatory  to get forward with a girl because you think she's into you, you learn to ignore any signal that isn't bright flashing neon. The risk/reward ratio for responding to hints is not at all in our favor. Guys like to say they're just dense, but this is deeply-ingrained cultural training. Sorry ladies, until the culture changes we're going to remain oblivious. 
As a guy, here's a hint to the ladies: if it's a hint, it's too subtle. 
He probably thought you were going for his cheek and missed.  
God... in middle school me and my best friend watched Scrubs all the time. We'd do a Todd high five in the hallways whenever we'd see each other, and one time the girl I had a crush on put up her hand like she wanted a five, so I smacked her hand as hard as I could and snapped... turns out she was waving to her friend behind me. I had forgotten until your comment..  
To be fair he didn't want to be standing there slack jawed staring at you.  Guys don't want to be thought "creepy"..... especially if he was attracted to you.  So his thought process went something like this:  "Wow this girl is super cute.  I hope I don't screw anything up. Just play it cool.  Don't say or do anything stupid. Wait what is she doing? Ohh my god she is taking off her clothes and no one else is here! Yes ! YeS! OMG Y......... Ohh Shit stop staring... stOP STARING! What do I do? What do I do? Crap! Whadoido? Run!  Run really fast and jump!"  Cannonball!... crisis averted.    "Damnit! You weren't supposed to do anything stupid!" 
The problem here is that you were hedging against rejection by turning it into a hypothetical, which also made it unclear.  
Follow up, how do you feel about Hugo Weaving currently? 
The only hint that is actually foolproof. Well done. 
To be honest, I'd think you were kidding unless I was your SO. It would be too awkward to walk in on you showering and be wrong.  
I think some cases is about low selfsteem right? I used to talk with a girl online every day. And one day she told me      "I love you".      And I thought "no way someone can love ME", so I asked her      "Is it a joke?"      "Yes"      And then I thought "wait what if she is serious"      "are you sure?"      "yes, it was a joke"      Now I think maybe she felt I rejected her so she just make a save. 
I'm ashamed to admit I did something very similar to the eye thing 
if only you'd said "blow your penis" that might have worked 
Probably too focused on not getting an erection to notice hints. 
He was in need of oxygen at that time, since before we can speak, we have to be able to breathe.  I'm gonna venture here (thousands of miles away and never having met either of you before) that you took more than his breath away with what you said.  :)  Source:  Have lived it.  :/ 
Honestly, I would probably do this just because I hate my landlord 
I thought the dogs were in your living room for a minute and was confused. See what happens! 
I know it was probably more smooth, but the thought of you saying "I could do better than that", pausing, and internally deciding "alright, let me talk about why the Alien would have easily gotten Ripley there" is too funny.  
Liking everything you post on social media is the guy version of dropping hints 
The arm thing is too subtle tbh. It could just be you being clumsy. Yesterday a girl I was sitting next to touched my arm three times in about a minute and the first two I thought might have been on accident, but the third time I said "what's up?" And she said that it was an accident. So yeah :/ 
I don't know what went down or how things ended but you should call this person. Like right now. You can't make up for being an idiot in the past but in 10 years you'll look back at this and think 'why did I never reach out to her after that stupid ex gf drama?'  Reread your last sentence and apply that to your current situation dummy.  
Sometimes Netflix and chill just means Netflix and chill... Doesn't it? ...Shit! 
I dunno man. I had a lady friend visit me in a different country while I was working abroad, share a bed with me for two weeks, and practically act like a wife with me. I told her I was into her and when I directly asked her if there was anything going on between us she said no.  
It's ok...I can literally invite my husband to get in the tub with me, and he doesn't get it. Sigh.. 
(Voice drifting down the stairs:)  *Dear, second and third bases are up here waiting for you!* 
Rub his penis. Touch the parts that are most involved in sex.   
Omg reading this makes me rethink all the times I was flat out rejected. Maybe the guys were just dense. 
Plot Twist: She was a ghost that haunted the Gym and therefore couldn't leave 
Just tryna get free attention from you.... drop her 
Fire is much more effective at keeping warmth than cuddles. That man's a keeper. 
The guy made a fire for you because you said "I'm cold". It took him like an hour.  Marry him. 
jesus that sounds like what i would do. my thought process would be, hmm she's cold oh i'll build her a fire to keep her warm. aw yea she looks comfy now, better not ruin it by crowding her in that tiny lawn chair, oooh look an empty lawn chair..... yea i did good, i'm so thoughtful! 
No man passes up a good excuse to light shit on fire. 
Man brain:  *"Female, cold. Fire, hot. Female couldn't possibly be attracted to me. Must build fire."* 
Oh god that's a hint I'd miss. I have an awful addiction to solving problems like that.  I'd build a fire too :( 
My wife and I have worked out a code phrase, for when one of us isn't picking up on the obvious signals. We say, "Howdy partner."  It's a quote from Shanghai Noon, and it works like a charm. 
Just saying I would do the same thing in his shoes. 
No offense but smoking weed and watching saw sounds like the least sexual/romantic thing I could ever think to do 
Upstairs and coffee was the old Netflix and chill. 
I wouldn't have got this one to be fair. In fact, I still wouldn't even think that's an obvious hint even after reading it 
also as a guy, its hard to tell to what extent that hint goes  from a simple "i think you're a cool person and we should be friends"  to a "you're pretty attractive and i wouldn't be opposed to having a relationship"  to "perform intercourse with me"  to "im being polite and keeping the party vibes up, but to be honest I am indifferent to you."  its hard man. i can barely read books  
I think this is the REAL story. Some hints are a little too subtle, but for the most part, men just don't wanna be considered creepy if they're wrong. 
You find her and you explain it, you dense mother fucker. I NEED CLOSURE. THIS ISN'T ABOUT YOU. 
Idk man I feel like this goes both ways right?  If you spend months with someone for the purpose of sleeping with them you might want to just say it after awhile haha. 
"Better not risk it, could be meant for someone else"  
"How about we go back to my place and do what they did in the movie"  "Oh I'll show you a move or two"  *leaves to rewatch the movie to know what you were referring to* 
I think the "I'm serious" is an important addition.  
I hear you. I've had bad landlords too. Unfortunately in this particular instance...our landlord was pretty great.  
That's pretty solid confidence. "Yeah I could do better than that and I don't even need to prove it." 
Dude. You opened my eyes. This happened to me all through middle school and I blew it off every time. I didn't know that was a hint, I thought they were just teasing me.  Which they also could've been doing 
Reminds me of a time I accidentally touched a girl's ass 2 or 3 times in the cafeteria line. I kept dropping something, and every time I picked it up, she'd back her ass into my head.  Before somebody suggests she did it intentionally, I received a death glare after the second time. 
Yep, that's my husband. I've tried being coy and he picks up on it like 30% of the time. I've gotten to the point where I just say "Wanna go fuck?" rather than being coy. Works like a charm. 
I killed an ant and she said "thanks, ttyl."  Fuck this fantasy world it's outrageously misleading  
A lot of guys are very dense or they think maybe you're hitting on them but then they think they are reading too much into it and you're gonna freak out, which is pretty dense, so yeah. 
A surprising number of these are young men unsure what constitutes consent, and young women unsure how to grant consent in a way that doesn't disturb the sexual tension. It's almost as if the sexes have trouble clearly communicating their needs and desires to each other because of some unspeakable chasm. 
Worked out?  She has him captured and tranquilized! 
Teach a man to cuddle and he'll fuck for one night. Teach a man to fire and he'll fuck for life.  
Yup yup yup, she's probably amazed at my fire building mad skillz.   Wait, she's not smiling. Why is she staring at me? Oh shit. Did I take too long to build a fire? Is the fire not big enough? Is it TOO big? That must be it. Oh nonononono. She thinks I'm a wood wasting blockhead.  I blew it. I'm never gonna get a girlfriend. Dude life sucks. I gotta go play counterstrike.  *storms out of the chair into the night...* 
*Build fire, demonstrate worth. Perhaps then female* will *be attracted to me.*  
It's when the woman is staring at the man thinking "kiss me", and the man is wondering "do I have something stuck between my teeth?" 
Mine and my boyfriend's code in public is, "Wanna watch Predator?" 
Coffee at 3am is not coffee, coffee at 3am means sex! 
"So where are you sleeping tonight?" totally sounds like she's making sure you have plans to sleep somewhere else. If a friend is drunk at your place and you want them gone before they crash there, you would ask, "So who's driving you back home?" 
There's no way to tell. Maybe she's just being polite? 
Dont worry. I can mostly read books, and I havent really figured it out either. 
We had sex twice, I guess he didn't understand all I wanted was more sex later on  
"So she's sucking my dick and I'm here thinking, 'Does she like me, or...'" 
I have literally dragged my husband by his penis to the bedroom. He's pulled my hair. It's been a fun 10 years. 
My first time I swear the entire time up until we were actually fucking, and I mean up until I was balls deep I doubted she wanted to actually have sex and thought it was just some joke and she would stop joking before I did. Welp, neither stopped joking for 3 years after that.  
I dunno... I've seen the movie Carrie. People be evil. 
I hate that. Or when you're deep in thought, staring into space and you realize that you are looking right at some girl and it's awkward 
It's not even denseness, just a failure to properly escalate. Dollars to donuts says they picked up on it but thought "There's no way, she's just being nice or goofy or whatever". 
This exactly. Girls are still under the impression that the guy is just supposed to "act" on his urges and make a move. I've always been worried that I will cross some line that I didn't see thinking I was getting "make a move" signals.   Girls, if you want to give signals do something physical like touching his hand or taking his arm. We will 100% get the signal if it's physical rather than verbal. 
Ok so I think I've understood the "kiss me eyes" finally. When I feel awkward that they are staring at me I should kiss them  
As a military man, most of my 0300 coffees don't mean sex.  They sure feel like it though. 
Look at you, Mr. Fancy Pants. I saw a book once. I've never even been close to figuring it out as well.  
"She's probably just being nice, probably feels bad for me or something. It doesn't mean anything." 
You're 100% sure he got the hint? Some of these comments are making me wonder if that was enough. 
People suck sometimes, but pad yourself on the back for doing the right thing - even though it backfired 
...guilty of this. When in doubt, I default to this. 
Yeah you really cant tell in this situation. Shes probably just canadain and beig polite.  
Sex happened so either he got the hint or just said "fuck it" and decided since the kids were outside and we were in the bedroom, why the hell not? Haha 
As goofy as that sound, reading all those comments, I'm starting to think we really need to find a universal code.  
When I was 8 or so my old nanny/baby sitter (choose which you prefer) was showing me a video of her time with her boyfriend in Paris. After it blacks out for a few seconds it then suddenly cuts to her lying on her hotel bed completely naked, legs spread, telling her boyfriend to 'come get it'. She jumped out of her seat tried to cover my eyes and told me to never tell anyone. I have now told potentially thousands of random strangers 
Growing up with my little brother and single Mom we never had a lot, but she made sure we always had a safe and decent place to live and there was always food on the table. She never really ate much, I remember dinners of baked chicken, beef stew, salmon (it was a lot cheaper a million years ago)... good food, nothing terribly extravagant, but always nutritious, yet she barely ever ate. When I was 10 I saw her eating pb&j on crackers in her room after dinner. That's when I realized there was never enough food for all 3 of us, she would cook what we had for my brother and I and she would eat the bare minimum, always out of sight, so that my brother and I wouldn't worry about the actual level of poverty we were at. I never asked for another material thing from her after that night. 
Was getting a vasectomy and the doctor told me not to look down.  I looked down.  ...I shouldn't have looked down. 
I was helping MIL cleaning out her closet. All was jokes and laughter until I pull out an unopened massive dildo. We were both paralyzed for a moment before she slowly took it out of my hands and mumbled something about the dildo not being what she tought it would be like and that she ordered it online. She then backed out of the room and threw it in a cupboard.  We then proceeded to clean the rest of the closet.  I desperately wanted to tell SO about this awkward event but decided to spare him.  
My boss forwarded me an email telling me to do something. I noticed the email chain had his bosses on it so I read through the chain. They had asked him to rate all my co-workers and I from best to worse earlier in the conversation.  
I used to do a little work after school at a local comic shop. One day after school I was bagging comics when the owners buddy came in. "Look at these!  Came out great!"  He had a stack of glossy amateur porn, featuring the shop owner, his buddy, and the owners wife fucking. He laid them out all over the counter and they started pawing through the stack excitedly. From what I could see it looked  like the three of them enjoyed one another's company equally and vigorously.   Then they noticed I was there. I got sent home early with a stack of free comics.  
I was driving from West Berlin to West Germany in the late 1980's.  My bf gives me wrong instructions so I have to take an exit off the Autobahn to turn back and get back to the correct exit.    On the small country road on which we found ourselves, we see a large truck with a missile on it, surrounded by Russian soldiers.    They were as surprised as we were, but just laughed and waved at us, as we got the hell out of there as quickly as possible. 
My teacher shoving a flask into his desk drawer when I came in unexpectedly. 
Late to this one, but I once walked into my dad's van while he was balls deep into a woman who was not my mom.  Dad had a drinking problem.  Mom took me and my brother to go looking for him because he was supposed to be buying Christmas presents.  Found his van at a bar.  Mom sent me to look inside the van to see if there were presents in there.    Looked back into the back and saw my dad's bare ass as he was plowing some chick.  He turned over his shoulder and looked right at me and said in the most evil voice, "Get out."  This was 20+ years ago now and I still get emotional thinking about it.  I still remember the entire thing so clearly. 
I was about 8 or 9 and my parents were going to be out of town so they had me and siblings stay with a family from our church. Once we got to the house (which was really nice BTW) they had one rule, you can play wherever you want but the basement is off limits. Me being the little bastard that I was snuck down there first chance I got and was supremely disappointed to only find rows and rows of plants growing under lights. 
More heard than seen, but...  I was golfing with my mother's fiance when he got a phone call. He had his cell volume turned up really high, and I overheard a woman who wasn't my mother say some things, including the phrase "fuck and suck," in a seductive manner. I convinced myself that it wasn't my business, or that I'd misunderstood, and dropped it.  A few years later, her now-husband was revealed to be a serial cheater, with active partners numbering in the dozens.  Yes, I still feel like shit.  Yes, they're divorced. 
Saw a Homer Simpson keychain in my mom's desk drawer. Didn't say anything.  Two weeks later its in my Christmas stocking and she goes "Wow, how did Santa know how much you like the Simpsons".  Thats how I figured out Santa must've been sleeping with my mom. 
Walking in on my cousins railing each other..... Now I understand why they were close at thanksgiving. 
When I was younger, my family went to look round a house we were considering buying. Went into the owner's daughter's room and there was a blow up sex doll on the floor, it was really funny but we didn't end up buying the house. 
Back in middle school we had this really strange gym teacher about 6'2 and ripped. Me and my friend were going to take a dump and thought that the locker room toilets would be clean since no one used them throughout the day. When we walked in to our left was one big shower room and there was our gym teacher showering while eating spaghetti out of a tupperware container. Thank god he was wearing swim trunks but he turned around and said you guys aren't supposed to be here so we left. 
When I was 14 and friend hosted a birthday party at his house with all the parents invited. Needed to use the restroom but the main one was occupied so my friend told me I can use the one in his moms bedroom. As I walked up to the door I could hear somebody in there so I decided to wait until whoever was in there was finished. A good 10 minutes later, my friends mom (who was hosting the party) and another good friends step-father walk out and see me standing there all confused. They asked what I was doing there and I just said I was waiting to use the bathroom. Surprisingly they played it cool and just said I can use it now and walked off. 
I saw a couple banging under a secluded water fall in the woods on a hiking trip with my parents when a was 12.  Majestic AF. 
My mom's attempted suicide.   I was about 4-5 when she tried to hang herself from some exposed pipes we had in the bathroom. My mom and dad were drunk-arguing all night when she went in to the bathroom and things got quiet. My dad rushed in to get her down and when he opened the door, that's the moment I decided to walk out of the bedroom to see what all the noise was all about, because they were different screams that weren't normal arguing sounds.  That image stuck around for a while...  EDIT 2: If you need to talk to someone, /u/mrlaughter has pointed me to /r/hardshipmates which seems like a fantastic community. There is also /r/MomForAMinute which also seems incredibly amazing.  EDIT 1: Thank you so much for your kind words and responses! I really thought this was going to go unread. I'm doing my best to work through all of your replies and getting back to all of you! First time getting attention, and I'm at work, but I will reply as quickly as I can. 
I saw an employees check stub that he dropped. He had been there for a month and was making what I made after my first year and was not a very good worker. I got a raise 
My parents' collection of sex toys - that was way more reality than my 10-year-old mind was prepared to handle  
Beavis and Butt-Head Do America.  My parents found out we went into that theater and they dragged us out REAL quick. 
About 9 years ago, there were a couple of notes scattered across the computer desk in my parents' study. I happened to read them because words are in front of my face, what am I gonna do?  They were notes my parents had written each other instead of just talking to each other.  Because my dad had slept with 14 hookers. 
Our cat was a little late coming home one evening (unusual for him).   I went looking for him, calling his name, not massively loudly as it was late at night in a built up area.   As I walked around a corner to a car park, there he was. He looked like he was just having a bit of a chat with a fox. They looked relaxed, facing each other, sitting and chilling out.   I called his name and he looked at me, seemed flustered, looked back at the fox then me almost as if he was saying 'he's not with me, I don't know him'.   I called him again and he chased the fox into the bushes before trotting over to me.   I'm sure I crossed an animal 'line'.  
One Christmas Eve I couldnt sleep at all so I went to the kitchen to get some water or something and out in the living room were my parents setting out presents and eating the cookies I had left out.  They said that Santa was running late and was in such a big hurry that he just dropped off the presents and asked them to put them out for him. 
My 6 year old cousin asked me if I wanted some chewing gum. I said sure, if she has some. She then goes to her mother's purse and takes out two packages of condoms and asks me: What do you want, strawberries or banana?   Next thing I know, I'm shoving Durex packages in her mother's purse saying "We should firstly ask your mom before going through her things". So the kid doesn't stop here, she takes the purse, goes in the kitchen where all the family was reunited and asked her mother: Mom, can I have some gum?" Her mom says she doesn't have any. The freakin' girl takes the condoms out of the purse and says: Sure you do, I want the strawberries ones please.   Imagine her mother's embarrassment... 
Similar story to the f-117 at the top.   I was a contractor in Afghanistan working at Jalalabad air field (FOB Fenty). I woke up to take a piss and gave a cigarette. On the other side of the runway I saw a few helicopters take off but didn't hear anything. I thought it was strange as the base was dead silent but didn't think too much about it.   It was only later when I read the news that it was the SEAL team raid to kill bin Laden.   Because of my pea sized bladder I was probably the first non military or government person to see those stealth helicopters.  
A long time friend of mines dad was showing me pics of a car he was restoring. He accidentally pulled up nude pics of my friends mom instead. He looked awkward for a minute. He never said anything and then just started looking at car pics like it never happened.    
An obese, greasy feller, sitting fully naked on a toilet, a mix of pain and confusion and surprise on his face as I walked into his stall at a Sizzlers restaurant.  Stayed with me for a while, not gonna lie. 
My dad's bank account balance when I was ~12, stopped asking for things after that 
When I was little, my father set a password on a computer I was using for playing games. I wanted him to type the password (while I was away), but set a camera to record it. Hid it behind a pile of books.  The trick was, the camera back in the days was only able to record for 30 seconds, so I had to call my father and run out of the room, so he could type it as quickly as possible. It stopped filming just as he hit Enter. 
My dads texts to a woman when I was 12.  He handed me his phone to use if I got in trouble and he changed the sim but forgot to delete the phone's storage so I saw all the texts.   I would always see him closing Facebook chats and he used to sit in my treehouse on the phone for hours every evening.   He told me he went on holiday to sort out a property he had abroad. He went with this woman.  They broke up and he forced me to tell him my Facebook password so he can 'ensure my privacy from strangers'. He blocked the woman on Facebook on my computer.  My mother had a brain aneurysm/stroke the year before. They were still married and I didn't know what was going on. It made me feel sick..  He knew this woman from school, and I hope he never cheated on my mother with her before her accident. 
Ben Affleck's social security number.  Years ago I was working for a company that I could access different departments' server files in.  I was bored one day and was poking through those files to see what else the company had going on.  I found a contract for a production deal with Ben Affleck, and his SSN was included (for payroll purposes).  I closed the file because I knew I should not have been looking at that, even if it was accessible.   No, I didn't retain it or remember it.  No, I would not do anything with it if I did.  I don't care about his personal life. 
As a middle schooler, I picked up a book at the library, flipped through the pages and found an application for a replacement birth certificate for some old man. It had every detail about his personal identification on it, so naturally I took it home thinking, "I'll just hold onto this incase I ever need to assume a fake identity by pretending to be an 80 year old man and flee the country."   My mom found it and had to explain to me that no we don't steal people's identities. 
When I was about 5, my mom took me to the bank because she needed something out of the safety deposit box. It was right when they were opening up. They asked us to turn around while they unlocked the vault, but I peeked. According to family lore, I went around the rest of the day chanting the numbers of the combination.  
My grandmother dying.   I was 7 and the phone rang, so I answered it. I walked into the back bedroom where my mother, aunt, and grandfather were standing around my grandmother's bed.   When I walked in the room, I noticed her move her head like she was looking at something on the ceiling. Then I heard someone say, "this is it..."   I've heard my mother tell the story of the moment she died and it's exactly what I witnessed. I've never told anyone. I'm 25 now.  
It's more something that this person wasn't supposed to hear than see but back in the 80's, my AP US History teacher won an award and got to have lunch with Senator Ted Kennedy and hung out with him in his office. As he was leaving, he saw an aide walk up to Ted Kennedy and whispered something into Kennedy's ear. Then Ted Kennedy yelled "HOW THE FUCK DO YOU LOSE A NUCLEAR WARHEAD!" as my history teacher was just casually walking away.  
My dad's penis. He kept it covered, but I had the weird habit as a kid of coming downstairs at midnight and going for an hour long walk. When I came home, he was usually at the computer masturbating in a bathrobe.  
Luckily I didn't actually see it, but when I was about 10 years old I was awaken from sleep in our caravan by the sound my dad having sex with my aunt (both where drunk) in the other end of the caravan while my mom was passed out drunk outside.   Ah, fun vacation memories. 
This isn't a particularly scandalous story, but I think it's amusing. My dad is a carpenter, and I used to come with him on installations to help out. One time we were putting in a cabinet for this nice Jewish couple, inside their study. I was walking by the computer on the desk, and I couldn't help noticing the open web page on it: OyWhatADeal.com  
I'm sure everyone can add the nudity of a friend to the list, so I'll skip that.    SPOILER ALERT: I learned at 6 that Santa was not really bringing me presents when I had my door cracked open on Christmas Eve and saw my dad and my cat wrestling with a present that my dad was trying in vain to get out of my cat's clutches. The scratches down his arm the next morning confirmed that it wasn't a dream. Sassy never took shit from anyone, though.  
I was camping in a huge old palapa in Mexico, near the east side of the sea of Cortez. I think it was near a town called Bahia Kino. On one side was a beach and on the other was an old rough airway. The locals had told me it was dangerous out there but I was young and dumb.  I was laying in my sleeping bag when I saw a boat flashing a light at the shore. A guy I hadn't been aware of standing fifty feet to my right started flashing a light back at the boat.   A truck drove onto the end of the runway an several guys ran down and met the boat and ran back and forth between the boat and runway. Five minutes later a small plane landed and they loaded and turned it around almost instantly.   The boat headed back to sea, plane flew away and the truck raced off toward town.  I lay awake the rest of the night thinking about how close to dying I had come. 
Opposite side: I got married towards the end of law school, and after graduating stayed with my parents for a few months while I prepped for the bar exam. My wife and I were fooling around, when my then-18-year-old brother opened the door and walked in to a perfect shot of us both spread eagle, touching each other's bits.   That was the last time that door went unlocked.  
Oh I can share something that's has some value finally.  So 16 year old me was swimming in the hotel pool when some girls about my age started swimming and every time she pushed off the top of her bikini would slip down revealing her nipples. Best holiday of my life and I must have stayed in that pool for at least two hours.... She wore a different bikini the next day :(   I was wearing googles btw that's how I could see under water 
The strange man eating a urinal cake in a public bathroom. He just stared back at me and we made really awkward eye contact as he shoved the remainder into his mouth. 
When I was 9 my Mom wanted me to do some more advanced reading, so she went to the story and bought me an R.L. Stine "adult fiction" novel (Goosebumps were in their prime then).   I started reading the book, and about page 5, a woman starts giving a bj. I learned a lot that day. I then went into my parents room and trolled my mom by reading the passage to her. 
Not see but say. I was in a long 6+ hour car ride with the parents and I decided to randomly blurt out "Dad what ever happened to the girl you got pregnant?" I have no idea what prompted me to say that. Mom turned to dad and yelled "YOU TOLD HIM ABOUT THAT?" Turns out my dad got a girl pregnant at 15 and had to get an abortion before being in high school. It was a very interesting car ride thereafter.  
My friend masturbating butt naked in the middle of his room looking at his computer. He always locks his door when he leaves. And turning the handle to his bedroom is usually a good way to check if he's home when I end up at his house. The door opened and so for the briefest moment my mind looked into his room and he was, as usual, in front of his pc. However, he was shirtless, and I automatically looked down to see if he had shorts on as a reflex and at the same time, he prioritises closing his browser window over covering his dick. So while I do regret seeing that image that'll never leave my mind, I more regret not instinctively looking at his browser because we're all pretty sure he's into Hentai. 
I was interning at a company while in college. It was not a local internship so the company found us furnished apartments. Most of the interns were in the same apartment complex and as one would expect all the young folks hung out together.   I smoked at the time and our patio opened into this courtyard type area. I was sitting on a plastic patio chair smoking a Marlboro Light and I look across to see this window that the blind was like 3/4ths open. I look over and see this hot bodied naked female walking around in front of the window looking like she was talking on the phone.   I must have been staring as another male intern walked up to me and I didn't even notice. He asked me what I was doing and he looked where I was looking. He proceeded to pull up another lawn chair next to mine and then asked for a cigarette.   Don't think we were supposed to see that woman naked. Looking back on it and considering how long she paced in front of that window, I wonder if it was on purpose.  
After my little girl's mum and I split up and I had her most of the time, being an apprentice with stupid amounts of bills I'd only normally cook dinner for my little girl (then 2) and I'd eat what she didn't. One night we had chicken bits I think? And I had a few and after I'd finish mine I looked at her eating hers and smiled at her, and she put some of hers onto my plate. I said " no you eat them" and she insisted. "You sure little bug?" (what I call her) and she said " yes! You are my daddy!!"  I almost cried. Makes my heart melt 
My MIL passed away suddenly a few years back and I ended up being the one to go through her things for donations because my husband and SIL were too emotional. I found 2 whole drawers of sex toys and homemade porn that went straight into a trash bag and into the dumpster. Never told my husband.    
You stole from the Mob and lived to speak about it.   Do an AMA! 
So I'm assuming as an 8 or 9 year old, you didn't know it was weed.. so when did you figure it out exactly?  *15 years later, in bed sleeping...*  You: . . .  You: . . .  You: . . *WAKES UP* IT WAS POT 
I expected more of these finds here. Were they orchids? ;) 
she wanted you to see. You missed out.  If you took that opportunity you would now be living with her on an island in Greece with 2 sons, one daughter and 2 grandchildren. Your grandchild Arthur would like playing football with the local kids and Jasmine would be the kind of girl that occasionally grabs a book but most of the time she would take a boat and paddle out into the sea and come back a few hours later with a sunburn.   fucked up real bad. 
Well, on the plus side we know how dad deals with his sexless marriage. 
She could have been saying "it would fucking suck if I framed you as a serial cheater" 
Please tell me that they are on different sides of the family 
You and your friend were going to take a dump together. Damn. Friendship goals. 
You know, my first thought is they were smoking pot or doing lines or something, or even simply sneaking cigarettes. Seems way more plausible she would risk doing drugs/smoking with a friend -which presumably all the adults there would be cool with and merely hiding it from the kiddos- than two adults fucking with their spouses and children all downstairs *and* you not overhearing a single moan or grunt.  Not calling you a liar or anything, just thinking from our adult perspective. There's more grown ups do in secret than bone. 
I saw my dads successful hanging at three years old. That shit screws you up for life 
He wanted you to find it, so you could get a raise. What a bro! 
My parents never allowed me to watch Ed Edd and Eddy. They said bad words like "stupid". 
This is bizarre.  I can't imagine that pills could be shipped in anything less than a tamper-proof container.  I always figured the procedure would be similar to how my company moves cash around- in thick plastic bags that are numbered with matching seals. 
Something similar happened twice to me.  I'm not in HR and I grabbed a binder off the shelf that appeared to be empty that I was going to use for prepping and RFP.  Printed excel spreadsheet of every employees salary.  5 years later, my boss sends me a budget spreadsheet for the entire team including my peers.  I'm making my own adjustments for my team and realized there are hidden columns.  Unhide.  And that's when I asked for a raise...   
Man...I remember emptying my mom's purse out on her bed one time when I was a kid, and some condoms fell out. I'm being inquisitive, asking her what they are, I probably opened one? idk. Anyways, she claims they're balloons. And blows one up and ties it off. And that's how I got a balloon one summer day. 
This makes me wonder if your cousin was just habitually chewing on condoms 
That's when you show him some nudes of your girlfriend so it won't be awkward 
This exact thing happened to me with my Uncle! He was showing me photos of an old Triumph he was restoring, and one swipe to many and I was looking at a picture my aunt must have sent him of her p*ssy. It's a real shame because she was my favourite aunt 
Dude, same here. I was too young to know just how low that number was but I knew it wasn't much. Thinking back, I have no idea how they fed and clothed three kids with that. Oh wait, I do. It's called credit card debt.  
I found one of those, too. It made me feel very alone. 
Usually a dead drop is done so that you are never at the same place at the same time.  I know for a fact the the CIA likes to hide thing in airport bathroom toilet stalls. 
This reminded me of the time I pulled off some mission impossible level shit (at least to teenage me) with my dad.  I put the slightest amount of some face cream I found in the bathroom -- not oily, but left the faintest residue -- on the TV remote buttons, and got him to put in his pin # to unlock his blocked channels on the cable box for me.  I could see his fingerprints on the buttons and later while unsupervised, used that to figure out his code. 
I realize if I had kids how screwed they would be with stuff like this.  "Hey dad can you log in?"  "Oh did you forget your login password? Here let me just reset it in AD for you." 
To be fair IF you were ever to use it, the man would likely be dead by then. You wouldn't be ruining anyone's life by using it. 
Did they at least tell you at some point?  Didn't they wonder why you froze them both out? 
A girl just took off her shirt in front of me at bible camp once before she realized I was there.  
We need a follow up. Does your mother know it happened? 
I wonder how many UFO sightings it's responsible for? 
Who has sex in their parents house with an unlocked door?!?! That's protocol number 1 for sex in the folks house rookie!!!!!! 
My SO's brother once walked in on his 75+ year old grandparents having sex. I guess he wasn't expected to arrive until an hour or so later. The worst part was instead of being embarrassed, the grandpa got out of bed and went in for a hug. And shrugged "What? It's natural. You should be happy we can still do it." I'm pretty sure he still has PTSD dreams about it to this day.  
Oh god I can't believe you sent that to your personal email....  
wow, what a selfish, greedy, philandering piece of shit.  Even cheating on your spouse with one other person is already expensive and time consuming. 
dicks are dicks, but the porn u end up at towards the end of a session... thats private! 
as someone who for several years could only afford to heat my house when my daughter stayed over, I know how awful it can be. Hope things are better for you, I'm lucky enough to be alright financially now 
Walked back to the car with a blank look on my face.  I might have been in shock.  My mom asked if there were presents in the car and I shook my head no.  She asked me what was wrong and I shook my head again.  She got out and walked to the van.    She came back and asked me if my dad and the lady were just sitting in the van when I walked in and I shook my head yes (I had no idea what I should have done in this situation).  I guess they had dressed and were just sitting there at this point.  She kept asking what I saw and I just couldn't say anything.  Then we drove home and never spoke about it again. 
The peasant! *At the diner...*  He didn't pay his check. 
My best friend in my early twenties married his cousin. 
Damn, I'm very sorry that you had to witness that.  I morbidly think of how different/better/worse life would have been had she succeeded. My own mentality aside, if it weren't for her, I would have never come to America, but because of her she has single-handedly ruined my (half)brother's childhood, and in a way I basically had to raise a kid at 12 years old while keeping her bat-shit crazy ass away from him as much as I could.   Families are fucking weird man haha. 
It's like when Daryl gets Michael to ask for a raise cuz they make almost the same amount  
When I was a PA I used to get sent spreadsheets from everywhere from my Manager which I then had to send out to the wider team. I always checked for hidden columns but also learned about hidden tabs.   One time I almost sent out a spreadsheet to the wider team which had performance feedback per person and their ratings from their Manager and their peers. All this information was in a hidden tab. That could have been so damn messy. Silly HR. 
Haha. That reminds me of my brother who almost did the same. He found a pack of condoms in my dad's old jacket(coincidentally he was looking for chewing gum too) and he started blowing or filling them with water. When my mom came home he started asking why would they hide balloons from him. 
"Hey, your daughter makes that same face! Lemme see if I have a pic..." 
Sounds like he became awesome at that moment.  Plenty of kids wouldn't have given a fuuuck and been mad about it, 
you're not the only one. i found one written by my sibling from when they were very young. still really messes me up. i hope things are alright with you and your family, solidarity and all that  
I think highly technical parents is what breeds hackers. "Oh you gave me an account with limited domain rights and a web filter? Let's see how we can get around that." 
Though I'm Australian I was born on Papua New Guinea. A little while ago I couldn't find my birth certificate anywhere so I rang the hospital in PNG where I was born and gave them my name and DOB and my parents name.   With little fuss I was just told to wire them $70 and they'd send me a copy. I then realised how easy it would be for me to steal someone else's identity either living or dead.  
We had the same friend group so it got passed on to them pretty quickly that I saw them. Those friends had my back and also stopped hanging out with them, which was nice. 
I am now going to use the phrase "wombats ate my salad" when I need to send my girlfriend a message.  I am not going to inform or clear it with her beforehand. 
Well of course, do you take my family for being savages or something? 
I believe the F-117 was responsible for a number of UFO reports before the government acknowledged its existence.  
Personally speaking, I was never to have my bedroom door closed growing up unless I was changing. Didn't matter what age I was. My mom threatened to remove the door when I wanted peace and quiet once and I had it closed. I actually live with my future in-laws currently and at first it weirded me out, because they give us *all* the privacy and don't bug us for shit. They don't come to our room whatsoever. We could probably die in there and they'd have no idea until our bodies started smelling. 
No kidding. There are so many logs generated for that. If it ever comes out, it is going to be pretty easy to find out it was you. 
I do, what a cunt. Did you manage to get some money off him? 
That's sociopathic. I couldn't handle an affair to begin with, you have to be mentally fucked up to manage basically 3 families plus girlfriends.  I knew a guy kind of like this, family friends. They had a normal life, big house in the OC, 2 kids, etc. Their life blew up 4-5 years back because he had another house and 6 kids with a woman 50 miles away. How the fuck... 
I'll do you one better.   A friend of mine and his wife MET at a family reunion. Cousins. Same last name. Everything.   I think they are at least 3rd or 4th cousins. But woah.  
Haha he told Michael to ask for raise because Darryl himself asked Michael for a raise at which point he'd make more than Michael. One of my favorite episodes. 
What do you mean by hidden tab? A hidden sheet in the spreadsheet?? 
We had a cat like this in our neighbourhood, a big, white, haggard looking thing. Found him meowling outside my house when my cat went in heat, looked out and there's like 15 fucking male cats on my lawn behind this big badass motherfucker like "send out the wench, human". She gave birth to a couple white kittens a few months later.  
"No, sorry, that's your wife again... hang on... I have your daughter here too." 
You go in the stall and say the secret password, "bumblebee." A dick slowly emerges from the hole in the stall. There is writing on it. You begin sucking, and slowly some of the writing wipes away from your effort, leaving only the permanent marker behind and revealing your next target. 
That is currently happening to my friend group we cut all contact with them   
I will do this, too. I don't even know what a wombat is, but I'm sure as hell gonna persist in saying that those fuckers ate my salad. 
Same for all secret aircrafts, its why UFO sightings change through the years. 
Yeh surely the mother could sue him or something . What did the divorce give the mother ? 
I wonder what story they tell new friends and coworkers about how each met their spouse. 
Yeah, right click where the tabs/sheets are at the bottom of an Excel document.  If "Unhide" is selectable, it means there are hidden sheets in the document. 
"hang on...somewheeeeere *swipe* around  *swipe* here" *swipe*  *swipe* "oh here she is-- oh no, that's your son. Haha, it's amazing I haven't fucked you yet too. heheh" *swipe* 
arent you the guy who stopped some weird dude on 4chan from doing some shit? 
Celebrities will have a hard time explaining all these sudden nudes 
Probably all the not-so-great photoshops out there that appear to break the rules of physics. People missing shadows, or appear to be floating or bending space around them...stuff like that. 
They should have blended some hair onto the back of the elephant.  Also holy fuck, if these things were real, we'd never have evolved out of Africa... 
If this were an album cover I would probably buy it just for the cover art. 
I choose to believe this is real...and no one can tell me otherwise. 
Cant believe I had to scroll so far down to find something this outrageous    
Just some color matching and some touchup and it would really pass for a real photo... 
"Oh, there's kind of a lot going on, but it's pretty...  ...  That's all the same guy...   and... huh..." 
This makes me think of the guy who took a picture at his desk with both hands in the shot and then posted further and further out pictures explaining how he took them. 
Is that the horse-sized duck I have heard so much about? 
Ok, that looks way to legit, I reckon it might not be photoshopped 
People still think that's real. That was one of the first viral photoshopped I became aware of.  
That's a good one! Lots of the pics here can be explained by some trickery, double exposition tricks and the like. But that one will be very very hard to explain. 
When the bird people first invaded, we didn't know how to react. There was no way that we could fight them, they could fly faster than or jets, they could run harder and longer than our troops, they were unbeatable... 
That's just Kaitlin Olson in her role as a German soldier. 
SCRAW!!! THE ENLIGHTENED BIRDMEN WILL CONQUER THE MUDMEN!!! CRRRAAAAAW! 
How do we know the Mona Lisa we know isn't photoshopped?  
That would be super easy to explain. Everyone would just think that someone had painted a new version of the Mona Lisa with Mr. Bean's face.  Unless losing our knowledge of photoshop also means we lost of knowledge of painting in general, in which case *every* painting would blow our minds. 
Biden has trash tastes. All he needs his Nico and Maki and he's set for life.  
Yeah honestly I have no clue what's even happening. What was the original picture even supposed to be???? 
By keeping the photo paper still under the enlarger, blocking the light from the enlarger from getting to certain places on the paper at certain times, and changing the negatives in the enlarger.  The way silver gelatin photo paper works is that the more light it gets, the darker it gets.  By making sure that only parts of the paper are getting light at a time, you can build up the image like stacking layers in photoshop. 
Holy shit I've seen this picture many times but never realized it was the same guy  
There's another one that was even more popular. Like a day after 9/11, every one was showing an image of the towers with smoke billowing out of it that had a photoshopped "demon" face in it. People went crazy over it.  
They could just figure its a hat. Look what costume and makeup departments do for movies. Thats totally something you could do with practical effects.  
I've always wanted to learn how to use Photoshop but I heard it takes too much time.  
Five UNBELIEVABLE photoshopped images. #4 is really unsettling! 
SKRREEEEEEEE!! DONT LET YOURSELF BE KNOWN SQUAAAWWWWW 
Iv'e always felt like there's some potential for an /r/enlightenedbirdmen and /r/totallynotrobots crossover because they both type in all caps.  But then I realized that's just stupid.  
It could be, Photoshop back in the early 1500's was called paint. 
I shit you not once my parents went away for a couple weeks. So my brother, myself and all my friends replaced **every single photo** in the house with that astronaut sloth.. we then went further and hid that photo in really odd places, such as: the bottom of cups, in between books, in the fridge & oven, behind doors, in every single draw in the house, on the ceiling, you get the gist. I think there would have been over 300 sloth photos in total.   My parents killed themselves laughing once they opened the front door. But the best part? There are still photos today that they are yet to discover!  
Did you frame that picture and put it on your night stand just to have photo proof of it? 
Literal dodge and burn too, to blend edges and to counteract the the dimness on one side of an oblique projection. 
Participants:   * Emus  * Sir George Pearce  * Major G.P.W. Meredith  * Royal Australian Artillery 
WE MUST BRING DOWN ALL THAT IS NOT BIRD SCRAWWWWWW 
More like those five girls have Joe Biden as a waifu 
Why did someone photoshop a human head into the sloth astronaut picture? 
It's funny how people don't know (or forget) that Photoshop and its tools have the names they have *because* it's supposed to be a digital photo shop.  The same way Avid Media Composer (and Premiere to a lesser extent) and its tools we made to mimic/emulate a physical film editing bay. *cut, splice, split...*  (same goes with almost any other digitized process, cut, copy and paste anyone?)  
That was a surprisingly succinct and enjoyable little rabbit hole.   This is the sort of thing that keeps me coming back to reddit.  Thanks for sharing :) 
"The machine-gunners' dreams of point blank fire into serried masses of Emus were soon dissipated. The Emu command had evidently ordered guerrilla tactics, and its unwieldy army soon split up into innumerable small units that made use of the military equipment uneconomic. A crestfallen field force therefore withdrew from the combat area after about a month." 
GARGLE THE BIRDIES STAND NO CHANCE AGAINST POINTY STICK OF BIRD DEATH GAR 
nah dude aus, probably missing a joke i think  but we did fill every draw :P  
that's why things like this and also d.a.w's and video editing programs were created. to have every one of these tools at your literal fingertips 
And we still say we hung up the phone when we are done talking. 
Damn it I wanna know what those said. The first three got pulled 
Lord of the Flies/Animal Farm crossover more like. That would actually work... 
This would add another dimension to the character of Piggy 
Every time he refers to himself as "humbled", snort an entire ounce of cocaine. 
Every time he claims he's the only person to fix something, drink. Every time he says "great," drink. Every time he says "bigly," drink. Every time he says "fake news," drink. 
When he finishes his speech and says "Obama, you're fired!"  fuckin cringe.  
I'm for fun and all, but this just seems dangerous.  
I'm imagining it will play out like Scar's speech in the Lion King. It begins slowly, with Trump reflecting on Obama's presidency and the death of democracy.   Then, he kicks it up. The skies turn red, his voice booms as Russian politicians slowly pour onto the stage behind him. Trump announces a new era where lion and hyena live together. 
If he actually surprises us with a well delivered inaugural address, chug a pitcher of beer.  
Take a shot every time you feel displeased Trump is going to be president.  If you're a Trump supporter, take a shot every time you feel smug watching the speech. 
#Drinks with Donnie  **Yes, my lord:** If Donald compliments himself, everyone must bow. The last person to bow downs their drink.  **Glorious orator:** If Trumpy forgets his speech and goes on a tangent, the first person to say: "Excellent point!" is allowed to assign two sips to anyone.  **Wait, what?** Everyone drinks when Donald Trump contradicts himself within one minute.  **Wordator extraordinaire:** When Donny Don invents a word, the youngest person drinks any amount they want. Everyone else must take as many sips.  **Splitting hairs:** If T-Dog mentions his hair, the oldest person drinks any amount they want. Everyone else must take as many sips.  **Make America Drink Again:** When Donaldine Trumpet says "Make America Great Again", everybody takes a shot.  **Unbelievable:** If the words "you would not believe" are uttered, everyone present must reply "We believe!", with the last person taking not one, but two shots. 
Drink for every vague superlative.   "Huge" "Great" "Best" "amazing" all get shots.  Dead by the third sentence. 
Pro Tip: If you're underage and still want to play a pseudo-drinking game, find some of those jelly beans that have a 50/50 chance of being disgusting (bean-boozled, I think) and replace "drink" with "pick a random bean" 
A little off topic, but if you can, skip watching the address in any form and read the transcript later. Trump is an insatiable ratings whore and it would just kill him if people didn't tune in to watch his inauguration.  
I'm literally too poor to afford that much alcohol.  
This might be one of the most dangerous suggestions. 
Soooo, I'm not a native English speaker and I've never managed to get what is wrong with the way he says China. Care to help me? 
If Kanye also announces Trump as his running mate, run to your nearest liquor store and drink everything. 
I think we need to approach these kinds of things in a measured way - like, one drink every three or so times he says it. 
You could be drinking watered down hard lemonades and this game would still kill you.  
I'd say drink everytime he says "yuuuge", but people may die. 
He once claimed "I'm the best at military!" With no experience in the military whatsoever. 
Whenever Trump says something you agree with, drink.  It's only as dangerous as the rules make it. 
And instead of Simba, Joe Biden comes back in several years and fights Trump atop the burning White House.  
To even suggest Trump could be a fraction as eloquent as Scar is an insult to Disney, Jeremy Irons, and lions.  
If you watched the RNC acceptance speech that's actually what he did. No idea if he actually wrote it or not, but if you want a preview go look it up, it was not the same as one of his rally speeches at all.  Also a pitcher of beer isn't very much, it's like 3 and a half beers. I thought we were trying to get drunk here? 
For glorious orator, how do we know what's tangent and what's speech?  
I want to offer one more rule. It's called "Quacktastic" and anytime the big D makes his signature duck face and holds his hand up, everyone must quack. The last to quack must have a shot. Is it too late? 
#Handy Man  Every time Trump mentions his hands, take a shot.  #Sore Winner    Take a drink every time Clinton or a primary opponent is mentioned   #Walled Off   On every mention of a border wall, the person with the most left in their glass drinks. Everyone else speaks in Spanish for 5 seconds.  #Are You Not Entertained?   In the unlikely and unfortunate event of violence breaking out during his speech, everyone must drink all of the alcohol in the house. It's going to be a long presidency. 
For Wordator extraordinaire, would it also count if he was using a word in an unusual way, such as the way he says "the cyber" to refer to the internet? 
he uses the word "very" more than an elementary schooler who hasn't learned enough adjectives 
I wonder if he'll rename the White House the Trump House.  It's pretty lucrative real estate you know 
Don't worry, you won't have to be concerned with money after drinking that much. 
I will no longer be bothered by him doing that for these are amazing.  
If they ask why you're stealing all the liquor, just tell them Kanye is Trump's running mate. They'll join in. 
Do you get combo points? I see the "unspecified contradiction" bonus from a mile off 
I think we've found the issue: His lexicon contains so few words that no matter what word(s) we decide to drink to, he'll almost certainly use them so frequently that there's a real likelihood we end up with alcohol poisoning.  
LOL. How'd I forget that one! Yuuuge mistake... my bad. 
Yayyyyy, soon we'll have a president with a catchphrase...  
You glorious bastard, that's ass slapping perfect. 
"I'm Donald Trump"  (Weird_Fiches thinks about it, not sure he agrees) 
"Barack? Barack, wake up. we gotta go home. Barack?" 
**Affirmative Action** : Every time that Trump says "Fake News" everyone exclaims "It's True!", last person takes a sip 
**A reply from Daddy Don:** "That's a tremendous question, very very tremendous. There's a lot of questions like that, and you know, I get a lot of the, but only the best, only the best of the best and the best ones are always the ones I remember, I remember this one friend, Paul, and Paul was a great guy, great great guy, really an amazing guy. He told me Donald, he told me Donald, you're by far the best candidate to be president, no doubt, you're the best candidate of all of them. And you know, it's something I realized then, you know, he was right. Tremendous guy." 
Everybody says it, all the time, everyone always says to me: "bLbGoldeN, you have the best of the best words, they're amazing, tremendous amazing!" and I know they're right, because everyone always tells me all the time and you know what? I've heard someone say that I had regular words folks, regular words and really, and really it's sad, sad! 
You know there's a lot of research and complicated, very complicated stuff that goes on in the cyber, because it's made by very smart people. Some people once told me that China was the one that made it, but I look at them in the eyes and always tell them: "We're American, you can't fool us." Folks, we're at war, we are, we are, we're at war everywhere and there's people dying instead of being safe here with us, and having a tremendous time. Let me tell all of you something, I'm going to change all of it, I'll change things so much you wouldn't even believe, because I win, I win all the time. 
You think he calls his wing dang doodle his Trump Tower?   
Can I get a small loan of 1 million bottles of tequila? 
There has to be something happening there right? I'm generally fine giving people the benefit of the doubt but there has just been *so much* creepy shit. 
Yes, Presidents have run with different VPs in the following election.   Pence scored him a lot of votes with the true Republicans, though, so it's unlikely he would dump him.  
If two of those are together, the penalty is added then squared. All three, and you drink the whole thing. 
u/TheMalteseSailor forgetting catchphrases and utterly failing. Sad! 
Well if everyone who opposes Trump starts drinking heavily throughout his presidency, the only ones alive to vote in 2020 will be his supporters. 
There's actually a documentary out there that floats the possibility that half the reason Trump ran in the first place was he was furious at getting embarrassed by Obama during the birther thing at the Correspondant's Dinner and this was his version of revenge. Might explain why he seems to be promising to replace Obamacare with Obamacare++ 
It's okay, we can use it for 2024.   Next election of course **has** to be "2020: Hindsight". 
This made me tear up. God I hate the feels I get from that part of the movie 
We Are Number One but it's played by Donald Trump Hand Gestures. 
Funny enough, right now the odds on him saying "Fake News" are 10-1 against it. I put $20 on yes just for fun. I'm optimistic. 
**Everybody Drinks it:** Whenever Donnie says "Everybody says/does ____" Everybody drinks until he finishes that sentence 
I'd lose my ability to comprehend colors before that happens. 
You dont know these people but they're fantastic believe me 
She's about the right age to be his next wife and she looks like her mother. He's a sociopath with no sense of ethics. you do the math. He's probably of the Hapsburg school of thought when it comes to genetics anyway.  
"I've been saving this 50-year-old single malt for a special occasion." 
Well i was thinking like Diet root beer in my case. Not much of a booze fan 
You're making me want to give up my coping mechanism, you bastard. If I can't drink the next four years away, how will I deal with them? ^^^/s 
I'm hoping a candidate will change their last name to Hindsight.   **HINDSIGHT 2020** 
I think "Make America Great Again" should be the election slogan for 2020. 
It makes it even worse replacing them with Obama and Biden, considering how close they are. 
Well that's not very nice. Hey everyone, let's lynch /u/Hellguin for being not very nice! 
Are you serious? You mean in the inauguration? Where are these odds given? Vegas?  (sorry if this is a joke and it went well over me) 
I'm a dirty old man and would normally enjoy this kind of thing (shout out to /r/CrusaderKings/) but ffs this guy's going to be the friggen' US President. 
You do not waste good booze on sorrow drinking. Sorrow drinking is for the cheap shit. Good booze should be appreciated slowly, and hopefully with friends. 
Take the ginsburg route and just survive off pure hatred. 
I know you're joking, but everyone who's outraged at this should start getting involved in their local politics.  That's where real change can start and where an individual can make a big difference. 
No I'm serious. I use a gambling website and you can place bets like that. Right now odds are 150 to 1 against him using the phrase "golden shower." Dead serious. 
Implying Kanye West bring in politics isn't something to be celebrated!? /s 
And miniature American flags for all! Don't forget the miniature American flags! 
$100 says that at least 4 comments from this thread will be word for word in his inauguration speech. 
Believe me, I have the biggest work in the world   
My dad's stripper girlfriend is here and she's been farting nonstop since about a quarter after seven.  
Christmas is for people to celebrate having a family, and disposable income.  I have neither, so here I am. 
There is only so many times I can listen to Mariah Carey   
Because I'm at work. How do you like all that electricity you're getting?  Also, half of my family is in Mexico and half of them are in the Caribbean.  
I lost at monopoly. Don't feel like family right now. 
I'm stranded in a state where I know no one, hundreds of miles from my family.   My abusive and toxic (ex) girlfriend left in October, the day I lost my job, after putting me into tremendous debt. Can't pay the rent anymore, so I'm out the 26th. My car is in need of repairs but I can't afford it, so I can't drive on the highway.   So yea, I'm hundreds of miles from my family, I moved to this state a year ago for a fresh start but have been unable to make any stable friendships besides a failed intimate relationship. And I am now financially ruined.   I'm eating a bowl of rice with some butter for Christmas Eve dinner by myself because I can't afford anything else in a place I once called home with a woman I loved. I'm too sad to be angry.  
Oh fuck lol. This post got me.   There'd a bunch of little kids running around downstairs, and I'm waiting for my cousin to get here so we can open presents and stuff.   What about *YOU*, OP? 
Alone Christmas is amazing. Zero stress. Tons of food.   When it would cost $1200 to fly my small family one hour (in airplane time) away, I say fuck that and FaceTime instead.  
Because I'm cuddling in bed with my 2 yr old son.  Two weeks ago his dad told me he wanted a divorce because he's had a 2 yr affair.  I am so depressed this Christmas that I can't do anything but sit and stare.    
Because I'm at my in-laws house and yet again, after being in the family 10 years, nobody got me anything.  My wife and I got them all something and they only buy her stuff...  I hate them.  This is garbage.  Worse, I'm the bread winner in the house and bought all of this stuff.   I just don't have the energy to smile and be nice anymore.      Football and Reddit in the other room...  
Its 8am christmas morning, just woke up with a hangover. Whiskey w/ beer as chaser 5/7 
This is the weirdest Xmas of my life. Parents both passed so it's just me and the sibs. Oldest bro was thrown in jail this morning until we managed to bail him out a few hours ago. Hit the bar to soothe our woes, then last minute grocery shopping at Walgreen's (and drunken flirting with the pseudo punk cashier girl).  Now my brothers are blasting music and dancing like morons and I'm taking a break with a cig and some redditation.  Happy Holidays, love all you idiots 
Haven't talked to my parent's in over 3 years after I came out and was kicked out. Currently working overtime getting paid a fuck ton of money.  
Because I have nothing to do and pretty much nothing to talk about. If anybody talks to me I put down my phone. 
My mom told me she didn't think I could handle being around family, so she left me at her house and went to theirs. I have a mood disorder and sometimes have issues keeping it together. This is absolutely the last year I am celebrating Christmas.  
Big thing tomorrow. Wife is baking cookies and I am baking a doobie.  All is well at the Compound. 
My family went to Paris for vacation and forgot to bring me. Now if you'll excuse me, I have to finish rigging the house with booby traps before some burglars show up. 
I'm in the same boat. I did hang an Xmas wreath on my front door.  This has been an absolute sucky year, made a gazillion times worse because my 12 yr-old dog died in August. He was the family I celebrated with. 
I just want you to know that I read all that and greatly empathize with you. Your son and wife are blessed to have you  
I work in hospitality. You'd be surprised how many women in our restaurants freak the fuck out when Mariah Carey's "all I want for Christmas is you" comes on. It's alarming the screams from the grown women everywhere.  
...this is not what I expected but I'm inexplicably jealous. 
Also working! Apparently people still expect an ambulance to come on holidays.. 
11pm to 9am here.  I'm the only one without kids who is trained on this shift.  It wouldn't be my first pick of places to be, but I took it because it's more important for them to be home tonight and in the morning than it is for me. 
Holy fuck. I just went bankrupt a few minutes ago. I feel you dude.  
Better just you than fielding someone else's bullshit and being utterly unable to relax. 
If you're both on the lease she still owes you for half the rent. You can sue her for what you've paid so far and any other costs associated I wth the eviction.  Small claims court. Check out r/legaladvice.   
My Husband is browsing Imgur, my daughter is playing League, and my son is playing Helldivers, while I browse Reddit and tinker with WoW. :) 
I'm really sorry to hear about this. :( Sounds like your mother has her own issues to sort out. Hope you're doing okay. 
I'm sorry, friend.  If it makes you feel any better, I also have a Chinese immigrant mother and am in a PhD program, and it doesn't make the nagging go away. All those "what if I stayed in China" rants are still there. You're not alone, and you didn't do anything wrong. 
Look at Mr. Fancypants here flying one hour instead of driving. 
It's my first christmas since my dad died. He was estranged from all of the family except me, so I'm sort of alone in this. The cancer care centre where he died gave me a hand-made quilt donated by volunteers, and I brought that with me to my family's, just so I'd have something of him with me.  
Damn dude, sorry for your loss.  So watchya playin? 
Hey friend, me too.  Mom passed in September and I've been thinking about her a great deal.  Feels weird going through the motions when you know you have to. 
I'm still struggling with my soon to be ex wife's affair, the holidays are tough. It's been 4 years since I found out and everything fell apart and I'm still a wreck. If you need someone to talk to I'm here to listen, trust me you need to let it out or the holidays will fucking kill you. 
My house burnt down earlier this year, so Christmas is total bullshit this year. Everyone's annoyed and frustrated and cranky.. 
Why aren't you eating chinese food with your family? 
Just a jew, a lonely jew,  I'd be merry, but I'm Hebrew On Christmas... 
It's even worse when there are people you'd rather be with, but you're forced to be with your family. 
Just start singing "All Star" by Smash Mouth as loud as you can until they stop arguing and join in.  
Your day sounds like a great independent movie I'd put on a list to see once it hits the shitty cinema in my town which it never will so I'll forget about it until I see it on Netflix four years later after scrolling through my suggestions for half an hour. 
Exactly, people are always like, "YOU KIDS ARE ALWAYS ON YOUR DAMN PHONE YOU SHOULD TALK ONCE IN A WHILE"  "Ok what do you wanna talk about?"  "..."  "Exactly.       bitch" 
Psych nurse here. If your blood pressure is stable, ask your doctor about Prazosin (minipress). We use it specifically for nightmares related to PTSD. 
If ya need a friend those 2 hours hit me up we can talk or play online games  
God damn, I wish I had a compound. Or at the least a barbed wire fence around my house. 
Perhaps you could make something out of clay to play with? 
Mom had a stroke on January 9th of this year. I'm the caretaker, brother too busy with work. Sucks but it is what it is. I'll get my life on track when I can.  Hope your holidays are great and have a good new year! 
I can't help but think that the nearest animal shelter might have a lonely dog that's anxiously waiting to celebrate Christmas with someone who will love him back.   
I'm a grown-ass man and you'd be surprised at how I freak the fuck out when it comes on. There's a diva in all of us. 
It is :)   Had a hectic day. Last minute shopping, travelling for hours to get here (on public transport with an overexcited kid) and helping my folks prepare for tomorrow.    Now it's time to relax with shitposts and wine!   
AND firetrucks.  *eyeroll*  friggin' Divas.  Put out your own fires and drive yourselves to the hospital.  You'll never learn to take care of yourself if we're always doing it for you! 
Someone coded on my floor tonight at work. Don't they know it's Christmas Eve?!  Edit 1: Coding is a medical colloquialism for cardiopulmonary arrest. For you programmer bros, if one of you can help me with my python script that'd be great.     Edit 2: My first Reddit Gold! It truly is a Christmas miracle. Thanks stranger!  
You ungrateful little shit why I oughta send three ghosts over to your house to frighten you into realising the true joys of electricity millennial good for nothing you don't even know how electricity works dumb fucking shirt fuck you  Merry christmas 
3pm to 1am here. Single with no kids. I offered to work Christmas and Christmas Eve. Time and a half plus a two full day's worth of vacation. Gonna be a nice paycheck.   
This is my human granddaughter.  I also have a pug and chihuahua on my lap.  
It's such a horrific feeling, isn't it? It's like, I try to use the word "betrayed" to describe it, but using that word nowadays makes it seem so, i don't know, old fashioned or Shakespearean. That word doesn't do the feeling justice either.   As to your offer, i can't even imagine. I guess, well, my family all lives in upstate New York. I'm currently in Dover, Delaware. I can't even imagine what it would cost to get me up there, but that would certainly be the surprise of the century, for them and for me. But I'd never ask that of a stranger, or anyone I knew personally even. I'd feel beyond guilty and unworthy. Idk... 
4 kids screaming, dogs going crazy, wife and mother gossiping with each other, blah blah blah. At least im in the same room 
Thanks for your kind message. Despite reddit's imperfections, it blows my mind that ranting into the digital ether can bring out genuine support like yours, even at a time like Christmas Eve. 
Thanks dude. I guess I've only delayed the inevitable; soon, she'll start demanding to know specifics of my "program." But it's reassuring to know this happens to other people out there.  Out of curiosity, what are you studying? 
Mrs. Fancypants, and the drive is 9 hours over mountains with a two year old, so...nah.  
Thanks man.  Been playing Fifa and Final Fantasy XV! FF is so good!  
Hey buddy. I lost my mom in October 2012 and the first Christmas was absolutely awful. Four years later and it's a mostly happy affair for my family with a few sighs and sometimes the occasional tear.  The pain never goes away but it's less "front and center" as time goes on. I hope you'll come to appreciate it for the time you have with the family that's still here at some point like my family and I have. 
I feel so hard for you people. I've never been married but my ex broke up with me after dating for 3 years on Thanksgiving 2 years ago and i found out she slept with a roommate of mine the day after christmas. Holiday's kicked my ass and I was only 19. I can't even fathom it being someone you trusted so mich to marry them and have kids with. 
I had this happen 15 years ago.  My mom somehow managed to out together one of my all time favorite Christmases  it was a real rough year but I'll always have fond memories of that Christmas.  
Because us jewy-jew-jews (everyone say that out loud) do that tomorrow night. 
And now, 3 hours later, it's still 12pm Christmas Day in Australia.  Everyone forgets the west coast #bestcoast 
Or the person you'd rather be with told you to fuck off and ran directly into her exes arms.  
This is a great suggestion OP. I did 5 years in the Army Infantry and got injured in Mosul Iraq. Every night afterwards was a nightmare(literally). VA prescribed me mini press and life has been much more tolerable. Even if your PTSD isn't service related don't hesitate to PM brother. We're all in this together.  
Damnit! Should have thought of that when the stores were still open.  
Please make sure that you take care of yourself. You can really get worn down over time. The stress will really do a number on you physically and emotionally. My brother and her family could care less and it's taken a toll. I've let my life get off track for too long. Please don't make my mistake.  I wish YOU awesome holidays and a fabulous New Year. Please PM me if you ever feel the the need. I never understood what far reaching impact strokes could have until my mom had both of hers. 
If he doesn't have disposable income even after losing his dog, maybe taking on the long-term responsibility of another animal isn't the best choice. You really should be able to afford to care for an animal before you adopt one. I can't tell you how many people I've seen barely scraping by whose pets need to see a vet, but they put it off because they can't afford it. 
7pm to 7am here. Working at the front desk of a motel. Someone's gotta keep the rooms warm and doors open for hookers and junkies ;)  
"This is my human granddaughter."    i can't stop laughing at this  
My mom refers to my cat as her granddaughter. She has settled for second best after she gave up on me ever having human children. And admittedly, I do spoil my cat. I bought her a quarter pound of King/Chinook Salmon for Christmas. 
You're human man, there's no being worthy about it. Don't feel guilty for taking, when so much has been taken from you. 
The way you write tells me that you are an intelligent well rounded and reasonable person. PhD or not, you'll be fine I am sure.  
Well, at least it sounds like you're living away from home. Distance definitely helps. Also, r/AsianParentStories is your friend.  Applied math! Specifically, physics-based models that are used to study living systems. 
Nice! Ive been wanting to play FFXV but I can't justify getting another game with the 5 im already playing. 
Similar situation after 5 years. I know plenty of people have it worse, but its been 10 months for me and feeling like shit is putting it pretty lightly. She was once my best friend and I don't think I will ever be the same again. 
We have been really fortunate, we were donated a tree and ornaments. It's just been waves, I'm okay and trying to handle it, and then I just have a pity party. I go between pity/sadness and then guilt. I had so much, I'm fortunate, I'm lucky - why am I feeling bad for myself?? It's been a rough year. 
Lots of us did it tonight! In fact, I'm just heading home from a big ol Jewish Christmas Eve right now! 
I have PTSD from something not service related, and I have constant nightmares. I haven't been able to reliably sleep in years. Is there really a medicine that I can get that would help out with that? I never mentioned it to my doc because I figured the nightmares were just something people dealt with... 
HAHAHA. YES. I AM HUMAN. COME, FELLOW HUMANS, LET US ENJOY COMPANY AND MERRY FESTIVITIES WHILE INJESTING GLUCOSE INTO OUR ONE-WAY DIGESTIVE TRACTS. 
I'm trying to force myself to think and feel that way. I'm just so terrified of people getting the wrong idea about me or something. I've never *ever* been good at accepting help from others, but lord knows, if I've ever been in a situation where I needed assistance, this is certainly that moment.  
Diabolical. She might respond by deciding to limit the spread of said defective genes by massacring me. 
on the second night of Hanukkah my true love gave to me  One Present  on the third night of Hanukkah my true love gave to me  One Present  on the fourth night of Hanukkah my true love gave to me  One Present  on the fifth night of Hanukkah my true love gave to me  One Present  on the sixth night of Hanukkah my true love gave to me  One Present  on the seventh night of Hanukkah my true love gave to me  One Present  on the eighth night of Hanukkah my true love gave to me  One Present 
As someone who's family insists on going to the movies during the holidays, I am so sorry and thank you so much 
Hey buddy: take the gift and pay it forward. One day when things are working better for you, you can do the same for someone else. That day will come! 
When they get grounded they play games for my husband. They mentioned it to their friends and all of them were like, "I wish I could play video games for my punishment!" 
Phone, or in public.  Toxic parenting 101. They can't be an asshole in public. And if they are it's hilarious 
as someone being dragged to the movies on xmas day, thank you for your sacrifice. 
My tired eyes read that as on oxmas day, I imagined you having this awesome pagan holiday around a roast ox and bonfire with lots of mead. 
In college I had a fair number of all nighters and usually had the tv going to help keep me up and help with concentration.  Once a couple weeks after submitting an essay for a political science class I noticed that the message I sent with it to my professor went something like: "attached is my water for Italian cooking".  My essay was completely fine and had nothing to do with Italy. I guess my brain just turned off as soon as I'd attached the paper and there must have been some cooking related infomercial on tv while I sent it.  
Was on the phone with my boss and she was getting really irritated about something, I don't even remember what. The combination of her irritation and my exhaustion made my brain misfire, and I ended the call with "okay bye bye Mom, I love you!".  I was so embarrassed but she thought it was hilarious and started calling me her adopted daughter after that. I mean, she is the same age as my mom so it's not too weird, but I certainly felt like a child around her instead of a colleague until she left the company. I miss her ): 
My husband and I had an inside joke. Whenever someone lost something, the other person always asked, "have you checked inside your butt?"    I was in a meeting at work (conservative and traditional corporate office) one day and a coworker said, "I can't find my pen." Without any thought or hesitation I quickly responded, "have you checked inside your butt?" As soon as I said it, I snapped back to reality and realized I was at work. As you can imagine, everyone went silent and stared at me as my face turned bright red.  
Not too weird because it does make sense, I recently moved to the apartment directly above the one I used to live in. My former roommate leaves the door unlocked.   The frequency at which I just storm in and enter my empty old bedroom is staggering.  
I'm a security guard for Amazon and I have to do bathroom checks. Caught myself yelling "SECURITY!" right before going to the restroom at a bar on my day off. Thank God it was empty.  
When I was in school (6th grade I think) my mom would make my bagged lunch.  She would wrap soda cans with aluminum foil so they would stay cold (pretty sure that doesn't work).  One day I un-wrapped my soda and discovered she packed me a beer that day. 
Cleaning up my face with electric clippers.  Thought, "Oh, missed a spot." and proceeded to shave off my fucking eyebrow. 
Answered my cell phone "[911 center] what's the location of your emergency?"  Makes my spouse laugh, my friends roll their eyes, and scares the fuck out of telemarketers.   12 hr night shifts are a bitch. 
Opening a Mozzarella cheese stick for my daughter, threw away the actual cheese stick and gave her the wrapper.  
I have two: 1) Walking to work on a very straight path through a nature reserve. I fell asleep and sleepwalked for about 10 mins. It was so weird, i blinked and suddenly appeared near the end of my journey.  2) Got into my car with coffee and a newspaper. Carefully held the rolled-up newspaper whilst hurling the coffee onto the passenger seat.  
I grabbed my "lunch" on my way out the door for work in the morning.  I kept wondering what that beeping noise was the whole drive there. Couldn't figure it out.  Got to work and grabbed my lunch, only to realize I had actually grabbed the baby monitor. 
Instead of ground coffee, I put a couple scoops of sugar in my coffee filter and brewed it. 
Once while playing an intense board game, I was concentrating so hard that my buddy realized that he could just hand random things to me and I'd take them and put them in my jacket pocket or place them on the table in front of me. I only realized when I ran out of space to put things.  
I cared for a horse for several years.   First thing in the morning I would go put feed and water in the field, lead her out, and close the fence behind her.  One morning as I'm walking back into my house, I hear a weird sound behind me. The sound of hooves on linoleum.   She looked as surprised as I was that I had brought her into my kitchen. Luckily, she never told anyone so my secret is still safe. 
Patted one of my coworkers on the butt. I was in the habit of walking up behind my husband and patting him on the butt, so it was just automatic. Fortunately, coworker wasn't offended. 
I used to work in a call center and would answer my personal phone with my call center speech  
I used to fall asleep in class quite often, and normally my writing would trail off in to something illegible and then I'd be out for the count for 10/15 mins. One time I woke up after an in-class power nap to find that my writing had trailed off and then I'd written "my son" as clear as anything at the end of the sentence. I was 13/14 at the time and don't have any children.  
Woke up three hours early for some reason and didn't check the clock but thought I was running late. Rushed through getting ready for work and hit the road. Think it's a bit darker then usual but it could just be grey clouds before the rain. Roads are bit emptier then I'm expecting, must be lucky today. Finally pull up to work and start opening up the shop before anyone else gets in. Look over at the clock and realize I still have two hours to go before I even wake up. Almost went home but decided to stay and just take off three hours earlier then normal. 
Texting my wife while cashing out at the grocery store. She had just done laundry so I wanted to thank her. Rather than typing, I spoke aloud to the cashier saying 'thanks, love you' 
I used to work at the airport while in college, and one day I went to get groceries and drove 30 mins to the airport instead.  
I woke up one morning in college, got dressed, left my room and got halfway out of the dorm before I realized I had no pants on. 
Spent ages cooking dinner only to pick the plate up and empty it straight into the bin. I was so tired and hungry, I cried 
Raising my hand to voice my opinion while in a conversation not a school 
I was tutoring another student on geometry (arc and area and whatnot) just after I had finished cramming for and taken a Calc test. About three quarters of the way through the poor kids homework I realized that I had not done any of the problems correctly. Rather, to the students endless confusion, I had been integrating the circumference of the circle between the endpoints of the arc. Once I realized my mistake I redid the work with him and reimbursed the session cost.   I've never seen someone so grateful to find out that they *were* doing their math right and that I was in whatever post apocalyptic math-based dreamscape. 
grabbing my keys, phone, wallet, etc. before work.  why is there a tv remote in my car?  the etc. included the tv remote 
I tried to put a pacifier in my mother's mouth as opposed to infant she was holding. The best part is that she was nagging the hell out of me.  
When I was 18, hanging out with my then girlfriend at her place. Fell asleep for a bit, and when I woke up she said, "you're cute when you sleep." My immediate sleep-brain reply was, "not when seven people end up dead." 
I drove a city bus in college.  My route and my commute home had a road that overlapped.  Driving home from work one night I ended up doing my bus route instead of my commute home and didn't realize it until I ended up in the bus terminal at the end of the line.  I guess it was better than driving into my apartment complex with the city bus. 
Lose my phone in my hand while in the middle of a call. 
I asked a customer to let me know if we were out of something and I would grab it for them and instead of saying "come yell at me" I said "come at me". Also at different job told a customer "goodnight yourself" 
probably the time i cracked 3 eggs into the sink. one after another. 
Left my house extremely sleepy and drove to my old high school instead of the university. I'm in grad school and have been out of high school for 5 years. I was turning in before I realized what I did, thought I had stroked out for a minute. 
I got out of work late, drove home. Must have dozed off because last thing I remembered was being on the freeway a couple of exits from home. Woke up in the garage 10 min later, with the car turned off. I got home safely without causing an accident. Scared me still thinking about it. 
Post Duty ER. Was already home and asleep. Mom woke me up for dinner, saying "Food's gonna get cold", thought I heard "code", so I jumped up and shouted "where?" And ran down to the dining area only to realize I was at home. 
Had a pet rat out roaming with me while I made some toast.   cleaned up, put the rat in the fridge and didn't realise until I put the butter in the cage that *oh shit*  Went to reclaim the rat, she was all "Fuck off, the food box is MINE now". Already gotten into the ham.   
Locked keys in car then locked car inside house garage.  good times 
Sprayed my hair down with what I thought was hair spray. It was Lysol.  
Was at my fiances house for dinner. Had to leave early. Was in a rush. Kissed her dad on the way out.  
I tried to put the cat into the tool drawer and then almost put the poor thing into the fridge 30 seconds later.  
I wear a fob watch at work. Pinned to my chest. On my days off I don't half get odd looks if someone asks me the time and I automatically start pawing at my boob.   When my daughter was very young she loved trains. So I'd take her on short trips and the line passed some fields, where I'd point out the animals to her. Got some weird British alarmed looks that time I pointed out of the window and loudly said "look! Moo cows!" when was on the train by myself.  
*sighs*   It had been a long, rough day at work. Once I got home I really had to pee, I pulled down my pants, sat and started peeing. I forgot a step. Pull down underwear. You read it right everyone, I pissed myself on the toilet.    EDIT - Fun fact, I never shared my embarrassing moment with my husband. I wanted to share some of the funny responses I got and finally just told him. He hasn't stopped laughing yet. (He was having a bad day so I'm glad I shared.) 
I was woken up at 3:30 in the morning for a random drug test for baseball last semester and after I pissed in the cup, I drank it.  Don't know why, but I did it. Luckily there was still enough in the cup to test.  
I often have the urge to say "ok, love you, bye", when ending a work call.   
I kissed a teacher on the cheek, she told someone "I can't hear you" while tapping her fingers on her cheek and I thought she wanted a kiss... 
Was typing up an essay, mind started spacing out, came back around and I had typed a page without any errors. Was strangely proud of myself 
I ordered a meatlong football from subway. I then got upset when the dude had no idea what I wanted.  Then we both laughed. 
 There is a walk in closet in the bathroom at my house. Once I picked up dirty clothes off the ground to put them in the clothes hamper (also in the bathroom) while also needing to go to the bathroom. As a result, I threw my clothes into the toilet and unzipped and almost pissed into my clothes hamper before I noticed. 
Poured orange juice instead of milk into my cereal, put the bowl of cereal into the fridge, walked back to the table with nothing wondering where the fuck I put my cereal. 
Put the dinner on and realised I had no carrots.   Decided to drive to the shop to get carrots - ended up driving to work.    Burnt the shit out of all the pots and had to buy new ones :( 
I put on a coat I hadn't worn in awhile and felt an Altoid in the pocket. Sweet!, loose mint. I popped it in my mouth and it was a watch battery. 
I was sitting at my father's wake and my brain was just completely shut off. I was sitting in between my girlfriend (at the time) and my sister. Everyone was extremely devastated by my fathers passing. My girlfriend was pretty torn up and I could hear her crying softly. Not really thinking I put my hand on her thigh and rubbed gently to comfort her.   I can see my sister turn to me in my peripheral. She whispered, "What the fuck are you doing? Snap out of it." My girlfriend begins to giggle as she sees me rubbing my sisters thigh. The giggles and the whisper finally make sense and I snap my hand back and laugh my ass off. We all had a pretty good laugh. Tears of sadness turn into tears of laughter. My sister and I are super close and she knew I meant to rub my girlfriend's thigh for comfort, not hers. Girlfriend knew I was fucking spaced in that moment.   (Obligatory....it was an innocent mistake, for all you pervs and down voters...)   Edited for clarification. 
Vigorously picking my nose while holding a cigarette and driving; crammed lit cigarette up my nose 
one time, one of the kids asked for... shit i don't even remember what. probably asked for a sandwich or something. on autopilot(i was tired and sick) i go into the kitchen, got a bowl out of the cabinet, sliced up a bunch of ham, put that in the bowl, poured in apple juice, stuck a slice of toast and a teabag on top and handed it to him with a steak knife.   kiddo was smart. he watched me do all that, took the bowl and knife, said 'thank you', put it on the table and went and got my wife and said 'daddy's super tired' and showed her what i'd done.   she put me to bed after that.  
When I was a kid, I was having breakfast, pancakes and apple juice.  Somehow, I poured myself a glass of maple syrup and took a slug, expecting apple juice.  Spit it across the room. 
Lately when im browsing internet i suddenly get an idea strike and i have to search for something,i open up a new tab and instantly forget what i wanted to search for,i get really mad close my eyes and try to figure out what i wanted and succeed like 2/10 times, most of times i just close the new tab thinking that im a young man with a mind of a old man with some brain damage. it hurts 
My wife and I had a really long day running all over the city with out daughter. This was three days after my second deployment where I had been gone for 12 months. We got in bed and I just sort of opened my laptop, put headphones on, and turned on the ol porn. I didn't understand why I had just gotten slapped until nearly 30 seconds after the fact. 
On a similar note, I did park maintenance for awhile and often entered the opposite sex bathroom to clean. I have found myself yelling "FEMALE MAINTENANCE WORKER!" before entering the ladies room 
What did you do with the beer and why is the answer you chugged it? 
Been giggling like mad at all the stories, but yours? yours pushed me over the edge. I think My laughing just woke up the neighborhood.. 
Thank you for the diabolical idea of how to get rid of telemarketers!  
Imagine you pick up someone elses signal with the baby monitor and start hearing voices in your car.  
The other day I was checking in at an amusement park. After the guy scanned my ticket, I, for some unknown reason, held out my hand. And the guy handed me his scanner.  
Haha I've done that.  I was walking through town with my gf at the time, looking at stalls and shops and she was in my periphery, or so I thought... She had stopped to look at something else and a woman of roughly the same height and hair colour was stood next to me.  I checked my phone for time, gently caressed her shoulders and said "come on now, it's time for us to head off". And just walked away from this woman.  I turned around a few meters later to see my gf a luminescent shade of embarrassed and this entirely freaked out little old Asian woman. 
I had to go to Walmart once after finishing my midnight cashier shift from a competing grocery retailer across the street. I absentmindedly grabbed my stuff, approached the cashier and asked her if she found everything ok. We stared at each other blankly for a little bit. 
I would always try to greet people when they walked into clothing stores/restaurants and then realize I'm shopping/eating too, that's not my job here.  
What did you used to do at the airport? I think airports are interesting 
I did something like that when I was like 8. My dad was in the car getting ready to take me and my brother to the game room, and I didn't want to miss out so I ran to the car without pants on. Then I hear my mom yelling out the window, "YOU HAVE NO PANTS ON!" 
I was making breakfast one early morning and cracked my eggs straight into the garbage. 
Every year I have a day or two where my first period learns something a bit wrong because my brain isn't working. I usually hope they're not paying too much attention and try to reteach it the next day.  
I have done this. Instead of grabbing my coffee, I got my tv remote and didn't notice until I got to work haha  
i was really hoping it was the other way around :( 
I was on a bus with a guy new to the route but finished his training. He got mixed up, took a wrong turn, got more mixed up, and some people who were regulars to the route straightened him out and got the bus on track again. It was funny as hell. No one was mad, everyone just apologised and laughed because Canada eh. 
It's better than looking for your glasses while you're wearing them. Not my proudest moment... 
Have done, but with just two.   First egg: "oh, dammit!" *Rinses egg down sink*  Second egg: "oh...oh, fucking come on" 
My husband is an ER physician. We vacationed in a little cabin with a couple of his coworkers, another physician and a nurse (us sleeping together in one bedroom and them in separate beds in the other).   One night, my husband rolls over in his sleep and his CPAP mask is no longer forming a complete seal on his face. Waking up to the air now rushing out of hubby's mask, the MD coworker practically yells "There's a problem with a vent!" (as in ventilator). This wakes up the nurse, who responds with an equally loud "What room!? What room!?". After about five seconds of confused silence, they finally regained their wits and burst out laughing. 
You reminded me of my favorite one! I kick my truck door closed all the time.  One time, I kicked it closed before grabbing my phone, and in a sleepy panic *threw my keys into the truck just before the door closed.*  I was so out of it I yelled "Yes!" because my sleep addled brain must have thought that was awesome.  Had to wait for my wife to get home to open the door to the house to get the spare. 
I worked at a restaurant where we had to knock on the bar door before opening it, I probably did it about 20 times a day for 6 years. Almost every time I open a door that you just have to push open, like a bathroom door at a restaurant or something, I knock really hard like three times. Lots of weird looks.  
Ah crap something similar happened to me. I got to a party and saw people I knew, mostly female, so I gave them all a hug and a small peck on the cheek, get to the one guy in the group, both of us bearded men and proceeded to give him a peck on the cheek. We both just stopped and stared at each other.  
Yeah... they probably didn't need the pee to know if you were on drugs after that. 
I had this happen to me. I had procrastinated on a film study project, started working on it at 8pm the night before it was due, made it about 1/2 of the way through by midnight, and woke up in my bed at 5:30am to go to school with no recollection of anything after midnight. I was freaking out thinking I still had four hours of work to do to finish, but checked the document and it was *done*. Last saved at 3am. I got an A on a project that I barely remembered doing, and I had done the second half *faster* than when I was conscious. 
I've tried to put milk in the cabinet where the cereal goes a bunch of times.  I've even tried to put the box of cereal in the fridge.  
When my husband and I started dating,  we were long distance, and often talked on the phone late at night, due in part to his job and the time difference. One night,  I fell asleep on the phone,  in the middle of my own sentence,  and finished the sentence with something like,  "... but then we need to find a place to camp." It was like my brain was playing mad libs and just filled in with "adjective, noun, verb," or whatever.  
Sounds like you forgot more than just her password.  
Had I been a year or two or I probably would have drank it.  I have it to the lunch room teacher who has known my mom for years. 
My old girlfriends mom used to pay for fast food in a drive through then drive away. 
Just the very image of him angrily hurling coffee at the passenger seat like it offended him somehow has me in tears. 
I knew none of those people where paid. They all just pass on the torch. 
I'm glad I'm not the only one, something about airports is really fascinating to me. 
Skype meetings are the worst about this because you don't have any body language to clue you in that someone wants to say something.  So usually one or two people just steamroll the conversation and you basically have to talk over them for 30 seconds to get them to stop and give you some time.  It's honestly a real problem with conference calls in my experience. 
If it was OCTranspo in Ottawa, people might have laughed about it in public but you can be damn certain they made a bunch of passive aggressive posts about it on /r/Ottawa. 
Not as bad as not being able to find your glasses because you can't see without your glasses. 
I cracked one right into the trash can. One tap on the side of the stove then right into the garbage you go! Liquid first, shell second, patience last.  
A heart stopped, or someone stopped breathing. Code red or code blue.   At least that's what I remember from when my mom worked in the emergency room.  
haha, oh jesus, those poor guys must get so stressed. I cannot imagine another profession as stressfull that would make you wake up mid panic. "The walk-in freezer is open! Someone left the Walk in freezer open and there's a problem with it's fans!"  Said no cook or waitress ever when waking up in the night. Poor Medical staff, you guys are all nerves.  
I rushed all over there concerned and apologetic and she's fuckin' arse-deep in a packet of ham and actually tried to cling to the door as I took her out.  She'd seen fuckin' paradise and wasn't leaving.   
I worked three jobs once, and they all had different ways of answering the phone, plus, of course, my own phone. One day, I picked up a call at one job, and my mind went completely blank. All the caller could hear from me was "Ah, uh, Thank, hello." Pause. "Thank, uh, This..." Then I hung up.  
Most of my friends would probably just roll with it  
One of my coworkers got super drunk at a party at another coworker's  apartment. He went outside the place to smoke, finished the cigarette, went back in and passed out on the couch. When he woke up, he had a blanket and a pillow over him, but something wasn't right. Actually, everything was slightly off. As the haze of the post-blackout wake-up started to clear, he realized he was in the wrong apartment. He had stumbled into a stranger's home and fell asleep on their couch.   He grabbed his shoes from by the door, quietly opened the door and hightailed it out of there. Never went back to that coworker's apartment. 
Unrelated story, but our bio class was working on a lab report and one of my buddies in the class was going through depression. Night before it was due, him, I and a couple of other lads were working on it in a Skype call just to make things easier. Soon, he goes quiet and we hear a quiet rumbling, enough to catch onto the mic. Turns out he fell asleep. We felt bad for him, so we broke into his drive account (security question was easy as shit) and finished his report for him.   Week later he is telling us that he finished his entire report in his sleep and that he was feeling substantially better since he felt his body wasn't giving up so his mind shouldn't either. I think he got a 92 on it too.  We never told him it was us. Dude's doing great now 
A really common one is she asks me what I'm doing (through text), then asks me again a few minutes later (after I've answered, I'd like to add). I always respond "you just asked that" and she says "oh yea. Autopilot". 
he has some serious moments, i admit.   other times he's a shrieking pain in the ass.  but sometimes he's pretty awesome.  
He did not, no.  My hope is that he didn't notice me.  My fear is that he was only pretending to not notice me. 
Sounds like you had a few beers before writing this. 
It took me a minute to figure out what was going on. I looked down at my hand and I was like "uh, I think you need this," and handed it back to him. He just took it like "thanks..." and went on checking the next person like it was totally normal. 
I think it's because almost everyone at the airport is probably there for an important reason 
My brain does that too. One time I couldn't decide between saying France or French, so I ended up with "Franch." To make matters worse, my brain has decided "yup, that works" and now if I'm not careful I'll always end up calling it Franch.    
Do you process the information at the moment and just don't store it? Or is this cool trick a cause of accidents?  
"There's a bug!"  "Uh-oh" said the programmer, as he rolls over into a more comfortable position. 
Just keep rolling with it until after the marriage. 
I love to see that good in people. "Oh look some stranger passed out on my couch, drunk. I should get him a blanket."   Those people are awesome, and probably going to die from being too nice at some point. 
My mom will ask me the same question three times in succession, forgetting I already answered each time. 
One phrase I do this all the time with. I often say "take care buddy" or "take care bro". More often than I'd like, it becomes "take care bruddy" or "brud".   Makes me wonder if I English as good as I think. 
"I HAVE SEEN WHAT LIES ON THE FAR SIDE OF THE HORIZON, MAN-BEAST. YOU WILL NOT CAST ME BACK TO MY PURGATORY OF IRON BARS AND PROTEIN PELLETS!"  (Translated from *'Squeak!'*) 
By far the best in the thread so far. Just imagining the coworker's face is fucking killing me hahaha 
I mean, If I was planning to kill someone, and they offered me a blanket and pillow, I'd probably change my mind. 
You cannot even blame it. Kind of sad for the rat to having seen the truth. 
the men bit her, now she's turned into one of them. A manpire 
My Dad is a pilot and told me a story a few years back about meeting Robin Williams on one of his flights. He was actually commuting on a connect flight to Minneapolis from where he would be starting his trip from and happened to be sitting next to none other than Robin Williams' wife (Robin was sitting a few seats ahead of him). My dad got up a short while into the flight and asked him if he wanted to switch seats with him so that he could be with his wife. According to my dad, Robin Williams responded with a friendly smile and said "no it's okay I feel a bit like wandering around right now anyway." He got up shook my dad's hand and then proceeded to go say hey to other passengers for a bit. My dad said he was one of the friendliest guys he had ever met.  
"Never pick a fight with an ugly person. They don't have anything to lose."  ~Robin Williams  Out of the tens of thousands of hilarious things he said, this one always made me laugh the loudest for some reason. RIP, funny man. The world is a lesser place because you're no longer in it. :( 
When I was maybe 10 years old, I was in the lobby of a hotel in Baltimore and my dad tapped me on the shoulder and pointed to a guy standing in line. I turned and saw a short, hairy guy with a big pack pack. When I realized who it was, I let out a gasp and made eye contact with Robin Williams. He then looked back at me and let out a gasp of his own. Small, insignificant story, but it makes me laugh thinking back to that.  
I've always heard people talking about how a certain celebrity death really hurt them, and I couldn't honestly understand it. I had never really looked up to or had been effected by someone I never even met before. Now I know. This death hit me like a ton if bricks. I am at a loss of words truly. All I can say is I truly will miss this man and everything he has done.  
"If you're that depressed, reach out to someone. And remember, suicide is a permanent solution, to a temporary problem." -Robin Williams So sad :( 
Finally, the megathread is upon us. Does anyone have any favorite quotes? I like "You're only given one little spark of madness. You mustn't lose it."  
For every person who is saddened by this I feel Robin Williams did his job on earth. If you have the feels right now then he positively affected your life and he'd be happy he did. Mission complete. RIP 
Just goes to show even the most happy, upbeat, and funny people can suffer from severe debilitating depression. He spent his entire life making other people happy. He will be sorely missed.   E: Just wanted to add that I'm reading all of your replies and if anyone needs to talk, or perhaps let some of their burden go, my inbox is 100% open.   
I know this'll probably be buried, but I figured I write it anyway. I met Robin Williams a couple years back when I was in a Hostpital. It wasn't anything life-threatening, but I was prepped to go into surgery later that day. Some of the other kids and I were told that "a surprise celebrity" was coming to visit us, and we would get to spend the morning with them.   I was shocked and so freaking happy when I saw Robin Williams walk into the room. I had to wait 20 minutes before I could talk to him (we were in a circle, and each person got to ask him questions), but the wait was totally worth it. I can't remember the actual questions I asked (I had a lot of drugs in my system at the time), but I do remember him patiently listening to everything I had to say. At that point in my life, not many people had given me the same  courtesy.   He was, and still is, one of the greatest people I've ever had the pleasure of meeting. 
Goodbye, Robin Williams. You will be missed.   Why did he have to go? :( 
**Here's my personal Robin Williams story.**  I live in the Wood River Valley (aka Sun Valley, Idaho). And he's a very frequent visitor here. Meet him a couple of times.  Once was out hiking with a some friends when we decide to stop for lunch. As we're eating a small group of mtn bikers goes past and one of them has his shirt off and holy shit is he hirsute!  I've always had issues with impulse control and blurt out, *Hey check it out, it's a bear on a bike!*  It was Robin Williams.   He heard me and stopped cause he was laughing so much. His group stayed for a bit as we talked about the trail conditions and whatnot. Really nice, decent and obviously funny human being.  The world will be less humorous with him gone..... 
His portrayal of Patch Adams inspired me in my medical career.  How did he inspire you? 
How can we as a group rally to support the people we already love?  Will they speak out and accept the love that we have to give?  I just wish I could hug him and say everything will be all right...last week...  
He's not dead, he's only wandering the forests of Jumanji waiting for his time to return and take us away from the sadness and evil in the world.  
"I heard joke once: Man goes to doctor. Says he's depressed, life is harsh and cruel. Says he feels all alone in threatening world. Doctor says, "Treatment is simple. The great clown Pagliacci is in town. Go see him. That should pick you up." Man bursts into tears."But doctor" He says, "I am Pagliacci." Good joke. Everybody laugh. Roll on snare drum. Curtains."  RIP Mr. Williams 
"Reality is just a crutch for people who can't cope with drugs." Robbin Williams 
I normally don't care about this sort of thing, people I've never met dying. This and Steve Irwin though really hit me in the feels.  
Who could play Robin Williams in the inevitable biopic? 
Any Robin Williams stories from people who met him? 
When your job is to make everyoe happy, i guess you forget how to make yourself happy.. 
Spoken like someone who's struggled with depression. 
It makes me sad to think how overwhelmingly depressed he must have been to not take his own advice that he has given to millions of people. 
Well, I think it's a pretty safe bet Louis will be at Robin's funeral. 
Today, I learned that Hook has a 31% on rotten tomatoes which is ridiculous because everyone I know loves this movie. 
He had a small part in my favorite movie, Artificial Intelligence, as Dr. Know. He recites this poem in his scene and I love it so much.  Come away, O human child! To the waters and the wild With a faery, hand in hand. For the world's more full of weeping than you can understand. 
Fucking loved it. Proved he could step away from comedy and still nail a performance.  Good Morning Vietnam was my favourite though. 
I have been depressed lately, so the other day I went on Netflix looking for a movie to cheer me up. I ended up watching The Birdcage, even though I have seen it several times before. I picked it because I loved Robin Williams and he has never failed to make me laugh. I feel so honestly sad that there was no one and nothing to cheer him when he most needed it. I feel like one of the brightest lights in the universe just winked out and the world just got a little bit darker. 
When he burst into Christopher Reeves room shortly after his accident portraying a russian doctor there to perform a colonoscopy...Reeves said it was the first time he laughed and knew things would be alright. 
I had a friend that grew up in San Francisco and went to Robin Williams' house on Halloween and he told me Robin always had the best candy bars and made everybody that came to his door laugh.  
It seems to me that the most successful comedians always have an intimate understanding of how life can make jokes out of us. 
Aaand that's the thing tonight that pushed me to tears. I feel fairly confident that this is the only presidential statement to say "bangarang" 
While this is a huge tragedy, it's important to remember that Williams had been struggling with severe depression for years.  One especially bad day with the ultimate consequence was always a possibility.  It's important to keep that in mind, especially if you have loved ones in a similar position.  Don't forget there are great resources higher in the thread. 
What Dreams May Come, amazing performance with so many angles. 
You treat a disease, you win, you lose. You treat a person, I guarantee you, you'll win, no matter what the outcome. 
He showed me that it's ok to be a goof as an adult. As a kid, seeing a grown man running around making funny voices and great jokes in movies made me realize the adulthood doesn't have to suck. 
I'm silently sobbing watching hook with my kids (6, 4 and 2). They've been obsessed with it the last few days.  
RIP Mr. Williams. We'll all be waiting for God to roll a 5 or an 8. 
The thing is with Steve Irwin at least I could've expected to see him go in such a way. While tragic it was oddly fitting of him. But, I can't even imagine Robin Williams without a smile on his face much less depression and suicide. His death seems to hit something deeper because of how unexpected and unlike the image we all had of him.  
His words finally just broke the floodgates... As someone with a similar depressive disorder it really hurts to imagine that even at his age after starting a family and all his success that he was still hurting underneath it all. 
I think Weinger's and Gottfried's comments got to me the most. It's wonderful to see the huge celebrity outreach in this time. 
He also struggled with alcoholism. That is actually a quote thrown around in aa meetings quite a bit. 
If I see a picture of him at the funeral I'll burst into tears. 
He also paid for treatments Christopher Reeves' family couldn't afford.  
"...will be the cornerstone of my administration. I'm proposing that America get behind a brand new biparitsan comprehensive medical coverage bill that is bangarang as all get out."   - from Obama's 1st Inaugural Speech, Jan 20 2008 
This one. I was talking to my son just last night about Robin Williams and told him he needed to see this movie. I think we'll watch it tonight. 
He brought humor to the role, but he preserved the character's dignity and humanity to prevent it from being a complete joke or a characture of a gay man. 
This is one of the few movies that makes me laugh out loud any time I watch it.  I might watch this tonight.  
This was mine too. Even though we couldn't see him, it's amazing how they got the genie to look *just a bit* like him in the face...So god damn sad right now... 
This is one of my favorites. It was the first time I saw Robin Williams in a serious role. His character totally creeped me out in this movie. 
Miranda: What happened?  Mrs. Doubtfire: He was quite fond of the drink. It was the drink that killed him.  Miranda: How awful. He was an alcoholic?  Mrs. Doubtfire: No, he was hit by a Guinness truck. 
I have never seen this movie and I feel like it will have such a different feeling to it now. Too sad. 
YES. This movie is SO underrated. And Robin just absolutely kills that role.  
Such an underrated film. I could never understand why the critics hated it so much.  
 You treat a disease, you win, you lose. You treat a person, I guarantee you, you'll win, no matter what the outcome. 
That was my favorite quote.    The theme and ideas are so pure in that movie, the delivery is so perfect. 
I've read this multiple times, which makes me feel both better and worse about myself. 
I was just trying to explain this to my girlfriend. I use humor all the time to deflect my true feelings.  Also dethklock: comedy is pain 
How many of you just read this in Barack Obama's voice? 
Oh man, I forgot this fact and thanks for reminding me. God dammit Robbie, why did you have to go!? 
I've always seen overdosing as a kind of suicide... Plenty of celebrities do that.  
I'm rather surprised this is so far down. I guess it must be a generational thing...  
I started the movie thinking it was going to be dumb and over dramatic. In the end I was laughing every two minutes. He just played the role so well. 
Our job is improving the quality of life, not just delaying death. 
They were roommates at Julliards and they promised each other that if one of them got successful they would take care of the other.   
/u/sucks_at_people probably meant intentional suicides. ODs are often accidental 
And they did. The Williams family took care of Reeves' son after both Christopher and his wife passed away.  
I just want to say, I love you too. I wish I could hug you right now.  
Not my story, but my brothers.  He lost his wallet and was retracing his steps looking for it. A homeless man approached him at a coffee shop and said to him   "Don't worry. It's in the bathroom sink. Your wallet is in your bathroom sink"  Later that night he did indeed find his wallet at home in the bathroom sink.   A few days later, he saw the same homeless man and thanked him for his help. The guy became really irritated and told my brother he had never seen him before.  Could have been a lucky guess, but I think Magical Bum makes for a better story.  
I've had glasses since the third grade. I was playing tackle football with friends after school (I wasn't wearing glasses), tackled one of my friends, really big collision, for a second I regained full eyesight...then I blinked and it was gone again. 
When I was about 10 years old I saw my old dog catch a crow out of the air then just gently release it.  
My dad swears he once saw two cats, a raccoon and a skunk all meet up in the middle of the street at night.  
When I was about 10 they started putting missing children on milk cartons. Every morning for a while I was looking at this boy's face on the side of the milk while I would eat my cereal. Then one day a car went down my street while I was playing outside, and there was a boy in the back seat with his face up close to the window looking out. I'm 99% sure it was the boy from the milk carton. I told my parents but they didn't believe me. 
I was at the Shedd Aquarium in Chicago.  I walked up to the cuttlefish tank, and for some reason all 20 or so of the cuttlefish rushed over to me.  It was a big tank, maybe 10 feet long.  I walked the length of it, and they followed me.  I walked back, and they followed.  A few other people saw and tried it themselves.  But alas, the cuttlefish only had eyes for me.  My best guess as to the cause was that the guy who feeds them is my doppelganger.   
Ball lightning. It was right after a thunderstorm passed by.  I could see floating orbs in the sky. There were a couple of cars parked by an open field and people were watching this happen, so I parked and got out to join them.  We all sorta just looked on in silence until they winked out one by one. There was at least ten of them and they seemed to fly together in patterns. Sometimes they were fast, other times they slowed down or reversed direction. They seemed small, but I could tell this wasn't because they were far up in the sky. If I were to guess, they'd be about the size of a basketball, maybe a little larger.  The whole ordeal only lasted thirty minutes. We then all got in our cars and left. I tried taking pictures but it was dark and the lights were too faint to make out. I should recorded a video instead. I noticed someone was recording them at the scene so I had kinda hoped I'd see it online at some point. But it's been two years now so I guess not. 
A chameleon escaped from a bag when my friend was giving it to me and it leapt into a big pile of snow. I looked around for it for a while but couldn't find it so I gave up. Several weeks later the snow all melted and I was out there and found the lizard partially frozen to the ground. I peeled him off and put it in one of those little plastic tanks and sat it by the radiator in my house. Within an hour or two the lizard was hopping around the cage like nothing ever happened. It lived for several years after that, and was known to my friend and I as Jesus the resurrection lizard.  
I was snorkeling in Hawaii once, and I swear I saw something that looked like a clear chameleon, but as soon as I got close it buried itself in the sand. I still vividly remember discovering a new species.  
When I was around 10 years old I went down to a lake when I was on holiday. When I get down there I vividly remember a massive ball of lightning just hovering and then it struck the middle of the lake. I never ran so fast in my life back to the litte house we were staying in.  
I was out for a walk late one night. This was in rural Illinois, so there was nobody else out. I noticed from a distance that there where these squirrels just standing in the middle of the road. Thought to myself that this is strange. When I got closer I noticed there where three squirrels standing around a cat that was lying down. I thought for a minute the cat was dead, but when I got closer and walked passed them, the squirrels and cat followed me with their eyes, none of them moving a muscle. It was a look like, "Move it along nothing to see here."  Still to this day I think of how bizarre that was.  
As a child I touched some weird pest plant in our garden, I think it stung me. Then I saw everything in inverted colors for short time. And then back to normal. I was in such a shock, I couldn't explain it to my mom. I just went to her crying.  
When I was about 6, my entire family was helping to build my grandparents a new house. I was helping my dad move some really long 2x4s from the lumber pile when a mouse ran out from under the board I had moved (out in the middle of the woods, mice were no big deal to any of us.) I did a double take though because THE MOUSE WAS FREAKING BLUE. I don't mean the sun reflected off its fur and it had a blue sheen to it, I mean a brilliant, royal blue. He was running fast but I got my dad to notice it too and he agreed that the mouse *really was royal freaking blue*. We've told multiple people, my mom included, and no one believes us. But we know what we saw.  
I once saw a man in an Abraham Lincoln costume complete with top hat running for what seemed like his life along the street. I slowed down and when he turned to look at me he was missing an eye. I drove off and of course no one believes me. 
My bathroom had a towel holder thing, which was a fastened bar parallel to the wall. It had started coming out of one of the holders and one day I accidentally pulled too hard on it. It came flying off and landed in a clatter, but I couldn't find it.  Mind you, this was a small bathroom, maybe fifteen feet by six feet in area and the counter and cabinets are seamlessly fastened to the wall. I checked in the bath, behind the toilet, under the towers -- nowhere.  To this day, I have no idea what the fuck happened to it. 
I slipped on icy stairs last winter and swear I saw my own butt crack as I fell. No one believes me. 
When I was at my family's cabin when I was like, 10, and It was the middle of the night, but me and some of my friends were just dicking around outside. Then, I swear we saw a blue flame on the water. Not just a light, it was actually fire. 
My friend and I were watching basketball in the early days that Charles Barkley was a panelist. He was apologizing for calling a team "midgets" and saying that he now knew it was offensive. But as they were going to commercial, we both heard him say over a hot mic "Besides, they shouldn't hate me, they should hate God."  My friend and I were amazed, and convinced he would be fired. But not only did we never hear about it again, the clip doesn't even exist online anywhere. It's as though we had a double delusion.  
A fat squirrel in a tree threw a piece of fried chicken at me.  
When I was 5 I woke up from my sleep and saw a man sitting on the stairs watching me. I wasn't scared though. There was something tranquil about it. I just watched him and he watched me for what seemed like 10 minutes. Then all of a sudden he was gone. A few days later I found out my dad was killed in Europe. I live in Canada and my parents were seperated. There's pictures of me with him when I was just born but he left shortly after that.  To this day, that is the only memory that I have of my dad. A ghost watching over me.  I don't believe in ghosts but I know what I saw. I've never told anyone before except my mom.  
A monkey jumping from car to car on a busy street. I could probably draw a sketch of it even though this happened about 5 years ago. Definitely one of the most odd things I saw. Unfortunately everyone thinks I am telling a bad joke when I explain what I saw, or they just nod it off and continue not giving a fuck. 
One time when I was really young, maybe like 10 years old, I came home after school and was making myself a salami sandwich.  I pulled the bag of salami out and took out two slices. I smacked the two slices together, and suddenly they became one. I tried my hardest to separate them, but there was no seam or anything that I could split them up with. I even showed it to my mom but not a single person believed me when I told them. I had fused two pieces of salami together. 
I'm in line at a cafeteria.  The guy in front of me is holding a pudding cup.  Someone walking by stumbles and falls into pudding cup guy, knocking his pudding cup out of his hand.  While everyone is looking at stumbling guy, the pudding cup goes a good two feet straight up in the air.  Pudding cup guy is totally focused and at the last second turns and catches the pudding cup behind his back.  He looks at me, smiles and that was that.  No one else saw it. 
When I was about twelve, I was riding in the backseat of the family car. I looked over and the car next to me had three people sitting in the front (this was in the 1980s) and it was a man, woman and man. In that order. At the stop light, the woman leaned down and the two men leaned in and started making out.  This was the first time I had seen anything like this. I was so dumbfounded, I couldn't even tell my family.   
I saw a bunch of crows, around 20+, gather around in a circle. I was like wtf and took a closer look to see 3 other crows in the middle of the circle, all on their backs. And some crows from the circle would hop in and try to peck at the 3 crows, while they cawed and tried to defend themselves with their feet. I know crows are smart and all but didn't expect this level of social behavior. It went on for a while before a kid ran in and scattered them all.  
While I was playing poker with a few friends, I was dealing and somehow managed to deal a royal flush on the board, giving every person a royal flush. This was well into our game and the cards were definitely well shuffled, and don't forget I'd also placed the burn cards down. The odds of this are so astronomical that, apart from the friends I was playing with, no one would believe it happened and would assume I'm just a liar.  
Years ago, when my mom was pregnant with me she saw a monkey in the tree outside her house. She went to tell everyone but no one believed her, "Sure, pregnant lady."  But sure enough the news that night had a story about Zoo break out. 
I was at the airport and saw a businessman with a carry on wheely bag get off the escalator.   He turned the corner, broke into a sprint carrying the bag by it's small strap handle on top.   He swung the bag forward and let go of the strap handle. While it was in mid-air he grabbed the currently unextended extending handle, pressed the button and on the back swing extended the handle and landed it on its wheels and continued sprinting, all without breaking stride. 
When I was 5 I liked to mix various liquids... playing chemistry, I guess.  My grandma let me play with all her bathroom stuff.  I mixed her shampoos and creams and cleaning products, etc.  (I just realize now this might have been dangerous if I had mixed ammonia and bleach, for example). I swear I created a white liquid that produced a single black bubble that would come to the surface and pop at a regular interval.  No one believes me, or maybe no one cares.  I guess it's not that cool.  
It was like a moth or something that looked like it, was a good couple of feet long. It was dark ish, on a main road, saw a few normal moths fly past me and as I turned my head watching them fly past I swear I saw this giant goddamn moth sat in the road; it was in the darkness between some street lights and looks like it sort of flew off further into the dark.  Was a pretty bizarre experience tbh, not even like I was drunk or high or anything.  I'm wondering if I saw the *Moth*ership  Update: So by the replies I've received, it was either mothman, a rare/unusual 'giant moth' type that got suuuper lost, an owl or bat, or an actual honest to god borderline cryptid *Giant Moth*  Good to know that others have had similar experiences though! I'm not totally crazy after all 
I saw my neighbor walking down the road in a red party dress around 3am.  I wasn't fucked up or on anything.  He denies it and the rest of the neighborhood thinks I'm making it up.  I saw you Tim.  You and I both know. 
I was at my mom's side when she passed away.  I swear, seconds before she departed, I heard her and my grandmother (who had died in the 80s) behind me.  Mom said "I really look awful," and Grandma said "It's time to go."  I turned around but the sun was coming in through the window so a little bright.  It was at that very moment that mom passed away. 
I don't believe in Alien invaders. I'm sure there's life on other planets, seems ridiculous that we'd be completely alone, but I'd imagine you couldn't keep a visit from interplanetary species a secret.  That said, I swear to god I saw a tall thin, long armed, long legged thing walk from one wheat field across the road, in front of my car and over into the other. I thought my eyes were just playing tricks on me so I didn't say anything for a second but the. My friend in the seat next to me said '...wait... did you see something just now?.'  No idea what it was but I saw.... something. 
My memory of watching the Challenger explode is super vivid. I was in 5th grade, our teacher had been following the story for weeks. She had even applied to be chosen as the teacher on board. I remember they brought all the students down into the cafeteria and set up the tv for us to watch. And as it exploded, and the announcer fumbles around trying to figure out what to say, I look back to my teacher's face, and she is just stricken with shock. She has tears in her eyes, and at that moment I realized what happened. And that it could've been her on that shuttle.   Supposedly this memory could never have happened bc supposedly they didn't broadcast it live. But I would swear upon anything that it was and I experienced it just as I said here.  
A man dressed as a confederate soldier walking down my street as I was heading home from work. There was a school bus coming and he stopped on the other side of the road, as if to let the bus pass before crossing, and I stopped at the stop sign. We looked at each other, the bus passed, and then he was gone.  
While having a picnic at dusk by an airfield in San Antonio in 96 or 97, my girlfriend and I saw a space shuttle land and quickly get taken away with out anyone else around.   I was thinking the air traffic was pretty light and was bummed because normally there were a lot of of big air force transports that would land there, but this particular evening there was nada.   And then I saw something coming in very fast and very steep. I could tell it was a shuttle before it touched down.   It was an unidentified space craft... literally... it had no markings that I recall. It was met by one of those tow truck rigs and was taken immediately to a hanger. The doors were promptly closed.  No press. No nothing.   It wasn't until later I read about the CIA blue space program.  
Once when I was a teenager I was watching a movie by myself. The tv room then had two chairs separated by a couch. I was on the chair to the right, and at one point I laughed really hard at the movie. I heard someone else laugh and saw what seemed to be a girl my age double over in laughter in the other chair. The weird thing is it didn't startle me; it just felt nice to share laughter. Then I realized that I was alone in the whole house and the chair was empty. So I turned off the tv and went outside lol.  
When I was in the US Navy in the midish 2000's, I was in the Western Pacific doing a tour on the USS Kitty Hawk. I was on night shift at the time and it was about 2am and there was a storm way off on the horizon lighting up the skyline something fierce to the portside. I swear to this day that i saw something that had to be about the size of a large skyscraper breaking the water, silhouetted against the horizon.   I've heard stories from people that have seen similar things. Only people that have seen similar things have ever come close to believing me. I don't blame anyone for not believing me. It's haunted me for over a decade. And I'll probably never know what it was. I just know there's creepy fucking shit out there.  
Once woke up in the middle of the night to an "earthquake"  not uncommon where I live,  nothing huge but big enough.  I'm sitting there riding it out watching my cat freak out on my bed when I realized it wasn't stopping and getting more violent. Then I noticed only my bed was shaking the rest of my room wasn't. I remember doing everything I could to check if this was just a vivid dream or something like pinching myself and checking my phone and it all checked out.  Once things stopped I didn't wanna get off for fear something was gonna reach out from under my bed and eat me at this point so I waited for my cat ( my one and only witness) to go first before I sprinted to my parents room.   Still can't convince myself something logical happened, if I wasn't so calm at the beginning/ my cat wasn't there also freaking out i would have guessed I just hallucinated the whole thing and continued on with my life.  
I was watching a football game a couple of years ago, and in one of the shots where they panned over the crowd I saw a girl look straight at the camera and mouth my name. Scared the shit out of me, but when I rewinded it the seat was actually fucking empty. Maybe I just need to find someone to fill that seat. 
I was riding in the back seat of a friend's car one night. I looked over to the side of the road and saw a dog. It's body looked something like an English bulldog. As we got closer, I could see that it had a human face. That freaked me out a little bit.  
After my grandmother died, she left her rocking chair that she had rocked me to sleep in as a little boy. I kept it in my bedroom as a reminder of her.  Not long after she passed, I would wake up and see her quietly sitting in the rocker, smiling. We'd have a conversation, just as we did when she was alive.  This recurred regularly, night after night, with all sorts of discussions - until one night, when she "disappeared" from the rocking chair right before my eyes, never to return.  I can't prove any of it, of course. But *if* those nightly visitations were all dreams, they were hands down the most vivid series ever. The sad part is that after she stopped "appearing," that rocker seemed very empty - and I realized how much I missed her. 
One night I was sleeping at my grandparents place. I woke up around 3am needing to pee. I raised my head slightly and looked at the base of the mattress I was lying on and saw a gown just floating there near the wall at the height it would be if a person was wearing it. I froze for a couple of seconds before quickly rushing to get my phone to shine the light on it. By the time I did there was nothing there. Safe to say I was scared out of my mind when I finally worked up the courage to get up to pee.  
Growing up, we had a door in the lounge with that glass in that distorts whatever is behind it. This looked into the hallway where the stairs were.   My family and cat were in the lounge, leaving the rest of the house empty, but we all saw someone walk down the stairs, but no noise. (We had no carpet on the stairs, just wooden steps and they were creaky as hell).   So weird.  
When my Grandfather died (god bless his soul) my 12 year old self was quite upset.  I asked my dad for two dimes, I know it's odd. I put one in his breast coat pocket and held one myself. Years later my whole family has been finding dimes everywhere in random spots. They attributed this to "Grandpa looking over us" kind of turned into a thing. On that token, my dad forgot about the double dime I requested at gramps funeral, I brought up what happened at family dinner recently and they think I made it up. I hope they have reddit.  
Snoop Dogg on Chatroulette. It was only for a second but I'm convinced it was him. 
I remember hearing that dying animals sometimes go to places they never normally went before before they died. 
He probably realized what it was and didn't want to get taken to crow court. 
Your dog was probably thinking "hmm... I didn't think I'd get this far" 
Something similar happened to me. I was 5-6 and was playing outside with other kids. All of a sudden, those two cars stop by a sidewalk, they grab a girl on a tricycle and speed off. Only her bike was left. We ran to my mom to tell her someone got kidnapped. She was cooking, somewhat listened, nodded her head, smiled, "Oh, really?" and that was it. I think about it often.  
could have been the colour of your shirt as well.  i work at an aquarium, and as someone who wears the uniform, animals get thrilled at the sight of me often, just because of my shirt colour. 
Ball lightning lasts that long? I always assumed it just kinda came down from the sky and burst.  
Are you sure it was a chameleon? They don't really hop/jump. And they don't have sticky hands so it wouldn't have been able to climb around in a plastic tank  
Our house was struck by lightening one night and my mom says she saw a hovering ball of lightning. Apparently it's something that can happen. 
You probably touched a Brugmansia. They are loaded with scopolamine and can cause you to see things that are not there. Inverse colors are a common hallucination from them. Brugmansia are a very common garden flower, despite their effects, because only small children will be effected by contact alone. Did you have big orange flowers that hang downwards in your garden? 
You should have caught him. They evolve into Radicate when they level up. 
My dad used to work in construction and built a lot of stuff around our house. He used this thing to mark long lines, it was like a tape measure made of string, covered in blue chalk. Bright, royal blue chalk. Maybe the mouse got into something like that? (Might have been why it was hauling ass too, it fell into that and got trapped or stuck, yall moved a board and it ran?) 
Wait what do you mean exactly? Like you fell in such a way that your pants slipped down and your back twisted over? Or you like, saw a vision of your buttcrack appear before you? 
Kangaroo's do have a tendency to escape from travelling circuses. That's the only real explanation I can gather 
Funny enough, yesterday I was reading a thread about satellite TV. Back in the day, you could pick up the satellite feeds that broadcasters sent to local TV stations. Like, if NBC was covering a basketball game, they'd have a satellite truck set up at the arena beaming up to space. The satellite would then beam that down to Earth, so that your local NBC station could pick it up and transmit it across its broadcast area. It was up to your local station to then put in advertisements during breaks and whatnot.  However, if you had big dish satellite, you could sometimes pick up those raw feeds. Supposedly you'd end up hearing the commentators just BSing, the cameraman aiming at random things, etc. 
I was walking to class and passed by a trashcan with a domed lid. On top was a bottom piece of a bun. As was walking by it, a squirrel came out of the trash can and put a Chick-fil-A chicken on top of the bun, then went back inside the trashcan. I assume it was to get the top bun. I really wish I took a photo of it.  Another instance was a squirrel with a cigarette butt in its mouth. 
My mom used to see her dead sister standing at the end of her bed watching her for years after she killed herself. It was always peaceful and tranquil, she says. She liked seeing her. But then one night it just didn't feel right. My mom got scared and shouted for her to go away.   She never came back after that.  
How did they rule it as a drowning if they didn't find a body?  
I read this as cows at first and was seriously impressed. 
crow fight club?  1st rule of crow fight club = caw caw motherfucker 
Going by the way it was moving I'd say experimental air craft or teenage aliens doing their version of donuts around the locals. 
Investigate this! Surely theres a science subreddit who can explain?  
What the fuck Steve? You said you wouldn't tell... 
Well according to wikipedia one of the only two places they were naturally reintroduced was Zion national park, so I believe you.   
Some skinny, tall farmers feelings are hurt by this. *I'm not an alien guys!* 
All the atoms lined up perfectly and fell into the floor 
Is your ashtray by any chance actually a guitar pick? 
Did you recheck the top of your cupboard? I bet it's there and maybe you dreamed or hallucinated dropping it. It's worth a shot. 
Just a heads up... if no one in your house smokes, putting an ashtray full of ash in your kitchen is the worst idea ever.  the non smokers 100% smell that.  Hate to break it to you, but you smoking is no secret in that house. 
Holy fuck for some reason the start of this triggered a memory of something for me.  Talk about fuckin bug out....  Secret solo smoke sess out front of my house at like 2am in quiet suburban town. Finishing up when over the treeline comes a helicopter flying somewhat lower than you might expect. Being a stoner I of course immediately am like Iiiii better pack this show up n go inside.  Now I like to imagine if I were w someone theyd have been like what dont be so paranoid, but sure fuckin enough as it gets closer the fucking search light clicks on and points directly on me. Like full flood light. I didnt know what else to do so I just slowly waved at it. After what seemed like forever the light switched off and it continued overhead and past me. I was left sitting there like wtfffff 
Are you in North Kansas city? Theres a guy in my girlfriends neighborhood that dresses up in a civil war uniform 3 or so times a week and walks his dogs. We finally saw him walk past her house the other day. Very strange, we even Googled to see if there were any reenactments near by but found nothing. He's a doctor of some sort so I suppose he just has a passion or heavy interest in that sort of thing and has the money to make or buy those uniforms. 
That could've been the start to a real touching Rom-com or maybe even a drama, but you fucked it up.   
There's nothing like the laughter of a child.  At 3 am.  When you don't have kids. 
I've had similar experiences of this too, only with smells. My gran used to wear this cheap perfume that can only be described as old lady perfume. She was the only person I knew who wore it.                     I have moved house a lot since her passing, but every time we get moved in and semi-settled the smell of that perfume comes drifting through the house, my partner also smells it but he never knew my gran. I like to think she's just checking the place out and tutting to herself. 
This one I can imagine is legit. Just not real. I used to get very real hallucinations right as I was waking up. 99.9% of the time it was seeing a spider or spiders climb up a wall or across the ceiling. Like, huge spiders. Sometimes bigger than could ever exist in nature. I used to go literally flying out of the bed, scared outta my mind (huge arachnophobe). But then one day I stared at one, too afraid to move, and it slowly faded away as it crawled. Still happens once in a while now- I just ignore it until it goes away. Anyway, it seems very similar to what you described. 
My cat went to our neighbour's flowerbed. He was a roamer, so I can imagine that he'd been there before, but I remember him hiding under our rhubarb plant and meowing sadly a few hours before that. Poor baby. 
I will defend any dog in crow court, I'm very educated in _bird law_ 
I once wore a maroon shirt to a zoo whose uniforms were maroon. I attracted the animals everywhere I went. This is probably the right answer. 
I just googled it and you're right, not a chameleon. I think it was an Anole.  
Yeah, its called ball lightning. It can pass through windows, and is SCARY SHIT. 
And it was a Shiny, too! What a missed opportunity. 
That's a chalk line. Sounds better than someone catching him and spray painting him which is what I first thought.  
Sounds like a skinwalker. People see them here in northern AZ. Never seen one but I think one came by my grandmas house one night when were spending the summer with her. Dogs went crazy outside and then all of a sudden went quiet. Then the smell of rotting flesh came in through the open windows. Me and my older brother were playing video games and were the only ones awake. Just remember my brother jump up, turn off all the lights, TV and GameCube and drag me to the bed and told me to be quiet and not move. Like he knew what was happening. Scariest experience of my life.  
I have a cousin who lives in Kentucky that has a petting zoo.  She has a kangaroo, an alpaca, a camel, and various other animals you'd not normally see in Kentucky.  She's brought the kangaroo with her to family reunions a couple of times. 
I think this is still possible occasionally? I remember last year when WWE broadcast from the UK someone picked up the raw feed and streamed it live online and you could sometimes hear the commentators during commercial breaks. It's fun to watch.  
The real question here is who threw away a whole Chik-fil-A sandwich? 
Join the club. We've had a cougar in our backyard on several occasions and it has been seen around the other houses outside of town. People have pictures of the tracks but the DNR constantly says it's "just a big coyote". There have been a handful of farm animals mauled in the area.   This is in central Wisconsin so it's not unlikely that it's actually a cougar.  
He was fishing with mates. They saw him go overboard.  
There's also lots of small, barely-regulated zoos in Appalachia. It's far from certain that they'd report something like that. 
As long as it's preceded by 7 What's New Pussycats 
They will need the year this happened to research known substances available at the time, possibly any name brands and any measurements OP might recall. 
There's a *LOT* more to the story of that day, this is just a quick summary of the last minute or so.  It was very very very surreal.  I have no idea if my brain was forcing me to see things a certain way or if it was very supernatural.   
LOL, and of course it's the guitar pick you juuuuuuuuuuuust bought. 
Yes. Also the kitchen was recently redone and it still never turned up.  
I wasn't walking about 2 blocks from my house to 711 one night when a very low helicopter shone its light on me like that. A voice over the loudspeaker told me to get back inside immediately. I guess they were looking for someone dangerous.  
More like a horror. OP wouldn't be living to tell this story if he decided to fuck with whatever freaky ghost bitch decided to join him. He did the right thing.  
HOW DO YOU NOT SPEAK OF IT?!   Seriously, so often people experience something strange  and then say they never spoke of it again. If that was me I would still be talking about it to this day trying to figure out what happened. I mean how can you never mention the time an exact copy of you was mistaken to be you by your own parents and then vanished into thin air while nobody was looking?  
Holy crap thats some Ametyville Horror stuff!  Please tell us more!  Did the haunting stop eventually? 
LPT: when going to the zoo, where the same color shirt as the staff uniforms 
Ball lighting chasing some teenagers through some woods could make a good low budget movie. 
Well, I think you just discouraged a lot people from experimenting with it. 
I too have seen a coyote man. I was driving in my home town, which is a tiny little farm town, with my best friend. We were driving through a stretch of road that we call "the tunnel of trees" because the trees close above the road and it is very dark. At the end of the tunnel on the corner of a dirt road stood a humanoid creature on its hind legs. It had a coyote type face and it's front legs were bent in front of it very unnaturally. We both saw it and could describe it perfectly. We didn't talk about it for years. I've seen a lot of other coyote related terrors near my home.  
Did you ever ask him if he actually know what was happening? Or was it just in case it was your granma coming to tell you guys to go to bed?  
I think it just depends on whether the feed is scrambled. Most of it is these days :( 
I did that once. It was a stressful day and I just wanted to enjoy a spicy Chicken sandwich. The bag broke which ruined the fries I was really looking forward to so I was already pretty upset. Then the first bite into the sandwich was that weird chewy feeling where maybe there's a tendon or something* that your teeth can't bite through and it grossed me out so I quit and gave up on the treat I bought myself.   Just wanted to vent about that 
From northwestern Iowa. We get a cougar every couple years wandering through neighborhoods. Last one they killed in front of a school bus.  
I looked over and watched a guy rub his girlfriends back while she threw up all over one time 
At the end of the day, you win some, I win some.  I think I've made myself perfectly redundant. 
Holy crap that's actually pretty scary. I wonder what he did?  
Started watching that because I was curious about crow combat. I can't say that I know a lot about bird "fighting styles," but in-species fighting is so different. I was expecting a lot of foot-biting, and some eye-pecking, but not at all for one to hold the "sentenced" bird down by the neck and bite it. Or for an attacker to use their feet to hold the other's feet down.  Regardless, I couldn't make it through the video. Little too intense for me. I need to go hold my parrot. 
Where do you guys live? I want to make sure I never go there. 
Do we really have to assume that all ghosts are murdering assholes? Why cant they just be chilling watching game of thrones with us once in a while. 
I know right? Not even to try to figure it out or anything, just to have a cool story to tell. I wish I had weird/cool life events like that to tell others. My go-to "interesting story" I tell others is about the time I tripped while running down the stairs and sprained my ankle for a week. I would trade my sprained ankle story for freaky doppelganger story in a heartbeat.  
My mom always tells me that when I was born she thought I was abducted by aliens. 
Maybe he went overboard, got amnesia from the lack of oxygen and forgot who he was, and then hitch hiked or died out of sight.  
I'm so sorry for your loss. That was really beautiful. 
Or faked his own death and took on a new identity to start a new life? 
Thanks, very much appreciated.  11 years goes by quickly, and while I miss her as much today as that day, it does turn into the "new" normal and you stop hating the world.  Hopefully some random redditer runs across the story when they've got a lot of grief and it brings them some comfort too. 
I'd wish that for the next week, the days are 25 hours long so I can procrastinate just a little bit longer. 
To instantly become bilingual, but only in a fictional language,  like Dothraki or the black speech of Mordor.  
He could clean my house, he could do a kind of shitty job too.  
I get to trade in my car any time I want at no cost to me.  But I can only ever get a 1986 Datsun. 
That my fingernails and toenails will stop growing and stay at the appropriate length forever. 
I would wish that every time someone around me said they lost something, I would instantly find it but I'd have to keep it for myself.  It would be nice because I'd get all this new stuff but shitty because I could never use the new things around anyone since they would probably think I stole it.  
Can I get the ass and back hair to move back up to the top of my head where it used to be? 
I can toast bread with my mind, but only a whole loaf at a time.   I saw that somewhere once years ago and it still makes me laugh.  
The ability to throw my farts like a ventriloquist.   
Be able to leave the house without forgetting something, especially that one specific thing you needed for work that you realize you forgot halfway to the office and have to decide to either go without or turn back and end up being late! 
You know when you're trying to put a fitted sheet on your mattress, but you can't seem to get one side to stay down and you think to yourself, "Man, if only I had someone here that could hold down one side of this fitted sheet while I'm putting it on my mattress?"  I'd ask for a blowjob. 
$500, won't make shit of a difference but I'll have $500.  
I want to increase my likelihood of finding spare change on the ground by 500% 
My wish; if I get drunk with someone who speaks a different first language, then for the duration of said drunkeness, I get the ability to speak that language as well as they can. My English skills also change to match my drinking colleague's.  Basically, it would be useless for a job or anything like that, but it would lead to fun. 
Every time I toss something at a garbage can from this day forward it goes in. Every fucking time.   No look toss? In.   Behind the back toss? In.   From across the room? You know it's in.  
$1000 in loose change.  Significantly more shitty than $1000 in cash or check form because I'll either have to roll it or pay the Coinstar fee, not enough money to alter the course of my life, but would definitely moderately improve my life in the immediate short term.  I would probably spend most of it on food, or forget to take it to the bank and let it sit around collecting dust. 
For the rest of my life, I never pull into a gas station on the wrong side. On my car, I know it's on the right. But sometimes I'm listening to the radio, or thinking about something, or just being fucking old and I pull into the wrong side. And I know on rentals or a buddy's car there's always an arrow on the gauge, but still, sometimes I'm jetlagged or distracted or shit and I pull into the wrong side.   I would like the shitty genie to grant me always pulling into the correct side at the petrol stop.  
I'd ask for my clothes to clean themselves every night, even if I'm sleeping in them.  I'd look like a cartoon character because I'd be wearing the same clothes for the rest of my life. 
I'd ask that every time I take a shit at work the larger stall is available so I can live like a king for 15 minutes out of the day.  
A slightly worse genie and so on until I get the worst genie you could get 
Everytime I sneeze, a random person in a 1 mile radius of me shits their pants. 
I'll wish that he curse those people who pissed me off that whenever they push or press a button, 75% of the time it wouldn't work. 
I'd wish the farmer behind our house would fix the flooding problem. The whole field drains onto our property. The head of the drainage board in our county is best friends with the farmer so nothing will get done so the back part of our property is useless.  
I'd probably just ask for a brand new backyard fence so I don't have to worry about my dogs getting out all the time.   By the way This is a really good question that should've been asked in peak hours because it probably won't get any traction now. 
If I complete the hardest or most time consuming assignment, all my other assignments are automatically completed. 
Not have to cleanup after a wank. Can be a real downer 
Could I get a magic carpet with a top speed of 10 mph 
Give me a million reddit karma. The points mean nothing.  
I would wish that every time someone sneezed it would be too loud and stuff would come out.  
About $8 for a Spicy Deluxe and fries at Chick fil a would be enough to keep me happy for a few hours... 
I wish for my cell phone to always be at 60% battery life.  
I'd like to not go to a stupid meeting I have to go to tomorrow. 
Oh man I'd kill for an extra hour of ~~sleep~~ watching old tv show reruns and playing with my phone. 
It's not even one of the Tolkien languages people have heard of, so you get a useless L2 and a bunch of Tolkien nerds stalking you because you're the world expert on Avarin. 
He'd clean the entire house thoroughly, then take all of the trash, dust, and misplaced items he's collected and toss them all into one important room. It would probably be most effective in a bathroom or bedroom.   The genie could also "clean" the house of some things that would bother you if they went missing- batteries, some lightbulbs, a remote, maybe a door. 
I see a loophole here. Buy one of those two dollar toy cars, classify it as 'your car', trade that in for a 1986 Datsun, sell the 1986 Datsun, repeat, profit. 
what if you accidently rip off one of your nails? you're fucked dude.  
"Oh no, I can't find Spot!"  *Arf arf arf*  "Aw fuck..." 
And you would never be able to have friends over or you would look like a total klepto. 
You'll end up with 70 TV remotes, 25 car keys, ass tons of socks and maybe a wallet or two.  You might even find a virginity 
This reminds me of the "shitty super powers" game I used to play with my friends whenever we went to to all-night diner after a closing shift. My favorite one was telekinesis, but only within the context of making soup.  Other winners included: - creating sexual tension - always knowing how old a person is - being able to turn on lights with your mind, but not off again  
Imagine going into stores with this power and toasting every loaf of bread so when people open the package they're all "????? toast??"  E: thank you for the gold, kind redditor! 
I did this today... I work in a oil refinery and they WILL NOT lemme in without my badge... And I forgot it... Had to drive 45 minutes home to get it and then 45 back... Lost $50.... :( 
$500 is a life changing amount of money for me right now.  
Take powdered Metamucil every day. Use to only think it was something old ppl drank until my buddy got me on it. Takes 2-3 days to kick in. Have had only no wipers (wipe once of course for confirmation) for about 2 years now. Best LPT I have ever learned to date. Orange flavor is excellent. 
"I'm sorry, but this is beyond the power of the genie of Old Milwaukee." 
I wish that, even if it were just for a day, my dog could converse with me as a normal intelligent human.  Not only would I explain what you did, but also what thunder was and that it wasn't going to hurt him.   Then I'd try to get a system of nonverbal communication worked out for various situations, as well as ask him what he dreamed about and what his favorite dog food was. 
I used to fantasise about having the power to know where every bit of dropped currency was in whatever city I was currently in. I would then realise I'd rather just have the power to give myself lots of money without having to walk around for it. 
Could substantially change your life, though.  You could use it to get laid a shitton, especially in tourist heavy areas.  You would speak the first language of every foreign girl in the bar.  That would be life-altering.  In more ways than one. 
What if you're in a room with the door closed and it's outside the room? 
Dump it into the self-checkout at your grocery store, or wherever. It'll take a few months to burn through that much change, but it's free, and using the self-checkout avoids the burning judgement of a minimum wage cashier. 
Bring the jar to your bank and they can count and exchange it without a fee.  
There's not always an arrow, sometimes it's just an icon on the dial.  AND ON MY PARENTS' 05 SUBURBAN, IT'S ON THE WRONG DAMN SIDE.  That is all. 
I had a professor in college who only owned black slacks, brown dress shoes and white button-up shirts (the kind that are formal, but don't have an actual collar, so no ties ever). He owned a lot of each (showed us a picture of his closet), but it was all the same outfit. Great, smart guy but you're right, he was SUPER cartoonish.  
Definitely shitty when you're on a long drive by yourself 
Do brakes count as a button?  I feel like there's a fairly good chance this wish will kill everyone who pissed you off. 
As someone with. Ridiculously heavy flow, you do not want this. I promise. 
It's okay we'll just steal this question, reword it slightly, and ask it tomorrow while we have nothing better to do at work.  
The shitty part is that the genie is the one doing the other assignments. He dropped out of high school and doesn't particularly care, so the grade you get on them hovers just barely above failing. 
You could easily test by doing it in a mirror and seeing if anything bad happens to you 
That sounds fucking fantastic. I bet the sex was angry as hell.  
Was that the couple who tried to raise a kid with Klingon as his first language? 
Who the fuck spilled spot remover on the dog again? 
Well, if op doesn't have theirs anymore, I feel like this could cause almost infinite virgininess. 
Yeah, he misses the smell of ass hair on his head. 
I like "able to breathe underwater but only in soup", "able to be invisible but only if no one could see you or record you anyways", and "able to teethshift - mildly change the shape and color of your teeth within normal human parameters". 
I imagine it like a magician, like Gob from Arrested Development..  "Ma'am, open that bag of bread." "It's toasted." "ARE YOU NOT ENTERTAINED?" 
My work is strictly about passes but they always keep a couple of temp ones spare if you forget...And you're nice to the receptionists. 
$50 bucks right now would make life so much more comfortable. Just enough to eliminate a few small worries. 
Get a bidet. You won't care if it's a clean shit or not. 
still, adds up and is better than a kick in the teeth 
[ ](/fl_excited)I call dibs on the other kind of rimshot. I've always wanted to be able to fart on command.  
Like I said, not worth the effort. It's the mildest inconvenience in my life 
Having been a "minimum wage cashier," gotta say, we're not the ones burning with judgement. 
Most banks aren't accepting loose change any more, only rolled.  They exist, but finding one would be an adventure. 
And when you have a quick sneezing fit in the car on a back country road, that would lead to true discomfort. 
Yeah but occasionally that person is going to be you.  
^started my period last night with PCOS. Sleep with tampon+pad, still have to get up every 2-3 hours to change both unless I want to change my sheets too.  
Holy shit! I did it and then I dropped the toilet paper roll in the toilet!  **I HAVE THE POWER!** 
The dad only spoke Klingon to the kid, the mom spoke English, kid started rejecting dad at about 7, and by 14ish could not speak or really hear Klingon 
This one could actually be useful. Shoot/graze yourself twice in relatively painless or quick-healing areas, and then you've got one-time stray bullet protection forever.  
Shit, mate, I'd take 10 bucks now and be happy I don't have to starve myself for another few days. 
Unless you're always down on your hands and knees picking up loose change, and end up getting kicked in the teeth anyway. 
$2 for a years worth of inconvenience?! Even if that isn't your property it's still your throne. Just poo it! 
Blessing in disguise; If you're ever suspicious of someone watching you, just throw something at the nearest bin and see if it lands or not. 
Can confirm, the people behind you in line are probably much more annoyed by it.   Looking at you, old lady who still uses checks, didn't even bother to write out part of the check ahead of time, and writes as slowly as is humanly fucking possible. 
My credit union has a mechanical change sorter. It gives you a receipt to take to the teller, and that much gets deposited into your account. No fee if you're a member! 
Still better than spending the night crying in a ball of pain on the bathroom floor waiting to puke again. (Me, age 13-23, until I went on birth control.) I would literally rather die than go back to that. 
If someone's selling one on the market every week, it'll drop below 10k pretty quick. 
Every third bullet fired in the world then. You could get extremely lucky and have every one ever fired at you be useless, have it never work at all in a meaningful way, or somewhere in between  
If you have a paypal or something I'll send you 10$ right now. I'm pretty broke but I'm not "10$ will keep me from starving" broke. 
Sugar free haribo and metamucil would have an epic battle over bowel movement consistency, in you. 
A year in which I sit on the loo twice a week at most. I think you're vastly overestimating the size of this inconvenience, I literally picked the smallest flaw in my apartment. That loo seat will still outlive most of our society 
Long ago when I worked at a grocery store, I asked a customer why she chose to use checks. She proceeded to fucking complain to management about me after I finished with her.  Excuse me for trying to understand the benefits of using checks. 
PREACH. I started using the Nuvaring to skip shark week because I had been given heavy narcotics that didn't put a dent in my cramps. Shark week free for nearly seven years. People always say something like "that isn't healthy, you shouldn't do that, blah blah blah," but even if it takes years off my life, I have a QUALITY of life that I wouldn't trade for the world (in terms of lady business, anyway - still a mental health clusterfuck who may have narcolepsy, but at least I'm not crippled for seven days each month).  
With surplus rum, I will be drunk, on turps as I am on bourbon. 
Thanks for the offer, but I wouldn't accept it even if you did.  My mess to get through. 
It reminds me of this joke: What's the difference between Dubai and Abu Dhabi? People in Dubai don't like the Flintstones, but people in Abu Dhabi doooooo   
**EDIT6:** HERE'S A FUCKING MUTANT SWORDFIGHTING A ROBOT. ^^^^/s 
You can make a payment with no money I your account. Checks take 3 days to clear a bank. They can even bounce and then you didn't pay at all but you still have the food and now you're 3 days away. 
Yeah, that's what I mean! Like an exoskeleton made from fingernails. That's fucking disgusting.  
Give us this day our daily Mead and forgive us all tresspasses as we did not see that this was not our own home... 
Teethless they bite, lipless they smile. Eyeless they watch.  The trash misses again. Again and again. You think you sense a slight chortle and whip your head around. Eyes searching furiously into the void. 
it doesn't always work like this anymore. a lot of places process your checks electronically right then and there like a debit card transaction.  
Can confirm. If they run your check through the little machine at the register it was just turned into an electronic transaction like a debit card.  Even if they don't do it right there in front of you it is pretty rare any more to have a few days before your account is debited. 
I was on Jerry Springer. The episode never aired but the entire thing was fake. They even asked me to find friends to complete the storyline of a double love triangle. Coolest part of it all was when they literally asked me if I wanted a fake doctors note or a fake death certificate made out in a fake family members name in order to get me out of work. They literally had a guy on staff whos only job was to get people out of work so they could attend filming. 
I was on set for a filming go Ghost Hunters in Buffalo. On the show, they are "investigating" an upper level of the Buffalo Central Terminal when they hear a "disembodied" voice say "Get out!"  It was the property manager on a lower level yelling at some homeless people to clear out. Everyone knew it was him, but it somehow made it in the show as an "unexplained" event. 
While at a bar in NYC, someone approached my dad and his buddy asking if they wanted to be on a gourmet cooking show. Naturally, they agreed and asked if I (14 y/o at the time) could join. The promoter said of course, gave them the location, and told them to tell me not to eat a big lunch as this would be a large multi-course meal at an upscale restaurant.   I skipped lunch that day after a rough lunchtime soccer match, and left school early to meet my father and his friend. We arrived in a strange part of Manhattan -- near the Hudson, in a rather dead part of the city. We got a call from the producer saying "sorry man! Wrong location! We're sending a car to pick you up immediately".   We hopped into a taxi and... BOOM, "you're on cash cab!" the bald headed host declared as lights flashed above our heads.   So: we lost, got kicked out in Chelsea, and ended up spending our own money on food and a taxi home.   Very upsetting :( 
I was on "this morning" when I was about 7 and they did a big makeover for me and my siblings. The premise they created was that we were a nightmare and my poor mum  just  wanted  us to look smart for an upcoming christening. The main part I remember was them telling us to jump in the mud and shout no when our mum asked us to stop. Normally we wouldn't have dared so I remember that being fun! Oh and my sister ruined her hair three times before going on stage so they made us hold her hands so she couldn't touch it.  
In Holland there was a Dutch version of pimp my ride, a player of a football team we played against had his car ''pimped'' the car didnt even make it home, he had to call the car repair service on his way back from the studio... 
My cousin was involved in filming for the bachelor (not a contestant) and said they film many scenes in several different ways.   For example they might film them cuddling while walking and then walking while looking annoyed and so on.   Not that fake but yeah...  
My mate was on "tattoo fixers" if you don't know what it is, basically they get people in with tattoos they regret and make a design they don't tell them about, tattoo it on and cover the old one up and "surprise" them at the end. He filmed the "big surprise reveal" like 5 times because he wasn't surprised enough.  
My sister's friend's family was on House Hunters several years ago, and everything about it was staged. They had already decided on the house before the show even started filming, and other other two "options" that the couple was "considering" were found afterwards. They filmed a bunch of fake conversations between the family members to make it seem like they were still making up their minds. The thing is, this was a Latino family, and every member struggled heavily with English. The conversation scenes were obviously forced, as these people were just stumbling their way through scripted English sentences and it was obvious that they would have been having the conversation in Spanish if they were on their own. The issue was so bad that I'm surprised they even aired the episode.  
I have several friends that were on the first season of Moonshiner (discovery channel). It is totally fake. I mean, they do make moonshine, but what you see on the show is not what it's like in real life. Most of them are licensed to sell alcohol, and do sell it locally at the package stores, the others only make a little to have for themselves and a few friends (more to keep up a family tradition than anything else). But the producers had them set up stills in the woods, and even told them what to wear to make it look more "back woods, redneck, good ol'boys" than anybody in this area has looked in 50 years. Most of us sat there , with the guys that were being filmed, watching the episodes and laughing at all the people that probably think this stuff is real, while drinking store bought beer. The hard stuff is only for rare occasions*, it'll rot your gut if you drink it all the time.   *Rare occasions = Saturday nights 
When my wife and I were looking to buy a home in Michigan, our agent told us we had the opportunity to be on House Hunters if we wanted to. We talked to some person from the show, and they told us the basic process: we'd buy whatever home we wanted, then they would film us there before we moved in, as though we were just looking at the place as well as looking at two other "prospective" places that they had selected. Then we'd ultimately "choose" the house we'd already bought and live happily ever after.   We watched a few episode (or I did, my wife already liked the show) and I convinced my wife of how stupid they would likely make us look, so we passed.  
I was on a European version of "Survivor" where we went to an island and had to survive for 2 weeks. Whatever was seen on camera was what actually happening.   The only fake thing is that we got some food to maintain a somewhat healthy diet. 
My younger brother was a side character on a show about a family that raised a rare breed of pigs, since he was friends with the family. It was a lot of bullshit. My brother grew up in town and literally had never worked on a farm before shooting, and was introduced as someone who helped out a lot. They let one of the pigs out on purpose to catch it while being filmed, and the one that "escaped" used a fake name that sounded better. He said most of what happened was done for the cameras, and they had another weird side character the next episode that was a "gun nut". I'm pretty sure the only thing that was real were their names. 
My uncle was on Pawn Stars attempting to sell something. The item wasn't even his. He knew a guy who worked on the show. 
Worked on love it or list it. The reactions at the time of the reveal of the house were meant to be real and they actually sign a contract saying they won't go in the house before renovations are complete. 99% of the work isn't done by the people shown doing the work on tv. It's done by subcontractors. The entire staff works until 1 or 2 am the night before filming to get the house ready. Most of the stuff they put in for design purposes was taken back after the shoot because it wasn't part of the homeowners budget. We got blacklisted from several stores because we would buy thousands of dollars of stuff and take it back after we shot.  
My brother was on Xfactor UK. There are several rounds before the televised rounds, so all those rubbish acts you see on TV have been picked by producers to go through.  I've also been in the audience of The Voice and Xfactor and they make you do loads of fake cheering, dancing and clapping before the show starts so they can cut it in to the actual show. 90% of the cheering you see/hear on the televised shows have been added in post production. 
I was on a TV show in the UK called 'Bargain Hunt'. I went on it for a bit of a drunken dare and never expected to get past the online application form but after a phone interview and a 'Bargain Hunt' try out day we got on (we as in me and my workmate - I asked workmate as he was going through a crappy time). It was shot over 2 days, day one we had 1 hour to choose the 3 antiques to sell and day 2 was the auction day (where we sell chosen items). The only 'fake bit' about it was that we had an hour to choose our 3 items, but we actually spread this over 5 hours as we had to film, get sound right, get lighting right etc... and as the TV crew are sorting out lighting and stuff me and friend would keep on looking around the antique house for other objects to buy. 
A guy did an AMA about being on Pimp My Ride. Everything done to the car was cosmetic. I believe his car didn't run before the show and didn't run after. Basically, a polished turd.  
I had a cousin on the new Chris Hansen. I wish that was fake, it's not :/ 
Never been to the Pawn Stars store but one of my customers told be about going there.  This must have been 4 years ago, they said they had to wait in line to go into the store, and they all pitched in $100 to have Chumlee come out from the back room. 
A family aquantience had a house built for their disabled adopted kids from Extreme Home Makeover. I think Ty was a dick, but they were just so grateful to have the house that they didn't dwell on the negative aspects 
Obligatory not me but my cousin: She was on Hell's Kitchen and said that they would film for over 10 hours on a day, then would go to sleep around 11pm only to get woken up at 2am to film again to make them more irritable. The producers would purposely bring up topics to create drama within the chefs. They re-tapped when they answered the door in the beginning a couple times to make them seem "more surprised." They portrayed my cousin as the "classic hot blonde". It was certainly more of a reality TV show then a cooking show... 
Had a friend on an MTV show where one person goes on a date with two different people at the same time and they try and create conflict between the two daters and make them fight for the one person. He said that it took forever to shoot because they were told to "be themselves" but they both absolutely hated the girl and kept making fun of her so there was very little conflict so they finally had to script things in for them to say. My friend "won" the "Real date" with the girl and she did give him her number but he said no thanks and went and got drunk with the other guy where they continued just making jokes about the lady.  
A husband and wife that I know, who that run a historic park in Kansas, had the "Diggers" TV show come to their park and film a show. They said they spent a few hours doing some shots for the TV show, then broke out the rest of the team and did an actual archeological survey. They didn't expect them to find much since the site had been picked over for decades, but they ended up finding quite a lot of artifacts. 
I went into the Pawn Stars shop when I was in Las Vegas. They have a line on the side walk to get in, bouncers at the door, and none of the cast in the store.  The place is pretty much packed all the time, so my guess is that if someone brings an really interesting item in, then employees have them come back in a week and clear out the store for filming. Either that, or none of the items are actually from real customers. 
I had a friend who auditioned for The Voice on the second season I think? He has a beautiful voice but was told his "look" wasn't right for the show. Always thought that was pretty stupid. 
Has anyone been on Impractical Jokers? How 'real' is it? Especially in the later seasons - since theyve become quite popular dont people recognise them on the street while they are doing various challenges?  
I wonder if supernanny is fake? I know kids are good at acting but still... 
Does anyone have an experience on the show Naked and Afraid? Something tells me that show is bs 
My ex was scheduled to appear on Jerry Springer once. His girlfriend at the time was a topless dancer, and their show recruiters went to the club she was dancing at to pick up girls for upcoming episodes.   She agreed to film, and managed to get a deal where my ex would get to appear on the show with her. Behind the scenes negotiations involved coming up with a storyline and light scripting (the plot would be that he was appearing on the show to propose to his stripper girlfriend, and she would reveal that she was actually prostituting herself and would introduce him to her pimp). The show runners loved it and even agreed to provide an engagement ring for the bit.   So he woke up for his morning flight, turned on the TV while he packed, and watched the twin towers fall on live TV. 9/11 blocked his chance at white trash fame.  
My sister was asked to go on jerry springer by a coworker, but she declined. It was the episode where a man was dating a woman who turned out to be transgender. Not sure what my sister's role was supposed to be.  
My favorite is the episode (no idea which of the ghost shows it was) where they hear this wheeze. Most of the show was them freaking out about them. Come to find out it's a really fat cat just chilling on a bed upstairs with a breathing problem. It was pretty funny. 
The first 10-15 minutes of those ghost shows, where they go through the history of the place, can be legitimately interesting though. 
I was a guide at Fort Niagara when Ghost Hunters shot an episode there and claimed to see an apparition out of the window of the bakery in the French Castle. Turns out it's a double pane window and due to the imperfections in the glass it made their own reflection appear distorted as I was able to replicate it the next day. Not that weird things haven't been witnessed there but I've never heard anything I couldn't blame on the old buildings creaking. Although the lead guide is a former science teacher and a major skeptic and he took a photograph that showed those orbs you see a lot in supposed ghost photos. 
It would have been soop awkward if you lost just as he had gotten onto the fdr or west side into stopped traffic. Oh you lost well i cant let you out here or i would be at fault if a real taxi killed you. *sits in silence for the next 20 minutes* 
Wow, that's fucked up lol. That almost feels illegal 
I tried out for Canadian Idol. Reading the contract they made us sign, it literally stated that the producers could override the  fan votes if needed to make sure the person they wanted to win, would win. So yeah.   I still tried out. I was not the next Canadian Idol.  
I heard that because of mounting complaints and a couple lawsuits they had to change the way they conduct the show. Now they have to do a proper job of the make over and show the transformation in 60 minutes. Not sure how true that is though 
"...we already agreed what it would look like after its done."  "I know but at least act more surprised!" 
Did he discuss what it was he wanted with them prior to filming? Because I always thought it was strange they'd make a decision as big as their next tattoo completely on the fly like that. 
Out of all of them it doesn't surprise me one bit to hear that 16 and pregnant is the only one that has enough real ridiculous drama that they don't need to fabricate things. 
My friend was on teenage mom, my country's version of 16 & pregnant. She never tries out clothes in stores, because she had anorexia, and they forced her to do it and filmed when she showed the clothes to her friends. It was her nightmare, parade in front of the crew, when she wouldn't do it in front of anyone. They also told her to have certain conversations with her friends, they asked and asked and asked about her anorexia and then edited it like she hadn't talked about anything else. Told her to talk with her mom about her anorexia, they never talked about that stuff. They promised her boyfriend wouldn't be in the show, he was on almost every episode... It was just a big fuck you from start to finish 
I have no clue how people love his show so much... my gf is obsessed. And I'm like wtf it's so fake it's ridiclious.  
I was born in Henry County, VA and lived there until I was 8, and my sister is 40 and has lived there her whole life. Shining like that actually happens, but not nearly to the scale that it was shown. My sister's ex did have a cold water creek still and made illegal shine (albeit in Patrick County). Now I live in east TN, and everything here is legal.  
The CC prob cooks nothing ever, he prob puts his name on it even though a line cook made it 
Can confirm, Survivor is some real shit.   I had a lecturer who used to be part of the medic team. People got hurt pretty often, although it was usually the crew, since there's a lot more of them. But exhaustion was a big part of the cast's issues.  He also watched a fellow cast member drown, while on an expedition/day off on one of the islands. Those islands can be genuinely dangerous places. 
When the production leaves for the night, do the wives stay at the house alone with the husband? well i know most of the families had kids (if not all), but im just curious.   
Did he just tell the *guy* that he wanted to be on the show so they just gave him a random item the shop already owned? haha Or did he borrow an item from *another* guy he knew? 
I always wondered if they got to keep the furniture and whatnot. Do any of them offer to pay extra to keep it or try to set a budget for them to spend on it off camera?  
I'm just sitting here in this alley smoking Meth and next thing I know this 7 foot tall gorilla of a man and a skinny dude holding a bright camera are yelling at me. I start running and next thing I know the gorilla is on top of me, I'm sweating and bleeding from my forehead. 
My uncle was on Reno 911! and he said the whole thing was fake. 
My friend was one of the rubbish acts. He knew he was awful, the producers knew he was awful. He was only putting on a character for a laugh. He got called back for the novelty "shit act ensemble" at the end of the season.  Also, this is why so many people come out with shit like "I quit work to be here!" and are devastated when they don't go through, the fact that they've got through the untelevised rounds already has gotten their hopes up. 
I've heard this. Apparently you only go through to the actual auditions if you're great or really terrible. And then they add a couple of average people to make it seem more normal.  
A close friend of mine made a trip up there to check out the shop.  They were filming that day.  Friend and his wife were approached and asked if they'd like to play along.  They were handed a comic and told to ask about something specific.  Basically, it was a filler spot so the guys can have a chance to talk about their extensive knowledge.    They ended up not being able to use the footage because my friend is a manager at WDW.  Disney owns Marvel, yadda yadda. 
Why isn't this higher up? I'm not shocked that The Bachelor is totally fake, but I dunno, the alcohol fueled disorientation is pretty interesting. Wow.   So weird.  
With David Dickinson? How much more mahogany is he in real life? 
Even as a viewer, I've reacted to that. They do a lot of stuff that looks good, but they don't do anything to the bits that keeps it running and safe. 
It took me quite a while to realize that they just turn broken cars into glorified "ricers".  I only realized it when I actually learned of that term, I enjoyed the show when I was younger tho. The thought of 2 TVs at the back of the car hooked up to PS2s or XBoxes was amazing to me. 
For interviews if you want to be absolutly sure they cant edit the footage without it not making sense at all, interject random stuff into each sentence that way even the most experienced editor cant mash words together. 
Had a friend of a friend enter this show. The only way I found out was I was watching the show and saw her. She wore baggy camo clothes and cowboy boots like 100% of the time, no matter the occasion. They gave her new clothes and hair style. But about 2 weeks after the episode aired, I saw her with her Camo get-up shopping at Walmart.  
I love What Not To Wear, but I'm surprised they would pick you for wearing punk stuff at a concert. It seems like most of the people on the show aren't people who just have an alternative style, but wear clothes that are really poorly fit/unflattering, outdated and worn out, or especially inappropriate for their lifestyle and job (i.e. a 40 year old attorney wearing clubwear and flip flops to court). 
"This girl is way too boring for tv we can't use her"  "Tell her it's because her clothes looked too good so she doesn't feel bad"  Lol I'm joking but totally off topic I looked through your post history and it turns out we have the same auto immune disorder! Woo!..? 
I've always wondered what they do with the Taco Bell and Wine Coolers after they arrest the perp. Shame to see a Crunchwrap Supreme go to waste.  
My dad volunteered as a carpenter for Extreme Makeover Home Edition awhile back when they came to our area. He had the same story. They would film what they called "camera ready" volunteers for a bit during the day and then a crew would come in and do all the real work. He also said Ty was an absolute asshole who never left his trailor other than to shoot his couple segments and looked like he had never actually swung a hammer in his life. I was really bummed about it because they do such a good job of making him look good on the show.  
The neighbors must have LOOVVEED that going on all night 
Is it allowed in the US to work overnight in a residential district?  Thats not possible in Germany. 
A month ago Reddit told that the show was filmed in a recreated studio, due to laws pertaining to the filming inside pawn shops. Anyone know the truth? 
Never understood the point of this show. Why don't you sell your stuff on Internet?   Or at least when they call someone to evaluate your product and after that they give you shitty deal, why don't you tell them to screw themselves and use what the expert tell you to sell it yourself? 
Extreme Makeover did a home for a family here in town and their property tax and insurance went up so much they ended up having to move out of the house. 
Wait. So on a scale of History Channel being 0 and NatGeo being 10, where is Animal Planet? 
I mean how do you know he didn't learn it from the ferret?  
My favorite thing about Pimp my Ride was the fact that it took months to do up the cars, not a couple weeks like they say. 
One of my highschool friends who is trans ended up doing a Springer show where they did this whole "I'm a man" reveal to their boyfriend. They had never met before. 
My favorite for this is Destination Truth. The host is an archaeologist and part of the Adventurer's Club. He does another show on the travel channel now that's a little less outlandish in what's being investigated, but with both shows they go into pretty nice detail about the areas they're visiting and some of the customs of the local people. 
Haha for realz. To avoid that pitfall, the producer gave us an address that avoided highways  
When you get into the cab, they give you a rundown on the rules, and you'd be free to say "no thanks" and not ride anywhere.  But it seems fun, so I'd do it.  I'd be annoyed at being hungry though.  There's no reason they had to tell to eat less at lunch. 
Not sure if it's true, but I heard they have that clause more in case they need to, but it's not something they actually use.  ie- they find out a contestant is a convicted rapist, they can just vote him off the show without worrying that a convicted rapist will win the grand prize.  
There's a few times (never aired of course) where the person came home and went apeshit that their house had been violated and that everyone had to put it back how it was otherwise lawyers, etc.. 
Wouldn't surprise me. Lord knows if that happened to me, and I was unaware of it beforehand, I'd sue. I like my furniture thank you very much. 
I dont know, the show got aired on ''veronica'' i forgot the name, it was a blue orange car. 
"When I say 'Hello, Mr Thompson' and press down on your foot, you smile and nod." 
It's completely random from what he told me, his tattoo really doesn't suit is personality and it's fading like crazy already, a lot of people say the tattoos they got done weren't done to a very high standard ie. not deep enough in the skin etc  
Are  you saying that all reality shows should have their characters replaced by pregnant 16 year olds?  Survivor just got *way* more interesting 
Yeah "made me watch..." My husband says he hates my shows and yet he always seems to come around when I watch, and asks questions...  
The international version is just interesting  to watch, especially if you are planning to visit or ever think about moving there.    The Australian ones have essentially confirmed I will never retire there due to the stupidly high prices for real estate.    "Bob and George want a three bedroom house near the beach, their budget is $1.6 billion..." 
It seems kinda strange now that I think about it, but I enjoy the tours of the homes and the before/after of the one they got. I skip through most of the reality stuff. 
I was on my phone and couldn't be bothered googling. Took a punt on the auto-correct. Totally wrong.  Better change it before this hits front page and my inbox gets flooded with corrections.  
A restaurant I used to work for catered live celebrity chef events. Several of them were winners of Top Chef or various Food Network cast members (not the big names, but members of the teams that swoop in to help). They would send our owner a signature  recipe in advance, he would show up with one of his chefs and while the Celebrity Chef was making one serving of their dish out on stage to demonstrate the two of them would bust ass and make a few hundred copies to serve to the audience once the demonstration was over.  
"I know a guy who's a specialist in Napoleonic-era French enema kits, lemme give him a call." 
Best episode of cops was  "I'll get you bitch"  or that episode where that lady was so angry at her husband she takes out scissors and starts cutting everything in their house.  Even her hair. 
Not always.  A few people got lucky enough to have some decently impressive engines installed  
They are *really* experts at preventing this kind of thing from happening. I have heard stories of people on big brother where the staff was trying to push them to trash talk on other people and they would ask the most horrid manipulative leading questions and when they tried to refuse, they held up their contract and threatened to sue them for not cooperating. 
Haha I actually have a feeling that might have been how it went down. I assume most people put together their worst outfit for the interview but I still had some self respect so I put on something I'd actually wear. I think if I had a pic everyone would agree it looked alright -- just looked like a movie assassin outfit or something.   Woot let our spines fuse together! Ha pun. AS power.  
I've actually thought about how funny it would be if they show the guy getting taken down after he walks out the front door, and then it cuts back to Hansen just unwrapping the happy meal the guy brought with him.  
Adam Carolla actually called him out as being a fake. Asked him questions a real carpenter should know. It didnt go well, Ty is a phony. 
I've heard that Ty Pennington is a dick and a fraud probably a dozen times on Reddit over the past few years and now I hate his stupid mortgage commercials even more. 
Oh yeah. Plus the family was fairly wealthy and totally didn't need to be rescued. Meanwhile my friend's dad's house was still flattened. 
You can, but local noise ordinances apply. Of course you can do whatever you want if no one enforces the laws or you bribe the neighbors.  
To be fair the 30 Mexicans were probably picked up in a Home Depot parking lot and being paid cash. Rules tend to not apply. 
I'm from.CA, Mexicans were the hardest working dudes Iv ever seen. Never complained, even the illegal ones. They would do any job, they just wanted to work. Never even took breaks when they put a new roof on my house, I went out and got them.all lunch they didn't even speak English. Respect for them. 
I went there a couple years ago. There is the pawn shop where you could buy stuff like a normal pawn shop. Apparently, the Pawn "Stars" come out sometimes to interact with people, but not very often.  One of the workers told us there was another shop they did the actual filming at.  
Everybody that appears on Pawn Stars has to apply and have their inventory pre-examined for authenticity.  It's not like random people bring in that kind of stuff. They also pick people with stuff that isn't real, to try to make the show seem authentic. 
Probably about a 2. You sometimes get an actual documentary about animals, but for the most part it's Finding Bigfoot season 23 and Jackson Galaxy Cat Whisperer reruns 
Was it where she was dressed as a hula girl? I didn't see the whole episode just a clip, I have no idea why she was dressed like a hula girl.  
Josh Gates is definitely in my Top 5 People to Have a Beer With list 
Also on the x factor you usually have to have a sob story  
You could make a religion out of Bill Wurtz memes. 
That would be me, but if they smashed my old stuff, lawyers would be inbound regardless. 
I always assumed that, even though it's a surprise to them on-screen, surely they're in on it for this exact reason AND they'll need to grant permission for the team to get into their house? 
Like seriously, who the fuck thinks it's a good idea to redecorate and repaint a person's house without their knowledge or informed consent?  I'd be fuckin pissed too, even if it was a quality job.  
My husband is a tattooer and I've watched the show. Based on the information I have available to me, this is probably the correct answer  
I'm pretty heavily tattooed so I like to think I know a decent tattoo when I see one. I also know plenty of people in the industry. For the most part, the tattooers on Tattoo Fixers are utterly shite. "Sketch" especially. He's a glorified scratcher. The issue genuine tattooers have is the bad name they give the industry. Interestingly enough, one of my tattooers currently working on my second 3/4 sleeve said that one of the knock-on effects of the show that they have noticed in their shop is that they are getting fewer requests for cover-ups, primarily because of the reactions of the "tattooers" on the show. If a client thinks they're going to have a tattooer laugh and take the piss out of them for one bad life choice, then they're unlikely to want to get it out to show anyone. Aside from the actual poor quality of their tattooing, the way they deal with clients is just highly unprofessional. 
Okay so we found exactly what you were looking for, and, it's under budget! "I know, it just doesn't feel right, you know babe? I mean, did you see the backyard? It was so, not us."  
The international ones are always explained simply as "American wants to move to the other side of the world and live in an exact copy of his old American home." Half of the episode is spent highlighting that American guy wants X but 90% of the homes in Y don't have X and American guy is not pleased, but oh my god, look we found one that does have X but it is also located in the middle of an alligator pond and there's no kitchen.   Needless  to say, it's fun to watch.  
Sarah wants to live in an ancient Italian flat, in a charming village. She wants 4 bedrooms, 3 bath, two car garage, full washer and dryer mud room, and a fenced in backyard.  
See I'm kinda more okay with that IF the recipe was made by the CC. I dont think it will be very smart time wise to just have the CC cook for the whole audience 
People used to do enemas for medical reasons a lot. Tobacco enemas were a thing in the past. 
Wasn't there one guy who got a brand new car because his old one was Frankensteind from two or three different cars? 
True, but when they did that, they didn't do all the things needed to run such an engine safely, such as stiffening the chassis, better brakes and so on. 
\*Chris Hansen turns to the crew\* "Hey guys what do you want for lunch? I can message the next perv from the bait account and ask them to bring some fast food." 
You know you've hit rock bottom as a tv personality when you start doing mortgage commercials.  
That's OK, it's probably half made out of cardboard! 
Noise ordinances aren't enforced based on who's making noise. 
We have the same situation in the UK with polish guys. Hardest working people, do such a good job, never complain. And a lot of people regardless still have the same bullshit attitude to them, that they're terrible scrounging immigrants.  
He definitely seems like an awesome guy. I imagine just listening to him talk about his adventures would be fun. 
Where's the reality show for this? I'd rather watch this. 
Yeah, if youre gonna fake anything, fake the reactions. Tell them beforehand, have em sign a waiver, then have him fake surprise 
The people on that show, specifically that Sketch guy, are universally hated by the tattoo scene. He also steals designs from other artists. All sorts of controversy about him and this show.  
When the adverts come on I genuinely have a bad time telling what's the bad tattoo and what's the 'fixed' one 
That's a good point actually I've never thought about it like that, thinking about it though if I really regretted one of mine and went to get it covered up and thought they'd laugh at me I'd be seriously put off  
My husband is a tattooer (we're in Australia fwiw). The first thing he says any time this show is mentioned is what a piece of shit that sketch guy is. He has the privilege of probably being the most internationally despised person in tattooing  
The woman always need a place to "entertain guests" and the man always needs a "man cave." Or it's just "not authentically [insert current county] enough." 
It's the one with no personal items in it. The other two are other people's houses.  
There's always that one person in the couple that seems to complain about every little thing.   "MMMm yeah I dunno bout this caaarpet"  "Mmmnoot feeling this kiiitchen"  "Yeeeah this one doesn't have a ocean viewwww"  
She also wants to live in the middle of the city but also wants it to be quiet and charming. Her budget is $12 and she also has a sack of potatoes.  
That's brilliant. Did they do a few takes for the awkward handshake with Holly Willoughby? It looks like she expected it 
I specifically remember one episode where they had something like sacks of potatoes in the back of their pickup so their shitty brakes would at least get a little bit of braking power (I'm not sure if that even helps or makes it worse tbh) and Pimp My Ride actually gave them a proper set of brakes and made a big deal out of it actually braking now. 
I love the way Ty justified himself "Nevermind", "of course" like he only knew the answers after it was reveled.  That's not how it works buddy  
I got 30s into it before I had to stop... it is sooo brutal. You can hear the disappointment and frustration in Adam's voice. Lol 
Look at mr. fancy walls, using cardboard! I built my home out of toilet paper and used McDonalds straws! 
Noise ordinances are also probably not enforced when all the houses are flattened in the area. 
stereotypes don't help anyone. I worked with poles for years and like any group many were hard working, especially the younger ones. Then I'd go home to my house share with 5 of them, 3 were on benefits and two were incredibly violent alcoholics who I could hear drinking all day and often woke me up belching. They were both women. People are people. 
In said AMA the dude talked about how for example he had a cool TV put into his car for the show and once his episode was over they took it back. It's kinda funny in the end  
Trading Spaces used to air the ones where people were pissed. You should look for the purple house episode. 
God that "man cave" shit has to stop. It's like a virus of cliches invented by a TV show that's spreading to reality. You're not keeping up with the Joneses now unless you have a side room with a 400" tv, a deer head and a beer sign.  
If I got the opportunity to hug Holly Willoughby, I'd insist on at least a few takes.  
I'm surprised they didn't just install a sack of gold plated potatoes. 
Holy crap, how can he not know at least some of these just from exposure? I buy/sell/rent real estate, but I don't swing a hammer outside my own home (liability aside, I'm not... "good"), and while I'm handy I wouldn't consider myself anything near  contractor and I knew all of these (not as well as Adam, but I know the general idea). They're pretty basic questions. And Ty's question "butt joint vs dovetail"... seriously? The answer is in the question.   If he didn't purport to be a contractor/builder I'd give him a pass but what the hell... he has at least been around this stuff for TV how did he not absorb any of it?!?   
Well, it's Death grilling you, I'd be 100% ashamed as well  
I hope this is only "the stuff we did was not actually street legal so we have to take this out so you're allowed to drive your car" and not "well show's over, pack it up boys"... 
That show was terrible.  It was like they were trying to play practical jokes on each other instead of making something nice.  I saw one where they spray painted someones couch.   
I completely agree with you. When we bought our house friends and relatives were commenting that the finished basement was going to be my "man cave". I had to repeatedly tell them: No, it's the media room. It's where anyone in the family can come and watch TV, Movies, it will house most of the toddler's toys, I may setup the area under the stairs as a little club house for the toddler, and it will have theater like seating.  There's no area in the house that is being used exclusively by me.  Not to mention, you would have thought that the giant framed Mickey Mouse Club House drawing would have made them rethink their assessment of the area.  
Could he not have read one fucking carpentry book in 20 years just out of pure curiosity? How do people that care so little become so successful? 
Step 1 - Pretend you are yawning Step 2 - Arm around her shoulders Step 3 - Please let me know, I never have gotten this far  
grab her waist pull her close pick her up Batista bomb her  pin her you are now the wwe champion 
This has gotta be the best derailment on reddit in a while. 
It's hard to distinguish between who's kidding and who can't read  
Just saw another post that OP commented on and you guys followed him to tell him, "Not movies." God I love Reddit. 
OP not realizing that a good make out movie *is* a good make out move. 
You're six comments in, I'd say it's a thread about makeout movies. 
I got really confused reading the comment section until I reread your title. lol   Also, Alien. Not like the movie - what you do is you grab her head, stick your tongue down her throat and put your babies in her. 
Jesus Christ, I can't be the only one who read the question correctly on my first try, and got extremely confused by the rest of the thread. 
In highschool my girlfriend and I would always make out to The Godfather part 2. To this day I still haven't seen the full movie, and can't watch it without getting turned on. 
1. Cut a hole in a box. 2. Put your junk in that box. 3. Make her open the box. And that's the way you do it. 
I'll give you a real comment. Bite their lower lip gently when you go to open your mouths. Also, move your hands all around their body, rub their back, stroke their thigh, grab a handful of hair. Good stuff 
First of all Rat, you never let on how much you like a girl. "Oh, Debbie. Hi." Two, you always call the shots. "Kiss me. You won't regret it." Now three, act like wherever you are, that's the place to be. "Isn't this great?" Four, when ordering food, you find out what she wants, then order for the both of you. It's a classy move. "Now, the lady will have the linguini and white clam sauce, and a Coke with no ice." And five, now this is the most important, Rat. When it comes down to making out, whenever possible, put on side one of Led Zeppelin IV. 
People just love movies man. But I found that killing that awkward silence the moment before by just announcing that you're going in for the kiss works well. Saying it right comes off as confident 
breath in ear and kiss on the lobes. then progress to labia, while watching that eternal sunshine whatever movie with Jim Carey I think.  
my boyfriend does this to me all the time  would recommend 11/10 
I'm baffled by how many people misread the thread title, myself included. 
This is the most unintentionally funny thread I've ever seen.  
I think most of us read "movies" then came to the comments, realized it wasn't, but didn't care enough to switch mental gears. 
Ferris Buhler's day off is the best make out movie everyone likes it for nostalgia but everyone has seen it a bunch of times so you get bored with the movie quickly and move onto fun stuff  
Nothing screams make out more than a woman screaming while being raped. 
Haha OP is trying to get serious advice but has to spend his time clarifying 
When you came, did everything slow down, and in the flickering light from the screen, did you see 12 copies of your girlfriend's face, dodging each rope of jizz,  one by one, in a manner that didn't seem humanly possible?  
Best make out move out there. The sex scenes and the hot, emotional drama turn me on every time. 
TL:DR will wait for the movie version and hope I get lucky. 
Seriously what is up with this mass hallucination, it happened to me too 
With joy and excitement, he posted his thread -   'I wonder what answers they'll give me?' he said.   'Perhaps some advice on the best way to start?   The finest of moves for the amorous art.'  And so, with elation, he waited a while -   He opened his inbox and read with a smile.   Misguided. Mistaken. Misread and misquote.   He frowned with confusion.   '*Not movies*,' he wrote. 
Do you... Uhhh... Do you want us to call someone for you?  
I'm going to sum up my stupidity by saying not only did I see "movies" in the title, but "movies" in everyone's comments and was confused as to what everyone didn't get... 
Every question on askreddit for the next week about movies is going to have "not movies" comments in it. 
How can I tell if she wants me to make our with her? Or even just kiss her?  I was so tempted to kiss my crush earlier, but I didn't know how she'd respond.  
No, the Spider-Man is a makeout move where you kiss upside down. 
Someone please psychologically analyze this and explain why me and a ton of others read movie instead of moves  
Look for unusually long moments of silence where your just kind of staring into each other's eyes, sound cheesy I guess. Also keep an eye out for if she drops her gaze and glances at your lips. 
You could gaze in her eyes for 5 minutes, and still not get the hint. So the sure move is to just put your hand on her in kissing position. You know, side of her face, or on her chin, or on the back of her head/upper neck. She will deny you instantly if she doesn't want it, if she doesn't do anything, then you can spring on her face.  
I don't get why people keep upvoting op for claiming these movies aren't movies 
I like the description. A rope of jizz. Now imagine climbing that rope to the top of Mount Everest. Now imagine it breaking up in mid air because it's not really a rope, but jizz. Now see yourself dodging that jizz like Neo from the Matrix as if your life depended on it. Now imagine you are at home getting a blowjob while watching the movie the Matrix. 
Nothing gets the ladies hotter like screaming at them that you'll be putting your tongue down their throats.  
With my current SO, I literally just asked her "hey, can I kiss you?" We had been hanging out for awhile already, and I had made it clear I was into her relationship wise early on. I have yet to have a miscommunication related incident.   
It's not a good make out movie, though, it's too short 
dude, they're movies, not programs.  get with the picture. 
Someone must have made a move about this already.  
dude, they're not pictures, they're movies. get with the film 
Dude, they're films, not movies. Get with the moving pictures. 
Film, they're programs, not dudes. Get with the movie. 
I got so drunk, that about an hour after the new year I jumped off the balcony, fell to another party and stayed there for a few hours before realising I don't know anyone. 
Had to convince my friend not to jump in the pool because he thought "This water is 2016 water, I gotta jump before it becomes 2017 water!"  It wasn't even a pool party. 
clapping to the beat of a song, a drunk man from holland comes up to me and says I have great, powerful claps and we should clap our hands together in the form of a high five 
ER Nurse.  Guy came in complaining of scrotal pain. Stated he was at home, in his living room, high on coke and quite drunk, sitting on a bicycle when he slipped and caught his marble purse on the sharp pedal. He felt wetness and assuming it was blood wrapped his manhood in TP and ran to the ER. He got back to my room and finally found the courage to check the damage himself. Noticed it was just urine and he had peed his pants. Ran straight back out into the night without another word.  Happy new year central Ohio.  
This lady was much drunker than everyone thought and no one realized until around 12:10am when her husband tried to get her to leave and she grabbed him by the throat and push him down some stairs. He got up, dusted himself off, and calmly walked out the front door. She attempted to sober up in the dining room while someone downloaded uber to her phone so she could get home.  I felt bad for the guy, but secretly I was so happy to see he said F This and bounced completely.  
My friend started belting out the theme tune to an old British kids show called "poddington peas". Then he started crying, and said "when I was a kid there was an episode, about a fucking pea who was too fat to get out of his house - all the other peas tried to help him, but they couldn't get him out - I remember identifying with that pea - that pea was me!" He cheered up once we bought him a kebab 
I ate a 8 piece family bucket of fried chicken and chugged a few beers. While walking home I  vomited in the middle of the sidewalk and basically laid down on top of a bush to recover. Some guy with his lady walked past and when he saw the scene I just heard him say "Jesus Fuck".  
"STOP TELLING ME WHAT TO DO, I HAVE NEVER DIED BEFORE." a  friend who got kicked out of 2 clubs and wanted to keep drinking and partying.  
We asked our friend how drunk he was, he responded, "twice." 
On our way home after the party we got pulled over by a cop for taking too wide of a turn. It was raining pretty hard and our DD wasn't super familiar with the area. This is when the drunk asshole laying across the back seats starts panicking and screaming, saying he knows we are getting pulled over because he wasn't wearing a seatbelt.   Long story short cops don't appreciate it when they can tell someone's freaking out in the back of a car they're walking up to. Luckily he was a cool guy, ended up giving our DD a sobriety check and sending us on our way. We apologized for the actions of drunk people but it was pretty late and the cop just seemed glad we had a sober DD. But I don't recommend reaching out through another persons window to try to grab at a cop, even if you're just trying to get out a drunken apology. 
Was on the beach and this guy couldn't find anywhere to hide his bag so he just tossed it into the ocean and yelled "those fuckers can't steal my beer now!"  
I live in Texas and have a friend who moved here from Scotland a few years ago. Ever since she moved here she consistently has faked an "American" accent to fit in. Last night she got so drunk she forgot about her American accent and started calling everyone dirty sluts in the thickest Scottish accent for an hour or so. 
Went with a friend to his coworkers party. By the time the party was settling down his supervisors girlfriend was all over him and I mean like sitting on his lap, trying to get him to dance, kissing him on his cheek on her way out, etc. Meanwhile his supervisor was right there, kinda drunk, fairly embarrassed. She kept looking over to her boyfriend and saying things like "It's okay if I dance with him right, you don't care right? See he doesn't care." I felt so bad watching the whole thing unravel in front of my very own eyes. 
No Ubers were running late after the party ended so my two buddies caught a ride home with the Domino's delivery guy 
Shook up an open bottle of champagne and sprayed the ceiling, TV, and the host's girlfriend. Party fell apart shortly after. 
Had a small get together with friends, we were all getting stoned and playing the new VR I got for Christmas. One friend is playing and out of no where he starts falling, once he hits the ground he just lays there and says "so this is how it ends." 
I went cheering with the police and firemen just after twelve when they were putting out lit fires. 
A really drunk guy took the giant bowl of noodle salad and started trying to feed everyone with it. He would walk up to people and put a spoon in their mouth, it was pretty hilarious. He also tried selling his scarf because he owed  some guy money so he would just casually ask everyone if they wanted to buy his scarf.  
Drunk buddy tried to shoot a firework holding it in his mouth. He tightened it too hard, the firework never flew and exploded right on top of him. He ended up with the face completely black from the powder and some small burns on his face. Two policemen were next to us when this happend, they told him it was the most stupid things that they had seen this year, and yes we were still in 2016. 
A guy I'd never met named Tony kept asking all the female party goers if they knew what his name was spelled backwards. Then would slur out " y not" my wife thought it was funny and creepy at the same time.  
This one girl dropped a slice of pizza on the floor. She then proceeded to rinse it off in the sink, and then ate it... 
She made SO MANY new bffs. And tried to start an orgy 
I vomited so hard that I've burst/damaged a load of blood vessels in my face. Also the punchbag at the back of my mouth is swollen from the vomit so it feels like I have something stuck in my throat. I think I was probably the drunkest person at our party... 
Coming home from the party last night, we stopped for pizza. The super drunk guy in front of us told us he paid for our pizza. He made a big deal out of it, but then fumbled the machine and almost forgot his card and dropped his pizza box on the floor. We asked the cashier if he had actually paid for our pizza, and she double checked and said "he... didn't even pay for his own pizza." We paid for his pizza.  
He is 17. He tried to kiss my friends drunk Mom. In front of the buzzed dad.  he did it.  
A friend of mine was extremely drunk and saw this guy walking his dog. My friend started petting the dog and when the owner asked him to stop he started petting the man instead.  
After osu lost he was throwing stuff around on the front porch (it was his house). He chucked a big cooler into the air and it bounced at a really weird angle to land perfectly to cover up one of our friends heads. Everyone at the party and a bunch of passerby all collectively cheered 
I yelled merry christmas instead of happy new year :( 
My wife of 7 years around 2am drunkingly told me she loved me. I told her I loved her back and she responded with "you do?" As if I said it for the first time.  It's how she said it that was funny, almost like after all these years she never knew I loved her.  It's one of those you would need to be there for it moments.  
I think I was the drunkest person at the party.  Aaaaaaaaand I kissed my ex. Like a fucking moron. 
Dude asked a girl out for the evening. Kissed her at midnight and told her how happy he was she came out with him. Then extremely drunk him took a different girl -one he had just met- into the hotel bathroom, everyone noticed, and proceeded to do things with her that entirely pissed off first girl. When he came out of the bathroom, his first action was to hit on another girl (me).   Everyone was pissed at drunk dude for the amount of drama he brought to the night. And he wasn't hot, at all, just a douche. 
YOUR CLAPS ARE OF THE HIGHEST CALIBER, FELLOW HUMAN. PERHAPS YOU WOULD LIKE TO ENGAGE IN A COOPERATIVE EXTENSION OF THE ACTIVITY? I AM CAPABLE OF PROVIDING A COMPLETELY NON-SYNTHETIC HAND 
This is vastly under-upvoted how in the hell did he find space enough to do that 
do you live in new orleans bc i'm pretty sure i said that a few times  
I think we have different definitions of the word tipsy 
My very drunk friend made me a mixed drink last night. I asked him how strong he made it, and he shrugged and mumbled "three or four".  
plumber couldn't be assed to use toilet, shits in pot 
That's awesome. I have a couple of Scottish friends. The accent gets stronger the more they drink. I love it.  
Who the hell would want to hide a Scottish accent? She's got her priorities all wrong. 
Someone stole my friends front door, just ripped if off the hinges and ran down the street 
This is the best one, honestly. Dude may have been trashed but he knew what he was about. You gotta respect a guy who stands in a campfire to prove he isn't lying. 
No matter how fireproof the shoes are, wouldn't his feet get unbearably hot after ten minutes over a flame? 
Happened at my brother-in-laws house as well, champagne EVERYWHERE 
"Hey have some noodle salad. Good isn't it? So anyway do you wanna buy a scarf?" 
One night I pretended my name was Tony and it worked for me.   My Korean friend Park didn't have much luck that night. 
You need to expound on this story a bit more than that. 
Yeah you can't just leave it there. At the very least you have to explain how/why a bathtub is so close to the TV, never mind the fire in it. 
I have a friend who does this every time she gets drunk. She tries to hint that she wants to have an orgy with the subtlety of a freight train.  
Hahaha this reminds me of my brother on our birthday (same day, three years apart) many years ago. I realized I'd lost track of him and asked his friend where he was. Friend pointed and said "over there, petting that guy's beard."  Beard guy looked super uncomfortable. I felt bad, but quickly got him to stop. 
Really starting to sound like you pissed yourself and are blaming it on the dog 
what the fuck is a cooler if it wouldn't kill someone if it landed on them 
this one is my favourite. innocent and hilarious.  
Have a similar story. My friend's grandmother passed away and he visited my place shortly after and my mom accidentally said congratulations instead of my condolocences. He gave me a very strange glare.  
This is why I don't drink heavily, until it becomes the reason I drink heavily. 
that song is extremely sad. i don't get why it was played in the first place.  in any case, sorry for your loss. :( 
I'm concerned the skull might be too scary for them. Have you considered a treasure chest as an alternative? 
If I get you for a Reddit Secret Santa next year, I promise I will make you a lovely cross-stitch sampler- instead of "Home Sweet Home" it will say 'Midnight Is A Whole Minute, And I'm A Slut", maybe with some pretty flowers and vines along the edge :) 
I like to think that it's one of those "every square is a rectangle" kind of things. If you're wasted, you're also significantly tipsy, and probably have a heavy buzz going on.   Every subsequent level of drunkenness also includes the previous level of drunkenness. It's like building a pyramid, except instead of getting closer to the sky, you get closer to the floor.  
I'm thinking that's how the accent developed in the first place  
If they can do that with their bare hands it's probably best to just let them keep it 
A guy with fireproof shoes is definitely rocking cargo shorts 
For fucks sake I knew I'd find us on this thread somewhere. 
It's a miracle he didn't suceed in selling his scarf with that, honestly. 
You know, the traditional New Year's bathtub fire. 
It's an insulated box for keeping drinks and food cold. They're typically made of plastic 
i've done that... then tried to correct and the recipient said not to worry.  
To alcohol! The cause of, and solution to, all life's problems. 
He did in fact kiss every person at that party before 12:01  
It's not a pyramid scheme. It's more like a funnel.  
That's what I figured... like.. Merry Christmas to you bud.. enjoy your door 
Not just every single girl. Not even every girl. Every *person*.   What a champ.  
He's getting himself a house, one piece at a time. 
Yeah, who contributed that peice of paper to the stack?  
and it didn't cost him a dime. You'll know it's him, the shittiest house in town 
Its a '16, '17, '18, '19, '20, '21, '22 split level ranch. 
A lot of people don't realize this, but during wars and other significant military campaigns countries capture one another's records. Much of this tends to be banal bureaucratic stuff, but in the case of governments that are meticulous record keepers, there are sometimes volumes of damning information about war crimes.  The US National Archives has a Rebel Archives, captured from the CSA during the Civil War. It contains descriptions of the treatment of prisoners of war, some of which are gruesome.  Union medical officer logs are no better. 
Kamera aka Laboratory 12, the Soviet assassination laboratory. Reading through some of the ways they've killed you it becomes clear that the number one thing keeping most people safe is their mundanity.  Like the amount of people poisoned in broad daylight without them even realizing it is crazy, it's indefensible even if you knew it were coming.   One of the more interesting ones was a man who knew he was targeted so he holed himself up in a hotel with guards. The assassins sprayed a poisonous substance on the lamp shade with like a tube.  When the man turned his lamp on hours later the substance evaporated due to the heat and killed everyone in the room  Another was radioactive rat poison. The target went to the hospital knowing he had been poisoned, and he was treated for common rat poison, which is what he had been poisoned by. He then died as the symptoms of his radiation poisoning had been masked by the symptoms of the rat poisoning 
The audio recordings of the final sermon at Jonestown. I think the worst bit isn't the people cheering at the idea of their own deaths, it's the children crying as they're being force-fed the cyanide - and then the eerie silence when they stop crying. FBI declassified the tapes a while ago, they're easy to find online. Haunting stuff though, can't shake it from my brain.  ETA: People keep asking if it was classified. It was, by the FBI. They wouldn't release the tapes until they were officially declassified, despite petitions in court from surviving relatives etc., the info is all there if you wanna search for it.  
Aren't the JFK files suppose to be declassified this October?  
On January 3, 1961, a United States B-52 bomber went into a tailspin and broke up mid-air, accidentally dropping two Mark-39 hydrogen bombs over Goldsboro North Carolina. One of the bombs worked exactly as intended, it's parachute deployed and it's triggers activated, armed and ready to detonate on impact, 3 of the 4 safety switches failed, a single low-voltage switch prevented two 4 megaton nuclear explosions. 
You can read the speech that was written for the President, in the event that the Apollo 11 crew were stranded or died on the Moon. It's creepy and horrifying to think about. 
The remaining JFK assassination documents are going to be released to the public in October 2017 so that will be pretty crazy. 
Reading all of these posts, from around the world, I can't help but think about how the internet is going to change the way in which we all live/are governed. Twenty (hell ten) years ago, most of us would have never known the details behind these operations. We may not even know about them.   How will our ability to share previously unknown information change the way things happen in the future? Will we see less of these horrible undercover things, because those conducting know there is a good chance the rest of the world will find out? 
In the 1960's during the time period where the Canadian government was trying to wipe out aboriginal beliefs, they were abducting children from their homes and giving them up for adoption in the United States and other countries.   The Canadian government was also putting these children into Residential schools where they would beat and sexually assault these children to try and "beat the Indian" out of them. The government was very Anti-Aboriginal for a long time. 
Also anybody working in factories with phosphorus (look us phossy-jaw). 
The Germans were meticulous record keepers, and a lot fell into Allied hands, at the end of WW2. 
Andersonville. A prison camp where the treatment of prisoners was so bad that the commandant of the camp was hanged after the war. 
It is interesting that all of these evil experiments the US did happened not long after WW2 ended. I wonder if there is a connection? 
That reminds me of the fleet captain, also Russian i think, that disobeyed orders and decided not to launch missiles and prevented war.  
My family were all miners from the Midlands, and my dad mentioned that during the miners strikes it was common knowledge amongst them that a lot of violence was incited by Metropolitan Police undercover as protestors.  
"The SLAM as proposed would carry a payload of many nuclear weapons to be dropped on multiple targets, making the cruise missile into an unmanned bomber. After delivering all its warheads, the missile could then spend weeks flying over populated areas at low altitudes, causing tremendous ground damage with its shock wave. When it finally lost enough power to fly, and crash-landed, the engine would have a good chance of spewing deadly radiation for months to come." 
Do these people hear themselves when they name their projects after death gods and demons? 
In general, biological weapons are the 21st centuries scariest weapons because I think there is a strong potential for custom viruses that make everything else look like child's play.  Essentially, playing pathogen.   Infect a target population via somewhat clandestine means with a virus that ends up overwhelming the health infrastructure and creating chaos.  
My roommate told me about this a month ago and the very thought of it is creepy as fuck. Just an entire town, all the ruckus and noise and then....nothing. There are pictures too, those are just horrible.  
My understanding is that they taped the sermons over existing cassette tapes, mostly pop music and the like. I heard a bit of the final sermon and there's slow, deep, pop music playing ominously in the background. The actual sermons themselves were free of background music. 
Kudos to the tech who said "Three is good, but four is better" 
Holy fucking shit. So North Carolina basically almost had a new lake.  
To put this into perspective, the Little boy and Fat man bombs were 15KT and 20KT of TNT. 
So you mean that with one bomb, the safety switches worked as intended and prevented it from going off, whereas with the second one only one of them worked? 
That was during the Cold War too. Could you imagine that shitshow that would've resulted?  
Had to be so surreal.   "wonder what the weather's like next week. Hmmm light showers on Tuesday and... Oh! Localized apocalypse on Thursday!"   
Woe, that was a chilling read. I cannot imagine looking up the weather and seeing that bulletin.  
I've always said that the kind of people who aspire to positions of power are not the kind of people we really want holding those positions. This is a prime example.  
Go with what works for you, man. Never be afraid to think outside the box.  ed: did I accidentally reference something? Why does everyone keep talking about iceboxes 
Something like this really makes me wonder how this kind of 'network' of professional lawbreakers form. Do people go knocking around their colleagues' office asking "Do you know about this new moneymaking scheme that Friar Billy came up with"?   I mean, I'm sure there were no small amount of self-justification, religious indoctrination, and hierarchical pressure involved but still for a ploy this big to last 5 decades with so many people's willing involvement...   Do people really get out of bed each morning thinking "I should steal some babies today"?  
 "In one case, seven volunteers in Kentucky were given LSD for 77 consecutive days."  I've done acid for a couple days in a row and I'm trying to imagine 77 days but I just can't... 
whats insane is that one of the larger minds behind MK Ultra, Henry Murray, wound up at Harvard and performed psychological experiments on a then 17 year old Ted Kaczynski, who would eventually become the Unabomber.   
LOTS of fucked up crazy shit is associated with MK-Ultra.  
Wasn't this the basis of *Close Encounter of the Fourth Kind* or something like that? 
Well of course they would try all sorts of things to see what worked. If you've got basically infinite money, why not take a run through the phonies to see if any are actually real? 
Great, now you've got me thinking that Mars is really a past version of what Earth really is today, I mean we've got our own pyramids, and definitely some strange inhabitants as well (looking at you, Dennis Rodman). Now does this mean we're destined for some sort of strange planetary catastrophe? All out nuclear war because Russia and the US couldn't get along? Mars sure does look like a fallout planet, indeed.  Fasten your seatbelts, friends. 
The government has tried some really, really weird stuff over the years. It's almost comforting to know that every crazy angle has at least been looked at instead of being shut down. I'm sure there are plenty of things in modern science and technology that once sounded as baffling as using a psychic to find the history of mars.  Yes, the CIA tried it, but that doesn't mean much of anything.  
Jesus fucking christ. I read the first part and thought that was sick enough; then I looked at the scrollbar. It's really fucking fucked up that he turned it into this every-day thing that happened so regularly he had to make a video for it.  
Did he actually let people go like he said in the transcript, or did he just murder them? 
Not sure which is more surprising - that they had such a plan or that they actually declassified such a plan. 
I read somewhere that the German higher-ups didn't trust their low level workers and soldiers to carry out their orders against the jews thoroughly, so they made them fill out paperwork meticulously, thus that is the reason there is so much documentation of the holocaust.  
So did their parents just sign away their rights and leave? 
Cropsy really shook me. The footage from the hospital is haunting 
Never gave them penicillin for decades after it was discovered and known as the cure. 
Largely for the same reason, if the US were to nuke Russia it would probably send more than 1 nuke. 
I mean, doesn't everyone know that different police forces do this? There's literally a phrase for it: "agent provocateur". 
At its simplest level, "We won't kill your wives if you don't kill ours" is a very enticing proposition. 
I think it's about control and target. You can control who you shoot with a gun, but a flood will kill innocent people and serve no purpose other than damaging the individual. The same logic applies to chemical weapons - they're indiscriminate and hard to control. 
100mt was its max potential, what they detonated was 50mt 
For some reason I love the idea of a nuclear powered rocket whose only attack ability is to fly all over the place at Mach 5 breaking shit with shockwaves. 
The scientists who come up with these ideas give them appropriate names. Whether they're ever actually used is usually up to the MoD. 
it was a direct cycle reactor. at the very, very, very least it spewed activated Oxygen (which is no fucking joke) 
What was crazy to me was the scale. Usually when you hear about these cult communes it's like a handful of people - maybe 100 people if that. This was over 900 people. Over 900 people willingly took their lives for a crazy idea. They also murdered a congressman. 
I think they'll reclassify it all.  It won't be declassified until everyone who remembers it is dead and it's of historical interest only. 
What is it that's creepy about this? I'm confused. Just that it's fragments from the bullets that killed the president? 
Imagine having to autopsy the President of the United States. 
Russian pessimist says: "Things cannot possibly get worse."   Russian optimist says: "Yes they can." 
There was also a nuke accidentally dropped on Mars Bluff, SC back in 1958. 
I'm starting to think they shouldn't be flying with these.  
Wait, so it could have been 200 times the size of fat man... fiddily fuck that shit RIGHT off. 
From what I can gather nuclear bombs don't detonate by themselves. They need to be triggered. So it just disintigrated on ground impact.  Meaning they are not impact sensitive. They get triggered.  
And in Guatemala, they actually *infected* people, on a larger scale than Tuskegee, and lied to them about what they were doing. It's one of the most sickening atrocious in modern US history, IMO. 
I was listening to Hitchhikers Guide to the Galaxy today and you reminded me of this. "It is a well-known fact that those people who must want to rule people are, ipso facto, those least suited to do it... anyone who is capable of getting themselves made President should on no account be allowed to do the job". - Douglas Adams. 
75 \*million years ago, a space-emperor named Xenu found the solution for overpopulation: murdering billions of his subjects. Using psychology and income tax assessors, Xenu gathered them together and froze their souls using a mixture of alcohol and glycol. Then he loaded the spirits onto spaceships that look exactly like DC-8 airplanes, and sent them to a primitive planet (Earth). There Xenu dumped all the spirits into volcanoes and detonated hydrogen bombs in the volcanoes. The spirits of the aliens were blown to bits then dispersed through the atmosphere and stuck to the spirits of humans like burrs on clothing. These spirit chunks are apparently the cause of all human suffering. Through Scientology a person can allegedly learn to control these alien ghost pieces to perform superhuman feats. 
At the time this was written, 1983 if i read the article correctly, who was the potential threat for WW3? The Soviet Union? 
The actual system is called FOBS which stands for Fractional Orbital Bombardment System.   It basically drop half ton rods of a tungsten-steel mixture. No warhead, no explosives, just pure kinetic energy. It doesn't violate a treaty of no weapons in space (I forget the actual treaty) but it could drop these rods in minutes.   The scariest part is that these are designed as rods I believe six inches across and twelve feet long. They are practically impossible to detect upon re-entry and even harder to shoot down due to its relative size compared to conventional ICBM's   Call of Duty: Ghosts had a similar system in its campaign. I think that was called THOR or ODIN or some Norse god.  
You'd pretty much lose all sense of yourself and reality, I can't imagine going through that 
"As the experimentation progressed, a point was reached where outsiders were drugged with no explanation whatsoever and surprise acid trips became something of an occupational hazard among CIA operatives." 
Just "The 4th Kind" and it is a very scary movie.  
Seriously, what's the worst that could happen. Best case scenario you got a new superweapon of people who can look into the office of USSR secretary, realistic case scenario you wasted a time of a few interns 
Some odd million years from now some space squid from Europa will be looking at a barren scorched Earth thinking. I wonder what happened there! 
The most fucked up part? His "drug cocktail" to erase memory appeared to have worked. While trying to find victims, only two were found because others asked about it recognized tattoos on the women. When the women were approached they offered to talk to law enforcement but had no recollection of anything even remotely like that. Then the moment they heard the audio from the tape the memories came flooding back and they remembered everything.  Last Podcast on the Left has a pretty good episode covering this. 
"What we're telling them to do is so bad, we don't expect people to do it. So instead of saying 'fuck that, no' we're gonna make them prove that they did it." 
Let's agree not to kill each other's kids.  Don't attack clinics or the medics, we both need to help our wounded.  Long ago people would trade PoWs back and take breaks at night, in winter, or during holidays.  The goal is to keep the battle contained and restrict suffering. Our soldiers fight yours, and if we get a win condition we stop. After all, we all had lives before this that we kind of don't want to be super shitty when we finish the fight.  This only works when both sides agree though.  
Jesus fuck.  The Sundial probably could've burnt and irradiated nearly everywhere on earth regardless of detonation area.  Holy shit. The dude who designed didn't stop to think at all if he should do it.  Why would anyone ever need a weapon that absurdly destructive, to the point you could irreperablly damage the earth and kill literally billions of people? That's just... Wrong. 
A lot of them didn't do it willingly. There were guards forcing them to with guns. 
Cant help but think people would point fingers at the soviets too. Nuclear war avoided. 
Nope, but to be fair, I didn't spend a lot of time in the actual town.  There were three occasions when my family would go to Goldsboro:  Birthday dinners, movie nights (which were rare), and the county fair.  Usually for dinner we'd go to Ruby Tuesday or Outback, which were right off the highway, same as the theater and the fairgrounds.  I'm not sure where specifically that sign is, but I would assume it's downtown-ish. 
Isn't there any ethics approval for experiments in US? WTActualF  
And Beeblebrox was perfect because he didn't care for governing. He made the people happy. That is until he stole The Heart of Gold.   
Levels above OT8 have been "nearly available" for years (like, at least 30 years), but they have never been released.   Lately, instead of additional cash grabs by making new material above OT8, they've simply been releasing new versions of the low-level courses and requiring that people go back and take those again.   The number of people who actually go all the way up to OT8 is actually very very small. Even (most) famous Scientologists that you've heard of never make it that high. 
My Tia Machi from the DR was born in jail for this exact reason, and was given every name her mother could think of that came from her/her husband's family line to make sure Machi could keep her identity even if her rebel parents didn't survive.   Machi is her nickname, since she has around 10-15 names total. Her mom did make it out of jail, but her dad was killed.  
Yup, the Soviets. It was a serious consideration at the time.  If you fancy having the shit scared out of you, go and have a watch of the BBC drama Threads (readily available online) which dates from that period and depicts exactly what would happen to one of England's biggest cities in the event of a war. I was born well after it was produced and well after nuclear war was even a possibility but it still scares the fuck out of me. 
Thank you. Even though the content is very sad, its a beautiful speech. 
but doesnt acid lose half the power of its dose if you use it the next day, for example if you do 100ug one day, and do the same amount the next day it would only feel like taking 50ug? 
Pretty good for 40 years ago. But I don't know if they really put google to shame. 
Torture, rape, dog rape, rape and torture with a nice touch of psychological torture 
The Sundial blast would've been the size of Texas. The fallout and subsequent nuclear winter would have probably killed almost everyone on the planet. 
However, if you wanted to blast something out in space, I could see some use for it..  
There was a guy on NPR talking about Jones town. He said over half the people were either kids or elderly who would have had no way surviving in the jungle and would die either way. Basically the mos of the people had no real choice in the matter 
Saying you'll shoot someone if they don't commit suicide with cyanide doesn't seem like a good threat.  If I don't want to die I'd rather get shot and have a chance to survive that.   
They killed the children first so that the adults would be more willing to die. 
Smart of your grandma. I would assume they'd just give the kid a different name though (once they took her).  
I watched Threads once a couple years ago. Never again. I was on edge for days. It scared me so bad. The raw suffering it simulates it unbelievable and horrifyingly realistic. You can imagine all this happening to you in your own circumstances. I have no desire nor need to ever watch it again, it'll be sticking with me for a long time. 
The worst part of that is the implication that the problem would be a technical one with the lander, leaving the astronauts alive and well, and in contact with NASA, but stranded. What would they do in that situation? Keep taking to them until their oxygen ran out? Let them speak to their families? 
To further elaborate on the above. We aren't talking like a paragraph of extreme detail here.  We are talking like a full on page or two about him and his buddies getting off on watching his dog rape the victim in more detail than you can be prepared for.   I think the beastiality portion is what fucked me up and stuck with me all this time more than anything. But there isn't a "that's not so bad" part to any of the transcript     
Sounds silly but this would be the perfect defensive weapon. Don't attack us or we will detonate it and everyone loses. This was part of the plot of Dr. Strangelove. The Russians couldn't keep up with the us economic system so they built a weapon that would wipe out all life if a nuclear explosion went off in their territory. The problem is that once this weapon was built and the design known all it would take is some rogue state to say we all lose and boom. Game over planet earth.  
I had no idea this was in Guyana until you said jungle. I honestly thought this happened in the U.S.  
You should read up on Jim Jones, he was nuts near the end. Apparently he would give people Kool-Aid tell them it was poisoned as a test on a regular basis to see if they would drink it before he actually did this. 
I read somewhere that procedure was that NASA would cut communications.   Imagine that, being stranded on the moon, just you and one other person until you suffocated to death. Scary stuff. 
Holy shit if that's true, I'd imagine they can read our thoughts from Langley by now.  
That was the philosophy of most of the arms race at a point. Dr. Strangelove wasn't just some goofy movie, but it was an analysis and criticism of the concept of Mutually Assured Destruction.  
Is that where they came up with the fact that variations on 'Drinks the Kool-Aid' means being part of a cult? 
The idea was to let them die in peace and with privacy, not broadcasting their every panicked word to everyone on Earth. 
Honestly I see being cold as only justified in situations with hope.    If there's no hope and death is inevitable, you switch to comforting people and helping them die well. 
if you think there's not at least one division working on that tech, you're out of your mind 
There is Mutually Assured Destruction and then there is Mutually Assured Destruction via SUICIDE BOMBING. 
Which Kool-Aid execs have to be just thrilled about 
As someone who works in a control environment I'd imagine it's also taking into account that listening in to them as they died would just break the comms guy and ruin his life...  
The thing is, they were actually drinking Flavor Aid. It wasn't even Kool-Aid. So it's probably doubly annoying for Kool-aid execs. 
Woah... It just occurred to me. Someone already thought of this:  Underwear - tighty whities.  
I don't have a contribution really, but this thread made me realize how silly and ridiculous the term "walkie talkie" is, and how we've all just kinda accepted it.   
All of this sounds like something Tom Haverford would say.  
AIDs would definitely have been called Booty Cooties 
You know those those thong type shoes you put on your feet when going to the beach? Haha, guy would probably call them something stupid like "Flip Flops" or something. Ha.  wait a minute.. 
Grand Theft Auto would be Stealy Wheely Auto-Mobiley. 
This was actually the same guy who named walkie talkie.  
Fun fact: Defibrillators do not start or restart hearts. They are for putting them back into rhythm. 
I've recently realized the same thing for the word "movies"  "Look at all these moving pictures and stories... what shall we call this?"    "eh movies" 
 I call eggs pre-birds, or future birds. Root beer is super water. Tortillas are bean blankies. And I call forks ... Food rakes. 
Walkie talk fucks? What type of phone do you have? 
Pooper scoopers are already a thing. It's a weird shovel for dog poop. 
*-sneezes-* Terribly sorry, I have a case of the wheezy sneezies. 
What do you call a Frenchman wearing sandles?    Philippe Philoppe.  
Once had a teacher who referred to them as "Beach Floppies." Never thought of them the same way again. 
That's why we call them jandals instead of something silly like "thongs". 
Brian Regan is better than all of reddit combined at this game 
EVERYONE GET ON THE GROUND I HAVE A ROOTY TOOTY POINT AND SHOOTY 
I read that in the guy from CoD: Black Ops voice in multiplayer's voice. 
tighty whities 1935, walkie talkies 1940. The dates check out. 
You shake it, we take it  You spray, we pay  You jerk it, we work it  You masturbate, we inseminate  You waste it, we baste it (like... Like a turkey baster. Sorry.)  Go to town on your turgid schvantz, we'll stick it down in some girlys cunts 
Thank you for sending me on a binge of American Dad clips. 
They also called the first non-silent films "talkies". 
You've literally just given the etymology of 'movies', it was a lazy way of saying 'moving pictures' or 'motion pictures' 
Talkie walkie is actually the France name for Walkie talkie. 
I don't think u/dpgproductions has been using his phone correctly... 
Why not just pick up a sleeve of those weird cone shaped water cups for like a dollar whatever 
"Got my swim trunks, and my flippie floppies. Im flippin burgers you at kinkos straight flippin copies" - Andy Samberg in Im on a boat.    I regularly call them flippy floppies because of this 
I'm a new dad... I'm saving this in my dad joke archive  
That means something else when you're at a nude beach 
"We" being Kiwis? Because you guys also call speed bumps jutterbars, and shopping trolleys trundlers. Our countries are so close and yet so different. 
"Ok, take my bendy spendy, lets not get silly killy here"  
Sounds like something a Chinese merchant would say. 
We used to answer our teachers phone like this "Mr. Barry's abortion clinic, you make em we take em. No fetus can beat us." 
Grapes are...   Teen Raisins.  ok, I'm going to keep going til I stop giggling. May be a bit. 
upvote for using "daintiest" and "motherfucker" in the same sentence.  
Hey! Detroit is trying to break that stereotype! Come visit, we're a really cool town with a very strong culture growing. Every city has it's problems but aren't known for them, why is Detroit? I guarantee you'll have a good time if you come see for yourself. Especially during any major sporting event.  
Am kiwi, never called a trolley a trundler before oO in fact, never heard anyone say that ever  
My teacher had us listen to Stupid in School in 8th grade for pretty much no reason at all. Still one of the best stand up bits I have ever heard in my life.  
Actually we have a bunch of slang that mimics Chinese phrases. My mind is drawing a giant fucking blank right now though.  
I like the happy penis on that package of condoms. 
Can confirm. Three boys, my mom gave me this information before the first one arrived; I've never been peed on 
And never heard a speed bump be called a jutterbar.... where do you get your information from? 
For a comedian to be so clean and yet make me laugh is genius work. I'm a fan of Doug Stanhope if that puts things into perspective.  I went to a Regan show a few years back and he was transitioning over to Godspeed which I hadn't heard at the time. Loved it. He did requests at the end which I've never seen a comedian do. People yelling "the big yellow one is the sun" at him from the audience, still makes me chuckle. 
My guess would be that if they piss into a cone-shaped cup what will happen would be a backblast, spraying piss all over their bodies. 
Oh God, now they're actually going to make that because this is all they needed 
This as real as it gets. I'm on a boat mother fucker don't you ever forget.  
I have definitely never heard people mountain people sea.  
Preventing pee spray =/= absorbency   Note to self; don't reddit when tired 
They're pretty damn awesome!      But treat 'em like a firearm - never take your eyes off them unless they are safely stored and *always* presume they are fully loaded. 
More Absorbency = Less piss all over your freshly-changed baby boy 
Also available in blue, for the manly men, and pink, for the fashionable women. 
I'm a cobbler. I fix shoes, cut keys, engrave dog tags wedding rings, hell I'll engrave your poop if you want me to. I chose my vocation because, well they had a vacancy and I needed a job. But now I love it. 
Well, it's not exciting, but I'm an Audiologist and never had to worry about finding work. Also have worked in 3 countries (so far).  
Speech-Language Pathologist. I personally work in an elementary school, but in the field you can work with people from birth through old age with a HUGE variety of disorders: articulation, language, stroke, swallowing, autism, traumatic brain injury, fluency, voice, and lot more! Or you can go into research. It's such a huge field that you'll definitely find a niche you love, and speech pathologists are hard to find these days, so you'll definitely find a job.  
I own an ice cream shop and leave work everyday covered in chocolate and caramel. It's a pretty sweet job. 
I'm a CPA working in public practice at a regional firm. I do a little bit of everything on the client service side - audit, tax, process consulting, etc. Would love to chat.  
My title is Chief Metallurgist and Heat Treat Manager.   Big title and I get to do cool stuff and go to many cool places (China, South Korea, Poland, Scotland, Mexico, Canada, and many various USA states and cities).   Metallurgy is just solid chemistry really. Throw in heat treat and I get to manipulate materials to achieve the properties I want. Marry this with manufacturing and holy cow..... Job security. We are lacking in metallurgists due to outsourcing and lack of interest but it's actually really cool. I get to play with neat toys, solve everyone else's problems and essentially act as an alchemist.   I've never been without a job. I've always had a pay raise. Never settle for one company; move around; grow your salary.   I've jumped from automotive industry to industrial gearing and love it. Both are rewarding but both have pros and cons as any sector does.   I would HIGHLY recommend this avenue as a career. I don't see a lot of people going into this field.   AMA [serious only] 
I am a Registered Nurse.  I got into the field quite accidentally, when I started nannying for a family whose daughter had prematurity-related health problems and a feeding tube. I had to learn CPR, and give crushed medications, and it was a natural progression.  I have spent 2 years in Cardiac, 3 years in Postpartum(Mom/Baby) and a year in Labor&Delivery. It is beyond fantastic. 
17-year-old Dunkin Donuts employee with big ideas (namely an m&m donut but no one listens)  AMA 
Any redditors with a career in politics... but not as a politician? I am 2 years into my BA in PoliSci and very interested in a career as a political analyst, but have yet to come across someone with inside experience. 
I'm a full time baseball umpire. I mostly work high school or adult league games. I'll sometimes work a semi-pro game. I got into it because I was able to start at 13 doing little league games and a paying job at 13 is something any kid will take. 
I'm a teacher. I don't have a traditional BS in education, so I was certified through an alternative program (TNTP, which is quite similar to Teach for America). I did have to have a Bachelor's to enroll in the program.  As for being a teacher, it's great! Yeah, I have all kids of bullshit to deal with (Common Core, administrative bullshit, etc), but it's an awesome way to work in my craft (music) and feel like I'm making a difference. And, while I'm busy when school is in session, I have time to freelance after school quite a bit.   If anyone wants advice on becoming a teacher, especially a music teacher or a career-switcher/nontraditionally certified teacher, please feel free to ask me!  
I am a network engineer for ATT mobility. I chose the mobility field because I saw handheld computing as a solid industry that isn't going anywhere.  
I make gaming-themed YouTube videos (mostly Minecraft) for a living, and do some speedrun livestreaming on the side.  I have an abnormal love for Minecraft which makes the job a pleasure most of the time, and I love the freedom of self-employment. However, it's more of a job than a lot of people would assume. Obviously it's not something easy to get into, but I can still answer some questions if people have them. 
I'm a psychology researcher with plans to study to become a therapist after my social psychology PhD. I also volunteer as a crisis counsellor and earn money on the side by working as a research assistant for a professor at my university. I get paid to learn about things I find fascinating and fucking love it. AMAA? 
Active duty Navy here.  I have training in a few different specialties, but my primary job is dental assisting. Didn't really choose it, the navy was just more or less trying to fill a quota when they stuck me with the job. Assisting dentists all day isn't half bad. It's the military aspect of it all that can be debilitating sometimes. But I've been a few places, seen some cool things, and met very awesome people. Plus, it's steady income. 
I thought job fairs were for companies looking to hire 
I love cooking  I worked at a busy family run restaurant  I hate cooking 
I'm a line cook. Get my ass kicked daily to the point of pure rage. I guess I love it since I don't see myself doing anything else. 
Do they save money with transfers by delivering them with the mail? 
Just wanted to say I'm glad people like you still exist   So hard to find a good poop engraver  
Always been curios: why are cobblers and keys linked? Seem like a strange combo. 
I just got expensive custom musician earplugs from an audiologist because I go to a lot of concerts and festivals, and boy do I wish I had done it earlier. I always assumed audiologists only work with old people but I could tell he does all sorts of interesting stuff.  Now I feel old as I want to tell everyone to protect their ears better. 
Why did you open the page in IE!?  It works fine in Chrome! 
I'm a software developer, and I work very closely with the QA team.  What can a developer do to make your job easier? 
What are the requirements to be one? Also shouldnt minipigs be in the zoo not working there?  
Is going the full route to become a CPA worth it? Especially with how difficult I've heard the exams are. I'm currently an accounting student, and I was basically wondering if working for businesses and such are worth not getting the CPA?  Another question would be is the job as boring as everyone that isn't an accountant makes it out to be? 
So, I'm studying Chemical Engineering (BS) right now, and I really like the concept of heat transfer and thermodynamics. What kind of background do you have that qualified you for this position? Additionally, did you have a really strong interest in materials engineering, or did the opportunity just kind of happen, and you ended up loving it? Thanks for any answers! 
As someone who interacts regularly with medical librarians, thank you for all that you do. I have had to hunt down some truly esoteric information and I couldn't have done it alone. 
I'm interested in becoming a nurse!  What does a normal day look like for you? And what kind of schooling am I looking at? 
I hear a lot of nurses bash the nursing profession and community. I have a background as an EMT and military medic and have some experience working in hospitals. I feel like a lot of people that bash nursing are people that had no clue what they were getting into and were already to deep to change careers. What are you thoughts on the good/bad of nursing. Is it really all that depressing as people make it out to be?  Edit to clarify: I ask because I am considering pursuing an MSN for non-nurses. As of right now, I'm taking the California Medical Assistant exam to try and get some more experience in a hospital environment  before I make any big decisions. 
What's your main source of income from the webcomic? Advertising revenue, book sales, merch? 
At what point in the training do they give you all the same voice? 
Well shit man, the thought has crossed my mind a few times that when I FC in EVE it basically is ATC. Do you find yourself less inclined to put a headset on for gaming when you've spent a shift already wearing a headset? 
92-94%? I always thought only about 4 or 5% of the sea bed has been explored  
Sounds like very hard work, do you do this by yourself or do you have people that help you? 
how on earth do you get this job? Did you go to school? how hard of a job is it to land? 
Is it a well-known chain that you frost for? And was it an entry position, or did you have to work your way through to the people-free position? 
I used to work at Dunkin Donuts. Had to wake up at 3 in the morning and had a 4-12 morning shift. I always had a great time spreading chocolate on the donuts and making creative designs on it. It really is more fun then you'd think. 
Do you get to bring any free doughnuts home at the end of the day? Free or not, I'm fairly certain that I would be extremely obese if I had your job. Doughnuts are my weakness.  
Do you ever eat the frosting whole? I love that stuff.  
Is that a good wage where you live? That's a bit below minimum where I am so just curious. 
I am a fresh new front-end web developer who just worked his first day at a full time agency! What advice would you give a new web developer like myself just getting into the field? Anything you wish you learned when you were at my point? Anything that is a necessity to know about the industry? 
As an 18 year old who has a month to decide what I should do with my life: should I go to college? 
How does someone get into Umpiring or refereeing in general. My dad was an Athletic Director at my high school, but he never told me. 
What kind of lawyer are you? is being a lawyer as boring as people make it out to be? 
Heard a story about an underwater welder using a warm water circulation in his suit when it sucked a jelly fish into it and he got stung 100 plus times, does that worry you? 
sweet! how did you get interested in something like that? have you had an affinity for water all your life? or machinery? 
Im not familliar with that, what is an underwater welder? 
So were you like a computer science or engineer major before youtube? You seem to know a lot about coding and circuits. 
Have you ever had problems with friends or family acting like you've never done (what they perceive as) "a hard day's work"? 
OMG Seth Bling! THE Seth Bling?! My kids are obsessed with your videos! You are a HUGE celebrity in our house.   In fact, my daughter (10) says she wants to be an animator because of your egg videos. I wish I knew how to help her more...I signed up for Harvard's EdX CS class and was planning on doing it with her but it's too advanced for her.   Do you have any advice for how she can get started? They're homeschooled so I give them lots of leeway to pursue their own interests and I'd be all on board for making "animating" an official school subject.   I won't bother you further but if you wanted to PM me any education suggestions I'd be eternally grateful and/or send you pizza :-) 
wow, just checked out your channel, very impressive, over 1.000.000 subs is pretty amazing.  I don't really have any specific questions about youtube or gaming, but rather the selfemployment.  Would love if you could describe how much you work dayli, how your friends feel about you being self employed and just in general how your life is different from others.  Would really appreciate it, if you took the time to answer! :) 
What does a normal day of work looks like? Also how much do you make? 
What field of chemistry did you specialize in? Could you do this with a heavy background in Instrumental Analytical Chemistry and how would one get into it? 
Hi!  I get to meet an internet celebrity!  I'm a student who will (God willing) be going for my MD-PhD - I research now in mood regulation (antidrpressants).  But that's not important - I wanted to say thank you for bringing science to the public in a friendly, interesting way.  Enthusiasm is what separates successful students from the rest - not intelligence.  For me, Jeff Corwin helped establish this interest, but for the next generation I am sure there are a few or many kids out there for whom you are serving this role!  So thanks for being the friendly, curious, unpretentious voice of the scientific spirit that the internet needs!  If you are ever in New Haven, lunch is on me!  
What has been the most interesting thing you have run into? And going back a couple years, what courses did you take in high school and university to get you where you are today? 
In what part of the industry? i heard it can be quite stressful. 
The best question I can think of is how you got in, how many years did it take you to get into that position, what position did you start out as and what options are available for you now in terms of promotion?  Thanks. 
Job fair can't be complete without the armed forces :)  where's the telemarketer guy? 
Hi, Joining the military has always been on my mind but mostly if i couldnt find anything else. Mainly becouse i heard it is a really good place for building character. How is life in the navy. are you stuck on a ship or a base or can you go home at the end of the day? 
Yeah upvoting since this seems like a really great idea and I can gain insight on jobs I am considering 
I love cooking, always considered myself good at it, and that's exactly why I never ever want to do it for a living. 
I worked as a server at a restaurant before I started at USPS. So I went from getting little to no respect, to everyone I walk by smiling and saying hello! It's crazy! People really like their mailman! 
Both involves cutting metal. And back in the way long day copying a key means you had to cut the pattern by hand which means you had to be skilled. Not the key machine they have now.  
Audio engineer here.   Yes, everyone SHOULD be protecting their ears. I wear earplugs to every concert I'm at, it's just always too goddamn loud. Why? Because that's how everyone *likes* it.   The louder music gets, the less clarity it has. It becomes just a wall of sound. That's no fun for anyone, and that's where guys like me come in. To weed out those unnecessary frequencies that "muddy" the mix up, and to bring out those frequencies to give the highs more definition, and the bass more oomph.   Most concerts sound best between 100 and 115db, depending on what you're listening to. You *should* have earplugs with you, but if you happen to forget them, that's okay. It's the SUSTAINED EXPOSURE that will damage your hearing.  Please protect your hearing.    
Exactly this! I'm currently working a fairly complicated page with lots of graphs and charts, and it works perfect in Chrome and Firefox. IE outright crashes before I can hit F12 to open the debugger. I hate Internet Explorer. It is probably the single most annoying part of my job. (I'm a web developer/software developer.) 
It's not that bad to be a starving artist. :)   I went to school for creative writing. After I graduated I worked as an editorial assistant for a magazine, but found out reaaaally damn fast that I'm not cut out for a 9-5 office job.    I finished the first draft of my first novel two weeks ago. I nanny part-time and am definitely poor (though not starving, since I eat all their food!), but it's worth it to have the free time and brain energy for my book!  
"You are so retarded... Lufthansa 375 is primary... Eithad 228 is secondary. What the fuck is wrong with you?"  "Dude..."  "Airbuses... AIRBUSES... **AIRBUSES...**" 
I had all 3 but the connections are what nabbed me the job. I suspect without experience and education my resume might have been ignored. I know some peers who are more gifted than I am, who are struggling because they are less well-connected.  Right now I am working on a celebrity biography show (boring) that pays the company bills and a time travel show (AWESOME) both of which will be airing this summer. If people like em our itty-bitty company may get an itty-bit bigger. 
A lot of people will tell you to work on stuff to gain experience in the industry. For nearly everything, this is true. For editing, this is true, but you HAVE to be picky about your projects. There are sooooo many timesuck projects out there that will never turn into connections/money, and plenty of editing projects that do pay out there.  Location-wise, I grew up in Boulder,CO, met a couple people with light editing work, and worked on a couple wedding videos that paid for my early equipment. Pirate the software, play with it yourself, get comfortable with it and find freelance projects. You can pay your dues/get experience anywhere, but you pretty much need to move to LA or NY to get paid to work on the cool stuff. There are editing positions everywhere, but they generally come with less pay/fun. 
It's a well-known chain, yea. I was hired on as a "production baker" after years of fast food experience with other chains. 
Not all jobs need college.  Nobody can answer that question until you know what you're gonna do.  College is expensive, but very rewarding and can lead you to a great career that pays well.  You have to decide for yourself -- is it worth it? 
Lineman are professionals who build, maintain, upgrade distribution (sub 34kV) and high voltage transmission (up to 765kV) in the states. They are some crazy but very skilled individuals.   Source: I'm a transmission line engineer.  
Mods can't verify if information is actually yours. Even if you say "My name is John Smith and my phone number is 555-example-555", it **could** be true but how can we know? 
Criminal. It is, actually, more boring than people make it out to be. At least until you step into court to argue your case.  
Yeah, but then again where's the excitement without some danger?  In all honesty I'm not too worried.  Chances of that happening are fairly low. 
Not OP, but pretty much exactly what it sounds like. Someone that welds while diving. It requires licenses that take time and money to earn, but can prove to be profitable if you are willing to put in the time. It is still a manual labor job, so you will need to consider how long you can do it for. Finding the right contracts can be very lucrative with people allegedly earning a six figure salary in USD. 
Yep, I have a degree in computer science from one of the top colleges in the United States, and I worked as a software engineer for Microsoft before doing youtube full time. 
Actually, ElementAnimation did the animation for those videos, so I'm sorry to say that I don't have any good advice for you. Best of luck, though. 
I'd say I work roughly 40 hours a week, though it varies. I'm working a bit more now that I'm live streaming several times per week. I work a lot on the weekends.  My friends generally are very interested in my job, its much easier to relate to the minutiae of my job than a normal desk job. I also get a fair number of video ideas from my friends, and they like that sort of limited involvement. 
There are three* general fields: prep, production, and post-production. *maybe also marketing and distribution...      I work in production, where the actual shooting gets done. Specifically, I work as a grip: sort of lighting and rigging and support department. and yes, all aspects of the industry are pretty stressful. But usually quite rewarding.  
Luckily for me, I'm not on ship. I'm on a military installation and I do get to go home after the work day. 
good god I can't believe that was 2 fucking years ago...I think I need to go outside more.  
The phrase: "If you love what you do, you never have to work a day in your life." is total bull shit in my opinion. Never ever turn your hobby into your job. Just accept that work sucks and that you need to sell some of your life to make other parts better. 
 As a drummer that sits next to amps all day, everyone tells me to protect my ears, but I don't hear them. 
I went to school for creative writing, too. I'm currently a bartender at a major chain resturaunt...  
Now you say you Reddit all day unless you start a project. What kinds of projects do you work on?   I'm currently on my way through school to hopefully do the same type of deal when I get out.  
I know this may sound a little stupid, but how does one get 'connections'? Is it purely luck in knowing the right people or did you actively seek them out? 
I can't even see the asterisk. It really feels like part of the original comment. Very well crafted. 
I didn't like welding in the rain. I couldn't imagine welding in the water. Especially in water with salinity.    
Yeah, most underwater welders dont last long though, usually 7-10 years before their body can't keep up with the pressure. That's why the pay is so high 
If the views ever stopped coming in would you go back to working as a software engineer, or try to stay in the video game world? Also, I love your videos! Good luck in UHC!  
Doesnt it ruin movies for you if you see how everything gets done? 
What kind of jobs are available in the navy and what can i expect in your line of work? 
It's Okay,  It's only 18 months.  I had the same freak out..  It's from December 2012, not two years.. ^ this guy and his exaggerations. 
I graduated with a creative writing degree. I moved to taiwan. I spend 14 hours a week teaching English and all my insane amount of free time reading and writing.   I still make enough money that I literally don't know what to do with it. I save 1k usd every month. Its just sitting in my bank account cause its so cheap to live here.  
The way he abbreviates "you would" is extremely forward thinking. OP loves to be efficient, definitely would hire.  
If anything, it makes you appreciate the good movies even more since you understand how much hard work went into them.  
I can barely spit out a drive through order for a coffee I get every morning.   That combined with my lack of attention span, and destructive curiosity, I definitely would be fired within 10 minutes.  
Jimmies or sprinkles? Coming from a professional doughnut maker, you should know best of all.  
You should be a mechanic, I am and I have a hard time pronouncing my name some mornings. I ruined a "defective" fuel pump because I wanted to see how much distance and pressure I could shoot water across the shop. Got bored a few days ago and was curious to weather or not anybody fucked with my tool box so I wired roughly 120vs to that bitch and went to lunch.    He doesn't mess with my toolbox and I feel bad because the porter got involved and she's such a sweet girl. She hasn't talked to me in 2 days now and throws my tickets at me 
The boxes say "sprinkles" but my family is from New England, where they're called jimmies. I'm so conflicted! 
Use a piece of the answer in quotes as your query. 
Add "forum" to the search.   This will bring up people who are writing about the problem or issue you are searching for of just about any product out there. 
Putting a / between first and last name for a person will search for the names together  E.g, searching John Smith Podiatrist will give you podiatrists with both the names like John Wilson or Fred Smith,  Searching John/Smith will only bring up John Smiths  Hope this helps :)  
Three words: GOOGLE. ADVANCED. SEARCH.  You can find pages with an exact phrase, omit certain words, look up numbers, file types, and all on the domain it's on. Seriously, you don't even need to be good at phrasing things, just put in what you need and you'll probably end up finding it. 
Google stuff the old way. Search for the potential title of the article that would have the information you need, rather than just asking a question. Search for "Cherries bad for dogs" vs "can my dog eat cherries?"  Doing this helps you find the answers, not just more people with the same question. 
Add "Reddit" to the end of the search and there's most likely a thread about whatever you're looking for 
Key words only. Don't ask full questions, just enter the main words. Good tip is to keep it as concise as possible 
#1 Protip of all time * Dont be lazy, just do the search.  
Haven't tried it in awhile but i remember being able to change my user agent to googlebot and browse gated forums that way. There are Chrome add ons to do this.  
Aside from quoting and exclusion, I find most of the fancy search features unnecessary if your queries are reasonably specific (ie not things like "problem with ms word")  
When I'm searching about something, I often click the Reddit link as well. Reading the comments often gives me a bunch of useful info or links from other redditors.  
Just a warning: it's common for bots to use these, so getting too fancy with filters (allinurl:"URL", etc.) will get you flagged as a bot. 
Didn't Google start ignoring literal string / exact match quotes a few years ago? 
What's the difference between using "John Smith" and John/Smith? 
You can tell how much internet experience someone has by the way they phrase their searches.  
Hmmm...I want to find a place to simulate being at the bottom of an underground condition, where the temperatures will be high, the light will be virtually nonexistent, and the air will have high humidity.   "hot, dark, moist" 
Maybe I'm lucky but being especially descriptive seems to help me. I'm sure it depends on the topic but searching a complete phrase works well for me. For car problems it will often take you to a forum specific your car and someone who experienced the same problem. 
I find the exact opposite is useful. Sometimes I just make a word salad of several words pertaining to what I'm looking for. The Trick to this is using the right words. A proof of this is google's uncanny ability to find movies or songs based on obscure descriptions. 
I had success with "what was the name of that satellite with the gold disk launched way back when" 
True, but this can also bring up biased information. Check the inverse search too, if possible 
The old way? I don't understand. Are you saying the Ask Jeeves method is now the most common way people are searching?  
That's how I found Reddit in the first place. After multiple google searches to my questions I would keep ending up here. So then I started always added Reddit to the end. Couple years later made an account.  Now I'm on here every day. 
This might be too specific of a question but I was trying to figure out something similar to this a few days ago.  Would that work for a website that has overlays to blur things out? For example, if you wanted to see the answer to a question on Chegg thats partially blurred out? 
I loved Around (I don't remember the syntax) from Nexis searches. I have been missing it for decades not knowing it was available in Google  
Thanks, this had bugged me lately, but not enough to Google the solution. Which is totally embarrassing in retrospect.  
For 'actual verbatim' you need the undocumented triple quotes """like this""". I use it so often I made a global hotkey to easily surround my queries with triple quotes. 
That is the first I'm hearing of this. When did this happen? I have the olds.  
Years ago you used to be able to use this syntax to search for valid credit card numbers (e.g. 4000000000000000..4999999999999999), of which there were a jaw dropping number posted online, not even by scammers or whatever, more like small businesses not knowing the difference between intranet and internet site... I think Google censors those results now. 
Why's that? I use this routinely to get up-to-date results for computer issues. The missing expiry date for information is a growing problem. Why should Google be concerned about "issue 2016..2017", but not "issue"?  Isn't this just one search with even stricter criteria? 
This is the only good way to search reddit  Now if only it didn't link to shitty fucking mobile versions 
I trust Reddit more than many other sites. I can read a bunch of different opinions and be sure that I'm not being misinformed by a biased source. 
Seriously, pinterest in image results is fucking cancer. 
I do this primarily because every single website I find on a given topic is either loaded with garbage intrusive ads that block my whole screen, is segmented into ten pages, or flat out crashes my mobile browser. Reddit threads on the other hand are almost always buttery smooth. 
Google treats the slash (and lots of other punctuation) as basically any word delimiter, so `John/Smith` becomes `John[non-word character]Smith`. Since it has no spaces, then Google will not separate the terms and search them as a unit. The difference between that and `"John Smith"` is that `John/Smith` should return any of:  * John-Smith * John/Smith * John.Smith * John Smith * etc. 
Dear Google, what's that thing where the guy does the stuff with his hand, and then the girl gets that thing that smells bad? Thank you, from Doris. 
I dunno, I consider myself fairly experienced, and I sometimes just literally type a question I have into google. The results tend to be forums where others have posted the same question. 
The more words you use, the more of those words need to be in your ideal search result. Similarly, Google has an easier time mapping synonyms and similar words to those chosen if the string is shorter.  *That said*, if your query is very close to what you're actually looking for, this isn't a bad way to go. 
This is easier if it's a common problem many people have asked questions to.  If say, you're trying to open an obscure or old program and you get a 3DGlobe.wrf error or some shit, then it's important you only google 3DGlobe.wrf and hope for the best 
Absolutely. For instance, searching "vaccines cause autism"...  
Sadly after years of watching people use search engines I would say minimum 75%+ of people ask questions.  
(ananas OR pineapple) AND (sperm OR jizz) AND taste 
I tried that, well I tried removing the overlays and it appears that they are just images being blurred. It could work, but I don't know.  
Teaching people about the + made me feel like a genius when I was in high school sad it's gone 
What's the difference between single and triple quotes? 
When they started Google Plus. I think they want(ed) to dedicate the + sign to search for user handles.  
Problem is these days it thinks it's smarter than you and sometimes searches synonyms even then. 
Even worse is googling something on mobile and the damn google amp page opens instead of the reddit page.  
Honestly, this site can be a gold mine at times but the search function here is garbage. So half the time I need to google something I add "reddit" at the end lol. 
Reddit can be very biased. Techical solutions are pretty trust worthy but I wouldn't take anything upvoted on reddit at face value. 
Just when you think you found something cool, you have to make an account  
I used to do this all the time around 2002 or so, it was the easiest way to get mp3s (way faster than Kazaa etc). Every so often I check it out again for shits and giggles, but all I see are fake sites and DMCA notices. 
Every time my mom calls me, she always tells me about the movies she's watched lately. My mom has a habit of always forgetting the names of the movie but remember the plot very poorly, so she'll describe what happened in the movie to me in the most absurd way. What I'll do is google the movie exactly the way she describes it to me while shes on the phone, and it'll always turn up the movie in less than a sentence. Its so funny to her when I do it. She's like "Oh you googled that so fast! What did you type?"   "movie where white guys saves black guy from slaves and they go to the slavers house and kill everyone"  
that illustrates your point well, though I've often found when I google that it's overwhelmingly about how trustworthy vaccines are. 
I don't know why you regard that as sad. Depending on what you're looking for, typing a question is frequently a good way to turn up a result of someone asking the exact same question in a forum somewhere, followed immediately by the answer. This is particularly true with common software. You being the first person anywhere to have a particular problem with Excel is like winning the lottery - not fuckin likely. 
Asking questions can actually work out great many times.  
Yep, in a presentation a few months ago from a guy at Google, he told us they are trying to make it answer questions that are in natural language... Which obviously is not helped by people who type only keywords (like me) because they don't trust it lol. He was working in a team that makes some back end stuff about understanding natural language better, which helps with all Google products like search, translate, etc. 
Yeah I do but those are no replacement.  The "+" operator forced the results to contain a certain term.  For example "+adidas running shoes" would return results that ALWAYS had the term adidas.  It was great. 
When you visit a website, your browser automatically copies the web page to your computer and shows you that saved file - that's you "on the site".  You're going to edit this saved page - and delete the popup - in 2 steps.  Here are Enxer's instructions step-by-step on how to do that:  1) Right-click the gray screen that gets displayed over the site and choose "Inspect".  2) It will highlight some code - press DELETE on your keyboard  You *may* have to do this one more time to get rid of the grey You *will* have to do this again in a few days when your local saved copy of the page is automatically refreshed 
Easier method: install uBlock Origin (available for all major browsers, as far as I'm aware) - it's a great ad and element blocker.      When you come across an element you don't want to see again, click on the ublock icon, find the eye-dropper, and use it to select the element you want to disappear. Due to the various ways undesirable elements can be coded, occasionally this must be done a few times for a single irritating element.   As far as I'm aware, pinterest doesn't load more than just a preview of a page unless you're logged in, so this method (and the aforementioned, by /u/enxer) don't work there, unless the image you want is right at the very beginning (which you know it damn well isn't).   
You're right, I don't think that search would work. OP's mom would be on both sides of the house. 
No wonder I was having so much trouble last week.  Why the hell did they remove it?  
Damn, what will happen when they launch Google Colon in 2018 
God damn I hate it when it thinks its smarter than me. The other thing is when it takes the one key term *out* because it found way more results with that term missing... except I was *trying* to narrow down the search to the small subset of manageable results, not wade through 100,000 unhelpfully broad ones! 
-site:pinterest.com will exclude useless image results. 
Reddit is valued at at least $240 million dollars, and they can't make a half decent search function. 
Yep! I've definitely done tech support issues this way  
Yeah, seriously. You can get +1000 upvotes for something in one sub, and -500 in another.  
And I've been using -one -two -three like a pleb all these years 
I get flagged constantly and I always get the "I am not a bot" check box. 
Alternatively ---  1 response:  "Just Google it noob" 
This worked beautifully for me once,  i dont remember what movie it was but it was an amazing view into technological advances 
Is that real? They seem hesitant to even tell what vx means 
Google scholar puts this argument to rest. You can literally search "thimerosal" and read the abstracts of the top cited papers.  You don't even have to understand the study, abstracts are often written in plain English and are easy to digest. 
My wife Googles literal questions. I use keywords. She sucks at Google. 
"Do pineapples, also known as ananas, have an effect on the taste of your sperm, also known as jizz?"  Or, find a result that includes:  Either "pineapple" or "anana",   Also either "sperm" or "jizz",   Also "taste" 
You forgot a critical step: go up a row or 2 and delete *that* code, not the code that is initially highlighted 
lol that place is boring trust me you don't wanna go there  
I got 70,700,000 results...Not sure what to think.  
Happened back when they released Google+, so probably because it interfered with that.  
The 500 early adopters will insist that the quality of shits taken with a Google colon is vastly superior, but no other shits will be given 
Results for "how to fix car in GTA":  * How to fix cars!  * ^^^missing: ^^^~~GTA~~  
especially frustrating if the Name you are searching for is similar to a celebrity.  If you would search for a Woman named Brittney Spear you would never find her because the Popstar would kill all your search results 
Fuckin pinterest with their domination of the Google image results. 
What even is Google amp?  I use like every single Google product daily and still I have never heard of that. 
People give posts ambiguous titles and wouldn't bother tagging them  "I just found this weird tip today to help with my craft" is probably the title of that post you're looking for, and you'll never find it because of the stupid title 
The other day I typed in "The other pig movie" Gordy was the first result. I was amazed.  
It's a joke sub about what technical jargon looks like to the uninformed, but they are SUPER committed to never spelling that out (because it would ruin the joke). I had to browse the place for like an hour the first time to figure it out. 
That's not true. Abstracts are generally written assuming the reader has significant background knowledge or is willing to read through the paper's introduction. Press releases are generally easy to digest.  
"ananas" is the word for pineapple in a few languages, it's not a plural of "anana". 
Correct me if I'm wrong, but "or" actually means  X or Y, or both. 
Right there's definitely no discussions between the masterminds of Reddit who are secretly controlling the masses there. Seriously, don't bother!  
I got 2 results for both searches. Wtf is going on? 
And they didn't think of renaming their useless unused service rather than messing with an age old convention. Urgh, Google.  
"How to cook method in GTA"   Results for: how to cook meth.     And, now I'm on a watchlist.   
I read this imagining that she intentionally goes out and kills anyone with the same or a similar name to her in order to gain Google dominance.  It's been a long morning, the coffee hasn't kicked in yet... 
A Google cache that speeds up certain high-traffic sites on mobile devices. Makes linking a pain.  
"He got it!"  *gif of a cat leaping 10 feet to catch a mouse*     
"Thingyouwanttoknow site:Reddit.com" is useful for finding info even in the comments but finding specific gifs or pics is rare due to the title being part of the content as a whole instead of just labeling it. That would be boreing a hell if Reddit was just pics with the correct title. This is cat picture 443 enjoy. This is cat 444 enjoy. 
If I could search Reddit and find what I was looking for, I wouldn't need to outsource it. 
Fun ract: I once had trouble confuguring a program correctly. Asked on reddit. Found the solution by myself a few hours later. Commented on my thread with a detailed description on how to do what I needed (due to the referenced xkcd).  Now fast forward a bit more than a year.  Different PC, same problem. I didnt remember the solution, just that I found tge solution somewhere on the internet. Went forward to look for it. Found a great explanation which described all steps on reddit. Had the thing set up in 2 minutes. Wanted to thank the author just to realize that it was my comment.  Not sure if I should be happy (helped my future self) or feeling stupid (forgot the actual solution for a problem I solved a year ago). I went with the former :) 
It isn't a joke, there are posts in that subreddit that clearly explain exactly what "VX" is... 
Abstracts should never require reading anything other than the abstract and the title of the paper.  They are supposed to be a brief summary of what the paper is about, the method used if relevant, and the major result. They are primarily to give you an idea if that paper is going to be helpful to you as a researcher without having to read the whole thing.  Of course, some papers are so opaque that even a subject matter expert can't make head nor tail of them, but for the most part abstracts of papers published in any decent journal will be readable by anyone moderately familiar with the field. 
Google isn't making much sense in general when it comes to Google+ 
I don't think that - works any more. It's a trick I used to use lots, but haven't been able to get working recently.  
It's no joke! There's a lot of active research into sub-Coulombic inductance coils. Apparently they could have applications in electric cars, Hyperloop projects, and Cranford C-beams.  
Or most things they do.   Here's a laptop! But you can't take it out of the house as it needs data to work. No it doesn't have data capability haha 
My buddy did his PhD on Cranford C-beams. Their paradoxical change in structural strength compares to withstanding deep oceanic pressures when the forces are applied perpendicularly, where only the hypercrust plating was applicable in the tangent corners. The sub-Coulombic inductance coils could funnel out the weak energy so only the forces necessary to maintaining integrity of the C-beam and increasing its resistance/kg property remain within the structure. 
I think this may be something more serious/different than what most the Redditors up til now have said!  The commanders of the special forces don't support those in the coup. Which means not all the military is joining in.  This could get much uglier than a "return to secularism" that many are advocating, especially if the military is split on its support. 
I don't know much about Turkish politics but apparently the Turkish military has a standing order to overthrow the government if it becomes too Islamic. 
Pro Tip: Don't trust partial video clips claiming one side wiping out another.  This PR tactic was used to great effect during the Libya civil war as well as during the Venezuela coup against Chavez with very little editing needed.  Took a long time to get uncut versions of videos that gave you context. 
I'm living in Ankara.1-2 hours ago i was looking the news for these incidents. And suddenly all mosques around neighbourhood(later i learnt that all Ankara) beginning to calling prayer . And these call is the same prayer when somebody dies. And After he finished calling prayer ,he began to read an anouncement which R.T.Erdogan invites puplic to the squares to stand out the Army. And while  anouncements and ezans were still made there was a huge exposion.It was far more scarier than a very good horror movie.And now; there are still F16's flying around and explosions occasionally.I wonder what kind of a Turkiye i will encounter tomorrow. It is so disturbing being in Ankara now.. 
"There are decades when nothing happens. There are weeks where decades happen"  -Vladimir Lenin 
Erdongen is so maniacally against protest but is urging people to protest this. What a hypocrite. 
I love CNN's live stream  "The coup is over"  "Soldiers entering CNN's studios in Turkey, it may not be that clear cut" 
Urges his supporters to go on the streets and fight, while he's safely on a plane and seeking asylum in Germany. Typical Erdogan. 
Welp, he's saying he's going to neuter the military.  Welcome to authoritarian goverment, Turkey. 
While principally not a fan of coup d'etats, it's been increasingly hard to not kinda want one in Turkey.   Though that feels awful to say.   I hope it'll pass as bloodless as possible and cool heads will soon prevail. 
Erdogan calling people to the streets, wow what an absolute mongoloid.   There are tanks and helicopters out there. The civilians are fine where they are. 
For those wishing Erdogan would be a little less authoritarian, I don't think this will end well. When Turkey gained its independence, Mustafa Ataturk viewed the military as a way to keep the politicians in check, and that seems to be the basis for what happened tonight. Some in the military must have felt that Erdogan was overstepping his bounds, becoming too authoritarian and too sectarian for what was demanded of him, and so in response, I expect Erdogan to come down with an iron fist and be even more authoritarian than ever.  
Has the Coup really been repelled or is it propaganda?  
Gulen this, Gulen that, cleanse this and that. Erdogan has become delusional, paranoid, and worst of all, dangerous. Turkey is in a 100x worse position now compared to 24 hours ago. 
Why does nearly every "Hey, Turkish guy from Istanbul here, coup failed!" comment come from new accounts?   
So Erdogan is denied re-entry at Istanbul, denied refuge in Germany, asks UK, then turns around and hovers south for a couple of hours, then zooms right into Istanbul in the face of a millitary coup and starts talking trash about the millitary?  Something doesn't add up 
This whole thing looks more and more like a deadly ruse. Erdogan is flying into the airport, how could he do that if he had any uncertainty on whether he'd be shot down or taken prisoner. He'll land and look like a fearless conquerer. This is too real to be a game, but it's too silly to not be one...  
Idk why people are saying this is over, it does not look that way. I am still seeing new video of gunfire and smoke coming from Ankara. 
* coup was staged at 22:00 pm. not 05:00 am while nobody could respond. * junta did not kill the internet. * junta was at max 2500 soldiers * majority of the armed forces watched as erdogan called people to streets against the junta. * erdogan's whereabouts were known but he wasn't touched. * none of the mp's got arrested. * a single unit of 8 soldiers with a chopper tried tv channel hopping in an effort to halt gov't propoganda while there are at least 50 national tv channels. * religious personel was waiting ready to call people to streets with prayers in their mosques.      does this smell cheesy or what? 
Sky News have just inadvertently aired civilians being gunned down on the bridge  
Is no one else actually looking at the live thread?  The coup is failing.  Everybody saying this is good, it isn't.  If this fails, Turkey will truly be fucked. 
So glad I was not born nor live in Middle Eastern countries. 
So ultimately, Erdogan won't mind the results of this night that much, huh? He's still in power, and he can use these events to effectively place himself into a position of full dictatorship, if he wasn't there already.   I imagine he'll go full Stalin on his army for a while.   I guess ultimately, everybody loses. The army loses, Turkey loses, the world loses. It would almost seem like this will end Turkey's long tradition of the military stepping in to fix when yet another government fucks over the country.  
This coup was so unorthodox and sloppily done you have to suspect Erdogan was behind it. Coups are bloodbaths. When the first waves of a few hundred people came out in to the streets, in a proper coup they'd all be slaughtered like lamb at your local butcher. Nobody else would step outside. The military would have known exactly where the president was and executed him on sight. The power companies siezed and utilities shut down. Supply chains run through the military to make the people dependent & subserviant to them. A coup doesn't need the entire military in reality, it just needs a few thousand well rehearshed elite and commited soldiers. This has the potential to happen in any country, America too. 
Askreddit again with the breaking news.  I guess /news is pretty much irrelevant now. 
Turkey is part of NATO, will this require other NATO countries to protect the 'current' government by taking actions against the military group? 
Turks have betrayed Ata Turk. Turks have backed an Islamic government over what the father of Turks had laid the ground works for.   Turks who have the most freedom out of any Muslim nation, have spoken loud and clear. They do not want secular governments anymore.  
It's military v. Military v. Police v. Public support for coup v. Public support for erdogan. Then you've also got the Kurds...many against the coup, some I presume will see this an opportunity for advancing their own political aims, etc etc. What a complete mess. 
They're the ones throwing the coup, not overthrowing it but yes it's a bit of a tradition over there.  
This is my take. Erdogan ratcheting up control. The opposition all disavowed this coup, likely because they reached the conclusion that it was a setup, and I think they're still liable to be rounded up anyway.  Erdogan wanted a huge crowd at the airport so he can land, make a triumphant speech and then declare some marshal law himself. Next it'll be President for Life Erdogan, placing the military firmly under his control followed by a purge, and a rewrite of the Constitution. 
Are you saying this is a fake coup?  Not being sarcastic, seriously interested. 
Having been to Turkey, seen the jewel of Istanbul and met so many kind and friendly people there, I'm truly sorry for what's happening to your country. Take solace in the fact that tyranny cannot last forever.  
Thanks for writing that. As an American who doesn't like Erdogan, I'm disappointed that the military is losing/this might have been a fake coup so the bastard can further expand islamist bullshit.  
Erdogan started creating a way too islamic government. Turkish military has quite a tradition in overthrowing governments to get back to democracy.  
The Turkish military has a long history of removing Islamists from power with coups, this is another go at it 
These past few years have proven why "may you live in interesting times," is a curse and not a blessing.  
Wow. Theory number 2- Erdogan = literally Darth Sidious 
"We are hearing that a coup is occurring in the democratically elected Turkey, the military wants to out democratically elected leader Erdogan, who was democratically elected" -CNN    
Calls people to the streets, flees instead of helping. Lmfao 
Last resort definitely. Last I heard he's going to try to get asylum in Germany 
This is a coherent and sensible analysis. The clumsiness of the coup suggests gross incompetence or an ulterior motive. 
Yeah, I'm on holidays in Turkey right now. This really scared me, because I've never been in a similar situation. I don't know much of politics, but I hope nothing bad will happen. 
Germany told Erodogan to fuck off. He's done for. It's well known he's an asshole, so the only countries to give him asylum would be Sunni Muslim countries, and I highly doubt anyone wants to do that. 
exactly,now erdocunt is asking to snitch on internet coup supporters so he can hang them all as traitors.yeah thats democracy bitchez. 
Why are the Kurds against the coup, I thought they didn't like Erdogan? 
"The president now urinates on a bucket of fish heads while the army marches in hexameter. It's a glorious day for Turkey and therefore the world." 
Correct, Turkey is one of the few nations where the military is a separate entity. They were built and designed by Ataturk to make sure Turkey never turns to Islam.  I don't think this is the first time they've done this, too. 
Or some more eager faction of the military got swindled they had more support and to go for it and are now used as scapegoats.  
Well, tyranny lasts for as long as people refuse to stand up to it.   Every nation so far has shockingly, subtlety backed ergodan tonight... 
As an American who knew nothing about him until an hour ago he sounds like a total douche.  
Many of the old military and police leaders have been replaced throughout the years by the current president with people who are loyal to him. It was really only a matter of time before either the people or military took back control.  This coup seems more like a cleanup of all the shit that Erdogan has been putting in place. Hopefully there are no casualties and new leader can be elected. 
Turkey's military also is very trusted by the general people which makes things smoother 
He backed the democratically elected government, he didn't mention Erdogan by name. 
That's the second most important thing a military should be doing. All enemy's both foreign and domestic.  
What I've read is that people really like the military and support them when they overthrow.  You would then think that the people would then elect people who would please the military.  Yet, obviously not. Why? 
Don't worry, Germany told him to fuck off I think. 
Just do as you're told for now and come back with great stories for the grandkids one day.  
Sounds suspiciously like an attempt to raise a shield using the turkish people as bait to force the army to retaliate against the population. 
Germany rejected him, now's he's looking to the UK 
The Turks there would lynch him, that's a bad idea. 
If you're on holiday in the country, I suggest you contact your embassy in the country (if you have one) and ask what they advise you to do. 
Military has done worse to Kurds through our history than Erdogan even including recent events. For decades when military coups were happening on the west side of Turkey military was for the lack of better term killing and pillaging east Kurd villages with no oversight or care. 
Well not necessarily stopping turning back to Islam but more to stop any straying from secularity. 
I don't know anything about Turkish politics or political/governmental structure. This is pretty fascinating. So in theory at least, their military is like a government watchdog? Only with constitutional power to take action? 
Ataturk is my hero. I wish someone like him came to power in Iran too instead of a fucking Mulla. 
I had a Simpsons level flip-flop.     "Oh a coup, that's bad."    "Oh the people leading the Coup aren't doing too good, that's good."    "Oh, the leader of Turkey is an Islamist with an agenda, that's bad."    "Oh, the people leading the coup support democracy, that's good!".    "President Obama just backed the government instead of the military, that's..."     "It's bad." 
German government was even more vague: "The democratic order in Turkey must be respected." 
How did he get elected by a majority? Were his aims unclear prior to his election? 
It is, but the dangerous bit comes in deciding who is the enemy and who is not. 
Secularists in major cities like the millitary more than edrogen and his Islamist party. In the 1980 coup the millitary ruled for 3 years before democracy was resorted same.will.happen now prob if they succeed. The goal if this coup is to remove edrogen who is trying to seize more and more power  
Is it safe to assume, then, this will help to cut any potential ties Turkey may have with ISIS? 
Yes. I'm presently at a Hotel in Side quite far away from Ankara and Istanbul. Everybody, that is Turkish, here pretends like nothing happened. It's odd. 
That's because Erdogan took over the Turkish media. 
The U.S. embassy in Turkey has said try not to go to the embassy. 
Correct, but considering their position geographically it's unlikely that they'll lean to anything except Islam. 
More or less, yeah. It's really confusing compared to Western powers, but it's a very interesting setup the more you read about it. 
Of course the government would be trying to say they're winning, please ignore the fact that they've been getting bombed constantly by the military and a tank column is en route to Istanbul to detain Erdogan. 
I don't think he's really backing Erdogan it's just that if the coup fails we still have to work with him so best not to say we support the people trying to kill him. It would make meetings awkward  
I'm not sure if it's a good or bad thing that they are so good at overthrowing the governmnt. 
The message from the followers of Khorne were slightly less so: "Blood for the blood god! Skulls for the skull throne!" 
They should, better to stay calm and not 'pour out' onto the streets like erdogan says. Maybe they're used to it or expected this stuff anyway. 
Even more disgusting is the call to prayer. If I was a practicing religious muslim I'd be offended my beliefs were used towards political gain WHILE RISKING MY LIFE. 
What is the reasoning behind that? Is the embassy in Turkey and too dangerous to go there? 
"What country ever existed a century and a half without a rebellion? And what country can preserve it's liberties if their rulers are not warned from time to time that their people preserve the spirit of resistance? Let them take arms. The remedy is to set them right as to facts, pardon and pacify them. What signify a few lives lost in a century or two? The tree of liberty must be refreshed from time to time with the blood of patriots and tyrants."   The exact context for the lazy.  
Like when the US voiced tacit support for the 2002 coup in Venezuela, during the brief period when it looked like it would stick. 
Personally, I think if you're in a region that has a risk of Islam coming to town and taking over, it's probably a good thing to say, "hey, FYI...military can come in and protect the people's democratic rights." 
Under most circumstances, I'm decidedly against a military coup of a democratically elected leader. For this one, I think my feelings are pretty mixed. 
Erdogan is a fucking moron. He's going to get his own people killed. 
They probably say this because it would mean leaving shelter to go there, and if the embassy is attacked, there is a higher chance of civilian casualties. 
That's because if it's a coup and it's in Latin America the United States is almost always the one throwing it. 
Yeah that's assuming the Army never undergoes a religious awakening.  I know it's super unlikely as they think it's their job to be secular, but weirder things have happened. 
The main problem with democracy, and its greatest internal contradiction:  What happens when a leader or government is democratically elected, which seeks to undermine or dissolve the very democracy that brought them to power? 
no way would they attack the embassy - isn't that pretty much declaring war on the us? 
But how do you kick them out when democracy has been subverted?  In other words, is it ideologically consistent to "save" democracy through undemocratic actions? 
97 - sarcastic, grungy, smoking more cigarettes, more clique-y and edgy   07 - petty, attention starved, overwhelmed, but much nicer   17 - under so many layers of irony and memes they dont even know who they are anymore or care. there's no point in being creative or devolving a personality, anything you could think of has already been done.   
Devices and helicopter parenting, which doesn't mean parents who are intensely concerned about their children's futures, but parents who never leave their damn kids alone. 
my dad taught middle school from 1968-2004, when he retired i asked him what changes he saw in students from the beginning of his teaching career to the end. he answered; "the kids never changed. a teenager is always a teenager. the parents however, changed dramatically.  they used to respect teachers and side with us in disciplinary matters, but now they think their kids are perfect and we are wrong.  glad i'm getting out before it gets worse." 
1997 - "You won't always have a calculator with you everywhere you go in life!"  2017 - "Before beginning the test, every student must disable the multi-function calculator that goes with them everywhere in life." 
Going to sound like an old man here, but when I was in high school in '97 we had a system where various teachers aides would photocopy all of the notes, answer keys, homeworks, etc. and put into an unused locker.  My whole class - even the future valedictorian - used that locker.  I'd imagine cheating efforts have advanced since then. 
The 2017 students don't seem so... Alive  **EDIT** This was a very shit Daft Punk joke that has now sparked debate about student life and satisfaction 
1997: Colorful hair and piercings   2007: no Colorful hair, lots of tattoos  2017: Colorful hair and tattoos  (I teach in college)  Oh the other difference was 1997: No one talked about being gay, 2007: students came out to me privately in my office, 2017: Students talk about being gay in class  
'97 - "Quit passing notes" '07 - "Quit texting" '17 - "Are you seriously watching Netflix right now?" 
Senior Pranks in 1997 were outlandish and acceptable. Senior Pranks in 2007 were less common and more basic. In 2017 Senior Pranks are illegal. 
'97 - (Little regard to terrorism) '07 - "Remember 9/11?" '17 - "Can you explain what 9/11 was? I wasn't born yet."  As a history teacher it's been interesting and difficult trying to instill the gravity of events to people who weren't even born at the time. I imagine it was a similarly strange scenario for teachers who taught during the attack on Pearl Harbor or the assassination of JFK. Strange to have major life events turn to just another historical story for kids within a few short years. At the same time, it gives me motivation to keep teaching with the same passion as if the events just happened so kids continue to understand its importance. 
Not exactly what you're looking for, but I have a story to share.  My father graduated high school in the mid 60s. After graduation, he and a few friends rented a sailboat and went from the Carolina coast to the bahamas. Young, free, healthy men spent a few days sailing, a week on the beach, and sailed home.   When I graduated, shortly after 9/11, I tried to repeat this trip with a few of my friends. No one would rent their sailboat to a couple 18 year olds. I guess societal trust has changed. We finally find one through a friend of my father and set sail for the bahamas. 2 days in and we see a helicopter,  then a coast Guard vessel, then we're boarded by us government guys with guns who say "alright, boys, what is it today, you moving guns or drugs?"  After searching the boat for hours (and it's a tiny boat) and finding nothing, we are let go, but instructed to turn around and sail home under threat of arrest if we continued south.  Yeah, so I guess things have changed a bit  
The whole be cool stay in school thing seemed to work I'm not a teacher but I used to volunteer as a middle school basketball coach. Kids take school more seriously than when I was a kid. Which is a great thing. 
I can't say with 100% confidence, but I bet kids weren't dabbing on teachers every day in 1997 & 2007.  
Mom is a teacher for generally 3 to 5 year olds, I got this:  Kids are certainly more abstract thinkers than they used to be. This was a project they did about foods starting with 'P'  97: Pineapple, Pickles. '07: Pecan, Peanut, Potatoes, Pears. '17: Purple lollipops, Pigs in a blanket, Pepperoni Pizza  They're more likely to tell stories and negotiate. One kid roughly explained the concept of double jeopardy--You can't get in trouble for the same thing twice--to a teacher he was having a conversation with. One kid said that he wasn't hitting his classmate, but "the wind pushed him hand when he was running".   If they have a question that you "can't" (sometimes this means "won't") answer, they'll ask you to use your phone or the computer to find the answer. It seems like they're aware that information is very close at hand and no question doesn't have an answer. They don't take "Just because" or "No reason" at face value anymore. 
Am I the only one who's currently a student and not relating to the descriptions the teachers are giving about today's students? Like my classmates are incredibly rude and lazy. Not diligent and polite.  
Ya everyone in school lives on 7 layers of irony and I love it  
But how dare your father not give their *little angel* an a+ on everything.  What's frustrating is that the same parents that read your post will likely agree with you.  But then a teacher gives *their* kid a bad grade?  Well, now that changes everything. 
Once you hit college: you better have brought your calculator mother fucker, no we don't have one for you to borrow. 
But I rocked a rad pager during my senior year in 1997!!! 
Now it's just "you do that assignment?" "I got it from Johnny you need it?" "Yeah send it" then we just text pictures over 
You mentioned gap years so not sure if you're American. But I don't know how most American students can consider a master's with the current cost of education. Some careers it's obviously necessary, but I can't for the life of me figure out what people getting MBAs right after undergrad are thinking...tacking on that kind of extra debt seems insane. I've never once heard someone with an MBA say it was worth it. The wages aren't that different. Unless their employers are paying for it idk why you'd do it.  
Failure in the past was mostly accepted and treated as an indication the student didn't understand the concept. Failure was a teaching tool.   Now failure is seen as a character flaw so parents don't teach kids how to come back from it, they're just taught to avoid it at all costs. 
I mean I'm HS class of 2016 but can confirm. I don't know if I'm alive for 50% of the days I get out of bed. Just keeping a physical body alive long enough to go to class and study and do homework and and go to clubs you don't care about and then go back and sleep and repeat.  There's no passion in life to a lot of '17 kids. People are doing the grind ever so passively because spending time doing something else is a risk in it itself - unless you're using that time to distract yourself, in which case most students will do it to excess.   Man, and I'm part of the problem, sitting in bed texting on Reddit when I should have gone to class but instead slept through it because I was watching a Twitch stream. But I'm just gonna keep doing it, cause I'm just so fucking tired.  
I'm class of 2014. There's nothing to be alive about, you work insanely hard at school for a future you can't care about. No one really has goals or hobbies besides do well 
My little brother just recently graduated high school. During his junior year, another student streaked at a football game.  He was arrested and they tried to get him booked as a sex offender. He ended up killing himself. It was devastating, many many people were horrifie at the school's reaction. I remember my parents specifically saying that streaking at a big game would've been frowned upon but ultimately not a big deal when they were in school. 
Its called something "digital migrants". When we were young we didn't have smartphones nor simple mobiles. They just arrived so we slowly learned it, but not correctly ( well i myself is still slow with smartphones however I love my kindle reader) and then there is who born into the smartphone era. They are the "digital natives"? Or some short... They see this stuff while they are young like 0-4-10years old so their brain catches up faster and easyer for them to learn. You can see the technological usage between generations. 
As a high school teacher, I definitely agree that kids these days have an extreme reliance on their parents. Instead of approaching me about a grade, they have their parent email me. If a student emails me, it is along the lines of "hey fam can u tell me what homework i missed". The majority of kids have no idea how to appropriately email someone. Also, I can say something in class and within 20 minutes get an email from a parent of a kid in that class. Parents are involved to a point that is ultimately detrimental to their child.  
I am currently in college and personally understand what you mean about the guidance, but I noticed that a lot of it (from my perspective) came from the classes I took. In high school I took all AP/honor classes, the problem with them is that are so precise on their assignments and tell everything exactly how they want within a guideline or prompt. They don't leave room for creative thinking or thinking outside the box, let alone ever leaving the students to figure it out on their own. Luckily I took a lot of shop classes which was a lot of self teaching and I learned valuable lessons that way. But all in all, AP classes are too focused, they pigeonhole students thinking because they only give them one discrete path  
I feel like this account of your teacher conference will be the realest thing I read this week. 
I feel like this was what was portrayed in 21 jump street  
When I was a kid in the 90s my school took us on a field trip to the internet  We all loaded up in a bus and went to a high school in the city that had access to the internet, and learned how to use web search tools like webcrawler and askjeeves  
I like how /r/prequelmemes is so big high school teachers are specifically aware of it.   
Born too late to explore the Earth, born too soon to explore the galaxy. Born just in time to post dank memes. 
There is actually something called "Google amnesia" that exists where it does just what you say. People aren't remembering the facts but instead are memorizing where the facts can be found, the internet  
I was under the impression dabbing died with 2016. Was hoping anyway. 
Where I am, heroin has become the new thing within the last 5 ish years. Weed is normal.  
This has been my experience as well. Lots of high school kids now are very polite and hard working. I wouldn't go as far as more intelligent, but 2017 students are more diligent when it comes to typical high school busywork.   Another difference I noticed between when I was in school and the current students is that high schoolers in 2017 tend to dress and act less like teenagers. In my area, a lot of high school kids dress in business casual clothing, not too many rebellious fashion styles anymore (at least around me). Teenagers attitudes in schools seem to be reflecting the business-like environment as well- much less open rebellion, fewer artistic types, etc.  
Dude on my bus in the 8th grade stopped coming to school.  Someone sold him poison ivy and told him it was weed and he smoked it.  Don't think he died, but we never heard from him again. 
97 - racial slurs  07 - you retard  17 - ~ironic~racism, homophobia, sexism, etc 
Then they go bitch that this generation is too soft 
It's even worse when a professor says "Go ahead and cache the entire internet on your laptop and bring it to the exam. It won't help you. Have fun." 
A Google drive or a network for the students to share everything, making cheating streamlined and efficient. 
MBA is a networking degree. You should get it after excelling in the private sector. Kids who get them asap miss out. 
God damn if this isn't the truth and most of us are still dealing with the repercussions of not knowing how to handle failure.  
So we're inching closer to Japanese culture and are about to start seeing NEETS lock themselves up in their parents house? 
That's because failure now has severe consequences.  The path to a successful future is now seen as so incredibly narrow that any failure along the way, even a small one, is likely to knock you off the path.  How is Johnny ever going to get into Harvard Law if he gets a C in high school chemistry? 
2017 student  Can confirm. Would rather be dead.  Not joking. 
To be fair, this description sounds pretty much exactly like my life in high school graduating in 2006. It was fucking exhausting. I just kept doing more and more and grinding through the work until I pretty much had a nervous breakdown midway through college.  
Not OP, but I'd guess they likely are students who consider OP a mentor or friend. 
I'm 16 and go to a public high school. Everyone I know uses the open school wifi along with a plethora of different VPN apps. 
I just use a VPN to do whatever I want on school wifi. 
Just go to state school and get into as little debt as possible. Nobody ever cared where I went to school. 
this happened at my school but the administration got wind of it and had a "random fire drill" during the time when the alarms were going to go off  so by the time we got back inside, all the alarms had stopped ringing.... 
When I was in grade 8 the senior prank at the high school was to put alarm clocks (actual, physical clocks) all set to the same time into the ceilings of every classroom.  When I started Grade 9 in the fall, they still hadn't found them all, and in some of my classes there would be a full minute of alarm once a day. Way funnier, way more brutal. I loved it. 
That is all streaking should be. but people have to take it to the level of "OH MY GOODNESS MY CHILD JUST SAW A PENIS HOW DO YOU EXPECT ME TO EXPLAIN THAT TO HIM, THIS MAN NEEDS TO BE CHARGED AS A SEX OFFENDER AND HAVE IS LIFE RUINED BECAUSE I DONT WANT TO TELL MY KID WHAT A PENIS IS!!" If my kid sees something and has a question i answer it honestly and just say "dont go bringing this up in public place because it is rude to talk about body parts around other people, it could make them uncomfortable". Parents need to learn that their kids will see some shit when growing up and how to handle that in the proper way with your child is what being a parent is all about. not calling for someones head who is playing an innocent prank! 
The whole idea of a "Sex offender" has become so warped and diluted. It is no longer just for people who pose an actual sexual threat by means of rape or molestation, it is now a catch all for anyone unfortunate enough to have had somebody see them naked. Drunk and peeing in the bushes when a kid sees you? BOOM, Sex Offender. Harmless streaking prank? BOOM, Sex offender...  
That's absolutely terrible. I remember seeing streakers on America's Funniest Home Videos (albeit censored) and Bob Saget and the audience would laugh. I have no idea what is happening to our society but at the very most the guy should have gotten a misdemeanor for disturbing the public or something. There are far too many laws and regulations for the land of the free 
When I was a freshman 5 years ago, the senior class put plastic forks sticking pointy side up in the grass. Had absolutely no effect and most people thought it was just litter.   My sophomore year, the senior class put peanut butter on the back side of all the door handles, so when you try to open the door your hands get sticky. By the beginning of school there were about 20 ambulances and fire trucks and about 15 kids ended up in the emergency room with peanut allergies.  Junior year the seniors all showed up wearing swimsuits, which was my favorite prank, because senior girls in bikinis. Too bad they all got sent home for breakin dress code  When it came to our year we all double parked in the parking lot, directly over the parking lines. And we all got $50 parking tickets.  At our school there was not a single successful senior prank.   
They should have gotten extra graduation points for making funny Reformation jokes! 
Three kids got arrested for trespassing and missed the last day in school my senior year. They were going to put face paint and a wig on a statue of a teacher helping a student that was in the courtyard.   they did not even have to hop a fence or pick a lock but apparently showing up to school at 5 in the morning was illegal as shit.  
I lived literally through the "hey, look, Internet!" and "hey, look, cell phones!" age. Maybe it's because I was tech inclined, but I learned very quickly to use both really well.  There are a lot of people from my generation that don't, though. 
This is so alien to me. It used to be everyone wanted to avoid classes that had part of the grade based on attendance because then you could skip and just show up for exams. 
Well, AP classes *are* supposed to be specifically preparatory for the AP exam. So I'd blame the nature of the exam over the teaching style of the individuals.  
When I was in 7th grade, circa 2009, my school had a policy where if the student completed 50% or more of the homework, whether or not it was correct, earned a 9/10 grade. The only thing it taught was 12 year old me to do half plus one of the work and get an average grade. I blame that for my half ass work ethic now.  
I laughed when he said she was hot.      (it's probably a plus that she gets along with his daughter)    
That's exactly what I was thinking. I mean I think that movie exaggerated it (the cool kids don't think that "organized sports are so fascist"), but I do think it's true that the nicer, more accepting kids today are the "cool" ones. 
That was why I always hated history in school.  It was a lot of memorizing dates and names, which seemed useless to me.  Id rather we learn about what happened than exactly when it happened. 
'I was born far too late to discover the lands,   And the seas, and the skies, and the shores and the sands.   All the steps have been stepped, and the walks have been walked,   And the sights have been seen, and the talks have been talked.  'I was born far too soon to discover the stars,   And I'll never set foot on the red dust of Mars.   I shall only encounter the future in dreams -   But at least I have memes.    But at least I have memes.'     
We were 18 at the time and just didn't know better. We do now and that shit wouldn't fly today. We also didn't want to spend our vacation in jail, so we docked in the Florida Keys a few days and went back home instead of the bahamas. 
I'm seeing a few responses similar to this below.  I can't help but wonder if this is a result of these kids knowing they'll be competing for fewer and fewer jobs that pay less and less in the near future.  
Not sure how you roll poison ivy without noticing what it is. 
The cost of failure has gone up, people can't afford them anymore. 30 years ago, if you dropped out of high school and couldn't even read you could still find a job of menial tasks to make a decent living off. If you pull that today, you will get paid slave money and have to work 3 jobs without even affording a place to live, if anyone would even hire a high school dropout. Multiply by 1000 if you drop out of college and god have mercy on you and your family if you ever get sick and don't die instantly. 
Probably, considering our future economy is likely to resemble Japan's more and more in the future. Over-educated and under-employed young people working part-time work to eke out a living and finding satisfaction in personal pursuits rather than career ambitions. 
Not just on an academic level. God forbid you make a mistake in front of others then the whole world will know because of social media.  
I graduated 5 years ago, but I think it's that social media showcases the best of peers' lives and most people can't understand that enough to overcome that bias, so everyone feels inadequate compared to everyone else.  
I feel like I'm beyond a nervous breakdown. I've gone past it and now I'm just in this intermediary where no amounts of stress gives me urgency anymore.  
Yep and also I teach/do research on sex/sexuality topics so a lot of students come out to me.   
I assume the only reason they haven't blocked all those apps is that your IT guys must also use those programs to stream video content all day. 
This is exactly what we did my senior year (2008). We bought a bunch of cheap alarm clocks, set them for times we would be in the classroom, opened a ceiling tile, and chucked it, so we could honestly say we had no idea where they were.  We also parked two students' compact cars in the hallway, moved a teacher's entire room (desks, chairs, tables, everything) from her portable to the elementary school playground just outside, put every plant, fake or real, inside our principal's office, and put a RickRoll on a loop in the cafeteria TVs, then hid the remotes and ladder to get to the DVD players. I'm still pretty proud of that night. 
The really funny thing is due to the internet more younger children are now aware of human anatomy and sexuality than ever. The parent's whole "won't someone think of the children" has now become willful ignorance. Your child has probably seen more porn than you have. 
I got the pleasure of watching a drunk guy outside of a frat house pissing on the side of the house when campus police confronted him. They told him they saw him pissing, and the dude's response was "That's impossible. My dick is so tiny you couldn't have seen it!"   Campus police left him alone after making such a watertight argument.  
It's not laws and regulations that are the problem.  (Except for zero tolerance policies). There are certainly cases where you'd want a naked guy hanging around school to be brought up on sex offender charges.  The problem is everyone, especially school administrators, being unwilling to use common sense. 
In my senior class of 09 we all brought one golf ball with us to our graduation. After we each walked and shook the principals' hand, we would give him our golf ball. After quite a few walks the principal was frantically cradling about 20 golf balls as they keep falling and bouncing everywhere. His pockets were absolutely stuffed with them as well. Half way through someone just brought out a bucket for him to throw them in. Innocent yet amusing. 
I graduated in 2011.   We were told at the beginning of the school year that ANY senior pranks would result in immediate expulsion (and thus failure to graduate) for anyone deemed to be involved.   This upset even the parents.  So then, after winter break, it was announced that student council could put together a senior break committee and meet with the vice principals who would approve the prank and date of the prank.   I don't even remember what came out of that, if that tells you anything about how it went.  Also 2 of my teachers (who taught classes almost entirely made up of seniors) scheduled tests for senior skip day. So I didn't get to do that either. 
No, they should have been burned at the stake for condoning heresy. 
For any who are wondering. No the goat didn't survive. it was a very shallow river and about 20-35 feet above. 
If you've ever used a TI-84 Plus C you'll realize how amazing the CE really is 
Been in IT for 30 years, beginning on the "big iron". It's the pace of change that is different. Related is, which horse do you want to ride (.net, java, Ruby, etc.)?   My kids still roll their eyes at me because, for example, I can't get something to work on it. But when they have computer problem, who do they come to first? Yup, dear old Dad!! 
It just all flowed together in a way that suggested he was making a genuine comparison at all levels on his radar with no regard to the perception we might have of him. Just a slice of life. 
Yea but you didn't do anything wrong I don't understand. 
High Seas is 24 miles from shore, I believe. In international waters, you are still operating under the jurisdiction and the laws of the country whose flag you are flying. Also, piracy is illegal--pirates are considered "Enemies of all Mankind" and thus all nations are free to persecute them on the high seas. 
That would be my hypothesis as well. Kids in high school now have, in a way, had the veil lifted that was on students 10 years ago. Most of them seem to realize that their future isn't as bright and open as everyone was telling them it would be when they were kids.  
The best advice I ever got from a mentor was before the first interview of my career:  "Never stress about interviews.  They already want you.  The reason they interview you is to make sure you're normal."  
Further adding to this :  The social cost is higher as well. You made a gaffe or made yourself look stupid before cellphones and internet? Yeah people remember and might remember for a long while if no one does anything worse for a while.   Now you do it and it's caught on video or talked about online? it's there forever and people who were not even involved or even there or even in your own fucking town will be coming at you. IDK if teen suicide rates have gone up though...but I think it would still contribute to the "holy shit I can never mess up not even once" fear that young people have today.   
Now if only we had a nationwide transit network like they do... 
Social Media has truly shown how narcissism and low self esteem is a pandemic. The only people that get joy out of others misfortune are people that are not happy with themselves and have to get that small feeling of being above someone else. Before social media the trend started with watching reality TV. I can't wait to see what the next 'ego boost' machine will be. 
This is very important. People don't realize that we don't post our bad shit on social media, only our best. We shouldn't compare other people's highlight reel with our behind the scenes.  
That's a real bummer, I don't know your situation but are there really no teachers that give positive reinforcement, friends, family, coaches, etc? 
It would seem from the sentiment in these comments that you've all been thrust into adulthood early. (Correct me if I'm wrong; that's my interpretation.) It's like you have adult rat-race-stress and society hasn't yet let you in the maze. 
That's messed up.  Google and Wikipedia, etc are literally an extension of our brains these days.   
They most probably know you're using one. They don't care, but they know. 
My wife's a teacher. Teenagers are soooo bad at keeping shit a secret. Like, teachers have ears, ya know? 
Nice. Our senior prank (2009) was to go to Michael's, buy a BUNCH of glitter in our school colours that we sneaky poured out while walking down the main hall.  Glitter.... THEY WILL REMEMBER US FOREVER IF THEY LIKE IT OR NOT. 
Yeah.. I remember when my son was 9, I was checking his computer history, and he had searched for "nekid veginas".  After I excused myself to laugh for 10 minutes, we had another sex talk  
When I tried to have 'the talk' with my then 9 or 10 year old she told me, don't worry mom, I have the internet. I checked to make sure she actually knew facts not bs and she was good to go.  
See, this is a senior prank that is funny and not just kids being assholes. When my husband was in high school (as a junior; I teach at this school now and have heard the story), some seniors snuck in the school and straight up vandalized shit--destroyed the school emblem on the brand new commons floor, shot off all the fire extinguishers, put glue into most of the locks, tipped over the shelves in the library...all shit that was just criminal and not at all funny. 
It would have been great! If they had used whipped cream, or almost any other type of sticky food item that didn't have a deadly allergy related to it. 
I have a soft spot in my heart for goats this is awful 
I have the TI-84 Plus CE and it's my favorite calculator. No ragrets on spending $190 on it 
My dad learned to program on Fortran. When we looked at my Sophmore year high school schedule and saw the PASCAL course he called it "new fanlged.". This was 1999. 
I had a doctor send my parents out of the room to tell me I had an STI, but then when they came back in went on to discuss how I should tell my partners to get tested, etc. defeats the point, dude. 
Her ass was thick as hell.  My wife and I discussed it more than we talked about my kid's grade. 
Not doing anything wrong and not having your day/holiday/life fucked over by over-zealous police are not mutually exclusive, sadly.  
Yeah we were told we could be whatever we wanted, and that there were plenty of well-paying jobs. With the globalization of social media and communication, it's impossible to lie to children anymore. 
Bingo. My son is only 12 but I'm teaching him C++ and emphasising math and science. I barely graduated high school in 2002 and quickly realized that there were no well paying jobs for the undereducated. Not to mention the unhappiness that comes with being undereducated. My son will not go through the same struggles. 
I had an interview for an internship, but they also interviewed 40 people for the position.   ...Apparently they didn't want me. I didn't have enough experience to get the internship to get experience. 
Yep. Rates are way up. 16-21 seems to be the "danger zone"   Fun fact. Female teens are more likely to attempt suicide. Male ones are more likely to succeed in the attempt.  
I took me like a month at my job to have my Internet Access unrestricted.  My job:  Programmer. 
can confirm, my high school blocks almost all VPNs and I got a detention for hosting my own VPN at my house 
My school's senior ditch day was ruined  Because a senior asked her dad if she could participate in it  Her dad was the principal  
When my son was the same age I found "girls who are not wearing underpants" in his browser history.  I actually still can't type that without giggling. 
This is why I think it's awesome that pornhub now has a sex education channel to talk about the reality about sex.  It's kind of fucked that we now need porn sites to properly educate people on sex, since schools aren't doing it. 
If only that riverbed would have had a soft spot for goats...R.I.P. goat bro  
If he's able to learn C++ well right off that bat that is great. I never had any programming until college and once I did get some taste of programming I loved it.  If your child isn't keen to take on C++ (as it might be a little 'dry' for a youngin') you might look to the higher 'framework' languages (like swift, or .net framework with C#) which don't get into the dirty parts that C++ will have, but will increase his interest in programming. I hope your son is enjoying programming. I love the ability to 'make solutions' that programming allows.  Good Luck! 
Most males use suicide such as hanging or guns which will kill you pretty quick and usually works.   Females tend to use something like OD on pills or slitting wrists which is slower and is less reliable? (If that's the right word for it) 
Am surprised you got caught, school administration is normally very tech illiterate. I could have told them straight up that I use a VPN and they would think it was done kind of drug. 
Our senior ditch day was ruined because our "valedictorian" had her mom ask the school if it was an excused absence. Are you fucking kidding me?? The answer was in the name! 
You mostly get girls in underpants with those search words. It is important to be able to use google in a good way, so you need to have a talk with him. 
My brother was 6 years old when he googled, "naked ladies." I was blamed for it at first until the kid admitted to it. Probably the first time I wasn't the one who got in trouble haha 
...since parents aren't doing it.  I had the first "talk" with my son at 10. (Basic plumbing, dangers of becoming a young father, and mention of disease and the possibility of his weiner falling off.) Small discussions and questions along the way since. We'll have the final talk this year as he turns 13. (Foreplay, what diseases and why you might wish they actually made your weiner fall off, consent and the danger of being labeled a sex offender, emotional harm, etc.) 
I had a few friends that got the shit kicked out of them in a police interrogation that took place on the streets of a quiet suburb.  They were looking for drugs, and they really weren't accepting the fact that there were none.    We were all around age 16 at the time, and some old lady had called in saying that we were doing drugs in the woods.  We were setting up a fort and just talking. 
I had someone call my license plate in because they thought I was selling drugs with all the people coming over to my house. They thought deodorant on my car seat was coke and searched my car threatening to bring me down to the station if I don't give them my phone without a passcode. They found nothing but cops will do anything it seems. 
I knew someone who was arrested, charged and convicted of "going equipped to commit burglary" because he had a spare pair of black trousers on him... because he was on the way back from the gym, after dark, in a bad area... where he lived. He had a previous conviction (weed I believe) and was poor and working class, so he didn't have any chance of getting a fair trial.  
How was it ruined? Just ditch like normal. Them knowing ahead of time or not doesn't change anything. 
The only talk I ever got was when my dad told me "If you get a girl pregnant, you don't have to marry them.  Pay for an abortion, take care of the kid, be a father, whatever, but only marry someone if you actually want to marry that person.  You can be a parent without having to be married to the other parent.  Both sides being happy for themselves is best for the kid." 
Unlock your phone so I can illegally search it or I'm going to arrest you!  
Right? Here I am, 28 years old, successful in IT, and proud that I have my own VPN at home...and kids are getting detention for it now?! Get off my lawn!  
Who is this hacker VPN and do teens ingest it anally with tampons? News at 11. 
At my school, when the administration caught wind of a skip day, they would enforce rules very strictly for an unexcused absence, meaning your teachers had to give you zeros for anything missed that day and it also opened you up to getting put into detention.  I more than made up for that time my senior year when I'd skip out on pep rallies. Not too upset about not having a skip day. 
"Your mother and I have decided it's time to chat with you about Search Engine Optimization" 
In the 90s growing up we'd skateboard all day and night and maybe run into police bullshit a couple times a month. But after 9/11 there was a dramatic shift. Within just minutes of skating boarding anywhere we would be instructed to get on the ground and then we'd be searched - body, clothes, backpacks, cars we were driving ect. for hours and then be interrogated about "what drugs we were on?", "where the drugs were?", "why we were at that particular location?" and then threatened with all sorts of tickets and arrests if we didn't leave immediately. It was pretty insane.   I really miss "the good ol days" where you could set out with no plans and just hangout downtown without officers grabbing your nuts and asking about drugs.  
I hadn't done coke at this time in my life, yet. It was old spice original. I always keep a stick in my car. 
A lot of these are just things you'd ask a genie, not a foundation.  I'd have them pour water on my enemy's face 15 minutes after he falls asleep. Every time. 
Someone asks them a question any time they take a bite or sip of something. 
have to work for the make a curse foundation having to inflict all of this and ensure it all works 
As soon as they fall asleep at night they will be startled awake by a loud scream from inside their home and only they will be able to hear it.  
Get the biggest boner in the most awkward and humiliating situations and only get a half boner when they actually want one. 
All critical emails, mail and other indirect correspondence simply wouldn't reach their intended recipients. Mundane stuff would go through as usual though so rather than being able to identify the curse, the target would merely feel alone and ignored in the world. 
Their internet connection will disconnect at random. Also when they are going to watch a video, their connection will be slowed so the video stops to buffer often. 
Make everything in their life slightly too _____.  For example, maybe they'd go to a restaurant that's slightly too far away from their house, only to be waited by a slightly too chatty (and therefore slightly too slow) waitress. Their meal would be slightly too salty, or perhaps slightly too bland. It would cost slightly too much, and be slightly too cold. I think you get the idea (In fact, I think I explained slightly too much). 
Speaking as someone who has been battling a cold for a week, I would inflict the curse of the nose whistle. Once an hour, the noise would spontaneously resolve, only to start again 30 seconds later.  
Random people would come up to them while they are around coworkers/family/people who matter and say things like:   "Wasn't that orgy wild?  Hope to see you at the next one!"  "Hey, what is that herpes medicine that you use called?"  "Where are your seats for the Nickleback concert?"  
An itch down at the bone that moves through their body in varying intensities.  It can never be scratched properly and it can't be adjusted for. Just a constant itch ranging from inconvenience to straight up agony  
Replace all of their sugar with salt... I am a simple man   
Show them what would have happened if they said 'yes' all those years ago... 
I'd remove their brain / mouth filter. Everything they think will be spoken aloud.  
Every time they introduce themselves people mishear their name and call them a slightly wrong name. If they spell it out people add extra/incorrect vowels for no reason. 'Grant Smith' 'So that's Gareth Smythe, right?'  
I'd send a pack of fleas to everyone that stops in the middle of a corridor when they know there are other people walking through it 
every time they google somthing important, it rickrolls them and deletes browser history 
Every time they walk through a doorway, glitter falls on them.  
Profuse sweating from every single pore, especially when other people are looking at them. 
No matter what the temperature of the area they are sleeping in is, they will always be too hot. The pillow will never have a cold side either 
Every time they take their FIRST drink of a beverage it will be all dust in their mouth and they have to swallow it to be able to drink any liquid. If they keep spitting it out they will not get any liquid to quench the dryness in their mouth. Once they swallow the dust, the drink will work until it is empty. If they refill the drink, it again produces a mouthful of dust that needs to be swallowed first. 
To fall deeply in love with someone that won't love them back.  
Functioning hair follicles on the inside of their eyelids. 
They'd have a persistent, rock-hard erection that never goes away... until they try to relieve it.   They'd experience immediate flaccidity any time they try to have sex or masturbate, thus depriving them of any sexual pleasure or release.  As soon as they give up trying... BOOM! Boner time again. 
They can't round the tv volume up to multiples of 10 or 5  
B.O that they cannot wash or perfume away. They will stink everywhere they go. 
They miss anything they throw or drop, every time.   Even if all they do is drop something an inch above a table it flies to the edge and drops to the floor.  
Replace their IV drip with LSD, turn off the lights, play sounds of children crying.  
Every bowel movement should be excruciatingly painful, but should alternate between liquid stools and constipation.  
Opposite co-ordination. Every time they want to make a left turn whilst driving, they turn right. They wanna grab something on a shelf? Their arm moves down instead. They also read signs mirrored too, so if a sign says left to them, it means right. 
They are given a pie. They cannot eat anything else or drink anything other than water until the pie is completely eaten. They don't have to eat the pie in one sitting, but it is the only food they are allowed to eat until it is gone.  The pie is made from green (IE not ready to eat at all) strawberries and has no sugar added.  Also, if they don't finish the pie in one sitting, the people at Make-A-Curse will discreetly replace the pie with a more-complete pie every now and then, so the curse continues on forever. 
Spoilers. Just... spoilers. They will never enjoy an new movie ever again 
For them to suddenly have a undying fetish that would make normal relationships impossible. Like Paraphilic infantilism or Necrophelia etc 
10 thousand octopuses all over their house and car  
Insomnia, it would take them at least 2 hours to fall asleep. 
Since everyone else is doing curses instead of single acts I'll follow suit...   I'm a robotics guy. So my enemy would be too (if I have one?) whenever they supply voltage to something it's either 10 times more to 10 times less than they think it is.   The amount of magic blue smoke they will release...  
IMO this is the most brutal and demoralizing thing I've read in this thread.  Even if you love your job and this happens it's hell.  
I don't know why but this was the only one that made me laugh out loud.  
You have to let them get some sleep, otherwise they'll die from sleep deprivation.  Let's make it random whether the scream goes off or not. Maybe 1 out of 10 times. Enough so that on the outside they appear to be functioning normally but they're being slowly driven insane by Satan jacking their Bluetooth speaker. 
Exploding head syndrome. Happens to me, look it up 
But wouldn't getting half a boner be an awkward situation, thus giving you a full boner?  
Could this randomly work in their favor though? Like maybe his job earns him slightly too much? Or the taxi drive home was slightly too slow, and allowed him to avoid a car accident? 
So a shitty YouTube video that always happens to be the only video of something you're trying to watch. 
I have one of those stereotypical Asian parents. One of my friends would just randomly blurt out "Hey, when was that paper you needed to write due?" or "Are you ready for the math test?" and for the next week, my mom would be all "Pbghin! No playing video games, you have test coming up!" I'd correct her, but the idea of "there might be a test/paper/project due" outweighs the idea of "James is a shit-stirring asshole." 
I have no feeling in parts of my right arm. No feeling, that is, except for when it's itchy. I can feel the itch, but *I can't feel it when I scratch*! It's like nothing is happening. And the itch just stays there for hours, maybe even a day or two. It's literally an itch I can't scratch and it drives me nuts! 
And replace all of their salt with calcium bromide. 
Christ almighty, it's difficult to imagine what that would be feel like. Nice curse 
Time to castrate myself, because if people knew the sexual thoughts I was having then they'd run away. 
Hold off on this, I'm experimenting with behavioral altering by purposefully stumbling into them. Especially if they have their fucking laptop open walking around. 
Did you know that you already HAVE taste buds in your ass? They just don't do anything! 
I know the question said short of murder, but does driving someone to suicide count? 
I would feel so special. It is like a party whenever I enter a place! 
as someone with hyperhidrosis and social anxiety this is just another day for me  
They then become histories greatest explorer since they can sleep outdoors in the arctic or on everest 
On the bit between your finger and thumb? Or between toes? 
This is fucking horrible, maybe the worse not violent one for me. I have a pretty serious drug problem and usually the only time ill stop and go home is after a few days because I smell, I don't know why but for me being smelly is maybe the. Most embarrassing thing, strangely more than being a drug addict.    
that's clever as fuck, and would be insanely inconvenient. 
My wife and i agreed that if either of us was terminal, instead of stringing it out by "making us comfortable", we bail on the hospital, say goodbye to our loved ones, and go on a bender, that for the terminal one, wont end. 
But if they read a left-sign (and understand right) they will try to go right but then go left because they always turn wrong, which makes them right again....? 
Ok, that's a unique one. But it's pretty evil too. The octopi would almost certainly die pretty much immediately so you're gonna have some nasty rotting octopus everywhere for a few weeks, at least until it rains. 
Came to say this, lol, it's not a curse, it's a real parasomnia, and it sucks! 
Maybe, but then since it's no longer awkward, it would deflate back down. Thus becoming humiliating again. 
That's Spectrum to you. Same shitty service and unreliability but not any of the stigma associated with TW! 
Thank God I didn't have friends until my parents stopped giving a shit and moved on to shaming my brother for being a disgrace to the dynasty  
They could also just not wear socks? IDK if it's really a problem is you can just not bother. 
Have you tried using a mirror and scratching where the itch is on the other arm? You might be able to trick your brain into feeling the scratching.  
And replace all of their calcium bromide with sugar 
I'm confused, isn't the stereotype that black people do that?  As in A-Aron? 
Try to look out for the contractors testing signal strength for telecom. They get shit on enough and actually serve a purpose stopping and finding dead spots etc. 
Bullet ants are relatively common and chill unless you fuck with then. Fleas will mess your shit up regardless. 
You can lead a horse to water but you cannot make him sink. Except with concrete shoes.  
Similar to when you're warm after consuming alcohol, you will still die in cold temps no matter how warm you feel. :/   
"Too hot" which means they would start sweating. You probably don't want to start your day in the arctic covered in sweat. 
Yes, psychological damage is what I am going for for my last act of revenge if I found out I'm going to die from terminal illness.  
Don't ask questions, just send him tits and kittens before you get dust in your mouth.  
oh no my plan is flawed. i've been cursed with stupidity on my death bed!! gosh darn that jim! 
I remember that. I still blame user error since they made the joke buttons very noticeable and alerted the user of the new button when Gmail was opened  
My Asian friend married a white girl. His parents just started completely ignoring him.  He considers it a mixed bag.  
Barbarian....who doesn't wear socks with shoes.  Hell i cant even step outside in my orange crocs without socks on.  
Doesn't work. I think it's because I only have some small patches where I have no feeling, with the areas around those patches able to feel that *something* is happening to my right arm.   (Also, it's hard to scratch one arm without using the other arm...but it is amusing to try) 
Both. White people have the "add extra x, y, and zs sterotype" whereas black people have the "laquafanidashaida" sterotype. Both of these are jokes of course, and are not mean to offend anyone. 
i'll take fleas over an animal with "bullet" in its name every goddamn day  e: christ himself could not make me pick one single fire ant, let alone a bullet ant. fleas all the way. 
Great, now I'm picturing George Takei with a ringpop in his ass  
I think I like this better than the original saying 
3 days.. Seems a little short. I dont have time to watch the whole video right now, but couldn't the guy try doing some exercises and meditate? Yoga? Stack the bottles in his room? Make a sock puppet? I dunno, its not like his room is totally empty.  I like being alone, so to me this doesn't seem that overly horrible.. Maybe if he was strapped down to a board and couldn't move or literally had nothing in his room at all I'd feel differently. 
I am literally sitting right next to a girl a like that doesn't like me back (yes she does know).   It never be painless but it does get easier to deal with.  
The problem, IIRC, is that they bound keyboard shortcuts to it, also put it in the same place as the previous button in the UI. Which was very stupid. Not to mention it muted future responses in the conversation, so not only do you look like a minion-loving idiot, you also missed all of the replies asking for clarification.  Modern web apps have already conditioned users to ignore small changes over time. 
I poop my pants all the time as an adult. I keep an extra set of underwear in my trunk. Good times. Used to be a TV reporter and had to poop on the side or the road in the middle or no where in a snow storm. Another time I was moving and driving a U-Haul and pooped in a litter box, my cat never forgave me for that. 
A man who wears crocs is a man on the edge with nothing to lose.  
The only feedback you have is yourself. Imagine you can't talk to anyone. Look into a mirror, for about 2 minutes. Right in the eyes. You'll get bored and want to do something. Maybe you'll talk to yourself, or fix your hair. Now imagine there's no mirror. There is only the four walls and you.  Isolation is a horrible curse that I wouldn't put on anyone. God may have mercy on the poor future astronauts who will explore space by themselves. 
Maybe you should stop being so close to her so you can get over her before you resume the friendship.  
Or, just don't resume the friendship.  If you came to *really* like the person before, all the reasons for that to happen are still there. 
Sometimes I think Satan browses Reddit when he needs inspiration 
*sudden, catastrophic, nuclear fusion occurs*  *thermonuclear explosion obliterates city* 
Damn right I do, you guys are a new kind of sadistic 
How do you feel about being included in so many writing prompts? 
And I think he knows a *little* more about fighting than you do, pal, because he invented it! 
Pretending that I'm not driving a 2005 Toyota Corolla.  
Apparently doing crazy shit on ambien cause I don't remember being up at 8 am.... 
Pretending like my 1.0 VW polo is actually a 2.0 gti  
I have a lumpy cam so i have to bring the rpm's up so she won't stall when cold....sorry. 
I mean I didn't invest in this excessively loud exhaust system for no reason, amirite? 
Probably a mating call for other riced out 95 Civics. 
My car is just really loud when I start it.   And when I drive it.  And when it's in park.  It's loud all the time 
Trying to get my cheap motorcycle to start without it shitting out on me. Once I can rev it all the way I know it's safe to put in gear. 
lol 8am? I would LOVE it if people around here only did it at 8am. Try 2am at the 24-hour fitness across the street. Oh and thumping that bass, that has to be done too. God forbid these braindead morons realize they are in the middle of a residential area and people are trying to sleep. I have fantasies about tracking down where they live, waiting until they go to sleep, and waking their ass up with a bunch of stupid, meaningless noise. Or completely destroying their precious vehicle.  I really fucking hate you if you're one of these people. 
Sitting in a room with four kittens who are obsessed with the zipper on my hoodie. 
Carbureted engine.  Doesn't start easy in the cold, she'll stall.  You fancy pants fuel injection users always trying to keep a man down. 
I'm trying to get my truck started and it won't unless I pump extra gas into it 
What you're hearing is actually the sound of Mustangs at their local cars and coffee.  
I have 02 I feel you.   I was at a red light with my friend and a challenger shows up next to me. As a joke I start revving my engine pretending I was gonna race him. He didn't even hear my engine lol.  
Comcast sucks dicks for sure, but paypal's credit card menu has a profanity filter. I know because "fuck" is the first thing out of my mouth when dealing with the cock-gobbling, idiotic, non-intuitive, condesending bitch voice of their menus. Scream "FUUUUUUUCK!!" one time - ONE TIME? - and she says, "if you are finished hang up, goodbye". Fucking hung up on me! I canceled my account lol. If I can't swear at your automated system you can go fuck yourself paypal. So anyway i don't have paypal anymore   
You forgot the important detail that your HIDs were an aftermarket kit and you didn't bother retro fitting your projector lenses 
No kidding. My mother was on that shit for years. One night she did deep knee bends for two hours in the dark living room. Another night she asked me "where the black man was that liked your hair", when she hadn't had a black guest in years. Yet another night she tried to make a cake - in the morning there was pancake mix, an uncracked egg and maple syrup in a bowl on the counter. Ambien will fuck you up. 
Ambient is no joke. I have nothing but ambient horror stories and very understanding neighbors 
Funny. I'm pretending my 1.8t gti is a dodge viper.  
/r/firstworldproblems:  I'd like to pretend my Series 3 BMW is a 750, but I can't hear the sound of the engine even when I rev it up.   
I also have a theory about people who set their alarm off on purpose every time they are getting into their car because they enjoy hearing it. They bought it, they want to hear it. Every.  Fucking. Time.  
People ask me what my cam is. I tell them it's a 7/11 cam. They are like what? I say that my valves are always open. 
You should go to a mechanic and get that checked out. Lumps in your camshaft are a sure sign of Camcer. 
But I have to work late shifts on Saturdays, you dick. 
They have whistles you can put in your exhaust for that.  
the thing is, this could be a 100% sarcastic imitation, or it could be the guy who lives directly across the street from me being 100% serious - and i'll really never know 
I had a similar experience.  Met a cop in a social setting one time and asked why they let motorcycles ride around without mufflers without ticketing them for violating noise ordinances. His response was along the lines of, "You can't do that, Harleys sound awesome man!"     I just thought to myself, "Yup, there's one part of the problem." 
As a girl.... how is this supposed to impress me?? I don't know any girls who are impressed by guys being douchebags and revving their engines really loud.... 
I am not sure if you are serious, but as a person that has had a non-fuel injected engine, and someone who has listened to people rev their engines to "warm up their car" I have to get this off my chest.  How to warm up a non fuel injected engine.   1) Start car. The engine should sound a little quiet and tired.  2) Let engine warm up for 3-5 minutes. It should get louder, perhaps sound like it's about to take off for space flight.  3) Tap the accelerator pedal once, it should go down to a normal level of engine running sounds.  4) Drive.  You do not need to, nor should you rev the engine every 15 seconds because you're bored. Some areas require that you sit in or with your car as it warms up. If you're bored, catch a pokemon or watch a cat video on your phone. 
Yeah, me too. Except I don't know of this thing you call "park." I have speeds 1 through 5 and a gear marked "R", which I assume is for race. 
Holy shit, there's a 24-7 fitness place that actually has people who work out at 2am... that's kind of awesome.  I've always wondered what it must be like to use a card lock place to go lift at 3am, some weird 24-7 Popeye-bro in there who has been waiting for years for someone to spot his benchpress. 
I always want to blast NPR outside their window. BBC News Hour bitch! 
Ugh I had a neighbor with two ancient trucks that he parked in front of my house.  These trucks shared *one* battery, every time he wanted to switch trucks he'd have to switch the battery.  Hoods banging, engine revving to get things flowing, don't miss that at all. 
2000 Corolla  Last summer my muffler literally fell off, picked up my girlfriend later that same day and she said it sounded like a Ferrari. Nicest thing anyone has ever said about my baby.  
TIL: apparently ambien causes people to do crazy shit they don't remember. Including taking your dong  and social medializing it.  
Ambient horror is my favorite kind of horror. Next to post-rock. 
Sheeet...I just want the mad street credit in my bright red polo :( (secretly wishing it was an rx7) 
I'm just over here making my VR howl like a wookie.  
Your crackpipe is exploding as we speak and your oil pan just kissed a pothole. Your cupholders are laughing at you wanting to utilize them for anything bigger than a RedBull and theres electrical issues plotting against you. But at least your check engine light is on so you know everything is ok. welcome to owning a MK3 VR6. 
That's okay, you can't hear the 750 when you rev it up either.  It's like listening to a velvet lion gently purr. 
Oh dear, it's metastasized to your radiator (I know nothing about cars). 
Mostly a decrease in my fluxalterbators pixelosilating refractotape 
My brother is actually Satan and once an hour he has the fuzziest of kittens tied and tortured to death by blind otters that he doesn't feed. 
Sigh, it's tough being a non-douchebag (or maybe only a slight douchebag) named Chad. People assume I'm shitty from the get-go and I sometimes believe it affects my ability to land jobs. Would you hire Chad? Of course not, he's only going to show up late and will eventually fuck your girlfriend. There needs to be one of those sad PSA commercials shot in black and white about what it's like being a Chad. It's tough people. It's tough.  
People always tell me, "You have the most beautiful dick." 
Except Harleys sounds like shit due to their horribly fucked up engine design 
Yes, this. Some little shit at my work thinks his fart can civic needs to be damn near red lined to get it to warm up when we're leaving work. JUST LET IT IDLE YOU RICEY LITTLE BASTARD.  
They teach us in Finnish driving school that warming engine slowly is worse than driving and warming it faster. The cold engine runs a lot longer cold which grinds the metal parts, if you let it just run still with low rpm. And I'm talking about colder than waters freezing point.  But why would anyone warm their engine staying still? You can use that RPM and gasoline to get going. 
this particular one gets used at all hours of the day, but the broiest of the bros with their tricked out 3fast5furious civics and window-rattling bass cabs tend to be the ones that work out between 12 - 2am, and they tend to be the ones that tokyo drift out of the parking lot, but not before taking 30 minutes to come down from their cross-fit high, sitting in their car listening to what I can only assume is an album of the sickest bass lines to ever be dropped, and only the bass lines.  When I moved to this neighborhood I thought it would be pretty nice living within walking distance of a gym, I'd have no excuse not to work out. Now I hate that place and the particular type of moron it brings around the area late at night. 
My girlfriend has a '98 Corolla, unfortunately still with muffler after 200,000 miles.  My best friend has a Grand Prix and the muffler has a giant crack so it basically does nothing. People say that sounds like something bigger too. 
My dad bought 1000 knives from an infomercial and it came with a katana 
People exaggerate a lot.  You do weird stuff, but for the most part you babble in place and then fall asleep.  Then you sleepwalk to 7/11 to try and buy drill bits. 
Do you guys like your cars? I'm getting my license next month (the age for license in my country is 18 and i'm 19), thinking about getting a polo. Any thoughts? 
I'm an asari who has given up all my worldly possessions in favor of moral duty to the code of law #justicarproblems 
It's scary how well you are able to describe my ownership experience 
They have to create the sound and pipe it through the speakers! 
It's a purpose built chrome moly tube chassis drag car though. Absolute massive roller cam. Open headers and 14.25:1 compression. You wanna hear this thing idle. I pop wood every time.   Oh, and If I ever fired it up at 8am on a saturday at home, I'm pretty sure the cops would come and tase/pepper spray and then shoot me. 
It's almost like you have explosions going off literally a few inches away from you.  
You know after Home Improvement had finished it's amazing run, Richard Karn got a gig hosting Family Feud.  My friends and I were in LA, and went to the taping of the very first episode.  Richard came out to warm up the crowd a little bit, and we could tell that he was a little nervous with it being the premiere episode, so I waited for an appropriate time when he made some funny quip, and I yelled, "I don't think so, Tim!"    He laughed, and gave me a subtle point with the finger.  I think he appreciated a fan in the audience; but the audience itself all turned around and frowned at me like I was just yelling random shit.  One of them even said, "His name isn't Tim."  Suddenly *I* was the asshole. 
Motorcyclists use this reasoning too, loud pipes save lives is the mantra. Except there's no evidence of that, and really they just like being loud because they think it makes them look cool. 
With a username like yours, Chad is the least of your douche bag name issues. Brah. 
But a Maserati sounds absolutely amazing.  I doubt even the grumpiest old fart  wouldnt mind a Maserati revving.    Their engine is BUILT in a special way for it to sound this good.  They actually engineered a Excelent sounding engines.  
Lol isn't the point in 'warming up' (esp fuel injected cars) to let the engine idle/drive at low rpm to get the oil warm? How can you think revving it high helps here?  I know carbureted cars are a different story. 
I feel like you're me.  You don't happen to live in Colorado off of 470 and Broadway do you haha.  I just bought a house RIGHT up the street from a 24 hour fitness.  It is seriously the broiest of bro central.  The hilarious part, is that it's in Highlands Ranch (which, in this state, is suburbia exemplified), where you wouldn't think the bronozzles would be hanging out. 
Ha! Fuck you guys. 96 Corolla. Do I win? She's grey lavender and I call her the Misty Plum.  
I was on Ambien and one night I kept trying to eat a taco, but I couldn't eat it. It was a picture on a taco shell box. That along with many other things that happened that night showed me that I shouldn't take it anymore. 
A Polo is a good choice for your first car. Drives nice, relatively cheap to drive and maintain. Look for one with a recently replaced timing belt and you should be safe from any expensive repairs for a while. 
Some of the Civic Si's had a hose that came off of the intake and diverted sound into the cabin. So you could hear your engine rev. VTEC, yo!  Not making that up. 
Yea what was Wegner thinkin bringin Walcott on that early?  
Those people were uncultured assholes. Probably never read Gatsby, either.  
"His name isn't Tim".  That guy is going to get hit by that thought one day while he's trying to relax and realize that he's a dick and that you knew his name wasn't Tim.  You were just being a GG Greg.  Good for you OP.   How many seasons was home improvement? 
I live in a house that used to be owned by a dude in a motorcycle gang. Every single Harley that drives by my house revs or opens their throttle up to max as they pass by. Every. Single. One. Bikers use their loud pipes to say hi. 
I had heard that motorcyclists have blind otters but I wasn't sure until now. 
Wouldn't a turdcervix indicate a complete lack of douche? 
On the third month Harambe rose again, in fullfillment of the memes. 
Ferrari engines too. They are tuned to a certain note.  
You don't need to warm up any semi modern car these days, just don't drive it hard as fuck right away. 
My dad got you beat on this one - 94 corolla, I don't even know what the original paint was because it's a mess, 3 gears so if you go over 70 it's sounds like it's gonna die, but still his daily driver.  And then there's me, the prodigal son, with the 2016 Corolla - oh well 
No, release as fast as possible, then you'll really get going... 
You should greet them with an air horn. After you jump out of the bushes. 
My 95 sounds like a kitten purring, then you hit 40 mph and the car becomes acoustically attuned to sound of the drive grinding. But hey, the A/C blows colder than a snowmans balls. 
I used to have a neighbor who daily drove (!!!) a 72 Buick with a nasty 455 with a dominator. It sounded like a pro mod warming up in the morning. 
It's like the hokie pokie: left foot in, right foot in, left foot out 
I hope this southern charm is taking away all these rape vibes I'm giving out. 
455's are torque monsters. Small bore and big stroke. They don't like to rev high because of that so you don't see many at the track. 
... and you do a big burnout. That's what it's all about! 
We go to bed, you doze off  So I take your country-girl clothes off 
I was dating this girl that was a little dysfunctional due to being sexually abused by her grandpa and nobody knew about it. I noticed some red flags and got her to open up and tell me about it. After we broke up, I told her mom she should stop inviting grandpa over to Thanksgiving dinners due to the sexual abuse. The mom called me a liar, but after asking the other daughters/cousins about it they confirmed it was true and that they had all been molested too.   After word got back to grandma, she said, "I'll take care of it".  Fast forward a week and grandpa is dead. Apparently Grandpa had a lot of serious medications he was taking and grandma messed with the dosage, which killed him. His death was ruled natural cause and nothing ever happened to grandma. 
Turned left into my sister's driveway at 3 am. A guy on a Harley was doing 60 mph in a 30, with no headlight. My half ton pickup left 4 feet of skid marks from being pushed back by the force. I still remember seeing him do mid air somersaults this was 1976 
I've posted  this before in more detail but the truncated version is when i was 16 years old I hit an 87 year old man after he ran stop sign.  I was with him holding his hand when he died on the sidewalk.  He had a heart attack.  They weren't able to determine if he had the heart attack before the accident which would explain why he blew through the stop sign or if he had one as a result.  His family was very gracious and I am very grateful for them.  His son called me the day after it happened and told me his mom had died 6 months prior, his dad had been very depressed and while they were sad he died this way they were happy to think their parents were reunited.   
When I was 18 I was working the night shift in a nursing home as an aid. Part of my job was to turn the paralyzed patients every two hours to make sure they didn't get bed sores etc. This one particular resident had late stage Parkinson's diseases and her muscles and joints were stiff and brittle and she was catatonic. As I was flipping her from one side to another, I applied light pressure to her leg to move her back a bit and this snapped her femur. Given her age and health the doctors decided that surgery was dangerous and she would have to heal on its own, if at all. Because of this we could no longer flip her, which resulted in bed sores. She eventually went septic from those bedsores and died of septic shock. I always felt so bad about that.  
7ish am on a Sunday morning. I'm heading to work in a small town at the age of 15 or 16. Come over a crest on a hill and have no time to react. T-bone someone making an illegal u-turn in a driveway. All I remember is veering off to the right and damaging someone's stone wall after the hit, crawling out of the wreckage out of breath and stumbling to see if the other person was okay. Their vehicle spun multiple times and landed in a ditch facing away, but driver side visible from where I originally was. Driver wasn't there..move along the vehicle and check the other side.. Driver is hanging out of the passenger side window with a steady stream of blood from their skull. Bottom line for me is that I ask and implore everyone, please use your seatbelt.. 
2 years ago.   My sister was working at a dealership. Her husband and I were spending the day together until it was time to pick up sis from work. He had been drinking tall-boys all day, so when it came time to get his gal I took the keys and said I'm driving. He was mad enough that he refused to go with me. When I came back with my sister he was no where to be found, but it was common for him to go on walks to calm himself down so we didn't think much of it. 8am the next morning, State Police were banging on the door. They told us he was struck and killed by a train while he was sleeping on the tracks. 
My wife and I were both very sick with the flu. My father watched our two small children and even come to sit with me in the hospital. The day after I got out of the hospital he got the flu and died a couple days later.   I still feel guilty knowing that he didn't have to sit with my children, or that he didn't have to sit by my bedside, but he did. It helps knowing that he loved me so much that he was willing to put his life at risk to be with me.   I just never imagined that the flu could have been so serious to hospitalized, much less kill someone. I hold myself responsible and I feel guilty for getting him sick.  
A guy attacked me at 3 a.m. while I was walking to work. I tried to choke him long enough to render him unconscious. And I did. He never woke up. He was a firefighter, a husband, and a father. I know it was self-defense. It still bothers me sometimes, nearly ten years later. 
I was gaming when one of my best friends messaged me asking to talk if I was free.  Since he usually asked this of me just to talk about random stuff, I didn't think too much of it and just planned to reply back to him after I was done with my gaming session.  A couple of hours later I finally replied back to him, but he didn't reply back which I thought was weird but was probably just him being busy.  He never replied again.  I found out the next day at school that he had committed suicide around the same time that I was gaming.  I can't help but think that I could've talked him out of it if I had replied to him immediately.  To this day I still feel guilty about it, and I've resolved to never let a friend down like that again.....too bad I didn't have that thinking sooner. 
When i was younger playing xbox whilst at my grandparents house i had left the room to go to the bathroom, leaving my wired controller on the floor. I suddenly hear a thud and decided to finish my business before seeing where it had came from.  Whilst cleaning up i heard a scream from my grandma and was told to stay in the bathroom. And so i did.  Found out that my grandfather had accidently stood on my controller and fell over the wire, cracking his skull open on the table and was announced dead at the scene when the ambulance arrived.  I am now extra cautious with where i leave items, encouraging my younger brother and sister to clear up their mess once theyre done.   
I was driving a semi a small car pulled in front of me and slammed their breaks i couldnt stop in time my truck wound up on top of their car i was the only survivor of the vehicles involved  
Loan officer for a local credit union.  I ordered a repo on a guy's car; totally justified.  A week later, he gets off at a bus stop about midnight, and starts walking home.  A car hits him, hit & run.  He's found literally dead in a ditch the next morning.  I didn't kill him, but if I hadn't ordered the repo, he wouldn't have died.   
I was working in a nursing home as a volunteer. He was a painter, he told me to bring him oil paints, canvas and thinner, and he would paint something for me.  The next week when I had to return I was excited to see what he'd painted, but he was no longer there. The nurses told me that "they" came to pick him up.  I think he drank the thinner at night. 
When I was 4 and visiting Japan, I opened back door of a car in Japan to the sidewalk but a motorcyclist driving in that space between the curb and road slammed into it. Blood everywhere. I don't remember the exact aftermath since I was so young, but everybody was screaming and I just sat there not understanding exactly what was happening until my mom ran off the scene and into the building in tears.   *Thanks for the kind words, everyone. I don't blame it on anyone, even myself, as it was just a really unfortunate circumstance. As for the thing regarding my parents as discussed below, don't worry about that either. They're out of my life, but honestly while I do believe my parents did some really crap shit to me, I don't wanna be angry at them. I'm here now and by myself, and I think the best course of action is just to put them and this ugly event out of my head.   Unless it's to tell you curious folks. Thanks for the kind words and reassurance :) 
So I'm a mental health worker who has recently had a patient kill them selves, they sadly aren't my first and won't be my last. I followed protocol and didn't do anything medically wrong but will always feel personally responsible for them. There were signs I missed, lies I believed, and things I do differently in hindsight. Some of the families put cases against the hospital but I've been cleared of any wrong doing. Unfortunately when you have the riskiest cases then you can't win all the time. That doesn't stop me feeling incredibly sad when it happens and imagine the family grieving for a lost son/brother/ father.  i will always remember their names and have planted a tree in each of their honour. I strive to become a better nurse each time 
I was driving my girlfriend and I back to town from a day by the water. We were on the highway and she leaned over to kiss me, next thing I knew we were going off the road and then the car was rolling. It just happened.. I had a few scrapes but her seatbelt wasn't on properly and she died there.. in my arms on the the side of the road. Never thought this could happen to me.  
When i was 4 Years old, my mother was roughly 3-4 months pregnant              one day I was supposedly crying and throwing a tantrum over a toy or something,my mother tried to comfort me by cradling me in her arms and take me to to my room which was up the stairs but i cried and kicked so much that she lost her balance and fell down the the stairs, i was unhurt and mother recovered without any lasting injuries    but my sibling died. 
I was a fairly new driver. I was sitting in the parking lot texting someone on my phone. It took a few seconds to send the message.  I pulled out of the parking lot and immediately came to a roundabout. It was a slow day, barely any cars around. A car pulled up moments after me, but since I beat him by a second or two, he had to wait while I went past him in the roundabout.  Nearly the second after I passed him, a big truck slammed into his rear end. And he was going fast. Real fast. Probably 45 to 50 mph.  They both died. The best they could figure, the elderly driver of the truck passed out for some reason.  If I had waited to text my friend until I got home, that man would still be alive. If I had waited for my friend to reply before leaving the parking lot, that man would be alive.  I was just in the wrong place at the wrong time. 
Throwaway account.  5 years ago I was staying the night at my boyfriend's (we were both still living with our parents).  We started messing around, both getting really into it, as usual. He came once, and seemed to be breathing more heavily than usual, which I attributed to me (and felt good about it, naturally). He then suggested that we take a breather, but I was all worked up and insisted that we go again immediately.  During it, his breathing got heavier, and he collapsed. I panicked and called in his parents, and we rushed him to hospital. Turns out he had an undiagnosed heart condition. He didn't make it. The doctors all said that it was probably the sex that got his heart-rate too high, but that I shouldn't blame myself (yeah, right).  I don't think I'll ever get over it, honestly. If I hadn't pushed to go again, he'd probably still be here. 
Deployed in Afghanistan. Urban area.   I got into programming to kill the time. Had an Arduino set complete with everything I would need to make tons of little gadgets. Got pretty good at it too (going to school for it when I get out). When it came time to go home, I didn't have room to take the kit with me, so I threw it out. Keep in mind, locals work on this base, and in my time there, at least three had been kicked out for ties with the Taliban.   Within an hour of tossing the kit, it had been taken.   Didn't think anything of it, probably some other soldier thought it was cool and took it. Big base, anything could happen. About three weeks after we left, an IED went off outside the gate. No NATO casualties, but about 20 civilians died in the blast. EOD reported that it was a "strangely sophisticated" bomb. They used my kit.  My negligence gave them the means to kill 20 innocent people. I've never told anyone in the world about this, and it haunts me to this day.  
The people that shot her are to blame not the person who tried to save her. 
Perhaps even grandma was abused herself and that could be what drove her to do it. 
My sister chose to end her own life by walking into traffic, and in some ways, I feel worse for the people that hit her - she made a horrifying choice that I still struggle to understand, but she made that choice. The people who hit her unfortunately didn't get to decide whether or not they wanted to be a part of her tragedy, and I feel terribly for them. I will never be able to apologize to or comfort those people, and I would really like to, so allow me to use this anonymous posting to kind of do so. The other person made the mistake, not you, and while I expect you'll be haunted by it because it was horrifying, please understand that the family members' grief towards you is heartfelt (albeit maybe undesired on your part).  
Not your fault. J-walking is against the law for a reason. Without any visibility there wasn't anything you could do when someone decides to cross illegally. Add alcohol to the mix and it's just a recipe for disaster. Feeling glad that you weren't being charged for anything is perfectly fine. Ruining your life for something that wasn't your fault wouldn't bring him back, nothing would. 
Did the other forecaster ever get punished for what he had done? 
To hold a stranger's hand in his final moments. You are a beautiful person. I hope you are okay now.  
That seems like it should have definitely been at least a two person job. 
It's a horrible situation and I feel for you, but it's unlikely that you could have saved James. Chances are you'd have come to harm as well. I really hope you'll be okay. 
You would have ended up drowning as well, he would have paniced and grabbed you and pulled you under 
And don't make illegal u-turns like a dumbass. That would've solved the issue.  
Thats not your fault. You didn't let somebody too drunk drive. Thats what you're *supposed* to do. 
The only person to blame here is him.  Seriously, how drunk do you have to be to sleep on traintracks? 
Jesus, I'm sorry that happened to you but it's not your fault. The father shouldn't have given you the gun without checking if it was unloaded first. I hope you can find closure on this one day.  
Be careful with that lady man. That "I'll kill you someday" line is no joke imo. That's some thriller movie type shit.  I'm sorry that this happened to you though. I too have a story resulting in an unexpected death but I am probably not going to tell it, as it will probably give my ID away if any redditors from my area are around. 
Have you done anything about the alcoholism yet? I quit 3 mths ago. Started at /r/stopdrinking and then started to go to AA meetings in my area. 3+ months sober now. My life feels saved. 
Crazy to have a pool party for 6-year-olds, especially with an apparent lack of adult supervision.   Not your fault, but arguably the fault of any of the adults who allowed that to happen.  
As someone with severe, legally disabling depression, it can get so bad that it will drag others down with us if you let it. Luckily, you didn't. What were you supposed to do? Let him keep stealing from you and bleeding you dry and forcing you into your own depression until he found someone else to do the same thing to? No. You did the right thing. This isn't your fault.  
I don't understand why anyone would remotely have a reason to blame you, nor should you blame yourself ...if he didn't borrow yours he could have got a gun anywhere, or just used any other method.  
The family has no right to hate you. You didn't know and they let him keep a gun or had guns accessible to him  
why did he attack you? was he on drugs or had a mental breakdown? 
This is a dumb question, but would it be fair to convey to him that lying could result in his death? Like, this isn't just a perfunctory question. "Are you taking any medicine? I need to know to avoid a fatal reaction."  I once had a dentist who was going to perform surgery on me ask if I did illegal drugs, and when I said no, he reiterated that I needed to be honest because if I did heroin, I'd likely have a fatal reaction to the anesthesia. 
As someone not involved in healthcare, I would never think someone would hide a medication... but I guess it happens.  I'm sorry man, that's honestly a tricky situation, especially if someone insisted they weren't taking anything because they didn't want to be embarrassed.  
Sometimes people do this as a means of suicide.   It's unfortunate you were involved and had to deal with the fallout but it wasn't your fault.  
9yo is very young to deal with this type of situation. You didn't killed him, you just didn't saved him. There is a difference.  
Why the hell did the bus driver wave pedestrians through on a red light!?! Is that a normal thing to do? 
Sorry to bother you but I have to ask. How was the legal stuff following the accident? because it just looks someone else's mistake that hurt you and that poor girl. 
Completely the fault of the bus driver. Why the fuck would they wave on pedestrians at a green light??  
I wonder how many lives you unknowingly saved by repoing someone's car. 
It may take or have taken you a long time to believe this, or maybe you never will, but you did him a really big favour.  
I had a similar but less serious incident as an adult in Taiwan. A friend dropped me off at the place I was staying. I opened the door on the kerb side and a kid on a bicycle slammed into it. He was ok, a few scratches. What some may not realize is that sidewalks are uncommon in Asia and so the area between buildings and cars is still road. The reaction of my friends suggested this was my fault and I should have looked before opening the door. 
My girlfriend gets pissed when I don't respond to that kind of thing while doing something potentially dangerous. This is exactly the kind of thing I'm afraid of.    I'm sorry for your loss man. 
What kind of bullying took place? How did people at your school, especially the bullies, react to his suicide? 
Do you remember this or did your parents tell you?  
I had asthma as a kid. If I still do, it hasn't shown any signs for 20 years.  My asthma attacks, as I remember them, weren't delayed. They didn't happen a day later from a triggering event. I could be wrong, I haven't had an attack in 20 years, medical knowledge has likely changed.   I hate to say this, but not having his meds and refusing the hospital killed your father, not that ride. If that ride was the cause, I think it would have hit immediately. 
That wasn't caused by you.  The asthma attack the next day wasn't affected by the ride the day before. 
Hey, you can potentially Google "accident x street x date" and find out what happened  It's not your fault, and logically you probably know that, but I know survivors guilt, and I know it's not as simple as knowing and understanding that you're not at fault and couldn't have done anything. I'm sorry you're feeling that, and I wish you the best. 
It's part of why I *fucking hate* driving with my father in the vehicle, He'll always be giving helpful nuggets while I'm trying to focus on driving, raising complaint when I don't go immediately, etc. 
Not your fault. You didn't kill her, in fact you thought that if you drove her she would be in more danger. You had no way of knowing Tiffany was that inexperienced and you wanted to protect Caitlyn. 
Hey, it might not have been your kit that was used. Even if it was, you had no way of knowing what would happen. 
I feel like it's hard to argue you gave them the means. They had to also obtain explosives right? You can't just make an Arduino explode. They probably could have controlled the payload with any other microcontroller too, and there are tons of them available via other means.  I'm also surprised there isn't some kind of strict policy for destruction of materials brought on site. 
That's what I was thinking too. Maybe knowing that her beloved grand children were harmed too was enough to drive her over the edge. 
Im very sorry to hear about your sister, and thank you for the kind words. I've had to stop trying to associate 'blame' and who made the mistake where--it just goes down a hole that doesn't have a good outcome.  
They replaced the street lights that day, pretty fucked up it took a death to save a few cents.  
I don't know the full details on that, but I do know that the chat logs were saved so the blame was really taken off of us. We demonstrated meteorologically why we wanted hail. His argument was "I have more stripes, get rid of it." I just wound up having a discussion with my commander about it in private and he basically said that no one pulls rank on the weather. Next time this happens, we have to stick to our guns and don't get pushed around by a "senior" forecaster.  
It should have but in most cases the staff to aid ratio is ridiculous. Imagine being left to care for 33 people that's what our third shift does anywhere from 25 to 33 people most of them total care several are bariatric residents. CNA'S are not valued enough for what they do. 
Yeah... when you consider that 'pulling the plug' often means starving to death or suffocating it really makes you wonder why we can't be more humane instead of waiting for people to die in horrible ways. 
I agree with this. My grandmother died in misery. She was old and fragile with dementia and would just scream "kill me" at all the nurses for months before she died. It was cruel that she was kept alive long after her body and mind were gone. I wouldn't wish that suffering on anyone.  
Seriously this. Last Summer, I was vacationing with my family and girlfriend in California. We stopped at a wide, slow-moving river and we got in to swim. Girlfriend had never been swimming in water deeper than she could stand in before and I grew up with a full size pool and could swim really well. Girlfriend was supposed to stay near the shallow part but somehow ended up in the deeper area. I came over to push her back to shore and it was SO exhausting to nudge her the 8ft back to the nearest grabbable surface while also trying to keep her head above water. I almost passed out from exhaustion when I got to shallow water and my legs were shaking like crazy.  Definitely could have easily drowned. 
I understand that that would've probably happened but I still wish I could've helped somehow. 
Or suicidal, even drunk me would probably look for a more comfortable place to pass out than train tracks.  
The gun is always loaded.  It's not a toy, end of story. A hunter should know better than to give a firearm to a kid outside a safe environment (shooting range). 
Quite frankly she needs to go to jail (or an institution, where she can get a better sense of where the responsibility is). He did nothing wrong and shouldn't have to suffer for her loss. Everyone has bad things happen. Doesn't mean we get to go around attacking innocent people. 
Good point. I was at a pool party for 6-7 year olds, and I remember diving into the pool and accidentally landing on one of the other kids who was lurking underneath the water. One of the adults saw this and pulled the kid out of the water. I am really thankful to have had that supervision. 
We were at the ocean a few days before my sister's wedding. We had been body surfing the waves earlier hut everyone was up on the beach relaxing. We look out and see people yelling and waving and having a good old time out there. After like 5 minutes we realized they were actually in distress and took off into the water and saved them. It was crazy how close we were to just watching them drown. 
The thing that makes it feel like my fault is that after his second DUI he asked me to keep his gun so it wasn't an option. He then asked for it back a few months later to go shooting, I reluctantly gave it back to him and said to give it back afterwards. He said he was getting counseling and other things to help with his troubles. I would compare him to Robin Williams, he was typically the life of the party and could cheer anyone up. It just hurts knowing the last thoughts about me were that I hated him. I didn't/don't, I was just frustrated with him because I cared about him. 
Its easier to cope with the loss if there is some sort of scapegoat. They probably know on the inside he didnt do anything. And social pressures and not seeing the signs are why he'd blame himself If I were to guess. But the last part is very true. He obviously had the  intent to commit suicide, he would've done it one way or another.  
One night I was out drinking with a friend that kept saying he wanted to go get some coke (cocaine). I didn't have any interest and told him no thanks. Told him to just go home and call it a night. We went our separate ways. Got a call the next morning from a detective because he was found dead. He overdosed. Obviously that was crushing, sad news. But I also felt terrible. I felt sick. I felt guilty. What if I went with him? Could I have changed the outcome of that night? Well, his mother, whom I had never spoken to before, called me a few days later to tell me that she absolutely does not blame me at all. She said he was "a big boy and only he was responsible for his decisions." I didn't realize it at the time, but thinking back, that call really really helped me. 
Yeah it's just that I felt at fault, and people drilled into my mind that it was me. Heck, even the local paper at the place said that the accident happened as a result of poor conduct on our behalf. When you see that in a newspaper it really fucks you up.  
I think this is very important.  This reminds me of a post here where a little girl had to have surgery and she was not allowed to eat the day before. Of course her parent gave her food and she almost died.  People often think that these questions/advices are "just protocol". It can help to remind them they might die. 
If they've got something to hide, then they will hide it.  If you're lucky, you *might* get the truth if you get loved ones away from them, but then you also might not. 
It always seemed like I killed him in my 9 year old perspective. Like I was sitting there watching as he died thinking he was ok 
No. Not following basic road rules as a driver is the stupid fucking thing you can do. 
The investigation lasted nine months, at first they wanted to charge me with negligent homicide, it ended up getting brought down to a negligent driving ticket. There really was no grounds for that either but it seems everyone that day got something. The bus driver was substitute and she was no longer allowed to sub bus driving and the victims boyfriend who was walking with her but didn't get hit, he got a Jay walking ticket.   Years later the family tried to sue everyone, but it got thrown out due to a time limit they had to file. My insurance company handled everything, I never spent a day in court. You could imagine what that would do to anyone let alone a 17 year old kid. Reliving in therapy is one thing, taking the stand would have destroyed me. I never even finished counseling. I wish I did. I'm still dealing with it to this day and I just turned 36. 
He was the most lucid of all the people living there. He was the only one that could walk without help, and that only time we talked he was so depressed and told me how the nurses drugged them to sleep and how horrible that place was.  And I thought painting something would make him happy. 
If I remember correctly, I actually ran after her at some point, but she was so panicked she kept shouting "Go away!" whenever I tried to get close.  
I Actually learned this from my grandmother when i was 13  
I agree. Couldn't anyone just order an arduino online? I'm sure they're really easy to get anywhere.  
This is the part I don't get: Who cares if they object, regardless of their rank. You are the forecaster. It's your forecast (your subordinate's, in this case) with your initials on it. So long as your forecast is consistent with the operational area forecast, note the objections in your forecast worksheet and leave your forecast as is. If it doesn't verify, then be prepared to write up the missed forecast review. Too f-ing bad for the guy that doesn't want to brief it. 
As an adult with training, maybe.  As an eight year old? Not a chance. The *best* you could have *maybe* done was stay back and encourage him. But most likely you would have simply witnesses him going under for the last time first hand. Not a memory you need.  Sorry you lost him that way. 
Yeah as a non-firearm user this is the rule I live by. Can it fire a bullet?  If so, assume it's loaded. 
As a former lifeguard, I was really nervous when I clicked that link and proud that I found the drowning kid quickly.   You look for lack of sideways motion. For the kid going up and down. Arms out to the side, chin going under and coming up (but less each time).  
That was me when I was a teenager.  Was at the beach and swam out to a buoy -- I wasn't (and still am not) a good swimmer, and by the time I got there, I was completely exhausted.  I was hanging onto the buoy while frantically waving to a passing boat.  The passengers smiled and waved back.  Somehow I managed to swim back to the beach.  My body felt like it was on fire and I could see my entire chest move with my heart beat. 
Fuck the media, they always make up shit. You were definitely not at fault here.  
My dad's a cardiologist and he calls this the "door stop". He's been practicing for almost 50 years, and says when someone is leaving his office, if they hesitate for even a fraction of a second at the door as they leave the exam room and don't sneeze, there's something they didn't tell you and you need to calmly figure out what it is.  
As another former paramedic: Many people don't even realize that the pills they take daily are medication. You'll ask them if they are on any medication and they say no, but once you start listing some of the standards for old people, many of them will remember that they actually take 4-5 different pills a day. It's pretty crazy (but then again many older people aren't really mentally healthy). 
I'm 30, and I've broken my wrist tripping over a crack in the pavement that I didn't notice. I absolutely understand how elderly people could die from something like that - all it takes is a solid blow to the head and you're done. 
But surely they should have warned you, and told you to turn him on his side if he choked? If you weren't there, it would have happened either way. If they had some kind of baby monitor, shouldnt  they have come in to check on him? They probably blame themselves but took it out on you as a coping mechanism.  
You likely did him a huge favor. If I ever end up in a nursing home I hope someone will be there for me to do the exact same thing. Once all the quality of one's life is gone, remaining on earth is sheer torture. 
oh god i am so sorry. how is your relationship nowadays? 
That doesn't seem like a great age to learn that. Did it have a negative impact on you and would you rather not know it? 
I don't think Amazon Prime covers Afghanistan. The only commercially produced product that is available for purchase in every inhabited place on earth is Coca Cola. 
I've thought about every possible thing that could've happened differently and that one has been hard to think about. I wish I saw him one more time since I just turned around and he was gone but seeing him go under would be too much for me.  
As someone raised with guns who owns multiple this is me even to the annoyance of others. I can unload the gun myself and hand it to someone to look at and if they point it near me I will scold them.  
When you are in trouble in the water youre supposed to raise your arm with a closed fist so it doesnt look like you are waving. There needs to be more info about this sort of thing. 
my mom was murdered and I was there and a week later when I went back to school everyone was asking me questions and the news made up shit saying she was hit by a baseball bat to the head. We didn't even own a baseball bat he just used his fists and punched her in the temple but yeah media is retarded. 
Me: Do you have any medical problems?  78 year old Patient: Nope. None.  Me: What do you take the Lipitor,  Coumadin and Metformin for?  78 year old Patient: For my High Cholesterol, Afib, I have had a heart attack, PE. Oh and I'm diabetic.  
Train suicide can leave an incredibly gruesome scene as well.  
It's true, after all quality of life is gone, every day is Hell. My father dealt with MS and Tinitus for a long long time waiting until my big brother and I were grown enough to understand and living our own lives before he took his.  He was unhappy for atleast a decade.  He went out with some dignity, he knew he wasn't getting any better.  Still, the best man I've ever known. 
Uh... so in an unrelated incident 4 years ago right before I graduated high school, my parents kinda, for the lack of a better phrase, kicked me out? I wasn't able to do very well in programming like I had wanted and didn't build the prerequisites to go to UBC, and they basically went ballistic and never want to see me again.   I'm living alone right now, and my parents haven't responded to my contact attempts since. I'm not sure if they're even in the country any more.  
It actually better knowing,  my mom and I have had a complicated relationship,  She said that she loved me(like any mom would) but could tell there was some form of resentment and its better knowing where the resentment came from  
I'm cringing that a Brazilian anesthesiologist found it more cost effective to teach Spanish (don't they speak Portuguese in Brazil?) than to re-qualify to practice medicine in the U.S.  Couldn't even be a nurse anesthetist?  We throw out a lot of immigrant expertise... 
You should absolutely mention it always.  Just like people on Adderall should mention theirs.  It's a medicine that effects your body.   Now I wouldn't mention like the occasional Advil though.  
Most suicidal people don't want to leave a mess. But sometimes you just can't think of any other way. And depression changes your mind. When you go into a depressive fugue it's like the whole world is literally gray and grainy. The person in your head isn't you anymore. 
that's for sure, I mean who the hell writes a jaywalking ticket after such an accident? 
The number of NYC taxi drivers with graduate degrees from their home countries is really rather astounding.  
I would add one should also disclose herbal or nontraditional medicines because some do interact with other  drugs. At one point, I used St John's Wort, and because I had heard of some interactions, I made a point of always disclosing. I also found that even the more skeptical health professionals would still rather know everything a patient is taking. 
Jumping in front of a train was honestly one of the leading ideas I had when I was having suicidal thoughts.  I **never** wanted to leave any kind of mess for anyone, but I figured that with a train, at least my parents wouldn't have to see it and try to clean up.  They'd also not have to live around the area where I'd died.  Those were very big positives in the "death by train" column for me.  Plus the fact that it could give them hope that it was a tragic accident, if that helped them cope. 
Yeah....particularly a dick move when it's the boyfriend of a girl who just fucking died. As if that guy doesn't have enough on his plate. Like all the guilt of not moving his girl, or being more careful about crossing the street or any of that.   
I can't come with any argument against that, but honestly I don't think there's any possible positive outcome for me to hold a grudge against them. I might as well be dwelling on that asshole bully in grade 4.   Note: I don't excuse my parents' behavior, and know that they treated me horribly, I'm just saying I don't think it's healthy for me to really hate them. All I want to do is just move on right now.  
Yeah, Japanese, but first generation Canadian, and that Asian parent stereotype had to come from somewhere.  
Had a prime view of a woman jumping right in front of a train. I was standing about one a half meters from her when she jumped onto the tracks in front of a train that was like 5 meters close.  She managed to lay down on the rail so she didn't make as much mess as if she'd get hit by the train itself.     Pretty much cleanly cut in half, made it past the first set of wheels. Must have instantly blacked out from pain, because she only got one short scream out.  Reason? Issues with her partner.  Aftermath? Train traffic stopped for a few hours, police got there first, then firemen, then paramedics (essentially just drew sticks which one of them is going to pronounce her dead), railway firemen (half an hour drive), railway inspection (about 45 minutes drive). And of course they needed to get the people from the train to their destinations.  And last, but not least she left behind two teenage children.  &nbsp;  Also one part is still bugging me. She marked her ticket right before me.  
"I met someone and she opened my eyes," said my husband three weeks after our son was born. I'm still bleeding from that stab wound. 
A couple of years ago I got really really sick and moved back to my parents' house for a couple months. My roommate asked me if some friends of ours  (his very long-time friends) could stay in my room for a few days because they were temporarily homeless. They had like 4 kids and the kids had to stay somewhere else.  It was Christmastime and these people were pretty poor and weren't going to be able to afford presents for the kids. My parents were actually going to give them a couple hundred bucks to help with presents. I came back to the house a week or two after they came and stayed only to discover they had stolen my MacBook, another laptop, a kindle, a set of gaming headphones, and my external hard drive (like 15 years worth of pictures stored on there). They also stole my roommate's college ring. I'm still mad and it's going on three years later. You don't steal from friends. Especially ones who are saving your homeless necks.  
I was in a band with some friends in high school.  I wrote all the songs we played.  They kicked me out and said they didn't like my music anymore and wanted to go another direction.  I later found out they had booked a show and played my songs they said they hated.  I felt pretty crummy after hearing that. 
I invited all my high school "friends" to my birthday party and none of them showed up. Luckily I had my 2 close friends from outside of school show up and still have a good time. Went back to school that Monday and instead of sitting at their table I took a chance and sat with this girl I had a crush on, we dated throughout highschool and then some so it worked out. 
 Best friend of many years tried to break up me and my then- boyfriend by fabricating evidence he was cheating on me.  Never figured out if it was her being possessive of me or if she wanted to date him.      Edit - it has become apparent this wording was misleading and I apparently distressed some people.  Then- boyfriend because we've since gotten engaged,  not because we've since broken up.  Thank you to all the kind people out there congratulating :) 
Was friends with a guy since middle school. We were inseparable. I helped him with his depression, got him to move out of his parents house, supported him when he was emotionally wrecked, etc.   But the moment I lost my job and became depressed, he wasn't there for me. Stopped talking to me, hanging out with me, answering my messages. Asked him why he was ignoring me and he said I was being too sad.  
My sister had a destination wedding and I was one of the bridesmaid. So after a year of planning and saving up money (we live in North America and her wedding was in South America), I was super stoked for this new chapter in her life and a fun vacation too. So leading up to the days of the wedding, my sister was okay to me (just the usual way she is to me). Day of the wedding, her husband had to come to me and tell me that she doesn't want me to be her bridesmaid. Then two days after, I got kicked out of her husbands parents vacation home because 'they didn't want the situation to get worse between us'. Of course her husband had to tell me that too. Not once has she spoken to me about it, gave me no reasons whatsoever.. nothing. It's just funny because she's seven years older than me and always claims how mature and cool she is, yet she can't even talk to me and tell me what the hell happened.  
"I'm so sorry honey, I don't know who could be spreading those rumors. They're sick and they don't know you at all."  Rumors had been spread that I, an awkward nerdy girl who'd never done more than hold hands, was not only sleeping with the whooole school, male and female, but also that I was pregnant! Yay! News to me, right??   My best friends swore they'd defend me and when they found out who it was they'd make them regret it.  Then I went down to the lowest floor of the high school (foreshadowing much?) and walked up behind my best friend and noticed she was talking about... Me? About what a slut I am? That she'd never be friends with me? The girl she was talking to started frantically signaling to cut off her convo but GUEEESS WHAT too late.   I switched schools halfway through that year and never looked back. 
My best friend and my husband.  Married 7 years.    Refinanced dream home in October.   Booked 'bucket list' vacation two weeks later.    A week after THAT, he came home and told me we were getting a divorce.   He then walked out the door and never looked back.  No notice.   No, "honey, I am growing unhappy".    We never fought and I thought we had an awesome life.  But that wasnt the "stabbed in the back" part.     Look, people grow unhappy and get divorced.   Shit happens, right?  Except that besides blindsiding and abandoning me and our child,  he went around to all of our friends and family playing the victim of how he was unloved and unappreciated.    He also neglected to mention in his tale of woe about his side piece.  Would have taken a bullet for the man.    Didnt know he was holding the gun. 
2nd grade I had this crazy abusive teacher who would sharpen pencils to throw them at students and smack us on the head with textbooks. One day after talking to my parents about this issue they told me to run to the principle's office next time this happened. About 2 weeks later she got crazy because one kid fell asleep in class she started chunking pencils at us and one stuck me right in the shoulder (wasn't deep but it stuck) so I ran to the principle. Long story short they never believed me and she was able to keep her job. Worst part is the counselors would come down regularly and talk to us about this issue but didn't believe anybody in class since the teacher would suck up to them when they walked in.   I did find out though that a couple years later one kid's father was a FBI agent and truly wanted to investigate and set up a camera inside the classroom to record some evidence. She ended up serving some jail time after he went straight to court 
My little sister literally stabbed my back with a pencil when we were young, does that count?  
I just found out two of my closest friends have been cat-fishing me with pictures of an Israeli supermodel for the past couple weeks, so that was pretty cool of them.  
My friend of nearly 25 years happily ended our friendship over a few thousand bucks he owed me.   Hey Bill, if you are reading this, go sit on an AIDS needle.  
I learned my "friends" weren't actually my friends during an acid trip. I was already having a bad trip and they fucked me up even more by telling me things like how I would never be able to have a real relationship and that I'd fucked my brain up for life. Needless to say, I spent the next 20hrs trying to hold myself together while those thoughts kept racing through my mind. I'm still not me 
In college, I was involved with the theatre department. I had never gotten over this one ex of mine, and one of my closest friends broke up with his gf to get with the girl right when she and I started talking again. He then wrote a play about it, set it in my apartment, got my room mate (another extremely close friend) to direct it, and performed it in front of the entire department. The play included my family's personal history, drug use, conversion to a different religion, and entire pages of conversation we'd had in real life thrown word for word onto the page. When I said how shitty the whole situation was, the vast majority of my friends essentially gaslit me and acted like I was being unreasonable.  
My (ex) best friend of 5 years stole my boyfriend. She's gorgeous and lively, very outgoing. I'm a more than slightly chubby redhead who plays video games and reads all day.   We met through my BFF, he was tall and sort of decent looking, worked on a farm and seemed like a really good guy. I have a massive soft spot for farmers.    So, he and I hit it off and spend almost all of our free time together and were texting constantly when we weren't together. A few months later we get into an argument and he pretty much lays it out there, he had only been dating me so he could be close to my BFF. I was too fat for him, and he had been fucking her since pretty much right after we started dating.   Called BFF. She confirmed his story, and said she was only doing it because she knew he would hurt me and wanted to make him like her so she could hurt him back.   He was my first serious boyfriend in years, and I wouldn't even consider dating for nearly another year after that.  
Reading the first 10 answers made me realise I have good friends...  Thanks OP. 
I picked up the rocket launcher and my friend thought he should have it more, so he meleed me in the back and took it. Then proceeded to miss all his shots.  
I was playing risk and a bit into the game me and my friend kinda teamed up with me to take out someone else. After a While it was my friends again and he redeemed his cards to place twenty something troops on our border (He had Europe and some of Asia, I had Africa and South America) and attacked me. He kicked my ass 
Holy shit my bloods boiling from just reading this. I can't imagine what I would've done in your position.  
If it makes you feel better when I get my own place I won't let this lesson be in vain.  
This is just painful to read dude. Were you in high school when you past your best friend? Do you know why they did this to you? Why didn't you beat his ass up? 
They were totally different songs. You see, yours were like "ding ding ding ding da da ding ding". But theirs were like "da ding ding ding da da ding ding". Completely different songs. 
Fuck em, that just means they're incapable of writing their own songs and that you will be more successful than them. And I bet if you looked hard enough you could replace them all with more talented musicians and be much better than you ever were with them. 
Lol, this very thing almost happened to me. I let a girl whom I had dated for a few years (long distance since graduating college) move in with me, but from day one she was trying to give my business' stuff away to her friends for free. When I told her that she couldn't do that because that's how we (both of us, now that she's living with me) can afford to eat, she called me extremely selfish (and other unkind things). So I kicked her out less than 24 hours after she had moved in with me. She tried to reconcile with me (not by admitting that she was wrong, just by saying we can still be friends) but I wasn't interested in being friends with someone who would treat me like that that. The coda to this story, which I just found out recently, is that she was actually married the whole time but it was a green card marriage and she recently got deported (and that'll probably be the only good thing I have to say for the Trump administration).  
Why not interrupt when it's clear he's flirting to ruin his "game", by saying something like "oh that's a funny story, were you out with your wife when that happened?" 
That is the type of guy who going to end up cheating on his wife. 
I stayed friends as best I could with an ex of mine. On the surface, things seemed pretty bad as she started dating my roommate. But on the inside, she was conspiring with another friend of mine to keep me single. They told the girl I crushed on that I was just using her to make my ex jealous. Made that girl cry. Eventually made me cry after all was said and done.  It's been a year and a half and I have no regrets. The other "friend" was a shitty person anyways.   Edit 4/1/17: I have not forgotten these events, though I legitimately wish everyone the best despite this. 
If dude had depression issues then this is plausible. It's shitty but plausible. 2 depressed people are much worse than just 1.  
It's possible he just wasn't strong enough to bear your burdens along with his own.  I've definitely had to step back from helping someone because I wasn't able to do it without getting bogged down myself  
With the details you've given, it sounds like your sister's husband is doing some manipulating. He may have told your sister that you came on to him or something else. I never trust a go-between. 
That is when you break ties with your sister and stop talking to her/being around her. 
Yea, I've discovered you can't trust co-workers. People are nuts.  My co-worker got fired. I was literally the only one in the work place who had her back, because I knew what was going on there wasn't her fault exclusively. However, they had all decided she was to go.  When she got fired, she threw me under the bus telling my boss I had installed a "virus" to a wordpress site I was working on (which was on a dev server, not a live site, btw). So the boss freaked out and locked down all my accounts.  Till I showed him what it was, an activity tracker plugin to monitor how much time I spent working on it.   At least everyone found that pretty funny. 
Fuck the former friend. But fuck the idiot VP the most. He had no business being a manager.  
Man, some people are sadistic. I don't get why they would get joy out of others' suffering, and to be aware that people who do that ARE sick, and yet do it themselves? Sociopathic...  These are people that eventually become the same conniving snakes in the workplace, causing toxic environments and office politics. 
The saddest part of this for me is that now you're still scared of intimacy... Sorry mate, hope you can let it go and get close to someone who's not a bitch.  
that last line makes it seem like your mom is in hell. or maybe she's in heaven and reaching down to make Brian's life miserable? 
I have no idea how long ago this was, but if you were to sue him in civil court, you don't need "beyond a reasonable doubt," just a preponderance of evidence.  Basically if it's more likely that he did it than that he didn't do it. 
Why is it such a common thing that "she's basically my little sister" often translates to "you can't sleep with her because I want to." It's so creepy. I don't think I've ever heard of two people who referred to each other as "basically siblings" who didn't eventually end up hooking up. Is it denial?  
Dude! Same thing happened to me in college. I introduced a large group of my friends to a large group of my gf's friends early on in the relationship. After the break up, they all pretty much left me in the dirt. But oh well, life goes on and you find the ones who stuck with ya are the true friends. Or fuck it and you find others. 
Thats tough...like the time Jack Black got kicked out his own band :'(  
WTF I came here to say that same thing!  Had a friend message me on AIM saying he's sorry my band broke up.  I told him we didn't, and then he insisted.  Went to the band chat and sure enough the drummer and bassist decided to use a joke 'side project' band as an excuse to quit, and they never played any gigs with any bands ever again.  I think the singer/songwriter still thinks I left his band.   
Dylan must be super cool to forgive such a tragedy 
That's a pretty cheap way of finding out someone is an asshole. After 30 years friendship it could have been a lot worse.  
My God what a wonderful ending. Completely infuriating, though, that the teacher was able to get away with so much. How long ago was this? 
Atleast she got what she deserved, she is everything what is wrong with education :/ 
I would make a huge deal out of this by saying, " Oh, isn't it fantastic that we'll share the same wedding anniversary?!" My bet is it will drive your friend's fiance crazy, and maybe you'll get lucky and they'll change the date. Kill her with kindness. 
I got stabbed in the chest with a pencil by one of my good friends. We both got suspended.  
I got stabbed in the forehead by a mechanical pencil by my classmate in Grade 2.  Couple years later I found out that she liked me and did it to get attention. 
Do they know you know? Or do you have a chance to mess with them back? 
There are two sure ways to lose a friend.  One is to loan money to a friend and the other is to borrow money from a friend. 
I don't think giving someone your email and password is something that normally happens over time, especially with something as important as school.  
dumb pieces of shit. your life should not be entertainment for others. 
My best friend and I were fishing and he cast his line and hooked his own back. I was confused as to why he was yelling and reaching for his back, then I realized what happened.   You brilliant idiot. Hooks are for fishes.  
Ugh, I squirmed in my seat reading your story. What assholes. So sorry, friend. I don't trust people either. 
My best friend has dated two of my exes. They're my exes for a reason, and if they're happy together then who am I to judge.   Having said that I told the first one, "I was here before you, and I'll be here long after you're gone". I was right.  
To be honest I was very angry about it, and very hurt but I had so much to do with just picking up the pieces that I couldn't even focus on them. After the graduation, what I really took from the situation is learning that I never want to make anyone feel the way I felt when they hurt me. I've been more open and more strict about honoring commitments and making sure people I care about can count on me when they are helpless.   It would be nice to see where this attitude gets them in a few years, but I think it's best to try and cast them away from my thoughts. 
"You know, it's funny; when you look at someone through rose colored glasses, all the red flags just look like flags." 
Game developers go to the same conferences casino game designers go to so they can learn tactics of how to reel people in. 
She said she was just trying to do her own thing? I wasn't the only person she bailed on either. She was the kind of person who was really afraid of what people thought of her... I personally think she wanted to start getting into drugs and partying a lot more and she was afraid I would judge her since I'm a pretty low key person. She had also always made fun of the kids who did drugs and partied in the past so she probably thought I would think she was a hypocrite. I wish she had just asked me, I totally don't care about that kind of thing.  I found out later that she got into an abusive relationship and then knocked up. Which is sad but also I still kind of hate her for what she did so... 
Not OP, but my guess is that his roommate was a rapist pedophile and wanted to get the suspicion off of him.  Or maybe he was just an asshole. 
A maelstrom of different reasons. The perfect storm of bullshit.   My roommate's girlfriend never liked me. My roommate became friends with an ex-girlfriend of mine that is mentally ill. My roommate was a repressed transwoman and nobody knew until much later. My roommate had a highly erratic sleep schedule and drank at least two bottle of Mountain Dew a day. My roommate constantly "adapts" their personality to the people around them. We were just tired of living together and had a lot of clashes over personal space (of which I am super protective). I constantly make inappropriate jokes (my girlfriend does stand up so being grossly inappropriate is a cornerstone of our relationship).   The big one though: my roommate's relationship was failing and I think they tried to salvage their romance via mutual hatred. It didn't work.  
I'm just impressed by the commitment. He lost 100 pounds to ask someone out? Wow 
Yeah, he always has been. He'd always been very overweight, and immediately friendzoned by any woman he's ever really liked. Don't even get me started on the fuckshop that is his marriage now. oy.  
Can't wait to read the new boyfriend's post in 6 months on the next thread like this... 
Giving "business stuff" to friends eh? Just lying around the house you say? How much for a gram  
 Yeah exactly.  When I figured out what she was doing I cut her out of my life like a tumor.  Didn't make it into a big scene filled with drama, just quietly turned and walked away from that friendship.  Don't need that in my life.   
My ex told my new gf that if i could break up with her, I could break up with my new gf too, that we would never be happy; to my new gf's face, in her house, in front of her parents.  That was 13 years ago, my then new gf and I have been together ever since and have been married for 6 of those 13 years. 
Because he smelled something off early on and A) told me immediately he felt uncomfortable with stuff that was happening, stuff she was doing, ways she was contacting him etc and B) began documenting all communication she had with him,  messenger logs, texts etc and proactively gave them to me *before* she tried to take pieces of them and show them to me to put him in a bad light (which she did).  I didn't ask him to or anything.   He could tell she was behaving oddly about stuff and kept me in the loop.  That good communication probably single handedly saved our relationship.     
My boyfriend and I both have repeated lapses of depression... Most of the time is fine.... But sometimes it gets really ugly.  When he is trying to cheer me up, it's usually okay. But if he gets into a funk I can't pull him out of, I get really depressed and sometimes breakdown for multiple days because of the feeling of unrelenting guilt that I can't help him the way he helps me.  As much as I love my boyfriend. My depression makes it really hard to be near him sometimes. 
[](/cocosad)Hard to judge on a case-by-case basis, but I get what you're saying. Helping someone with depression, especially when they're depressed for extremely long periods of time, can be very draining.  
Not to mention a VP shouldn't be going directly to an employee if there's a manager between them.  Chain of command is important in any business structure and both his former friend and the VP broke it by circumventing the manager.  Shitty deal. 
So many people try to deny that this happens, it's refreshing to see people talking about this type of behavior.  I've been the above board, blunt, "I'm just here to work" type of person my whole life, but the type that wants to create havoc for no reason has been a burden through most of my professional life. The less you participate, the more they single you out with this shit, it seems. 
Growing up I was told that everyone goes to "heaven". But once you get there you have a complete understanding of everything you did in your life. If you did something good but didn't realize the impact it had now you do and it feels good. But if you did something awful that didn't bother you when you did it, now it does and you have to live with that horrible guilt for all of eternity. Your own personal hell. 
I feel like maybe I have some insight . . . Musicians, as people, tend to fucking suck, at least when it comes to behaving responsibly. Especially within the world of punk/rock/etc., a vast majority of musicians are more concerned with the cult of themselves than they are with writing music. People and relationships tend not to matter enough to do the right thing.   source: been playing in bands for 15+ years  
I'm glad your company got shut down. I was getting fuckin angry reading that story. Did you find a better employer? 
Nah, I knew them both pretty well and there was also a bit more backstory as to why those two stopped being friends, so I knew it was true. 
I was stabbed in the hand with a pen by a girl in my class. She showed me her boobs a couple years later. We were cool after that. 
I made it abundantly clear to them that I'm aware of what they did. Would having a third party send them a fake "local man found dead after harmful prank" news article be too much?  
You clearly haven't played Settlers of Catan with friends 
You know those emails you get about avoiding obvious phishing links and keeping your password safe? That's the person they're for. 
I guess it would depend on who did the breaking up. If it was you, I can see you not caring.   It would be hard to have a friend do that if you had been broken up with and had lingering feelings for the ex. 
I feel sorry for you. But she obviously mixed up guitar and bass so, in the end, she definitely was a moron  
DA-NA-NUNANAAAH-NUNANAAH doo doo doo dumb dumb da na na na nahh WELL YOU THINK YOU'LL BE JUSST FINEEE?? WITHOUT ME BUT YOUR MINEE! 
Judging by how she handles things, I'd give it a lot less than 6 months 
Why were your ex gf, new gf, and her parents all at their house?  
That's a good man right there. Sorry it didn't work out. 
This makes me think of my old roommates. They are absolutely perfect for each other, but both struggle with mental health issues, primarily depression. It's pretty easy for them to spiral. He is upset and She doesn't feel like she can help, which makes Her upset, which then makes Him more upset because he realizes that his depression has made Her upset and so on. Like you said they are mostly okay, but sometimes a minor incident will cause a week of them being down. They basically never get mad each other, but are sad at each other which is almost worse. 
Agreed. VP should've immediately contacted their direct superior and been like "why is this dumb fuck bothering *me* with this pointless bullshit? I have *real* work to do."  
This is the truth. Workplaces are just "edgier" and more deceitful high schools.. only difference is you get a paycheck for attending.  
My friend wanted me to stop being so addicted to runescape and when I went to get food in the kitchen he sat at my computer and dropped all my armor (rune of course) and ever since then, I think back at it, and see it as more of a favor  
We were in 7th grade. He's kind of crazy already, and I guess he was having a bad day. Anyways, he was sharpening a pencil at the pencil sharpener and was taking forever. I tapped his shoulder and asked when he'd be done. Without thinking, he turned around, stabbed me with a pencil, and when he realized who he stabbed he realized he shouldn't have done what he did. I pulled the lead out of my chest, the substitute teacher freaked out, and we both got suspended. He got suspended for fucking stabbing somebody, and I got suspended for "provoking the attack".   10 years later and there's still a grey spot on my chest. I'll see him from time to time and we still joke about it.   So, yeah, he stabbed me but it's fine.  
*rolls a 7*  YOU MOTHERFUCKER YOU HAD A SHEEP ALL THIS TIME. I JUST SPENT 4 CLAY ON THAT SHEEP 
It wasn't me either time.   There was only lingering feelings for one of them. The first girl was fucking crazy. I'm pretty sure she's a sociopath. I warned him about her, and that she'd fuck with his head, but he was thinking with his dick and went for her anyways. He lasted longer with her than anybody else but in the end he admitted that she was too crazy and it was time to let her go. Fun fact: we both lost our virginities to this girl.   The second girl was pretty, nice, and really enjoyable to be around (usually). I was kind of jealous for a while but I'm glad they were happy together. Eventually they broke up and he moved on.   We've been best friends since kindergarten and I support his decisions. If he wants my sloppy seconds, that's his choice. Whatever floats his boat. It's not my place to get in the way of what he wants in life.   After 17 years, he's more of a brother than a friend. Ex girlfriends are irrelevant in comparison. As long as he's happy, he's got my support.  
Haha right?? I was the guitarist so this shit made no sense on many different levels. 
YOU THINK YOU CAN KICK ME OUT OF THE BAND and then Zach you come in with a facemelter 
No,  no.  Then- boyfriend because we're engaged now. I kept a man like him around :) 
Oh god that sounds like us.  The worst is when I realize it got set off my something little. 
"actually, i think it's around the time we go to war with hell anyway. jesus, sound the horns. and get me my nail bat." 
The freedom of a workplace is amazing compared to a school setting.  
You got suspended... For being stabbed? Because they assumed you must have deserved it? 
Turn it on its side and "Celloooooooo" you've got a bass. 
OH. Then CON-FUCKING-GRATULATIONS. Original wording can be...misleading. 
"Dad you know I don't like nails" "Just get the bat medamnit" 
What if all these posts talking about how concert friend is the bad friend is actually the other "friend" trying his manipulative tactics once more?  
Getting hacked. I work in IT, and have to convince at least one person every week that some tiny change or inconvenience on their company computer or phone does NOT mean you were hacked.   Forgetting your email password because you're too good to write it down does NOT mean you were hacked.   Receiving that spam email about penis enlargement does NOT mean you were hacked.   Skype cutting in and out during a conference call due to poor connection does NOT mean you were getting hacked.  Just be smart, and if you don't know what something is-- don't click on it. 
When something bad happens at work. Look, I get it, shit happens. Servers go down, bad code gets pushed, some moron allows log files to be written to backup server drives, whatever. But I swear to you, the minute something happens (trust me, the guys who need to work on it already know) one dude will come running in screaming his head off. "This is all fucked up we need it fixed NOW we can't do anything with this being down."   Okay, yeah. Look dude, chill the fuck out. We get it. We're working on it. It will be up when it's up. You freaking out and losing your shit and having a fit isn't going to make anything happen any sooner. Likely, it will make the situation worse. So just chill out. It takes a lot for me to get legitimately upset or angry, so maybe I'm biased, but I swear some people get off at the fact that they can act like children at work. Drives me insane. Get out of the office and go count to ten. 
Kids sports. I coached kids soccer for 7 year olds and there would be parents screaming at their kids during the game and you'd have to ask them to quiet down. It's just a game, people  
Gluten-free diets  Some people can't eat gluten.   Some people can, but mistakenly believe that avoiding it will help them lose weight.   The nice thing about the latter group is that restaurants are now more likely to provide gluten-free options for those who actually need them.  
Video games causing kids to become violent. It doesn't happen. Period. No research has ever concluded anything even close to that. In fact, some research actually suggests that kids playing video games is a good outlet for them, and opens all kinds of doors socially.   On a related note, parents who bitch about violent games for their kids. "GTA scared little Timmy so much I am calling for a boycott!"   Oh yeah? Well it's rated M for a reason you twat waffle, so maybe educate yourself before you buy your kid whatever game they fucking ask for! Good grief ignorant parents are the fucking worst.  
Nuclear reactors. They don't explode like a nuclear bomb. 
I don't know about everyone, but I wish the robin who spends 18 hours out of every day launching himself at my daughter's bedroom window, would calm the fuck down about his reflection and cut that shit out. 
Folks who get pissed at long lines at places you know are going to have a long line. Like the DMV, the Post Office, or Doctors office. You knew it was going to take awhile. Bring a fucking book or use that magical mobile device to entertain yourself silly! 
I am the most valuable part of my life. If the money is lost, the girl leaves, the house burns down..I am the one who can rebuild and re-accomplish it all. I've done it before when I was scared and new.  Also, exercise. Keep all your shit calm and collected.  
A lot of people in the film industry are sure getting their panties in a twist about Netflix 
What phone other people use.  Seriously, why do you even care?  Platform advocacy in general is just stupid.  Nintendo vs. Sega was a fun battle for middle school, but so many people just don't seem to grow out of it. 
Currently sitting in an airport waiting to board a flight, and every time there's been an announcement saying that our flight is going to be delayed a little longer, the lady in front of me yells at the flight attendants, from the comfort of her own seat....    Like I understand that you're frustrated about it but your yelling doesn't help the plane get to the gate faster!!! 
I used to referee kids basketball games from under 8s to under 16s quite a few years ago and my god some parents need to calm the fuck down   I've had parents abuse me for making calls they don't agree with, abuse their child for missing a shot or making a mistake, abuse other spectators who they don't agree with etc.   There's this one incident which sticks out in my mind, where a kid who was literally playing under 12s so he would have been 10 or 11 caused a turnover ending in an opposition goal and his father made the coach sub him off and then proceeded to scream at him, which ended up in the poor kid tearing up   Yes sport is competitive and its great to be passionate but when it's a kids game, some people just don't know where to draw the line. Calm the fuck down and enjoy the sport, you're there for your child to have fun and learn to work in a team, it's not an NBA competition    TL:DR parents need to calm the fuck down when it comes to their children playing sport  
Getting on a plane.   We've all bought tickets. We've all reserved seats. We're all getting on this plane (unless you're flying United - topical) so why queue or push or add to the already stressful experience of making it onto a flight on time by turning an otherwise civilised experience into some kind of aviation-based Hunger Games?!  
Well in Ireland we are having great weather , peaks for 22 degrees a day(very unusual for Ireland) All I see all day on social media is sun this and sun that. Irish people need to calm the fuck down. Or in Irish terms 'calm de feck down wouldya'  Edit - to avoid some peoples confusion , I am in fact Irish 
When the plane lands. Everybody stands up gets their luggage and stand still for 15 min whilst they deploy the stairs.   Whilst I chill and continue watching netflix downloads.   Also when "boarding the plane xyz" is called. Everybody crowds to it, and proceeding to wait 40 min or so in a line with hand luggage.   Whilst I chill and continue to watch Netflix downloads sitting down, 10ft away from the queue and being the last one.   CALM FOCK DOWN 
I'm an Android guy, an Android enthusiast if you will.. the whole debate about iPhone vs Android really needs to die. Both are good options and both have pros and cons. 
That Elvis person all the young kids are so into now. The way he moves his hips, that just shouldn't be shown on TV. It's obscene! 
Millennial's work ethic. I work with quite a few millenials and it seems to me the only reason they work less than baby boomers is because they use technology to their advantage. 
Avocado toast and $4 coffees. Apparently it's killing the American dream. 
Millennials.  I keep seeing articles about how they're unbelievably lazy and have a disproportionate sense of entitlement.     I'm sure *some* do, but that's not reason enough to get hysterical about the entire generation. 
Fidget spinners. People get so fucking angry over them it's incredible. Some guy the other day said a fidget spinners app was the downfall of society or something. 
"OMG, the world is violent compared to how it used to be."  Its always been violent. If anything, its less violent.   With that said, we should never settle for something we can improve. Let's keep working to make the world a better place, but maintain perspective while doing it. 
Hating stuff because it got popular.  "Twenty One Pilots is TERRIBLE! Emo trash!"  "The new Star Wars movie has NO REDEEMING QUALITIES! Sheep!"  "*insert video game here HAS THE WORST FANBASE! So cringe!"  We get it, you like being an isolated hipster who only enjoys fringe shit. Go back to your corner where nobody can hear you scoffing under your breath.  "Hipsters are the WORST, amiright!? Who do they think they are?" 
Call of Duty WWII having female characters in the French Resistance faction. It's not because of SJWs they added them, but because there were in fact women in the French Resistance  
Today is the last day for the Seniors at my high school and everyone is acting like all of these seniors are about to die and they will never be able to talk to them again. I just showed up to school 10 minutes ago and I have already seen more tears than the day after 2 girls committed suicide in the same week. 
Making every tragedy an opportunity for showing *just how much you care*.  Yes bombings are sad, yes ISIS are assholes, but putting a flag on your profile picture ain't gonna do shit, and doesn't make you a good person.  
The recent health craze going on.   Don't get me wrong, I'm all for healthier eating, getting more exercise and seeing a healthier population (especially with kids), but almost everything is okay in moderation. A chocolate brownie doesn't need to be substituted for a dark cocoa powdered, spinach-banana, flax seed "brownie." 
Some people use exaggerated emotions as a tactic in business setting. Executives tends to do this the most. They know they do it, though they'll deny it until the day they die.   If they do it enough, they'll get a reputation that proceeds them. But that actually helps them when it comes to working internally. Most people tend to roll over and just go with the flow of someone is emotionally intense. It's a subtle type of organizational bullying.   The best tactic is just to act like it doesn't bother you. Don't raise your voice and keep a stone face if you can. Keep the discussion factual and talk in a calm voice. Ask them questions. Eventually they will run out of gas, if they realize emotional chaos won't push your buttons.  
Reminds me of those parents who took their kids to see Deadpool and lost their shit, demanding their money back and threatening to sue, because there was adult themes in a comic book movie. It's fucking rated R, you idiot. What did you think was gonna happen? That's some lazy, shitty, goddamn parenting.  
Fun fact: Nuclear reactors are designed to not explode. Nuclear bombs are designed to explode. 
Put a sticker on the window. It doesn't have to be huge.  
I'm sorry I bought a robin costume and didn't know what else to do with it.  
What's even better, once I stopped feeling like having superior taste was important I realized I actually liked a lot of that stuff. Some popular music is terrible and will be forgotten but some of it is great and will be remembered for a long time. Missing out on it because "popular = bad" is just dumb.   I like Coldplay all because I forgot about the stigma and gave them an honest chance. 
THANK YOU  I come from the jazz and classical worlds of music, and 9/10 people in those communities say things like "you have to actually study it to understand this sophisticated music" or "oh, you haven't heard this album/piece? You're not a REAL fan." Then they wonder why more people aren't becoming interested in their music. It's a real problem that I hope goes away in my lifetime. 
Nah, I think it's pretty legit to be pissed that you have to wait a long time at the doctor's office. You make *appointments* at those places. If they're not ready for you at your appointment time, they fucked up. 
Also, kids know the difference between when they've "won" something and when they've been "given" something, so this idea that it's creating a soft culture is some seriously overblown and stupid bullshit.  The generation that created participation trophies cause they couldn't handle their kids being average at something is now shitting on kids for having participation trophies. It's insane. 
It's fun to compare the objective pros and cons of technology, but it's pretty rare that *A* is better than *B* at everything rings true.  There are things I love/hate about iOS, Android, Windows, Linux, OS X, BSD, etc. 
The only reason to care what phone other people use is if you're seeking information to evaluate which one YOU want. "Oh, you have that phone! How do you like X? How does it compare to Y?" But the pissing contest about "Why would you want that phone?" is stupid. It's right up there next to the console VS PC shit.  
Agreed. I've had long delays happen a couple of times. Yelling at the staff doesn't change the situation, neither does sitting around and talking shit loudly in hopes that others will join them.  
Also people lining up in line or "next to" the line before their boarding group. C'mon your ticket is assigned and you'll get on the plane before it takes off I promise.  
And calm down about the refs.  They are usually only a couple of years older than the kids they are refereeing/umpiring.  My son loves baseball.  He qualified as an umpire when he was around 12.  He knew the rules better than the grown ups, but it was also meant to be a learning time.  He did it for one year and quit.  The parents were horrible to him.  I remember a huuuuge father leaning over him and yelling at him about a call.  Fuck that guy. 
I coach 12s and 13s and by far the worst part is the parents. I've had parents rip their kid's faces off before the fucking game even started! Like, they're in the stretching lines in tears. How the hell are they supposed to perform with that on their shoulders?  And as much as I'd like to I can't really go tell them their parents are wang-rods or anything, fuck it sucks. 
Because there is always "limited space in the overhead bins" 
We're going to hit 30 on saturday in Britain. The weather forecast just slapped a huge 30 over the whole island in a "its gonna be s hot the specifics dont even matter" kinda way. 
I stand up even though I know I have a 15 minute wait simply because I need to try to get some feeling back into my long legs before I have to walk off the plane.  
I feel you there. I have a cousin who deployed to Iraq a couple times and it's incredibly sad to see how much the war fucked him up.   It was also interesting meeting other guys from his unit at his wedding, the general vibe I got from that group was interesting.  
He makes me want to chew gum and stay out past curfew! 
I started my first office job recently, at a subsidiary of a fortune 100 company. I work with 5 other people and they're all older than 40 and have been working there for several years. Most of the job *should* be done through computers, but several aspects are still done with a pen and paper because they can't adapt to the technology. I had to show someone how to download files from an email and attach them in another. They had worked there for YEARS. I did all of the daily tasks in under an hour and they were amazed. I just don't understand how huge companies are able to function.  
For real. Chat disabled is the only way to play some days. 
You rock!  Cancel that!  You rock!  Cancel that!  Ugh I hate chat in team based PVP. 
The people selling the expensive toast and coffee *are* the American dream though... 
But it killed the housing market*  \* - not the record low salaries, massive student costs/debt, physical mobility required for jobs now, etc 
The worst is when millennials themselves write these kinds of articles. Way to throw your entire generation under the bus assholes. 
I feel some people use the word 'Millennials' as a synonym for 'young people' :/ 
This is just Minions all over again. If you aren't a middle schooler, odds are your primary exposure to these things comes either from Facebook or from complaints on Reddit.  Reddit loves to hate things. In particular, Reddit loves to hate popular things, often solely for the fact that they're popular. Many people here have a real eagerness to grumble about all the "damn kids" and how things were different "back in my day." It's the tendency to hail one's own childhood fads as high-culture while shitting all over the fads of newer generations.  If Pokemon came out for the first time tomorrow and became absurdly popular in elementary and middle schools, the bulk of Reddit would probably lump it in with Minions and fidget spinners. 
As a high school teacher of Freshman, I think I'm allowed a little hate.  I have exactly one kid with ADHD that correctly utilizes his fidget cube and spinner.  ( No issue with this kid)  All the rest? Why the fuck do you need one that lights up and makes noise.   (Also bottle flipping smh) 
It's been getting less violent but in exchange, we're now able to see every violent thing that happens.  
Man, I wish more people understood this. Yes the world is fully of shitty people and things, but it's a hell of a lot less shitty that it was even a few decades ago.  I think part of the problem is that the time period people tend to fantasise about is almost always the era in which they grew up. If you had an ok childhood then that period will always seem better than the one where you're an adult, burdened by responsiblities and aware of all the crap going on.  The 1950s seems to be a particular favorite. 
It always amused me that shows like Breaking Bad were packed full of violence, gore (the ol dissolving bodies in a bathtub) and drug use, yet using the word "fuck" more than once a season was apparently where AMC drew the line. As if people old enough to tolerate the rest aren't old enough to have heard the word fuck a million times.  
I don't do the flag on the profile because you have that really awkward moment when you have to take it down... 
People need to calm down about food preferences in general. Like, if you want to pour your milk before your cereal or put ice in your milk, then you do you.  
Right? I am all for being a more health conscious population (i.e. maintaining a healthy, balanced diet) but some of the advice I have seen come out of the "movement" is sometimes just hyperbolic.  
I mean, *I* care about the sex *I'm* having or not having. I think it's fair to say we each care about our own sex.  But yeah, other people shouldn't. Generally.  As long as, you know, it's consensual. Effective consent, none of that namby-pamby, "well, she technically said yes" consent. And you're not cheating on anybody.  
Reminds me of when some mom brought her 5yr old and 2yr old in a stroller to see Logan. They promptly walked right out when the bachelorette flashed her tits. Like, I don't know what the mom was expecting 
And people who could not afford Samurai did not hire Samurai. 
Extra effective if the sticker is a life-sized image of a hawk.  
Hang around with an older man who wants some young Dick to mentor.  
I didn't know the stigma existed when I started liking Coldplay. And I was honestly surprised to learn about it.   Same with Nickelback. I didn't grow up listening to any type of rock music, so they sounded fairly average when compared to other musicians in the same genre.  
I used to hate any hip-hop that was at all gangster or "ignorant". I got over that stupidity a few years ago and I've found so much more music that I love.  The best way to listen to music is to always go in to it wanting to enjoy it. My listening habits are so much better now that I'm open minded about everything. 
I personally felt that AvA 23 was when the series hit its peak  
I mean. They do all the time and no one goes to watch it.   There are plenty of original top tier films in the past couple years and they did well for their budget but they did abysmal compared to what alien vs avengers would pull.   At some point you have to blame the audience.  
I've got a MacBook and a Windows desktop, they're both great. I use them for different things, they're both great machines that I don't regret investing it at all. 
Oh I love the ones that say "I'm never flying this airline again" out loud when it's something like a delay to the gate or a weather diversion that has nothing to do with that specific airline.  
I was in the same boat. Started umping at 12 and quit after my first year. The parents just ruined it for me. I remember one game I was behind the plate and this one kid refused to swing. 3 at bats and the bat literally never left his shoulder. His fat alcoholic dad was right behind the fence screaming his ass of at him. "I'm gonna beat your ass if you don't get a hit!" I stopped the game, turned around and told the guy he needs to cool it. This did not help the situation. He only got more mad and began cursing louder. Well his kid stuck out again of course. More yelling ensues. The 40 something year old guy that I was umping with came to defense. Told the guy that he needs to leave the game or he's calling the police. If you get kicked out of a 9 year old baseball game then you have real issues.  
You were in 9th grade when he was telling you all this?? Holy crap. That is awful!!! Being born to a nice set of parents is like winning the jackpot. There are a lot of crappy ones out there!  
Football/Soccer coach here, can confirm.   It's mostly those parents who themselves failed miserably in their youth doing the sport, who now expect their kids to do better. 
To be fair, if it's 25 or 28 or 30 the result in the UK is the same:  Overweight men will still walk around with their shirts off.   Every single woman under a certain age will wear one of those long, maxi dresses, regardless of whether they owned one before this week.   The Sun will have a picture of some students in bikinis on Brighton beach, together with a 'heat' based pun.   The entire population of Scotland will turn bright red and shed their skin.  
Have a couple of friends in different branches, the ones that have never seen combat or been deployed are all mouthy about wanting to blow shit up etc  The two that actually got deployed, don't speak much about it and when they came back, they weren't the same. They have a look about them that just screams 'I've seen shit' but I know they will never talk to me about it. 
He makes me want to overdose on bennies and drag race my friends until the loser dies in a fiery crash.  #real1950s 
Usually it is ok, and if people start saying I am trash I just laugh because that means that they are just as terrible at this game as me.  Especially in Bronze, what the hell are players expecting?  
What the comment is referring to is the game chat in Rocket League. One of the quick chat commands is "What a save!" which was likely intended to be used to congratulate teammates, but is now used sarcastically when the enemy team scores a goal. 
If I hadn't bought that avocado three years back I'd own a home outright and be set up for retirement by forty five... 
I have personally cut back on my avocado toast consumption. I am now a millionaire.  
And the funny thing is that so many Gen Xers have forgotten about how we used to be the ones who were stereotyped when we were in our teens/20s. I've got a friend who's a couple of years older than me who's always going on about "entitled millennials". When I remind her that boomers used to whine about us being "slackers" her response is always "um, no, that was different, these kids really are entitled."   It's almost like it's a symptom of being young. 
Pokemon actually has been absurdly popular again, at least where I'm from.  I made about a good 150 splitting up my old cards into little makeshift booster packs, and selling them to my friends and coworkers for their kids.    Fidget spinners, on the other hand, have already taken a huge nosedive.  Like, one week they were all the rage, and now the kids are over them.  Its kinda funny since Reddit seems intent on hating anything kids like, but by the time they get around to circlejerking about it, the kids have already moved on to the next thing.      
Joe Rogan made an interesting point about this a few years back on his podcast.  He was talking about bad news in general, but put forward the idea that humans grew up in communities for so long where the extent of bad news was just that, in your community.  But every day has some bad news going on somewhere in the world, and that is what makes the international headlines.    His point was that people can only carry so much bad news, and before maybe this constant wave of it wasn't as much of an occurrence.  But now, you have to cope with bad news on a global scale rather than that of your community, making it very difficult to deal with.  One in which you can't take actions to help for most of it.  I thought it was an interesting viewpoint. 
Recently that guy in the Trump administration got a lot of flak for basically saying "Saudi Arabia is obviously great because I saw no protesters".  That's what we do with the 1950s, look at all the rose-tinted media and a much less open society and say "oh wow, look at how happy everyone must have been because no one is talking  about all the awful things that are happening".  It's like, take idk... child sexual abuse.  You think that shit started in the 80s?  No, we just actually talk about it now instead of telling little Timmy to shut the fuck up and not bring shame upon the family.   
'Say my name' 'Heisenberg' 'You're gosh dang right' 
As odd of a trend as it is... it is nice seeing my one fifth grader who, according to his IEP, is required to have a small box of fidgets.... well, all of a sudden he is a cool kid, not the weirdo with the box of toys he gets to play with while everyone else sits and learns.  In fact, he has things ten times cooler than the spinner that people all of a sudden want to borrow and tinker with. 
I really do hate this brigade against fidget spinners. Wasn't it not so long ago that people were crying out about kids not playing with physical toys and just glued to their screens? And now there's a cheap physical toy that everyone loves, and people are losing their heads again. 
Fun fact: Jesus was against virtue signalling.  Matthew 6:1  "Be careful not to practice your righteousness in front of others to be seen by them. If you do, you will have no reward from your Father in heaven. So when you give to the needy, do not sound a trumpet before you, as the hypocrites do in the synagogues and on the streets, to be praised by men. " 
Maybe I got whooshed but the humor is supposed to be in the debate itself. One of the many memes where the joke is the gross over exaggeration. I.e harambe, gingers having no soul , mei being the actual devil spawn and the whole   Sugar vs salt on grits Thing.I personally see it as a cheeky ribbing between the two parties.Sorry if I'm being captain obvious. 
Scientific research over the years has shown that if people sometimes can't recollect an incident, it's because the incident never happened. 
Probably thought it would just be blood and violence - you know, stuff that's perfectly fine for children to see. They didn't expect there to be anything actually adult, like boobs. 
A billion years ago Japan might not have been here. 
I think I'll keep giving this guy's daughter nightmares, thanks. 
Not to mention TV technology has progressed to the point where the quality doesn't even diminish if watched at home.  Maybe the screen won't be as huge, but it makes it even harder to justify a $20 ticket.   
Sir? SIR. WAKE UP SIR. I ASKED IF YOU'D LIKE AN IN-FLIGHT BEVERAGE. 
I was on a Southwest flight and some parents were letting their kid run up and down the aisle with their hands out tapping seats. Taptaptaptap laugh.  People were giving dirty looks but the parents were oblivious and no one said anything. This went on and off a couple of times.   During the beverage service the kid bumped into the flight attendant who looked back over her shoulder and said, "Hey kid, why don't you go play outside.".    It was glorious. 
Should have called child services with him threatening the kid as well. 
Damn that's awesome. So what did he like quit his job and just become a full time sports league manager or what? 
So how does he deal with parents going "Aw come on Jimmy! You can do better!" Or coaches yelling at players across the field so they can be heard?  
Parents are fucking crazy. I used to ref hockey and was in like 8th grade. I was usually given preferred games as the association saw me as unbiased and professional. They gave me the final in an atom hockey tournament - so the kids would have been 7-9. Final game, tie game. Give the home team a penalty with 4 minutes left (the kid I gave the penalty to basically baseball swung his stick in to another kids arms... not a clutch and grab play I could pass off as "intense hockey". That was deliberate.) Anyway, visiting team winds up scoring. End of the game I get met by a father who tells me that I am a fuck up and that I should be careful leaving the arena tonight. Got in the dressing room, locked the door and called the cops. Noped the fuck out of there with a police escort.  
Piece of shit here, can confirm.   Always disappointed my kids don't live up to the idea in my head of how good I could have been if I didn't suck so hard. Maybe if I just yell some more they'll get it.  
I've seen two types return from deployment: You get the one guy that talks about everything and goes in to great detail about his deployment and you immediately know he didn't see shit, do shit, or accomplish shit; he just sat in the green zone pushing papers.   Then you get the guy that is withdrawn, refuses to talk about his deployment and is genuinely trying to move on. You immediately KNOW he's seen some shit and did some shit while over there.  
I've seen people say stuff like "does it seem like there are *more* homosexuals now? You never used to hear about so many people being gay, now it's normalized and all the women are choosing to go with women!"  Like...no shit you never used to hear about them when being gay meant social and professional ostracism at best and institutionalization or death at worst. Ditto premarital sex/pregnancy. It sure did happen, it was just hushed up and the baby was adopted or claimed as the child of a married relative. (Happened to Jack Nicholson - grew up with "mom" and "sister" only to discover after their deaths that "mom" was really his grandma and his "sister" was really his biological mother.) 
wait what's he got? 10x cooler than a spinner you say? 
I really ought to check out his book. Seems like there's a lot of wisdom in it, if you don't take it literally. 
I think there are two camps. The ones who are just being playful about a difference of minor opinion, and the ones who get legit emotional about what strangers eat.  I think part of the problem is that some people don't realize the first group is playing, because they behave identically to the second group.  TLDR: Poe's Law.  
Wait a minute... I can't remember being born. Does that mean it may have never happened? 
Stop taking my job ya immigrant jk I have a brown dick too cheers mate 
if anything the participation trophies are just reminding you that you weren't good enough to get the winning trophy 
If a member of the cabin crew woke me up like that I'd be god damn furious. 
Yeah. He's made a very good living out of running the league (and still coaching full time in it). Quality dude. 
Guy with no kids here. I sell participation trophies because the parents can't handle their kid not having one. 
My friends would talk about their down time and stuff like that but nothing else, just about how they got a really great tan, played games, hit the gym and stuff like that.  Not once would they say anything about anything else, they just have a look in their eyes that is kind of distant. 
My favorite was when somebody asked the government how young people should afford houses and the answer was literally "get Mum and Dad to buy it".  No, wait, my favorite has got to be Joe Hockey saying that it didn't matter if they raised the fuel tax because poor people don't have cars anyway.  It's both very sad and very funny how severely out of touch the government is with its citizens. 
Soggy cake. Humid cake. Damp cake. Sweaty cake. Drenched cake. Wet cake. 
You want some elk meat? I marinate it in MCT oil and tenderize it with my kettlebells.  Never change, Joe 
Kids who get hooked by the spinner realize it is just a toy and that it doesn't help them concentrate, but they LOVE the cube.  It has a switch, some buttons, a rolling ball thing.... his is something they love to play with that doesn't absorb all of the attention like the spinner.  Also various fun pencil toppers 
Some more scientific research over the years showed that 'sometimes' is the key word in the aforementioned scientific research. 
I'm sorry, we don't have Coors. Is Miller Ultra okay?  
Participation trophy here. You are superb just for even trying! 
If you are in the unit with them, and you are training, you hear some shit. You hear those downtime stories, but you also hear stories about the scenarios that you are training for. Part of me wishes I would have deployed so that I feel like I helped, and part of me is extremely thankful that I completed my six years without seeing those things. 
"What the fuck was that Jimmy!? I'm gonna beat you when we get home until you understand how to catch a ball you fuckin narc!"  Is more along the lines of today's parents. 
Dusty shelf here. Looking forward to getting cleaned off.  
True that. Only time I heard anything was in boot camp. From my chief. Given my position, I'll never see the things he saw, but he drove the point home. This isnt about the down time or the fun you have or the people you meet. People are out there fighting and dying doing things I probably never could. I'm thankful my position keeps me away from it all, but also envious of his experiences because I want to feel like I'm doing more. Even so, my job is to support and provide a necessity to the guys out there. I'm content with that. 
If you were rich, you had a hoop to go with your stick. 
We need more of your attitude in the armed forces. It is a collective job, and a lot of meatheads don't realize how vital people like you are.   I am logistics myself, though I have one of the more dangerous logistics jobs (transportation) right now. I have seen videos of first hand accounts from my buddies, so I am extremely thankful I didn't have to witness these things. 
A master chef told me this in culinary school: "you can always stop cooking." Take it off the burner or out of the oven if you need to. Surprisingly helpful tip 
Learn cooking techniques instead of recipes.  Don't approach recipes like they're magic spells in the Harry Potter universe. If you wiggle your nose wrong or put in a spec to much of some seasoning you're not going to end up with a completely different dish.  Alton Brown does an incredible job of teaching a cooking technique and then showing you a recipe that applies that technique. If you learn a process instead of a rote recipe you will know how to cook dozens of dishes, and it's really the only way to develop skills in the kitchen. 
Chop with the rear part of the blade, not the tip, in a rolling motion.  
Control your heat. Control everything, but mostly your heat. 
Keep it simple.  Something with 3-4 ingredients that go really well together is better than something with 12 ingredients that clash with each other. 
pastry chef here, not my best tip but the only one I can think of this early on my day off...flouring pans for cakes is a step not to be skipped but when it comes to chocolate cakes, it looks awful so for dark cakes, I use cocoa powder instead. 
Learn to brown things. So many people are content with their ability to not burn things that a lot of food that could be GREAT turns out tasting no better than if they had boiled it. 
If you have to keep adding salt, try adding some citric acid instead 
Heat will remain in your food after turning off the stove and it will continue to cook, so pay attention to your timing. e.g. when you want to add cheese to your omelette, cheese should melt in a plate with heat of the eggs, otherwise you will have over dried omelette, same as overcooked pasta.  
Not a food tip but a cooking tip.... a falling knife has no handle. If you drop a knife, get the hell out of the way and let it hit the floor. Washing it is easy enough. Try to catch it and you could be visiting the emergency room. 
If something burns slightly, throw BBQ sauce on it and call it "Smoked".  If something that's supposed to be smooth comes out chunky, call it "Homestyle". 
Mise en place, which is French for "cut and measure your shit out ahead of time". Saves so much stress.  
Timers. I always forget I have something going on the stove while I'm cutting something across the kitchen. Timers save lives.  
You can use the stem of broccoli. Just peel, slice and fry it in the pan, it's delicious. 
If you're worried about calories, just eat a smaller portion rather than substituting "healthier" ingredients.  Especially when baking. 
The only recipe that should have only one clove of garlic in it is a recipe for one clove of garlic. Two MINIMUM people. 
Not a chef, just italian. Now ,at last, i can rant on how to cook pasta.  For the love of what's holy wait for the water to reach boiling point before dumping the pasta in it, and remember to salt the water. Nobody likes eating starch glue.  Furthermore when making spaghetti try to use a proper pot, it shouldn't be necessary to break the spaghetti in half in order to cook them. 
Not a chef, but cooking is my hobby. Number one rule in my book is follow a recipe exactly at least once before fucking around with it. I've seen too many people get angry or frustrated because they decided to substitute X for Y, and then the dish turns out badly. Try the recipe first, then decide if there's too much garlic, or if cinnamon would taste better to you than nutmeg.  If you hate peeling garlic, take as many cloves as you need, toss them in a bowl, cover with another bowl, and shake the hell out of it. The peels get knocked off.   Also, fuck margarine. Just use butter. 
Don't be afraid to experiment. Every successful new recipe or derivation was at one point an experiment. 
Seasoning is paramount. I didn't realize this until I got to know my GF's family. Most people way underseason their food or only use the basic salt, pepper, garlic powder etc. You think baked chicken is bland? You're not seasoning it enough. Olive oil, salt, pepper, rosemary, thyme, garlic powder, and SMOTHERED in Paprika. Delicioso. 
Salt your food. It's amazing how much better things taste with just a little salt.  
Not a chef really by trade, but learned this while I worked as one: take a small hand towel and either loop it through a belt loop or between your waist and your belt so it hangs over your leg.  As you move around, then, you always have something to wipe your hands/your instruments on and you don't need to go out of your way to do it! 
A knife is not a wedge. It's a knife.  If you're pushing down to split your food in half, you're **doing it wrong**.  Who's supposed to be cutting the food here -- you, or the knife? Exactly. You're the brains, the knife is the muscle. So stop leaning into your knife trying to part the bread sea, and start *slicing*.  Seriously, if your knife is sharp enough, dragging the blade's length across whatever you want to cut should be plenty to get through it. The weight of the blade is all you need. 
Damn. 49 yrs. The rolling motion. I forgot about the rolling motion.   Welp. I probably have 20 yrs left before I'm spoon fed so thanks.  
my mom will only cook with max heat because its faster, but it always ended up tasting better than my dad's careful heat management.   then i found out that chinese food is to be made on high heat always basically :/ 
My wife ruined my copper (copper!!) pots/pans by constantly doing this. She turns on our gas stoves and blasts shit like a Saigon flame throwers.  
Just to piggyback on your excellent point, when a recipe calls for garlic, people need to try adding both raw garlic and roasted garlic. The raw garlic will still have that sharpness and bite(when cooked), but the roasted garlic adds an entirely different dimension, a mellow, earthy flavour and the two compliment each other very well 
If you do this, don't eat 3 heads of garlic in one sitting.  Your stomach will hurt and you will smell bad for a few days.  Source: my wife ate too many of these at once. 
Recently i have been using black garlic, it is garlic that has been gently heated over several week and looks like little nubs of tar, it smells and tastes awesome, it has a really deep molasses like, umami flavour, you would not even know it was garlic really, great in sauces and gravy.  
Why do you flour pans? I'm assuming it's to stop it from sticking, but why wouldn't baking paper or simply buttering work? 
Man...every time I want to brown something, and my dad is around, he'll put a lid on the pan because all the 'flavor is being let out', apparently. Sometimes I have to be stern and say I'm following a recipe, but how can I explain this to him? All the meat my parents cook seems to be half-boiled in its own juices from putting lids on every fucking pan... 
* Does not apply if it's tomato based, add sugar instead.  
To piggyback, season even more when using ground turkey.  
I love to bake but it's so hard to follow this principle. I usually try to make small individual things so I can eat one before I serve without the cake missing an obvious chunk. 
As a professional cook, i have always struggled to find out how to go about this with say...meatballs. i cant taste the mixture before i cook so its always a bit of a crap shoot. Any suggestions? 
"Add 5 cloves of garlic to the stew"  "Wow, that is a ton of garlic! In you go!"  my coworkers roommate, adding 5 bulbs whole not peeled into a stew 
I went for the catch one time because my cat was like rubbing itself on my ankles at the time. No regrets because cleaning up the bloody mess from me catching a knife by the blade was easier than cleaning up the mess of a dead cat would've been. Plus I kinda liked my cat and didn't want to accidentally stab it. 
Girlfriend always laughs how even if I drop a spatula I will jump back and out.      Reflexes are reflexes and have saved me so far. 
Yesterday I showed my husband the hole in the floor where I dropped a knife, got myself out of the way and watch it embed itself half an inch in the wood floor. 
Or if something comes out a bit sloppier that you expected, you have created a nice wholesome "Rustic" dish. 
Also, you don't need these 10 kitchen knives. 3 good knives of different sizes, properly sharpened and cared for should be all you need. Then, only buy other knives if you have a need for them (like one for peeling, etc.) 
There's a reason restaurants do not use the Everlasting Eternally Sharp as sold on TV serrated knives. They suck. Don't buy that junk. 
On that note, knives need to be replaced over time. Grandmas favorite kitchen knife doesn't need to be handed down like a sword for generations. 
This is exactly what I do whenever I cook. I always end up with just a saucepan and plates/cutlery once we're done eating. On the other hand everyone else I know ends up with every single utensil and piece of crockery used when they're done, which makes it hard to relax after an enjoyable meal.   It's so easy to keep on top of; that part where you leave to simmer for x minutes- wash up while you wait. Bring to boil- wash up while you wait. Cook until softened/browned- wash up while you wait, etcetera etcetera.   
I don't get how people have trouble with this. When ~~in Viking~~ *I'm cooking* the only thing left at the end are one pan and n plates of hot food.   
I thought that meant that everything is supposed to be keep in its rightful place.  So you can find it when you need it. 
Preparation is the key for efficient an fast cooking. Even at home I cut vegetables in advance and store them in the fridge. Not having to cut all this stuff for every meal you prepare can save a lot time. 
Can you give some examples of very surprising instances when pro chefs use butter?  
Cut everything before you even touch a cooker. Mise en Place.  
This but also with tops of certain veggies. I've used carrot greens, radish greens, and celery leaves sauteed with butter and salt. They also taste good thrown into salads.  Just do a quick google check to see if it's edible beforehand. 
Yes, THANK YOU. God, I'm so sick of people bringing diet food to office parties and then having seconds. Two plates of bad food doesn't hold a candle to one plate of good food! 
Meh, I think it depends. Granted, you should still watch your portions, but if a healthier alternative still tastes good, I say substitute it.   Like the average slice of bread is like 70 calories. Doesn't sound like much, but when you're usually using 2 slices, that adds up. I recently found a 35 calorie bread and it tastes exactly the same. Not "the same" like "OOH DIET COKE TASTES THE SAME AS REGULAR" (it does not), it actually tastes like just regular bread. 
Julia Child says you can use dry vermouth in place of white wine in recipes, which is great if you only need a splash and don't want to open a whole new bottle. 
I like to buy those little 4-packs of single serving wines.  Good enough to cook with and I don't have to open a large bottle if I dont have any around. 
Don't use cooking wine. But do use bad wine or wine that has gone stale because it's been open on the fridge for a few too many days.  
Speaking from limited experience I would recommend avoiding cooking with sweet wines. Following the "cook with what you would drink" adage I tried moscato and it was genuinely terrible. 
And please please toss the spaghetti in the sauce, don't just dump it on top.  
When you get good enough, you can just look briefly at the recipe and already see why the person that wrote it doesnt have tastebuds. 
precook your wings by frying them in oil at about 225-250, cool, then fry again at 360-375 to crisp them. this technique renders more fat from under the skin and puffs it a little. can dredge in wheat or rice flour using this method as well (second fry only)   
Can confirm.  Winged a baked potato recipe.  Ended up with a functional, yet batteryless, clock. 
Hmm. A few days ago, I decided to make "impromptu dough" where I just mixed together a bunch of stuff I thought sounded good and then baked it to see what happened.  Keep in mind, I don't really know how to bake and can only barely cook. The resulting lump of hardened (baked, I guess) dough I got was pretty much inedible. I ended up tossing it in the trash.   Maybe I should stop doing that, 
This is mostly true, but you *always* need to add more vanilla. Like, how is 1 tsp of vanilla ever enough?     Joking aside, there are still basic (somewhat chemistry-related) baking techniques to learn. Take chocolate chip cookies, for example. If you want a thicker cookie, refrigerate your dough and make it into balls while it's still cool before putting in into the oven. For a more spread out cookie, room temperature dough works better. For a softer cookie, take it out of the oven earlier. For a crispy cookie, take it out later. Amount of butter also impacts the texture and chewiness of the cookie. So there is still a bit of improvisation that can happen if you learn the proper techniques based on your desired outcome.  
Weighing scales are for baking, measuring spoons are a dark art 
Bought lovely new pans. SO (who is major kitchen hazard) used for midnight snack, burnt then scraped clean with a knife. Get a mad facial twitch just thinking about it.  
When I do a roast chicken I always roast some garlic along with the potatoes or whatever delicious veg I am having. And then smush it onto whatever I happen to be eating. Love dat garlic. 
It's a dry barrier that will discourage adhesion of the baked good, allowing it to rise as it bakes. Butter is fine if rising isn't a concern, but fats are "sticky" and can actually hold flour-based things down. It's the same reason you would flour a surface when you're rolling out or kneading dough.  
My mother does this with "fried" chicken. Just a little more oil than it takes to cover the bottom of the pan, and covers it the whole time.   She can never figure out why it doesn't come out crispy like the fried chicken she has at restaurants, despite me constantly telling her she's making steamed chicken, not fried chicken  
I dunno, a tiny splash of red wine vinegar is my secret ingredient in chili. No added sugar, just meat, beans, crushed tomatoes, pepper, onion, and spices. 
My mom gets pissed if she finds out there is sugar in pretty much anything! Like I was making a cheese cake and she got pissed when I added sugar because "cream cheese has PLENTY of sugar", yet another reason I can't wait to move out... 
Good advice. Ground turkey needs all the help it can get. 
Baking is harder, but some of the best ways to get consistent cakes (or other baked goods) is to:            1.) Get a scale and use recipes that give measurements in grams/ounces   2.) taste the batter! Raw batter will not kill you and in general if the batter tastes good the cake will taste good   3.) learn what a well cooked moist cake feels like. It should be lightly springy, but firm, when you gently pat the middle. After a few times you'll be able to tell with no problem.  
Take a small amount and toss is in a hot pan to cook it through. 
I remember seeing a Jamie Oliver recipe with a typo so it said something like 30 teaspoons of salt instead of the required 3. All the comments were complaining it was way too salty. Imagine having that much faith in Jamie Oliver. 
There is a "No animals in the kitchen while cooking" rule in our house. Animals know the invisible border in which they can not cross during cooking time. Don't want to trip over one of them while holding boiling water or something. Would be bad for both of us.   
An inch?  Wow.  Is your floor made of balsa wood?  
My former head chef always said:  If you mess up a main dish, call it "Rustic" If you mess up a dessert, call it "Artisanal" 
Got my dad a good quality kitchen knife for Christmas. Just found out that he's hidden it away in a top cupboard because it's sharp. 
I think about 95% of homes badly need to pack their knives up and take them to a professional sharpener. And also learn how to use a honing steel. It makes such a difference! 
Pairing, chef's, and bread.  I have never had a need for anything else. 
i only use a katana personally used by Jin Kai Moto-san to conquer the 15th century child emperor Taka Hami-san 
Professional sharpening is cheaper than people think, and a good pro will tell you when it's time to replace.   Also: Learn the difference between sharpening and honing, hone regularly and sharpen as needed.  
The problem a lot of beginner chefs have is that we feel the need to watch the pot on the stove instead of walking away and letting it cook on its own.  
Buddy, I think you're doing it wrong.  You're not supposed to be in the viking. He just helps you out.   
Be careful with this. Some ingredients taste better when chopped fresh. Onions, for example, will be noticeable more flavorful if diced just before using them vs. if they were diced a day or so ago. 
My tip: when you see a recipe that calls for X cloves of garlic, just cross out cloves and write in bulbs.  
All these gif recipes show them just dumping ramekins full of pre-chopped and pre-measured ingredients into their places, is that the way to go? Should I invest in some more ramekins/similar? 
Saint Julia is right.  Especially because, much of the time, you are reducing the wine for a sauce.  Reducing already fortified wine is quicker for the same flavor punch. 
Does this happen? As there people who..... Don't finish their wine? 
I wish garlic amounts were by weight - some cloves are half the size of others  
i can and do eat sauteed garlic. so good. never enough.  
Which is fine if you like how your changes turn out. But don't be that guy that posts a reply like "I didn't have flour so I substituted baking soda. Also I am trying to cut back on sugar so instead of 5 cups of sugar I used 1 cup of salt. 0/10 would not recommend." 
Man, the # of recipes I see where "saute onions, 5 minutes", and I always wonder if these people have tasted onions that have sauteed for 20+ minutes before. They keep getting better! 
Instructions unclear, try to eat clock.  No is potato.  Such is life. 
It shows curiosity and initiative! Keep it up and you'll have something tasty one day:)  
There isn't one single "right" way to hold a knife. That's just a popular way a lot of chefs do it since it provides a better pivot point and control with the knife. That said, I've worked with chefs who've preferred what Alton Brown called the "accuser" grip which has your pointer finger running along the spine of the knife. I always thought that was super unsafe but...works for them I guess.  
Never thought I'd see the term wok hei on reddit. It's true though, wok hei is everything 
My mom did this to all our nice pans, so now she's pissed that my dad and I don't want her using the NEW nice pans... (I spent $80 on a set of nice cake pans and she thought using a steak knife to loosen a cake I was letting cool was a good idea, and ruined the coating on, and she used steal wool to clean a non-stick frying pan) 
I had to teach my husband not to use metal in my goddamn pans. He ruined all of his by using a fork or knofe to cook/stir.... they were awful and sad.   
I remember never believing that cocoa powder was unsweetened. It's chocolate, and chocolate's always sweet right? I remember taking a big ol' spoonful because I was hungry.  I couldn't breathe straight for half an hour. And the taste... 
Oh my god! Is this why homemade cakes tend to have a huge rise in the middle, but are almost flat towards the edges?  
To add to that, when you're browning stuff, leave it alone. Meat often sticks to the pan as it's browning but releases once it's ready to flip over. If you try to flip it too early the nice browned stuff will end up stuck to the pan. 
A couple drops and you'll swear you can even see the flavours! 
Personally I need some sugar in there to balance it out. Either brown sugar or sweeter ingredients like carrots. That said, I live in a country where rich, sweet, balanced tomatoes are harder to come by. 
A cheesecake without sugar would be horrible. Have her try tomato sauce that's too acidic and ask her if it needs anything. When she can't figure it out, sprinkle some sugar on and have her taste it.  
My wife struggles with this. Anything that calls for sugar, and I mean ANYTHING, she'll replace the sugar with either applesauce or honey.  About half the time it works. The other half the time her tomato sauces have a weird texture because a scoop of applesauce is not a replacement for a pinch of sugar. 
Have you ever roast garlic, in the skins? Probably my favourite part of a roast meal...  
This happened with my step mom because she cut herself really badly while cutting potatoes. She doesn't practice safe cutting habits. 
Freshman year in college my roommates brought home a restaurant grade mandolin. I knew one of them would get hurt so I put it above the cabinets. I was the only one who could reach it ha 
I have two chef's knives, actually. One for me and one for anyone else in my kitchen. 
I only use my Hatori Hanzo, but to each his own... 
That guy strolls down my street now and then, calling for people to bring out their knives and scissors.    I live in a traditional meets modern area. It's not rare to see a road rage incident where a Mercedes and donkey cart full of cabbages are both trying to pass each other on a one-way street. 
Grandmama is in them. You weren't told about the curse?  
Ohhhhh!!  You just explained so much to me!!   I never understood why my roommates did that, didn't realize it was born of anxiety about leaving food unattended 
Just pick up white ceramic bowls when you see them going cheap. I have four large, deep soup bowls, four smaller deep soup bowls that are useful to make sure I don't eat half a packet of cereal for breakfast, four shallow small bowls about the size of a saucer and maybe half a dozen tiny bowls that hold half a cup and are useful for dipping sauces, parmesan etc. It's more than enough to cook with, and all of them cost like a dollar or two. Plain white crockery is  always crazy cheap. 
I met her at a dinner party in the mid90s.  Very nice woman.  She helped herself to a full, unashamed grab of every guys ass as she took a picture with them.  Literally a handful, not just placing it there.  She also told a story about smuggling meat from overseas claiming it has been smoked when it hadn't.  Julia Child gave 0 fucks. 
When I was broke, my go-to meal was pasta coated in buttery garlic and steamed broccoli. I never got tired of that meal.  
Oh my god this is my mother. This drives me mad, and she does it constantly.  
I'd hazard a guess that this hypothetical person probably can't make a fully followed recipe taste better than mediocre anyways.. 
Yeah, I do the accuser grip with my knives.  It's really not as unsafe as you might think.  'But what if any part of the knife of your hand slips?'  Well....it won't.  In my....ten plus years of cooking I've cut myself maybe ten times on knives.  Most of the injuries I've gotten have been from something that you wouldn't expect.  Like the jagged metal part from foil boxes.... 
Yeah! What is it, anyway? I've tried googling it, but I can't find any chemical explanation. It tastes glorious. 
Ceramic pans are great until someone does this.  Still don't know if my mom or boyfriend fucked the pan up.  
Sometimes, but not exclusively. Another reason is that the outside of cakes in tins will cook much faster - that is, they'll rise, but set before rising as much (the middle cooks slower, so is able to keep rising longer). To help this issue, you can cook in a bain-marie (water bath) which provides better balance over the temperature, or I have these oven-safe straps that I soak and then wrap around the tin, which provides _some_ balance. 
You said you wanted the flavors to be more alive.  
Good idea. Another thing would be to just make the cheesecake without sugar like the mother wants and have her taste it. Then make another with sugar and have her taste THAT! 
If it's all triggers then there's no bullets.  Catch away.  
Well, the last time I handled a sharp knife I made a nasty gash in my thumb on the first try... happened at work (yeah, it wasn't the first time) so I've now been banned from sharp objects. Happens all the time. 
what the hell is a restaurant-grade mandolin, and who the hell needs restaurant-grade when playing their mandolin, be it for themselves or an audience? 
Haha. I have three, one smallish one I use all the time, one larger one in case there is watermelon, and a huge one whose name is getouttamykitchen. 
Everybody knows Hatori Hanzo now. He's become a sort of celebrity sword-maker. Totally commercial - complete sell-out. I only use swords from Korehira Yoshimoto - you've probably never heard of him. 
Where is this? I've never heard of a traveling knife sharpener, living in CA. 
best horror movie ever - you throw out grandma's knives causing her to come back haunting you, trapping you in your apartment insisting she won't let you leave until you're fed because you look like you're wasting away. 
I don't trust food not to go to complete shit if not watched. I know what's needed to make the food, but me and my stove have a faulty relationship. One wrong move and shits burned, or cooked on outside and raw inside, I may suck. 
If I cook while she isn't there, my food is perfect.   If she's watching me cook, I use way too much salt, she doesn't like cumin, you won't be able to taste anything over that much garlic, and I'm just going to burn everything cooking it that high. When it's done it's missing something.  
From my friends who work in the industry, they say that the accuser grip isn't always recommended because it can lead to early carpal tunnel. Something about doing it every day rigorously for a few hour especially during prep can take a toll on the joints.  
It translates as "breath of the wok". It's a bunch of aromatic stuff produced in the seasoning process as oil is seared into the metal. 
I bought a $60 frying pan. Real nice one that I loved. Room-mate boiled water in it and forgot about it. Came back out and the non stick coating was ruined and the pan never worked properly again. I was pissed. 
She does the whole granny cutting style where she peels and cubes potatoes against her thumb and because she uses a dull/practically 400 year old knife to do it she'd never cut herself before. 
Lmao whoops. Not even gonna edit that. I enjoyed it too much.  
I live in Toronto. Every 2nd week, in the summer, this guy drives slowly around the neighbourhood in his knife-sharpening truck, ringing a bell like he's the ice cream guy. Not only is he NOT the ice cream guy, he won't stop for anyone! You chase him down the street holding your knives and he won't stop to do his job. I think it's a mob front.  
My grandma always tries to feed me while I'm eating.  She'll literally shove a plate between my face and the one I'm currently eating from. "Would you like some gingerbread?"   Yeah, I probably would, but how'bout you let me finish the stew you just gave me first? You know what? Screw it, just put it next to the smoked fish.  Grandmother's cooking... resistance is impolite. 
Mine just can't follow the fucking recipe to save her life. She doesn't get that different ingredients yield different results, particularly with baking which is more an exacting science than just cooking. It's completely maddening. She subs various oils in for what it says, she thinks wheat flour will do the same as all purpose, etc. NO. IT WONT. Then she gets mad because "that recipe is shit". No, ma, it's you. 
Or the under side of the meat slicer. You know, the part that's the farthest away from the goddamn blade. 
so like the same concept of why grandma's cornbread in the 30 yr-old never-soap-washed cast iron is way better than mine in the 8" round tin? 
If it ain't broke... and old people... Oh and when my grandmothers electrical foot bath thingy broke and she wanted to return it, turns out it was 13 years old. She still had the receipt though 
Can confirm, have frantically chased West end Toronto knife man with dull but large kitchen knife. Luckily I heard him coming up the street behind the house so was able to find money, grab the knjfe and make the sprint. I came out onto the street right behind him, so then I just chased him waving my knife like I was trying to land a plane. He noticed. $5.  
I want to be made at you because you didn't say they're G-R-R-R-R-EAT!  But you gave me the answer I wanted so thank you. 
"Hey babe. Coconut flour is just flavored flour, right?" "No, sweetie. It really isn't. And now you owe me $30." 
Now that's some quality grandma story right there. 
Tell that motherfucker to stop for people when he comes to East York! 
My grandma's coffee maker broke once. It was at least 30 years old. She was upset. Went down to the basement and came back up with the SAME coffee maker. Turns out it had gone on sale once in the past and she knew she would need a new one some day so she bought it to be prepared for the day that happened. Still being upset, she fiddled around with the old one and got it working again.  Pretty sure she still has the "reserve" one in the basement. 
Applied for a Guitar Tech job at guitar center. Went through three levels of interviews. Right during the last one, this fucking dude, goes through all my paperwork and is like "you got the job, we're gonna start you off in sales." And I was like "I didn't apply for sales, I've interviewed the last three weeks for the Guitar Tech position." An he just said, "I know." And had this shitty stupid smile on his dumb face. And that's when I realized, they probably don't care for their employees there.  
One place my wife interviewed asked her if she had any kids or planned on getting pregnant soon.  Both questions are illegal to ask during an interview.  
If they dodge the question when you ask about hours.  
If to move forward in the hiring process you have to pay them for anything 
I interviewed at a company years ago where the interviewer asked me if I ever thought it was okay to just drop a former employer in favor of working for him the next day.  I said no because I do believe in the courtesy of a notice and not burning bridges whenever possible.  He got irritated with me and ended the interview.  I consider that a dodged bullet because any company that celebrates a lack of courtesy and professionalism is one that will extend that lack of respect to me. 
When they mention the high turnover rate several times during the interview.  
If the interviewer cancels and forgets to tell you.  I once drove an hour each way just to learn that my future boss took the day off. Not a sick day. She had booked a vacation months ago and didn't bother clearing her schedule (or checking it when scheduling my interview).  That job ended up being very short-lived and traumatic. She was fired like a month after I quit. 
In science:  "We work hard".  "Professor Y has high expectations".  "I don't believe in vacation". - actually heard this one on an interview once.  
I had an interview at Tops where the interviewer talked for 5 minutes about how her honeymoon begins at the end of that workday.  I got the job, technically because she said she would contact me when she got back about when I could start working.  Years of unemployment had finally ended! I couldn't wait!  2 weeks and 4 days later I called to ask about the job only to be told "I don't remember you and I don't remember any interview."  I was devastated.  A year more with no job and I began the rotation of searching again and got an interview. 8 to 10 years of cashier experience gets you an interview but never a job.  I went in to the second interview thinking it might be someone new. It wasn't. What she said when she saw me made me see red:  "Oh I remember you!"   
If they show you large commission numbers from a few years ago.  Hotels.com did this, but what they didn't say was the large checks were from a year ago and they changed their commission structure since then an those checks are no longer obtainable. 
Hostile interviewers.  I had an interview years ago, where they had a good cop, bad cop routine going.  The good cop asked me about my hobbies, and seemed interested.  The bad cop, scuffed and rolled his eyes. 
While waiting in the lobby for my interviewer to come out, a man flung the work area door open as he was screaming and literally sobbing about the place being worse than hell. It was like a red flag factory exploded in my face.  
Mine was going for a corporate job that required travel ~40% of the time, which to me didn't sound so bad.  I interviewed separately over a day with like 8 people on the team.  I'd say about 4-5 of them had negative things to say about the travel aspect.  So that was a red flag for me. 
Sometimes you just get a vibe in a place that it is way too serious and I don't mean serious in a good way but instead that everyone is walking on eggshells type of serious.  I get skeptical of places where everyone constantly praises the boss/CEO/founder and constantly mentions how ultimately they make the decisions or things like that.  That just sounds like a place run by an iron fist.   
When the person interviewing you is the person whose job you'll be taking, and they're quitting because the job sucks.  This comment is oddly specific, but I'm currently interviewing candidates to take over my job. It's a real ethical dilemma, encouraging someone to take the job I'm leaving due to dissatisfaction, but I tell myself that they may enjoy it better than I have. 
Posted this before but my roommate once was asked to do a trial run as a waitress since she had no experience. Sure that's cool. It was for Valentine's Day lunch, surely she will be shadowing and letting drinks and what not. Nope. They put her out there solo for a 5 hour shift THEN ASKED HER TO COME BACK THAT NIGHT TO WORK A DOUBLE. She never got paid for it and never returned.  
I once went to a four hour job interview that was 4 different 50-60 minutes sessions each with a different group of people. Every single group asked me the same damn questions, while repeatedly warning me how busy the department was all year round.  It raised a red flag. If you're so fucking busy all the time, then why don't you get more efficient and interview me all at once!!! I got the job and learned that this was pretty typical. They were always "busy" because they were inefficient. In reality, they really didn't have to be so busy all the time. I often did extra work to fill my time because I did things much more quickly than the previous person to do my job. 
One that I've experienced- they asked me to start immediately.  "When can you start"?  "Tomorrow!"  "How about right now, we're way behind."  *Thanks for joining the crew of the Titanic!  Watch your step, she's listing about twenty degrees to starboard, but a finer luxury liner has never sailed the seas.*   
When they ask how much I'd like to get paid, I say $11 an hour, they chuckle and counter with minimum wage. Why'd you bother asking in the first place, Sam's Club? 
If the interviewer seems stressed or rushed, that's your first sign.  
I had an interview where the guy said "we - we work hard here. I'd like to say we play hard, too, but.. we work hard here".  Then, later on when I asked about what happened to the predecessor "he left. Unfortunately, he took on a little too much, became unhappy and left. He's taking some time off before he decides whether he wants to stay in IT or not."  So you overworked a guy to the point where he decided he needed a new career? 
When they ask you what your five year plan (or similar) is, then mock  you for having goals that they think are too ambitious.   I once told an interviewer that I'm interested in being a professor and he responded with "You? A professor? Ha!".  I did not take the job. 
They wanted me to explain my tardiness stats from high school.  I'm in my thirties. 
I once interviewed for a company that said they'll be holding onto my passport and my university degrees as long as I work there.   While I had heard of such instances, I also knew it's against the law. 
If they say, "It's like a family here", they mean "the drama is unbelievable and yes, it gets very personal". 
Had an interview with a store owner once when I was in high school.  Guy threw a pad of paper across the table at me and told me to list out my values.    The values of an 18 year-old.  Applying for a job as a cashier at a sporting goods store.  Uhhh, what?  Jotted some stuff down and he then proceeded to tell me why all my values were wrong.    "Family is great, but God is greater.  God should be top of your list."  "School is only good if you get to work in your field."  "Work ethic? I'm just going to assume you don't know what that is."  "You definitely don't know what love is, so don't list your girlfriend anywhere in your values."  He then told me that I'd be less than minimum wage as a Trainee for as long as he saw fit to call me that and how that was completely and totally legit.  Promptly Noped the fuck outta there.   
"We work hard and play hard" means "we expect you to work unreasonable hours and becoming a functional alcoholic is really the only way to cope with it" 
If they say that over time is expected. That just means they are under staffed and you will be putting a lot many hours you are not getting paid for. 
Baker here, on my first day I was given a potted tree, I was told to plant it, if I was still baking when it got big enough to hang myself off, I should, because this is not the job you want for the rest of your life.  
"You'll be required to work overtime when appropriate"  OK, that's fine. So is it a week on, week off system?  "No. You'll need to work overtime when we need you"  Right, but you'll give me notice in advance.?  "No. If we need you to work overtime you have to stay"  I told them there and then to keep their job. I'm desperate but not that desperate. 
When the mournful eyed Filipina janitor bumps into you as you walk towards the restroom, slipping into your pocket a hastily scrawled note that says "you leave, is no good for you here".   
When the interviewer's eyes have the cold, lifeless look of someone who's slowly dying on the inside.    You look into their eyes and see that all their hope and ambition is lost.  They've come to accept their meaningless existence and know they will die a lonely death, looking back on a life full of regret.    If your interviewer gives you a vibe like that, don't take the job.  
This is a GREAT question and I'd just like to say that so many interviewers forget that interviews are a two-way street. Sure, I need a job, but they also need a good worker, which I am. I'm also old enough to recognize a bad fit.   
Group interviews. Seriously what a dumb idea. I think Walmart and a few others do this 
In all seriousness, check the bathroom for one-ply toilet paper. If they don't care about your ass, they don't care about your ass.  I've worked several places when I was younger and all the bad places fit this rule.  
"Must be a self-starter" = We won't train you.  "Fast-paced environment" = We will overwork you.  "Must be able to multitask" = We fired three people and want you to do all their jobs.  
They mention their employees must wear "many hats".  
They had a bed...   Like. In the middle of their cube-farm, they owned, and encouraged employees to use, a bed.   Someone was sleeping in the bed as I was getting my tour of the space. 
I had an interviewer that was interested in hiring me and when I asked if we could go around the office and meet his team, he didn't want to.  Huge red flag, didn't take the job. 
Not subtle at all - I went for an interview for a job that I was already doing with 5 years experience, with excellent reviews and even a recommendation from my current employer. It was a panel interview and as soon as I walked in one of the interviewers walked out to the parking lot. He comes back and goes "how do you plan to work this job with two kids still in car seats?" I told him he was asking an illegal question and was being straight up sexist and inappropriate. I knew right then that I wasn't taking the job.  
If you can you assess the coffee situation while moving through the office for interview.. Powdered creamer? Run. Liquid creamer in numerous flavors? Work there till death or retirement. 
If the interviewer(s) aren't personable.  If they aren't smiling or talking to me on standard conversational level, it's probably a crappy place to work.   
When they interviewers are too informal. I generally try to be professional until I see them get a little less formal. This one interview the two people kept texting each other on their apple watches and giggling. Then after every response would turn my answer into a weakness.  I wasn't offered the job but I wouldn't have taken it abyway 
People are way too excited about working there and are totally high on the company Kool Aid. Working there is the best thing EVER according to everyone you talk to. There's nothing they love more than slaving away for company XYZ.  They're either full of shit and lying to you and cannot be trusted about anything -OR- they're truly high on the Kool Aid and you're going to be expected to similarly partake if you ever want to fit in. 
- "We wear many hats" - Asking to interview you at odd times - 3pm or later on a Friday, 8am on a Monday, etc. If they want you to interview at those times, pretty much means you will be working at those times (earlier than 8am) or late on Fridays).  - Can work with unknown or vague requirements = Chaos - "We don't have a lot of processes here" = Chaos - Work hard/play hard: You will be working a lot of hours here and you will be expected to go to happy hours several times a week. Also, many of your coworkers will be alcoholics. - Asking stupid questions like, "If you were a tree..."  - Making fun of you, in any shape or form -- mocking your past experiences, your degree, etc. Keep an eye out for this! I've had it happen to me very subtly and openly. :( - Asking you to do some sort of mock up work for them.  
Out of curiosity, how would you suggest to bring this up? I am at a job I love with a great work life balance, but I still think they would have counted against me if I asked about hours that early on. 
This needs to be higher. I mean, a lot of these red flags are good, but this is a pretty much guaranteed sign right here. 
I once drove 3 hours one way only to be told as soon as I got there that they had just hired for the position, and he was such a great guy and he could start on Monday! Is that wonderful? All I said was "Well, good for you." And then when I got back to the parking lot I called my dad crying and he thought I had been in an accident lol. And then a friend told me that it was clearly my fault because I should have called to confirm the interview! Fuck off bitch. Those fuckers should have called ME to cancel, OR just interviewed me anyway and not even tell me that THEY had wasted my fucking time.  Also their office was TINY. Like fucking Nick Valentine's office/home in Fallout 4 is bigger than this place was. 
Yep. When I was in grad school I got a TA spot. During my meeting with my first professor he mentioned "The world of academia requires certain sacrifices" and I knew immediately he expected me to do the sacrificing for him. 
Ugh. That's a shite interviewer. If she's more about her vacation than her job, then claims to not remember you, that's a red flag. 
I just quit my latest job a few weeks ago and one of the things the girl training me said was, "if, no actually when (manager) pulls you up on something, don't say anything just agree even if he's got it wrong."  Lasted 7 months in the place and I honestly don't know how I got that far. The manager was an absolute cunt and everybody was terrified of getting on his wrong side. 
Worked for Sitel once.  I was there for six months.  I was being considered for a management position because so few people had even been there half that before quitting. 
I had a similar experience with a major corporation.  I had a phone interview with the company recruiter, a phone interview with the prospective manager, then a round-robin of panel interviews that lasted five hours.  It was fucking exhausting.  They warned that the job would be excruciatingly busy, and told me that almost everyone comes in before 7 a.m.  It was flattering to be one of the three top candidates in the nation for a very well-known company, but I walked out of that final interview wanting nothing to do with that department. 
I once interviewed for a job and was offered the position on the spot. I told the guy I would need two weeks' notice for my previous job. He asked what my current schedule was, and I told him M-F. So he asked if I could swing by Saturday at 10AM since I had the day off, to "get me logged into the company computer system." I thought it was weird, but I lived close by and didn't really mind. I got there and he asked why I wasn't in dress code. I told him I had no idea he intended me to work right away, so I wore jeans. He said "That's okay... you can go home and change on your lunch break." That job did not last long. 
If I hear anything that sounds remotely like "work hard, play hard" I'm out.  I work hard,  but when employers say that,  I've learned it means they have zero respect for work life balance.  
They asked me about my hobbies, and I said develop apps and mobile games in my free time. Both of them laughed and one said "free time? Well, if we hire you you can say goodbye to that." And they didn't believe my previous employer was real because they'd never heard of it.  I got a rejection email that night at 9 PM. Couldn't have been happier. 
Companies calling themselves "families" makes me angry. It's an insult to the word.  My last company loved to call its employees "the [company] family!" ...I ended up getting laid off via google hangout with no notice. My company email had been disabled before the conversation was even over, and people I talked to daily thought I was just on vacation for a week afterwards. I woke up with a job and discovered I no longer had one just before lunch. Some fucking family. 
I hated this shit when I was younger applying for department store jobs anyone could run. The Interviewers acted like he place was the big top of something. The worst was RadioShack. Had to drive 1 1/2 hours for an orientation thing. The district guy gave us a talk and was like, if you work hard, you can be just like *me*! No thanks.. you look miserable as shit. 
They dropped that one on me during my last job interview and it turned out differently.  In my case, "We work hard and play hard" is accurate *if* by "work hard" you mean *working at a very relaxed pace in a cushy office job* and by "play hard" what you mean is *sometimes we drink one beer together on Friday before everyone gets home to their families*.  Don't get me wrong I have no complaints with my work environment, but at this stage this expression is just a cliche that could mean anything and its opposite. 
Spot on! Going to guess you've worked in investment banking... 
I would have taken the job.  Sounds like there* would have been upward movement since people don't hang around. 
I had a similar experience to this. Showed a company how to fix their mess and then I closed out the file without saving it. The laser beam looks told me I was just there to show them how to fix their issue and not for an actual job.  
I had a hostile interview with Bank of America during internship time during college. They asked really mean questions to everyone (we all talked afterwards) like "I see that you have accomplished this. Why do you think this is good enough for BoA?"  Almost no one went on to take the internship even though they offered a position to plenty. 
To add to your first point: the negging interview. I had one where I'm pretty sure I aced the initial interview. I answered every technical question, had the interviewers laughing a few times, and they all seemed to be pretty happy (though I was already pretty sure I wouldn't take that job, since they threw up some over working red flags).  The second interview was with the owner of the company, and trying to tear apart me resume. "Well, this is a senior position, do you really think you're qualified?" and "oh well, I'm not too sure about this."  Mother fucker, if you don't like my resume, don't waste my time and bring me in for the second interview. The technical guy who interviewed me clearly though I knew my shit. 
Yeah fuck that. I'll work overtime when needed, but I have a life. I have commitments.  
Even better one is "if we call you in at any time, you are required to come or be written up/fired". They usually won't come out and tell you this, so asking around is the only way to see it coming.  Bitch, am I getting call pay? No? Then I am not on call. 
For number 4, why are agencies bad? Ignorant college kid here 
This. A lot of people go into interviews like beggars. They're not giving you a handout, you're doing them a favor. They will get way more money out of you than they give you in return. That's how they afford to pay you. 
non native here. could you explain what a commissioned insurance sale job is and why you did decline it? Thanks! 
I was between jobs once and did a group interview to be a substitute teacher for a school district.  The group interview lasted 4+ hours and involved weird team-building exercises.  On top of that, they didn't respond to any of the candidates for the better part of a year.  In my case they were stunned that I was no longer available... 
"Looking for highly-motivated people" = We expect you to do a lot of unpaid overtime. 
You forgot "must be able to work late"- We don't believe in 8 hour work days.   
'Lots of room for growth/upward mobility' = we're offering you a shitty position that doesn't pay, but if you hang in there for a few years we can give you a very slightly less shitty position. See also 'a good learning experience' 
My boss said this countless times during my interview, and still says it occasionally.   I actually don't see it as a negative at all. We're a pretty small business so it's expected for everybody to do a lot of stuff. It gives my days variety and gives me experience in lots of different areas. Some of it sucks and I'd rather not do it, but some things are pretty cool and I wouldn't experience them if I worked at a bigger company and only wore one hat, so to speak. 
Kinda related, I got contacted for an interview by a call center and when I came in they took me around, showed me the entire place. Offices, break rooms, like they were ready to hire me off my application alone. Got to the interview, it went well. Never heard from them again. I don't even know why they bothered with a 15 minute tour. 
I misread that first time and thought you left the kids in the car for a job interview.  
I was asked in an interview, "if you could be any kind of animal, what kind would you be and why?" And I said, "why do you ask?" The interviewer (my future supervisor) said, "well, people are caught off guard and answer honestly. I had a woman tell me that she wanted to be a cat because they sleep all day and someone else takes care of all their needs. We didn't hire her." He gave a few other examples, too. I ended up saying, "obviously I would be a Clydesdale because I always work hard at a steady pace!" They laughed. I got the job offer.  Sometimes they ask stupid questions because stupid people will give answers that say a lot about who they are instead of stopping to wonder why they're getting asked such a stupid question. 
"So, what are the hours like?"  If they don't appreciate someone who's actively trying to learn and ask questions about the job, chances are it's not somewhere you want to work. 
I concur. Some might think - well, it's only a little bit of money and I'm willing to make a small investment. However, if the company does this it means they are absolutely not willing to invest anything in you. In other words, you are completely expendable and replaceable; if you go, they don't care. 
Depends on where you're traveling. A major metro every weekend, with some stints in Bali? Sure.  Kankakee, Illinois every week for two years? Less than great. 
im terrified that my workers do that to me, like are they agreeing because they think its a good idea or because they might be scared of something? 
Logical.  Their emotions are quite strong and are to be kept under control.  Such is the teachings of Surak. 
I worked for a tech company that tried to fine people $100,000 if you worked for an competitor in the next ten years. Sure I'll sign, if you promise to pay me those 10 years I'm sitting around doing nothing. 
I interface with Sitel senior management on a near-daily basis, and I absolutely believe that. We're one of their largest contracts, and its like pulling teeth to complete any major project deployments because we have to get an entirely new management team up to speed every few months.   Least they're cheap?  
Yeah we know.  But it honestly wasn't worth a big legal battle for her, who didn't have enough money or energy to even begin with that for probably $20.  
That job for me likely would have lasted until my lunch break. 
To be fair, maybe he stares at everyone's breasts, male or female.   The key is to stare at his junk, as a sign of dominance. 
To be fair I'm a freelance contractor so I've been paid through Paypal before by other companies,  but other companies had me send them tax forms and sign contracts first..  
"We're like a family" - Quiting for greener pastures is an unconscionable betrayal but it's totally okay if we fire or lay you off as an unnecessary  cost cutting measure.  
"Well I do a lot of drugs, have a lot of sex, and can barely play an instrument.  When do I start?" 
"We work hard and we play hard" = anything from "we work way too hard but pretend there's play if it helps you feel better" to "we work sometimes but mostly fuck around" to "we do an easy, sensible amount of both working and playing but saying that makes me feel like a cool guy." 
Most staff move on but the manager is at 12 years and no intent of leaving for another 3. You see he tried, but being a big guy the trunk snapped. It was a funny day.   
I would have loved to be a fly on the wall when you did that 
I worked for a subsidiary of BoA, in tech, they had some of the most draconian bullshit standards ive ever experienced. Thought all banking was like that. I work for a much smaller entity now, and it's roughly 8 billion times better. Give or take several illions. 
That's all about getting you for cheap.  Owner negs you so you are less confident in salary negotiations.  Had this happen to me twice by tech companies.  You don't want to work for someone like that.  Because they start doing that shit every year for a couple months before review time... dropping hints that your performance is bad, etc. 
I have a buddy who hired in at a place that was supposed to be four 12 hour shifts - 48 hours a week, right?  He figured since there's OT in the schedule, there may be some more, but that a four day week is nice. He's got kids.  Dude's working 14-16 hours a day six days a week now. And they're trying to get him to take this salaried coordinator position (he's doing it currently because somebody left). But the salary they're offering is less than he made hourly last year 
This is what they wanted. It might be the weekend or your day off but you'd be expected to come in.  $45,000 for a specialist technical job was shit pay for a standard 37h week. There's no chance I'm going on 24/7 call out. 
Agencies are fine when you are getting your foot in the door or need a job quickly, but the OP had significant experience on his resume, and shouldn't *need* to be put on what is essentially a probationary period. It becomes an insult more than anything once you've reached your peak in the workforce. 
Man Ive found many employers now days dont even bother to tell if you are hired or not. They only contact you if you are hired but otherwise, its ghosting. 
I went through a temp agency once.  I had an interview for a position doing data entry at a mall (it would have been my first job out of college).  Well when I was getting the interview details over the phone from the temp agency, it was hard to hear and I put down the wrong date.   I get a call later on the actual interview day (thinking it was the next day) saying that I missed the interview.  They had me come into the temp agency, where I waited like half an hour before they talked to me, and berated me on being a no show, even though I tried to explain the mixup.   They then had me watch a video in a room about interviewing, it was like 45 minutes of super basic stuff.  After that was done they went and talked to me again and said "Yeah, because you missed that one we won't set you up with any more interviews".  So they wasted my time out of spite. 
Yeah! When I was interviewing for a job at Netflix. 
Insurance sales jobs are often very grindy and unhappy; all day on the phone cold-calling people to sell them insurance. These people don't want to be called and aren't happy with your call. It sucks. It's a job anyone could do, it requires no knowledge or skill. Places like Scott's company invite anyone who applies, and hire basically everyone, and everyone quits or is fired in short order.   Commission means you get paid a percentage of the value of the product they sell. So you could make a lot of money...but you won't because it's designed to keep your pay low, because they don't care about you.  
"Opportunity for overtime" = you will need to work 9 hour days and skip your lunch to manage the workload. also, how do you feel about coming in for a few hours on Saturday? 
That's so dumb. Like I like sleep and would love to sleep all day at home but that doesn't mean don't need a job and I'm not a hard worker when I'm at work  
More than that, it's usually a sign that the company is a scam. 
worked for a company, two weeks before Christmas: Owner of the company: "we need everybody to buckle down; if everybody works hard we can still meet our numbers for the end of the year, we've just got to finish these last projects etc etc...I'll be calling in daily from vacation in Australia, but just because I won't be here doesn't mean you can slack off"   
That was also in the contract, a ban on working for clients or competitors for 2 years. And if you give your three months notice, they will start withholding your paycheck. Glad I checked glassdoor on that one.  
For us non-Americans, what is Sitel and what makes it so bad?  
My last job was like that too. My position had super quick turnover, but everyone else had been there for at least a decade. It didn't take long to find out why. Within the first month, I found myself having to argue my way out of getting written up for something that happened during my day off because no one who was there that day would own up to it.  
It isn't a big legal battle. One phone call to the Department of Labor (or state equivalent) and your lost wages will generally magically appear. They will handle it.  The restaurant industry takes serious advantage of their workers and counts on them not knowing the rules or standing up for themselves. 
I didn't realize it was like that, though I wouldn't be all that surprised since it is such a good gig  
never take a job without a contract, you're in for a rough time here, probably 
I never understood this tactic. Don't employers constantly whine about turnover costs and the high cost of training new people? Why make it policy to insult your employees in a misguided attempt to drive salaries down?  Best case scenario is you succeed. Your negging works, the employees feels less valuable than they actually are, and feels they are either not good at the tasks required for the job, or thinks that the job is too demanding. They either become dejected likely decreasing their productivity to a degree that offsets lower salary costs, or they simply leave out of frustration.  Worst case is they know exactly how valuable their skills are, and are aware of their own competence relative to their peers. You slowly lose your best employees who leave for better prospects and you're left with a group of people that actually ARE incompetent.   
Which is exactly why they want him salaried.   There was a forman on the last construction job I was on. He wound up working between 80-90 hours a week. Salary.   I would have quit.  
Yup, that's why I said "the best you get". Most of the time they don't give a damn. 
From evertyhing I've heard Netflix is an awful place to work.  It's insanely competitive & you are basically always on the copping block. They burn employees out quick. 
Shit, wish I had known "opportunity for overtime" means you will be shamed by all your coworkers if you don't do "your share" by working 10-11 hour days. At least my company gives double time for extra shifts.  
It is. People act like they can make instant, factual judgements on other people based on little things way too much. Especially with vague and open-ended questions.  
Usually. I just started working for a coffee chain, which will remain unnamed but American runs on them, that gave me one free uniform shirt and wants me to buy the rest. It's definitely legit but still a pain 
Withholding your paycheck? As in, your last 3 months aren't paid? The labor board must love that one. 
It's a call center chain.  The one I worked in handled inbound customer retention calls for a large internet provider. 
Obviously it was your fault because you weren't there to stop them from doing it wrong. 
I worked at Costco as a summer job 8 years ago. The same people still work there today and they barely have openings outside of seasonal work. 
The point of Costco offering good benefits is so that they can get better motivated and better quality workers than the competition.  
We one time were getting a good bonus.  They made a big deal and made dinner for everyone.  Grilled steaks.  They later revised the bonus amount,  to  less than half.  Pretty sure I just paid over $100 for a shitty burnt steak.  
St. Lawrence of Rome is the patron saint of cooks, chefs and comedians because when he was being burnt alive over a huge gridiron, he cheerfully proclaimed 'turn me over, I'm well done on this side!' 
Employers always complain about the high cost of turnover they just never think they are the cause of it.  
I did an interview with Amazon for their AWS IT department. Similar culture. The interview was 6 rounds and the last in-person interview was 8 hours long. More than one of my professors and colleagues warned me not to take the job because everyone they knew who worked there was miserable. Everyone I talked to in the interview process worked there less than 2 years. It paid a lot but I did not end up working there. 
I'm a mechanic and worked for a Honda dealership that tried that.  I've been provided uniforms by every shop I've ever worked for so I wasn't about to start paying for them. They ended up changing their minds when they got tired of me wearing everything I deemed suitable for getting dirty at work. 
There was a guy that showed up 30 min early for every damn shift.  Wasn't the fastest, smartest, or best worker, but he had a job for life.  Just having him as an example of what was possible in the building was worth having him around.   
I feel like working in a call center would be crappy no matter what the atmosphere was like.  There would probably always be high turnover at call centers. 
You may be joking, but this has actually happened to me on several occasions. 
Costco is like the holy grail of retail jobs.  Seriously.  I tried multiple times to get my foot in the door there back when I was trying to make a living in retail. 
Are you sure he didn't just say, " AH holy shit! This fucking hurts 
"We paid people with degrees and 10+ years experience slightly above minimum wage, demanded they work unreasonable hours, tried to make them question their value, and they all left. Today's workers are so entitled!" 
Amazon has a very high turn over. I know a few people who went there and only intended to work the 2 years, get their stock signing bonus, cash out to pay their loans off & find a place to actually be happy.  The signing bonus in stock is paid out weirdly. You get 10% after 6 mo. 15 % after 12, 25 % after 18 & the remaining 50% after 24. 
Man, I'm a pretty mediocre worker. But I am ridiculously reliable and ALWAYS come in if i'm called in from somebody elses callout. Got 49 hours this week part time. I just show up, and show up when somebody else can't. People talk me up like i'm good or something but I just show up.  
Yeah, even as I was posting that, I was thinking that it probably did happen to someone for real. :/ 
The running gag I was told was that everyone works for Amazon for 2 years before moving onto Google. 
For a lot of jobs in the service industry (retail, fast food, etc) just showing up consistently puts you above most of their potential employees. 
Because we don't have to fight mutant insects here. And generally the COL is cheaper. 
Because I only have to read about "Florida Man", and not expirence it live. 
I can think of a couple:  (MUCH) fewer bugs (exception: mosquitoes)  Four seasons   
Because Zombies are slower in 4 feet of snow...   That, and snowmobiles. 
No tornadoes, large earthquakes, devastating hurricanes, poisonous reptiles, alligators, crocodiles, bear attacks, oppressive heat. it's a good trade off for having to wear a scarf occasionally. 
Because it reminds me that I'm alive. Being hot just makes me suicidal.  
When you're uncomfortably cold, you can always throw on an extra layer to get warm.  When you're uncomfortably hot, there are only so many layers you can remove before you're still uncomfortably hot.  And heat makes me much more prone to irritability, depression, and lethargy.  That's why I moved out of Houston and into Pennsylvania. 
I lived in Costa Rica for a few years and a lack of seasons REALLY bothers me.  I love the place but I cannot describe the comfort it brings me to see lush spring turn to radiant summer turn to contemplative fall turn to hallowed winter.  Seeing time pass like that helps me value the moment I'm in and gives perspective to where I want to go.  when I go walking in winter, when I feel the cold bite at me and the wind push against me I am reminded of how alive I am.  It is not a feeling you get from 65-70 degree weather with no clouds and no wind.  I feel like I'm in a vacuum, that I'm part of a vacuum as well.  In cold and windy weather I feel nature flow around ME.  And the wife snuggling is hard to beat bruh, especially when you make your own cocoa and have a fire going. 
Because I got laid off the same STUPID year that I met the most amazing woman who lives in STUPID Fairbanks, in STUPID Alaska.    When we were living apart we were trying to figure out who would quit their job that they loved and move to the other person's city and my STUPID employer decided to go out of STUPID business.  I moved in with the love of my STUPID life in STUPIDVILLE and the air HURTS MY STUPID FACE.  STUPID. 
The cold keeps the riff raff out.    I've lived in Wisconsin and Florida, and it's amazing how different the people are.  A lot of Florida residents aren't from florida, they're transplants, so you just don't get the same "down home" feeling that you do with the people in Wisconsin.  Most people in Wisconsin were born and raised here, and it feels like they are just a lot more wholesome (don't hate me florida!) 
Vermonter here. 1) How would I know my state cares if it didn't try to kill me with weather? 2) I run naturally hot and dealing with cold is much easier than heat. 3) I live near a college town so I enjoy the effect cold weather has on newly arrived warm place people.  
Because, after global warming your cities will be under water and the air won't hurt my face anymore 
The air doesn't really hurt my entire face, just my nose. I don't really know what factory produces the smell, but every morning I'm blasted with the smell of offal. If you've ever butchered an animal, like deer, you'd know what smell I'm talking about. 
I don't like heat thats more than 25 celcius. its uncomfortable, sweaty, itchy, it makes doing exercise less desirable, it makes going shopping more uncomfortable. it's just pretty shit. 
Fewer bugs/pests and things that can kill me.  Here in Minnesota we also have great schools and access to healthcare.  You just gotta have some good indoor hobbies and winter isn't so bad. 
Because I don't like the idea of air conditioning having to be a necessity. 
Born n raised in Los Angeles, met "a boy from queens" three weeks before he was moving back to New York. Fell crazy in love and moved a couple months later. Been here seven winters. Have an insanely awesome job (low stress, good pay and benefits). Started a family. His parents are nearby and help out a lot with raising our two little boys.   So I'm used to weather that hurts the face now. Having seasons makes you appreciate the good weather days. The same weather every day got monotonous growing up.  
Canadian here . Can agree. Except that random first nice day between spring and summer is usually like a tuesday work day . And youre pissed off all fucking day because you wish u were outside 
From someone else's perspective, yeah it's kinda funny.   Think of it like this, you'd have never visited Minot if it wasn't for the air force and you'd have missed so much 
I was born in North Dakota, molded by it. I didn't see the light until I was already a man, by then nonresident tuition was too damn expensive. So, here I am 
If it's any consolation the Air Force sent a northerner to Florida and this place hurts my face. I'm too pale for the hot damnin sun!  
This person gets it.  When I first moved from Texas to Michigan, I was miserable in the cold.  Then someone just told me to quit complaining and embrace it, and that's what I did.  I gave up (winter) running and took up xc skiing and never looked back.  Winter is now my favorite season and I can't imagine living anywhere that doesn't get snow.    There really is something beautiful about the snow.  Everything is much more quiet, the nights are brighter, and the world is so much more peaceful and manageable when you're in the middle of the woods and it's snowing and there's not a soul in sight. 
Hey we have four seasons in the south as well:  Bugs, Air made of hot soup, Air made of soup that was left out, Cold-ish sometimes but not really  Edited to add commas, since making it look like a list on my phone apparently makes it something else on desktop.  
I live in the Pacific Northwest and we have few bugs and the air doesn't hurt my face. We also have four seasons. 
I like how the top two comments are talking about opposite climates temperature wise.  
I agree! Heat definitely makes me very lethargic. I have no energy to do anything when its 115F (46C) out. Plus I get heat rash and sunburned very easily... I just think I was never meant to live in a desert.  
See, I have never found a temperature that makes me uncomfortably hot - live near DC, summer can be up to 105 and HUMID.  Fine.  We goto Florida in July, just fine.  St. John (USVI) in June also fine.  Cancun in June or July, fine.  Less than 60 degrees, NOT FINE. 
This. There is nothing like the feeling you get in the spring when everything comes back to life. The green seems so much brighter than I remember from the spring before, the sun feels warmer, the birds seem to sing prettier. As much as I don't like winter, I'd miss spring and fall ten times more if I didn't live in a place that experienced all the seasons. 
Poisonous: You eat it, you get sick  Venomous: It bites you, you get sick 
Similar. Boyfriend and I worked at the same part time get-me-through-college job in hot, humid Florida. I got a promotion, then he had to quit when we got married because I couldn't be his supervisor any more. He starts putting all his effort into finding a job in his actual career field. Finds a great opportunity - joins the military. First place they sent us both was in glorious Monterey, CA. Should have known it was too good to last. One year later, we were banished to 3 years in Fairbanks.  Last week it went to -49F. The air hurts my face. 
Global Warming will make the Gulf stream break down and stop transporting warm water to colder climates, making the air hurt your face even more. 
Ditto. I also don't think my husband could handle being that far away from his family. They're a pretty close-knit family. I can't blame him, they're pretty kickass. It's nice having good in-laws.  Now if we ever get stupid rich, we'll just pay to move everyone to Hawaii. That seems like a good plan. 
It makes people assholes as well.   The cold tends to make folks pretty friendly. 
Correct answer.   I grew up in Michigan. Once, in college, it was so cold as I walked across campus I had to stop at the school store and overpay for a winter hat just to feel okay walking to the class building OR walking back to my dorm. My fault for not having a hat, (yes mom, you told me so) but it was strange to literally feel unsafe without one.  For 6 months I lived in South Carolina, and in June and July it was mid 90s on a daily basis, creeping up to 100 semi-often. It was excruciating, I would dread leaving the house, delay grocery shopping until the evening and basically never be outside. And I'm a moderately active, moderately outdoorsy person. I just couldn't do it. I was practically homebound during daylight hours on weekends and I would stay up late and sleep in just so I could be up during the night more and be more active as a result.  Given the choice I would rather endure the Michigan winters than South Carolina summers.  
idk,NY is getting pretty bland, weather-wise.  We haven't had any really good snowstorms this year. 
No, Wisconsin is "never sober enough to drive away" 
Hey, if it's gonna be my first time experiencing a real winter, I may as well go for the coldest state in the lower 48 I guess. 
"I was born in the cold, molded by it. I didn't see above freezing temps until I was a man and by then they were nothing more than scalding" 
The air force sent me from Missouri to California then Iraq. Like some kind of cruel joke. Then Turkey because I loved the middle East so much apparently. Then back to Iraq because I didn't get enough last time. Then Afghanistan. That place gets cold in the winter though.  
Fun fact it's eerily quiet because the snow absorbs a lot more sound  
My favorite Michigan quirk is that everyone always heads "Up North" for recreation. If you live in the Southern Lower you head to the Northern Lower. If you live in the Northern Lower you head to the UP, and if you live in the UP you go to Canada. Aside from trips out of state, no one vacations to a lower latitude in-state. Its just not proper.  I love my Mitten. 
Good thing we have plenty of snow in Michigan *looks outside to it raining in January just north of Detroit*  
You don't need a snowblower. Snow shovels work just fine 
We have those in SE Texas!  Sleet Season, Spring, Hell, and Monsoon.  
Have you ever been in the forest in the height of summer here? So. Many. Bugs.   They are mostly around bodies of water and I still fucking love it here, rain and all. 
It also rains like a motherfucker there. I'll pass, thanks. I hate rain. 
Or you could go with face-hurting air, tornadoes, venomous reptiles, and oppressive heat.  Illinois: come get the worst part of every season. 
Icelander here. We don't get tornadoes, and this winter has been so mild I can't even remember the last time my face hurt. It's disappointing, to be honest. We have a reputation to uphold, and we're failing. We're failing with comfy faces. 
The northern states and most of Canada is like this, as long as you aren't on either coast. 
I guess I didn't consider OP was talking about heat. Like sun burn? I've never had heat hurt my face other than the sun its self.  
That first spring night sitting out drinking a beer with friends on a porch is always amazing too. 
Crime rates go down during the winter, because who wants to go do anything outside in a blizzard? 
Not to mention a decent cost of living, tons of things to do (and we can afford to do them!), beautiful lakes, nice summers, theater, restaurants...and aren't we voted amongst best places to live, raise kids, etc?  
Of course he hasn't. How can you watch something that hasn't happened yet. ^^^^^^We ^^^^^^didn't ^^^^^^listen 
Hawaii checking in. Are you sure about this? We just had a major cold spell come in over the weekend. I had to close my windows at night. 
Life isn't fun when you step outside and sweat from every pore on your body instantly. 
Interesting to see how this is a personal preference thing and not universal. I moved to South Carolina a couple years ago from further north, and would MUCH prefer blistering heat to blistering cold. 
I'm the total opposite, if I had to choose between 100 degree weather and 30 degree weather, I'd choose the heat every single time. I grew up in Texas so I'm just used to the heat and I love it. I can wear pants around when it's over 100 outside and not break a sweat.  I'm currently studying abroad in Moscow, and I fucking hate the cold. Having to bundle up in clothes just to walk outside some days... I'm basically how you described when you were in SC. I avoid doing things just because I don't want to go out in the cold.   At least now I know to avoid a cold place for graduate school... 
I think I live what could be considered "middle ground" but unfortunately the air hurts my face in winter and air conditioning is a necessity in summer. :/ 
Lol, like being drunk stops Wisconsinites from driving 
I grew up near Orlando and just moved to Seattle in August. Your post has triggered my PTLIFD (post traumatic living in Florida disorder). I never even gave a second thought to the bugs until I moved and realized there aren't any here and that everyone in America doesn't deal with sugar ants and palmetto bugs seeking refuge in their house. Or mosquitoes every time you want to go outside in the evening. And the constantly changing indoor vs. outdoor temperatures, ugh. It's so nice to not need a shower after bringing groceries into the house. And to be able to have all the windows open for more than just a couple random days of the year. 
Outside of maybe the Everglades, our bugs here have nothing on northern summer bugs. The worst mosquitos in the world live on the Minnesota/Ontario border. And the nasty black flies... They're only active for a few months of the year, but god damn do they make up for lost time. 
The cold is not what is bad about living in the dakotas, im in shorts and a hoodie at 10 degrees but the wind is what kills you. Fuck the great plains winds. 
I know it's just a joke, but in ND the temps get over 100F in the summer. And around this time of year, the temps can change by over 50 degrees in a couple days. 
Nah, if you live in the UP you stay in the UP. You know how hard it is to get to Canada from the UP? You can either drive around Lake Superior or head to Sault Ste. Marie at the easternmost point of the peninsula. I lived there 19 years and never went to Canada. Why would I with the Copper Country, Porcupine Mountains, Canyon Falls, Pictured Rocks, and hundreds of other beautiful scenic areas all relatively close by?  That said, I'd love to visit Canada. Seems nice. And Sunnyvale is there. 
It would take several hours to shovel my driveway. We have to have someone plow it with a truck. Depends how long your driveway is and how good of shape you are in. Also, if you work/school early you don't want to be shoveling a ton in the dark before you can even leave. (We pay the same person to plow my grandparents driveway even though it's short because it's just not safe for them to do it though they have a shorter driveway). 
North Texas reporting in:  Sleet (2 weeks) Spring (3 months) Hell (6 months) Brown (2.5 months) 
I've heard that girth is much more important than length anyway 
The plains are so infinitely worse. PNW really is a remarkably nice place when you consider the pros and cons. They payoff is definitely worth it 1000x over. I know everyone says that about where they're from but we've got it good.  
It's not heavy rain; often more "drizzly" than "rainy". 
Hey now. Summertime Chicago is incredible. Love Fall here as well. 
Don't forget.. and all in the same day...  Seriously though like high 63 last Saturday. Expecting snow Thursday 
Hey I'm in Michigan and we have the same- it's been raining for a week. RAINING in a month when we normally have bitter cold and snowstorms. It's weird, and I agree- disappointing. 
I always find it strange how people say that the northern states are exactly like Canadian provinces. The difference between where I live and southern part of my province is astonishing. It's always hard for me to believe when I hear people say that Montana is just like Alberta. Y'all wildin  
The dry heat of Vegas was surprisingly painful to my lips, nostrils, and eyeballs.   Still a nice place to visit though. 
Pretty sure the homeless population goes down too... I mean... they leave, right? 
"Honey, I love you - but your place makes my face hurt" 
It's crazy, 10 years ago it would get -50 and stay there for 3 weeks. Now a single day of -50 is newsworthy.  
Because the story of someone buying a house on a hill wouldn't be as interesting as a zombie castle. 
When you step out of a cold shower and insta-sweat. 
You can always put more clothes on to get warm.  You can only get so naked to stay cool 
Come to Scotland,  the air may hurt your face a few days a year and you might want air conditioning a few days a year but neither situations ever last more than 2 days,  each might happen twice a year  
Had that happen...that and so many decayed lizards found around the house under shit, behind curtains...  Florida is a great place to visit, horrible place to live 
I don't think I've ever had a serious bug problem in my whole life of living in Seattle. Fleas maybe since I always had hairy ass pets. Even when bugs get in it's just not that bad. Rats and mice are a bigger problem. Or raccoons maybe. I live in a 117 year old house next to the unfinished attic and I've never seen a bug in my room. 
Oh, and I forgot...around 3pm...it rains for about 15 minutes then the sun comes back out and bakes all the water on the ground giving you a nice sauna feel as you watch the steam rise  
Oh come on you act like that only happens in Florida. I know you northern folks have truck jackers too. 
Sshhh don't tell people that  Tell them you haven't seen the sun in 7 years 
It's the "constantly wet" part that turns me off. I don't care how the rain is coming down, just that everything is always wet. 
my wife has rattle snake fang scars on her knee where she was bit when she was a teenager.  northwest illinois by galesburg.  first case of snake bite at the hospital probably the only case as well. 
Totally! That one day in fall when the weather is perfect.  
January average high/low temp for Calgary is -1/-13, for Helena, MT it's 1/-10.  I'd say that's in the same neighborhood.  
Yeah, heh heh. They go somewhere warm and cozy, like a friends' house or something, right? 
It is almost like the planet is getting warmer or something.  Just a theory though. 
He can do every character, including John Redcorn and Kahn, except for Boomhauer. He can't even do it at half speed. For some reason that's the only character I actually can imitate (at maybe 75% speed).  
Knowing American TV, we'd get 60 minutes about it easily 
I think that' a big part of what I hate about cold weather. It always feels like a big event to go outside. Gotta put on a ton of clothes, and then take them back off again when you arrive. Leaving the house in warm/hot weather is a much more casual affair. 
I'm gonna go with personal preference on this one too. There's nothing more frustrating than trying to get your gloved hand into the pocket on your third layer of pants to get your phone out. Or your out and about and get into your car to go home, only the 5 layers of t-shirts, long underwear and overcoats means that getting a hand over your shoulder takes more effort than bench pressing a whale. After you're able to reach the seatbelt, there's so much fluff between you and the seat that you can't find where to click the belt on the other side. Nothing frustrates me more than having to layer up in the cold, because I lose every bit of dexterity that I have. I would rather be hot and mostly naked, and if that isn't good enough, a little water poured over your head keeps you nice and cool, without giving up being able to function.   
Secret's out about the PNW, sorry to say. It's too bad you have a huge housing affordability crisis that's making it impossible to live there for  basically everyone except tech bros.  
Hey there.  North is Chicagoland, everything else is south ;-) 
/u/novaer is likely from Edmonton (or further north). -6/-15 here. Closeish, but still a big difference (especially since Montana can be at +2, while Edmonton is at -20). 
Was about to write "username checks out" and then I realised it's not MuffedCanadian.  
All those house hunter shows already exist.  Househunters: Inevitable Climate Change doesn't have quite the same ring to it though. 
What sort of work is available in an area like this? I'm always envious of people living in the countryside, but I don't know what I could do for a living out there.  
For people who prefer metric units, that's 0.000101604691 gigagrams. 
Actually, we try to keep a river between us and Kentucky for the Holy Spirit. 
Grew up in Edmonton Alberta and am now living in Saskatoon Saskatchewan for the past four years and the difference is staggering. Sure, it can hit -40 in Edmonton occasionally but it feels like EVERY winter in Saskatchewan it is -40 or worse every day with the wind chill. Seriously, there are like 3 or 4 trees in this province. I've tried to move back to Alberta but every time I step outside it's a near death experience.  
My husband found a pantry moth that had died stuck to the inside of his straw. After he'd already been drinking from it for a while. 
I had jaw surgery so I was (am still) numb from my bottom lip to my chin. This made it somewhat difficult to drink from a glass so I used straws for a while. Then I ran out of my box of straws so I decided that was the last straw and learned to drink like a normal person again.  
One of the Senior VP's of my company told me: "A gentleman never drinks through a straw," so I haven't used one since 
Serious answer: That video of that turtle with a straw stuck in his bleeding nose.  Funny answer: I dunno.  
The realization that it is impossible to look like a badass when drinking with a straw. 
When it broke the camels back.  That was my only camel. 
The first time I ever went to bar I was drinking from a straw. This drunk guy walked up to me, took my straw out, threw it on the ground and said: "straws are for bitches!"  Haven't used a straw since  
Fear of repeated straw usage giving me a bad case of "old lady mouth."  
It was after watching Stupid, Crazy, Love. That scene has always stuck with me. That and Shopping at Gap. 
I had one go up my nose on a date once. Sprite turned into cherry sprite and the date ended in shame and blood. 
I once ate from a bag of mixed nuts for about ten minutes before noticing a live cockroach crawling around in there. It was all covered in salt and looked like a little almond with legs. Wasn't using a straw though. 
I just gagged while taking a sip of my beer.  Christ. 
Reminds me of that time I poured myself some iced tea from a pitcher in the fridge, took a big gulp, and slid a perfectly intact and whole blob of grey fuzzy mold about the size of a pomegranate directly into my mouthhole 
I feel you. I had jaw surgery as well and my bottom lip and chin were numb, I got into the habit of wiping my mouth a lot when I ate because stuff would get on my chin and NO ONE would tell me. It took about 4-6 years for the full feeling to return to my chin. 
It's been over 19 years since I had my jaw surgery.  I currently rock a pretty awesome beard (if I do say so myself) and it has only added to the lack of sensation.  I sat with barbecue sauce on my beard for 10 minutes at a restaurant the other day.  Nobody told me.  A table of friends and my wife sat there, silently judging me, while I engaged in a passionate discussion about red beans and rice, with my beard slathered in barbecue sauce. 
I feel like that was on the waitress, if she had burst out laughing, that could have easily been a how I met your mother story.  Unless of course you forgot to follow Rule 1: Be Attractive. Then it's on you. 
I'm focusing on wrong part of your anecdote but does drinking root beer have similar effect as alcohol, or do they come in alcoholic variation?  I've only tried it handful of times as they are some what hard to come by in the UK and I've only tried the bon-alcoholic root beer. 
When you can't stand being deprived of dick no more 
how did the straw get lodged that deep into the nostril?? That seems really hard to do.  
True, but when I used to work at Wendy's, we always tried to get the phone number of the girls who asked for a straw with their frosty.   Edit for those not getting it:     1. We were stupid horny teenagers.    2. Frosty are very thick shakes and quite difficult to suck through a straw.    3. In case you still haven't gotten it, if you an suck a bowling ball through a straw, then a horny teenage boy might extrapolate you could give a great blowjob.   Edit 2: I replied below, but it's getting missed.   I don't remember if anyone got a phone number, although we did attempt a lot. I never got a number while at work.  
It's definitely possible to be cutesy with a girl when drinking with straws though. Get two and sip from either side of the milkshake. Works best if you're a tough biker with slick black hair and a leather jacket but you're sweet when you're around your girl and she's the only one who can melt your stony exterior. 
If you are a badass, everything you do looks badass. Except drinking with a straw. 
Hmm, well if it's camels you're looking for, then there are four places. There's the Camel Hut, that's on third. There's camels are us, that's on third too. You got Put Your Butt On That Camel, that's on third. Swing Low, Sweet Camel... That ma... Matter of fact they're all on the same complex. It's the camel complex down on third. 
Wood? I feel like a wolf with a strong enough blow would be able to get through wood. Just saying, you may be setting yourself up for disaster. Brick is a solid choice though. 
:( People are just awful for the environment. I hope we find a biodegradable alternative to plastic soon. 
now I kind of want to go into marine biology to help these animals   ~~but I hate water and swimming so probably not a good choice~~ 
I have reusable plastic straws that I just wash. They also come in stainless steel and silicon and aren't really that much of a pain to wash. Some things just need a straw, like smoothies or milkshakes. 
Serious question: was really necessary to remove the straw from the turtle? I mean, it looks like the straw was inside the turtle for many years and when they remove it, it's nose started to bleed. Poor turtle perhaps needed antibiotics and pain killers.  
The real struggle here, though, is old lady mouth or yellow teeth? Bc coworkers drink their coffee with a straw and I just can't get behind that because old lady mouth and also wtf. But they swear it keeps their teeth white and they don't have old lady mouth yet either so I'm conflicted.... 
How did you come down on the straw so hard as to cause a nose bleed? Also, JUST LOOK AT THE STRAW PEOPLE! 
Nice dude. That reminds me about the time I ordered some fried chicken salad from this new delivery place at my college. After picking at the salad for a couple minutes I noticed a live cockroach crawling around in there. It was all covered in ranch dressing and looked like a little piece of chicken with legs. Wasn't using a straw though. 
I once left tomato juice opened and a cockroach drowned there. I gag everytime I think it could easily be unnoticed, covered in a thick layer of tomato 
Either you meant a pomegranate seed or you have a mouth the size of...well, a pomegranate. 
I don't know how you can read that line and not start moving your mouth like Mr. Ed the Horse trying to get peanut butter from under his lip.      Edit for respect.  
That line made me laugh out loud. My guy asked what was so funny but when I read the post to him he just frowned and said "I don't get Reddit."   *sigh* 
Rule 2 is equally as important: Don't Be Unattractive.   
/u/minicipalchark comfirmed as OP's mum? /u/lordtuts finally brought justice? More on this at 10. 
I'm going to buy some of those metal ones on Amazon soon.  
I heard there's one where MaryAnne rides the camel with you.. 
Don't be absurd. No one will ever need a house made entirely of brick.  
They do exist - I've seen them at music festivals where vendors are required to provide compostable utensils and straws. I don't know how available they are to the public, though. 
"As I made my way past the breakers a strange calm came over me. I don't know if it was devine intervention or the kinship of all living things but I tell you Jerry at that moment I was a marine biologist!" 
Turtles lives for decades, maybe even centuries, so 8 minutes of pain and a bit of blood is a small price to pay. It likely obstructed its breathing and ability to expel water and stuff out from its nostrils and its ability to do coke.  
I WASN'T looking, and i was trying to get to the lip of the cup so I could get some ice, but instead wound up with the straw WAAAY up my nose. it was super bad. 
Cool man. Reminds me of the time I was delivering my baby with my wife. After cradling my newborn child for a couple minutes I noticed it was actually a giant live cockroach crawling around in my arms. It was all covered in blood and looked like a little baby with legs. Wasn't using a straw though.  
I'd say that tomato juice is repulsive enough even without cockroaches 
i've been fighting them for 2 years now, destroyed every 'dried good' we could find, keep everything in the fridge now or in sealed containers, sprayed every nook and cranny, put those traps in every god damned room - basically salted the earth but they're still coming. they fill up the traps in a few weeks but doesn't seem to put a dent in the population.  I've resorted to interrogating fresh catches, they're tough little bastards, though, haven't given up any nesting locations yet. 
I have this theory where Reddit is secretly staffed by 300 professional comedians who moonlight as anonymous Redditors to help make our world a better place.  Nah who am I kidding, it's just the cast from Whose Line. 
Rule 3: if you can't not be unattractive, be charismatic as hell.  
I have met lots of attractive people with hideous parents. I have lots of people who were hideous and then did themselves up and had me all like *diggity dizam*  I really think it is up the individual 
/u/lordtuts? I haven't heard that name in years... 
I will NEVER use a plastic drinking straw ever again after watching that video. 
Glass is the way to go- you can see if it needs extra cleaning with a pipe cleaner on the inside. With the metal ones it's anyone's guess what the inside looks like 
He said 16 or 17, just look down.  If you are a girl...Welcome to trying to figure out why teenagers are morons.  Science and religion has failed us on how they survive. 
A proper hiking back pack that sits tight looks badass.  A tiny laptop bag bumping up and down looks silly. 
Gingerbread is the future of residential construction materials 
THE SEA WAS ANGRY THAT DAY MY FRIENDS! LIKE AN OLD MAN TRYING TO SEND BACK SOUP IN A DELI! 
Sweet bro. Reminds me of the time I was saving a family from a fire. It wasn't until a couple of minutes of saving that I realized I saved a giant cockroach instead of any human. It was covered with smoke and looked like little father legs.  Wasn't using a straw though.  
Did your brothers join you in arms or were they are bunch jerks and laughed at your amazing and masterful note? 
Very interesting, thanks for the response!  I'm actually in the Army, so I'm kinda stuck with the surgeon I get placed with, but I am assured by everyone that this base has the best oral surgery department in the military. Luckily, this also means that everything is free.  I'm about 2 weeks into braces, and my orthodontist says that total treatment time should be about 2 1/2 years, including about 4 more months of braces following the surgery. He says that my lower jaw simply stopped growing when I was young (currently in my early 20's), and my upper jaw is arched in the middle, causing my bite to be both open AND over.  Overall, I've always been extremely displeased with my teeth and that part of my face. I feel that it's damaged relationships and professional avenues for as long as I can remember. I'm just ready to get it done and be a new me :) 
I applaud you if you actually stick to this. But there are a lot of causes that people will pick up for an hour, a day, a week, a month, but sooner or later they drop it. This has been exceptionally visible on Reddit, a site known for picking up and dropping causes faster than they do dank memes. Many people also simply forget *why* they picked up a cause.  That being said, to everyone in this thread pledging to stop using plastic straws, it really is a small change, but it can make a real difference if enough of us do it. But if you find an alternative, make sure it's actually a better alternative. 
After reading these suggestions, I think I will just revert to using a sippy-cup. 
I mean specifically the girls who asked for straws. Only thing I can think of is some connection with blowjobs, but I'm not making it. 
Rad homie. Reminds me of the time I was in middle school taking a math test. It wasn't until a couple minutes of test taking that I realized my teacher, classmates, parents, siblings, and myself were all cockroaches and that I wasn't taking a test and that I didn't know what a test was. I was covered in urine and so was everyone else and we were in a bathroom in Soho. Wasn't using a straw though. 
Thank you :) all done with an ink well and straight pen. Hand cramps for days. 
I mean, they got a kick out of it. But they did shit all to help. Took me a year and a half but finally got rid of the moths.  I moved. 
Yeah but unless you stay on top of maintenance of said sippy cup it accumulates all sorts of bacteria and mold. And just dishwashing it doesn't work. You have to full on scrub that sucker (pun?) out.  
On the internet no one knows you are an anthropomorphic wolf 
Sick, friendo. Reminds me of the time I was elected President. It wasn't until election night that I realized my opponent and her entire team were just giant cockroaches and that my entire campaign was a joke. It was all dressed up and talking and just looked like a Secretary of State with legs. Wasn't using a straw though. 
Probably more effort than the actual eradication of the moths? 
I tried using a straw for hot tea.  Seared pomegranate with honey strip from my tongue and the roof of my mouth.    And then I did it again, after the healing, but before the remembering.   You, sir or madam, are a badass.  
Yea, make sure to take the seal ring off the top and clean underneath it. loves to grow mold there if you dont. 
/r/furry is leaking  ^^^^or ^^^^its ^^^^not-so-wholesome ^^^^counterpart 
What do you gain from playing Mario party or Mario kart that kids don't? 
Righty hoe. Reminds me of that one time i was praying at my shul. It wasn't until a couple minutes of scheming that i realized my rabbi, parents, myself, and the rest of my congregation were cockroaches and we werent praying but feasting on the feces of some liberal arts major who had relieved xirself into and all over the coffee machine at starbucks. I was covered in some liquid the humans called "iced frappuccino" and so was everyone else but we didnt really much care because we were cockroaches. Wasnt using a straw though. 
Well, this was more time/effort than the Battle of the Baking Cupboard (the first one), but much less than the overall war.    Eggs can remain viable for up to 300 days. Months after I thought it was all over they'd be back. 
The list of things you can shout at your friends when they blue shell you is considerably longer as an adult. 
Ripper, cobber. Reminds me of the arvo that I was sinking tinnies with Steve. He was on barbie duty and the bloody drongo had burnt the snags to buggery. It wasn't until I was taking the first bite of a snag sanga that I cottoned onto the fact that Steve turned into a fucken New South Welshman, and the woolies snags were actually just minced up blues fans. Wasn't using a straw though. 
Annnnd nobody is questioning this guy because of his username? WHAT IF HE'S LYING?! 
You almost got me to Google "Do wolves have knotted penises?" at work but I managed to stop myself in time.  NOT TODAY INTERNET! 
I've gotta tell you, I still hear screaming, fireworks, and car horns blaring outside. I'm north of the stadium by quite a bit. Everyone here in Chicago is going crazy. The rain finally stopped too so everyone and their dogs is outside. Go Cubs! 
2016 is hands down the weirdest year of all time.... 
This is something I'm gonna tell the grandkids about.  "Grandpa, where were you when the Cubs broke the curse?"  "Shitposting on reddit." 
I live in Logan Swuare and I swear I stepped onto my stoop and it sounds like the purge out there, please send help. 
Anyone see Kris Bryant's face when he was fielding the ball for the final out? That was hilarious.  
Naturally, it just took some rain to end a 108 year drought.  
And I thought Leo winning his Oscar took too long.   Maybe 2016 truly *is* marking the end of the world.  
On a scale 1-completely burned down what's the status of Chicago right now? 
Ok everybody, fess up and start doing all the things you've ever said you would do,   "once the Cubs win the World Series" 
I found myself jumping out of my chair shouting in celebration, then realized I'd never cared about baseball or any baseball team ever and not sure why I was so excited about a team I'd never even watched play a game.  Still a great finish though.   
Bill Murray must be dying with happiness right now. 
Living in downtown Chicago, I got my windows open and the city is exploding in cheers and car horns.  It's electric. This seriously feels like a dream. 
As a Chicago Cubs fan as of about 1am GMT, I have never been happier. 
Lifetime Red Sox fan here. I remember the feeling back in 2004. The feeling of the curse vanishing. It gets weird there. The tragedy had become part of our identity for so long and for a while we didn't know, as fans, who we were any more. But guess what Cubs fans, you're fucking winners now. Get used to it. 
As a natural born Chicagoan in the Cleveland area, I got a resounding "Go fuck yourself!" when I cheered out the window. Honestly, it made it even better. 
This is where you suddenly find out that 75% of your facebook friends have been life long Cubs fans.  
So many people posting no one will see that I like Shirley Temples from Applebee's. 
Man, Leonardo DiCaprio won an Oscar, The Cubs won the world series. What is this world coming to? 
My grandmother is 93 years old, she has been rooting for the cubs since she was old enough to speak, she's told us about how growing up in the dust bowl the best days of her life were those spent listening to the game on the radio, I cannot express how happy I am she got to witness this victory in her life time 
What if they won because on Tuesday the world is going to end and god wanted them to win one before everything ends 
Literally the last batter, best and closest game I've watched in forever. 
First Brexit, now this. Pretty sure that spells out a Trump presidency if we're going by the laws of 3 for huge unexpected results. 
A lot of non-baseball fans might not realize this, but there's a certain significance to tonight's game winning, drought breaking Cubs team.  The man who is the president of the Cubs, was the GM of the Red Sox in 2004 when they beat their own 86 year championship drought.  Epstein sure knows how to build teams. I'm fairly certain no single team management person on this entire planet right now AND in history can say they've helped break nearly 200 years combined of championship droughts.  There'll be stuff written about him for years to come. Accolades, anecdotes, not to mention intense studying of his team building strategies. The man might very well now be one of the most legendary figures in baseball, if not all of sports when it comes to management at least. 
That and its senile population who have been diehard fans for their 90+ years on Earth can finally *let go*. 
I'm in the loop and there has been uninterrupted car horns for fifteen minutes. IT'S SO FUN! 
Tornado sirens went off in the northern suburbs on the Last out. 
I was in Boston when they reversed he curse.  I literally saw a car flipped over and on fire 
Next thing you know wikileaks is going to drop a file revealing that Steve Buscemi wasn't a firefighter on 9/11 after all 
Last time the Cubs won the world series the United States was a single nation. They even called it "indivisible" 
TIL the last time the Cubs won the World Series, the U.K. was still part of the EU. 
Son of a bitch, the Sports Almanac was wrong by just ONE year... 
To be fair, that answer will apply to all major events they may ask you about  
I'm on the red line and we're about to hit Addison. Send help.  Everyone is singing. I fucking love it. 
Hahahahah same I'm in California and Milwaukee. The purge has commenced  
That one high school senior predicted it for this year as his quote, though. He has some explaining to do.  
Imagine the people that blew tens of thousands of dollars betting on the Cubbies last year because of Back to the Future. Didn't pay off that year, so those people didn't bet a dime this year, thinking the curse was too strong. And then the Cubs win this year, just to rub salt in the wound. 
Theo Epstein could run for governor of California by basing his campaign around two words: drought buster. 
It's god tying up loose story ends before he fucks us all up.   That's right. I called it. Trump victory.  
My grandpa was a lifelong cubs fan and he passed away a few months ago. What a great time to win.  
My grandpa didn't get off his ship in the Navy until 1946, so this was his first Cubs World Series even though he was alive for the last one. He's been in kidney failure and in-home hospice care for a while now and I'm glad he got to see this. 
This girl named Becky Schwartz said she'd fuck me "when the Cubs win the world series". I don't know how to explain to my SO that I have to do this... 
He probably died of a heart attack when the 2 run HR tied it up. 
I like having the shortest championship drought in all of professional sports tbh 
This is why I really wanted the Cubs to win. I remember watching that game in 2004 on a tiny tv when I wasn't supposed to be awake because of school. They broke the curse and I got to see it as a sox fan. I'm so happy for the Cubs and their fans, it's a great feeling 
So has this ever worked in favor of the person who got the tattoo? 
I'm nearly 50 years old.  I'm not a sports fan by any means, but I watched this game tonight (the first ball game I've watched in years) with a pic of my parents, who both passed away 13 years ago, propped up next to me so they could watch too.  My grandmother, who died in 1992, always had the Cubs game on when we would visit her as kids.  Like so many, this isn't just history for us; it's history for the one, two, or maybe three generations of loved ones that have lived and died without seeing the Cubs win a World Series, while always staying fans.  
I almost teared up, but theres no crying in baseball .  But seriously this really put into perspective how big this is, and even though I've never really cared for baseball, you've made me recognize how lucky I am to be alive and witness this . 
I'm totally biased since I'm a Cubs fan but I mean if you have to lose to someone, might as well be the team that hasn't won a championship in over a 100 years. 
I feel kind of bad, because I was raised as a Cubs fan, and I've always felt the love for them in my heart.  I grew up watching Andre Dawson, Mark Grace, Ryno, Greg Maddux, Sammy Sosa, all those goddamn greats.  Feeling that heartbreak in high school with the 03' team (losing with Wood and Prior...HOW?).  But I'm the type of guy who doesn't really have the patience to *care* through an entire 160+ whatever game baseball season.  So, I'm not really fairweather because I always keep tabs on the Cubs, but I also can't muster up much of a shit about baseball esp if the Cubs aren't good.  I suspect a lot of people have similar stories. 
Jesus Christ. That coupled with how it actually happened (game 7, extra innings) makes that sound like a screen play. That's so cool 
Isn't a baseball game always down to the last batter...? 
Only because Biff screwed up the original timeline when he changed his name to Trump  
Where are you going? ***Why did you leave your house???*** 
I know those are streets in Chicago but I still read that as you being in some kind of quantum state 
I'm glad someone else saw that. I'm genuinely concerned. 
I'd say Back to the Future's prediction was still better considering they predicted it decades ago 
It's what every baseball player dreams of their entire life! 
He's the biggest winner of all, imo. Red Sox then Cubs? Dude is amazing.   Which team is next? How much money is he getting? 
Cubs win the series and fucking Biff the presidency  
My dad passed 13 years ago. I'm wearing his Cubs hat. 
Yeah i live in the suburbs and it is just, crazy, people are running in the street and honking aswell  
I had no money riding on it and I almost had a heart attack. 
Even as a lifelong Cubs fan, I was rooting for the Sox so hard in 2004. I was in seventh grade. I remember staying up way too late too, those extra innings games where you guys rallied against the Yankees. Ortiz with those clutch home runs. Curt Schilling and his bloody ankle. All of it was beautiful.  
Seriously if I were OP I would start shopping that shit.  
That video is actually from a couple years ago. IIRC that guy controlled the fireworks for the Indians and accidentally fired them off when the opposing team hit a home run. 
Why? My country left the EU. David Bowie died. Donald Trump has a serious chance of being POTUS.  At least Tottenham didn't win the league.  
It was 1993. Rumor has it he may have chosen 2016 because it's 23 years later. Jordan's number. Chicago.  
Yeah, I'm pretty sure this means Trump is going to win the presidency and North Korea is going to discover internet porn.  
That little giggle as he throws the ball had me laughing so hard 
I just realised, with this almost definitely becoming a classic, Joe Buck now has two of the most iconic announcer moments in sports history:  "Stays on his feet, airs it out, down the field... it is... caught, by Tyree!"  and now  "...gonna be a tough play; Bryant; the Cubs... WIN THE WORLD SERIES! Bryant makes the play, it's over!" 
I have a feeling Bryzzo snagged that ball for memorabilia... 
"McFly's a hero because he's a butthead. I like people who aren't buttheads, okay?" 
My husband is at some bar who the hell knows where he's at lmao  
OFFICIAL SELECTION FOR MEME OF THE YEAR NOMINEE:   #BLEW A 3-1 LEAD 
Sounds like a book and movie adaptation waiting to happen.  Hey OP, include this comment in the movie please. 
Death, taxes, Arsenal finishing above Tottenham... some things never change  
Robo-Goodell walks up to the podium "and with the 1st overall pick of the 2080 season, the Cleveland Browns select... Robert Griffin the Sixth" 
Last year was fucking precious.Tottenham for most of the end of the season ahead of Arsenal, and Arsenal gets....second 
Breaking news! RG VI has torn his ACL while climbing the stairs to greet his new comrades. 
1908+108=2016  108, the height of the Sears Tower, also the street Cubs HQ is on. 
was this the guy that was using multiple accounts to up vote himself? am I remembering correctly? 
The first time my SO and I slept together I woke up during the night to use the bathroom. I came back in the room and she farted one of the loudest farts I've ever heard. I started laughing like crazy and she almost woke up. Almost. We've been together for seven years.  
I know her secret Twitter handle.  But she might know my secret reddit account (this one) so perhaps it's a wash. 
He claims he doesn't love the new cat his parents adopted. Claims she always just sleeps in his room for some reason.   Motherfucker loves that cat so much. 
My ex, and the cheating. She thinks I found out when I looked at her phone, but I new about two months earlier when she sent me a pic of herself watching Netflix in bed. I don't think she realized that the dude's face was 100% visible reflected in the laptop. After that it was a matter of me being in denial and trying to fix things. 
I knew for a year and a half about my engagement ring and never told him until after he proposed. He was not so good at hiding. 
Everybody likes snacks, right? Some of us like chips, others like fruit, or yogurt. Well, my wife likes croutons. Frozen croutons to be exact and she tries to hide it like an alcoholic hides bottles of vodka. Where does she hide the croutons? In the freezer. At first I'd put them in the pantry when we get home from the grocery store, but they'd always end up in the freezer. I'd be like, "Uh, hon, what's up with the croutons in the freezer?" and she'd act like she had no idea what I was talking about. Now here's the thing, I've tried them and now I'm addicted to them too. So now I openly eat cold croutons out of the freezer as a snack, and she tells me what a weirdo I am while she eats half the bag with me. No idea why she's embarassed to admit what a genius she is for discovering such an awesome snack. BTW, the best kind is Chatham Village garlic and cheese flavor. 
My wife dropped my iPhone in a Port-A-Potty toilet.  Luckily it has been so used there was a large pile of shit which gently held the phone above the liquid.  She cleaned it off and gave it back to me.  A year later I upgraded and gave her my old phone.    She insisted on purchasing a new cover even though I had a high-end OtterBox.  I never understood why until one of the kids told on her. 
My ex made up a person and spoke to me as them. We met when we were quite young and were both pretty weird... I put it down to insecurity and wanting to look like she had cool friends (I was a little older). I never let on that I knew because it would have been super embarrassing for her and this was literally the start of the relationship.  She made up quite a few stories about this guy and I got a few emails from "him". She didn't realise that changing the name of the account didn't actually change the address, which was fully visible. 
She smokes when I'm not home, I know this because I always move the router to the window where the signals best, when I come home the router is in a different position away from the window, I put it back without her knowing and call her out for smoking, she has no idea how I keep finding out! 
His affair.  I knew for 3 weeks before he left (to look after his allegedly sick dad) and for 2 weeks after before I told him I knew. He said last week he's ended it and sees what he has missed but I know he's still sleeping and living with her whilst messaging me. Basically what he just did to me - I'm his wife, we were together 12 years. He just can't stop lying. He may be genuinely remorseful right now but I can't get past his deceit.  Update. - sorry if my comment was confusing and thank you for all the replies. I found out in December, he was cruel and miserable throughout and nearly ruined Xmas for the kids. I suggested he go visit his 'sick dad' at NY and slammed that door right behind him. Took time off work (I was main earner then) and rearranged my life to take care of the kids and get a job with flexible hours. I'm happier. Kids are doing well. He's the one struggling now. 
My (soon to be) ex-wife met another guy about a year and a half ago. She was so bad at hiding it that I thought she WANTED to get caught. Posting romantic stuff on her Instagram when we hadn't been romantic in a long time. Confronted her, lied even with solid evidence. A few months later stuff starts disappearing from the house, pretty obvious that she's moving out. Then we started to have no money every month(and I have a pretty okay job), realized she was stealing money basically by paying her bills twice a month with 3-4x the minimum payment and not paying mine. Let it go on for a bit and finally confronted her, she doesn't admit to it. I finally just pull my check from our joint account and she says she's leaving but is going to be homeless. The next day she had changed her facebook back to her maiden name and had a picture of her and the other guy at their new place. I don't know if this counts. 
She is breaking up with me tomorow, said she wants to talk, and it's not something we can talk about in texts. We are on the verge of a breakup for like two months now, feels bad. 
He spent a ton of money on bruins tickets this year. Whenever he got tickets to a match he claimed he got them for free through work but I know he paid for them. I don't really mind since he can spend his money how he wants, but it's funny to me that he thinks I wouldn't realize he's spending a few hundred bucks every time he goes to a game  
They don't love me anymore. But... ya know... finances and such. 
She had sex with my boss before we knew each other, before I had been hired into the company. I'm not mad about it or anything, everyone has a past but she carefully dances around ever coming into my work now and I'm careful not to bring him up. 
Can't we just have an anon mode so I can stop making throwaways? YEAH I KNOW YOU LOOK AT MY REDDIT FITE ME WHEN YOU COME HOME. 
My ex - his drinking. I could smell the alcohol on him. Excuses included:  - it's the coffee I had - it's the gum I chewed - it's my aftershave  - the guys were drinking, not me - I had to use a solvent today, I must have gotten some on me - etc  I gave up. I knew. Then he started coming home fall-down drunk. Gave him an ultimatum. Went through with it.   Typo fixed 
we were long distance when we first started dating.  The one time she came up to where I lived for 4 days, but I had to work during one of the days.  When I was gone she had to take a dump and clogged the toilet.  She couldn't get it to plunge and was freaking out so she went to the kitchen and got a fork and a plastic bag and dug the turds out of the bowl and threw everything in the dumpster out back.  She called her friend panicking and the friend thought it was hilarious.  Friend told me about it one night when the girl had left the room after we moved in together.  I find it funny but don't want to embarrass her!  
This is in the past, but still a good one.   Ended up finding out that my (now ex) girlfriend was cheating on me after hearing one of my parrots pick up, "Oh, God, yes, Jim!" In a rather scratchy sensual voice.   Turns out they've been having sex where I keep him while I went to work. Dumped her ass the next time I saw her and told her.  
When  he's about to fall asleep he's completely honest.  it was about 7 months in when he grabbed me and whispered into my ear "You're gonna be the mother of my children."   I told him and he was thoroughly embarrassed and he apologized.  however I neglected to tell him that pretty much every night he would tell me that he loved me starting a month in.    I don't mind and I'm not trying to rush things and neither of us have any plans to jump into that sort of stuff right away but it's nice to know 
"reddit what is the worst secret your so is hiding from you"  "she has sports tickets for my birthday"   what 
At night, once I go to bed, he binge watches Gossip girl.  
She is hiding baseball tickets for when my favorite team comes into town. She is waiting to give them to me on my birthday. 
Combination of her drinking and her cheating. I can tell by her behavior and the look in her eyes the second she drinks. Saw texts from another guy while she was passed out... Not really sure what to do. 
He has been hiding he's autistic from me for ten years. (Should clarify it's a long running on again off again thing between us but even when it's off we were still good friends) He suffered abusive therapy and because of it thinks hiding his autism is the most important thing. Except that's like trying to hide an elephant in a bathroom, and he's not always super high functioning. So it's always a weird charade of me pretending he's not autistic while busting my ass to gently handle that.   I have no idea how to talk to him about it. I know he has a formal diagnosis. He was so traumatized from institutional medical abuse in the name of therapy that even mentioning it or acknowledging it can cause him to have a meltdown. He thinks if I knew, I wouldn't love him anymore, but I've known for YEARS and I still love him. I like him just how he is, I just want things to be easier and less scary for him, and I don't know how to help most of the time because he won't admit the problem. 
I woke up in the middle of the night to my gf giving me a handy while i had been asleep.  I pretended to stay asleep through it and she never said anything to me about it since.  Was that some crazy Cosmo test to see if I'd say someone's name in my sleep or something?  
While me and my ex were dating she said that she had a driver's license, but I knew she didn't the whole time 
I know he already bought an engagement ring and that it's a pearl, not a diamond. But he's just awful at hiding gifts from me. Not physically, but he just asks me a ton of questions about what I want and then plays it off like I could never figure out why. And I already knew he had gotten a ring because he left mail out from Zales and suddenly had a zales rewards card in his wallet. And I figured out it was a pearl because a few weeks ago he went out to dinner with me and one of my girlfriends and she was talking about what engagement ring she wants and we went on about how neither of us wants a diamond. He got very serious and asked me if I like pearls and acted relieved when I said yes.  
She says she doesn't want children.  I know that she actually does want children, and that she's not capable of having them, due to stumbling upon some medical records. 
My now ex of 2 weeks was trying to hide her drug addiction from me. Was also cheating on me. Told her parents what was going on in an effort to get her the help she needs for her drug problem. She accused me of conspiring with them to ruin her life, told me she hated me and hopes I die, and accused me of abusing her throughout our relationship. I know it's just the drugs talking and that she still cares about me on some level, but that doesn't make things any easier. I still love her and care about her as a person, but all romantic attachment I had to her is gone. She's no longer the amazing woman I fell in love with. 
She really disliked my friends (or maybe thought they disliked her), which led to awkward hangouts with groups and eventually led me to uncontrollable anxiety when they were in the same room... Yeah, it was a bad feeling that was never addressed.   
She quit taking birth control. "Somehow we beat the odds" and ended up with a daughter. Probably did it to keep me from leaving.   That or the time she cut herself and said she was attacked. She did this to hide the fact she was seeing an ex.  
When I'm asleep, he grabs my boobs. I sleep top less and if he gets the opportunity, he takes a feel. I allow it because I enjoy it. I think it's funny. 
That's she's been cheating on me with the same person I've been cheating on her with.  
Gay relationship. My graphics card is dying and it makes it difficult to play ffxiv or overwatch without something catastrophic going on.  He bought me a GTX1080 and is waiting for our 9th anniversary in a few weeks to give it to me. He thinks I don't know, but he talks in his sleep. And when he talks in his sleep, it's almost like he's trying to rehearse the situation in his dream. It's absolutely adorable.  He's ratted himself out various times in the past the same way. I always act surprised. :) 
"What's the worse secret" top 9/10 top comments are adorable or sweet. 
That she started dating me because my parents had a lot of money and I was following down the path to also have a lot of money.   I saw her group chat with her mom, sisters and aunt about what a good situation she's in and how she'll never have to work, and that even if things go south she just has to stick around until my parents aren't around anymore.   I'm only with her until I finish school because I don't want to be alone in this time of my life.    
He had always said he hates to cuddle at night because it gets hot/ it's uncomfortable/I hog the blankets/ect. However,  when he thinks I'm asleep he'll scoot over and wrap his body around me. If I even make a move like I'm awake, he'll run back to his side and pretend it never happened. I think its freaking adorable. 
Throwaway because he is a redditor. He is becoming complacent and a bit lazy I guess, so (without even having to go behind his back) know about the several other girls he messages on almost a daily basis, and he is not always asking about the weather or their opinion on the Cuban missile crisis. We live together, and the secret I am keeping from him is a painting I am getting made of his family for his birthday. 
Make it for her some time and tell her you wanted to take a whack at making your own salad dressing. Then play it off like you came up with it all on your own and see if she figures it out. 
Wow what a fucking idiot. Like, why send a pic with him in the room goddamn  
He planned to propose for a year and a half before he did it?  Why?  Did he just get a good deal on a ring and buy it just in case? 
Damn, a year and a half of knowing it was coming but not knowing when?  
Damnit.  I lost the gal I was going to spend my life with to leukemia.  I'm so very sorry. 
Wouldn't work with me; I throw my pillow off the bed in my sleep, I'm instantly awake grabbing for it.  
I remember in college dating a girl whose parents were/are Chinese immigrants, and their English isn't great.   I spent spring break with her at their place 3,000 miles away, and asked if I could check email at their computer to check my midterm grades (this was 2004, before mobile email).   I forget what letter I typed in first but just one keystroke led to something like www.asianshavingsex.com or www.chinesepeoplehavingsex.com or something similar in that the websites likely didn't exist but had the basic "havingsex.com" as the suffix, and realizing that the father's attempt to find porn online was through blindly guessing at website names. Poor guy.   I obviously never told my then-gf.  
Same thing happened to me, more or less. Even talking to him on the phone *right fucking next to me*. We had set up auto-transaction payments for most of our bills, so I shut that down really fast, but it wasn't easy. Her stuff slowly started to disappear and I was like well she's not keeping it all in her car duh. She didn't lie about having nowhere to go, she actually bragged about it. Nice new town-house, new mercedes for her, etc etc. He spends all this money on her so that means he loves her more than I did. Oh ok you're a dumb bitch, bye.  
As the opposite half of that equation. I fell back in love with my wife. Fairly recently actually. We have been together 15 years now. Rough spot about 5 years ago. Separated for a year. Got back together. Honestly, in the last year, it's really going well. I am back in love again. Just letting you know, there is hope. Couples therapy helped. But we both had to do slot on our own. And the biggest piece for me was that I needed to see she was truly making an effort.  
Been there. Done that. Single 2 years now. Was definitely for the best in the long run. We only have one life, no point wasting it on the wrong person 
This happened with my wife and a friend - before I knew her. Actually, it is only because I am friends with him that I met her.  He encouraged our dating.  I don't know if she knows that I know that they had a little thing, no reason it ever needed to come up really.  I don't feel any resentment toward her but to be completely honest I have a small amount of (unreasonable) resentment toward him.  He is a super nice, genuine guy so I am chalking this up to a biological, human condition.  
Five of us in a skype call playing LOL together. One of my buddies just starts reading off some recent comments from my reddit account all nonchalantly. Will never forget that immense feeling of panic. Now when i post things i have to make sure id be ok with my buddies ragging on me for it haha.  
Oh god this reminds me of me:( when I first started dating my bf, I was super shy to use the bathroom or toot or anything in front of him. Well one night I'm hanging out at his place with his friend who I had just met for the first time, and I get a stomach ache. I  ended up clogging the toilet big time (I used to be really bad about the amount of tissue I used) and he didn't have a plunger. I had to leave the mess in there, tell him what happened, and then go purchase a plunger from the store. First, buying just a plunger by itself at the store is embarrassing enough, but then I had to walk through the living room where my bf and his friend are hanging out with the damn thing! Very VERY embarrassing but luckily we all had a laugh and now me and my bf have been together for almost 5 years :)  
I came home from 3 months abroad having left my boyfriend to care for my pets. According to my African Grey parrot there was someone by the name Linda that did "something" very good. She also kept calling people "Fucking Shmuck " and demanding that they get her a beer. She had also master the sound of a gurgling bong and followed it with loud coughing sounds and the occasional "BOOYAH!"   Sounded like he had a lot of fun. 
I've walked in on my husband watching Gilmore Girls more times than I can count. 
It sounds like you might be dating a... basic bitch. 
You think his mom didn't mediate the whole thing? What if you both think you're keeping secrets but you're not? 
He's just extra smart... plots within plots within plots.   He knew you'd find out but knew if he kept it anonymous he'd look even better.   Brilliant guy, and a nice one too.  
I highly doubt that he tripped up.   Let's dispel with this fiction that SO didn't know know what he's doing. He knew exactly what he was doing 
I'd start with breaking up with her. Then go buy yourself a steak.  
That's very sad. :( My aunt and uncle got divorced because my uncle couldn't handle being married. (They were still dating, just no longer in the same house). When talking with the marriage counselor, they realized my uncle actually had severe aspergers the whole time. Once he started getting treated for it, they remarried and are pretty happy together, because now they know what's going on. Hopefully there's hope for you and him, if my aunt and uncle got things to work 
As an adult autistic, I can tell you that the vast majority of us wish that allistics would be mpre upfront and direct with us instead of worrying about doing things the right way. Of course, you know him better than I do, and if he's had abusive therapy it's going to be more complex...  Here's an idea: why don't you try doing something autism-related around him? Volunteer for a summer camp for autistic kids and tell him about it, or read a book by an autistic around him and mention how good it is, or something. Communicate to him that you're accepting of his condition, and that you admire autistics, and you might be able to ease him into it. 
My gf hates when I oversleep on a regular basis, so she plays with my cock when I'm supposed to wake up.  Jokes on her, I still oversleep every time. 
She likely smiles when you come visit, because you're a good man who brightens her day.   Keep it up.  
God I hope that when I die my wife doesn't sell my guns for what I told her I paid for them.  
This is amazing. I wonder how long he had been waiting for you to ask just so he could use that line. 
She might still be telling the truth. I don't want kids and I can't have them anyway. 
I had a crazy ex accuse me of hitting her, which is absolutely untrue. One thing I said that immediately made her stop was that when she says that she minimizes the experience of women who have actually been abused. For some reason that really worked and she never said that again 
Scott, how could you unload your load on your sleeping gf? That's fucked up. 
Going through this right now and I can't find it in me to forgive his friends for the way they treated me. I see you're speaking in past tense, may I ask what happened? 
If you don't break it off now, you'll get complacent and end up marrying her. You'll be married for the most miserable 10 years and she'll get alimony and child support. 
Live stream the Breakup Day for us, We'll help you celebrate. 
I apparently did something like this. I don't really like cuddling when I'm awake. It's hot and breathing through her hair / my face right next to her neck is uncomfortable. But apprently I used to really cling to her when I was asleep. Weird. 
Out of curiosity, why are you getting him something so thoughtful when it seems he's looking for the first opportunity for greener pasture?  Obviously a relationship is much more complex than a few words, but yeah. 
It's been three years. You can't be married to somebody more than half your life and not be profoundly impacted when they're gone. 
The window opens in-wards not out-wards, the router on the shelf blocks the window from opening so she has to move it to the side to open the window. 
You're talking to an oak tree rn. I don't move an inch until I'm up for the bathroom  
That won't help, she put a gps tracker on him. No matter where he goes, she'll find him. 
he's an international superspy dating his handler.  
This whole inconvenience is why I hunted down and slayed all my girlfriends evil exes.  
she says she threw it in the dumpster, but I just use spoons now just in case 
The best is when you *only* buy a plunger. Everyone knows whats waiting for you at home.  
we broke up and i was married to my amazing, genius, beautiful wife within like 18 months.  she pretty much waited for me to get this other bullshit out of my system and then moved in to set things on the right course.  now we have two kids and my life could not be any better.   
wait what? picturing your husband randomly asleep going "OH YEAH" has me dying of laughter 
Yup, definitely. Giving is fun, but it's even better if you can see the result of the appreciation.  
Omg that's such a good idea! But.... After a year apart, I really want to spend the first day just with her haha  
Her best friend : I bet you can't wait until the 21rst!!  Me : why the 21st?  Her : Uh..... Shit oh right! Yeah sorry the 26th haha   So.... I got suspicious, because she loves surprising me.  I decided to invent that after my finals I wanted to maybe go to Amsterdam or some other place  (from the 21st to 25th) with some friends to see her reactions, it was hilarious to see her trying to find excuses and reasons for me not to go.   And her parents seem to be avoiding talking about the day she comes back.  There's a bunch of other little clues but that's just because I know her do well haha  
He picked and chose what Catholic rules to follow. He wasn't going to masturbate but beating his SO was cool. 
That's pretty much what he said, too. He gets anxiety attacks and breathing my air (like when someone is face to face and super close) or having my hair in his face made him feel like he couldn't breathe.  
Found out too late. Painting takes time, and I can't back out now. I might just keep it and turn it into a dartboard. I am many things, but wasteful isn't one of them. 
I mean I would climb out the window and damn near fall a floor so I could smoke.... she can't move a router. That's lazy 
Sneaking out at 4:30 am to smoke a cigarette before going to school as a 14y/o and getting asked by police why the fuck you're out already was my highlight. 
This is why you need to keep a tighter cutlery inventory. 
That's why a plunger is my go-to house warming gift. 
If you can fit your penis into her urethra, you have bigger problems than an ex. 
Like a squirting orgasm while she's sitting on your face 
I'm a sleep groper. I've woken up more than once having sex. When I ask, my wife tells me that I was all kinds of making moves on her. 
Her friend: She's totally coming home on the 21st!   You: It was right about then I began to suspect...  
Sounds familiar :) Being the little spoon was better, but by far my favourite was our backs against each other. Easy breathing, feeling her warmth without being sweaty, and feeling really safe, with no-one able to sneak onto us from my behind. Expect for the fact that we were asleep, of course. 
It's why you have a guest cutlery set, and a secret personal set. 
Thank god I'm not the only one. It's my wedding gift for young couples as well.  Although I do get odd looks when I ask the hardware store to gift wrap it. 
Why is she so closely associated with this phrase? 
Wait, other people actually do this? Am I being had? 
I was diagnosed with aspergers at the age of 11.  I feel like I'm part of a play where everyone has the script except me. 
You know that time you said something stupid and everyone looked at you like you grew a second head? Imagine feeling like that everytime you talk to someone.    Iama high functioning autist ama 
As an autistic person, what's being not autistic like? 
While I live a pretty normal life I have a lot of issues with sensory sensitivity. Like loud noises, bright lights, certain food tastes, smells and standing in crowds of people. These things make me feel a bit stressed out resulting in various issues like headaches and digestive problems.   While we're on the subject. Certain non-autistic people have the misconception that those of us on the spectrum would "lack empathy". That is simply *not* true. We often have a hard time to "read" people, but we certainly do not lack human empathy. That needed to be said.  
It's really, really lonely. To be desperate to go out and be with people but at the same time have no idea how to interact with them. Left out of every conversation. Completely ignored.  The benefits are basically being able to concentrate on anything and really excel at it. Also not falling apart in an emergency, because the emotions of the situation don't really come into play. 
Unusualsoup, you have just made me a really happy lady. ( I just created an account to respond to you, I read threads and have never felt the need to respond) I am a 25 year old nanny to an autistic 5 year old, I can read him faster than anyone else can. I've learnt to adapt to his needs, and with therapy and a specialist and lots of coaching, he is a very verbal child now. The stares and rude comments from strangers are very upsetting. But thankfully he is oblivious to them for now.  He loves routine, and used to be very obsessive about every little thing in his daily life. He has really come out of his shell in the last two years. But he is very selective of who can be around him.   It is so nice and refreshing to see such a nice person on the internet and know that my cute little 5 year old has the chance to one day be comfortable to talk to strangers. Thank you SO much for giving me a little hope on a rough day. All the best to you!   
My brother is autistic. I can't tell you what it's like from his perspective, but it doesn't take long to figure out that a lot of people have zero sympathy for someone that isn't neurotypical. 
I'm with you bacon, I too was diagnosed with aspergers syndrome, well, at age 10. I know exactly where you're coming from. What I've sorta picked up on is that you have to have your own "script" to conquer social encounters. Like somebody asks what's up and I say, Man I'm rockin n rollin! Get brave, accept the fact that you'll fuck up. It's okay to get teased a little as long as you draw a line somewhere. I didn't accomplish my social awkwardness till late in highschool, but it doesn't end. Thing is, you end up being so proud of yourself that you forget your problem being a "problem".  
Now everyone on Reddit thinks they have aspergers.    
A friend of mine explained it to me like "Imagine you're meeting someone new and right out of the gate they dump "I got molested as a child so that's kind of like a duck in cold weather."  You'd have a fearful mix of "holy shit wtf do I say now?" but also "wait, what do they actually *mean* by that?".   And you get that feeling for almost every conversation, with everyone, forever.  I'm not jealous. 
Reading through all of the replies, you all express yourself so well & get your idea across very clearly. To me, you all sound very cool, fun & Nice people to have around.  But I guess this  goes for everyone, it is so much easier to express ourselves on a keyboard in our comfort zone. 
What happens if you are somehow prevented from watching the Simpsons? 
Would you mind me asking what you mean by "stressful" when changing something on your routine?   Do you feel uncomfortable and don't feel comfortable again until it goes back to the way it was?    Do you get used to the change?      
When were you diagnosed and what support have you access too. There are therapies which may help with some of the problems you have stated that have helped me. 
This is the most accurate description I've ever read of myself. Though I've never actually been diagnosed with autism. Mostly because when I grew up autism diagnoses were mostly limited to the ones further up on the spectrum and I've never seen a reason to talk to a doctor about it later on. Getting an official diagnosis wouldn't really change anything but give me a blanket excuse for almost everything.  And for me the stuff that normal people struggle with learning, mostly maths, and computer related stuff, does seem to come naturally to me. It's almost as if I've traded some of my ability to communicate with people to being able to better communicate with computers. And I've taken full advantage of it and made a career out of it. 
The therapist who diagnosed me once told me this story about how one of her patients basically thought "Why is everyone so fucking weird?" for about 17 years before he got diagnosed, because he genuinely didn't realize that _he_ might be the odd one. That's me, as well. 
I actually think that we have too much empathy. I often times get visibly upset when I feel I hurt someone.  
I do. Autistic 110% lacking in "human empathy" here, genuine monster, step right up.  ...Seriously, though, while most autistics tend more towards hyperempathy, lacking affective empathy isn't something terrible. It's true that I frequently don't feel bad at other people's pain, but that doesn't gaurantee someone's an amoral beast. The same way I can believe in being good without the threat of going to hell, I can believe in being good without my brain caning me if I lapse.  I've got morally upright friends & my own standards for that.  [I know you didn't explicitly villainize lack of affective empathy, but, I felt this was worth stating. A lot of people do.] 
Oh man, yes. I have thoughts that no one else has, and when I articulate those thoughts, be it a joke, reference, even just a sentence, I will more often than not get a vacant stare in response. It's actually getting a little irritating if I'm honest, having to try and explain in terms they'll understand before dismissing the conversation entirely because I'm fighting an uphill battle. 
I'm autistic and was intimidated by the thought of putting it all into words, so I'm thankful that you did. I've grown to fear and hate contact with people because of the stares/bullying. But I'm not afraid of children or small animals. My dog is my only friend. 
I am a cubscout leader for 8 year olds here in Utah(and in Utah we have a very high rate of Autism, 1-58 kids are on the spectrum) so I'm trained in dealing with autistic children so that they can be better included into the scouting community, I've had several scouts with Autism including my close friends son. You're description was so in depth, beautiful and warming. Don't be afraid to be who you are as long as that outcome results in happiness. And always continue to educate and make others aware.  
Oh, man. I don't often realise how lucky I am to be high functioning. I understand the loneliness bit way too much. I have a big family, so I'm not short on wisdom, but I am on experiences that I can make and have myself. I have people that I talk and laugh with. They do too. But I'm not one of them. My best friend that I've had since Grade 3 is in all honesty kind of a misleading dick. When I bring up a topic, he'll ask questions like he's probing for information. Then he tells me he can't right now.   I'm terrible with noises too. When I was a baby, mum couldn't take me to church because the noise would make me scream. Speaking of babies crying, that is out. My parents have observed that when I hear a baby or a toddler wailing or screaming, I get really visibly distressed. I **despise** that sound. Thinking about it now is actually making me kind of angry.  
I am much more high functioning than you appear to be (especially in the sensory department, don't have much of those) but the arms flapping, man. Every god damn time. I do it unconsciously even when I'm trying to think about something : just walking in circles and flapping.  
I'm sorry that you feel so lonely in this society. I know about feeling different and struggling to be in crowds or loud places and with sensory overload. We need to make more spaces and have more patience and understanding of people who process the world in a different way. My little cousin has autism and is my favorite person in the world, so reading this made me a little sad because he has so much inside of him that he can't quite articulate/explain. Thank you for sharing so beautifully your story and experience. All the best to you, friend!  
I work with children who have disabilities and a lot of them have different forms of Autism, what can I do to help them that you wish people would have done for you in high school? We help them get jobs, learn basic skills or cooking, cleans, and hygiene.   I would be your friend in a heart beat, you seem like a great person. Hope you're have a good day!  
I really like you. Sometimes I am busy and can't be on Reddit, but I like to talk about lots of different things. You seem kind-hearted, inquisitive, and observant. If you would ever like to have a conversation about something, or ask questions, or just be a goof, feel free to send me a message. 
This... wow, this perspective is really interesting. Like... just the way you described it is like having to fill out forms in triplicate to get a body part to do something... I.. holy shit. 
You said this very well. It caused a trainwreck of mental issues for me like depression and social anxiety. My biggest problem with autism is communication with other people. I just don't know how to respond and sometimes I stay quiet, forgetting to talk. 
How would you say your emotional levels are? Is it true that autistic people can be very emotionally under-developed?  Thanks for writing about it. It is really interesting to read and you also sound very intelliegent. You enlightened me, actually. I too thought autistic people who waved their hands around were wierd and "stupid" but thanks to you I now understand there can be a sharp and reasonable mind stuck inside that "half loaded" body. 
People who bully someone for being autistic or for anything they have no control over are not only jerks but also very stupid.  Keep up the fight :) 
I wish you many smiles and happy thinking :) I am glad I could make you smile. It is hard sometimes and it is scary but there are ways to make life better. Never just go "they have autism they can't do ____" Because sometimes they can and other times they may not be able to say put their socks on, but they can get the socks and ask for help to put them on. Its not the same but its better than just assuming they have no understanding of the socks. Thank you kindly for your response. 
I must agree on that :/  It's very sad actually to see that despite what science and medecine have discovered & Accomplished, people are still being jerks to others over things they cannot control. 
I really loved the part about the store & I'm really sorry that it closed! 
It seems to me that autism diagnosis is really hard to either rule in or out, right? I mean in mild cases how can a psychologist be absolutely sure it's autism?  I can understand many of your points or even associate with some of them but to me, the line seems really thin between just personality quirks and a genuine mental condition. 
When ever ppl ask me how i am i still want to say somewhere in the middle between great and terrible. They want you to say great 
I have high functioning aspergers. I hate it when people say "what's up?" I just say "nothing" that sounds depressing but I can't think of something that's happening to say to people on the spot like that. Sucks 
I don't know why, but I thought 'bacon' might have been an aspergers tick or something until I realised it was the other guy's username. 
b...but it's just a harmless case of social anxiety, r-right? 
The Internet has been one of the best things ever for autistic people. It is so much easier to communicate through text devoid of all the body language and vocal tones...  
There's also a lot of us that have no idea how to explain what it's like so we just read through everybody else's explanations and upvote the ones that make sense. 
You also have to consider that people that are severely impacted are unlikely to be answering this. So you're probably getting a skewed perception because most of the people answering here are very high functioning and therefore somewhat eloquent and capable of giving detailed answers.  But there are many low functioning people with autism who wouldn't be able to reply to you because their communication skills are almost entirely non-existent. 
I think computer scripts is a much better analogy. Actually both of them together, but it's a lot of reminding yourself "if this then that" 
This is exactly it. It always surprises people when I explain that my eye contact is forced because it's not natural to me; when I'm reading your facial expressions I'm doing so consciously and intentionally because it's not automatic; when I read your body language it's intentional; and what neurotypical people call social anxiety is ratcheted up 1000% because it's not just the fear of being judged, or the usual driving forces behind social anxiety. Every interaction is like taking an oral pop quiz, and every moment I spend in the presence of others I'm cramming for the quiz.   I also have a hard time explaining that yes, I get "REALLY INTO" things that interest me. Special interests are at a whole other level for me than neurotypical people.  
Of course not  if its a one off thing that I know about in advance (e.g going to see family in the afternoon) then I feel nervous (pit of my stomach ish, no apatite and butterflys) for the rest of the day in the lead up (sometimes the night before too) and that stays for at least 30 mins in to going off usual and that goes depending on how conformable and relaxed I become.  if it's unexpected will hit much harder and take more to relax again  if it is a permanent change then for the first few times its much harder to be comfortable, I can fixate on it but it goes down over time as that becomes the new routine  basically i can get comfortable over time almost as if I'm being detracted from the change but that does take a bit of work  
I was diagnosed about 15 years ago I think as a young child. I did get some help in primary school so up to 11 but after that  virtually nothing. I have been getting help for Anxiety and at the moment I want to get that well and truly sorted as I know how dangerous that can get  Thanks for the advice, you're too kind! 
I should probably see a therapist, then. I recognise myself in more than a few of the answers given in this thread. This one in particular triggered a few slighlty uncomfortable emotions. 
I have huge trouble telling someone they've made a mistake. I've let people go calling me by the wrong name, or I change the subject in conversation, because the idea of making someone feel bad for making an error is intolerable. That one's a bugger to get around. It was worse as a teenager, I was once frozen to the spot for 3 minutes outside a teacher's door because knocking would interrupt them. Never mind that I had to see them and that they were expecting it, it might slightly inconvenience them and it would be my fault. I'm glad that stage is mostly over with. 
Yeah, autistic hyperempathy's a common thing statistically. I've heard from a lot of people with it, & it's the one disability thing I am honestly really, really glad to not have to deal with. Not anymore, anyway. People with it have my respect. 
I am an autistic person with hyperempathy, and my husband (also in the spectrum) has very low levels of empathy. He certainly still cares a great deal about others, but he finds it difficult-bordering-on-impossible to understand people's feelings or connect with them. He still has plenty of *sympathy*, though.  I, on the other hand, am kind of like an emotional chameleon. I can't help mirroring the emotions of those around me, and it's very tough. I want to be helpful and supportive when I see someone having a hard time, but when I start to adopt their negative feelings, it becomes very difficult to help because now I've got all this stress of my own to deal with. 
Ok so I see the same thing in my sister and her problem is that she doesn't include the necessary context to get her joke or what she's talking about sometimes.  Just to give an example, during her diagnosis of autism a lot of new terms for what autism is were being invented and one had the acronym of A.S.S. (In the Netherlands here, so the acronyms were made out of Dutch words and ass isn't a Dutch word). So my family joked about how if you had autism you were an ass.  My sister explained to a guest one time that she has autism, and joked about how she's an ass. The guest was confused because he didn't know about the acronym, and it never occurred to my sister that most people wouldn't know that.   Do you think you have trouble determining what details you need to and don't need to include when talking with someone?      
I have a cat, she is my friend too. She is very friendly. I was afraid of contact too but I was able to gain a volunteer to take me to library and through that I have become a bit more able with contact. If there is an organisation with you nearby, they may have a volunteer program it may help. Things are much better now I am older than when I was younger. Maybe you can try once again one day soon? :) Happy thinking to you. Best smiles. 
Thank you kindly for your nice words :) I like to help people and if this can help then I help. Its very different from my usual lego reddit postings :) 
Hello, I am glad you feel lucky sometimes. That is a nice feeling. I was also very distressed by crying and screaming babies. However I have changed how I am now. Sometimes it is hard.But other times I feel okay if I can ask the parents questions. "Why is the baby crying" "will it be okay" I love babies but it can be hard to understand some sounds they make and express.  I am sorry your best friend is misleading, that is sad. I am glad my friends are not misleading. 
I walk in circles a lot too. My flapping is only when I am really happy and excited. Hehe when I got gilded in this I got excited and my arms went everywhere and I giggles. I guess happy feelings make that happen. And excited. 
Social groups, being invited to something. I never experienced an invitation to anything till I was older. Even if I don't want to go the feeling of being included is the best feeling ever. Like my friend she had a party just for me. She invited 3 people to play board games and they chose board games that I was able to understand. It was the first party I had ever been to. I was 25.      Jobs and basic skills are okay, but if you don't feel like you belong or don't feel like anyone wants to be around you. Then it can be scary and sad.      My friend invited me to the board game night with an actual invitation it said Time: Place: What to bring: it made it structured and it was the best adventure I ever had because it was my first real social adventure. So I think Planned Inclusion.  
:) I am very bad at messaging people first, they often have to message me. I love messages. Thank you kindly for your kind words. 
Sorry I do not understand this comment :) Can you explain. 
I hope this is a good thing. I am unsure by your post. 
You made some of my confusion less confused, thank you :) I get so angry at being asked to interpret prose, as if I'm supposed to know what the author was thinking!   (Sometimes, I think I have very mild autism...)  Just wondering, how did you learn this trick?  
I really like when people tell me right away that they are autistic and how we can best be friends. It helps me relax too, and we can both have a better time talking about whatever it is that you love right now.   It's often easier throughout because when we make plans, I can count on you to be at trivia every Tuesday night at 8pm. I can bluntly communicate what I need socially and it's really really nice. Like, "I really like the dress I'm wearing; could you please tell me it's pretty?" or "I'm sad because this thing happened and I would really like a hug right now, but it's okay if that's not something you can do right now."  I've always loved people with passion, and folks on the spectrum are generally exploding with it.  
Usually I just kind of find something else and drift away from that. I'll revisit it from time to time but I generally don't regain the interest on the same level.  
Come to Europe, where I had better days is an acceptable answer 
You just described that perfectly.   My current girlfriend didn't realise that I have high functioning autism - partly because it's not severe, but also because basically all of the interactions with her have been ones that I've been through many, many times and I roughly know how I'm meant to react, even if sometimes I don't know *why* I need to react that way. it's a huge help but also a hindrance because some people just refuse to believe me until they spend more than a few minutes at at time with me. 
That and you have time to think through what you want to say. Or at least that's the case with me as an aspie. It's not weird on the internet if it takes 2-3 minutes to respond to a tweet or comment, but it's definitely weird if you do that in real life. 
It's more accurate sure but most people don't understand computer scripts either... 
Reading this thread, I'm starting to wonder if I'm autistic. 
That's interesting. I used to feel like that, but to a much lesser degree. I'm not autistic, just was a very nervous kid. I'd get very nervous about something I had to do later in the day or week and totally work myself up about it so I felt stressed and miserable. As I got older I just managed to be more in tune with my feelings and when I felt that way I'd be able to stop and think, wait, why do I feel this way? Some stresses I eventually just cut out of my life and others I learned weren't as bad as I thought. Hang in there, hopefully it'll get better.  
A lot has changed in 15 years with therapy, I am 28. Therapy now is much different to when I was younger. Even just 10 years ago. Much has changed. I wish you many smiles and happy thinking. Just if you want to change, there maybe a way you can get help and not have to do it alone. 
Just remember that no matter what the doctor tells you, you're the same person you've always been - you just may have a name to some of your behaviors.  
hahaha, brilliant.   As someone who's not autistic, but is an introvert, that sentence reads this way to me... "Imagine you could eat a burrito for breakfast and then wear it to work." 
I do the opposite. I often point out mistakes because I think I would want to know and therefore think it's courteous. I do this without personal judgment---we all make mistakes all the time---but my criticism is usually taken as judgment, especially because I lack appropriate facial expression/recognition. I used to do this more often and have learned to tone it down. Nonetheless, it still comes up several times a week --- very small things I say without any ill will and people take them as insults. I have to be constantly vigilant.  On the flipside, I'm good (or I think I'm good) at receiving critical feedback. I'm a perfectionist, but I rarely if ever take people's comments personally; the feedback is just data, and my assumption is that we're both (say a supervisor and I) aiming for my improvement. I always appreciate direct, clear communication.  
I've always thought I might be on the Asperger's spectrum but this thread feels like it's confirming it for me. I have so many of these idiosyncrasies and I feel like they  really have held me back from being as successful as I could have been.  This topic is a bit of a mind blown moment for me. 
Wow, I had never heard of hyperempathy before. My son is autistic and can't watch movies because he gets too stressed and upset whenever something bad happens. We can't watch Peppa Pig because her brother George cries a lot and it drives him crazy.  
That's interesting. My dad's Italian and I remember as a kid when I first saw footage of Iraqis in street markets haggling by arguing and yelling really loudly at each other in ways I can only imagine most Westerners would have perceived as really aggressive, all I could think about was how much they reminded me of my Italian family. 
This is exactly it. Former employee was on the spectrum. As soon as he was aware that everyone else lacked the context that existed in his head, workplace interactions smoothed over dramatically.  
My son's like that.  He assumes everyone has the same knowledge about video games\memes and will start talking to people about these topics and often will lead to people being baffled.   
Yeah, my friend says a lot of those things too. I've been trying to do this thing with him, where I will come pick him up in my car and we will go somewhere planned and ill say and after that we can figure out what we are going to do. At first that was hard for him, but eventually he got the hang of it. A lot of the time now we dont have any set plans, except maybe one or two things we want to fit somewhere in the day. He's come a long way in that manner.  I know autism is different for everyone but do you have obsessive behavior?  My friend does, very singular interests and its all or nothing. For the longest time he was obsessed with Doctor Who and only doctor who. Eventually after I kept bringing up the awesome parts of other shows and movies I love he took some interest. So I've been showing him some of my other favorite shows. He still has a hard time being a fan of multiple things, but hes getting there. 
Oh man change could be so hard. When I was younger I hated it when my parents would redecorate the living room. Took me weeks to get used to and accept it as the new normal.  I  have become more flexible with my planning. I still like using checklists for days and making precise plans with friends but if a change needs to be made I can handle it usually. It all depends  on how "full" my head is at that time and how immediate it switches. A calm mind and some time is what I need to process it and change the schedule as the new normal. 
Not autistic as far as I know, but damn if I don't touch *everything* that looks like it has a cool texture, would join you if I could. You do you and fuck everyone else.  I wish you all the best. 
My thing is complicated by CSA and three rapes and the resulting ptsd. I'm getting treatment and hopefully will become desensitised enough to finally take my dog out for walks. That's my only goal so far. I'm still too scared to think about interacting with humans face to face. Even this reddit thing is giving me heart palpitations so I'm probably going to stop fairly soon. Thank you for the happy thinking :) 
I wish we could nominate you to mod an autism related subreddit. I wish I could pay you to help me better understand my kids and be a better mom. 
I haven't been diagnosed with autism but I absolutely understand the hand flapping. I do it when I'm really happy or excited; it's like the happiness is electricity and I have to channel it through my hands to process it properly.  
Thank you for that, I'm going to remember this and use it for the future! :) 
You seem like an incredibly nice and genuine person. It's amazing to me that you are so positive. I am going to be more positive today and try to pass along the happy smiles and happy thinking! 
I think he's trying to say that you're a strong fighter & You should be proud of yourself.  I agree with him :) 
Your description of autism gave me clearer understanding of what it's like. It sounds like your day-to-day life can be a battle sometimes.  
It's a good thing. Your perspective on your condition is very helpful to those who don't know much about autism. Many think that you aren't aware of your surroundings when it turns out you are *too* aware sometimes. It sounds like you have some good outlets to pursue which is very important. Best of luck to you. 
This explains it...  I'm not sure if I'm on the spectrum, but I've increasingly started to think so. I'm female.  When I was a kid I did not feel anything. I just mimicked what was the appropriate facial expression, got it all down in reflexes.  I went through a traumatic/emotionally abusive relationship around 18 years old and have genuinely felt emotions since. But it's just the ones that mattered, and not all of them.  It's weird, because I was always super empathetic. I liked people because by seeing their emotions I could feel emotions. But I couldn't have my own emotions until I lost my mind and sense of self later on with a terrible person I thought I loved. 
It's an acceptable answer everywhere.  Lots of folks just don't want to dive any deeper. 
I worked in a Northeast USA town for five years and every single day when I asked this old guy "how are you today" he would always say "I was better 40 years ago" in such a distinctly sad droll tone and I get kind of awkward because I had no idea how to respond to that  
I'm coming up on 40 years old in a few months.  I feel like I have learned enough of those things, that I can now pass for completely normal.  I've got a wife, I got a place, I keep my bills paid, I haven't had to move in over 4 years which is a new record for me.  At worst, people think of me as an under achiever.  Nobody has any ideas.  It can be done, but it does take time.  A lot of time.  
For me, i just want to be treated with dignity, patience, and respect. Be aware that I'm probably agonizing over your social cues that i may or may not be interpreting correctly or even noticing. 
For most people it's social cues that are the most difficult to notice. Making everything just a bit more explicit in terms of meaning goes a long ways  
I don't know if this is common for aspies, but I definitely am someone who can be incredibly articulate and intelligent if given time to form a statement. In public social situations I usually just say what comes to mind, because in the time it would take to formulate an articulate statement the conversation has already moved on. On the internet or through text I have time to think about these things  
I mean I think they get the basic if this then this. If they don't you could say "logic trees" 
Autism is a spectrum disorder. It's very likely many people have one or more symptoms but would still not cross the threshold for diagnosis. 
Thank you so much, I wish you many good times as well  
Somehow this is really comforting. Thank you so much :) 
Where it gets real fun is that Introversion/extroversion aren't binary. I'm a natural introvert with an extroverted personality so hanging out with friends is a lot like hiking up a mountain; it's fun but when it's over I am *spent.* 
Being an introvert doesn't make you socially inept, you know. I'm tired of seeing this implication. I'm certainly an introvert but yet I serve tables which involves talking to strangers all day, which I dislike. Go figure.  
You described it rather perfect. I'm definitely not an extreme introvert or extrovert, but I'm introverted enough to realize midway through a conversation that I have no idea what I'm doing and am trying to figure out a way to leave now. It happen constantly an I kinda wish I was better at talking to people so maybe I'd have more friends. 
You might try to soften your criticism with "I don't mean to be critical but I noticed..." and end it with "... I just thought you'd like to know."  Even give a compliment after like "And I really appreciate that you..."  
I share the majority of these symptoms (hyperempathy, fear of doing something wrong, "outlandish" social behavior, etc.) and have been diagnosed with a personality and stress disorder. I would definitely seek help if it's something that really affects your daily life. 
I have to say I'm so glad I don't have to shop for my groceries like that. I hate going to the supermarket enough without having it full of people shouting and arguing over every price.   I'd pay double (probably do!) to avoid all that hecticness. 
Just wanted add a little something to this. My kids are like this but are not autistic. They assume because all their friends know all the memes, then everyone must know the meme and the meaning behind that meme.   Reddit is like that too. 
I did not like change when younger! It would have been impossible so many things I do now. Small steps! 
Sometimes people just like to touch everything really cool. You know when I was younger I was told, never swear. Swearing is bad. So I have only said two curse words in my life. So seeing someone able to curse like you just did, in my head your like a super rough good guy in a movie, like John Mcclain from Die Hard :) ! Keep being awesome! 
I am unsure what CSA means but I am sorry for these things happening to you. But it sounds like things maybe not related to just having autism but by things that autism has made worse that have happened to you.  I think you are brave and strong. If reddit is making you uneasy it is okay to not use reddit. :) 
:) I ma a moderator of /r/lego I like that. I gave some communications in real life before on autism. I hope you can be the best mom you wish to be and that you feel you are doing a good job. Trying to understand your children is the first step to being a kind parent! 
:) Thank you kindly for putting value in my words, they would just be words if you didn't like them. Now they are liked words :) Its an upgrade like in a video game. 
:) Thank you kindly. I am not sure if a strong fighter. But I try to be brave. 
Yes, difficult. But! Also joy.       I was sick recently. My 8 year old friend and her mother took me to the doctor. Afterwards when back at my home, she put a blanket on me and kissed my cheek to help me get better faster. I think that was a joy, even though being sick was hard.   It is like that, there are some bad things and then good things and so not all of it is hard, just some. Like dressing I need help to do, but patting my cat I can do myself. Typing on the computer I can do, but tidying my house is hard because I am unsure what is useful and what goes where. A mix. 
Reddit is austistic is the correct answer. Place where you can take all the time in the world to reply or simply not. 
Congratulations. I am nearly the same age and in a similar position. Everything is so much easier now that I've learned how to cope with my limitations. To the outsider it looks like underachieving, but every day of peace and happiness is an achievement for me. 
I want to think I treat everyone with dignity, patience, and respect. But apparently I don't sometimes. What do people do that make you feel that way? 
And now we've literally got a bunch of autists sitting around breaking down the options of how to address this specific hypothetical social situation.  Been there many times myself, friends. 
Possible. Here's why I'm wondering about myself:  I have SEVERE social anxiety, especially at work. I can barely mumble out two words to co-workers. It's 100x worse around my supervisor.  I am CONSTANTLY evaluating and reevaluating social interactions in my head.  If I know a social interaction is coming (even a small two sentence exchange), my anxiety shoots through the roof, and I play out every conversational possibility in my head.  I am constantly afraid that I will be reprimanded or even terminated at work. To be clear, I work at a good place, moving up, and turning in high quality product. I have zero reason to feel this way.  I am very detached from my emotions, and they tend to hit me after the fact, if they do at all.  I am very closed off, even with significant other(s).  If I'm around a lot of people, I feel the need to get out and get out now. This doesn't happen all the time, but it does happen fairly regularly. 
Holy shit, you can be a mix of both?  This just answered a lot of confusion I tend to have about my inconsistency in my dealings with people. 
that just means you're a social introvert all the verts mean is where you get your energy from, if you get tired when you hang around people and need to be alone to recharge you're an introvert, if you are energised around people and get sluggish when your alone you're an extrovert 
The ol' shit sandwich! Compliment-Critique-Compliment  
I don't mean to be critical but I noticed this would take quite some time and I couldn't help noticing it's also a bit dishonest to say you don't mean to be critical when you do. Not attacking you, just thought you'd like to know. And I realy appreciate you sharing your views.  Something like this? 
I feel like because of this, the average Westerner is TERRIBLE at negotiation. Like, if you were from Asia, Africa, the Middle East or Latin America, difficult negotiations are just a part of life.   My friend from Kenya managed to get a Sony store employee to sell him the DISPLAY TELEVISION THEY USED IN THE STORE for 50% the asking price. It was dope. 
Thats awesome that you get to have some of the things you like cross over like that. Thats also awesome that you can juggle several different things you like at once! Good luck with your adventures!  
I hope we get to someday read your stories. You write beautifully. Thank you for your words 
You sound like you really got the hang of managing your autism man. 
When you say "Write" do you mean fiction or a diary or what exactly? 
it got a lot better already luckily :) And I also learned to recognize when I am opposed to something just because it's different and my autism has difficulty handling it, I manage to take a step back and re evaluate. 
Touching cool stuff is cool be it a wall, a leaf, a strangers awesome hair (ok maybe not this last one) totally with you on that.  Only two?! That's commendable, no idea how you managed. I'm a tiny mid-20's woman with the mouth of a sailor, it's fun and apparently makes me sound like John Mcclain, which is fantastic.     Yes I will and you keep being your damn awesome self too, you brave, unusual soup. 
child sexual assault.   Autism is definitely complicating the PTSD and its treatment, and as I'm a female with autism that means there's less knowledge/awareness of how it manifests vs how it typically does with males.  
Oh my god, I've been reading your messages now, and this one made me laugh and cry at the same time. I never made that connection before!  
I really enjoy reading your posts, you have a very unique way of putting words together to convey your thoughts. It puts a smile on my face. It's really great that the Internet makes it possible for you to give a person a smile from a million miles away. Pat your cat from me, will you? 
This comment made me smile. It's an interesting and fun way to look at words.    I have really enjoyed reading your comments and conversations in this thread. You are a great communicator on here and your personality shines through what you type in a nice and thoughtful way which is awesome. I think you are a very fun and kind person.    Thank you for sharing your experiences and insights with us. They have been informative and enlightening while also being very entertaining to read. I hope you have many happy adventures that make you smile like reading your comments made me smile today! :)  
I'm not autistic and I don't know what's useful and what's not when cleaning house. Haha!   But in all seriousness, that's a reallwy great perspective to have. Finding joy in the everyday things.  
........................................That is correct 
Hahahaha. I wish I could meet you all IRL so we could have hours of these pointless arguments. I love it but no one else will entertain it 
100% sounds like social anxiety not autism. I think you're good. Minus the crippling social anxiety of course :/  One thing I found helpful in dealing with mine is to actually force myself into situations where I have to speak to people. Socialisation needs to be practised.   
I always buy my electronics off the display shelf. Usually around the super bowl. Has nothing to do with him being from Kenya, just a smart life hack. The store doesn't want to pay an invoice tax for that model anyway so they could theoretically give it to you and save money.   Ps: typically you won't get a warranty but who cares, my 55 inch Samsung for $799 cost me $349. Best Buy is the best place to do this.  
Hey. At least we are high functioning, unlike 4chan. 
I have a published children's book :) I love to write. 
I am a girl :) I do not know if I manage it, but more, others help me manage. When the support is in place lots can happen. I hope this makes sense. Like before I could talk people had to guess my needs. With therapy and support and care I became able to talk. With talking I was able to express my needs, then they were able to take that further and help me better myself more. Independence as much as possible is the goal for anyone with any disability. 
I write poetry, stories, mostly for Children, sometimes just what I am feeling or finding hard. I have one published childrens book available on Amazon. 
:) Thank you for kind words, You keep being awesome action hero too! 
Maybe you can make one, I am not sure what quotes you mean but it is good you are happy. 
I patted her for you. She likes rubbing her head on things. So I also let her rub her head on my hand for you too! 
Today when I visited my neighbour, she has an 11 month old baby. She was feeding her. She let me with my shaky and unsteady hands, feed the baby a spoonful of food. The baby smiles at me. It was the best part of my day.       Funny too, sometimes the worst part of my days have nothing to do with the things that make me life hard like autism and that. Instead today the worst part of my day was going to the store to look at new televisions as mine broke and I am sad as it was my company in the quiet. And finding out they are so expensive and I cannot afford a whole new television I can only pay for 3/4 of a television.     So I guess maybe sometimes some of the hard things seem not as big as some of the other things that come. 
I've seen comments, know i had a good reply, and still waited ~30 min To think it over..... 
This. I get social anxiety and I look like a weirdo(when talking, been told I'm physically attractive). What I started to do was forcing myself to be more talkative in class, whether if it's around my classmates or I started asking more questions to the professor so the spotlight is on me-forcing myself to continue being coherent with the professor and to learn to be confident in my own voice.  That and I'm 27 at a community college. So maybe I'm giving less fucks? 
I've always been curious when I see someone able to type so well but had/has difficulties with speaking - would you mind elaborating on your experience with the two? Were you fine with writing/typing even at the time when you could not speak? Or did both abilities kind of evolve together?  
What kind of therapy worked best for you? My autistic daughter is 15 and does not speak beyond a few words. She uses AAC and can type with support but she doesn't like to. It's hard work, she says. I want so badly to help her, she has so much to say. And she's funny! When everything comes together just right, she can use a complete sentence and say the wittiest things. I want to help her use her AAC, despite her motor difficulties. She gets so frustrated when her brain won't let her hand type the right thing. She has no friends because people just don't know how to interact with someone who appears to not be interacting. She's a joy and I would love to see her be able to write like you do.  
That is great!!  And by the way, I've noticed many comments are about lego...So why do you like them so much? :) 
You're awesome! It's really made my day reading your comments, you seem lovely. I've really liked learning about you! Good luck with your adventures and your writing! Feel free to message me if you ever want another friend!! :)  
When you wrote that your arms went everywhere and you giggled, it was a perfect description of experiencing joy.  I think almost everyone who read that ended up smiling, because for a moment they could feel a little how you felt. 
Do you have a PayPal account? I would like to contribute to your TV fund. If you or your parents or someone who helps you has a post office box I could send it to you that way.  
You sound awesome! Baby smiles are an excellent way to lift your mood! 
27 at a community college....thank you for your service. I'm 22 and the thought of being around 18 year olds scares the fuck out of me  
They both evolve together. Starting with PECS and other kinds of communication. I really like words. Now I can talk. I still use PECS as well as AAC with ipad and type/write. My abilities to get thoughts exactly right with writing is nice. With talking, It can take a few mistakes. Though sometimes I miss small words as I think in pictures. "The" "and" "but" because those are not significant in my brain. Yesterday I sent a text to someone it said "I had the longest ever" and I meant longest nap. but my brain skipped over nap because in my head I was still laying in bed and so my brain jumped that word. Its very strange and I do not understand it. 
I am fascinated by something similar. /u/UnusualSoup, you can elaborate your thoughts eloquently on complex subjects (and better than most) but when you saw a small cut on your leg, you weren't able to determine that it was fine--you needed to ask a neighbor. Where is the disconnect happening? 
Lego can fit into whatever I like. If I like castles. Lego castle. If I like westerns, Lego Westerns. If I want to see what it would be like to have cowboys fly a spaceship. I can have cowboys fly a spaceship. I began using lego as play therapy. It was the best thing I ever did.      I like building even if its hard and slow, even if it takes time with my coordination problems. I like that I can do it and I like that I can decide what there is. I like playing stories and seeing my stories is more fun than just imagining them. Lego also helped me with communicating with others.    I am a moderator of /r/lego and its one of the most wonderful communities there is. When my computer broke some years ago. People there helped fundraise a new one for me. I care about many of them very much and I care about the sub.       So Lego helped in many ways, it fits into my likes in many ways and it gave me friends. 
You have wonderful adventures too! And you find lots of smiles ! :)! 
I understand, but I meant it depends on who you are dealing with. My GP has no experience with girls with autism but she is kind and tries. Since working with me she now has more awareness, BUT my support worker has experience with females with autism. So her knowledge is very high. Although under diagnosed, it just means more people need the training. But it doesn't mean everyone. I am sorry I am thinking very literal. 
Yes! And they let you stare at them and never get angry about it! 
Women would ride down the street on their bikes and give off that Doppler effect.   weeeeeEEEEEE-OOOOOOOOooooooo.    
There would be no discernible recordings of Elvis or The Beatles performing live. 
Men would probably be way less embarrassed by random visible boners 
This library would not be nearly as quiet as I want it to be 
I'm imagining cute little earmuffs that girls could wear on our vaginas to keep our whistles discreet when out in public. The muff muffs. 
Mulan probably would have been found out *way* quicker than previously. 
It would certainly have taken a lot more work for me to stay closeted as a lesbian... 
One Direction concerts would sound even more shrill and high-pitched than usual.  
There's an awful rape whistle joke somewhere in this... 
Archer would have to seriously question whether he had tinnitus or just dropping more panties 
A theater showing 50 Shades of Gray would sound like a giant flock of rabid owls. 
Teens outside of the UK would also have confusing feelings about tea 
My wife would continue to be silent in the bedroom 
If we're going there, then that means in this same world anytime a man gets an erection the "BOOOOINNNNNGGGGG" sound effect plays. 
Everywhere except England. There it's still tea time.  
It's already really weird to watch a live recording of the beatles. Why go to a fucking concert if all you're gonna do is shriek?  
It sounds like her 3rd overtone is ringing at a tritone above the fundamental.  I bet she has herpes!  
Here's the catch, in this world when a man gets aroused his dick begins singing, "Hello my baby, hello my honey, hello my ragtime gal." 
"Mom, for the love of God, can you take the tea off" 
Yup.  "I'm just on the phone with a friend."  turns into  "I'm just on the phone with a friend...[whom I'm clearing fucking or wish to fuck]" 
"You used to whistle when I took off my shirt.  Now I can literally stop you from whistling by taking it off.   Getting old sucks." 
What on earth are you doing at your local library? 
There's an alternative universe where this happens. There's a Reddit thread in that universe asking how life would change if vaginas bled every month. It's heavily downvoted and everyone thinks the guy who posted it is really weird.  
So something like:  * 10 things that your whistle says about you.   * Are you a C sharp or B flat? Find out what your whistle means!  * Whistle while you work, how to be productive and seductive.   * G Spot to G major, everything you want to know but too shy to ask.     
Now I am imagining someone's vagina sounding like a foghorn. 
It would suck to be the guy who women make a descending slide whistle sound around.  
Oh joy. Thousands of screaming 13 year old girls with whistling pussies.  
Trust me, there would be zero whistling at strip clubs. 
#JUST BECAUSE IT'S TEA TIME DOESN'T MEAN IT'S D TIME.  
Am I the only one who thinks he kind of looks like a tater tot?  I don't see the appeal... 
That's just Western culture, though. I want to believe there'd be places where whistling vaginas are celebrated or manage to advance technology. Maybe that culture would be the one that imposes colonialism.  oh god what am i doing i'm getting way too into this 
Excellent work at theorizing alternate timelines, however I think you started the divergence from the main line too late. Go back much further to the earliest days of civilization, and see what societies would do.  I suspect the answer would be a dramatically different, or completely reduced, form of puritism. Possibly the exact opposite of the extant power dynamics. A look at species which exhibit female-based mating competitiveness might show a glimpse of the social structures that would form. 
This was well though out and I enjoyed reading it. Thank you.  
Or, alternate interpretation.  Far more men become obsessed with the sound of whistling steam because it's the sound of good times.  Instead of just a curiosity, when the Aeolipile is discovered, a great deal of effort is put into refining it.  Eventually they develop new uses for steam our civilization never thought of, finding steam powered ways to accomplish things we use electricity for...leading to a world that could be best described as steampunk. 
English women would have it made.  Just like men blame farts on the dog women could blame their audible arousals on the kettle. 
Even the Beatles was pissed off in the end because they could not even hear themselves play. 
This is why I'm baffled by people who prefer the live recordings of songs. 
I love watching the videos of the ~~fan's~~ fans' faces. The ones who just stare wistfully at The Beatles with tears streaming down their face make me laugh every time.   Do wish the rest of 'em had shut up though  
I have no idea what this means but it sounds fancy 
"The kettle isn't on, dear"  "Then wha- *oh my fucking god mom*" 
No one has invented a clever solution for hiding boners, I bet girls would have this whistling sorted out in a couple days so that no one could detect it.  
also its a law school library so everyone here is too busy for sex anyway so I really don't think it takes too much to set these people off 
Every time someone opens the door you just hear *whistling* 
That would require a lot of talent. In fact maybe people would put on sex shows and perform symphonies like this, it'd be a whole new art form. 
I'm sure they are used to hearing your wife laugh when you're bpth in the bedroom.  I'm sorry that was needlessly rude and I feel really bad and I love you 
I would just carry a whistle around at all times, hiding in the shadows next to a busy street, blowing it at random times during the day 
Agreed that I just focused on Western culture, and very specifically American history (which is my specialty). I can't really state what would happen elsewhere.  However I'd be curious to hear what culture you think whistling vaginas would lead to advanced technology?  ((we're all in way too deep but if we pretend it's normal maybe no one will judge us)) 
It's actually not that common in the UK to use whistling kettles, that's much more common in the US. Source, am English, live in the US 
Imagine feminism in the 60's.  WE MUST LET OUR VAGINA'S BE HEARD!  SCREEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE 
They basically didn't do live shows for the second half of their career. 
Not sure if it'll help, but an overtone is a musical note that is part of a harmonic series above the fundamental note (the note that is being played) and can be heard with the fundamental note simultaneously. A tritone is another name for an augmented 4th interval. Generally, this tone is dissonant (unpleasant) and sounds wrong/bad to the ear 
*walks off in disgust*  *slips*  *breaks arms*  "Shit." 
Flex the muscles in your legs continuously for about a minute. Your blood flow will be redirected from your penis to your legs. 
Oh, that would be a new job after the automation sets through; pussywhistling post production manager! 
HA!  Several years ago before the bar exam some students decided to, er, blow off some steam one evening in the law library where I work.  They left the used condom in the trash can.  These are grown folks with apartments.  Go home to do that or ask for a Clorox wipe to clean off the table when you're done. 
It's ok, sometimes she does laugh because we fall out of bed or the cat is meowing at the door like his tail is on fire, or I steal her underwear and try to make off with them. It's a great thing when you don't have to be so serious all the time. Someday, the kids will finally decode all the stealth grown-up stuff that goes on in this house and they're going to be sooooo mortified. 
Someone probably already did, hence being able to pay for internet access and a computer. 
Just hold on for you life! Hold on to your... Gonads and strife! 
Hilarity aside, the flaw in this logic is that these women must be aroused to do so.  So either feminism, or rebellion, gets them off - or they're basically a rolling orgy to keep it whistlin'. 
Yeah, and they mentioned that the reason was the screaming women. 
I'd like to add that this interval is often called the devil's interval, because of it's dissonant sound and therefore has been a key influence in the development of heavy metal music. For example, listen to the intro of Black Sabbath by Black Sabbath. The interval between the first two notes/chords is a tritone. 
This changed my life the first time I heard about it, straight up kills your boner in 30-60 seconds flat. If someone is asking you to stand up you can almost always stall for 30 seconds. 
I tuck mine into my sock. Really awkward on hot summer days when I am not wearing socks. Or pants. 
But not *too* hard.  You don't want to give "said female" an air embolism. 
Public service announcement: never blow air into a vagina. It can cause serious injury.  
They were written by Nelson Mandela between shoots of Shazam. 
What if they're 13? Or on library wifi on a library computer? 
Gonads and strife,   Gonads and strife,   Gonads and strife. 
I feel like im going to end up on a list if i click the image on that sub 
I'm imagining a "whistleverse" movie franchise, like the Marvel Cinematic Universe. 
I think a rolling orgy protest sounds good for all involved  
Screaming and, their later music was too hard to recreate live- a big point. 
"SIR, I SAID STEP OUT OF THE VEHICLE RIGHT NOW"  Almost there..... Hold on just a few more seconds, officer! 
Alternatively you could just hoist it around your neck. Like a cute scarf 
Bounced on my boy's vuvuzela to that show for years and years before I looked down and realized it was Nelson Mandela, fresh out of prison and ready to die in 1991 
He's not. I creeped his profile. Lives in Vancouver,does marketing or computers. Rooms with a doctor who doesn't understand fish. 
The more complicated music was because they couldn't play live.    P.a systems were not loud enough and didn't really exist back then.   Their back line was very quiet and the lack of a proper monitoring system meant it became impossible to hear themselves in the venues they had to play.   Of course women screaming added even more annoyance. The Beatles were great musicians not just something to scream over.   They decided not to tour again and because of that most of the time was then spent in the studio.   Having an endless recording budget and studio time allowed them to experiment more.   George playing the sitar, John learning piano and experimenting with double tracked vocals, Paul playing everyone else's instrument and ringo leaving the band and then coming back to sit and drink tea in the corner.   Thank fuck for the screaming girls.  
If they'd tried it just 25 years later it would've been super easy. Just have George Martin behind them with a set of turntables and a mixer, and have the Fab Four wear Adidas and big gold dookie ropes. 
No no no, the chuckle is the part between the anus and the testes. 
Now I have the version of Do Your Ears Hang Low with dicks stuck in my head. 
How does one not understand fish?  Better question, what isn't there to understand?  Actually I don't know, but that statement makes me hmm. 
I want to sit in the corner drinking tea and listen to you talk about music. 
It's a good and bad thing. If the girls would've shut up to the point where the Beatles could've tolerated it, they might have progressed in the studio at a slower speed, but still would've gone down some wild avenues.  If they kept touring, they might have lasted longer as a band too. But it's all conjecture.  
They tried it, but two of them died because they used George RR Martin 
I feel like I'm gonna have an epileptic fit from so many different memes flashing by so quickly.  
Not to hijack, but the main point being missed here is the Beatles mostly quit touring because large scale streamlined touring infrastructure had not yet been established. Security, safety, transportation, police escorts, not getting mobbed by fans, proper sound mixing and inner ear monitors, all the things modern bands take for granted exist, at least partially, due to the necessity demonstrated by the Beatles' horrendous touring experience.    *Better words 
I think it was /r/offmychest, but it might have been /r/confession. A mom posted about how she'd fantasized for years about spit-roasting her son and eating him- and how she eventually planned to tell him all about this when he was of age. Because apparently, being 18 makes the idea a whole lot more reasonable? 
Not too long ago a guy posted on r/relationships that he was born without an arm, the problem was that he then found pictures of him when he was a baby and had both arms at his parents house, I don't remember how did that end up  
Someone posted a confession about how they pee in their sink because they're tall and it's easier. Given a few days half of Reddit was pissing in their own sinks and posting about it. 
There was someone who posted about a way to give a spoon a cool rainbow color too it. The instructions on how to do this were to take duct tape and wrap it around the handle 4-6 times then heat the metal end up with a lighter "bigger the flame the better" for 2-4 minutes, then run it under a faucet with cold water at full blast.  Obviously this seems sketchy, but someone decided they wanted to try it. Someone replied to the post a few days later and was warning people not to try it as his friend tried it and now "he has no fucking eyes." Long story short heating up the spoon causes the metal and tape to expand and putting it under cold water causes the metal and tape to contract really fast which causes the spoon to explode.  
The /u/darylprat incident was a fucking tragedy for everyone involved.   Check out his post history for the full story but TL;DR this guy was clearly very mentally ill and stalking a girl who makes videos for IGN. He made a lot of posts on /r/legaladvice and /r/relationships asking for help on how best to get in contact with her even though she had banned him on all social media platforms. He was absolutely obsessed with this girl and judging by his post history, he may have committed suicide after this whole thing. 
The Boston bombing debacle. Side note: that is now used as a case study for computing ethics.  
There was this thread about a girl who ended up going to Europe with two men she never met. Seemed like they lured her into a trap basically, and she never posted on reddit since that last post. I forgot the details...if anyone has the link please post. 
Remember that time we found that hitman and the subreddit they made for assignments? 
That time Reddit investigated the Boston bombing and got 99.7% of the information wrong.  
The guy that disappeared forever after posting a pic of a landmine and saying he was going to smash it open 
As someone who joined Reddit 4-ish months ago, it is appallingly interesting to learn about these horrific incidents in Reddit's past. 
A woman posted about her sexual assault, with a photo of her bruised face. **"I was sexually assaulted in the early evening while wearing jeans and a t-shirt in a "safe" residential neighbourhood in Toronto. This is what he did to my face. Only rapists cause rape."**  People started going through her post history to play reddit detective and accused her of faking it. She was a makeup artist and had once made a post about rape culture... so naturally these people assumed she made up a fake assault to prove her point.  It was real, she posted a video of her wetting a cloth and wiping at the bruise, and spoke with the guy that started the witch hunt and even he was like "guys she's legit".   It was just an ugly, ugly thing all around and definitely a less-remembered dark reddit moment.  
I don't remember the exact details, but on some tinfoil hat sub, someone posted a picture of a daycare near their house that they thought was a secret operation. People called, drove by, somewhere in Utah.  It might not apply as its smaller scale, but a bunch of people harassed a daycare. 
No one seems to remember the last little kid reddit "treated", the one that made videos with his toy dinosaurs. He got super excited at his hundreds of thousands of views and subscribers, made videos celebrating. Then reddit got bored, quit watching, unsubbed and the kid got sad, started making videos apologizing even when he didn't do anything wrong. 
Didn't see it mentioned so here it is. Also, I'm not sure it counts in this thread.    So about a year ago, there was a thread in r/relationships. A woman posted, claiming that she found a camera hidden under her kitchen sink. It was her husband's, and in the gallery of the camera, she found that he had taken a photo of all of her belongings. But not just one photo, two photos.    It was quite a popular thread and people were creating and ruling out theories. It wasn't likely for insurance reasons, or any other ones suggested. Another one was, "Maybe he wants to know what you like but he doesn't want you to be worried" but why would he hide it? People asked her to stay in touch, but she never responded nor started another thread. She didn't post anything on her account anymore, either.   I've always wondered what happened to her. If anyone can find the thread, that'd be great.  
Beautiful female corpses sub. As a whole.  EDIT 3: There was also this one sub, really fucking weird, /r/jizzycarts . The title is not what it seems mind you (NSFW) 
The Ellen Pao debacle   The Boston bomber witch hunt   The ask a rapist thread.    
I don't know, but how about we have just a little kisses? Everyone will believe that that's all that we did. 
Not really history, but moreso something currently happening. Honestly I think we'd all rather forget /r/incels.  (I'm on mobile, sorry for bad formatting.) 
There used to be a subreddit for "sexy abortions"...  
Our beloved unidan, sucks cause i really enjoyed his knowledge. 
Nothing, there's nothing that we like to forget about, we love to rehash and regurgitate every little thing endlessly.    
Boston marathon bomber ring a bell?  We did it Reddit! WE FUCK UP SO BAD! 
The popularity and continued popularity around the broken arms guy. It was weird, probably fake, let's just let it go so I can start showing people this website again 
How that weasel, Alexis Ohanian, forced Victoria Jackson out of her job as coordinator for the high profile AMAs because he wanted to hob-nob with the celebrities.  How Hoffman and Ohanian are considered the saviors of Reddit for coming back after the Ellen Pao fiasco is beyond me.  Reddit only took off after those 2 clowns sold their stake in Reddit and left.  How did their new post-Reddit ventures fair?  Yeah, that's what I thought. 
So do you mean spitroasting as in over a fire or like strapping on a dildo and going for the peg because it could honestly go either way 
Some sick part of me wants to think his parents fucked up badly enough he lost it and just told him he never had one to begin with 
That's less of a dark piece of reddit history and more of a hilarious one. I mean, its an ISIS dude, he's an acceptable target. 
This sounds very similar to something that happened a few weeks ago. A girl posted in /r/TwoXChromosomes claiming that she may be her fiance's sister and that he knew for like a year. Obviously blew up. The next day, the girl (or guy) posted that it was all fake and it was done to call out news sources that quote these stories without fact finding. 
Fucking Christ. Reminds me of another story where some guy on a forum supposedly posted a way to make some crystals - that turned out to be highly toxic and hospitalised a few people, with a couple of deaths.  Could just be a myth for all I know, but it's scary. 
I remember last time this was brought up in a similar thread! and he showed up and kept on trying to explain that he was massively misunderstood and that he loved her...it was like he just couldn't listen to anyone saying that was he was doing was scary and that he was obviously sick...it was really disturbing. 
I remember that post so well too because I read a line that was like "The police don't have the thousands of minds working on this like we do." and just thought "I'm not sure that is how things work." then sure enough a day or so later they caught a guy and was harassing his family before any actual proof. 
Relatively new Redditor here. I hear the Boston Bomber debacle brought up constantly. Could someone please explain what happened thoroughly? 
Let's not talk about Morgan Freeman's AMA. Let's keep discussion to Rampart. 
Similar to this: the guy on 4chan who messed with a handgrenade and flushed it down the toilet. The next day there were news articles about an explosion in someones apartment that originated from the pipework and im pretty sure someone died. Either it was him or the grenade made his way through the pipes and killed his neighbor or something 
You know why gaming developers like to stay silent and unseen? This is why. The gaming community is full of nutters. 
Reddit is actually trash.  Every post related to a woman being raped gets two kinds of replies: Doubt and "Men can be raped too!!".  Redditors are trash. 
How did the police not investigate any further when he threatened to rape and murder her!?!?! Jesus 
I remember this. It was in a semi bad area, looked shady from the outside, and the staff refused to talk with the guy investigating. So he decided it was a drug front or something. IIRC it turned out to be a legit day care. 
That doesn't really seem like reddits fault. That's just the way the internet works, in particular it's how Youtube works.  
For insurance? Maybe he took two pictures to make sure at least one of them was good? Doesn't seem anything special to me. 
I didn't realize that one was banned. I went there once. It was strange. 
I came here to say the Ask a Rapist thread, that was the most disgusting and deplorable thing I have ever seen here.  
Explanation for others: dude posts a long series of stories about how he discovers his wife cheating on him, turns out it was all fake. 
Id seen that sub before and felt bad for some of them  (Im sure theres some nice ones) but felt like it was just a woe is me, pity party circlejerk.  Visited it after your link and holy fuck.  Some dude whos a frequent poster also openly advocates for raping women and says it isn't a bad thing.  WTF.  
If you read that sub, your eyeballs will get herpes. 
wtf is this shit, im browsing there now and they are talking about how even if an incel cured cancer nobody would care because they were incels.....like wtf? this is the first time ive ever heard this word and I doubt anyone within a 100 mile radius of me has heard of it.  Your not incels, your boring as fuck people who loathe everyone else for your own problems, go visit an escort you fucks. 
Power users are a plague on websites like Reddit and it's a good thing that he's gone. When a guy comments on a subreddit and is getting upvoted to the top no matter what he says, it's not healthy for Reddit.  
I'm actually rather new to Reddit (does a year count as new?), what happened with the Boston Bomber? I've heard it referenced but I can never figure out what actually happened. 
Not only reddit. The media as well, they copied every comment as breaking news.  
We don't like to forget it though, its mentioned and upvoted all the time.  
And to add the cherry on top, he's a mod on /r/incest now 
I naturally assume incest whenever it can go either way,but I think it's about canabalism 
Shit. I read and believed that one. It did seem a bit crazy, but I wouldn't put anything past 2016 at this point.                 I don't know why anyone would do that. All it does is piss people off and degrade our trust in others. 
Yeah and his last post says "Fuck this world" and the one before that pretty much says he's going to kill himself. I wonder if he's okay. 
That shit always annoyed me in movies. Keep stalking them until they love you is basically a less rapey version of John Wayne's "kiss'em till they stop fighting you" approach. 
i knew someone in a similar position, mum committed suicide, dad got a new girlfriend in, she sexually abused him and his two sisters, he runs away from home, moves to Brighton when he was 14, the social worker ended up being assigned to him rapes him, gives him HIV, he prosecutes the guy, rapist gets sent to jail, he gets an apartment and a bunch of compensation, develops a heroin addiction and blew it all. I caught him at the tail end of his life as he was trying to withdraw from using heroin he didnt actually manage it and overdosed. His name was Martin, he was a very sweet man, bright eyed, happy and hilariously funny. A sad  loss.  
This is what happens when unqualified people try to do things they are unqualified for. 
Because there was a very clear lack of Morgan Freeman. Every answer the account gave read like a PR guy with canned responses.  
I thought it was a microwaved grenade? That might have been a different one though, I don't know. 
I don't have anything to prove it but I'm pretty sure they figured out that the news article was an unrelated incident.  
it's also a perfect example of why any publisher with an at least moderately sized user base pretty much ignores people on forums completely, grabbing pitchforks and getting angry about things like this is part of daily routine.  
I feel like I only ever see "men get raped / are victims of DV too" when it's in the context of derailing a conversation about women. It makes me sad because I feel like the people who keep bringing that stuff up aren't doing it because they really care about the issues men face, they just want to exploit that suffering to shut down women. 
It did. It was ridiculous. They didn't want to talk to him because he was harassing a daycare. 
You don't have the full story.  The kid did not just apologize for not getting views or anything. Someone else (likely from reddit) ripped all of his videos and monetized the videos and reuploaded them. The kid was heartbroken to find someone else stealing all his work, calling it their own, and making money from it. The kid said he was going to take down his channel and stop producing content.  But he didn't, he had a good night to think about it and calm down etc, so he took down the 'bye' video and uploaded an apology video for his behavior. Now he's still making videos I think.  But the real conflict was with him getting views, someone trying to steal those views for dollars, and the kid being reasonably upset by this. 
This scares me. It scares me because while it's completely absurd, it's still a coherent story until the last sentence with that Ultimate Cheeseburger shit. This isn't the nonsensical rambling of someone having a bad trip or psychotic episode, or random phrases thrown together to be lel such troll. It's thought out, and written to be read. Then you get to the last bit, and a bit of the crazy slips out. Just enough to drive home that this is not a normal read.   And it's one of many.  
Exactly, how would someone assume that someone taking photos of their tv, purse or watch have foul intentions.   You are SUPPOSED to hide photos for insurance reason, because if someone comes in and robs you and steals the camera, you now have no photos.  Clearly a robber isn't going to look under a kitchen sink for anything of value.  People try to read too deep into things.  She never posted again, because she probably said; "Honey, why is there a camera under the sink?" "For insurance" "O, ok" 
Everythings a thing. Apparently the pedo sub was a this.  
I believe it's been quarantined and not banned yet 
How did reddit fall for that? He wrote, "she came over for some kisses" and even better " touch his penis, but only a little" lol 
Yeah, a lot of people there are actually fucking crazy. 
He also had a terrible effect on biologists in /r/AskScience.  None of their answers were respected and if they ever disagreed with something he said elsewhere they were downvoted into oblivion.  People who spent their entire careers studying the exact question posed were harassed for not obeying the cult of Unidan, who was just some random grad student. 
Not when your butt is on the toilet and your head in the garbage can. Purge all systems! 
/u/lordtuts posts an image in /r/me_irl saying if it gets over 10000 upvoted, he will tattoo the next day's top /r/me_irl post in his ass.   He didn't and instead posts an image saying something like: "You think I would tattoo my ass for fake Internet points? You are easily bamboozled."     
That guy promised to tattoo his ass, then bamboozled Reddit. His comment karma is going down the drain because of that.  E: two Reddit users say his karma is going up. WTF is happening? 
Hey this is the first time I have logged into this account in a couple years and I had a bunch of messages so I'll post a quick update here for anyone who stumbles upon this in the future.   I'm now almost six years clean from all drugs and alcohol and life is good.  It's too difficult for me to go back and even read what I originally wrote 7 years ago. Maybe one day I will be able to.  I don't even remember what I said in the first post but I know I can look back objectively and say that things probably weren't as good and 'normal' before I tried heroin that time as I made it seem in that first post. There were certainly warning signs before that with alcohol, weed, and other things that I had issues with substances although I probably couldn't admit it to myself at the time. I would have never tried it if things going well for me. What followed in the later posts with where it took me was very real.   Thanks for everyone who has reached out.    
4chan and reddit both do some pretty cool things, but the bad stories like kidnappers posting pictures of their victims on /b/ or people witch hunting random people accusing them of being terrorists really just kind of outshines all the good stuff unfortunately.  
I don't understand, that doesn't say he had it stolen from him, just that he shut it down and then people were mad and then he gave it away to /u/karmanaut. 
This is like the umpteenth time I've seen this user mentioned with no explanation. Did he actually do something awful or is it just a Reddit inside joke? 
She just had to prove how stupid and gullible everyone on the Internet is for her "social experiment" and then gloat about it on other subreddits.  She posted in r/TwoXChromosomes for crying out loud, not someplace like r/TIFU. I mean there people are going to give you the benefit of the doubt and try to help you out, instead of trying to prove you wrong; it's meant to be a haven.  
Yup, the old "mix bleach and ammonia" info graphic 
I think this story actually fits the topic of this thread the most. As in, we like to forget that it ever happened. In this case, the commenters like to forget (which is understandable). 
I thought it was fake?  The verification picture was proven to be fake  
Sadly, I think there may have been two grenade incidents.  
Ah yes, the ultimate proof for conspiracy-minded folks.  
I was one of the ones who subbed to that kid. This breaks my heart. What kind of asshole steals videos from a little kid? 
120V wall socket would badly damage/burn the penis.  A copper-zinc lemon cell has ~0.9V potential. This would not be enough to conduct through the human body, and would feel nothing like a shock. This guy is fake. 
Yup. /r/jailbait was around until some in the media heard about it and started talking about how reddit has pedos on it. I think it was one of the first times that Reddit was on the national news 
The PI that had a live feed, etc. overall a pretty fun weekend.  
But like, why would they go there and post there? Everyone knows it as that rapey place, so why would anyone think "oh cool, I'll hang out there and post"? 
Ha, I love it fuck reddit for caring so much about karma 
I think they meant it in the sense that it wont make people and the internet froth at the mouth for justice or revenge like the harm of our idea of innocence, ie abuse of children, defenseless animals, etc... 
It was confirmed by his Twitter account, so it was very likely his agent running the whole thing. 
I think there's been more than 2 grenade incidents. 
They refused to speak to me, and when I tried to have a look around the property, they called the **police**.   Yeah, you read that right.   The police of this town are in on it too. I guess this goes higher up than I thought. 
The lack of evidence only strengthens their conviction.  
I'm That's not right at all. The dad took the dog to the vet, was alerted to signs of sodomy, found beastiality on the 15yo son's computer, and confronted him. They decided to keep it between the two of them and not involve the mom  as long as the son never did anything like that again and went to therapy.   The dad then caught the son in the act a few weeks later and decided to include the mom at that point. She couldn't believe that the son would do something like that and said maybe it was the husband? The son denied the dad's story entirely and the mom believed the son. The son never framed the dad, he just denied he was the one that did it. Then mom moved out with the son and dog. 
The lemon battery didn't feel strong at all, especially in comparison to the TV outlet, but it still tingled enough that I could get aroused.  And yeah, now I'm aware of how strong electrical outlets are, and I consider myself to be really lucky i didn't get seriously hurt. I didn't do THAT again at any point after the camping trip.  I know that my story is very unusual and I don't blame you or anyone else from thinking I just made it up. I'll be able to give you the closest thing to proof I have in a few days when I go home. At my parents' for Christmas right now and I didn't exactly think it prudent to bring my sex toys. 
Because they're really fucked up and are okay with rape. 
Beyond that, it's easier to stand up against child abuse than it is against the potential for one to arrange your murder at any time. It seems like protesting a hitman website is exactly how you would end up on a hitlist. 
Now I need to know what ended up happening with everything  
The jailbait and violentacrez controversy came well after the narwhal. "The narwhal bacons at midnight" was already a thing before I joined reddit.  
Nonchalance about their own personal health or safety.   If you see someone start drinking more or smoking out of the blue, it might be an escape from psychological pain.   If they aren't showering as much, ignoring people, staying in bed a lot, eating less. These are all signs that they don't have the energy or aren't happy.   Many symptoms you'd see on someone with the flu are things you'd see on someone whose depressed.  
Switches in behaviour.  A friend was so tired, lackluster one moment and flipping out over something trivial the next. Later on, she said she couldn't talk about what really mattered, so she focused on little stupid things (e.g. The bus being late) and got super angry about it. It was always something out of her control, something she could get angry at without blaming herself for it. 
Are they really caring, and seem to fix everyone else's problems? That's because they gave up trying to fix their own.  Do they hate receiving gifts or say they don't want anything for Christmas/birthdays, but give everyone else gifts like there's no tomorrow? That's because they don't want anyone spending money on their pointless existence, and they don't have any real need for money other than bare essentials.  Are they a walking doormat? That's because they don't give a fuck about what happens to them, and they give negative fucks about making a decision for someone else (i.e, if you ask them what they want to do as a group, and they insist that someone else decides, whether by saying "I don't know," or "I'm good either way"), because they would hate to let their pointless desires influence someone else's day and/or mood. 
If someone overreacts to something small and blows it way out of proportion, it's usually a sign that they are very unhappy about something else but either don't know it or are incapable of fixing it.  
Getting upset or unable to handle a fairly simple task, particularly if you know them and know they're not just incompetent. Big problems people keep to themselves often show in the small stuff.  
Run down, sick all the time, snapping over things that might seem little 
They use Reddit for hours a day as a temporary reprieve from the bottomless pit of despair that is their life.  
Superficial dialog about off-topic things. Avoiding talking about how they feel or sharing personal details of their life. 
This was mentioned on the show Sherlock but I've found it to be largely true in real life. There is a good chance that they are depressed if the person is smiling when they know people can see them, but look sad when they think they are alone. 
I'm unhappy because I'm becoming increasingly aware of the enormous flaws in my personality, work ethic, and character that are preventing me from making the most out of this life. There's nothing worse than realizing you've been given so many opportunities and advantages, and squandered them all. 
Sleeping a lot is a very good indicator of someone who's very lonely and unhappy with life. 
Reading this thread has taught me I am extremely miserable. 
They look away - staring out the window or at an object in the room.  Their attention is elsewhere - internal, sullen and withdrawn. 
Speaking as an unhappy person: if they laugh at everything. Anything that can make me happy, even for a second, I will reach for it and try to hold onto it as hard and as long as I can. This isn't always a direct indicator; some people are just easily amused. But, I've seen it and done it enough times to keep it in mind.  
they seems that they do not care about things that they used to care about 
Nothing. Like, doing nothing, spending your time with nothing, being up late because "nothing."  I stay up late often. What do I do when I stay up late? Nothing. Absolutely nothing. And for some reason, I can't not do nothing. 
I've spent a lot of time 'looking for happiness' and I did a lot of stuff that made me feel better for a bit but eventually I always ended up right back at the start. It's just the natural cycle of life for some of us. So many highs yet so many lows. It's OK to be unhappy and lost, many of my accomplishments in life were a direct result from me feeling like crap. Just own it, keep going. Time will pass one way or another.  
Instant smile when someone talks to them, its just a show  
Well, here goes...  I know that I'm unhappy because I can't remember the base line of happiness. I can't remember where things went tits up, but what I do know is things seem like they haven't been easily manageable in years.  I used to think that it was so easy to be happy, it came naturally to me. Then something happened, and I can't quite put my finger on it. I lately have just chalked it up to being an adult and realizing that the things I'm supposed to do in life, have kids, own things, have a great job mean absolutely nothing to me. And the things I used to be so proud of made me look childish or immature.  I will say this, my ability to joke about everything and generally brush most things off has been a great set of armor for so many years. But to be honest it has tarnished and rusted from countless years of dealing with life. If anyone knows a good upgrade, it would be greatly appreciated. I'm not sure if I accurately answered the question, but I assume my point was made.   
Complaining all the time, about just about everything. They can't be happy on the *outside* because they're not happy on the *inside*.   
Always acting upbeat. Seriously, that upbeat person that never gets in a bad mood is secretly miserable. I promise.  
Whenever I'm feeling depressed I always joke more about depression. I'd rather people think I'm a dick who doesn't understand depression than think I actually have it. 
# tl;dr  You are secretly unhappy if:  * You do not smile enough, or smile too much * You don't go out, or go out too often * You sleep too much, or not enough * You are self-deprecating, or deprecating towards others * You drive a Chevy Cobalt  Guys...  
TIL I'm probably a more unhappy person than I originally thought I was.  
Really wish someone would have noticed earlier I was on a 14 month drinking binge. I've stopped now though. Just gotta shed the pounds the booze added.  
Or under reacting to everything, big or small. Almost having no reaction to any problem no matter how much it involves them and just fixes it in silence practically on auto pilot, or just walks away not caring. 
One of the big problems with depression is that people use use the word as a catch-all term for everything from grief to teenage sulkiness.  This is why so many idiots tell depression sufferers they need to smile more, when true depression has nothing to do with this. 
Goddamnit. I just had a near mental breakdown trying to cook salmon. This hits home. 
Yep, I've almost had my power and water shut off simply because I couldn't bring myself to log in and pay the bills online. I had more than enough money to pay the bills (I was making six figures), I just couldn't bring myself to care about anything enough to take care of daily living type tasks. Luckily my mortgage and car payments were on autopay at the time. 
Calling in sick a lot is/was my thing.  Just too hard to get moving.  Started not taking a shower every day..went to every other day...then every third day.  On the fourth day, I'd call in sick.   When I would make it in to work I'd get lots of, "how are you feeling?", "how's your health?", "are you sick?"  These questions made it worse for me because I couldn't answer or felt that I had to lie and make up some random sickness.  These people don't really care and besides if I were to answer I'd completely break down into a blob of tears and wailing.  Just be happy I'm there and assign me something that will keep me busy.  That was the best way to keep me coming back each day. 
you can sometimes see them put the smile on when they realise they have to react to something.. goes from no emotion to -sudden, practiced smile- "yeah.. that sounds great. i agree" 
The best you can do is chalk it up to experience and realise you are a better individual for understanding how not to go about things. If you feel guilt and regret then the present you is not the same person who fucked up. 
I once went on a date with a guy who did this constant, jokey self-deprecation. I'm a fan of that type of humor and use it myself, but during the dinner we had together, he made so many jokes about how he had graduated college and not found a "real" job yet. The first couple times, I laughed sympathetically. After that, I started to suspect that something was seriously wrong that he could not stop making fun of himself for working at a fast food restaurant. It got awkward. There was not a second date.  
I would say that sarcasm and tearing down *other people* is a more reliable sign.    Humorous self-deprecation, up to a certain point, is usually more a sign of confidence and positive attitude.  Of course, if you're taking it to a Louis C.K. level, then that's another matter. 
Can say that this is true. I struggle with depression, and have a very high tendency to tell people I'm busy/occupied when I very clearly planned on sleeping 12-15 hours that day instead.  Used to be a fairly frequent thing. I'd wake up after 10 hours of sleep for an hour or two, then take a nap again around 11am until about 4pm, and then immediately go back to sleep before midnight. If someone's sleeping a LOT, then they either have a deficiency/disorder or depression. 
I teeter on the edge of extreme joy and crippling loneliness most of the time. This thread is half of who I am. 
I've noticed that I tend to laugh with other people even when I didn't hear the joke or understand it correctly. After I do anyways I ask myself, "why am I like this." Nothing other than what I've already known I suppose. 
Top tip: Telling people that they look tired does not help. 
Can confirm, look tired, secretly (and not so secretly) unhappy. 
Or can't focus like they used to. Sometimes even reading a book can be a struggle. 
Their own lives, specifically. They'll experience the other people's life, though! 
There's a reason why nearly all of the funniest comedians turn out to be suffering from horrible depression or struggling with the scars of a personal trauma or tragedy 
Getting a pet is a great way to get your life back on track.  I had a really bad time in a previous employment (It turned really bad when a sociopathic idiot coworker actually tried to kill me. Luckily, he's also an incompetent idiot.). I was single and was generally feeling very gloomy.  Then, I got pet rats. Rats are social animals, they want to be with you, and you simply can not avoid loving them. I started feeling better, found a woman (now my wife), quit my job with the crappy employer and coworker (with a very nice settlement), got a good job.  Now, I'm living my dream life. And, it was my little furry friends who turned it around. They are gone now, but I still miss them, and I think I will always have pet rats. 
i know people like this  they're unbearable  primarily because i'm exactly like that, too... ive just been making an effort to shut the fuck up if i've got nothing positive to say lmao 
This needs to be higher. The happy person, especially socially happy person, can be secretly very depressed. Double points if they're trying to make other people happy, or pretty funny.  Robin Williams is actually a very good example of this. Comedians in general, really. 
You just described an introvert that works the graveyard shift, not an unhappy person. 
This was my brother, right before he killed himself. Happiest person you ever met. Lived to make other people laugh. But couldn't handle the secret sorrow within himself. And the one time he sort of reached out to my family, we didn't take him seriously. He killed himself on his 24th birthday.  
You nailed it. I didn't even realize this was a thing, but it's exactly who I was just before reaching out for help.   The person never messaged me back. So then, I was really hard on myself for tainting the carefree, positive personality I had depicted for everyone. Maybe he just didn't see the message, but my imagination still ran amuck.  
I think one of the biggest signs is being devoid of emotion. Like you can't 'feel' anything. There's basically this transition phase where you go from being uncontrollably sad to where you don't feel anything. Which is incredible for a few days, and then it's soul-crushingly awful. All you want to do is 'feel' something, anything, and you can't. 
Very true. One of my best friends was a recovering addict. Every time I would go visit, we'd spend the first hour or so just picking up the apartment. Years later after recovery he told me that was one of the smallest things that helped him the most. 
Wow ive suffered with depression for years and i never realised this, sometimes even when id put actual effort into cleaning, id just find it so hard to do easy tasks, one room could take hours so most times id give up, making me worse because id failed again 
I think this only applies if it is a downward trend. I've always had a messy place, personally it never was a priority for me. It isn't unclean, but certainly could be described as a shit show (only dress clothes are folded, projects left out, etc.). It helps I live alone, and I do organize for guests/events.  
this can also be a symptom of anxiety. I have GAD and often ignore texts or paying bills without any reason. it's so stupid  
The fake smile with a thumbs up he musters versus his usual glum face can hit people hard when first watching BH. It's one of those shows that can't really be watched with friends, yet you wish you hadn't put yourself through it alone. 
God I love that show. Simultaneously cathartic and depressing. 
I believe it was Louis CK who said something along the lines of "As long as you think your past is bad, you must be improving". 
It's the "up to a certain point" that's key there. Obviously to an extent, it's fine. And there's nothing wrong with being modest in most situations. But I've known people who talk like that all the time. All their humour revolves around it. It starts to feel like they're really attempting to reach out or be honest, but are hiding it behind "it's a joke". 
That's not good! Some of these are symptoms of Major Depressive Disorder (low energy, tiredness, changes in appetite, not smiling much, etc.) 
I keep asking myself the same question.... Discipline? Throw the phone into a river? Get out more?  
Likewise, not sleeping a lot at all. Think only about a couple of hours at night and a nap during the day.  _edit_ Ok, this seems to have some people riled up. I'm not at all saying that if you don't sleep a lot that means you're depressed. However, depression can come with a severly dysfunctional sleeping rhythm.  
In the darkest and saddest way, I genuinely prefer to be unconscious. 
Makes me feel better to hear that it's not just me.  Sometimes the smallest thing will set me off. Ice cream! Everything is great! I love the whole world! So much energy I can't control myself! Oh wait, they're out of the flavor I wanted. Everything is terrible, mind immediately focusing on every bad memory it can come up with. There's nothing worthwhile left anywhere. Zero energy.  Even I know I'm being ridiculous when it happens, but I don't know how to stop it. 
Wanna have a pity party together? Ill BBQ and set up the entertainment room 
This thread just makes me sad. It's not a good read on a Monday morning 
Wow, I just realized I do this too when I'm upset. I typically just shut down and if anyone asks, I'll give them that response. 
-Hey, you look tired! Are you sick or something?    -I'm just not wearing make-up...  
My go to answer if people ask if everything is alright is just to say "I'm just tired". 
I suffer from depression and I haven't read a book in years.  I used to read all the time but now I can barely finish a magazine article.  Hell, I even skim longer reddit posts.  It's just impossible to be interested or care. 
That also makes people like you more! If you're funny and always steer the conversation so people talk about themselves they won't notice the gaping chasm of darkness that you live on the edge of!  
Haha that's funny. It's even funnier when you actually do feel like you miss them and that you lost something very precious but even if you wanted to reconnect you realise they've accomplished so much by now and you're still the exact same as you've left highschool. Haha maybe not exactly the same, maybe a little bit more broken and dead inside. Haha. 
There's a podcast called the Hilarious World of Depression that hosts comedians to talk about their depression & mental illnesses... I had no idea how common it was until I scrolled through and saw most of my favorite comedians on there 
Comedy comes from pain. The funniest people in your life have probably been treated the worst at one point or another.  
Robin Williams had Lewy Body Dementia. It was destroying his mind and judgement. He didn't kill himself out of depression. 
Similar thing happened to me - reached out for help and got ignored. Later told that they "didn't know how to react" so they did nothing. 
This is me too. Years of self-analyzation and therapy have concluded that I do this because:  1) My self image is extremely low, so because I don't like me, I assume other people don't like me, and I try to 'keep people around' with generosity.  2) I have trouble making myself happy, so doing things for other people that make them happy give me a bit of happiness myself. And since that's one of the few sources and it feels good, I go overboard.  3) Difficulty understanding the ebb and flow of normal friendships and interactions with people. The times when you go days or longer without interacting with someone are normal but can feel like 'oh god they don't want to be around me', so I feel I have to make up for that by making every minute a party or have some kind of 'wow' factor. 
It's weird, this is me too. I've never really thought about the fact that I do it hoping the other person will be there for me when the inevitable emotional breakdowns happen. More often than not, they aren't. Which is even more heartbreaking.   Just goes with me needing to learn to look out for myself first and stop prioritizing others.  
The initial being so beyond not giving a fuck is kind of amazing. It's basically "I have *become* the Void. Whoa." And then eventually you realize literally nothing has any meaning to you anymore and nothing is worth doing.  
I see this with my girlfriend. She goes through periods of depression and lately she has been kinda numb. It's crushing for me because there's nothing I can do, I do try pushing her towards self loving types of activity like the gym, pampering oneself, etc. I know it can help. I can only imagine how she feels.  If you're at all curious she does seem like she's on the up. 
I'll tell you what worked for me - crying. It sounds stupid, but I got the idea from Fight Club. I'm a 30 year old guy and I'd been holding everything inside, not letting anyone know how deeply depressed I was, until finally one day when I was on the phone with my mom I just broke down and started bawling like a child. It was freaking cathartic, like a weight was lifted for a few hours. And so I started my own version of "meditating" each day where I'd just let out everything I was holding inside. Might not be for everyone, but it's been quite effective for me. 
Got to be able to pull it out the bag like it were natural. Never know when you'll need to cover 
Watched it with my also depressed SO. Fuuuuck, that last season finale.  
That hits home. My past wasn't amazing but I do look back on it very fondly.  
Digitally disconnect and get out into nature. Take a walk in the woods.  Go hiking. Go camping.  I recently started this and it has done wonders for my anxiety/depression. :) 
I have the whole not sleeping thing as well. I don't nap during the day, I just don't sleep very much. 
-Hey you look like shit today! Are you sick or something?  -I just put ON my makeup... 
This happened to me at work. I have really bad dark circles no matter how much sleep I get and I usually don't wear makeup everyday except a little concealer, but I actually wore eye makeup to work the one day because I was going to see my boyfriend that night and go out to the bar. My boss walks in and says:  Boss: Wow! Looks like you got some sleep?  Me: Huh?  Boss: *makes hand motion to his eyes*  Me: Oh. I put on makeup today...  Then he tried to get out of the fact he just accidentally said I look like shit all of the time by saying I looked good even though I "always looked good" 
Reddit is making me wish I could teleport all over the place, so many people here need good friends. 
the thing is, that it makes me happy to make others a gift, or pay their meal, even tho not for long, every bit of happyness is a gift of god for me 
Agreed, this is horrible. Even that soul crushing sadness is better than feeling nothing at all. 
fuck that. I just blend it up frozen and shove it up my ass. skips the liver completely. sheesh it's like you guys don't even know how to food 
If you don't mind me asking, how did your mom react? 
"...Sarah?"   Saw it recently and wasn't expecting it to get so dark. Even though it had gotten progressively darker since the first season. It's a miracle reddit hadn't spoiled it for me yet. 
When someone nods at you and says 'Alright', you simply nod back and say 'alright'.  You then pull your collar up to shield against the 30mph winds and horizontal rain and continue your pilgrimage to Bargain Booze and hope they havent sold out of the 'good' special brew or youre drinking paint thinner again tonight. 
We are quite reserved in some respects, and publicly acknowledging that something isn't right even to friends and family is hard to do, I know that can be said the world over depending on your friends and family but in the UK it's kind of the unspoken truth.   For example, it took me the better part of a decade to get help for depression and another 6 months to tell my family I was getting help for it, and I come from a really close-knit and supportive family when I told my family that's when I really started to feel better it was just hard getting to that point.  
Bought a fitness tracker thing that showed every night even when I'm 'asleep' for 8 hours I only actually get 3 hours of sleep a night, being exhausted doesn't help with anything especially emotions  
At least your boss is nice. He worries about his employees. Worth more than an MBa from Harvard.  
You don't have to teleport, there are many just like them near you. Finding them is the problem.   Also, you have a relevant username. 
Agreed. I *refuse* to talk about myself. There's like two or three things I actually enjoy and every time I try to talk about them I always get cut off/ignored. It's to the point where I just assume no one cares and don't even bother trying. It really goes a long way to making my ideas and goals feel utterly worthless.  and what's worse, I realize this, and still have a difficult time changing my attitude about it. ugh. 
If I can't make myself happy, I try to make others happy. That helps somewhat. 
You see that's what I have always told myself also. But I'm realizing that I may have more selfish motives.  
Feeling some kind of sadness that isnt sadness because you cant feel sad when you should is something that i dont think any people that didnt went throught it will ever understand.  
If you ever need to talk, shoot me a message. I'm in a good place right now, and I know how fortunate I am to have found a combination of medications that works for me. I know however that I am privileged to have an incredible support system around me, and that not everyone has access to that.  At my darkest, the advice that helped me most was to "be kind to yourself," which is really challenging when you're feeling any kind of self-loathing and worthlessness. I did it by trying to be proud of my small victories, even if it's just showering that day, or putting away laundry, or eating a meal. And forgive yourself for the bad days.  Anyway, shoot me a message. You're not alone in this! 
Like the angel she is, she stayed on the phone with me while I cried about basically every aspect of my life for over an hour. She knew I'd been having a hard time (going through a divorce I hadn't wanted), but up till that point I'd been putting up a pretty good front and my family thought I was handling it far better than I was. I made an offhand comment about not engaging in self-harm only because I was a coward, and she packed up and drove four hours to come stay with me for the next few days. To be honest, I couldn't ask for better parents.  
I feel like my refusal to talk about myself, but my willingness to talk about them, creates this one-sided relationship. A relationship where they get what they need and want from me, but I never really get what I need... because I never let them in. I can become people's best friend, but no one's ever really my best friend.... its easier to just avoid I guess. 
Thanks for the PM.   I try to be kind to myself.  The problem is that I find myself bragging about my accomplishments, and then the people who are supposed to be my support group end up mocking me for my proud, little accomplishments.  Oh well, I guess we do this for ourselves, right?  I dunno.  I had a very hard weekend, and I'm feeling really down.  So I really appreciated the PM.  Thank you. 
When I called my mom and had that similar breakdown her voice got notably annoyed.  And when I said through a haze of tears "I'm just so unhappy..." her response was 'so what?  nobody is happy.' 
I was listening to the 9/11 episode of Last Podcast on the Left, and they played a bunch of really heartwrenching audio clips, but by far the creepiest was just a bunch of high pitched siren/alarm-like noises. It was explained that all firefighters wear these alarms that go off if said firefighter is motionless for like 30 seconds or more aka. They are dead/unconscious. So yeah, it was basically listening to dozens of dead firefighters. It is super haunting to listen to and still sticks with me. 
Any black box recording where a plane is crashing and the pilots slowly realise they are going to die with all the passagers on board.   www.planecrashinfo.com/lastwords.htm  It's very chilling.  
It was audio tape, not film: When I first started working with nuclear submarine programs in the 90s, we had to go to "training" (really just a presentation) about the Sub Safe program, which is an extraordinary QA program enforced for nuclear subs. They played audio of the USS SCORPION sinking and breaking up as a result of an equipment failure. I don't remember the exact number, but the entire crew perished. 
PSA: If you are ever in a situation where someone is threatening to harm you unless you come with them, don't go with them. No matter what they do to you in that moment, there is no way it will be worse than what they will do if they get you alone where they want you. You're a lot more likely to survive getting stabbed during the kidnapping itself than you are to survive once they've taken you. 
Police found thousands photos in Rodney Alcala's (serial killer/rapist) home following his arrest. Some were of his confirmed victims. Eventually, they released about 200 of the photos to the public, hoping the women and children in the photos would be recognized.  I find some of those photos quite haunting.  Also, Alcala once won the dating show and that's not found footage at all but totally creepy when you watch and know he's a serial killer.  
I'm going to go with the man they found alive in a sunken tugboat 3 days after it capsized. 
There were those photos of the guy that went out in the bush and ended up dying (they made that movie about it) he was living in a bus?   Chris McCandless - those photos always creeped me the fuck out. (Its late so i'm not going to look at them before I sleep)  
I'm not sure what you mean by verified, but I remember an incident from Northern Ohio back in the 90s. Someone found a video camera lying in the middle of a pasture. When they checked the recording, they found very creepy B&W footage that included someone who looked dead. Where the footage came from and how it got there was a mystery.  A few weeks later it came out that the footage was from a video shoot from the band Nine Inch Nails, which was a new and up and coming band from Northern Ohio at the time. They had suspended the camera from a helium balloon, trying to get an overhead shot, and the balloon broke away and disappeared. At some point it must have landed in that pasture.  So it wasn't a dead person after all, just creepy footage from a creepy band.   
I love reading the comments but I don't have the balls to go to any of the links... 
Gotta shake your butt or the device every few seconds if you're standing and talking (depending where it's mounted). One starts beeping everyone does a wiggle. They turn on when you turn on your SCBA tank.  I'd never seen or thought of them in relation to 9/11. That's pretty chilling. 
All the other last words, and then the Polish Airforce with just "fuck" 
'Actually these conditions don't look very good at all, do they?' This one got me 
Man, this thread is doing a great job of reminding me to never touch anything anywhere with anybody.  
Seems like neither of them is a very good swimmer and due to panic they kept pushing the other one down to keep themselves up. 
That was very fucking surreal watching someone put a bullet through their skull.  
That was disturbing as fuck! The audio of him groaning after the shot and then the sound of blood gushing on to the floor was sickening. 
Holy fuck. There's just... no remorse. It's no big deal to them. "Sorry Cassie's family but... she's gotta be the one". 
This is absolutely horrifying, they are acting like regular teenage boys apart from what they're talking about and then they do, the way they were acting with each other they could have been talking about anything  
What is it with my state and serial killers? Seems we get all the fucked up ones. 
That's nuts. I can't imagine such a mental state that I'd be doing those things and pleading to the police to be caught. 
Shit I have that type of blinds and I am fucking terrified in the evenings.  
And THAT is why I sleep with my bedroom door closed. People can break into my house and steal what they want, just don't open the door... I'll ignore it and deal with the aftermath in the morning. 
He explicitly says he isn't going to kill them, did he ever let them go?  
Man what the fuck. Two victims escaped and reported the crimes and the police didn't follow up. In one case the husband divorced the victim. Jesus.  
Do not fucking read this shit. I read it like 3 months ago and still can get it out of my head. This shit is so fucked.  
Many of them knew but had guns pointed at them, actually. There was no way out. :( 
Yeah the silence at the end fucks with you more than anything. I really recommend keeping away from this one. 
Jones didn't even drink it himself and was shot by a follower... dignity my ass 
Reads "Unsolved Mysteries", theme song automatically plays in my head for the duration of the post. 
When I was in a high school, a girl a little older than me was kidnapped from a mall near our house. She was walking to her car and these guys pulled up next to her in their car. One pointed a gun at her and told her to get in the car. She did, and what they did to her afterwards was horrific (she did not survive). My mom told me if that ever happened to me, to just refuse to go because it would be better to be hurt or killed right there in a parking lot than go through what that girl did. 
There's worse from that incident. Video where you can see students desperately trying to break the windows as rescue boats go by outside and can't see them. Video from inside when the boat has tipped, showing the students begin to get very upset and record last messages telling their families they love each other and saying not to let their younger siblings go on school trips. Pictures and text messages received from when the boat had totally tipped and water was flooding in. Heartbreaking stuff. Kids broke their fingers and arms trying futely to escape, or tied themselves together at the end to not drift apart. Entire classes were wiped out and the highschool lost almost an entire yeargroup. 
*Captain Lee also instructed passengers to stay put and did not change the order even as he was leaving the ship.*  BUT WHY 
I still remember reading that some of the kids bodies were found without nails. They were scraping at the walls and anything to try and escape from drowning. That still haunts me.  
When I was younger I was really into death and watching these kinds of videos, I didn't get fazed by them at all until I came across 2 guys 1 hammer. I remember sitting in my room at my pc going on man this sounds crazy and as soon as it shows the elderly man  on the ground I was totally disgusted and horrified. I'll never foreget the gurgling noises. I stopped watching theses kinds of videos after that.  
Guy wasn't homeless, he had a wife and IIRC it was his brother that went looking for him and found his body when he saw his motorcycle by the side of the road. 
I really hope they catch that guy before there are more victims.  What was with the "spooky music" on that New York Post video?  
Well, he wasn't a corpse so I'd say that the ending was a happy one.  
Being the scuba diver investigating a 3 day old wreck when a hand reaches out grabs you has got to be pretty terrifying too. Not nearly as terrifying as being stuck in the damn wreck for 3 days, but still. That's how horror movies start   
My day is definitely ruined after listening to that 
Had a read and it's not really solved, more just confirmed they are dead.   They have no idea how or why they died. They found a boot with a foot in and some bleached bones, and that was it apart from some of their belongings.   The photos are very creepy though. Could have been by them. But around the same time the photos were taken, there were incorrect pin attempts on one of their phones - which never received the correct pin again.  
Total nightmare. Being lost in the woods, injured, and without any cellphone reception.  
....that is fucking creepy....  Do you have a link to any particular articles on this murder??? 
That guy was kind of an idiot. I hate that his dumb choices were romanticized the way that they were. 
That was from the video for "Down In It", which released back in 1989. In it, Trent Reznore appears to throw himself off a building and fall to his death. Trent had to prove IN COURT that he was still alive. 
i dont understand how you dont hear the horn....or the fact that a train literally shakes the ground beneath you when its within a half mile radius.  
A common problem with people who are drowning, they panic and pull their would be savior under the water, drowning them too. 
Bud Dwyer if you haven't seen it yet. Much more upsetting as he was an innocent man saving his family from the burden of his guilty sentence. 
I THINK these kids are featured in Lost for Life on Netflix.  
Closed and locked. Also super creaky floors, and dogs. Don't come down my hall.. just take the TV and go.  
Yep. He created a drug cocktail to mess with there memories and released them. He only killed them if he felt it necessary. 
IF YOU WANT TO THINK OF THE WORLD AS A CALM SAFE PLACE - DO NOT READ  JURY MEMBERS LEFT THE COURTROOM CRYING AND VOMITTING UPON HEARING THIS RECORDING.  THIS CONTENDS FOR THE SICKEST SHIT ON THE INTERNET.  DO NOT READ. 
They would also poison the children first. They knew that if the parents saw their kids dying that they would be more willing to kill themselves.  
Couldn't they pretend and then hope those gunmen didn't check if they were dead 
If someone ever pulls up to you in a car, run in the opposite direction. If they bother to flip the car around, you'll already be gone. 
The government had the balls to say those messages and videos were staged. 
A bunch of panicked stampeding school children would have ruined *his* chances of getting off safely.    
I wonder what it's like to be a fish caught in a tsunami. 
that really didn't look like what I expected a tsunami to look like, wow. kinda looked underwhelming, to be honest. but then the water just kinda keeps coming and you realize how fast it's coming in and all those cars just get pushed around like toys. 
I never saw that one, but the one that pushed me over the edge as a teenager on the Internet was the one of that Japanese lady in spiked high heels *slowly* torturing a puppy on a dock or something. There was a string of similar videos, but I never made it past the first one. The sounds were probably the worst part of it. There's one part where she like puts her foot on the dog's leg and then rolls her foot back so it just completely twists the leg into a broken oblivion. That's about when I closed out of the video, and since then I've been a lot more cautious about clicking potential gore links.  Pretty sure she, and the person who paid the women to do this shit, got arrested at some point. 
I hate when people say he was homeless. It's like they are trying to make it less terrible.   They killed a good man. They lured him and tortured him while his family wondered where he was.  
I always tell my daughter the same thing. That she should risk getting shot rather than go quietly. Because whatever they want you alone for will be worse than the bullet.  
That's my biggest fear.  I would rather die in the street or my own home.  At least I know my home better than any outsider. 
If you were the guy who found them you'd definitely shit yourself.  
I feel like if I saw a scuba diver show up after 3 days I would think I was hallucinating. 
Imagine the reoccurring multiple layers of anxiety; sharks, complete darkness, will I get rescued, is there enough oxygen in this pocket of air I found, ...it must've been so mentally fucked for that guy. 
I'm pretty sure he said he could hear sharks eating the corpses. 3 days, pitch black and that. I can't even imagine. 
yeah could be but the article also says that people will use pirates as a cover for fucked up shit.  
Shit I had never heard about the failed pin attempts 
Could be why folk tales warn people about leaving paths. might be a way to scare travellers who might be more scared of monsters than 'you might get lost'  
What makes it even creepier is that the outfit she has on is what he made her put on just before he murdered her. She was kidnapped whilst hitchhiking with a friend IIRC, and nobody hitchhikes in a dress and high heels.  
I would think that if you want to live in the wilderness somewhere you would pick a more temperate climate so the weather is one less thing likely to kill you. Not that it happened in this case but it is fucking Alaska.  
yeah, if you ever go to alaska don't bring him up.  They hate him, and that his brazen stupidity was glamorized.  There's been a few copycats since he died. 
Wait they used video effects so well he had to prove he was alive? That's a professional job gg editors.   But iirc "dying" then coming back to life is very expensive and hard 
Yep, I messed up twice already, thinking I am all tough and shit. 
Seriously. Want to connect with nature? Great. Turn your cellphone off and take it with you. Plus side is if you need it, you'll have a full charge. 
Don't forget to mention your username and the date 
We were taught to just calm down, take a deep breath and dive or "sink" if a person panics during a rescue, they are not going to follow you down. It's possible this is a "pool only" solution to the problem. 
The ocean is no joke. I'm not a great swimmer but thought it was a good idea in Hawaii as the waves looked really fun. Got caught in a rip, was pulled way out to see in an instant. Started to panic, get super tired, and had trouble keeping head above. Trying to calm down, but feeling myself tire and hyperventilate. Out of nowhere, this random dude is swimming near me. Looks like the actor Bryan Greenberg for reference. Smiles and says hi to me not knowing my little situation. Tell him I'm drowning, he goes...what for real? Tells me he's a off duty lifeguard and basically brings me back to shore as I lay on my back. My family and gf watching on the shore as some dude is carrying me back. Wtf happened? Oh nothing, this random dude just saved my life.  
This! Swimming sideways out of the riptide saved myself and my fiancee's life. 
The video of Dwyer is still with me today, after seeing it back in high school about 15 years ago. It will always be with me. What a gruesome thing it was. It haunted me for months after.  
"Shes gotta die hahahahaha". Wow. Those are some messed up individuals.  
They are, the one seems genuinely remorseful, the other one, even though he talked about how much he enjoyed doing the murder on the tape before and after, still maintains his innocence. 
It's surprising how well his "oh shit I'm fucked" reaction also works as a "oh no I'm devastated" reaction without context. 
Can I have the TV instead? No need to let a criminal take it.  
They still have no idea how many he killed though. The whole thing is a horrific mystery. 
Many protested - asking Jim Jones why couldn't they just pack up and head to Russia as was discussed as a possibility numerous times. 
I recently watched a documentary on the Jonestown massacre which said that the "kool-aid" was a mixture of cyanide and I believe Valium. The Valium would put them to sleep and numb the pain, thus the death would be painless as they would just die in their sleep.   Well apparently cyanide affects the small lungs of children significantly faster than adults, so the Valium never had time to kick in, and the children all ended up dying rather painful deaths, which the parents did indeed get to listen to.  
A ferry in S.Korea carrying 476 people, mostly high school students, capsized and sank. 304 of those people died. While it was happening, everyone on board seemed to believe they would all definitely be saved and there was even a student singing the Titanic song (recorded in a video). The captain survived and the country wanted his head on a pike. 
Isn't that the very same government who got caught doing some weird cultish shit and demanding bribes from Samsung? 
Well I hope that year or so of living he got before being sentenced to life in prison was worth it.  
If you're in deep water, no big deal. Boats at sea can have a tsunami pass right under them and it just seems like a large swell. It's when it reaches land that all that water and force has to go somewhere. 
Isn't that what makes tsunamis so dangerous?  Unless you know the warning signs by the time you realize you're in danger it's too late. 
I think I was 16 or 17 when I saw it. It was being shared around in my social circle as an entertaining 'look how dumb/stupid/fake this is'. I didn't learn that it wasn't fake until this past year...  
plus they are a lot more likely to get caught if they kill you in the middle of the street. 
As I recall, the diver that found him did get pretty startled. He said something to the effect of thinking he found another body in the water and when he reached out they guy grabbed back at him. Probably a pretty surreal moment. 
That guy's mental state was probably  close to that. Three days in total darkness, nearly silent, and no real way to orient yourself. I dont think i could ever imagine how long thkse three days must have felt. 
Funny enough, there was NOT enough oxygen in that pocket for him to survive as long as he did, because had he simply stayed in place the co2 he breathed out would have eventually killed him.  However, he kept periodically going in to the water and trying to look for another pocket or a way out, and him disturbing the water surface like that allowed it to absorb and disperse some of that co2. 
That rescue diver is amazing.  Super calm, and imparts it onto the guy he's rescuing.  Asking what his name is, giving him clear instructions, addressing him by name every time he has to tell him something.  I know is probably part of procedure they're trained with. Rescuing a calm person is going to be way easier, but imagine being down there for 3 days in the dark, then having some guy come in say, "Alright Harrison, are you comfortable? Okay, lets get you out of here" 
That was epic!  Pitch black alone with no food for 3 days, jesus! 
Sounds to me like something that happens when it's dark and you're panicked 
His major problem was that he didn't bring a fucking map. If he did he would have realized there was a bridge to get over the river fairly close to him.   That dude is basically a prime example of why you should never let romanticism override common sense.   Good movie though... 
I've met people that knew him and begged him to take supplies. They offered him flashlights, a sleeping bag rated for subzero temperatures, bear spray, OTC medicine for if he gets sick, all for free. They tried to give him advice on how best to survive out there. They said he was rude (might have just been tired of people trying to get him to stop) and didn't listen to any of them. Granted, this is all hearsay from almost ten years ago but still. Guy was arrogant and didn't respect nature, while thinking he was respecting nature. So nature fucked him up.      
"Oh fuck! /u/friedhamwallet, March 3, 2017...I'm out!" 
As someone who saved my sister from drowning as a kid, I was very glad I was better at underwater swimming than above water swimming. I gave* her a foot to hold onto, kept it above water, and swam her in that way.  
I too have a "the ocean is no fucking joke" story, where I was swimming at night with some friends of mine and just was too excited, didn't realize how far out we were, and waves started beating the fuck down. I couldn't keep my head above water, and when I could the only thing I thought to do was scream for my two other friends. turns out one was also drowning, and the third was on the shore, just paralyzed by fear watching the both of us, not knowing if they could help, and even if they could, knowing they couldn't help the both of us. pure luck got us back to shore, where we shook and chain-smoked a lot, making really dark jokes.   I couldn't even hear the sound of waves for a few years without having a panic response.  
The way the blood just *pours* out of his nose once he falls to the floor is something that I would have thought was overdone if I had seen it in a movie. 
IIRC he later stated that at the time he was in a delusional state that made him believe he hadn't really killed her and that she was really missing, and not just because he killed her. He went as far as to help out in search efforts because he wanted to believe she was still alive and that the murder was just a dream.  So when he is told about the body being found in this interview he is actually reacting to the fact that she really is dead and he can't believe someone killed her. He is grieving as opposed to freaking out over being caught.  Then again, this is just what he ended up saying later on so who knows if he is actually being honest. I think he is full of shit, but it's possible he was just so delusional that he really believed he didn't kill her. Dude is a nut. 
That's one of the most interesting parts of this audio. There is the lady who is like "hey guys, maybe we could not do this..." and the rest shut her down and then they do it. Bizarre.  
I can't find the source for this. Rolling Stone says Odell escaped by faking to go back for medical equipment, that Stanley escaped by faking checking for poison survivors until he saw an escape, two runners are too old for me to find their stories, and then some escaped via Leo's truck or by Jones' order 
Often even then, depending on your surrounding geography. 
That's so depressing  She fought so hard and was so close   Good for her tho to go down swinging  
Can you imagine being the guy on the boat for three days?! He could only assume he was going to die. 
That's really good information in case I'm ever trapped in a pocket of air in the ocean.  
Holy shit, this needs to be up higher! You see the diver gasp and shout something in surprise and the guy up top sees the hand and he's like "What's that?! Oh okay. Alright, you found one, yeah?" (a body). Then the hand moves and the diver shouts "There's someone alive!!" and you can hear the shock/tension in the guy up top's voice. You can hear him quietly mutter "Fucking hell, I don't know what to do." and then he goes back to being perfectly calm and collected.    Incredible 
The guy talking is on the surface watching a monitor, but the diver is surprisingly calm as well. I remember reading that Harrison had seen the light of the diver pass by in the hallway outside the room he was in, and he then proceeded to grab the arm of the diver. Imagine diving inside a wreck you are sure is filled with dead people only to be grabbed  by someone from behind. I would have shit and pissed myself to death.  
During an interview with the guy he says he could hear sharks below swimming around and rummaging/eating. I'd probably try to drown myself just to escape the terror of being in the dark with apex predators 
Sounds more like 1 girl trying the pin on the other girls phone (because the latter one is unconcious?) 
He actually had a habit. He would pick them up, tie them up, cut their hair, make them wear the same outfit (or similar I forget), then take pictures of them before killing them. 
I was planning on shooting myself one day and was watching videos of it to see what my family would find. After Dwyer I couldn't do it. I couldn't let my parents find me in that much blood. It put me off long enough to eventually get a little help and now I'm healthy and hopefully never to be in that position  
I don't think this is true.  He had made postings on forums online about "hypothetical" stalker-murder situations and how he would play dumb and be in a daze if apprehended.  His full interrogation is on youtube and it's just him giving yes/no/i dont know monotone answers and staring straight forward like a creep.  Also the detective is obese and leans back in his chair super far at one point and you have to marvel at the integrity of the chair. 
To me it sounds like he was just trying to cover his ass. Who would think that the killer would be among the group of people searching for her body? He probably thought it would throw off suspicion 
Did he know they were sharks because of the music? 
My best theory on this is that they went off path and one or both of them got hurt. I saw pictures of the trails they were on and once you go off path by like 10 meters you can easily get disoriented/hurt. This is the reason why all park rangers tell you to stay on the paths. The photos were taken by one of them during the night. My best guess is that an animal was stalking them at night and the flashes kept it back. Both of them succumbed to either their injuries, lack of water, or loss conscious and the elements took them.  The lack of remains is just what happens when the body parts are scavenged by animals. The foot stuck in the shoe is because the animals couldnt get through the shoe to the meat.  Stay on the paths people. 
that is literally one of the first places the police look for the killer. they ask for volunteers to help find the victim/body and take a list of everyone who helps and use that as a "suspect list"  
I had a girlfriend that had two toddlers from previous relationships.  I broke up with her and a couple years later her new boyfriend murdered her then four year old girl.  I know people wouldn't call it my fault but I know that girl would be alive today if I hadnt left her mother. 
True story. When I was about 10 and my sister was 6 we were at the beach. I said something about being afraid of sharks and my sister says "Don't worry. There aren't any. The duh duh... duh duh... duh duhhhh music isn't playing." One of the funniest things I've heard that came totally random.  
Huh, this is the most likely theory I've ever read on it.  
I thought that about the flashes too   Fucking terrifying when a puma is interested in you. 
Did you not read the Daily Beast article?  Looking at those imgur pics, if that gully flooded they'd be toast. One of them survived for 10 days at least. This is in no way foul play. It was a major storm the day they went out. A flash flood is also not out of the question.  And, they were in tank tops and jean shorts, nothing else. Even in the tropical jungle you can die of exposure/hypothermia. 
I was dating this girl that was a little dysfunctional due to being sexually abused by her grandpa and nobody knew about it. I noticed some red flags and got her to open up and tell me about it. After we broke up, I told her mom she should stop inviting grandpa over to Thanksgiving dinners due to the sexual abuse. The mom called me a liar, but after asking the other daughters/cousins about it they confirmed it was true and that they had all been molested too.   After word got back to grandma, she said, "I'll take care of it".  Fast forward a week and grandpa is dead. Apparently Grandpa had a lot of serious medications he was taking and grandma messed with the dosage, which killed him. His death was ruled natural cause and nothing ever happened to grandma. 
Turned left into my sister's driveway at 3 am. A guy on a Harley was doing 60 mph in a 30, with no headlight. My half ton pickup left 4 feet of skid marks from being pushed back by the force. I still remember seeing him do mid air somersaults this was 1976 
I've posted  this before in more detail but the truncated version is when i was 16 years old I hit an 87 year old man after he ran stop sign.  I was with him holding his hand when he died on the sidewalk.  He had a heart attack.  They weren't able to determine if he had the heart attack before the accident which would explain why he blew through the stop sign or if he had one as a result.  His family was very gracious and I am very grateful for them.  His son called me the day after it happened and told me his mom had died 6 months prior, his dad had been very depressed and while they were sad he died this way they were happy to think their parents were reunited.   
When I was 18 I was working the night shift in a nursing home as an aid. Part of my job was to turn the paralyzed patients every two hours to make sure they didn't get bed sores etc. This one particular resident had late stage Parkinson's diseases and her muscles and joints were stiff and brittle and she was catatonic. As I was flipping her from one side to another, I applied light pressure to her leg to move her back a bit and this snapped her femur. Given her age and health the doctors decided that surgery was dangerous and she would have to heal on its own, if at all. Because of this we could no longer flip her, which resulted in bed sores. She eventually went septic from those bedsores and died of septic shock. I always felt so bad about that.  
7ish am on a Sunday morning. I'm heading to work in a small town at the age of 15 or 16. Come over a crest on a hill and have no time to react. T-bone someone making an illegal u-turn in a driveway. All I remember is veering off to the right and damaging someone's stone wall after the hit, crawling out of the wreckage out of breath and stumbling to see if the other person was okay. Their vehicle spun multiple times and landed in a ditch facing away, but driver side visible from where I originally was. Driver wasn't there..move along the vehicle and check the other side.. Driver is hanging out of the passenger side window with a steady stream of blood from their skull. Bottom line for me is that I ask and implore everyone, please use your seatbelt.. 
2 years ago.   My sister was working at a dealership. Her husband and I were spending the day together until it was time to pick up sis from work. He had been drinking tall-boys all day, so when it came time to get his gal I took the keys and said I'm driving. He was mad enough that he refused to go with me. When I came back with my sister he was no where to be found, but it was common for him to go on walks to calm himself down so we didn't think much of it. 8am the next morning, State Police were banging on the door. They told us he was struck and killed by a train while he was sleeping on the tracks. 
My wife and I were both very sick with the flu. My father watched our two small children and even come to sit with me in the hospital. The day after I got out of the hospital he got the flu and died a couple days later.   I still feel guilty knowing that he didn't have to sit with my children, or that he didn't have to sit by my bedside, but he did. It helps knowing that he loved me so much that he was willing to put his life at risk to be with me.   I just never imagined that the flu could have been so serious to hospitalized, much less kill someone. I hold myself responsible and I feel guilty for getting him sick.  
A guy attacked me at 3 a.m. while I was walking to work. I tried to choke him long enough to render him unconscious. And I did. He never woke up. He was a firefighter, a husband, and a father. I know it was self-defense. It still bothers me sometimes, nearly ten years later. 
I was gaming when one of my best friends messaged me asking to talk if I was free.  Since he usually asked this of me just to talk about random stuff, I didn't think too much of it and just planned to reply back to him after I was done with my gaming session.  A couple of hours later I finally replied back to him, but he didn't reply back which I thought was weird but was probably just him being busy.  He never replied again.  I found out the next day at school that he had committed suicide around the same time that I was gaming.  I can't help but think that I could've talked him out of it if I had replied to him immediately.  To this day I still feel guilty about it, and I've resolved to never let a friend down like that again.....too bad I didn't have that thinking sooner. 
When i was younger playing xbox whilst at my grandparents house i had left the room to go to the bathroom, leaving my wired controller on the floor. I suddenly hear a thud and decided to finish my business before seeing where it had came from.  Whilst cleaning up i heard a scream from my grandma and was told to stay in the bathroom. And so i did.  Found out that my grandfather had accidently stood on my controller and fell over the wire, cracking his skull open on the table and was announced dead at the scene when the ambulance arrived.  I am now extra cautious with where i leave items, encouraging my younger brother and sister to clear up their mess once theyre done.   
I was driving a semi a small car pulled in front of me and slammed their breaks i couldnt stop in time my truck wound up on top of their car i was the only survivor of the vehicles involved  
Loan officer for a local credit union.  I ordered a repo on a guy's car; totally justified.  A week later, he gets off at a bus stop about midnight, and starts walking home.  A car hits him, hit & run.  He's found literally dead in a ditch the next morning.  I didn't kill him, but if I hadn't ordered the repo, he wouldn't have died.   
I was working in a nursing home as a volunteer. He was a painter, he told me to bring him oil paints, canvas and thinner, and he would paint something for me.  The next week when I had to return I was excited to see what he'd painted, but he was no longer there. The nurses told me that "they" came to pick him up.  I think he drank the thinner at night. 
When I was 4 and visiting Japan, I opened back door of a car in Japan to the sidewalk but a motorcyclist driving in that space between the curb and road slammed into it. Blood everywhere. I don't remember the exact aftermath since I was so young, but everybody was screaming and I just sat there not understanding exactly what was happening until my mom ran off the scene and into the building in tears.   *Thanks for the kind words, everyone. I don't blame it on anyone, even myself, as it was just a really unfortunate circumstance. As for the thing regarding my parents as discussed below, don't worry about that either. They're out of my life, but honestly while I do believe my parents did some really crap shit to me, I don't wanna be angry at them. I'm here now and by myself, and I think the best course of action is just to put them and this ugly event out of my head.   Unless it's to tell you curious folks. Thanks for the kind words and reassurance :) 
So I'm a mental health worker who has recently had a patient kill them selves, they sadly aren't my first and won't be my last. I followed protocol and didn't do anything medically wrong but will always feel personally responsible for them. There were signs I missed, lies I believed, and things I do differently in hindsight. Some of the families put cases against the hospital but I've been cleared of any wrong doing. Unfortunately when you have the riskiest cases then you can't win all the time. That doesn't stop me feeling incredibly sad when it happens and imagine the family grieving for a lost son/brother/ father.  i will always remember their names and have planted a tree in each of their honour. I strive to become a better nurse each time 
I was driving my girlfriend and I back to town from a day by the water. We were on the highway and she leaned over to kiss me, next thing I knew we were going off the road and then the car was rolling. It just happened.. I had a few scrapes but her seatbelt wasn't on properly and she died there.. in my arms on the the side of the road. Never thought this could happen to me.  
When i was 4 Years old, my mother was roughly 3-4 months pregnant              one day I was supposedly crying and throwing a tantrum over a toy or something,my mother tried to comfort me by cradling me in her arms and take me to to my room which was up the stairs but i cried and kicked so much that she lost her balance and fell down the the stairs, i was unhurt and mother recovered without any lasting injuries    but my sibling died. 
I was a fairly new driver. I was sitting in the parking lot texting someone on my phone. It took a few seconds to send the message.  I pulled out of the parking lot and immediately came to a roundabout. It was a slow day, barely any cars around. A car pulled up moments after me, but since I beat him by a second or two, he had to wait while I went past him in the roundabout.  Nearly the second after I passed him, a big truck slammed into his rear end. And he was going fast. Real fast. Probably 45 to 50 mph.  They both died. The best they could figure, the elderly driver of the truck passed out for some reason.  If I had waited to text my friend until I got home, that man would still be alive. If I had waited for my friend to reply before leaving the parking lot, that man would be alive.  I was just in the wrong place at the wrong time. 
Throwaway account.  5 years ago I was staying the night at my boyfriend's (we were both still living with our parents).  We started messing around, both getting really into it, as usual. He came once, and seemed to be breathing more heavily than usual, which I attributed to me (and felt good about it, naturally). He then suggested that we take a breather, but I was all worked up and insisted that we go again immediately.  During it, his breathing got heavier, and he collapsed. I panicked and called in his parents, and we rushed him to hospital. Turns out he had an undiagnosed heart condition. He didn't make it. The doctors all said that it was probably the sex that got his heart-rate too high, but that I shouldn't blame myself (yeah, right).  I don't think I'll ever get over it, honestly. If I hadn't pushed to go again, he'd probably still be here. 
Deployed in Afghanistan. Urban area.   I got into programming to kill the time. Had an Arduino set complete with everything I would need to make tons of little gadgets. Got pretty good at it too (going to school for it when I get out). When it came time to go home, I didn't have room to take the kit with me, so I threw it out. Keep in mind, locals work on this base, and in my time there, at least three had been kicked out for ties with the Taliban.   Within an hour of tossing the kit, it had been taken.   Didn't think anything of it, probably some other soldier thought it was cool and took it. Big base, anything could happen. About three weeks after we left, an IED went off outside the gate. No NATO casualties, but about 20 civilians died in the blast. EOD reported that it was a "strangely sophisticated" bomb. They used my kit.  My negligence gave them the means to kill 20 innocent people. I've never told anyone in the world about this, and it haunts me to this day.  
The people that shot her are to blame not the person who tried to save her. 
Perhaps even grandma was abused herself and that could be what drove her to do it. 
My sister chose to end her own life by walking into traffic, and in some ways, I feel worse for the people that hit her - she made a horrifying choice that I still struggle to understand, but she made that choice. The people who hit her unfortunately didn't get to decide whether or not they wanted to be a part of her tragedy, and I feel terribly for them. I will never be able to apologize to or comfort those people, and I would really like to, so allow me to use this anonymous posting to kind of do so. The other person made the mistake, not you, and while I expect you'll be haunted by it because it was horrifying, please understand that the family members' grief towards you is heartfelt (albeit maybe undesired on your part).  
Not your fault. J-walking is against the law for a reason. Without any visibility there wasn't anything you could do when someone decides to cross illegally. Add alcohol to the mix and it's just a recipe for disaster. Feeling glad that you weren't being charged for anything is perfectly fine. Ruining your life for something that wasn't your fault wouldn't bring him back, nothing would. 
Did the other forecaster ever get punished for what he had done? 
To hold a stranger's hand in his final moments. You are a beautiful person. I hope you are okay now.  
That seems like it should have definitely been at least a two person job. 
It's a horrible situation and I feel for you, but it's unlikely that you could have saved James. Chances are you'd have come to harm as well. I really hope you'll be okay. 
You would have ended up drowning as well, he would have paniced and grabbed you and pulled you under 
And don't make illegal u-turns like a dumbass. That would've solved the issue.  
Thats not your fault. You didn't let somebody too drunk drive. Thats what you're *supposed* to do. 
The only person to blame here is him.  Seriously, how drunk do you have to be to sleep on traintracks? 
Jesus, I'm sorry that happened to you but it's not your fault. The father shouldn't have given you the gun without checking if it was unloaded first. I hope you can find closure on this one day.  
Be careful with that lady man. That "I'll kill you someday" line is no joke imo. That's some thriller movie type shit.  I'm sorry that this happened to you though. I too have a story resulting in an unexpected death but I am probably not going to tell it, as it will probably give my ID away if any redditors from my area are around. 
Have you done anything about the alcoholism yet? I quit 3 mths ago. Started at /r/stopdrinking and then started to go to AA meetings in my area. 3+ months sober now. My life feels saved. 
Crazy to have a pool party for 6-year-olds, especially with an apparent lack of adult supervision.   Not your fault, but arguably the fault of any of the adults who allowed that to happen.  
As someone with severe, legally disabling depression, it can get so bad that it will drag others down with us if you let it. Luckily, you didn't. What were you supposed to do? Let him keep stealing from you and bleeding you dry and forcing you into your own depression until he found someone else to do the same thing to? No. You did the right thing. This isn't your fault.  
I don't understand why anyone would remotely have a reason to blame you, nor should you blame yourself ...if he didn't borrow yours he could have got a gun anywhere, or just used any other method.  
The family has no right to hate you. You didn't know and they let him keep a gun or had guns accessible to him  
why did he attack you? was he on drugs or had a mental breakdown? 
This is a dumb question, but would it be fair to convey to him that lying could result in his death? Like, this isn't just a perfunctory question. "Are you taking any medicine? I need to know to avoid a fatal reaction."  I once had a dentist who was going to perform surgery on me ask if I did illegal drugs, and when I said no, he reiterated that I needed to be honest because if I did heroin, I'd likely have a fatal reaction to the anesthesia. 
As someone not involved in healthcare, I would never think someone would hide a medication... but I guess it happens.  I'm sorry man, that's honestly a tricky situation, especially if someone insisted they weren't taking anything because they didn't want to be embarrassed.  
Sometimes people do this as a means of suicide.   It's unfortunate you were involved and had to deal with the fallout but it wasn't your fault.  
9yo is very young to deal with this type of situation. You didn't killed him, you just didn't saved him. There is a difference.  
Why the hell did the bus driver wave pedestrians through on a red light!?! Is that a normal thing to do? 
Sorry to bother you but I have to ask. How was the legal stuff following the accident? because it just looks someone else's mistake that hurt you and that poor girl. 
Completely the fault of the bus driver. Why the fuck would they wave on pedestrians at a green light??  
I wonder how many lives you unknowingly saved by repoing someone's car. 
It may take or have taken you a long time to believe this, or maybe you never will, but you did him a really big favour.  
I had a similar but less serious incident as an adult in Taiwan. A friend dropped me off at the place I was staying. I opened the door on the kerb side and a kid on a bicycle slammed into it. He was ok, a few scratches. What some may not realize is that sidewalks are uncommon in Asia and so the area between buildings and cars is still road. The reaction of my friends suggested this was my fault and I should have looked before opening the door. 
My girlfriend gets pissed when I don't respond to that kind of thing while doing something potentially dangerous. This is exactly the kind of thing I'm afraid of.    I'm sorry for your loss man. 
What kind of bullying took place? How did people at your school, especially the bullies, react to his suicide? 
Do you remember this or did your parents tell you?  
I had asthma as a kid. If I still do, it hasn't shown any signs for 20 years.  My asthma attacks, as I remember them, weren't delayed. They didn't happen a day later from a triggering event. I could be wrong, I haven't had an attack in 20 years, medical knowledge has likely changed.   I hate to say this, but not having his meds and refusing the hospital killed your father, not that ride. If that ride was the cause, I think it would have hit immediately. 
That wasn't caused by you.  The asthma attack the next day wasn't affected by the ride the day before. 
Hey, you can potentially Google "accident x street x date" and find out what happened  It's not your fault, and logically you probably know that, but I know survivors guilt, and I know it's not as simple as knowing and understanding that you're not at fault and couldn't have done anything. I'm sorry you're feeling that, and I wish you the best. 
It's part of why I *fucking hate* driving with my father in the vehicle, He'll always be giving helpful nuggets while I'm trying to focus on driving, raising complaint when I don't go immediately, etc. 
Not your fault. You didn't kill her, in fact you thought that if you drove her she would be in more danger. You had no way of knowing Tiffany was that inexperienced and you wanted to protect Caitlyn. 
Hey, it might not have been your kit that was used. Even if it was, you had no way of knowing what would happen. 
I feel like it's hard to argue you gave them the means. They had to also obtain explosives right? You can't just make an Arduino explode. They probably could have controlled the payload with any other microcontroller too, and there are tons of them available via other means.  I'm also surprised there isn't some kind of strict policy for destruction of materials brought on site. 
That's what I was thinking too. Maybe knowing that her beloved grand children were harmed too was enough to drive her over the edge. 
Im very sorry to hear about your sister, and thank you for the kind words. I've had to stop trying to associate 'blame' and who made the mistake where--it just goes down a hole that doesn't have a good outcome.  
They replaced the street lights that day, pretty fucked up it took a death to save a few cents.  
I don't know the full details on that, but I do know that the chat logs were saved so the blame was really taken off of us. We demonstrated meteorologically why we wanted hail. His argument was "I have more stripes, get rid of it." I just wound up having a discussion with my commander about it in private and he basically said that no one pulls rank on the weather. Next time this happens, we have to stick to our guns and don't get pushed around by a "senior" forecaster.  
It should have but in most cases the staff to aid ratio is ridiculous. Imagine being left to care for 33 people that's what our third shift does anywhere from 25 to 33 people most of them total care several are bariatric residents. CNA'S are not valued enough for what they do. 
Yeah... when you consider that 'pulling the plug' often means starving to death or suffocating it really makes you wonder why we can't be more humane instead of waiting for people to die in horrible ways. 
I agree with this. My grandmother died in misery. She was old and fragile with dementia and would just scream "kill me" at all the nurses for months before she died. It was cruel that she was kept alive long after her body and mind were gone. I wouldn't wish that suffering on anyone.  
Seriously this. Last Summer, I was vacationing with my family and girlfriend in California. We stopped at a wide, slow-moving river and we got in to swim. Girlfriend had never been swimming in water deeper than she could stand in before and I grew up with a full size pool and could swim really well. Girlfriend was supposed to stay near the shallow part but somehow ended up in the deeper area. I came over to push her back to shore and it was SO exhausting to nudge her the 8ft back to the nearest grabbable surface while also trying to keep her head above water. I almost passed out from exhaustion when I got to shallow water and my legs were shaking like crazy.  Definitely could have easily drowned. 
I understand that that would've probably happened but I still wish I could've helped somehow. 
Or suicidal, even drunk me would probably look for a more comfortable place to pass out than train tracks.  
The gun is always loaded.  It's not a toy, end of story. A hunter should know better than to give a firearm to a kid outside a safe environment (shooting range). 
Quite frankly she needs to go to jail (or an institution, where she can get a better sense of where the responsibility is). He did nothing wrong and shouldn't have to suffer for her loss. Everyone has bad things happen. Doesn't mean we get to go around attacking innocent people. 
Good point. I was at a pool party for 6-7 year olds, and I remember diving into the pool and accidentally landing on one of the other kids who was lurking underneath the water. One of the adults saw this and pulled the kid out of the water. I am really thankful to have had that supervision. 
We were at the ocean a few days before my sister's wedding. We had been body surfing the waves earlier hut everyone was up on the beach relaxing. We look out and see people yelling and waving and having a good old time out there. After like 5 minutes we realized they were actually in distress and took off into the water and saved them. It was crazy how close we were to just watching them drown. 
The thing that makes it feel like my fault is that after his second DUI he asked me to keep his gun so it wasn't an option. He then asked for it back a few months later to go shooting, I reluctantly gave it back to him and said to give it back afterwards. He said he was getting counseling and other things to help with his troubles. I would compare him to Robin Williams, he was typically the life of the party and could cheer anyone up. It just hurts knowing the last thoughts about me were that I hated him. I didn't/don't, I was just frustrated with him because I cared about him. 
Its easier to cope with the loss if there is some sort of scapegoat. They probably know on the inside he didnt do anything. And social pressures and not seeing the signs are why he'd blame himself If I were to guess. But the last part is very true. He obviously had the  intent to commit suicide, he would've done it one way or another.  
One night I was out drinking with a friend that kept saying he wanted to go get some coke (cocaine). I didn't have any interest and told him no thanks. Told him to just go home and call it a night. We went our separate ways. Got a call the next morning from a detective because he was found dead. He overdosed. Obviously that was crushing, sad news. But I also felt terrible. I felt sick. I felt guilty. What if I went with him? Could I have changed the outcome of that night? Well, his mother, whom I had never spoken to before, called me a few days later to tell me that she absolutely does not blame me at all. She said he was "a big boy and only he was responsible for his decisions." I didn't realize it at the time, but thinking back, that call really really helped me. 
Yeah it's just that I felt at fault, and people drilled into my mind that it was me. Heck, even the local paper at the place said that the accident happened as a result of poor conduct on our behalf. When you see that in a newspaper it really fucks you up.  
I think this is very important.  This reminds me of a post here where a little girl had to have surgery and she was not allowed to eat the day before. Of course her parent gave her food and she almost died.  People often think that these questions/advices are "just protocol". It can help to remind them they might die. 
If they've got something to hide, then they will hide it.  If you're lucky, you *might* get the truth if you get loved ones away from them, but then you also might not. 
It always seemed like I killed him in my 9 year old perspective. Like I was sitting there watching as he died thinking he was ok 
No. Not following basic road rules as a driver is the stupid fucking thing you can do. 
The investigation lasted nine months, at first they wanted to charge me with negligent homicide, it ended up getting brought down to a negligent driving ticket. There really was no grounds for that either but it seems everyone that day got something. The bus driver was substitute and she was no longer allowed to sub bus driving and the victims boyfriend who was walking with her but didn't get hit, he got a Jay walking ticket.   Years later the family tried to sue everyone, but it got thrown out due to a time limit they had to file. My insurance company handled everything, I never spent a day in court. You could imagine what that would do to anyone let alone a 17 year old kid. Reliving in therapy is one thing, taking the stand would have destroyed me. I never even finished counseling. I wish I did. I'm still dealing with it to this day and I just turned 36. 
He was the most lucid of all the people living there. He was the only one that could walk without help, and that only time we talked he was so depressed and told me how the nurses drugged them to sleep and how horrible that place was.  And I thought painting something would make him happy. 
If I remember correctly, I actually ran after her at some point, but she was so panicked she kept shouting "Go away!" whenever I tried to get close.  
I Actually learned this from my grandmother when i was 13  
I agree. Couldn't anyone just order an arduino online? I'm sure they're really easy to get anywhere.  
This is the part I don't get: Who cares if they object, regardless of their rank. You are the forecaster. It's your forecast (your subordinate's, in this case) with your initials on it. So long as your forecast is consistent with the operational area forecast, note the objections in your forecast worksheet and leave your forecast as is. If it doesn't verify, then be prepared to write up the missed forecast review. Too f-ing bad for the guy that doesn't want to brief it. 
As an adult with training, maybe.  As an eight year old? Not a chance. The *best* you could have *maybe* done was stay back and encourage him. But most likely you would have simply witnesses him going under for the last time first hand. Not a memory you need.  Sorry you lost him that way. 
Yeah as a non-firearm user this is the rule I live by. Can it fire a bullet?  If so, assume it's loaded. 
As a former lifeguard, I was really nervous when I clicked that link and proud that I found the drowning kid quickly.   You look for lack of sideways motion. For the kid going up and down. Arms out to the side, chin going under and coming up (but less each time).  
That was me when I was a teenager.  Was at the beach and swam out to a buoy -- I wasn't (and still am not) a good swimmer, and by the time I got there, I was completely exhausted.  I was hanging onto the buoy while frantically waving to a passing boat.  The passengers smiled and waved back.  Somehow I managed to swim back to the beach.  My body felt like it was on fire and I could see my entire chest move with my heart beat. 
Fuck the media, they always make up shit. You were definitely not at fault here.  
My dad's a cardiologist and he calls this the "door stop". He's been practicing for almost 50 years, and says when someone is leaving his office, if they hesitate for even a fraction of a second at the door as they leave the exam room and don't sneeze, there's something they didn't tell you and you need to calmly figure out what it is.  
As another former paramedic: Many people don't even realize that the pills they take daily are medication. You'll ask them if they are on any medication and they say no, but once you start listing some of the standards for old people, many of them will remember that they actually take 4-5 different pills a day. It's pretty crazy (but then again many older people aren't really mentally healthy). 
I'm 30, and I've broken my wrist tripping over a crack in the pavement that I didn't notice. I absolutely understand how elderly people could die from something like that - all it takes is a solid blow to the head and you're done. 
But surely they should have warned you, and told you to turn him on his side if he choked? If you weren't there, it would have happened either way. If they had some kind of baby monitor, shouldnt  they have come in to check on him? They probably blame themselves but took it out on you as a coping mechanism.  
You likely did him a huge favor. If I ever end up in a nursing home I hope someone will be there for me to do the exact same thing. Once all the quality of one's life is gone, remaining on earth is sheer torture. 
oh god i am so sorry. how is your relationship nowadays? 
That doesn't seem like a great age to learn that. Did it have a negative impact on you and would you rather not know it? 
I don't think Amazon Prime covers Afghanistan. The only commercially produced product that is available for purchase in every inhabited place on earth is Coca Cola. 
I've thought about every possible thing that could've happened differently and that one has been hard to think about. I wish I saw him one more time since I just turned around and he was gone but seeing him go under would be too much for me.  
As someone raised with guns who owns multiple this is me even to the annoyance of others. I can unload the gun myself and hand it to someone to look at and if they point it near me I will scold them.  
When you are in trouble in the water youre supposed to raise your arm with a closed fist so it doesnt look like you are waving. There needs to be more info about this sort of thing. 
my mom was murdered and I was there and a week later when I went back to school everyone was asking me questions and the news made up shit saying she was hit by a baseball bat to the head. We didn't even own a baseball bat he just used his fists and punched her in the temple but yeah media is retarded. 
Me: Do you have any medical problems?  78 year old Patient: Nope. None.  Me: What do you take the Lipitor,  Coumadin and Metformin for?  78 year old Patient: For my High Cholesterol, Afib, I have had a heart attack, PE. Oh and I'm diabetic.  
Train suicide can leave an incredibly gruesome scene as well.  
It's true, after all quality of life is gone, every day is Hell. My father dealt with MS and Tinitus for a long long time waiting until my big brother and I were grown enough to understand and living our own lives before he took his.  He was unhappy for atleast a decade.  He went out with some dignity, he knew he wasn't getting any better.  Still, the best man I've ever known. 
Uh... so in an unrelated incident 4 years ago right before I graduated high school, my parents kinda, for the lack of a better phrase, kicked me out? I wasn't able to do very well in programming like I had wanted and didn't build the prerequisites to go to UBC, and they basically went ballistic and never want to see me again.   I'm living alone right now, and my parents haven't responded to my contact attempts since. I'm not sure if they're even in the country any more.  
It actually better knowing,  my mom and I have had a complicated relationship,  She said that she loved me(like any mom would) but could tell there was some form of resentment and its better knowing where the resentment came from  
I'm cringing that a Brazilian anesthesiologist found it more cost effective to teach Spanish (don't they speak Portuguese in Brazil?) than to re-qualify to practice medicine in the U.S.  Couldn't even be a nurse anesthetist?  We throw out a lot of immigrant expertise... 
You should absolutely mention it always.  Just like people on Adderall should mention theirs.  It's a medicine that effects your body.   Now I wouldn't mention like the occasional Advil though.  
Most suicidal people don't want to leave a mess. But sometimes you just can't think of any other way. And depression changes your mind. When you go into a depressive fugue it's like the whole world is literally gray and grainy. The person in your head isn't you anymore. 
that's for sure, I mean who the hell writes a jaywalking ticket after such an accident? 
The number of NYC taxi drivers with graduate degrees from their home countries is really rather astounding.  
I would add one should also disclose herbal or nontraditional medicines because some do interact with other  drugs. At one point, I used St John's Wort, and because I had heard of some interactions, I made a point of always disclosing. I also found that even the more skeptical health professionals would still rather know everything a patient is taking. 
Jumping in front of a train was honestly one of the leading ideas I had when I was having suicidal thoughts.  I **never** wanted to leave any kind of mess for anyone, but I figured that with a train, at least my parents wouldn't have to see it and try to clean up.  They'd also not have to live around the area where I'd died.  Those were very big positives in the "death by train" column for me.  Plus the fact that it could give them hope that it was a tragic accident, if that helped them cope. 
Yeah....particularly a dick move when it's the boyfriend of a girl who just fucking died. As if that guy doesn't have enough on his plate. Like all the guilt of not moving his girl, or being more careful about crossing the street or any of that.   
I can't come with any argument against that, but honestly I don't think there's any possible positive outcome for me to hold a grudge against them. I might as well be dwelling on that asshole bully in grade 4.   Note: I don't excuse my parents' behavior, and know that they treated me horribly, I'm just saying I don't think it's healthy for me to really hate them. All I want to do is just move on right now.  
Yeah, Japanese, but first generation Canadian, and that Asian parent stereotype had to come from somewhere.  
Had a prime view of a woman jumping right in front of a train. I was standing about one a half meters from her when she jumped onto the tracks in front of a train that was like 5 meters close.  She managed to lay down on the rail so she didn't make as much mess as if she'd get hit by the train itself.     Pretty much cleanly cut in half, made it past the first set of wheels. Must have instantly blacked out from pain, because she only got one short scream out.  Reason? Issues with her partner.  Aftermath? Train traffic stopped for a few hours, police got there first, then firemen, then paramedics (essentially just drew sticks which one of them is going to pronounce her dead), railway firemen (half an hour drive), railway inspection (about 45 minutes drive). And of course they needed to get the people from the train to their destinations.  And last, but not least she left behind two teenage children.  &nbsp;  Also one part is still bugging me. She marked her ticket right before me.  
Do paramedics count? I responded to a call from a father who needed help applying medicinal cream to his 13 year old daughters vagina to heal her STD. He said he tried to do it himself but it was "swollen shut".... I just brought her to the hospital. 
I stopped a 25 year old Asian male from entering the east executive entrance of the White House. He had slit his wrists and neck prior to his arrival, but not deep enough to hit major blood vessels. He told me that he was a secret agent working for J Edgar Hoover and that he was 60 years old. He said he had important information to pass to president Obama. I ended up having to detain him, stop the bleeding and then involuntarily commit him. Turned out to be a local college kid, going through some mental health issues. I've field interviewed hundreds of White House "callers" but this kid took the cake.  
From a post I made a few weeks ago...   I was called out to negotiate with a 17 year old female who had barricaded herself in a bathroom with multiple knives and scissors (she'd done it right too, SWAT ended up going through the sheetrock wall). She wouldn't talk with me at all but had multiple graphic conversations with her mother, who committed suicide 3 years earlier, and her dad, who's serving lots of years in prison for sexually abusing her. When SWAT pulled her out she had completed multiple circumcisions on herself with the scissors, completely cut her nipples off, and had sodomized herself multiple times with multiple steak knives. The kicker was, she was talking the whole time and her tone or volume never changed. The pain never bothered her. Or, more likely, she never felt it. The human mind is scary as fuck.  
Im not a cop but my dad just recently shared these stories with me. My grandfather was a cop in a small town in the 60's-70's.  Late at night it was common for officers to pull over vehicles driving through town, especially if they didnt recognize them.  He pulls over a bus load of people.  He walks through and asks them where they are headed, yada yada.  They were headed to California, it was Charles Manson and his group.  Another story.  Same grandfather, same stop a car passing through protocol.  Asked the driver where he was headed, BS'd for a while and told the guy to have a nice evening.  Few towns over guy gets pulled over again, shoots and kills the cop.  Apparently he was doing this as he drove along, get pulled over and shoot the cop.  When they questioned him he said he had been pulled over by my grandfather, but he was such a nice guy he didnt kill him, but he did have the gun sitting in his lap. 
One night at about 1130, this guy jumps off of a bridge into a bay. On the way down, he hits a guard rail and loses both forearms and the top of his head. One set of officers found his arms and set them aside. I was on the dive team, so we go collect his remains. While we check on his condition, we notice the brain is missing. This was me flipping up his scalp and taking a peek inside to find nothing there. It's very strange to look for something very important and not find it. Anyway, we bag him up and get him on the boat. Our supervisor tells us we have to at least look for his brains.  Gross. So we dive and look around, but the only thing we find is a piece of skull. And we had decided if we did find it, none of us wanted to grab it.   
 My cousin is a cop and he responded to a call on Valentine's Day night. A 12 year old girl called in to say her mother had blown her brains out in the living room. I guess her and her brother were getting ready for dinner and the mom just shot herself.  He said the creepy thing about it was dinner all set up, drinks on the table and suddenly she shot herself. Kids were sitting outside when he arrived, to this day I can't imagine Valentine's Day for them. But I know that is something that stuck with him seeing that.  
My department sends an officer to all rescue calls if one is available. We got a call late one night to "assist rescue" at a townhouse complex for a "woman hemorrhaging." We didnt show up until rescue had already left with the patient. So we let ourselves into the residence and eventually found the bathroom, which was COVERED in blood. Blood on the walls, all over the toilet, everywhere. CRAZY amount of blood. Rescue hadnt mentioned anything suspicious on the radio, so this was surprising. We were preparing to leave when one of the younger officers noticed bloody footprints leading to the front door...and then across the parking lot...to a dumpster. We gathered at the dumpster, lifted up the top, and lit up the interior with our flashlights. Same officer extended his baton, reached into the dumpster with it, and brought out a bloody plastic grocery bag....with a dead baby in it. True story.  
It was a stormy night on the Oregon Coast.  A lady was driving drunk and ran into the back of a parked school bus.  When she did, her car caught on fire, but she was able to escape.  When I found her slowly walking down a side street, I was telling her to stop and turn around.  When she turned around, her lower jaw was gone, and she was totally dazed.  Her tongue was sticking straight out the top of her neck, and she was trying to talk.  She ended up surviving but needed tons of plastic surgery.   
My dad was on the freeway, and saw a guy in a big truck (it may have been a mail carrier?) that was swerving and driving crazy. He pulled him over, and the driver's hands were shaky and covered in blood. It turns out he had a prostitute in the back of his truck that he had killed not long before.  
I once went to a two fatality car crash. The cars had collided head on in a 55mph zone.   One of the drivers had left the house suicidal, and it was surmised that he picked a car out at random and went straight into it.   I had spoken with that man several weeks prior and seeing his skeleton in the burned up car was a little creepy.   I won't describe the rest of the scene, but the worst part of it is...  This was Christmas Day. Not a merry Christmas at all.  
Man this was probably 2010, 2011... I was really new.  Call came I'm as an "unknown problem", basically the 911 was so fucked up, even dispatch didn't know what to call it. Turned it this guy had just murdered his step father and then walked to his grand parents house to kill them as well.  He stabbed his grandmother through the eye with a Rambo style bowey knife, one that had the compass in the pommel of the handle.   He missed her brain by about an eighth of an inch, so she did not die. Instead she came running out of the house when we got there, knife sticking out of her fucking eye, and the compass was spinning around because she was moving. My brain literally went "that's not real" and I went past her, along with several other cops, before the sergeant was like "what in the actual fuck are you guys doing?"  She survived. We caught the guy in a stroke of pure luck. Elderly woman with a massive hunting knife for an eye, definitely the creepiest thing I can remember seeing. 
Not a cop, but a correctional officer in Texas. One time a guy slit the forearm side of his elbows (where it bends). He laid there in a big puddle of his own blood. I was one of the responders that day.  I'll never forget it. As soon as you entered the cell, the smell just hit you. Blood has a strong metallic smell, which I never realized before. He'd been laying there awhile, so the blood had coagulated which again, I did not expect. As we lifted the barely conscious guy out of the blood, the blood fell off his body in chunks, like Jello.  It was pretty disturbing because I didn't expect any of it nor was I able to mentally prepare for it. We're not really medically trained, so all of it was completely surprising to me.   
Are we accepting "Not me but a cop I know" stories?  My cousin is on in a major city, apparently 911 got a call from a 6 year old claiming **VEHEMENTLY** that there was a zombie outside of his house on the street.  So a patrol car swings around to see what's up.  Turns out a tweaker on meth gouged out his own eyes, had blood dripping down from the empty sockets, and was stumbling around blindly with his hands stretched out in front of him.  Goddamn, turns out the kid was telling the truth! 
Got a call that someone wasnt answering their Phone or the doorbell. We got to the house and noticed that every window was blinded by either curtains or pieces of paper. We rang the doorbell and yelled through the letterbox but there was no answer. We opened the door and got inside. In the house it looked like someone just had lunch. There was bread on the table and juice or milk in the glasses. Childrens toys scattered all around. Then I saw a note that gave me the chills. It was a suicide note. As the door was locked from the inside, the person had to be in the house. We checked room by room and my heartbeat was at 300% when I checked the bathroom. Preparing myself for slit wrists or throats I opened the door slowly, but there was nothing. Finally one more room left which was the attic. We walked slowly up the stairs and we found the resident there, hanging from a beam. I will never forget the adrenaline I had, the scene in the livingroom or the resident I found.  
We responded to a burglary alarm at a mortuary and found that one of the rear doors was left open.  Policy now dictates that the entire building needs to be cleared (searched) to confirm that it was a false alarm (which most are).  It's the middle of the night and totally dark.  We use flashlights and never turn on lights.  We walk into one of the rooms and see a body on a table.  It appeared that it was waiting to be processed (possibly embalmed) by the mortician.  It smelled like a mildly decomposing body.  Suddenly I see a shadow to my right and I shine my light there and find nothing out of the ordinary.  I immediately smell a really strong whiff of perfume blow by me.  The search was completed more expiditiously than normal after that...nothing was found. 
From my post 8 months ago:  Got a call for a missing child, got to the home to find the mother highly distressed, and not sure what to do. I called in everyone to first search the home and property. I decided to search the backyard since it was a large wooded lot with no visible fence. After about 10 minutes I found the boy, he was caught on an old chain link fence in the woods that was blocked by a bunch of trees, so you couldn't see it from the house. He had basically gotten strangled to death on the fence, he must have been climbing on it, fell, and got his hooded sweatshirt caught on it.   The worst part for me was having to call it in on the radio, knowing the mother might hear it inside from one of the other officers radio.   
I got a call that there was an abandoned truck on the highway. I was only a mile or two away, so I headed there. It was in the middle of these curves, with a mountain wall on one side, and a drop off to a creek on the other side. It was dark, probably around midnight. I pull up and there it is. An old 50's pickup truck. Light blue. Sitting there. I have no backup. I have no idea where the driver is. I walk up, gun out, inhaling the strong alcohol vapors. No one to be found. I call for a tow truck. Meanwhile I have to wait, in the dark, in the middle of blind curves, with no idea where the driver is or why he left it. My adrenaline was at an all time high for sure. 
My mom was a patrolman at the time and rolled up on a guy fucking a pumpkin on someone's front porch. It was one of those huge ones like 3 foot diameter. Guy was apparently too into it to notice her and her partner roll up him.  (Unrelated) A year later she got a call for a suspicious person and so she's walking around in the woods behind a neighborhood and heard someone sneaking around so she hid behind a tree and tripped the person. It was a guy in full ninja regalia carrying a wooden box with shuriken, poison darts, throwing knives, and a picture of one of the girls in that neighborhood.  She also found a butterfly knife in a hooker's pussy...well it moreso fell out when she was being frisked.   
Not a cop, but worked with an animal control officer who had to go with the cops into a house of an old lady that no one had heard from in a while.   She had passed away quite a few days before, and left behind two large dogs. The dogs were hungry, so by the time they got there, the dogs had eaten most of her. 
Not a cop, but work within a school district and have heard some pretty unfortunate stories about reported abuse. Any time a child says their dad/coach/aunt/cousin/sibling/pastor touched their peepee/whoha/cookie/flower/weewee/dingdong it's creepy. Worst are the ones that mention it to a grown-up but don't know the real word so teacher thinks the "flower" the kid mentions is an actual flower. Moral of the story - penis, vagina, testicles, labia, clitoris, breasts... Get comfortable with the real words and teach them to your kids.  
A guy was at a park masturbating at around 10pm at night, and I was the first to respond...  Called another unit to help me, saying he was resisting arrest, (which he was...)... and I made the other unit arrest him... we wore gloves.  Thankgod. 
Not a cop,  But my college friend told me he walked in on an od'd crack head that had microwaved her own newborn daughter. 
Some sort of inter-dimensional being must have put that cocaine in the center console.  Or maybe the dude's truck roamed around at night trying to get high off human drugs.  Who knows?    Certainly not the man driving, who the truck was registered to, and who had a history of controlled substance arrests. 
I'm just wondering how a neighbor is close enough to notice he hasn't seen him in a few days but not close enough to see a giant fire.  
Way to stop a secret agent you dick. Mr. Hoover is going to be pissed when he finds out you foiled his plans    
How does one "do it right"? I'm genuinely curious.  
Supervisor be like "It says here he's a donor... We really need brains" 
The fact that you spoke to these people at or near the time this happened, puts you there. That is a heavy burden and thank you for doing what you do.  
Get rid of the gold chain........... somethins off  
Wow.  To think that this could have been how I ended up. Except I survived my time in the dumpster and was rescued weighing 2 lb.  Thank you guys for what you do. 
Ok this one is worst ever. Beats the guy cataloging someone else's shit in ziplock bags 
One of my work colleagues was on jury duty for a case where a lady of the evening died on the freeway after falling out of a pickup truck. The driver's defense was that "out of nowhere, for no reason, she just opened the door and jumped out while we were in the middle of the freeway."   
Why on earth would they get him to help with the body removal? Surely he would be excused on compassionate grounds? I'm sorry he had to go through that :( 
That's the kind of thing my immigrant Christian parents attribute to demons, I've heard similar stories. Honestly not sure what to make of it. 
Reminds me of a story I heard at work, which I guess I'll share even though I'm not a cop. I build websites for a living and one of our customers runs this high class escort service. At one point one of his girls was invited to come to this rich middle aged guy's chateau somewhere in Belgium. She got paid upfront to spend the entire night with him, and we're talking 400 bucks an hour here, plus expenses.  You'd think the guy had some epic sex planned considering what he paid, but no. He gave her a large bottle of water and instructed her to pee in any corner of the chateau she liked. He then spent the entire morning sniffing around, trying to find where she had peed. By the time she left that was literally all he had gotten for his thousands of dollars. 
Strangely common. My senior year of HS a lower classman slept on the train tracks adjacent the school because his girlfriend broke up with him. 
The rider survived? How the fuck? What was the lasting damage to him like do you know? 
god damn...that sounds weird as fuck. i didn't know blood did that either. 
Oh man, I bet they hung themselves in the attic so their kids didn't walk in on that sight. 
Did someone break into their home, beat the husband and rape the wife? 
What was the "official" reason for two kids dying at the same time in such little water?   
See, I do my best not to be an overprotective parent, then I read shit like this. 
I mean someone could have easily been creeping up on you, and she saved your life by scaring them off   
You were about to get ganked and she pinged you to safety. Gotta ward and watch out for those mid lane roams  
What was the outcome? If you could still smell the alcohol the person must have still been around. 
Oh god. Speaking of rigor mortis gas... my friend worked at a retirement home for years. A resident died and the undertaker came but didnt have anyone to help him. My friend agreed to help him out to be nice. They went to the dead ladys room and she was laying on the couch with her legs resting on the back of the couch. She was in rigor mortis so my friend tried to bend her legs to get her to lie flat. When he did that gas came right out of her butthole into his face. He said he will never forget the smell. 
I grew up on a family farm in rural Indiana with a patch of untilled & still-forested land in the middle of the field behind the house. Exactly twice have my friends and I encountered wandering strangers while messing around down there after dark. Both times resulted in them quickly disappearing after realizing they weren't alone. Can confirm - always hair-raisingly creepy. 
Its amazing when people that have literally molested children act like outraged victims when theyre being questioned. 
This is the reason my 4 year old knows the proper words. And I am thankful for it since she was able to tell me a couple months ago that her older half brother had put a Nerf bullet up her vagina.         The matter has been investigated and is being dealt with.    She has not been to her fathers house since the incident happened.       ETA - in the thread below there is more information about the incident.      I am done for the night on responding as I have now given my self a headache from thinking about it and need to just unwind and not think about the situation for a bit.     Thank you all for your support and kind words.    
My daughter is deeply embarrassed by me mentioning those words, but I do it anyways for this very reason.  My mom worked in a school for thirty five years and made sure that we understood the importance of teaching our daughter the proper words. 
Goodness that's dark.  As a cat owner, I do appreciate you adding that last detail that the cat went to a good home. 
Good lord that's terrifying. It's one thing when it's just you but entirely another when you see something and it's verified by another person in real time. 
My aunt and uncle had won a "smallish" lottery. It was enough to buy them a house on some decent land. They had gotten fed up with their neighbours horses wandering onto their property all the time so they set up some razor wire around their perimeter. One day in the winter my uncle hears some chugging and can smell two stroke. He takes a look and sees a snowmobile just inside his property like with the driver slumped over. He's thinking this guy is driving drunk, got too cold and passed out, had a heart attack etc. Nothing prepared him for what he found. The razor wire he put up had decapitate this guy. Went right under the helmet line and about 95% of the way through. My uncle was charged with something along the lines of negligence causing death or something for not marking the razor wire 
A guy on my old squad responded to his first suicide while on FTO and the dude used TWO Desert Eagles. One on each side of his head. 
Maybe the whispering was also caused by some wind? Or did it sound vocal/human? 
This happened in my hometown except the mom was having a post-partum psychotic break. You cannot fuck around with post-partum psychosis.  
On a similar note, isn't it funny how every drunk driver has only had "a couple of beers"? They must have really upped the ABV of Busch Lite. 
That was one of my questions as well. Rural areas are wired like that 
The bathroom cabinet was right next to the door. So she opened all 3 drawers on the door knob side of the door (it opened inward). Then she wedged a metal handle broom against the middle hinge and a metal handle mop against the middle of the door. Every time a SWAT guy tried to go through the door it just dented the door. One guy put his leg through the door up to his knee and she started trying to stab him with one of the knives. They went through the wall shortly after that (just cut through the sheetrock).  
Yep. His parents were drunks and lived an alternative lifestyle. On the night he he killed them he said his dad tore into him pretty good - calling him a loser this and a loser that; he was a mistake; shouldn't have been born. But he said what threw him over the edge was his dad calling him a half a man. He flew in to a rage and choked him out. Mom watched and did nothing. She realizes dad is dead and says something to the effect that dad was right about him and son gave it to her too. Girlfriend helped clean up the bodies and dispose of them. She flipped and testified.   
No one believes you when you tell this to people in real life. All of the oldest brothers on my dad's side have had the same ring with a ruby and a diamond and all of them have died under the age of 55. We tried to get rid of it after my dad died at 45 (we were going to throw it in the hudson), but for some reason everyone wants to tempt fate and my uncle has it. 
I agree with this. The day that my bf committed suicide happened fairly similar to that. We both got up that morning, he had taken the day off work, which I didn't think was that odd really, he had worked nearly 2 weeks straight with no day off. I honestly figured he just needed a break. He sat in the bathroom with me while I did my make up/got ready, we talked just like everything was normal. He kissed me goodbye, told me he loved me and I never saw him alive again. We text throughout the morning, the last text I have from him was at 11:53...I just assumed he had gone back to sleep. However, when I got home around 4, he had been dead for hours. 
Link, please? It's simultaneously too late and just late enough for this shit. 
Isn't that adequate for "beyond a reasonable doubt"? People *do* jump out of vehicles at highway speeds occasionally. 
You don't. My German shepherd has a hell of a sprint. She's a part of the family unit though and just asks for her ball once she catches me. If she gives me a head start, I can make it a few yards before she's on me. I always make her give me a really good head start or else it's no fun. 
Pretty much. Rail thin, soft spoken, and I will never get over his fingernails that were too long and tobacco stained.   
None of us were sure what to make of it. I was firmly of the opinion that she was just severely mentally ill but one of the paramedics was looking round the house for some of this magic powder... 
A kid in my home town laid his head on the tracks bc he tweeted he was gonna kill himself and someone responded saying he didn't have the balls or some shit. Ppl are fucked up. 
First big car wreck I worked as an EMT, the senior medic gave me the duty of mopping out the ambulance. Blood coagulation is a strange thing. It reminded me of hair like jello. Very strange 
When I hacked up the brown clot from my tonsillectomy, the nurse walked in and said "oh Good" and holy fuck did it freak me out. I "went to sleep" in the OR and wake up in this white sheet room, hacking up this brown thing all over my chest and I'm greeted with "oh good"? I thought for at least ten seconds that I was in a weird murder hospital and that I wouldn't be making it out alive.   Then they brought out Popsicles and I calmed down.  
Yeah... apparently he was pretty confused upon waking from the high in the hospital, and asking why he was blind.... 
Yeah OP. I need to know how the hell that happened. It sounds terrifying for those children. 
It's not odd. Bodies don't decompose for 2-3 days at room temp. They can be stored in the fridge for about a month, freezer long term. In cold climates, the ground freezes and they hold them until it thaws for the actual burial if there's not a religious issue.  I'm not a funeral director, but I work at a funeral home. 
Nah, we just secured the building and left.  We get a lot of calls like this.  This particular one was just weird because of the setting and the perfume. 
The best form of protection is education. Make sure that your kids know how to spot a potentially dangerous situation and what to do in one rather than attempting to keep them away from anything dangerous. 
My friends son died when playing in the basement on some boxes and things.  He climbed on top of something and slipped or jumped off and his hood caught on something on the way down and he hung himself.  Just a little kid.  Playing pretend...... There's nothing you can do to eliminate accidents in this world all together, but there's something to be said for being over protective when paying attention was all it would've taken to save a child from dying in such a needless way.  
I like to turn off the mini-map for the immersion and full-experience 
We towed the truck, ran the plates, got his home address, and found him there. Did the usual "I have no idea why my truck was out there" routine. Not much we could do. But I saw his truck in impound for months after that. Guess he couldn't afford to get it out. 
He tripped over the kid and stepped on the chord and it pulled it out of his hands on to the kid. I think the worse part was telling the mother who wasnt home at the time. She let out the most horrific shriek and grabbed me with all her weight clinging to me screaming and crying. 
10 year old me used to wander into the fields surrounding town just to explore those untilled forest patches.   Every farm near town appeared to have one.      You'd find ruins of old buildings,  and ponds filled with frogs.  Abandoned tents, and collections of shopping carts with random objects like blankets and tv's in them.        10 year old me was adventurous,  but none to bright...   
What the fuck. Some people should live underground and wither away in their own filth. 
Everyone is a little shocked that I told my (at the time) almost 3 year old about boys' and girls' anatomy using the proper terms. But here's the thing, to him there are no bad connotations to those words. They are just words like any other words, they describe things. He had questions and he was calling some parts in words that he had invented, so it was important to explain. Anatomy is not shameful. 
Infrared body cams need to be standard so we don't have to wonder like this.  
Still mourning. Didn't get on reddit for awhile after. Forensicunit almost never posts anymore either. It sucks because you read so many of these guys' stories that you feel like you know them. You worry about them, you hope they're safe on their shifts, look forward to "hearing" from them, and then one day, :poof:. They're gone. 
Well, now I look like a liar. But while nobody will believe me now, I'll still say it: I actually didn't make that story up. I haven't seen that video up until now either.  
I am wondering how she knew how to do that..like, had she had a lot practice 
Interesting that the mom watched her husband get killed for doing something, then immediately did the same thing. 
Well fuck, you can only push someone so many times I guess. 
Holy shit. That is one hell of a blindside. :(  I was suicidal last year and I tried to tell my gf most of what I was going through, even though I knew it hurt her a lot. I didn't want to make up my mind one day and have it hit her out of the blue.   On a positive note: I've never been happier in my life than I am right now and we have a vacation planned early next month.  
I believe you.  Ive watched a demonstration of a helicopter and K9 unit.  "Perp" starts off running across a field, helicopter comes down hovering a few feet off the ground, door opens and this GS just explodes out of the copter at a frightening speed after the guy.  "A missile with teeth" is the best way I could describe it 
I'm really curious as to how widespread child pornography is. Someone once told me something about one website having 12,000 pictures posted in a day. I feel naive saying this but it seemed so shocking. It felt like a brick wall to the face of realization just how many images there may be in existence. I know it's global but how many people are trading images and how many images are there? What percentage of the global population has this issue touched, either as a consumer or a victim? 
Well, if the powder had worked in the past, then it's possible that it had a placebo effect and that it might have worked this time as well. 
This is a thing?! My God, that's a terrifying thought.  
The first time a chunk of coagulated blood fell off a patient it reminded me of canned cranberries at thanksgiving.   Couldn't eat at thanksgiving a few months later because it just all came back  
"what do you do?"   "oh, I work at a funeral home."   "cool! So what do you do there?"   "oh, I'm just the serial killer. You know how it is, just trying to *make* *ends* *meet*."   
Why do you use flashlights in this situation as opposed to just using the lights of the building?  Seems like it would just make your current position super obvious while enabling someone to hide from you and avoid you. 
Life is suffering. And the antidote to suffering is the acceptance of mortality as a precondition for existence.  
I'm throwing out anything with a hood in my little ones room.  Your poor friend :(  There is never a recovery from this   
I always stick my fingers in my ears and hum loudly to drown out warnings yelled from upstairs windows.  Keep it real, you know? 
At least he didn't end up over the cliff. This happened to an aquaintence of mine. Guy got sloshed and on his way home up a very rural winding road stopped to take a piss and went over the edge. The cops had his truck towed and 6 days later, after his girlfriend sobered up enough to realize he was missing, he was found dead there.  
"What are you gonna do? Stab me?!" - words of man stabbed.  
It's rampant. Honestly, in my experience, we only arrested the 'low hanging fruit.' There are some complicated, sophisticated CP-rings where you can only get into their circle/network by bringing in new manufactured CP content. Those were some of the most intense, labor-filled investigations that spider webbed the fuck out. Never ending cases.  
I helped with a support group for pregnant women and new moms for awhile. I was there because I'd survived dealing with severe antepartum depression. One of the other support mamas had survived severe post partum psychosis. She had no history of mental health issues. After her son was born she just lost it. Her husband was home for brief leave and he had to call her parents to move her all the way from Alaska (I think? It was somewhere crazy far away) to Maryland so they could keep her and their son safe and her in treatment while he deployed. His "holy shit this is serious" moment was when he woke up to her crying that their son's "chest is bad and he won't be able to breathe" (he had bony and odd shaped ribs) but if she could "just open him up, everything could be back together and he'd live"   She's okay now. She said she didn't fully get back to normal though until after their son had his first birthday.  
A friend of a friend had this. She called her husband one day during her maternity leave and told him her breastpump was telling her to kill the baby. She said it kept saying "murder, murder." Thankfully he called her an ambulance and she got help. She was completely fine after the episode ended. 
This surprised me when I turned 12. I don't know about other girls and may be tmi, but it's something I see almost monthly if you know what I mean.  
My siblings and I once heaved rocks at each other while waist-deep in Lake Michigan.  These were large stones, 10-15 pounds apiece, like a bowling ball basically.  We're hoisting them up to our shoulders and basically doing shotput throws at each other.  Dad got fucking *pissed* at us for that. 
Job security. That guy's got upper management written all over him.  
Oh man, hardest laugh of the day right there and I feel terrible for the timing and situation surrounding it. 
If not a hood, then it could just as easily be falling wrong and hitting your head on the curb, or the corner of a table, or even just the floor.  Human beings can be remarkably resilient creatures. We can survive some insane things, but we are also remarkably fragile. Sometimes all it takes is a forceful bump in the wrong spot.    
It took her SIX DAYS to sober up?? I can't even imagine being that drunk for that long... 
Suddenly the image in my head became less gruesome. Thought it was something entirely different happening.  
Yup. All the ladies in my EMT and Paramedic classes had no issues with the blood clots. The dudes came back from their first trauma calls all wide eyed like "DID YOU KNOW BLOOD DOES THIS???"  Um. Yeah. We're aware. 
Jesus H Christ. Most kid stuff I can understand but that is legitimately stupid, lmao 
Wow I thought the clumps were just chunks of uterine lining. I'm not sure what's worse to be honest. 
How do you make a net?  You sew a bunch of holes together 
1) I know a good knock knock joke but you need to start it  2) ok, knock knock  1) who's there  
What did the buffalo say to his son when he left for college? Bison... That always gets me. 
What do you call a mexican with a rubber toe?  Roberto 
My wife walked in on me masturbating to an optical illusion.  I said, "Honey, it's not what it looks like!"  
This is my step ladder. I never knew my real ladder... 
I went to a zoo but there was only one dog in it. It was a Shitzu 
The other day, my wife asked me to pass her lipstick but I accidentally passed her a glue stick. She still isn't talking to me. 
I bought the worlds worst thesaurus last week. Not only is it terrible, but it is terrible.  
Why don't ants get sick?    Because they have little anty-bodies. 
Do you know why when geese fly in a V one end is longer than the other?  There are more geese on that end. 
Why can't you see elephants hiding in trees?  Because they're really good at it 
What do you call a cow with two legs?  Lean beef.  What do you call a cow with no legs?  Ground beef.   What do you call a dog with no legs?  Call him whatever you want, he's not coming. 
A bear and a rabbit are taking a shit in the woods.  At one point, the bear turns to the rabbit and says,  "Do you ever have problems with shit getting stuck in your fur?"  The rabbit looks at him, uncomfortably and says,  ".....no?"  So the bear wipes his ass with the rabbit. 
What is green, fuzzy and if it fell out of a tree would kill you?  Pool table.  
How do you think the unthinkable? ....with an ithberg. 
Two fish are sitting in a tank. One fish looks to the other and goes, "How do you drive this thing?" 
A guy goes to a bar and and the bartender asks, "what can I get you?" The patron responds, "just a fruit punch for me, I'm driving" The bartender says, "great, but you have to get in line." The patron stops and looks around only to reply, "I don't see a punchline..." 
Want to hear a knock knock joke?  Two men walk into a bar 
What's the difference between Tuna, Piano and a Glue stick?   You can tuna piano but you can't piano tuna!   What about the glue stick?   I knew you would get stuck on that.  
Two cannibals sit around a campfire. One says "man, I hate my mother I law."  The other one says "well then try the potatoes." 
Why do scuba divers fall backwards off of the boat? Because if they fell forward, they'd still be on the boat. 
What did the baby computer say to the father computer...?  Data.  
Knock, Knock  Who's there?  I eat mop  I eat mop who? 
How is a bicycle similar to a duck? They both have handlebars, except for the duck. 
'Do you want to hear the reverse joke?'   'uh yeah?'   'well, start laughing'   
There are two muffins baking in an oven. The first muffin says, "Man, it sure is hot in here." The second muffin says, "Holy shit, a talking muffin!" 
"I like my women like I like my coffee - without a penis."   I remember laughing myself to shreds when I first stumbled upon it.  
this guy is walking down the street with bananas in his ears, another guy walk up to him and says"here m8 do you know you have bananas in your ears?" the other guy looks at him and pulls the bananas out his ears and says"what was that?i couldnt hear you there i had bananas in my ears" 
What's the difference between a duck?   Two of its legs are both the same. 
What's red and bad for your teeth? A brick.  Why did the boy fall off of his bike? Because someone threw a fridge at him.  Why did the koala fall out of the tree? Because it was dead.  Why did the second koala fall out of the tree? It got hit by the first koala.  Why did the third koala fall out of the tree? Peer pressure.  Why did the fourth koala fall out of the tree? Someone threw a fridge at it.   Why did the fifth koala fall out of the tree? Thought it was a game and wanted to join in.  Why did the man die? Because he was hit by five koalas and a fridge. 
the peanuts one!!! I love it..  two peanuts walking down the street.. one was assaulted. 
Knock knock   Who's there?   Interrupting cow   Interrupting co-  MOOOOOOOOO  I love this one 
A whale walks into a bar.  The bartender asks, what are you having tonight?  The whale says, weeeooooooooooooo in the deepest voice imaginable.  
Where does the Queen keep her Army?  In her Sleevy. 
I met Michael J. Fox once, went to shake his hand but he bet me to it. 
TIL that Human Centipede is actually a form of net 
i was on a first date once and she and i tried to tell this joke two each other at the same time...  
What did the mexican boy say to his father who left to the city? Ciudad 
What do you call a Mexican that lost his car?  Carlos 
Is there a pun or is it just that he asked for something dumb and that's why his head was like that?  
I told my friend that her eyebrows were too high on her head. She looked surprised. 
My thesaurus arrived yesterday, but when I opened it it was blank inside. I have no words to describe how angry I am. 
Where do generals keep their armies? In their sleevies.  
What's E.T. short for?  Because he's only got little legs! 
I was a bio major, and my professor told us this joke during a lecture once. I now drop it all the time, and people think that, because I was a bio major, I'm about to drop some knowledge on them. They are at first confused, then a collective groan is emitted which I feed off of to grow my power.  
Why do elephants paint their nuts red?   So they can hide in cherry trees.  What's the loudest noise in the jungle?   A chipmunk eating cherries. 
Anyone else frustrated that we never find out how deep the hole is? 
For some reason I read that as 2 gay guys at the beginning and was really confused when that never came back around 
What do you call a deer with no eyes? - No-eye deer.   What do you call a deer with no eyes and no legs? - Still no-eye deer. 
I use red and blue paint daily.   I can assure you that blue paint smells worse than red paint. 
I heard this dark joke about Minnesotans, know for their stoicism.  An adult daughter eagerly visits with her dad, after she's moved away from the farm, when he comes to town to sell vegetables.    Daughter: "How are you?"   Dad: "Could be worse."    Daughter: "How's my old dog doing?"  Dad: "Oh, unfortunately he died."  Daughter: "Oh, goodness! What happened?"  Dad: "Died of loneliness, I figure. Since your mom died."  Daughter: "Mom's dead! What happened?"   Dad: "Barn fire."  Daughter: "How did the barn catch on fire?"  Dad: "Caught from the house, I expect."     
Two soldiers are in a tank. One looks at the other and says "GLUB GLUB GLUB" 
Two birds are sitting on a perch. One says to the other 'can you smell a fish?' 
Jokes aside, why do they actually do it like that? 
My 4 year tells this one all the time. He has no idea who Sean Connery is or why it's funny, but it always gets big laughs, so he loves it. 
I'd tell you a joke about UDP, but I'm not sure you'd get it. 
"Want to hear the funniest knock knock joke in the world?"  "Uh yeah?"  "Okay, you start." 
Two cows are standing in a field   First cow says, "Moooo"   Second cow says, "Dang it! I was just about to say that"   
The oven says "That's not possible! They haven't turned me on!" The fridge says "Why would they leave two muffins inside a cold oven?" The microwave says "There's still a three day old meal inside me, I think the owner of this house is dead."   The old woman that lived in this house is coincidentally at the gates of heaven.  St Peter asks her "Tell me what you did in life that makes you worthy of coming in."  She replied boldly, "I made sure every one of my household appliances was sentient."   St Peter raised an eyebrow, before saying "A muffin is not a household appliance." and sending her to hell.   
I remember watching this in Sesame Street. Is it Bert and Ernie?  
The imagery of the last guy will always make me laugh 
The long, intricate time waster jokes are some of my favorites. 
This is one of my all time favorite jokes to tell, but I always fuck it up because I can't even make it half way through without collapsing in hysterics. 
I honestly don't care in the slightest of there's more to the joke that I'm missing. I'm going to have this joke keep popping up in my head all day at work and be stifling laughter. Even right now on the train started laughing. This is beautiful, thank you.  
Oh god, I'm sorry people of reddit, I need an ELI5 D:  To say sorry have a joke:  I laugh three times at a joke, Once when it is told, Once when it is explained to me, Then 3 hours later when i get it 
I have never heard of anyone else who knew this. My mom told us this joke. It used to make her laugh. She was the worst/best at telling jokes. She'd either laugh so hard she couldn't tell it or get confused and loose the plot. I thought the duck joke was one of those "lost the plot" jokes. Thanks for bringing up a good memory.  
This I like. Here's mine:  How can you fit four elephants into a Mini Cooper? Two in the front, two in the back.  How do you kill a blue elephant? With a blue elephant gun.  How do you kill a red elephant? With a red elephant gun.  How do you kill a pink elephant? You choke it 'til it's blue, and you shoot it with a blue elephant gun.  How can you tell if there's an elephant in your refrigerator? Because there's tracks in the butter.  How can you tell if you have two elephants in your refrigerator? You can hear them giggling.  How can you tell if there are three elephants in your refrigerator? Because the door closes, but only just.  How can you tell if you have four elephants in your refrigerator? Because there's a Mini Cooper parked outside. 
What's blue and bad for your teeth? The same brick travelling really fast. 
Here's another of the same type:  Why did the horse cross the road? To get to the other side.   Why did the cow cross the road? To get to the other side.   Why did the chicken cross the road? To get to the other side.   Why did the pig cross the road? To get to the other side.   ... insert as many farm animals as you want, preferably until the other person is looking annoyed ...  Why did the farmer cross the road? To get all his bloody animals back! 
It's amazing at parties. Just make sure the victim is a friend you like to joke with, not someone you actually dislike or you'll get beaten up afterwards  Source: Personal experience 
You sure? Every Mexican I've ever known without a car has been Joaquin.  
There are a series of jokes where a hard hearing genie or stammering wisher messes up a wish.  A ten-inch pianist is a common punch line.  This is an anti-joke version of that, you expect the man to have messed up his last wish and ended up with an orange for a head; but really he just made a stupid wish.  
what do you call a blind doe with no genitals? no fucking idea  what do you call a blind doe with no genitals and no legs? still no fucking idea 
i turned up late for dinner at my cannibal friends house, so he gave me the cold shoulder 
I checked the guys comment history and he said it was a sinkhole, 2km and muddy at the bottom so no sound got out.  Miraclously they popped down and got the man's goat back later that afternoon. 
What's brown and sticky?  A stick.  What's pink and slippery?  A slipper. 
Those two jokes never fail at parties. Single handedly paved my way to the alcohol. 
That's what I always heard too.   I like it better because I like the image of two fish driving a tank around blowing stuff up. 
Hi, I'd like to hear a TCP joke.    Hello, would you like to hear a TCP joke?    Yes, I'd like to hear a TCP joke.    OK, I'll tell you a TCP joke.    OK, I'll hear a TCP joke.    Are you ready to hear a TCP joke?    Yes, I am ready to hear a TCP joke.    OK, I'm about to send the TCP joke. It will last 10 seconds, it has two characters, it does not have a setting, it ends with a punchline.    OK, I'm ready to hear the TCP joke that will last 10 seconds, has two characters, does not have a setting and will end with a punchline.    I'm sorry, your connection has timed out... ...Hello, would you like to hear a TCP joke? 
Two whales are in a bar and the first whale says: "Aooooooooooohhhhhhhhhooooooooooaaaaaaaaooooooooaaoooooooaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaoooooohhhhhhhhhhhhhhoooooooooooooooaaaaaaaaaahhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhoooooooooooooooooooooooooooooaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeehhhhhhhhhhhhhooooooooooooooaaaaaaaaaaaaaa,"  The second whale says: "Go home Jerry, you're drunk."  
I've always liked:  Frappe, frappe. Qui est la? Don. Don qui? HEE HAW HEE HAW 
I still remember the last thing my grandfather said before he kicked the bucket.  He said "Hey, I wonder how far I can kick this bucket." 
How do you put an elephant in the refrigerator ? Open the door, put elephant inside, close the door.  How do you put an giraffe in the refrigerator ? Open the door, take out elephant, put giraffe inside, close the door.  The animal kingdom has a big convention, every animal must attend, who is missing ? The giraffe, it's still in the refrigerator.  You want to cross a river in which deadly alligators live, who eat anyone that gets near them, how can you safely cross it ? Just swim through, the alligators are at the animal convention. 
This genuinely made me angrier than it should have... 
What do you call two mexicans playing basketball? Juan on Juan. 
I always heard "Bubbles is a registered sex offender." 
What do you call a cow with no legs?  Ground beef. 
And elephants. None of these things live in the jungle...  
If shit doesnt stick to the rabbit, then the bear is accomplishing nothing but rubbing the rabbit in his shit! 
Because people ignored you after telling them, thus letting you drink in peace? 
Do you want to hear a heartbleed joke? It will be 1,000,000 characters long 
This one works best in person when you can draw out the first whale's vocalization for an absurdly long time. 
I'll never forget my grandfathers last words... "Stop shaking the ladder you little shit!" 
This is my go-to but I add in that they go to get their picture taken and there's a long picture line or something to really drag it out. 
I've actually read this entire thing before, it's brilliant. It's like a multi-layered rainbow cake, the joke is just layered in self-references and mini jokes galore, and each layer is full of other jokes... The amount of time that must have been spent carefully writing it out and keeping it coherent is scary to think about.  Basically, make yourself some time, read carefully, and enjoy. 
quick, someone get an out-of-work dataviz journalist and make a map of how this joke ends in each state, then draw spurious conclusions from it 
What do you call a dog with no legs?  Doesn't matter, he won't come. 
Then before you tell the drunk to go home, take a really deep breath like you're about to do the noise again  
The one I tell is about a wasp, where the punch table is at his 25 year high school reunion. You get to tell the wasp's entire life story, rise from poverty to go to college, his struggle with amphetamines, triumphal graduation, navigating his 20's, falling in love, and so on. Easy to stretch this out over an hour. 
Yeah, forget the punchline, I actually like reading it as a short story.  
I'm not a journalist and don't know anything about data visualization but I am unemployed and have Microsoft paint so I can probably do it  
"Shit on my lap, you she?" In a Sean Connery voice 
By the time you get to the end you're so invested you forgot you're reading a joke. 
have it on my desk by tomorrow morning and you're our new white house correspondent 
Is Sean Connery himself gilding you folks what is going on? 
Was at a restaurant with my uncle and cousins from far away.  First time visiting with them in years.  At the end of the dinner one of my cousins snuck off and paid for everyone as a nice gesture.  My uncle got irate yelling and complained that he wanted to pay his share because, and I shit you not, he has a movie ticket points Visa card and he was close to getting a free movie.  He argued and told off our cousin loudly in the restaurant over a few free movie points.  He would not drop it until he got our cousin to apologise to him for costing him movie points.  I don't think those cousins are going to fly down again any time soon. 
Not so much a tantrum but just an incredible rage incident.  I watched as a woman exiting an Einstein Bros Bagels looked into her bag and - in anger over some error in her order - perfectly frisbee'd an all grain bagel across the length of the store, over sitting customers, and beaned the cashier perfectly on the head.  Her aim was so impressive that none of us, including the cashier, could do anything but stare in silenced awe. 
I was a kid in a mall when I was able to shop by myself and saw a lady blow a fuse at some guy behind the counter.  Calling him names and what not just losing her shit.  He just puts up the palm of his hand and says, "Mam, I believe you are too irrational to deal with."  And then just pivots 180 degrees not facing her and ignores her.  Waits for her to leave and when she does, he just proceeds to say to the next person, "May I help you?"  Like nothing even happened.  I learned a lot from that guy in 1.5 mins. 
My mother-in-law doesn't handle stress very well, she tends to start lashing out at people and starting fights for no reason.  On the morning of my son's 1st birthday party she started to lose it as we were running around getting everything ready before the guests arrived. She first cornered my wife and started freaking out over the thermostat and some other unrelated pointless crap, then found me and started a fight over the garage door (it needed oiling and I hadn't done it because I was busy setting up the party). Volume of the voice steadily increasing.  My wife marches up to her and actually sent her to her room to calm down, and she did it! She stayed up there for an hour while my wife and I finished putting up decorations. It is a memory I will cherish forever. 
Had a patient family member that was super picky, constantly calling the nurses station, constantly coming out of the room to complain.   She was upset because she ordered a guest tray, wanted a cheeseburger, and it hadn't come up yet.   Another patient coded next door. So basically, patient was literally dying. All of us nurses left crazy lady to go to the code, and the lady went batshit, yelling YOU DON'T CARE ABOUT MY CHEESEBURGER! We ignored her lol.  
The parking garage near my work is a frustrating place. The monthly customers have a parking pass that lifts the gate to get in and to get out. The thing is, the pass and their sensor dont work. You have to creep up to where you think the sweet spot might be, wave your pass around, reverse and try again, curse a bunch, endure people behind you honking despite them going through the same thing..... frustrating.   Not surprisingly, I witnessed a grown man throw the most excellent temper tantrum I've ever seen. The gate wouldnt go up, and he just started screaming in his car and smashing on the horn, straight out of a movie. The worst part is is that the gate always seems to go up right when you reach peak rage. So he's yellin' away, and then the gate is just like "Alright, man. I'll open. Jeez." 
Some poor kid was taking too long at the ticket booth and a father began to get upset. Like, shouting and yelling at the top of his lungs upset. He then pulled his young son closer and said "See that kid? That's why you're going to be an attorney and he'll still be working here" - the poor son was super embarrassed and tried telling his dad it's okay, not a big deal, etc.  He apparently got rounded up by security later on and made an even bigger fuss and his wife went back to the ticket booth and outright called the kid a pussy for "telling" on the dad. Real classy family. 
When I was in high school, my boyfriend was planning on joining me and my friends for an indie movie night at my house. Boyfriend called me up to say that he couldn't make it because he had to watch his siblings, and I overheard his dad screaming, stomping and yelling at the top of his lungs. He kept calling me a 'stupid little whore' and a 'fucking waste of time'.   I should mention that I was 14. Who calls a 14 year old girl that?!  I ended up calling the police on him twice later; once when he punched his son in the face and another when he followed my mom and brother home. He wanted to 'teach her a lesson', we found out.   I don't wish pain on anyone, but if he died in a car fire I'd probably do a little dance.  
Back when I worked at 7-11 a woman came in for coffee, and i was out of decaf. so i offered to make her a fresh pot and she said that it wasn't good enough and she was already late, threw the cup on the ground and stomped out.  people, what a bunch of bastards. 
I used to work at McDonald's. One time a guy came through the drive thru and ordered chicken nuggets. We gave him his food and he drives off. A few min later, he comes in to the store and runs up to the counter ranting about how we forgot his BBQ sauce. My manager meets him at the counter, apologizes profusely and him some BBQ sauce packets (extra too, maybe 6-7 packets). He proceeds to throw them at her and the rest of us workers behind the counter. We all had BBQ sauce splattered on our uniforms, on the walls, equipment etc. After he ran out of ammunition, he ran out of the store and drove away like a coward.  I was 15 then and I pretty much lost my faith in humanity. 
I told a grown woman she could not pet my service dog while he was working. She got herself so worked up she started shouting, and told me that if I didn't want people to pet my dog I shouldn't bring him into the grocery store. I expect this sort of behavior from young children, and I also expect their parents to keep them under control. 
I worked the front desk at a hotel a few years ago.  A guest came to check in around 10pm and asked if he could get a room with 2 beds (he booked 1 bed).  I told him we were sold out of rooms with 2 beds.  Before I could offer him anything else, he took the bowl of apples we had at the desk and threw it against the wall.  Then he took his OWN laptop, threw it on the ground and started kicking it around the lobby.  Security came out promptly and told him he needed to leave, which obviously prompted more screaming and kicking.  Needless to say, he didn't stay at the hotel that night. 
When I worked at mcdonalds I was scheduled for an early morning shifts. This guy ordered a steak, egg, and cheese which wasn't something we batched cooked. The next three people behind him all ordered batched cooked items and got them before him. The guy proceeds to scream and shout and then get in my face. I tried explaining why but he was just screaming over me. The cook came out to try and explain hoping the guy would back down. We couldn't find our manager anywhere to try and get help.... His co workers slowly inched towards the door until they were far enough to just run. In the end he demanded a refund which the cook side fine please get in line and wait (ya he actually made the guy get back in line for the refund) as the guy is getting to the register his food was ready and he took it and left with no refund. Then the manager came out trying to figure out what was going on.... 
i work in retail, and i saw one woman literally flip her full cart over and walk out after her coupons wouldn't go through  it was actually extremely impressive now that i think about it, it must've had $150 of groceries at least 
Just landed in Orlando, picked up my bag and it was SHREDDED. I knew it was a cheap bag, just went to customer service to get a trash bag to hold my clothes so I could get to the hotel. Middle aged lady in front of me is going nuclear that the little ID tag was missing from her bag. No other damage. She'd had 2 connections, but that CSR better shit that tag right fucking now, how dare he lose the picture of her dog, rant goes past 5 min. I tap her on the shoulder and ask if this is really what sher spent money to go on vacation to do, held up my fucked up bag with shit falling out of it and said some off us have real problems. She stomped off without another word, I apologized to CSR for shitty people and asked for a trash bag. CSR hooked me up with a free Samsonite because of it.  *edit words 
I was recently driving on a small country road when I saw a traffic jam in the distance. I drove my motorcycle ahead of the traffic untill I saw two ladies facing each other in their cars. Both tried to pass each other, but neither wanted to make enough room for each other to make that possible. They could just drive forward and it would be over, but no, they just refused to pass each other and decided to just sit there and create chaos on this small road because they didn't want to drive on the small patch of gravel...         
I think it has to be when the ancient super market across the way was closing, because a new store had been built a mile away. They had this huge "everything must go sale."  I was scavenging for closeouts, as was everyone else.   At the checkout, a 60-something woman, was angry that "YOU PEOPLE"  didn't have what she wanted.  Then she proceeded to tell the cashier (in her 40's) she was "happy she was losing her job and she hoped she would become homeless." At somepoint she also called the cashier a "nincompoop."  The manager asked her to leave and she went on an incomprehensible tirade.  I just hope that old lady never walked into the new store because, the entire staff of the old store worked there too... and I strongly suspect they will remember her. 
Dude I was standing behind in line at the grocery store got pissed at the cashier for charging him by the pound for grapes. He was adamant that the listed price was for the bunch and was making a huge scene and getting nasty with the cashier. He asked me to come with him so he can show me (was within viewing distance from the register and I just wanted the line to move). We walked over to the grapes and he showed me the label and said "what does that say?" looking all proud. I pointed at the small text under the price and said "per pound." He got even more pissed and checked out talking shit the whole way through and left.     
A woman who was in her late twenties/early thirties, dressed in a business suit, who was literally screaming in the face of a poor security guard at Heathrow after having her half-finished juice box taken away and disposed of. 
The woman in the cubical across from me literally every day.  Examples:  Her new puppy wont sit quietly beside her for 2 hours at her kids baseball game.  The person who just called her wasn't 100% sure what they wanted and she has to work a bit with them find out.  Someone kindly asked for a response on the same day with multiple apologies for the short notice.  Her mother went to Vegas without her  (she's 35).  I got a review and she didn't. (I repeatedly explained that I arranged the review so I could make sure I was doing my job well as it was a new position to me).  All of the above and so many more all result in phone slamming, needing a smoke, swearing and omg usually crying in the ladies room.  We are a department of 2 so I get to pick up the slack. 
Disney World. Every single time I've been there.    Obscenely high prices. Crowds of some of the rudest people you will ever be shoved into. Mix in a healthy dose of heat / humidity / afternoon showers.   I have seen grown men and women snap in 17 different languages. 
Once had dinner at a restaurant with a group of people who'd been partying all day. Just after the meal was served, one guy cracked it about something and upturned the whole table. Food spilt, plates destroyed, dresses ruined, and he walks off down the road. To make matters worse, we all had to chip in to pay for the smashed plates and un-eaten meals. What a great end to fun day.  
I work as a lifeguard at a waterpark over the summer and some days can get REALLY warm. I once had a lady who was seriously angrily complaining to me that it was too warm outside, like somehow it was my fault that there was a heatwave that day.  
A little old lady in an unbridled rage absolutely red in the face screaming at a teenage Baskin Robbins employee, because she wanted $0.10 off a $0.99 ice cream cone. The deal was only available on Sundays and it was Thursday.   She made us wait in line behind her while she argued over a dime. The cashier couldn't do anything because the register was electronic and wouldn't apply the discount.  I was about to pay the lady in loose change to move along, but someone stepped in to assist us off to the side. We were in and out in a few minutes, and the irate octogenarian was still raging when I left. 
I had a grown adult roommate who was mad because her parents (who gave her $1000 a month *in addition to* paying her rent, phone, car, and grocery bills) would not give her an additional $600 a month.  Meanwhile, I'm a grad student who makes $10,000 a year and have been supporting myself since I was 19.  She was sobbing when I came home, and I was very worried and asked her what was wrong.  She had been crying for half an hour, and finally told me the story and asked me for support, saying, "It's just not fair that I have to live like this, am I right?"  I responded, "I literally cannot relate to you" and walked out of the apartment because I wanted to smack a bitch. 
Someone opened a window on the bus and some guy went nuts, stood up and slammed it shut and starting giving everybody a lecture how this guy should consider everyone else. We of course all english told him to stfu and opened the window again. 
Watched a woman at a rental car counter have a nuclear meltdown because the employee couldn't rent her a car since her license was expired. Her rationale was that even though it was expired, the license still showed who she was. 
In the office I work in, there is a bin behind my desk/pod, whatever you want to call it. Its been there a long time and people use it to put their tissues in when they come out of the toilet.  Someone moved it to a different position, and there was a banterous discussion for 5 minutes about how it doesnt matter where it is. During this, the woman who sits on my table who is normally quiet yanked off her headset, launched it at the guy sitting next to her (thankfully not me), stomped over to the bin, took it back to its normal position (we have many bins in quite a small office it really wasnt a big deal) and then proceeded to scream at us till she went red in the face about how we are being childish.  EDIT- having read this its a little bit underwhelming but I took the time to write it so fuck it  
The ex wife screaming "I fucking hate you and I hope you fucking die of cancer." that time I accidentally threw away an apple.  Damn, I love being single.  
We were in a shoe store where a woman was trying on multiple pairs of shoes. The salesman kept bringing her pair after pair to try on. (It was a challenge for him because the lady was obese and could barely see the shoes on her feet.)  Finally, he said, "I've shown you practically every style shoe in your size that we have in stock. Do you like *any* of them?"  She grabbed a high heel from one pair and threw it at him, hitting the salesman in the chest. She yelled, "I wouldn't buy shoes in this store if you paid me!" - and stormed out the door. 
Driving up to my first day of high school, someone pulled up next to my father and tried to fight him for (driving recklessly) and even yelled at me, a 14 year old kid, for being a part of it.  
My best friend's husband and father of her child pitches the biggest fits over the smallest things (she cooks, he wants junk food instead; she asks him to hold the baby so she can answer the door). I love her dearly, but his behavior has caused me to distance myself quite a bit lately. 
I pictured this from the point of view of the soaring bagel for some reason 
That's correct. We don't care about your cheeseburger  
My wife is an RN and some of the stories she tells me about patient behavior sets ME off.  
Plot twist: there's no sensor it's just a guy watching the cameras waiting for peak rage before he opens the gate. 
I hope their son grows up to be well adjusted and not follow in his parents footsteps and become a raging douchebag. I hope, but it's unlikely.  
Make me  A turkey burger  So i can get my  Satisfaction 
I do kinda agree they probably should put up a sign or something at the pump not saying to buy the ticket, but that is just horrible 
$280 worth for $0??  This extreme couponing thing may not be too much of a hassle, after all... 
LOL @ the second one.  'Fuck you I won't take all this product for free then.' 
That's the nicest way of saying I don't give a fuck I've ever heard.  
I know 100% it's the woman's fault, but some service dogs I've seen have this giant notes on their harness with "pls don't pet me, I'm working and my owner needs me"   
The manager has some spectacular timing...almost like they were waiting until assface left. 
Doesn't sound that hard, I mean, $150, what could that be? Like 15 bananas?  
Is your baby doing well? Best wishes to the new mommy. 
Being kind, polite, and reasonable to airline employees has always netted me the biggest favor payouts for literally the least amount of effort. Seriously.   
Well... Don't leave us hanging! Do tell us what happened to the lazy one, I've got my popcorn with me. 
I don't know that I follow.  If they were both facing each other (head on?), why would one be trying to pass the other?  
When I worked as a cashier at a supermarket, our bag boy was sent to run and pick up a jar of jam for a customer ringing up who forgot to grab it ('cause he wasn't doing anything, she had a long order, and she had been decently nice thus far). When he brought it back it was apparently sugar free, and this pissed her off and she threw it at the customer service desk in anger and it exploded everywhere.   Also had several people go nutso and start throwing food when they got angry. Milk was the worst, followed by yogurt and glass items. Thankfully they never threw wine.   This was at a fancy grocery store too. In a nice part of town. People were just ridiculous occasionally.  
My retail days... I loved having people freak out and say they were never coming back... then when they inevitably are back a week later, I could smile and say, welcome back! 
Currently in a customer service job. Nothing gets under my skin more than when customers throw out the "you people". God it drives me nuts! 
No doubt in my mind that he opened a few bags to cherry pick and stuff the one bag he was so insistent was sold by the the bunch as well. I know that type of shopper, that's why he got so pissed, all that effort for naught. 
fucking with airport security is typically a quick way to not get on your flight and be treated to a shiny new pair of steel bracelets. did she not get hauled away for this?  
Las Vegas seems like a weird place to go on vacation with your mom no matter your age. 
Dear lord. I used to work at Disney and I probably got yelled at about 20 times a day in every language.   "WHY IS SPACE MOUNTAIN BROKEN???!!"  "I PAID $12,000 TO BE HERE! I DIDNT COME TO GET RAINED ON!"  "YOU HAVE RUINED MY VACATION!"   
Once that guy was sober, I'd insist that he pay everyone back, as the decent thing.  
I still remember taking in my Pitbull for a routine checkup whdn he was still a puppy. Poor girl there was going through having to put down her 12 year four legged friend. Apparently a 6ft4 burly Russian man makes a great hug companion, cause when she got the news and it hit her, she just kinda fell back onto me while crying. I just held her there and tried to help calm her down, but just stood there for a few minutes with her to mske sure things were okay.   Losing a pet devastates people. I hope she finds well knowing her cat is chasin' Gods laser pointer. Why cant animals just live forever? 
I used to work at circuit city. This reminds me of a guy who made me call over my manager for a price override on Black Friday because a landline phone rang up 5 cents more expensive than the sign advertised.   The manager looked at him, looked at me, and just pulled a nickel from the drawer and handed it to him.  The stupid part is that guy had a look of accomplishment on his face like he just "won" a negotiation or something when all he really did was waste a whole giant lines worth of time for a fucking nickel. 
$1 upfront for $3 in product weekly for the rest of your days. Nice return on investment bro. 
"You're harboring a lot of shit. Go ahead. This is cathartic for you."   "It was pretty good - the sex is pretty good." 
lmao this is a legendary freak out.  The collective "UGHHHHH" from the crowd when she says "I AM AMERICAN" is priceless 
There is a 100% chance the girl she was yelling at was prettier than her  
Ahhh jesus. The couple behind the camera had the patience of saints.  I have a bunch of emotional dysregulation issues and I tend to spazz out when people get in my face like that. I'd probably do something stupid.  good on them, for real.  
Holy shit I wanted to reach into the video and punch her.  I'm so angry right now.  God dammit.  DAMMIT.  This woman is one of the worst people on the planet.  "I want my money back"  MY GOD IT CONTINUES.  Dude makes out with his girlfriend and she's being "sexually harassed".  Also, kissing is now sex.  Just degrading the other woman.  I can't believe the woman behind the camera didn't lose her fucking shit.  Everyone else just looking on uncomfortably.    WAIT FUCK THERE'S MORE?  "You're stalking me".  She's leaving the store but she is being stalked.  "Retarded foreign asshole".   
This was really funny until I saw the cashier's face. He looked pretty upset. 
I believe these people are doing it on principle.  They must 'win' at all costs.  They've been told that 'the customer is always right' and that if they are loud enough, the manager will give them whatever they want just to end the situation.  The amount of money in question is completely irrelevant.  
I was expecting the opposite reaction where you all pretend that nothing is happening and avoid eye contact with one another. But I guess there are some instances where one must intervene. I had one of those the other day where I had to call the police when someone in front of me was violently mugged.  
I wanna say kitchen nightmares? She was the nastiest rudest person ever. 
Why are people bringing their tissues out of the toilet and putting it in a bin, instead of flushing it down the toilet? 
"How dare you say that to my face."  "I'd say it behind your back, but my car's only got half a tank of gas!"  -Al Bundy 
Nowadays she could probably get 100 of that specific Beanie Baby for $1. 
They're the ones that have never worked a day with the general public in their lives. There are only a small handfull of people that they come into contact with, and they have /complete/ control over those people, and by extension, 99.99% of all human interactions in their lives.  You give them something they don't expect... and they just can't handle it. In their small, ostracized lives... there literally is no greater disrespect than that seemingly insignificant detail.  Or she was just 200% banannas, but really, what's the difference? 
In slow-mo, with something suitably epic playing in the background. Flight of the Valkyries, perhaps.  Optionally, teenagers in Einstein Bros shirts diving to intercept the flying bagel, with the typical slowmo "Nooooooooo!" and/or "Geeeeeeet doooooown!" 
"What's your profession?"  "Oh, I'm a certified asshole. I make people mad and get paid to watch." 
Some of us make it out without becoming raging douchebags. Not all of us, but it does happen.  
Its not for $0 though. Its for the hours ands hours of time spend finding/buying, cutting/printing, and organizing coupons or browsing/"clipping" coupons on apps. Then you have to go to the stores, sometimes many stores and sometimes hours away to find exactly what you need. Shopping can take even more hours as you comb through the store with your coupons, comparing everything to make sure you get the right things. Then you have to check out, which of course can take a while if you have a ton of things.  After that you're stuck with massive amounts of items that you honestly probably don't even need, never would have bought, and don't even really want that you have to store in your home. It can spiral out of control.  Nothing is ever free. You're trading the grocery bill for a _lot_ of time and energy, which honestly isn't worth it a lot of the time. 
It really is. There is no response to that. Fuck me, I'm going to remember that phrase and use it when appropriate.  
Many 5 years olds don't, so thank you for teaching him / her. :) 
Honestly, being polite, reasonable and kind works with damn near everyone in customer service. Even when I'm pissed, just saying "I'm sorry, I'm not mad at you I am upset at your company policy and I won't direct this at you" does amazing things because there is that rational separation that makes CSR feel like you aren't attacking them. They understand frustration. 
She was ostracized for the rest of our time there by both students and staff, got in trouble for inappropriately flirting with one of our taller students, but not much else. When the program was over no one ever heard from her again, haha. 
I once had a manager who, when the entitled unreasonable lady said,  "I am never doing business here again!" Replied with, "You promise?"  She flipped her shit and the manager earned mad respect from every employee. 
Grazers have been known to devour half a bag of grapes before they get to the register. 
If it rings up 12 bucks and you don't want them just tell us. I don't give a shit, and I totally understand when it happens with grapes. Any time someone looks sorta confused about the price and got a big bag of grapes I point it out. A lot of people end up taking the grapes off. If they aren't on a huge sale they are expensive. :/ 
Honestly, retail work itself isn't particularly hard or unpleasant, it's the goddamned customers that make it so. 
I now have this image of millions of cats chasing a single laser pointer and some bored angel sitting on a recliner moving it around.  
She probably forgot about inflation and was thinking that $.10 was like fifty bucks  
Seriously though, couldn't have gone better for me.  
She calls her a prostitute and she just mutters to her boyfriend "well I'm not getting paid" and they both snicker 
He even said, all he did was kiss her once in the forehead. Apparently that also constitutes making out.  
It's true. This is my father's mentality.    I'll never forget when I went with him to the apple store when he had this "we're gonna march right down there!" mentality about how I lost my adobe programs (I'm a student in school for graphic design so it was kind of a big deal) when my hard drive crashed. He was yelling so loud and causing such a scene I started to walk away after which he started screaming my name across the mall and telling me to "get the fuck back here!"    He's also made many waitresses cry when out to eat and purposely makes a huge scene so they'll give him a gift card to calm down.   Literally can't go anywhere in public with the guy without him causing a scene like this.  
I work in retail, and unfortunately our store operates like this. Throw a tantrum and you will get free things no matter thr value. I know one dude who got a free macbook.... Our managers are pathetic. 
Used to wait tables myself- when I saw the owners confiscating the server's tips my blood boiled.  
He had 0 plans to make it out alive, nor did he want to. His life had been ruined, and he wanted to get his revenge before going to hell.   I'd say there wasn't anything he didn't think of.  
People really thought they were going to pay for their kids college with beanie babies.  
I threw a tantrum in Walmart when I was 3 or 4, and my mom goes "Stop it, or we're leaving."  So of course I keep carrying on and screaming.  She just let go of the cart, and walked us out of the store. I just kept going "MOM! MOM STOP YOU'RE LEAVING OUR STUFF! MOM!"   On the way out she apologized to everyone we passed "I'm sorry, my son is being loud and ruining EVERYBODY's shopping experience, I'm so sorry, have a nice day!"  I have never been so thoroughly shamed and I never threw a tantrum again.  
It sounds like this son character was pretty logical about it...  I feel there's hope for him. 
I had a boss who said something like "you can be a couple of minutes late, or you can have coffee/food, but not both." His reasoning was that if some unforeseen event causes you to be late, that's one thing; but if you are late because you chose to take the time to get food, that's much less excusable.  (He understood that the unforeseen thing could happen after getting food and was a reasonable person, and honestly, his reasoning behind the rule seemed pretty solid to me - if you're already cutting it close, stopping for food is a bad decision). 
My grandpa has a seeing eye dog, I think that helps.  
This is my reaction to most stories here. Call the police.  
When a shop policy pisses me off I don't bother to tell the cashier I'm never buying from them again because I know the cashier won't care and can't do anything about the policy.  Instead I calmly leave and just never shop there again, if a friend asks me about the shop I recommend they don't go and explain why. I don't know why so many people seem to think doing anything different will help them in any way. 
I had a family come through my register recently eating some wings from the hotbar as they checked out. Yeah, those need to be weighed you stupid assholes.  Grapes get everyone though. Unless they are on a huge sale they are fucking expensive if you get a big bag. 
I'm gonna start slapping a dollar bill on the counter when people don't have change just to try to get in on this action. Probably won't pay off but it's worth a shot. 
Can I throw a tantrum online and get a free MacBook delivered? 
the compressed air nozzles at the cameras to blow dust off. he should have started a new life as a construction manager. that's some impressive forethought and problem solving skills.  
Thats the thing though: As a parent if you say something, you follow through, it is this simple rule that will shape your child like little else can. If you can't follow through on banalities, why would you expect your kid to grow up to follow through on any of his promises. Kudos to your mom.  
I started flipping shit at my dad in a K-Mart once when I was 13 (so like 1987, when K-Mart was a thing.)  He points at a small cluster of reasonably attractive girls my age and says "You calm your shit down or I'm going to tell those girls you have a little dick."  I clammed up immediately. 
I come from a small town and moved to a city for college, the first few weeks driving around and having to force myself not to wave were weird. 3 years later walking on campus I'll still tend to greet most people as I walk by, they usually give me a look lol.   Come on y'all I'm just a redneck tryna get a education 
Weird, every time I've seen wings sold in a store like that they weigh it at the deli and slap a sticker on it for the cost, or they'll have you pay right then and there. 
Asshole tax. The energy used to get back the money is worth more than the money itself. 
At the vary least it'll make for a decent story and help some poor cashier have a slightly less shitty day. 
But what if you hadn't? Would he have followed through? It would be kinda strange for a grown man to tell a bunch of teenage girls his son had a little dick, wouldn't it? 
It still makes sense to wave at people in cars, it confirms that they see you so you (probably) won't get run over 
That's what my local store does now, but they did used to have a self serve area where you'd have to take it up to the register yourself to get it paid.  
Another ting he does is he answers the door for Mormons/Jehovahs witnesses/any door to door salespeople/whatever and he's very frank. He says he isn't going to convert, he isn't going to buy what they're selling, but it's hot outside, come in, have something to drink and sit down for a bit. They never try to convert or sell things after that, they're glad to take a break and talk about the game or whatever with Dad for an hour or so and have lunch with him.  
That lawyer's pretending to look through documents trying his damnedest not to smile as he's thinking "I'm billing $250 per hour for this." 
My great grandma faced this issue.  My great grandfather was "missing: presumed dead" in World War 1.  They held a memorial for him, then she met and started dating someone else.   In 1919, he just wanders back in at the back door of the house (with a withered left arm and a wound stripe).    Great grandma split up with the new guy and carried on with my great grandfather, who ended up dying of appendicitis during the second world war.   
My dad died when he was 45 from a heart attack. My mom was 42. My mom started dating about two years after his death.    Before she died at 56 years old, 14 years after my dad died, she said if he were to come back she would choose him in a heartbeat. She even had dreams of him walking through the door all those years later.  No one in her eyes measured up to him.  
My dad died and left my mum behind at age 40 something. She's currently with one of his work friends after their relationship grew out of the grieving. I'm happy for her. Shes happy. But she would choose my dad every time. I feel for the guy because she's still grieving 3 years later. All her fb posts are about him and remembering him and photos of him. I assume he's understanding, but I still feel.for him.  
I wasn't married but might as well have been. We were together for 6 years and wanted marriage, just too young and waiting til we were ready for it. Then she was in a car accident. 4 years have passed, I've since had a couple relationships, more loves, and my life is generally happy, but nothing compares to her. If she were to come back right now, I'd choose her in a heartbeat.  
I couldn't imagine losing my wife she leaves for work soon, I'm gonna go hug her in the shower with my clothes on now. 
My dad's friend happily married had kids but wife dies fairly young. The kids are fairly young so he decided to raise the kids by himself. Years go by and he manages well kids grow up turn out smart and get married. He never married anyone for the shear love he had for his wife. However at age 50, he realizes that life gets lonely after the kids are all grown up and getting married so he married a widow and they are happy. They both have infinite love for their previous SOs but they are happy with each other aswell.  I guess, it's really a matter of whether or not it works as well as it did before.  
My mother has been widowed twice and I have a recurring dream that my dad comes back to life and I have to explain to him all that's happened since his death and mum's remarriage. I fucking hate that dream. 
My fiance died at 22. If he were to come back now, several decades later, I think we'd be strangers to each other. I am a very different person now.  If he turned out like his siblings, I wouldn't even want a relationship with him, honestly.  
I'm a widower dating a widow.  It hurts even to read this question.  EDIT (7 hours later because of some of the absurd things I've seen in my inbox):  To those who are replying with "so who would you choose," or "what's your answer," or the like, you obviously aren't understanding it at all.  Which is not surprising; it's one of those things that you just can't understand unless you've been through it.    But there is no answer to the question.  It doesn't exist.  As someone else pointed out, it's as if someone had asked a parent with one dead child and one living child which one they'd rather have.  It's a completely nonsensical question. 
Boyfriend died about a year and a half ago at 18. Would I take him back if he were to come back right now? Absolutely, no hesitation. In 30 years? I don't know. We might have ended up growing into two completely different people and it wouldnt have worked out anyway. I like to think it would, but that's just my morbid wishful thinking.   I really miss you Brandon. Hope you're doing ok wherever you are.  
I lost my husband a couple years ago after 20 years. I could never remarry.  
This reminds me of what Betty White once said on Larry King. Her husband (Allen Ludden) had died of stomach cancer and she was asked whether she would remarry, to which she said "Once you've had the best, who needs the rest?" 
I'm the fiance who has had constant suicidal idealization and attempts since childhood (currently 26). I'm always looking yet another reason to live, and all these heartfelt comments really struck a cord with me. I know I'm not the intended audience, but thank you. 
I'd be more curious as to which partner they'd want to be buried next to. 
My husband committed suicide after we'd been married a little over a year and our baby was six months old. I am still furious. I am single and not looking but if he came back now, I'd tell him to take a hike. If he came back 10 or 20 years from now, I might have forgiven him.  
My grandfather was killed in WWll. My grandmother didn't remarry until her four children were all grown up, almost 20 years later. Her second husband wasn't the sort of husband I imagined my grandfather would have been, but he wasn't the worst husband either. When my Nan was in a residential care home suffering from dementia, she only ever spoke about my grandfather (by this time my step-grandfather was a little senile and, thankfully, never noticed she wasn't talking about him).  I often wondered, if there is a heaven, what was going to happen when she was reunited with my grandfather? 
A little different answer, but someone posted about how when your partner dies, you can be at the height of your relationship and that will never be resolved.   My ex husband decided when our daughter was a baby to start transitioning into a woman. It was due to a lot of factors, but I ended up moving away and we got divorced. In my head I feel like he died because that person doesn't exist anymore, but I'm still sharing custody of someone who looks and thinks and jokes like my ex husband.   I haven't been able to really date anyone seriously, really. But when I do, I'll be faced with my 'dead partner' and my new one every day.  
This exact thing happens in the Netflix show, Glitch. It's worth a watch, there's only one season at the moment but it explores an interesting concept. 
not quite answering the OP, but a friend of my Dads had a wife and a mistress - inevitably they found out about each other and ended up running off together, leaving him on his jack jones.  There is a moral to that story but i am not sure what it is 
You guys should check out Glitch (TV series)   The dead come back from their graves, and one of the main characters has this scenario happen to him 
I never meant to cause harm. Please don't hurt me. 
That's about the time that you convert to Mormonism and get your own TLC show, Zombie Sister Wives.  
It's a little early in the night to be asking serious questions like this....  
as a kid i always worried what would happen when my gran got to heaven and her first husband (my Grandad) and her second would be there. I was rooting for my Grandad.  Then i realised that there is no heaven. 
oh my god, how hideous for your great grandmother. to have to go through the grief of losing him not once but twice... life is so fucking cruel. 
Damn. That's beautiful. I guess these couples are the exception since their second marriages lasted about as long, of not longer, than their first one. But I had never thought what it would feel like if someone said, "At least she's reunited with A now...". It's a suffocating thought.  
I think you hit it on the head when you said the part "saint who's been a perfect dead spouse" vs "living and flawed".  I think people have the hardest time with that when someone is gone, dead or otherwise, and one is actually there.  May you find peace with your current happiness. 
I have an aunt who is twice widowed (my late uncle was her second husband) and lost a son in a car accident. What you said about Facebook pretty much sums up her timeline. My uncle has been dead for 8 years, her son a few years longer, and first husband even longer than that. I can't imagine carrying so much grief for so long. 
It could be sad for him but it's also kind of beautiful that they can share this love for their late husband and friend together. Maybe he doesn't mind that she's still grieving because of this. 
My dad is going through something similar with my mom. Married at 18/17, just celebrated 40 years together last year. Mom passed of lung cancer about a month ago. He has trouble eating and sleeping, and given they lived in an extremely small town (~5000 people), he can't even go out to eat without people hugging him and falling over themselves to offer their condolences. Plus the simple things are triggering. He can't even go in the grocery store without the emotion just crashing on him like a wave.   So yeah, fuck cancer. 
This scares the shit out of me. I've been with my girlfriend for 8 years now. I'm 26 and she's just turned 25. She has a very aggressive form of kidney cancer (diagnosed in December 2016) and just 3 weeks ago became paralysed from the stomach down due to a tumour in her spine. She's not got long left to live but I already miss everything we once had. I only hope that I can overcome the grief and move on with my life after she dies, but at the moment, I am permanently sad. 
Hug her tight. My dad died on the way to work. This thread has made me sad :( 
This is sad and sweet at the same time. I'm glad they found each other.  
My mother died 10 years ago, and I have a very similar reoccurring dream. She comes back to life and is heartbroken to find my father has moved on with someone else. She's still sick/dying in my dream too. It's the worst. I told my dad about this, and he said he would go back to my mother in a heartbeat.  
I partially feel your pain, except the one I thought to be my other half is alive...and many things happened.  Either way, my condolences and I g  Hope everything turns out for the best for you. Maybe it will turn to love. 
My mother said something similar about her first husband who died young. I was always conscious that her great love wasn't my dad but she told me that it wasn't fair to compare as they only had a few years and who knows how they would have ended up.  
I agree. First husband died when I was 24. At 35, I am not the same person. If he came back now,  I would say no, we wouldnt be a match at all. And that hurts. 
That's by far my biggest fear. I'm sorry for your loss and admire your strength to go on, not every one does the same.   Edited a word out  
I hear you - lost the love of my life 6 years ago and I can't see myself committed to someone else.  I'm still desperately in love with him.  I imagine I'll be an old woman one day pining over a 35-year old man. 
Damn that last sentence. Dude... that must be the hardest thing in the world to lose both your wife and daughter. 
Wow good for you for finding someone but I gotta ask, 18 months after your late wife passed seems really quick. How did you move on so quickly? 
Can I ask how you met?  I'm a widow who is tentatively thinking of getting back into dating, but would really love to meet someone who has gone through something similar so they can understand what I've been through and not feel threatened by the love I still have for my husband.  
I'm lying here next to my beautiful wife getting ready for my work day. This was by far the hardest answer to read.  Been married 22 years, I can't imagine not having her here. 
Christ, what a roller coaster.   But where did the wife end up going for 3 years.  
Who can blame him, like, the heck you just fucking vanished and I had to hire a PI to find you and nothing, I moved on, then you came back when I was already with someone... And she gets pissy about it and tries to kill him, he's better off that way, although *maybe* not choosing was a bad decision.   
This story is so batshit, that I have a hard time doubting its authenticity. 
I feel like this is too specific to be made up, which scares me. 
I like this. Before my nana died last summer, we were talking about how she hadn't remarried even years after my grandpa died. She said "why settle for hamburger when you've had steak all your life?" 
Yup.. read it and said 'ooof' in my head.. thats a rough one.. i can't participate but I'm curious what people say.. 
But really. The end of Cast Away hit so hard because you can really see how awful it would be for both of them.  
My grandfather unexpectedly died in his 30's from a medical issue. My grandmother eventually met and married a man who also lost his spouse. In the end, they were married about four times longer than either of their first marriages, yet they both decided to be buried next to their first spouse.  It surprised a lot of people, but it was a decision based on logic more than choosing one person over another. Both had children from their first marriage and they never had any children together. They decided they wanted their children to be able to visit both their parents at the same place. My grandmother said she didn't really care where her body was since she wasnt going she be using it, so she thought about the people who would care. Even in death, she's doing her best to avoid inconveniencing others. 
My great uncle remarried after his first wife died. When the first wife died, she got put in one of the two plots they had. His second wife died and got put in the second plot at twelve feet deep. He died and went in the second plot at six feet. So the answer is next to the first one and above the second one. 
Yikes. Was he suffering from any known mental illnesses or stuff like that? 
I did, and then people commented that you can't answer a fantasy question with real answers. 
Wife of a widower, we have been married a few years now. It is a horrible, guilty kind of thought that chews away at you. Sending you hugs. 
Was everything ok in your relationship when he announced his desire to transition? You mentioned the thing about being at the height of the relationship when a partner dies, do you feel like you were there at that time?   Was he happy in the relationship (though obviously not in himself)?   Did he want to stay with you after transitioning?    Ignore me if these are too personal, I'm just really interested.  
Is a mistress a mistress if she doesn't know she's helping someone cheat? 
If it makes you feel better the question was inspired by grey's anatomy 
My exhusband is convinced that whomever you marry first is who you are forced to spend eternity with, and keeps accusing me on Twitter of screwing him out of a good afterlife. Uh... no.  
This was just hard to read. Hope he can find peace one day.  
This absolutely fucking terrifies me.  I used to do DMV work, part of which involved title transfers, part of which involved removing spouses that had passed away.  At least ten people just started crying at my desk in the year I was there.  I can't even imagine what they, and your dad, are going through.  I really hope I never have to either. 
That's such a sad story :( My dental hygienist was talking about a patient she has who's husband died like 8 years ago, and she's 85 now. His voice is still on her answering machine and she just wants to go peacefully and be with him. I can't imagine being in so much emotional pain. 
When my grandfather died, everyone kept saying, "Oh, he's gone on to be reunited with grandma." And of course his girlfriend/common law wife was right there. She had been there for him for almost 20 years. She helped take care of him in his old age. She is the one who was there with him in his decline in spite of her own descent into dementia. My grandmother was the mother of his 8 kids and got the best years before passing away at 68, but his girlfriend got the 20 years of end of life care, a dying old man crying out in pain that he was ready to see his wife again, and his children telling each other that those 20 years didn't matter to him and that he was finally where he belonged (with my grandmother). I would hate to have been in his girlfriend's shoes, discarded by the children of the partner you were with for two decades.  
My dad already has his name on the grave marker with my mom.  I always wonder what he will do, or want done I should say.  His second wife is a bit crazy.  I can't imagine she'd be ok with him laying next to his first wife, even in death.  He's not even allowed to mention my mom. 
I was thinking this as well. When you lose someone so close to you, you end up forgetting all the flaws of their character. Month by month, year by year, whittling them down to perfection. 
You know what i always wished i did for her? Buy her a horse. She loved horses so much, and whenever we rode she was like a horse whisperer. I didnt plan on her passing 3 years after we met, but i used to work in buying a horse in my future plans. I always wanted to make that dream of hers true. If your girl has that kind of passion for anything, do it big for her. That has to be the best feeling in the world for both of you. At least that's how i always envisioned it feeling lol 
and you tell her she's a good boy and you give her a belly rub and a scratch behind her ears 
Yea it's pretty nice, even the kids are really happy that their father found someone.  
My biological dad died when I was a baby and I was raised by a pretty awesome step-dad as long as I can remember. My mom almost never mentions my biological dad. When I asked her before why she said, "Well.... I honestly don't think about him all that much at this point. We were only together a couple years, I was so young, and we only got married because I got pregnant." It really put into perspective how even though it's sad, in the grand scheme of things my biological dad really was just a very small part of my mom's life, and that's okay. 
I'm really sorry for your loss. I hope this doesn't come across as insensitive but I'm very intrigued. Does this not discount the personal growth that he would have gone through between the ages of 24 and 35? 
It definitely is not easy. A lot of my fellow widows and widowers have had different experiences in our aftermath and coping because they have had to be a parent and a widow or widower. This creates it's own challenges that they have had to reconcile. (We have a great group of people at all stages of our grief over at r/widowers) For me, losing both girls destroyed my entire future. I had an identity crisis because everything I had planned for my future was gone. But I had great support and my counselor asked me, "who would you be if you never met your late wife?" From there I started reconstructing my life as an individual. I applied to law school, got in, met my SO (not in law school), and have been killing it in school. My current SO knows there isn't a day that day that goes by that I don't think of the girls and she supports me in that.  
Well there are several aspects to consider. First, my late wife was a young widow when we met. I was the product of love after loss so I knew of sorts what challenges I would face. Secondly though, I have always been a mover so to speak. I don't like to dwell or tread water. As such, seven months of counseling was sufficient to help me address every issue possible. Most widows and widowers don't go to counseling as long as I did. Once they "feel better" they stop. Me, I kept going even after I felt better to deal with the secondary issues like dating again. I stopped going in August when I moved  to the east coast for law school and met my current SO shortly thereafter.  
I'm not going to lie, *this* is what scares me about having kids.  
My mum died of cancer. My dad met my stepmum through the Macmillan nurse who cared for my mum, and also cared for my stepmum's first husband when he was ill with cancer. She set them up and they grew close and that was that. 
I'm a widow (41) and I met my new boyfriend (40) online he is a widower. He is actually a little harsher on me when I start getting sad. But he is further out than I am *edit I was actually pregnant when my husband died and he had very small kids when his wife died so him  saying things like he's never coming back didn't feel right at first but I know he wants me to keep from getting depressed or dwelling on the what ifs that sometimes I can get carried away with. My husband died 5 years ago and his wife died 12 years ago.  
Did expect to cry at this thread, not over Sprog... 
She was up in Isaan with her family. I can't remember what was wrong with her but I do know her family didn't want her treated in a hospital. They took her to temples and traditional doctors instead. She worsened and eventually got proper medical care, and then went looking for B. 
I was positive that he would kill himself the first time I saw that movie.  I may have been in a dark place back then... 
He was secretly self medicating depression with alcohol. He constantly lied to me and I can't count how many times he put our baby in danger. But according to him, he was ALWAYS sober. You don't get two dui's, fired from a career job and forced into rehab when you are sober. The problem for me was he hid his alcoholism from me from the beginning and it wasn't until we were married and I was pregnant that I found out. Then everything started to make sense. All the phone conversations where was "just tired." The totaled truck a month after he got it. Falling down stairs in the middle of the night.   I know I sound cold but the level of deception he brought into my life left me feeling utterly betrayed. He brought nothing but lies and heartache to our marriage.  
My dad still has a voicemail from his father who died close to a decade ago. He doesn't really listen to it, but I know it's still there. 
Oh wow, I did not expect to laugh in this thread. That's beautiful. 
My lady absolutely melts every time she sees a goat, she thinks they're the most adorable creatures in the universe. I'm definitely buying her a goat now. I'm so sorry for your loss OP, I can't imagine the weight you carry on your shoulders. I hope you find peace and enjoy life again soon. 
It pains me when kids try to interfere with their parents lives too much. My dad is in the process of selling our childhood home after living there alone for five years since mum passed. He's buying a small house up in the mountains and has vowed to live out his years riding motorbikes and skiing. I'm so happy my sister's are supportive too, we're so happy for him.  Here's to new chapters. 
If he came back today, he would be the same person he was when he died, so you can't include hypothetical personal growth here. 
I commend you on seeking counselling. So many men this day and age are afraid to admit they need help, it's honestly inspiring that you sought it out and how it helped you move on with your life. I imagine a lot of people will consider the time frame in which you moved on as short, but I think it's testament to how actively seeking help moving on can work.  
It's the scariest thing about being a parent. I sometimes wake up in the middle of the night terrified at the prospect of something happening to my daughter, even though she's perfectly fine sleeping in the room next to mine.  My heart lives in her body now. 
Wait, am I getting this right, is it a good thing that he's being harsh when you're feeling sad? Doesn't seem like something I would appreciate personally. 
The PI didn't think to look for her with her family?  
I get your point completely.  He certainly had a string of bad luck.   Btw, welcome to reddit where acknowledging someone else's point is a sin. 
It's funny. People think it's strange when I say I hope my wife dies first. I don't want her to have to live through my death, I'd much rather it be me that does that. Obviously, I don't want it to happen tomorrow or anything!  
Thank you for your kind words. All these replies have made my month. I'd love if my post compelled someone to do something awesome for their SO. And if you get a baby goat (had to Google to find out they're called kids), i got dibs on a family pic of you, your lady, and your kid  
Most Parents spend most of their life looking after us. We owe atleast a fun Retirement  
This is probably the most beautiful way of thinking ever. I'm married to a man whose first wife died. I have tried to explain to others the way my life feels, but no one ever wants to hear that I have feelings too. Why? Because his wife died! And my husband left me. I thought that's what the intention was. "Til death do us part". We all say it. She died. That's supposed to happen. No one is promised a long life. We all die eventually.   All I got was that I have big shoes to fill, and that people hate seeing me with him because they loved her so much. And that I can't make my home look like I live there because it won't look like she lived here.   All I ever say is that I'm not replacing her. I'm simply walking through the next phase of life with him. Is that so bad? He asked me to!  I love your mom's attitude. She's a wise woman.  
Yeah, somebody had to die for you to even exist. How can we be sure you weren't the one that did it? 
Absolutely. It would be as if you hit the pause button on him, then hit play 11 years later.  We aren't talking about them dying, then coming back that same day and living an alternate and secret life until you just walk across him 11 years later. 
Making the decision to have a child - it is momentous. It is to decide forever to have your heart go walking around outside your body.  -Elizabeth Stone 
It's fucking terrifying. Ive got an 18 month old son. Sometimes before I fall asleep I have those horrible thoughts about something happening to him. Makes me want to lock him inside forever.   I figure, if anything happens to him I'm going to jump in my car and drive it straight off a cliff.  
It probably depends on the person. Some people need to be sad for a bit, then get a proverbial kick in the ass to "snap out of it" while other people express the emotion differently.  
Same . My husband would swear off society and disappear in the woods ala Bear Claw from the Boonies (he loves that guy) . My husband has done medieval,  civil war and frontier reenacting/living history, so he has the skills and supplies to do it.   Makes me take really good care of myself (or try too).  During our premarital counseling I told the minister if something happened to me, I would want him to marry a tall buxom redhead. (My complete opposite). Because if she's loving him and maybe raising my children, the last thing I want weighing on her mind is " he only married me because I look like her" I dated a man in college whose dead HS GF could have been my sister....it sucked. He wanted me to act like her... 
Wow, the new wife is a wonderful woman. I think her rationale is absolutely solid, but I don't know if I'd be comfortable with that situation.  
I don't have any great advice for you but I wanted to let you know that I read your post and I think you're walking a hard road and I feel for you. I think people should be happy that your husband is able to find some light in an otherwise dark world; would they rather he be alone?  
Even if you did, it's not like you would have grown together in that time, so who knows how much different you would be to each other.  I say that as a 36 year old who married my high school sweetheart.  If we hadn't stayed together, and met up now, who knows if we'd be compatible, after different life experiences. 
Yep, exactly.  The only suicidal ideation I've ever had is at the thought of something happening to her. 
His whereabouts are conveniently undocumented for the entire period his mother and her deceased husband were together. Funny that. 
I worked as a tower hand for a construction company.  I used to take of my lanyard and move between booms(500-600feet up.)  I also would slide down the outside legs untethered because it was faster than climbing down the ladder.  I cringe when I think about that there was zero chance of survival if I fell.   
Timeshare presentation. I now know what hell is like. 8 hours of my life I'll never get back.   And of course the "free trip" was impossible to get. "We will call you on Monday sometime in the next two months, then you need to fly out on Tuesday and come back Wednesday."  
Back in the days before soft contact lenses you were supposed to clean them with hydrogen peroxide and then use a special neutralizer tablet afterwards.    I forgot to use the neutralizer before I put my contacts in.  Hydrogen peroxide in your eye HURTS! 
I went down in the pantry of my grandma's house and ate 45 year old peaches from a jar. did you know the human body is capable of shitting peaches in roughly the same consistency they were consumed? Me either. 
Asking a woman when her baby is due.  Doesn't really need a story. It went as imagined. 
I don't drink Southern Comfort anymore, I don't remember why and that's part of the reason. 
Elementary school age. During the 80s. My great uncle gave my dad a jug of homemade wine. He put it right next to the apple juice. I got lit up despite insisting that this apple juice tasted weird. Went off to school.  I'm never drinking wine again.  
Loaning money to a friend.  Lost the money and the friend. Not a very good deal  
Every man eventually learns the lesson that muscle rub should never be used to treat a groin pull or similarly place ailment.  
103 temperature, sicker than a dog from the flu and constipated. I was miserable. I took 4 "fiber" pills in the morning and had hallucination fits for the next 4-5 hours. Desperately trying to get some sleep, I took an ambian sleeping pill (extra strength).   Woke up 9 hours later not constipated anymore and having to do a shit-load of laundry. 
Hmmm i wonder what's inside the medicine capsules? What if i just eat that directly instead of swallowing the pill? (Empties onto tongue and promptly gag) 
Just came back from a three-week backpacking trip with FIVE other people. Trip was just originally just three others (my bf, brother and cousin), but two friends wanted to join. Jesus Christ. You gotta keep those trips intimate. And preferably, with family. The two add-ons didn't want to do any of the same stuff we did, couldn't keep up, didn't want to try any local food, complained about walking, only packed flip-flops, commented after thirty minutes at the Louvre that it was "just a buncha paintings", etc. etc. etc. Worst mistake. The original squad all chanted "never again" at least fifty times each the entire trip. So yeah. Never again.  
Had a Baconator for lunch and dinner three days in a row. I was working long shifts and there was a Wendy's across the parking lot from where I was.  After I finished dinner on day three, my body says:  **YOU MUST SHIT NOW!**  I shit my pants running to the bathroom. Had to clean up, and head back to work with no underwear.   0/10, though I occasionally went to work commando on hot days after this.  
Cave exploring.    The serious kind - with lights, helmets, and occasional crawling.       Fascinating while you're doing it,  but scary as hell in hindsight.    Ample opportunities to get seriously injured or worse,  in the last place in the world you'd want to be rescued from.     
What I wish was a "never again" story?  Masturbating after forgetting to wear gloves while making spicy salsa from scratch.  Current count: 3 times. I am an idiot. 
was younger and way more stupid.    got the chance to score meth and decided to get some to see what the hoopla is all about. Loaded all .3g that i bought and chased the white dragon.     Spent the next 22 hours alternating between jerking off and being on all fours all around my house trying to find meth crumbs behing the fridge that must've mysteriously gotten there while i brought the baggie from the front door straight to my room.   Shit's nasty mane. 
I was reading the tea tree oil is anti-bacterial. I wanted to use it around my eyes since I recently had a tiny put painful infection in my eyelash gland.   I DID NOT read that it has to be diluted.   I was beat red around the eyes.. the burning would not stop, dish soap and icing helped. It looked like I just got hit in both eyes.    Fuck you tea tree oil.  
My boyfriend's father gave us two bags of smoked venison sausages his friend made. We froze one and left the other in the fridge. I guess because it was smoked I couldn't tell when it spoiled, so one day I have some, and not 20 minutes later I almost crap my pants. I ran to bathroom, and while I'm pooping out my soul I just start vomiting into the sink, which was luckily right next to the toilet. I spent the whole day in there spewing smoked vomit and poo, and I haven't eaten anything smoked or venison since. 
I trusted a fart once.. Horrifically shat my pants.. Never again.  
I was taking a trip to London and saw it was so much cheaper to start my flights in Dallas (5 hours away). So I drove there, left my car, and took my trip. Everything went awesome. I figured I could get back to Dallas after sleeping on the plane and just drive home which was a dumb idea and I eventually gave up and got a hotel I left while it was still dark, driving through Oklahoma, and I saw a storm in the distance. Of course I got stuck in that storm in the middle of nowhere. I couldn't pull over, and there wasn't any place to stop, so I had to power through till I hit the next town. It was raining and hailing so hard I couldn't see, my car would occasionally lose traction, and the radio informed me there was a tornado watch in an area near me. It was one of the most terrifying experiences I've been through. I made it to the next town and got myself a victory McGriddle and swore I would always pay the extra money to fly out of the smaller airport near my home town. 
Long story short I made a batch of pot brownies with a good ounce of weed. I was a freshman in high school, and had no idea what I was doing. I ate a brownie and felt noting so I decided they were weak and ate the whole batch. Needless to say, that night I was moonwalking with Michael.  No seriously, I was so stoned. I was on the ground and I could literally feel my thoughts (does that make sense? Idk) and I couldn't move. I didn't even know if I was breathing. I was high for what seemed like the next 2 days  
I let my husband convince me to get pregnant.   NEVER. AGAIN  I mean, I love my daughter. But being pregnant was terrible. 
I walked up an escalator that was going down cause I was too impatient to go down then up again turned around to look at my mum. Fell. Had 4 holes in my leg. Only realised cause my leg felt wet(blood was trickling down it). Now I don't walk on escalators and am terrified walking on broken escalators that aren't moving  
Started smoking for like a month this year. At first I thought I liked it. But then I realised it was a temporary effect, which just left a terrible taste in my mouth. Sports and singing also became harder. So I dropped it immediately. Never again. 
Second post in this thread.  The blazing wing challenge at Buffalo Wild Wings.   I decided to order the hottest hot wings B-dubs has to prove to my friend that I could eat more than him. I think we each started with 6 or so. He bitched out after two wings, I had already finished mine. It was painfully hot.  To add insult to injury I decided to finish my friend's wings so I could talk a bunch of shit to him while I did it. The others in our group were cheering me on and I powered through it. The burning didn't leave my mouth until I got home.   It's true what they say about "shitting fire" after eating food that hot. The following day was spent on the toilet. Cheap beer and mega hot sauce explosion of fire out of my ass. It hurt so much I didn't know that kind of pain was even possible.   I still really like hot sauce though.  
Once I hooked up with a girl who claimed to be actively practicing a number of pagan rituals and religions, and also was somehow Buddhist. Ended up being nuttier than a squirrel turd, tried to put a curse on me and stuff like that. Never again! As silly as it might be I will always ask someone prior to sex if they claim to be or have at any point considered themselves to be "spiritual" beyond your basic belief in God.  
I will never again attempt to enter a friends with benefits arrangement. My heart can't take it. I'm in my 40s and lied to myself for a long time about how I enjoyed it. Better to learn the lesson late than never, I guess.  
Went to a timeshare presentation in Mexico. The guy hit us up leaving the airport. As this was not our first time, we entered the room with the lady who was pitching, and told her "in all honesty, we will listen to your pitch, but we are not buying anything. We are only here for the free stuff."  She was PISSED. Told us we were wasting people's time, and gave us the vouchers and told us to leave. But not before I chewed her ass about blindsiding people who had just got off a plane and were looking forward to a vacation.  Totally worth it, and didn't have to even listen to the hour long pitch. 
Still use hydrogen peroxide based cleaner for my soft contacts. Every now and then it gets me. Terrible feeling. Need to get contacts out because they are burning your eyes so bad. Eyes are burning so bad you can't open them to get the contacts out. Super sucks. 
The real question is why did your grandma have 45 year old peaches. 
God this reminds me of a cringy story from my elementary school years.   Bigger kid in class got cast as Santa Claus in a school play.  I walk to Biggest girl in class room and asks if she tried out for Mrs. Santa Claus.  She asks, "Why?"  Immediately say, "Cuz you're fat..."  As the words left my mouth, so did my lunch, cuz she punched my square in the balls, which I rightfully deserved.  I'm sorry, Sandy. I was young, stupid, and didn't have a filter.  
Just reading the name *Southern Comfort* made my stomach roll. Apparently Southern Comfort and I have a history.  
I can relate to this. Southern Comfort was my favourite drink for years. Then suddenly it wasn't. I genuinely don't think anything crazy happened that last night I drank it. It was just a drunken night at a small house party but just the smell of So-Co has turned my stomach ever since. It smells a bit like puke 
 I had a similar situation, but mine was with rum. My mother would put red packets of koolaid flavoring or whatever those things are called into a gallons of water. It would turn the water into koolaid or rather that's what it's for. She would keep the gallon of koolaid next to an empty gallon of water which she filled with rum.   Anyways i poured it in a cup and took a gulp of "koolaid" followed by "EWW MOM THIS TASTES LIKE MEDICINE! Wasn't pleasant... 
Lent $1k to a co-worker once. Took almost 6 months to get it back, meanwhile she is posting pics of her out on the town and doing expensive activities while claiming she "doesn't have it yet". Haven't spoken to her since.  
I'm sure you turned out great despite your proclivity for huffing lubricants, but this is the kind of thing that makes me question having children. That for years I could pour my heart and soul into raising my child and then walk into the garage one day and find him sucking on a can of WD40.  
honestly, it's a wild ride but not a bad one. felt like my bits were being gently warmed in the hands of a lover and at the same time like i was teabagging a stream full of glacial meltwater.   kinda exhilirating.  
I did this with those Nurofen capsules (the shiney red ones) that is a taste you wont soon forget, and the burning! 
I rented a beach cabin with 7 other people. 3 of them were content with just sitting on the beach, the rest of us got antsy and wanted to do things like play mini golf and visit a few breweries. The 3 beach bums were highly incensed that we wanted to split off. They didn't get that we're all adults and not everybody has to always be doing the same thing all the time. 
Some of the best advice I have ever been given was to go travelling by myself. I went to Mexico for six weeks and it was brilliant; I met people out there and hung out until we wanted to do different things, then we moved on.  
My mum gave me some stellar advice: *don't lend money, give it. And if you get it back it's a bonus* 
Once when I was in college, there was this guy that just kinda started hanging around. No one really knew him or liked him, because he proclaimed that he hated people and that his psychiatrist told him to avoid crowds. Of course he did this in the middle of a full classroom, loudly. One day in class, he explains that if you loan someone $20 and you never see them again, you're an idiot that lost $20.  A few weeks later, he asked me to borrow $20 and that he'd pay it back next week. Never saw him again after that. Best $20 I ever spent...  
Crawling trough a tight hole where you don't have any opportunity to turn around and crawl back? Imagine your flash light breaking down as well.   Big nope for me.  
I used to go caving all the time when i was younger. It was a lot of fun but it definitely has opportunities for danger.  On my 16th birthday, i went on a caving trip and wound up in the hospital. I remember i was climbing up this steep hill, slipped and tumbled off. I fell about two stories into a small river below and cracked my head against the rocks. I passed out, the group had to basically drag me out of the cave. I had a cracked rib, and a concussion. My mom drove about 7 hours to pick me up from the hospital and never let me go caving again. :\   
As the son of a mother, that's like pack your shit in the middle of the night and move across the country with no forwarding address type mortifying. 
Fairly certain a flight is not that much more expensive but a hell of a quicker.. I don't get the appeal of the amtrak over a flight regardless. 
What on earth does Blueberry Ghost pepper sauce taste like?   Why would you eat a chip covered in a mysterious sauce?  WHY WOULD ANYONE MIX BLUEBERRIES IN HOTSAUCE?   most importantly, what type of Lays chip are we talking about? 
They have that on HoT One the hot wings interview show on YouTube 
was this penn state. The gaff has pitchers of adios motherfuckers for so cheap. It's a fun easy drink to make when you host parties too. 
Overnight hospital stay/ambulance ride for only $600? You made off like a bandit.  
I used to love apple juice as a kid. I drank a gallon of it one evening and got violently sick shitting and throwing up everywhere. Ever since then apple juice and even apples make me mildly sick to my stomach. 
Why do people think they can fit a gallon of anything in their stomach? How big is your stomach?  
I did the crumb hunt when I tried it too.. once I realized what I was doing I just sat there and cried. Never again. 
Do you hear that kids? Do meth once and you turn into Gollum. 
Glad you were able to do it once and put it down man 
Came here to say the same thing. Will never do meth again because I absolutely hated it. Will never do heroin again because I absolutely loved it. Glad to be out of my experimentation phase when I was in uni but I'm glad I had it. Cured my morbid curiosity about a lot of things.  
Sounds like the time the only things in my kitchen were tuna and vodka.  If you're ever in that situation, pick **one**. 
My sister still tells the story of how I ate week old beef stew at her house and became violently sick. I let her tell this story because the only memories I have of that day are me taking the food out of the fridge, then me kneeling by the toilet several hours later. (not even vomiting, just by the toilet). Whatever happened that day was so bad I subconsciously blocked it out of my memory. 
Food poisoning is no joke. The closest I've ever been to dying was from eating at a huge all you can eat Chinese buffet. Lost power while home alone with no cell phone reception, shit my brains out and puked for an entire day and couldn't keep water down. My dad found me passed out on the living room floor and took me to the emergency room. I definitely would have died if he hadn't come home.  
I bet this led to a very happy relationship. I had terribly embarrassing things happen on my first two dates with my SO, I was sure he would never wanna see me again, and the way he handled it showed me what a great guy he is, now here we are 4 years later. 
When you say icing, I'm pretty sure you ment holding ice to your eyes, but I pictured the sugar paste kind. 
The Icelandic nightlife is something I need to see first hand 
Never even think about eating sugar free gummy bears.  Unless you're *really* constipated 
I did this at a bar after work.  The worst part wasn't trying to clean up, but having to casually pay my tab while knowing far too much. 
if you're feeling insecure about a fart, i suggest releasing it little by little 
In the event I find myself in that area why would I not want to do this? 
I can't speak for all of pregnancy, but first trimester is absolutely horrible.   Can't tell if you're hungry or full, throw up multiple times in a day, hate literally all food....  Luckily, we picked the 2 for 1 deal, so after this pregnancy we'll have two kids and be done. 
My dad had a retired friend who would go to these for the freebies. When the presentation started, he would pull out his hearing aids and set them on the table in front of him. Some salesmen would still go through the whole presentation, but others would just give up after a few minutes. 
Did it for a free dinner at an upmarket restaurant. Three hours of presentation,  months of occasional calls and three years on their mailing lists (not email mind you). Was it worth the free feed? Not in the slightest. 
This sounds like something from the "casually explained" guy. 
Yeah that was dumb. Especially if her name really was Sandy - you could've gone with the 'your name is Mrs Sandy Claus' reasoning.  
When I puked,  Southern Comfort came out my nose. 40 years later I still can't even smell the bottle cap without heaving.  Could never drink any whiskey again.  
That's pretty much me.  It was my friends and I's go to drink in high school and early adulthood,  then around 25 or so I just couldn't stand the taste or smell of it anymore. Stuff is too damn sweet and syrupy.   
Had a coworker who was Charity Central-always had a story "The power got turned off! I ran out of gas! The kids don't have diapers!" So some sweet-hearted people started a collection and we all contributed. She showed up the next week with new rims on her fucking piece of shit car, bragging about the "great deal" she got. From that moment on, I don't care--if you're working but crying poor, I'll nod sympathetically and walk right past you.  
About when you think its time to give them the sex talk, also give them the drug talk. "Not every pill or every aerosol can will get you high, some of it can and will fuck you up for good. And if you need good weed, you come to me." 
Not if it's tiger balm for you pitching shoulder and you get it on your dick in the bathroom because you didn't wash your hands, all in the middle of a baseball game. It was like 100 degrees out. I was considering putting my dick in the cooler so I could finish the 8th inning 
Ugh! Yes, my instinct in the situation was to keep going at our own pace and do what we wanted to do. If they wanted to come, great, if not, they could do their own thing. They weren't pleased at that, either. We are in our late twenties, and to me, way beyond knowing this is okay and we aren't being "jerks". Some people... 
That is actually how I live my life. I've "loaned" my friends plenty of money over the years with no expectation to have it paid back. Some have, some haven't.. usually by the time I get it back from the ones that do I've completely forgotten I even loaned it to them in the first place.. so it's really just like surprise bonus cash at a random time determined by a friend.  
I was in a group of five where one light broke, and that was a serious issue for just that person.   If somehow you lost all light deep in a cave that is intricate at all, you'd be entombed.   It's a complete absence of light in there.   Your eyes don't adjust like in a dark bedroom.    Total blackness, and you'd never find your way out.    
Wow!    That's another part of it.   It's not like it's all just narrow passageways.    There are huge, open rooms with cliffs and drop-offs.     
People make fun of that line, but as a kid (hell, even as an adult) I'd much rather be dead than have to explain to my parents that I got expelled. 
Fuck I couldn't imagine that. At least there were people there that he was able to talk to. I couldn't imagine how much worse it would have been if he had to sit there for that long, knowing that nobody will find you and waiting for your impending death. 
Was this the one where they got him unstuck and while they were celebrating, he fell back in, and they never got him out again? 
It tastes delicious. The blueberry it's in there to have a little sweet with the spice like how many habanero sauces have some mango as well. 
I was going to say, for a brief moment I thought I knew who this was but the college changes that.   I was once denied entrance to the Gaff because I was too drunk.  Same for the Darkhorse.  This was back when the Crowbar was still around and had nickle night 
Had the same thing happen. I had experience with softer drugs, lsd, ecstasy, lots of weed, so I thought I am well prepared to try anything. I wasn't. After that one experience with meth I stopped using any drugs, permanently. Shit made me scared shitless of becoming an addict. I barely even drink anymore, and I was used to going to parties and getting wasted at least 3 times a week.  
9 years and hundreds of completely unrelated stories later...  
I bleached my hair in high school (it's usually pretty dark) and got food poisoning the same day. I'll never forget my dads panic when he came home to find me puking my guts out, pale as a ghost, with unnatural yellow hair.   
Their relationship is the stuff of legend.  They went from awkward shy goofs to old souls over night.  Nothing bonds two people like sharing your pullover so she can tie it around her waist to hid poop stains down the back of her legs, while at the same time you've thrown your underwear away and bunched up a ton of cheap stadium toilet paper into a makeshift diaper so that the "dribbing" is minimized.  Looking back, I can't imagine which of our nights was worse. 
i'm from the 70-80% of the population that can eat those without issues.   they're fine. funny aftertaste.  
dramamine overdose will result in some seriously fruit-loopy shit.   we had an ensign who got righteously, violently, epically seasick when the weather would turn. he'd get dosed up and be functional for a watch shift but if we were in the shit for more than about six hours he was literally useless as he'd be high as a kite and hallucinating that he was in a stage musical(or one time hallucinating that he was a caterpillar who had to make a coccoon for himself). he had a pretty good singing voice.   after a couple patrols he got a prescription for an alternative that didn't have him bombed out of his gourd while still allowing him to function.  
I took a whole tube, once.  Specifically with this in mind.  Except, stupid me, I didn't get the *non-drowsy* variety and spent the whole night feeling like furniture.  Shit sucked. 
from what i can tell, the users of reddit collectively have bones of glass, sphincters made of tissue paper, IBS, crippling social anxiety, and a LOT of rage.  
Well, I live in the opposite end of Atlanta. So, if I'm driving to Louisiana or Mississippi, I hit Newnan about an hour into my journey. Once, I figured I'd stop there, imagining it'd be pretty rural and I could hop off the interstate and visit a gas station. I was dead wrong, though. Newnan traffic is as bad as anywhere else in Atlanta. The fact that it's far outside of the city center doesn't mean no one lives there, it just means poor people live there, e.g. the dudes I saw wearing matching gang shirts with an AK pistol on them. And there are also still country people there too.  The whole thing was, like, a 30-minute ordeal. Strange little town.  
30 year old me never made that association, let alone grade 5 me. 
I know like three people who blacked out on SoCo at one time or another and can't drink it anymore. Even the smell will repulse them.  I think you are on to something with your last sentence. Hangovers are bad enough but all that sugar really makes you feel like shit. 
This type of person makes me so angry. You're literally taking people's money and flaunting your poor decisions with it. Awful.  
Reminds me of my parents - my youngest brother's friend was getting evicted from his apartment because his dumbass mom spent her entire inheritance, and the spending didn't include rent. My parents offered to let him stay in their partially finished basement, as it was only going to be "for a couple months". So that was 4 years ago and the fucker has since bought two new cars, new rims for his cars, and A FUCKING DOG. But still doesn't have enough money to pay much rent, or move out.  
Exactly this. Tell them this is the plan for today and what time you intend to begin. They can either join or do their own thing. Or try and meet up midday if they want to join only some of the activities.  You can't ruin your vacation because others don't have the same interests or fitness. 
With flashlights as small and powerful as they are nowadays there's no excuse to not have three or four on hand if you're going to put yourself in that kind of situation.  Hell, I use one to look in my kitchen cabinets. 
The worst are the sloped tunnels that lead to underground rivers.   It's not a quick spike-pit type death so much as helplessly slipping into a pitch black underground river and drowning 
I recently read a post somewhere on r/harrypotter where someone made another good point about that.   Hermione was a first-year muggle born witch when she says that line, so what would have happened to her if she'd been expelled? Either they'd have taken her memories so that she would go back to not knowing about the wizarding world, or (arguably) worse they'd just expel her and send her home, where she'd spend the rest of her life knowing she has this ability that she can't use because she got her wand broken when she was expelled.   I'd absolutely view being expelled as much worse than being killed in that context. 
Yeah, just read about it. Everything was done right, but the rock holding the rescue lines gave. Just shitty luck. 
That was a fantastic story, make it into a film damnit!  
This story reminds me of Before Sunrise. You'll run into the Train Wife again someday for the sequel! 
Well, you'll live up to your username if nothing else. Say hi to Low Earth Orbit for me. 
Do everything you can to drink water in small amounts and keep it down! 
If you can, sip on Gatorade/pedialyte. A doctor told me when I got a stomach bug that even if you throw it up later, the electrolytes from Gatorade can still get into your system, versus water which needs to be metabolized. Not sure if it's true but it got me through a week of puking. 
This is what I was hoping to hear! A girl wouldn't clean up a guys shit unless it was true love. Good on ya! 
It's only really in large amounts that they give you issues. The sugar substitute they use can't be absorbed by your body so you just pass it. However, their low caloric content makes them a popular (one-time) binge snack among those trying to lose weight, and eating a whole package will turn your hindquarters into something resembling your username.  
I'm losing it at the image of a man trying to make a cocoon  
What piece of furniture did you identify as? Loveseat? Sectional? Were you leather, or a linen blend? 
This sounds like the most terrifying way to die I've heard of, second of course only to being in an underwater vessel that explosively decompresses. 
Probably should have gotten him out and away from the hole before they started celebrating, but I suppose that's easy to say in hindsight. 
There was nothing romantic between us, we just formed up into a family unit as needed and worked well together. I want to say her name was Amy. 
We are gathered here today to remember Meteorite12, a brave soul who was known to never turn down a challenge. 
Worth the risk if you're going to die in there anyway IMO. 
Well, they're in business because they're subsidized. No Amtrak route outside of the Northeast Corridor turns a profit on its own.  But, to be fair, just because any individual trip compares unfavorably to flying doesn't mean that the whole route is useless. For example, if for some reason you want to go from Chicago to Fargo, the cost is only $99 roundtrip compared to $300+ for a flight. 
The fact that you don't remember her name makes the story a bit more dream like. Like the effects of your experience are still with you and there are details you remember through the haze...but it all seems a bit surreal that you experienced it at all. Great story! And may you never be stuck in a train that long ever again. 
And time travel, like when you ask your girlfriend to make you food then time travel to after you ate it and get mad she didn't make it for you.  
It's the option of definitely dying and probably dying. I'd take probably.   
This needs more upvotes. You've hit the nail on the money - trains connect every city along the way, not just point-to-point like a plane. 
Thank you. Yes, it was *very* surreal. I remember that maybe Train Wife had reddish hair, Isabelle had big brown eyes and that Mike had salt and pepper hair. These were people I spent roughly 24-36 hours with almost ten years ago. Names and faces are fleeting; I struggled to remember Isabelle's name before I started writing the comment for about ten minutes. I hope the kid grew up with a fighting chance, she's probably around 12 years old now.  
I've yet to get so drunk that I time travel, but I hope one day soon I may accomplish this. 
"Hit the nail on the money"  I think you blended two idioms  
...do you mind if I steal this for a story idea? I might never write it but I want permission just in case because I feel like it might inspire me. 
Yeah, well don't cross the road if you can't get out of the kitchen.  
I know you are hurting right now, but things will get better. 
"I can't believe how expensive this is. Nice box though." 
"I always loved how she looked with that pearl necklace." 
"I wish you hadn't brought the children. How are we supposed to explain this?" 
"Who's the stiff one?"  "Quicker we gets this thing over the quicker we can go and eat."  "Damn that's a big box."  "Praying ain't gonna make it hurt any less."  "Don't just lay there like a cold dead fish."   
"Yes. Proof that it can be over in the blink of an eye. His was so short - *too* short, in fact. What a shame....he came and he went just like that. Leaving his wife to fend for herself. She's going to be okay though; what awaits her next is going to be long and hard, and if anyone is capable of coming out on top, it's her. She can handle *anything* thrust her way. She's always been that way." 
I slept with a guy who's mom had a guest book for their house and in the morning overheard her berating him for not letting her ask me to sign it. 
This is so spot on I suspect this entire post of being set up just for you. 
And that's how Optimizrs outted themselves as a serial killer... 
That's kind of cheating - that could reasonably be said any time or place parents could be. 
I'd punch someone if they ever said any of that to me in a funeral. 
"All the way from London? DAMN."  (but it actually doesn't work because the original line was "I came as soon as I heard." But we'll pretend.) 
This is awesome and all, but I'm not sure it would be appropriate *during* sex. 
Standing up and screaming, "damn, that hole is deep!" 
You came here looking for serious answers to this, huh? 
One more night, one more lo-a-oad,  thanks for the bukkake  even though you weren't so late, he  tastes like you only sweeter  (repeat and fade out) 
Were she was untrusting of anyone that showed up to her house and made them sign a guestbook?  Or were they really just ornate about their home that it had to have a guestbook?   
What was she expecting you to write?  A review of her son's cock? 
I can't look at comments like this in the same light since someone pointed out that excessive parentheses is how the far right denotes something "jew-related". 
Did you see that ~~ridiculous~~ludicrous display last night? 
and it's his only comment... calling r/karmaconspiracy ! 
What, you've never done 3rd person narration out loud during sex?  
She just loved her home. It really is a beautiful place! 
I more imagine it's like the pre-internet version of worthless points. Collecting signatures of people who've been over your home to prove to people who don't care that your abode is welcoming and great.  ... Jeez, I just remembered how every site used to have a guestbook. Always wondered why people would sign those, and it's so bizarre now to think that back in the day some people wanted others to know what websites they visited, as opposed to being creeped out by how many websites track without your knowledge. Times have changed. 
"10/10 Would ride again. Excellent water pressure. Coffee was delicious." 
When a man dies, is it appropriate to save his sperm or not? 
What was Wenger thinking g bringing Walcott on that early? 
Oh my god you are right! Also look at the name! This must be op using the double trouble post tactic to get his karma exports for free! 
Pretty sure it's legit, because the thread was 7 hours old when he posted. Who would wait that long if they were trying to game the system? 
Some people are proud of their home and nothing wrong with that.  We all get a bit silly for things we're proud of :) 
Remember when websites would have hit counters so you could see how popular they were? 
Yes. It's supposed to denote a Jewish conspiracy how they seem to (((echo))) throughout history proving they control everything.  I think some of them even thing they engineered the Holocaust on themselves, the ones who believe in it anyway, to garner sympathy to continue to secretly rule the world. It's obviously batshit, but in a weird way fascinating 
Self-proclaimed karma judge here. His reply was 7 hours after OP posted so I think it's legit. 
"Let's conspire to kill ourselves in the most horrible way, a way that's so mind-bogglingly awful, its memory reverberates across entire millennia; then they'll be sorry..."  Sounds more like Goths to me. 
Whoms'tve'de for hast thou doth'd wept for on this dayous of days? 
Well technically if you were to believe this conspiracy it would be more like:  "Let's conspire to have the Germans kill most of our kind while our traitorous sect flees to America and take over their banking industry" 
*Supposedly*, according to the crazy assholes that believe that stuff, the holocaust wasn't nearly as bad. The numbers and the horrors were greatly inflated by the (((media))) to make it appear much worse that it was. It's one way to reconcile the cognitive dissonance of "the Jews are ebil" and "there is way to much photographic evidence and way too many witnesses to say *nothing* happened".  Again I want to stress that the idea is crazy and stupid and I'm not advocating it, just explaining how they think. 
Whomst'd've'lu'yaint'nt'ed'ies's'y'es'nt't're'ing'able'tic'ive'al'nt'ne'm'll'ble'al'ny'less'w'ck'k'ly'py'nd'idy'ety'st'ged'ful'ish'ng'mt'ous'path'let'phile'like'ious'ant'script'ance'iatric'ite'emia'ory'age'ian'phone'ism'arium'ac'fy'ology'ure'pnea'ency'opia'loger'plegia'sophic'ent'hood'otomy'ward'ectomy'algia'orium'tude'cule'scribe'ization'crat'ade'gonic'onym'dom'ship'ic'ical'ial'ize'dox'itis'uous'scope'cycle'osis'ible'ular'acity'etic'cide'ative'plegic'ware'ese'ocity'sion'phyte'trophy'oma'ary'tome'scopy'ily'sect'ern'ist'esque'some'logist'phobia'iasis'pathy'ostomy'ling'ment'opsy'ee'oid'gam'gamy'cracy'ate'ine'oholic'aholic'escence'wise'arian'est'ness'eer'sophy'ette 
My parents met because my dad went up to my mom, grabbed her ass, and said "last night was fun..." - turns out my (party animal) aunt had been at a party and boned my dad the night before. My (extremely prim and proper) mother was mortified and ran away. My dad saw my aunt again later and was like "what was THAT this morning?" and my aunt had to explain. He later saw my mom and apologized and about 5 years later they ran into each other again and he made sure he knew which one she was when they started talking.   Dad and aunt now hate each other.  
My wife's identical twin sister is the most annoying person ever.  Funny, after identical twin my iPhone suggested the rest of the sentence.  
I was talking to a twin and I asked her out to a movie date, she brought her twin and when we were chatting after the movie I realised I liked the other one's personality better and dated her. It was a little awkward after that 
I actually dated an identical triplet. Thankfully they all had very different styles and kept different hair colors, so I never got my girlfriend confused with her 2 sisters. I'd be a liar if I said the thought of a foursome with 3 different variations of my girlfriend never crossed my mind.  
It's not as confusing or tempting as anyone may  think. They look the same ( my parents still mix them up after 10 years) but different personalities. Fun fact, my brother ended up with her twin anyways! 
Girl twin here! Just on the other side of things, I can't tell you how difficult it was to find someone who wasn't completely infatuated and intrigued by my twin and I. Almost all of my relationships, my SO would somehow get in touch with my sister and ask for nudes. It's always been extremely hard on me, and I have a lot of self esteem issues in result. To cope with it, I just get out of the situation and remind myself some people are just the way they are, and that means there will be someone who is good enough to see and want my identity only.  
I briefly dated a twin and she once said to me "so if you didn't know me at all, but you knew my sister instead you'd be going out with her not me right?" The truth is yes obviously I was physically attracted to both of them since they were identical, and you cope with it by knowing the person you're dating on a deeper level, obviously more than just thinking about her looks and body. At least for me that was it. 
My buddies father has an identical twin, his mother has an identical twin, and they are married to each other... both guys to both girls. Its really fucking weird.   **edit**   damn that comment blew up, so many questions, ill tackle a few;  - only one set had kids (my friend and his sister) so no idea if they would look alike if they both had kids  -his aunt/uncle hooked up at the wedding of the first two... - yes they go to twin conventions - didn't know them well enough to ask the swap question - they lived 3 doors down from each other in a cookie cutter development, with the same layout (this really weirded me out) - 
Dated a girl who has an identical twin, Weirdest thing that happened was when i came to pick her up at her place, i thought she was the one who answered the door, called her babe and leaned in for a kiss, she shoved her hand to my chest and said "Woah! i'm not chelsea". It was goddamn awkward after that. Told my SO what happened and she laughed her ass off. 
I dated a girl with an identical twin sophomore year of college.  It was hard to tell them apart (even for their parents) - they even dressed alike and ate the same type of food and listened to identical music.  The attraction was there equally. But the girl I was dating said, "Think of us as 2 dishes of identical ice cream - you can stick your spoon into one, but not both." 
I dated a twin, I never messed them up which was good, but there was this one time my girlfriend asked me if I wanted to play a game, I said sure.  She showed me a bunch of old pictures of her and her twin sister and asked me to figure out which she was.   I'm thinking, fuck I better know, this is probably a test, but I ended up getting really lucky because she seemed to almost always be the one in pink or the one on the left lol.   I asked her if she could tell, and she said no, she just memorized where she was, if it was her first time seeing them, she never would have been able to guess correctly each time.  Idk what kind of chance she thought I had or if she just wanted me to suffer, luckily I was pretty good at the game lol 
I'm a woman married to a female twin. Her and her sister do look a lot alike in the face and body wise, but have always had extremely different styles. It's easy to tell them apart because my wife has long, curly natural hair and her twin keeps hers short, plus it's dyed and straightened.   The most confusion is when we are together. Not because of the way they look, but because they also happen to have a very similar voice. If we are all hanging out, my wife and I, her sister and the husband, whenever one of the girls says babe my brother-in-law and I both look.   Upon first meeting them, I actually saw the twin I'm not married to first. I thought she was cute, but didn't get gay vibes so imagine my delight when there was a single, gay replica. Nowadays, they are both still very attractive, but of course my wife is more beautiful to me because I'm in love with not only her looks, but her soul, her personality, and all her little quirks.  
My best friend (a dude) had a twin sister that I always had the hots for, but I couldn't bring myself to ask her out because she looked too much like him. It was hot-kward. 
Currently dating a twin who lives with his twin brother. I'm not attracted to his brother and I'm not really sure why, they're very similar in personality and interests. His brother's girlfriend however, has been weird/jealous about me dating her boyfriend's twin from the start.  
I dated a twin when I was younger. She presented herself much differently than her sister, so it wasn't usually a problem. My gf had long dark hair and dressed like a hippie; her twin had short red hair and dressed a little girlier. Both were gorgeous, but I was much, much, much more attracted to my gf than her sister, so I was never conflicted.  Anyway, one night my "gf" comes out to meet me. It's dark. She's wearing a hoodie. I put my hands on her hips and go in for the "hello" smooch, and she just dies laughing. "I'm not XXX, dumbass," my gf's twin says. We got along well, so there was no drama, just laughs (including from my gf and her twin's bf).  
This is very similar to the "which one of us is Hikaru game" 
To all of the people saying that the other twin was a jerk, let me shed some light.  Sometimes guys will be standoffish to their brother or friend's significant other so that they aren't perceived as being competition for said mate. Probably doubly so for twins where attractiveness is equal. It's just a way of keeping a relationship out of the way of friendship or family.  
How do you cope? They are identical. Just pretend you're fucking the sister. Done.   
Not quite the same but my girlfriend looks exactly like her mom from the back. Not attracted to her but have definitely called her babe a few times. Super awakened.  
I used to date a girl with a twin, like both of them were 10/10. the threesome question was always on my mind and one day I got drunk enough to ask. If you don't ask you don't get, turns out she was down for it and her twin was an all around great guy. 
Do they hate each other cause they fucked in the beginning and dad married her sister or what? 
She uh... brought her twin to your date? She kind of started the awkward train if you ask me.  
I like the different colors thing. Who wears the original? 
Finally, a chance to leave four people unsatisfied at a time. 
That's crazy. That is literally the last thing I would ever think to ask the sister of the girl I was dating.  
My twin sister and I have run into the infatuation/intrigue, but not the asking for nudes.  Usually people want to run weird "experiments".  If I tickle her, will you laugh kind of stuff.  I am sure you know what I mean.  
I'm not even a twin and I've had so many boyfriends have feelings for my sister, and some have acted on them. I get you on the self esteem issues, it sucks. She's like a fun, free spirited, unemployed hippie and I'm a practical, empathetic scientist/mom. We're both pretty, in different ways. My husband finds her repulsive though, so he's definitely a keeper haha. 
My SO's dad has an identical twin who lives in another state with his family. Every once in a while his mom gets calls from concerned friends who don't know that he's a twin.  "I just want you to know I saw your husband with another family"  "Oh no that's his twin brother" 
At first I was like "Do they swap?  Of course they swap."  but then I thought "Well maybe not, what would be the point?"  
ok stupid question time, could your buddys uncle and aunt be identified as parents if they did a DNA test or is that not how it works? 
Sounds like you guys have to set up some rules in those situations where your wife and sister have to wear drastically different colored pants.  
My sisters husband smacked my moms ass once at thanksgiving time thinking it was my sister up on the counter, getting something out of a high cabinet.  My mom was flattered. 
My wife is an identical twin as well.  We actually lived with them for about 3 years.  I would mistake them if I saw one out of the corner of my eye occasionally, walking into another room, etc.  Once or twice I tried to hug or lean on the wrong one, but thats all thankfully.  As far as attraction goes, not really an issue.  I think when we were dating I thought about it a few times, but we've been married for 10 years and so it just doesn't process in your head the way one might think. 
This has happened to me a couple times. My wife doesn't have a twin, but I almost smacked a stranger's ass in the store because she looked identical to my wife from behind, same colored shirt, haircut, and jeans. I realized just in time. The other was at a function where my wife was wearing a uniform same as all the other women in the room.  Maybe I should just not smack my wife's ass in public. 
My dad snuck up behind my older sister and grabbed her ass thinking it was my mom. My sister abruptly turned around horrified at the same exact time my dad saw my mom sitting ina chair across the room. His face turned bright red and he looked at my sister and said "oh god, your mother is over there. Oh jesus, this is so embarrassing, I'm so sorry!" It was pretty hilarious.  Edit// aaand of course my first comment to hit 1k is about some mild incest 
It might have just been a defense mechanism to avoid messing with each other's relationships. I am imagining him acting extra uninterested in _you_ to avoid creating any accidental chemistry.  
I dated a girl who had an identical twin. My girlfriend was studying in the US, but her family lived in South America. We went to visit her family, and I met her twin, and her twins fiancee for the first time at a family party.   I few beers later, I came up behind 'my girlfriend' and started rubbing her shoulders...it was not my girlfriend, it was her twin. Her fiancee was watching me the entire time and was just giggling. Luckily he thought it was funny.  
I guess a threesome with her twin sister was off the table after that. 
This for some reason made me think how people who have cheated sometimes explain it as "he started kissing me and I didn't realize what was happening for a moment".  Clearly the normal reaction of someone who doesn't actually want to be kissed is like the one of your ex girlfriend's sister. 
This chick has clearly never seen a bowl of ice cream. There's literally nothing stopping me dishing up two and spooning both of them.  Could you tell them apart from which one was bad at analogies?  
That reminds me of when someone I was close to had died and I'd see people I thought was them, even though when I got closer/looked twice it clearly wasn't them, but for a moment there I'd get an emotional jolt because my feelings for my lost one were still strong. 
A close neighborhood friend of mine had twin sisters growing up. He was a year older than me, them a year younger. The whole crew paid very little attention to them until high school rolls around. They blossomed like a lotus flower.   I always knew they were off limits, but one time hanging in his basement another (drinking problem) friend started blabbering about how he was going to get with them and my other friend (who I think was also drunk, but not as much so) freaked out, punched a hole in the wall and dared him to say that again. He did, and promptly received a couple hooks to the face.  
"Auto pilot"  My girlfriend thinks it's so funny when I am asleep and starting making out with her. Usually I'm dreaming of her and then wake up to us having sex. Sometimes I'm not even dreaming and come to with one of us on top of the other. She likes to make fun of me about it and I would get mad....buuuuuuut I do get to have sex so I can look past it.  
The situation with the brother's girlfriend sounds interesting. Can you come up with any examples? 
It gets even more hilarious when people use NSFW when they clearly mean sex.   "Ladies of reddit, tell us about the NSFWest NSFW you have ever NSFWed?"   "Yes...yes...say more things like that.. Say it slowly..."  "never mind, I already came"  
My favourites are the "people who have naked pictures/sex videos online, why do you do it?". People frantically looking through post histories to see the content instead of just going to one of the many (many many many) subs that exist for the sole purpose of redditors to post those things of themselves.  Like... porn isn't difficult to find on the internet people.  
I get that now, but back then it was all his fault. I've forgiven her ;) 
It'd be funny if it was her plan to get her twin sister hooked up because she herself is not that interested.  
The one I dated did. Their natural hair color was auburn. One of her sisters had jet black hair and the other one changed hair colors often, usually drastic colors like blue/pink/silver etc.  
Well, it'd actually be 3. My satisfaction levels would be through the roof.  
I agree! I'm glad you have that thought, it should be everyone's but it is what it is sometimes.  
Right? Especially if theyre twins. You already know what she looks like naked 
Oh god haha I am 100% aware of what you're talking about. Or they ask if we know what each other are thinking at this very moment, usually in unison we just say they're an idiot. (All in jest)  
This would actually be an interesting case study for geneticists to analyze. But it is possible that the differences among the cousins would be the same as the differences between any normal group of siblings. 
There's got to be a cheating twin out there that totally takes advantage of that excuse 
Maybe they both tried to swap and they just end up back with their own partner unknowingly?  
Yes. Their genetics would be close enough that standard genetic testing wouldn't be able to identify which couple the child was from. 
"... that's my story and I'm sticking to it."  --sister's husband 
I received some hand me down shorts from my uncle, fast forward, at a pool party I was bent over picking up some sun screen and aunt walked up and smacked my ass seeing her husbands shorts 0_o 
I feel like they switched bikinis to fuck with you 
I have 3 daughters and have come so close on so many occasions. All 4 of them are the same size and the damn hair colour is always changing, but the butt stays the same. Ever since the first girl hit about 18 I have been careful but have still had some close calls. 
my friend did that to his sister, mistaking her for his gf  we constantly bust his balls about it 
How similar did you and he look? I guess I'm just wondering if the twins had the same type.  
Sometimes your brain needs to hard reset.   As a dude, I've been kissed by a woman before that wasn't my girlfriend. It took me a good five seconds for my brain to say, "WTF? STOP." We aren't used to not taking the first move, so most likely, we're just processing whatever the fuck just happened.   My personal experience. (I did tell my girlfriend immediately after.)  
"Hey, would you mind not fucking my sister?" doesn't have quite the same ring to it. 
I'm not putting a spoon into anything that's had a dick in it 
An ex of mine used to regularly jolt awake from a deep sleep in the middle of the night, and instantly just start frantically kissing and groping me. Within a few seconds we woule be having insane sex.   That alone is bizzare enough, but what makes it weirder is that he had a lot of sexual issues that made him shy away from sex for long periods of time (anxiety caused by ED and premature ejaculation), but whenever he woke up like this he would be rock hard in seconds and just generally more confident and aggressive.   I'm pretty much always up for a triple x throwdown though so I always went with it even if I was dead asleep. I'd be so delirious and confused but never once complained.   Every successful sexual encounter gave him confidence, and would carry our sex life for a while until he'd start to have problems again. Maybe waking up like that and diving into it didn't allow his mind enough time to psych himself out.  
Well my boyfriend has been single for a few years before I came along, and she has been with the twin for about 4 years so there is an established dynamic of the three of them. She guilt trips him when he chooses to spend time with me instead of them, gets possessive over him and basically has chosen to dislike me from the get-go. My boyfriend sees it too. At least she has a little self-awareness as I guess she was crying about this to his sister a month ago saying "I'm not sure if I feel this way specifically about this girlfriend (me), or if I would feel this way with any girlfriend."   I was pretty hurt about this for a while but have just decided to let her deal with her own shit and limit my time around her.  
The short time i tried social dating sites the amount of times i got asked for nudes right out the gate was alarming. The last one i said just go look at porn like i get that its easy and hey a woman with boobs lets see if she'll show me, but why be an asshole if i wont? I said no and the guy went off on me. Seriously..go look at porn! Its everywhere and its free!  
The love tunnel vision. I don't get hot for anyone but the person I'm into. I've been told it's weird but meh it's the way I am. 
That winky face makes me think "forgiven" means "I fucked her next boyfriend". 
The more I think about it this is the only logical answer.  
My brother and her have a baby together, we call my wife 2nd mom. The baby has never confused them. I thought that was pretty cool 
I want to assure you that doing that is fucking absurd. 
Sounds like a bad comedy plot.  Both men are played by Seth Rogen and both women by Jessica Alba. 
It would also depend if any of the distinctive variations between the twins (probably very few) carried through to the kids. And there would be enough variation between the kids that two cousins could be more similar genetically than two siblings, depending on how it all combined.  
She was embarrassed but not mad, he's French and this was the first time our family had met him... that's what made it the most memorable :) 
My sister was, I think, 16 at the time, is the same height as my mom and, at the time, had basically the exact same hair as my mom. So it is understandable how the mistake was made, but my god was it funny. I had never seen my dad's face so red before, he was absolutely mortified. 
This would be a fun gag to put in a movie.  Every time someone says "I know" they then start to lower down and some vapor comes hissing up.  Shot cuts away after a second. 
In my experience, it's not the size so much as the sturdiness of the legs. Which is so say I have no idea. 
Bingo Bongo. Got it in one. She is shorter and has broader shoulders.  It's pretty funny when people don't know they're twins and think that she has been miraculously healed or injured. Well, the latter one isn't really funny but oh well.  
You like with the eyes, you love with the heart. It's typical for us men. You can find all women attractive, but unless she has a personality which clicks with yours, you won't experience love. 
My wife's identical twin cities breaking business building that was a permanent solution for me if it's all here in the morning. 
No way, sharing a dick with your sister is disgusting, which is why I immediately stopped talking to him when I found out.   That's why the popularity of twin threesomes baffle me.. outside of the porn industry, I'm not confident they happen often.  
Ehh, twins are weird. I dated one in high school and I was only ever alone with her twice. She *always* brought her sister (we did hang out with a group, to be fair) and they were inseparable.  
That's wild, if you and your wife have kids yours and theirs will be closer to siblings than cousins I'd imagine. 
I want you to know I agree with you, and I'm happy that these responses are fortifying my belief there are honest good people out there, I appreciate it more than you know. 
Imagine how that must have felt to realize that for a moment he was sexually attracted to his underage daughter, and physically acted on it. 
I'm on it! Now I just need a good story to go along with it. 
ever thought about dressing up as jesus for halloween? 
My wife's identical twin sister and her family in a while  
I am a child on one of these relationships, and yeah, we're pretty much siblings. Very close family, it's kind of nice 
Just want to add to the conversation, that is insanely fucked up of your former bfs. Cheating is wrong, but beyond that family is sacred. Trying to mess with that is depraved. 
 Sexomnia is a real sleep disorder.  I've had it for years.  
My wife's identical twin sister is hot but I'm actually pretty vanilla  
Biologically speaking you literally are siblings.  
My wife's identical twin sister was bob the sims for a foster husband who had a foster husband. 
Wouldn't the guys have to be twins as well (not just brothers) for this to be the case 
No only if the two brothers were also identical twins. Otherwise you're genetically between sibs and half sibs.  
Read that in Kevin's voice (leader of the jellyfish fan club) 
My wife's identical twin beds and the rest of your life.  
Read that in Kevin's voice (We Need to Talk About Kevin) 
Got a call on my phone from an unknown number - I was at my laptop, so I typed the number into Google and hit enter (this was years ago before Google started futzing phone # searches), and when it didn't load immediately, I went ahead and answered it.   Turned out to be a tech from work who needed help accessing one of my systems. I walked him through it, then turned back to my laptop.  The top hit on google for his phone# was a craigslist ad for gay erotic massage. And it wasn't a wrong number - it had a couple months of ad history and even though there were no face pics, his unusually hairy arms and a small tattoo were easy to identify.   I kept that story to myself for a few years, only relating it after I left the company. I told the story at a bar with some old co-workers, not knowing that this guy's wife was friends with one of them.   Anyway... my bad.  
Bit of a twist  I caught my exes ( there was two, two separate times) escorting on backpage.  Ive been single since the second time. I dont trust my judgment  
Two wives of clients knew about me because their husbands flat-out told them, under the sad misapprehension that once they were divorced, we'd be free to have an (unpaid) relationship. The first time, I was flattered, conflicted, and saddened. The second time, I was pissed off. You threw your happy homelife away because you just /hoped/ some college girl was going to ride off into the sunset with you?   Now I only do 2 hour maximum sessions, because I've found that clients who book overnights or full-day sessions are the most likely to lose their grasp on the reality of the situation. Somehow, sleeping next to someone is more intimate than fucking them, and it makes these men confused. 
At this strip club I worked at one of the dancers had a daddy that came in legit almost every day he actually was good looking and charming. His wife saw his car in the lot and pulled in and tore past the bouncers and ran into the VIP area. They were back there it came to seconds of them getting caught. She didn't get her tip that day so he tripled it the next time out of guilt.  
When I was pro-domming, I had a great client--one of my favorites. He was this older guy, worked in construction, who liked to be dressed up like a pretty girl and humiliated. This is an incredibly common fetish and easy money.  For his 60th birthday, he decided he wanted to try getting pegged. That wasn't something I'd do for just anyone, but we had good rapport and the idea delighted me so I went ahead and made him my bitch for the evening. He loved it, we had a great talk afterwards about how liberated it made him feel. How, as he got older, he wanted to try new things, and how he wished his wife could understand and be adventurous with him. This is not an unusual conversation.  What IS unusual is that the guy apparently told his wife. I got a nasty email telling me to stay the hell away from "her man." I never responded and never heard from him again. I hope they made it. 
Friend of mine is a male sex worker  & massage therapist who mostly sees other males.   It's not uncommon to have sessions with married and ::cough:: "straight" guys.   One lady found out about her husband seeing my friend (I don't know how) and came down to this place screaming and carrying on, banging on the door, claiming he enticed this guy into homosexuality, etc.   oooookay, lady.      The next day they found someone spray painted  FAGOT (their spelling not mine), SLUT and some bible verse about homosexuality on the front door of warehouse space.   The thing is, my friend didn't live there, just rented the out the space by the hour for these sessions.     
Not a girl, but about a year ago one of the guys I was seeing paid extra to film a meeting with his phone. Apparently he had never told his wife he was into guys, and he had definitely not told her he was banging one. About a week after our meet I got a text from his number saying it was his wife and to never contact him again. Never did learn if they worked it out or not but I'm guessing it didn't go well  
Had a super tall Jewish fellow who was a regular.  Super sweet guy;  he was he kind of guy who would bring me food or run errands for me..bring me soup and Gatorade when I was sick.. sometimes just see a movie.  Anywho, his wife called from his number and politely asked who I was.  I just said I worked for Marriott hotels and wanted to see if she would be interested in a free, all expense paid vacation package, which she immediately hung up (I'm not very creative).  I guess she either figured it out or googled my number.. I haven't heard from him in over a year.  It sucks, clients can sometimes turn into your best friends, regardless in the nature of the work. 
Well I was 16, and stupid on drugs so it didn't occur to me what I was doing was bad. but... the police caught us and while my dad came to pick me up from the hotel I passed by the SO and his kids yelling at him while hes in handcuffs. 
Nice try to get the usernames of all 'Escort girls of reddit'. 
Not me, but a friend had been having an affair with a married guy for 9ish month. He said he was leaving his wife, but always came up with an excuse not to do it. Then one day, my friend was staying at his house when the wife showed up early from a business trip. She walked in and pulled a gun, aiming at her husband.  This broke out into a huge fight/scramble where I guess the guy tried to tackle her. He failed to pull her down but managed to knock the gun out of her hands. So my friend ran and picked it up and turned to see them screaming and trying to tear each other apart.   When the woman saw she had the gun she turned and begged my friend to shoot her husband; saying he was a cheating bastard, etc. My friend just stood there (bare assed) holding it. She said she was tempted, but very quickly chose to walk out, grabbing her clothes on the way. She threw the gun in a dumpster outside their place and drove off, never seeing either of them again.  
Hi! Escort here!  I have definitely gotten a few calls/emails from SOs.  Some very angry, some eerily calm.  Once, a lady was very relieved that I was a pro, and it wasn't an emotional affair 
I worked as a masseuse for a bit. I was never caught per se but I had a good client who came in a few times and he even paid to hang out outside of the establishment. We were friendly and all of our relations were purely business related which he was fine with but one day I got an angry text from a girlfriend/wife/etc threatening to kick my ass. I noped right on out and blocked his number. Never heard from him again 
Happened to one of my close friends but in an ironic twist.   So she caught her fiance doing the dirty deed with an escort in their own room. Here's the ironic twist. The escort is my friend's best friend and my close friend is also an escort who decided to retire a little while before their marriage.  
Level 8 mage here.  Was paid to escort some Orc lady through a flooded settlement.  She hurt her ankle but it turned out she used to be a shaman  
My best friend is a sugar baby & a dominatrix. She had an issue with a client who's live in girlfriend found my friend's number in his phone. She called yelling, screaming, cursing, etc. My friend laughed it off, saying first of all I don't know who you are, second why are you mad at me, and third- I'm not the only gal.   Sad note-   A few months later the dude started bragging about how he was molesting the girlfriend's 14 year old daughter in Disneyland. Friend called the crazy GF and she did nothing. Friend called the police & CPS, but it turned into them interviewing her about her life choices vs a kid being abused.  
I always find it stupid that people yell at the third person if theyre a stranger rather than the spouse/bf/gf who actually did the cheating... 
How much silver was this guy's tongue made out of?  
Wow, that definitely turned out better than expected. One question though...what exactly does one do with their face while peeing on someone? I feel like I wouldn't know where to look or what expression to make. 
Well when you're sleeping next to someone who feels like they care about you more than your wife, it's kind of understandable. Never been married, never had an escort, but feeling alone when your with the person who is supposed to love you sucks.    Have thought about hiring an escort just to hang out with lol. I'm sad.  
asking for a friend, what's the average amount of tips do dancers usually get from one client? 
So when I went to the strip club for my friend's bachelor party, I got a dance upstairs. So in middle of my dance, a middle-aged overweight Hispanic lady runs into the room and starts getting crazy with her man and the dancer. I felt bad for the dancer, she was a stripper dancing at a strip club! That's her job!  It was funny tho. 
That's like marrying your friend when you guys are both single after 30 and made that pact back in college...  
She didn't know him at all apparently. That's so sad. 
I'm sure that was terrifying but the image of her running outside still wearing the strap-on is pretty hilarious. 
Unrelated to the story but did you ever get grief from the cops about the agency? 
I feel like that white powder thing is overblown, coke is way too expensive to waste by making a mess. 
Coke with a hooker in an expensive apartment?   Wolf of wall Street much?  
Wow. What a scumbag to take something from your daughter, especially her panties, to use for sex play while cheating on her mother. 
I have so many questions about "financial domination"... 
She helped the escort get clean, then had the self-respect to leave the relationship, and then gave you a second chance after you got therapy? Your SO *is* a saint. I'm glad it sounds like you really appreciate her now. 
Woah your SO is one amazing woman. Glad you're doing better bud. 
Did she forgive you?  If so then you need to forgive yourself dude.  Being wary of making the same mistake is natural, but guilt is the other side of the coin of pride and both of them stem from low self-esteem... Which is likely where your sexual addiction originated.  Let go of the got and finally forgive yourself dude.  Learn to love yourself as much as your SO does.  And get her help learning how to do that. 
You don't say what her reasoning was for the cosmetic surgery, but it sounds like it could have been for really unhealthy reasons.  This story just makes me really sad about all of it. ;_; 
You sure it was Mad Cow (Jacob-Creutzfeld)?   It usually manifests later in age, if it isn't sporadic. Also, I've never heard of blindness as a symptom.   However, if it was, Jacob-Creutzfeld can cause pretty severe personality changes. So, it may have been a result of the disease, not really his own doing.  
I forgot another one where I am surprised I wasn't caught. I used to be a paramedic to put myself through school and then grad school. I had been inactive for about two years at this point but I had a gentleman go into cardiac arrest. I went into medic mode-  called 911, got an AED (at a nice hotel), and worked on him. He carried a list of his medications in his wallet so that made things very easy when the EMS got there- load and go. Luckily we were both clothed when this happened. He touched base a few days later saying thank you.  My 'awe hell' moment was after the crisis; luckily nothing ever came of it.  
This is weirdly cute. I'm glad you were able to help them out. 
This story makes me want to high-five the three of you. 
What kind of newbie escort doesn't get the room number from the client?!? It's like Hooking 101: Introduction to Not Getting Kicked Out of Hotels. 
You offered to give oral to an angry wife who knew you came to blow her husband, and she considered it??? You must be an excellent salesman lol. 
"I did offer her some oral since I was already there."  Congratulations, you just gained my respect. 
So wait, did she catfish you or did he get caught? Also I don't know why she was pissed with you, her husband is the one that responded to your ad. 
I'm confused - she was the one responding to your post, from his account without him knowing, then she showed up to call you a home wrecker? Or he set up the whole thing, she found out and showed up instead? 
For a while I was expecting the ending to be that the wife ended up paying your friend for services too.    
so, sir, we have your underage daughter on drug charges here...oh and um prostitution. 
Well yeah you're not gonna hear from him if you block his number 
My best friend is gay and the amount of "straight" guys he has slept with is crazy to me. I also read Craigslist missed connections to pass the time and theres SO MANY ads for male looking for male, and one (or both) is married to a woman. blows my mind. 
The most interesting part of this story is how much he shares with his niece!  
Honestly I can't get myself to judge escorts for sleeping with married men. Married men are more than capable of making their own decisions. 
They're different now from how they were 10 years ago. You used to be able to search for patterns like xxxx-xxxx... (where x is a numbers) and it would return credit card info that hadn't been secured. Google shut down a lot of searches like that.  
These misrouted  texts are a godsend, my buddy found out that his wife was banging her boss because of such a text. She was allegedly in the boardroom in a conference she was at, she was texting him saying how boring these corporate stiffs are, and how she misses him and suddenly in the middle of that, a rather risque pic on snapchat saying "come on right up, the door is not locked".  There was no coming back from that. Thankfully for him (my country's divorce laws excessively favour women when it comes to custody), he sort of blackmailed her and said, equal custody, no alimony (they were making the same amount of money) and if she said no, he would tell her parents and friends the real reason for the divorce. As she was from a conservative family that was very well respected by her community, she acquiesced and they had a fair and amicable divorce.  
Its always easier to pretend that the third party lured your S.O. away from you in some kind of trap or against their will. Like your S.O was perfectly happy with you until this Jezebel came and cast their evil spell. Basically it's just denial. 
From psychological point of view it makes complete sense. You're letting someone be so close to you willingly when you are at your most vulnerable. 
Many escorts offer 'social time' at a severely reduced rate! You might look into that if you just want a person to chill with. Most of us loooove social time; it gives us a chance to relax and get to know you. 
That depends on what services your friend is offering. But t could vary from club to club and based off her attractiveness. It should be between $250 to $350 off the bat  
Had two friends who made that pact before he went into the army. She was openly a lesbian by the time he got back and a few years later he came out as gay. Good friendship though. 
That's crap. If he was never attracted, why did the idiot even date you? I hope you gave him the finger as you left. 
True, but even for those who are pretty open, there's some "feeling out" required. I've always been into assplay, and have been with a bunch of women who have enjoyed me lavishing attention on their backsides. But not until I met my current gf, who expressed an interest in my ass (which none of the previous girls ever did) that I even contemplated if I'd enjoy attention myself. Turns out I do. Even people who are kinky and trying to be honest sometimes need to see what others like in order to figure out what they like. 
im sure getting buttfucked by hookers is only a small part of who he was as a person. 
The older I get the more I realize you never truly know someone. Even the person you are closest to, you'll never understand them 100% 
Going out on a limb and saying that if escort agencies there were illegal there they'd have kept driving and written the bag off as a cost of doing business. 
You laugh but in her mind you can probably bet she felt like Sherlock Holmes for putting it all together. 
What's funny? She hid her phone in his car and used it as a tracker. Don't most people plant tracker devices in their SO's vehicle when they suspect them of cheating?  
A lot of expensive escorts live in fancy places. There's a couple of pricey hookers who live in my building.  
Ah yes, the ol' mother/daughter/hooker/dad in daughter's panties on a leash videos 
Exactly. Even if he wasn't cheating, doing something sexual in your child's underwear is seriously disturbing.  
On a purely practical level, his wife's panties may have been too big.   On every other level... ick 
Everyone focused on the girls panties not even taking the dogs feelings into consideration. 
Srsly, buy your own shit if that's what you're into 
You spelled "saint" wrong, FTFY.  Pretty sure my SO would de-ball me in this situation.  :) 
She did forgive me. Thanks for the advice. For clarity, i dont live day after day with guilt, but i crops up every now and then. Also, we have children and i missed a good chunk of their younger years because  i was so wrapped up in my addiction, i was there physically, but thats about it.  
If I was cheating, my wife would probably hit me a great deal. If I was cheating and had a heart attack, she would be most grateful if the lady in attendance kept me alive.  That way she can kill me later, on her own terms. 
I hope this is all real. It's a nice thought that there's a sex worker that is both a paramedic and went to grad school, who helps old inhibited people with their sexual hangups, and saves her over-stimulated clients from cardiac arrest.      
This! We talked about this many times, i guess she just forgot.   Normally we also call up to the room first, to ask if we can give out the room number.  In high end hotels most FD staff wouldn't have the balls to kick an escort out tho. What if you f-up and refuse access to the wife of your huge VIP thinking she is an escort. Chances are small but not worth the risk  
I wonder how that conversation went. Coming from "you're a homewrecker!" To "do you want me to lick your gash?" 
I want more details on this.  "You home wrecker!"  "Sorry.  Want me to go down on you?"  "..........."  "So any-"  "I'M THINKING!!!!" 
Oh jesus. So funny. Laughing away here and cant tell wife and kids why ... oh god 
People don't think super clearly when discovering emotional events like a partner cheating. Their instinct is to pin the blame on the person they haven't trusted for years and years. 
It's embarrassing to look at it, almost. "Straight guy looking for another hung straight guy to pound this tight quivering asshole"  Like I'm sorry to say it buddy but I don't think either of you are straight  
That's what happens when you raise men in a society and stigmatize "being gay" negatively. It astounds me anytime a man gets that coy look on his face and says "hey baby can we do some anal" and when you say "sure, let me get the strap on" suddenly anal is a gay thing we shouldn't do. Who knew. 
This fucking pisses me off because I get weird hangup calls from numbers all over the valley and I can't find any way to connect the details to figure out who could be doing that shit. 
She was such a bitch that she had to be blackmailed into not taking shit away from the person she cheated on? Man, some people are just trash. 
"I can't afford you"   "I'm not a hooker!"   "Oh. Then I *definitely* can't afford you."  (Jack Reacher) 
It's a little more than that.  The psychological loss from accepting that your spouse/SO is the root of the problem and the damage to your life that removing them would cause tends most people to shift their attention to the perceived "easy fix".  Is it easier to get rid of the girlfriend/mistress, or is it easier to split from the guy you have children and a mortgage with, while explaining to all of your friends and family what was going on?  They may eventually get to the point where they kick their partner to the curb, but it's not going to be their first instinct. 
I mean I've only been with one hooker so I don't know if this is the norm, but she let another hooker friend of hers know every time she stayed at my place.  Even someone who would hurt someone who is vulnerable would be stupid to do so since they'd be automatically caught.  Unless she starts fucking you for free, it's about the money.  Any guy who believes otherwise is stupid, although I do feel a bit sorry for them for being so absurdly naive.  It was a convenience/business thing for her.  She got off at 2AM so by the time we got done it was the middle of the night and she'd usually been drinking.  We got along well enough so we'd hang til we slept.  If neither of us were too hungover in the morning I'd pay for round 2.  Never once did I think this insanely hot 21 year old party girl was actually interesting in a relationship with a 28 year old introverted financial analyst. 
Well it's sort of strange. I have friends, very good friends. I think it's sort of fucked up the reason I want to do it. I like meeting new people and connecting, but I'm really afraid of speaking to people. So it would kind of be like, "hey, I paid you. Now you're obligated to speak with me."   I'd probably just end up getting upset in the end when I do become their friend and realize that I still paid them so maybe we aren't friends. It's really no different to me than the good ol high school trick of "hey, I don't know you. You wanna hang out and do some drugs?" And then saving for later the part where you figure out if they are your friend or if they just like drugs. Never did that because the thought of it worried me and felt super fake and atrocious.   I've still thought about just hanging out with an escort tho. Just knowing me, I'd probably just be a little bitch at the end of it lol. 
sorry, i don't know much about the etiquette, that sounds like a lot, are you referring to the VIP area? what about the common area they dance on and privates?  
So did they still get married??? I hear it's legal for gay people to get married now. 
I've dated someone that I wasn't attracted to because I was lonely 
I (girl) have had guy friends admit to me that they like some ass play but have been scared to death to ever say anything because of the outright vile comments they've had from women before.   a LOT of women (straight and even bisexual) are absolutely revolted by anything guy/guy and ostracize guys that even hint that they're interested in it. It's kind of sad. I also think that it contributes to the higher suicide and STD rate among bisexual men. They have to hide their secret because women aren't accepting of it. Female bisexuality is almost expected and celebrated, but guys are still called all kinds of name. :/   and no, since i don't date guys, i didn't partake, but i was accepting of it and listened and gave some ass play advice.  
I get really annoyed when people define someone's being based on their sexuality. For example they tell closeted people things like "you are hiding who you are!". How the fuck what I like in bed defines my whole personality?! It's a really small part of me and I don't think it concerns anyone except me and my SO. 
Agencies aren't strictly legal as it's legal to sell sex but it's not legal to run a brothel or be a pimp which running an agency is. 
It's the best possible tracker because it's entirely deniable.  "Honey!  I found your phone!"  .versus.  "What the hell is this thing stuck to the bottom of my car?"  
Haha, this happened to me unexpectedly. I was living next to this really young looking girl. Couldn't have been older than 19 or 20.  She was out a lot, but would always come home with another dude. I smoked at the time, so I always saw her coming home. At first I just thought she was living the life, sleeping around and having fun at parties.  Until I saw 2-3 guys pay at the door before even entering. Also, some of them were over 50. 
r/MotherDaugherHookerDadindaughterspantiesonaleashvideos 
"My leash!?!"  Poor fella probably had to sit there and watch the entire time terribly confused and saddened. 
Seriously that's the entire reason Motel 6 even exists.  
I wish I knew the whole story as to what happened etc. All I got to know was that he was alive...not the total breakdown of the story as to what he said. 
Ex paramedic, part time sex worker- I'm not getting into all my own issues here but I have my reasons for doing what I do. I have a day job in a career field that I love and find stimulating.  I said older, not old. This is a good outcome from many stories where there is no happy ending and I don't know the outcome. I would never let someone die to save my reputation. Interestingly enough, this was one of the few cases where I found out if someone made it. Mostly when you drop them off at the hospital, that's it. There are risks that come with my job and I accept that and I accept that I could get caught. I negate those risks as much as possible, but there is not telling. I have met quite a few of the higher end escorts in career fields that you wouldn't believe.  
He almost crossed the boundaries between reality and the plot of a porno 
I'm pretty certain there's a spam phone service out there that spoofs their number to be one in the same area code and exchange as you, hoping you'll pick up because it's a local number.   
Usually people who cheat have no qualms with taking things that don't belong to them. 
Well, of course it's about the money, but men could be convinced that it meant more than that  
It's probably not the best boundary-setting in the world, but I have several clients I consider friends. Not close friends, but there is a connection, and it is genuine regardless of money changing hands. One of my favorite clients is an introverted, socially awkward young man who just wants to talk to a woman in a safe, quiet, no-pressure environment. I'm trying to hook him up with one of my single friends who works in a similar field and has the same hobbies he enjoys. If that's not an indicator of trust and friendship, what is? 
At the ny favorite club it was 25 minimum for a 4 minute dance the house got ten but you could charge more if you wanted. Then for a fifteen minute VIP it was 150 for 15 minutes. The house kept 65 and then 250 for a half hour and so one with their different levels of rooms from booths to actual private rooms with a door and furniture.  
My ex girlfriend felt the same way apparently. Except that she decided to tell me that. Didn't even sugar-coat it a bit. That shit was tough to hear 4 months in the relationship. 
it's been an hour, you should take a break and drink some water.  
You're getting caught up in yourself. To other people, their sexuality might be a big part of who they are. Maybe because they're closeted, they can't share their interests and friends with their family. 
The ones in my building are super polite, they share a place, I've heard them discussing camming before too.  It's amazing what you see/hear as a smoker. 
That's a very interesting plot line. I personally don't have the energy to get that involved with anyone but I'll watch the movie when I have a chance. I have never even heard of it.  
And now I have release, thanks. Also, they're both fucked up, glad you got away from that one. 
Like a business colleague. They can be your friend And your customer. If you're a bodyguard, it's *critical* that they're your friend because they'll take a bullet for you. Paying them money to be around doesn't seem so bad if you look at it as supporting your friend's lifestyle. 
Do people really pay that much just for dances, or do other activities take place?  I know I'm a cheap bastard (don't like strip clubs in general, either) but that seems like a lot of money for what basically amounts to a cock tease. 
Imo it's better that way. She didn't cheat on you, and didn't try to make it work when she realize it wouldn't work. It's tough yes, but in the long run it's much better for both of you. 
Oh, for sure. She and I shared a cigarette every now and again. We just talked about life though. Nothing about work or anything. There's no real way to bring up, "Are you an escort or no?" in a regular conversation. 
Feynmann did famously work at a strip club (in the sense that he'd go sit at a table there and do physics). 
Yes they do. I used to charge $100 for me to even take off my clothes and be fully nude in the VIP even though we were an all nude club. I was never naked on stage. 
Wow. What early signs did you notice if you don't mind me asking? 
As I am a social sledgehammer, I would totally bring it up and ask how much bank she's making. 
Reminds me of this dancer I knew, who claimed she wasn't a stripper because 'strippers start with their clothes *on*'   Fun times. 
I'll just chalk this one up to things I'm glad I've never felt the want to pay for. Holy hell. You could go get a massage for a dollar a minute. Hell, depending on the country you could spend literal days with beautiful women fulfilling your every desire for that much! Lol.   But I guess the old saying holds true, "An ass for every seat!" 
This is what I don't get about strip clubs. Alone or with friends. You pay big bucks to spend a few hours with some hot(?) girls you can't touch only to walk out with a hard on, blue balls, and a desperate need to fap. I can do that at home for the cost of an internet connection, of for a few real dollars have a cam girl take commands for less than an 1/8th the cost. 
LPT: If in vegas, call the club - they will send a limo for your and your friends, and sometimes offer a free bottle.  
When you go weeks without having sex, that's a pretty good indication. Then when you do have sex, it feels forced, like one or both of you perceive it more as a chore than something you're doing for enjoyment. One or both of you are not sexually excited enough - man has a hard time keeping an erection, woman is dry as a fucking bone and you have to spend ages trying to get their motor going. Typically one or both partners are getting their "needs" met elsewhere during these times - porn, masturbation, or even cheating.  Source: After 11 years of marriage my wife and I hit an all time record last month! We had sex 3 whole times. 
Ask her how you can enter the business, beg her to introduce you to her contacts. 
Escorts/private party strippers are significantly cheaper than going to a strip club 
You can definitely touch if given consent. Sometimes maybe even more. But the chance of a 'finish' are fairly slim. If that's your bag, find a massage parlor that caters to that sort of thing, or find a hooker. 
No need to call a club. If you're on the strip, throw a rock. It will hit someone who will give you a free limo to a strip club.  Never heard of a free bottle of booze though. That part's definitely fishy. Maybe if you have 10-12 guys who are all going, they'll give you a bottle of rot-gut vodka. Even then ... 
Gangs murdering people who flash their headlights as part of a 'gang initiation' 
My mom still insists that killer bees are a major concern  
Rainbow parties. There was a big hubbub in the news a few years back about teens having get togethers where the girls would wear different colored lipstick and go around blowing all the guys until their wangs were rainbow colored. There is not a single confirmed case of this ever happening even once. 
Dangerous trends that bored and paranoid stay at home moms spread around like syringes in ball pits. Maybe it's happened once, but that's not something worth spreading around the internet like as if some international super villain syndicate is banding together to drop syringes into all of the ball pits around the country. 
I used to work at a computer tech support firm. Held the job full time for 3 years, back to back calls...  My confession...    Our customers weren't nearly as technically illiterate/ rude as me and my colleagues made them out to be. Actually, 99% of our customers were kind and just wanted help.   I guess 'exaggerated stories of the call center' just made for good smoke break conversation; its like a right of passage in the phone support world.  We sometimes received a rude customer, but chances were that they had just been worn down from an earlier call with an inexperienced employee. Rarely did we get the entitled prick, and when we did, he/she was always pretty easily taken care of. 
I hear more people complain about other people saying "new year new me", than I've ever heard someone say "new year new me."  
A cashier giving someone a weird look because of an item they bought or commenting on items they're buying together.  Never worked as a cashier but I'm pretty sure they don't care what you buy and 'Hi how are you, find everything you were looking for?' is code for 'hurry and pay for your shit then get out' 
The "war" on Christmas. Pretty much everyone loves Christmas and celebrates it in North America, or at the very least, tolerate it.  
Claiming that the POTUS will hijack democracy and stay president when their 2nd term is over.  Some claimed that dubya would do this. Similar claims about Obama. If Trump manages a 2nd term, most likely someone will claim the same about him. 
All I'm saying is that when I stopped going on subreddits and watching videos talking about social justice warriors, after a month I completely forgot about them. I'm sure once in a blue moon you'll run into one without looking for them, but otherwise they barely exist to me. 
People getting Taco Bell shits. Smh y'all just got weak stomachs... 
Hooking up with someone and getting a card that says "Welcome to the world of AIDS". I'm pretty sure these stories were presented by pastors at church to promote abstinence. I mean, if you have HIV or AIDS and don't disclose it to a sexual partner I'm pretty sure that's a felony.  
I've read stories about people (women) yelling at men for holding the door open for them.  I don't know if that's *never* happened, but where I am I'm willing to bet it's never happened.  I'm a woman, and I hold doors open for everyone. Most people I know do. It's common courtesy.  
Not being allowed to say "Merry Christmas" anymore. So often this is used as an anti-pc argument and though I'm sure it has happened in a couple of customer service environments, it's way overblown.   
Your gay marriage corrupting my kids and turning them into sexual deviants who are okay with marrying a horse and other terrible, terrible stuff.    
Its like 10,000 spoons when all you need is a knife.   NEVER HAS ONE PERSON ACCUMULATED THAT MANY SPOONS. 
I'm always wondering why the people most afraid of terrorism are the ones who live way out where the buses don't go and almost certainly don't regularly spend time with people who don't look an awful lot like themselves. 
The mythical welfare queen in front of them in line at the grocery store buying $700 in steak with food stamps before getting in their brand new Escalade.  Like, welfare fraud exists but it is so statistically small/infrequent that it's extremely unlike that people see it anywhere near as much as they claim to.  
people requesting trigger warnings for dumbass shit. all the trigger/content warning requests i see are usually pretty reasonable, or contained to actual "safe spaces" where everyone is on the same page with that kinda shit anyway. Every trigger warning request for something stupid ive seen has been by obvious trolls 
This is something my local community deals with, but the presence of Muslims and implementing Sharia law in America.   I've seen countless blogs claiming that my city lives under Sharia now. Though not one can cite an actual law (they're "secret laws.") No one can point out a court case upholding such a thing ("yet..." they say.) No evidence of community leaders pushing for Islamic domination ("the Quran tells Muslims to lie...") A couple even cited an instance where a local Christian church was cited for a civil property infraction... which the church admitted to, corrected the problem, done; but it was evidence of "a war on Christianity." 
I have a friend that always goes bananas about these things. This year I actually stopped her from talking about it and explained that NO ONE is giving away free drugs. Drug are expensive, why would they do that, especially randomly, where there's not guarantee of a return customer?  She was like "oooohhhh".  
Texas Agriculturist here... African killer bees are a major concern in the south... their hives are in the ground, and they looks almost identical to your average honey bee. In some cases lawn mowers can run them over, or vehicles... next thing you know you're in the hospital seizing in anaphylactic shock. Seen it first hand many a time.  
Yeah, no one who has drugs is gonna be giving them out for free as Halloween candy. That shit's expensive. 
I love to make candy, and it sucks I can't do it for halloween because a bunch of soccer moms are nervous baylenn is going to get high from my homemade lollipops 
Whenever I see this I'm like... what kind of dealer is going to give away hundreds of dollars in product to a demographic that can't even buy the product? I don't understand... 
I heard about this too and have never once actually encountered this. Also if your blowjob skills are so weak you can see the other girls lipsticks then what are you even doing. And also gross. This feels like one of those dateline tonight episodes our  moms all watched before demanding to know if we were involved when we got home from school.  
It was also put into a YA book by Jodi Picoult, who claims she interviewed real live teens to get their party scene down... umm okay.  
oh yeah lmao  Which is odd because if you're blowing someone correctly there won't be a ring of your lipstick left 
Wasn't that in an episode of Law And Order: SVU once? 
It happened once to me when I was 15 but I just told the other kid "no thanks, I don't smoke weed" and he was like "all right." 
What I was told would happen:   5th grader: "You should do heroin, everyone's doing it, you're not cool if you don't do heroin"  What actually happened:  My college friend when I was a senior in highschool: "Hey you want a drink? It's cool if you don't, you don't have to drink"  Me: "Fucking finally, I would love a drink" 
I like drugs. I'm in my thirties now, and first started smoking weed when I was 14, moving onto other substances at 15 or 16. I've bought drugs hundreds of times, and have been offered drugs at least as many times.     Never, in 20 years of buying and being offered drugs, has anyone ever pressured or harassed me after I said "no thanks". It just doesn't happen. 
 Then there's the time I had to send a technician 3 hours out of his way, in a snow storm in Canada, and when he arrived, the problem was that the machine was unplugged.  I'm not making that up.  
Where did you work I had people screaming at me constantly. 
Now I've actually done this. On purpose, mind you, but those bastards are slippery. 
Now that I think of it, it feels like every kids show back then had some quicksand scene in it  
You might want to take I-90. I-95 has a little quicksand in the middle.  
Academics do this a LOT too... tenured and tenure-track professors estimate that they put in like 60 hour weeks regularly, but because they set their own research and writing schedules, it just FEELS like a lot more than an 8-5 job because you did 2 hours on a Saturday afternoon or worked in the evening instead of the morning one day, etc. I don't think a lot of people realize that a 60 hour work week over 5 days is working from 8 a.m. to 8 p.m. every single day, over and over again. 
I don't know, I've thrown my controller at my brother countless times...  Doesn't cause mass shootings, does cause fights 
Planet Fitness is the biggest gym bully of them all.  
I have a friend with a little girl and he HATES taking places for this reason which sucks, honestly.   Well, that and the fact that he's a big, muscular black guy and his little girl came out as white and fair as her mama. Luckily, she looks just like him but they do turn heads.  
As a mom with two daughters who I know have been to the men's room many times (dad taking them out for errands, whatever) I think in some odd way it's a good thing---it takes away the stigma and shows it's just a body part.  If we were all more open and honest about the human body and sexuality (when age appropriate) I think there may be a lot less teenage pregnancy etc.  Again, this is just my opinion. 
Every few months there's an ask reddit post going "what items would you combine to freak out a cashier?" and the comments are always the most try-hard nonsense. No one who works in a place that sells everything under the blue sky is gonna go "ohshit he's a rapist!" because you bought a knife, rope, and lube, or that you're gonna fuck a gerkin because you bought condoms to go with it. Because generally speaking people don't use the shit they buy *at the same time*. Why on earth would you think the cashier would think anything beyond "gerkins to eat, lube and condoms for the bedroom, oh god he's looking at me like a creep, and he smells, fuck, just avoid his eyes...." Like do you look at a guy buying a cartful of groceries, sweets, and toilet paper and assume he's gonna turn all that into some weird fiber-filled stew?    And yes, I *am* fun at parties, fuck you very much. 
I've always believed this until a cashier had a 10 minute conversation with me about a certain item I was buying. I'd orginally gone to self checkout because I didn't want human interaction but she insisted I come to her line and asked me all sorts of personal questions. Idk maybe she was bored. It was 10 at night. I didn't want to be rude so I gave some vague answers to her questions but yeah. I don't expect it to happen again but apparently it does.  
I'm a cashier. We just say "Hi, how are you? Have you found everything you need today? Is there anything else I can help you with?" while absentmindedly scanning whatever items you check out. We don't really rush customers out the door, and will genuinely offer help, but we won't pay enough attention to your items to care what you bought. 
Some Jewish people I know like to get Christmas trees and jokingly call them 'Hanukkah bushes'. Everyone's pretty chill with Christmas. 
Yeah all my non-Christian friends love Christmas  In the words of one of my Muslim friends: "Three days off work, a ton of food, and presents - why would I hate that?" 
Yeah, you say that but working retail in an area that is almost half and half Christians and Jewish people get offended. The Christians get offended by "happy holidays" and the Jewish people get offended by "merry christmas" (including my coworker who is Jewish)   So last holiday season I've just stopped saying it. If a customer says it to me I'll say it back, but I dont want to deal with it.  People who say it doesnt happen have never worked retail where people are inconvenienced by the dumbest bullshit.  
I remember my good friend's dad believed this whole-heartedly about Obama. He once said, "That sumbitch came out and said on live tv that he wouldn't give up his power after his second term!" When I asked him to show me where Obama said it he just acted like it was erased from the internet to prevent an assassination attempt. 
Taco Bell was my absolute favorite fast food place as a kid and I never had a problem. As an adult I hardly ever go there, maybe like once every couple years, but I still have never gotten sick from it.  It's probably from overeating. That'll give you the loose poops from *any* restaurant food. 
I think it's just people who don't eat beans often. Rice and beans is a staple in my diet since I'm Hispanic, so I've never noticed the issue of "Mexican food blowing up my intestines." 
I had one incident, where several people including me(f) entered a hall. Some guy held the door open and a man who was walking in front of me thanked him kindly. "Hodor" said "I'm not holding it for you, I'm holding it for HER!" while pointing at me. I deliberately ignored him for that.  There are people who even make holding a door open seem a dick move. 
I actually for the first time ever experienced annoyance with a guy holding the door for me. We were doing a shift together which involved a lot of doors and walking. Now, he's a sweet guy. But he insisted on opening every single door for me and refused to go if I opened a door for him. After six hours it got old real fast. Still though, I didn't say anything, let alone yell at him  
A friend of mine went to Europe recently (Germany specifically) and said that no one holds doors for anyone there. He did it for someone and it was a really awkward interaction with the person not knowing what he was doing.    He also said people don't do *any* kind of small talk there. Sounds like my kind of place! We're both from Tennessee so both of those things are common courtesy here. 
I've been told-off once for holding open a door. It was in art college though, so there was probably some combination of being edgy / social experiment / drugs / random penguin of doom / sleep deprivation at play there.   That was the only time though.  
Can confirm. Briefly saw a gay couple once, married a horse that same day. 
My cousin lives waaay out in the sticks. I mean, they have a use for the phrase "the main dirt road" because they live on a dirt road that is off of another dirt road. It makes the front page of their weekly newspaper when the grocery store has a new manager. Every second or third post on facebook (by some miracle they have decent internet service) is some macho bullshit about being ready for ISIS. A lot of stuff about Muslims too, even though I'd be a little surprised if any Muslims lived within 20 miles of him, or if he'd ever met one. 
And when you point that out you inevitably get a response such as. "But the National guard has a facility just outside of town, I have friends who work there!" Yes I'm sure the terrorist's first target is your husband's friend's sister's reserve unit.  
Lol very true.  I know someone who has a gun-filled safe, an underground bunker, cases upon cases of ammunition, and practically a life-time supply of canned goods and bottled water.   They live in the middle of Missouri. The nearest town is over 10 miles away from their plot of land. The nearest city is over an hour away.   They said they are ready when the terrorists come over.  I told them that they were crazy. They are horrified that my neighbor wears a hijab and are worried she is going to break into my home and blow herself up.  I told them that if she ate Taco Bell and needed to blow up, she was welcome in my bathroom.  They think I am naive. I think they play the stereotype game a little too hard.  
It turns out that people who spend more time interacting with minority groups are on average less afraid of those groups. Who knew? 
The closest I've ever gotten to it is seeing someone I knew who LOOKED like a welfare queen...she was on WIC, so food stamps for people with infants, and had a cell phone, (knockoff) designer purse, nails done, and obviously dyed hair. But her parents still paid for her cell phone (she was married at this point), the bag was less than $20, and she did her own hair and nails (she worked at a salon). But anyone who just glanced at her likely would have thought that she was gaming the system.  
Yes. The only place I've ever seen lots of trigger warnings is shen it's a site/board forbpeople with mental illnesses or a history or severe trauma. And yeah...people with PTSD or anorexia or who cut need trigger warnings 
A-ok to have a warning if a lone pair of titties has wandered on screen but good golly god if you try to suggest that maybe some people should know if there's a graphic rape scene in a film.. 
A muslim family lives down the street from me. I've only talked to the husband briefly, but the only reason I know they're muslim is because my neighbors told me to watch out.  The other day, I saw the father outside, mowing his lawn in cutoffs. It was terrifying.  
I once had someone claim that England is under Sharia Law. As someone who lives in England, I think I would be aware of this.  
My mother won't let this go. Everytime I try to argue that Muslims are just normal people trying to live their lives and practice their religion in peace in America she says:  "But a group of Muslims are trying to implement Sharia Law! In ~~Minnesota~~ Michigan! And by group I mean 50 people! And by trying I mean that it failed and they lost in court!"  It's embarrassing.  
Well, i have never heard someone complaining about that. 
Same thing where I'm from. It also means turn your brights off you dick. 
I'm convinced that this myth was started by cops to stop people from notifying other motorists of the officers presence to increase the effectiveness of speed traps.  
I knew some rich guy who would give out nugs to some of the older kids on Halloween. But that's a little different. 
The dumbest urban legend of all time.   Let's say it was true. "Okay kid, I'm going to put something in your treat bag. But turn your head and don't look at it. In fact, don't look in your bag until you've been to a few other houses, so it can't be pinned on me." It's the perfect crime. 
Lol. I guess no one really thought of the profits being lost just to poison random 6 year olds. 
I want to say this was talked about on Orpah's show back in the 90s  maybe.  I seem to recall hearing about this in high school. 
I remember the day my mom pulled me aside after dinner one night, and in an extremely serious voice said, "I hear some kids are saying they're into this now, and I really want to hear it from you. Please tell me you aren't pimping."  My mom thought that as a 13 yr old white kid, I had a stable of bitches out turning tricks so I could buy fly ass feathers and canes for my pimp outfit.  Bitch, I've got a Super Nintendo. Final Fantasy 3 ain't gonna play itself.  Besides, everybody knows pimpin' ain't easy. 
Flashback, we actually did that shit. I have no idea what the exact stuff was, but paracetamol, ritalin and other stuff, in a big bowl, grinded and then sniffed. We were really stupid kids, well, probably still are, because brain damage.  One dude danced alone for 4 hours, another sat at the table with the bowl and just kept on grinding, I remember looking at a friend of mine and one of his pupils was huge, while the other was pretty normal. 3/10 wouldn't do again. 
To be honest, if I were interviewed for a book, I'd also make my party life sound a lot more interesting than it actually is (drinking a bit and making sure all of my friends who drank a lot/too much get home all right).  If anyone is up to show me how to get a rainbow coloured dick, I'd be down. 
So you want me to round up teenage girls to suck my dick?  
Maybe the real story was about how teenage girls suck at blowing people? 
Most of the time when someone says "I don't drink" the rest of us are just like "good on you man, that's probably the right choice, please drive me home later while I regret everything I've ever done." 
Probably the most realistic drug ad I've ever seen was one where a teen shows up to a friend's house where they're hitting a joint, and offer him a hit. The teens inner monologue starts going nuts about "wait, if I say no they'll hate me! I'll never fit in! They won't think I'm cool! My life is over!!" ...eventually the kid says "uh, no thanks" and the smoking teens say "cool, bro" and they all proceed to chill together.  I think it didn't air long because it was unpopular with the current drug narrative. I'll have to see if I can find it, I think I remember it aired back in the late 90s or early 2000s. 
Can confirm. Made friends (Aka, listened to his ridiculous week-end antics every Monday in Theater tech class) with one of the "rebels" in the school. He eventually confided in me that he really appreciated how I never seemed to judge him for everything he told me about his drug use and weekend activities. He then told me that if I ever wanted to try any drug he'd be happy to take me out with his friends one weekend and get me anything I was curious about and make sure I was safe about it.   I politely declined, but coming from him the offer was actually kinda touching considering I was a total nerd who had no business hanging with that kind of crowd.  
Because, honestly, everyone offers their drugs out of courtesy, a social imperative to share, but is relieved that they can keep more for themselves in the end. Except for hard drugs. I don't imagine many people offer to share their heroin very often.  
Are you really an "overprotective mommy brigade" if you object to syringes in a kids' ball pit though? 
not as slippery as the ones that created the stereotype, that race is extinct  
They do and I was TERRIFIED of quicksand as a kid. We went to some amusement park and there was a story walk through that had a quicksand scene and I just lost it and had to be taken home early. Adult me is very grateful that it isn't an actual thing that happens everywhere. 
I've been in more fights because of Monopoly than GTA.   Although, in fairness, Mario Party has caused quite a few as well... 
is the lunk alarm actually a thing? It just seems too stupid to be true. 
Customers in line with me comment on my items a lot, way more than cashiers. At least two or three times in the past couple years I've had ribs on the "belt" and wound up talkin' BBQ with total strangers.  Could be they were trying to score an invite... 
You say that but i very clearly remember 2 ladies who came in and bought 1 cucumber, strawberries, whipped cream and lube. My mind instantly thought "well they're going to have a fun afternoon".  
My first time buying condoms I was really awkward about it, too. Before you grow up and realize no one gives a fuck if you're having sex or not, it seems like a much more daunting task than it really is 
I bought beer and condoms at target when I was about 24. The lady working the counter carded me and then said "why are you buying this? you're so young"   I like beer I guess. When she got to the condoms and lube she was visibly uncomfortable and out of sorts. She kind of looked around in a panic then shoved the items in a bag as fast as she could. My girlfriend at the time really enjoyed it when I told her, and we used all three of the items I bought that night! 
Plot twist: neither she nor anybody she knows has a cat. 
Pretty much every Jewish person I know loves Christmas more than the Christians I know. Dunno why, but Jews love them some Christmas.  
Have you talked to him since then? A bunch of people who were predicting that have pivoted over to the Deep State idea, the one where Obama didn't *really* step down, and is controlling everything from the shadows. 
I wonder how much money that person has collected through the donate button. 
There was a really tall like maybe 6'5 super generic neckbeard type in my school and on the first day of class, he held the door open for the 3 girls infront of me, while us 4 where talking (3 girls+me) but he held it awkwardly diagonally so you had to walk under his arm then he just shoved infront of me and didn't let me through while literally saying, "And they say chivalry is dead".   I thought the neckbeard stereotype was just some stupid internet cringe shit, but man that was actually hilariously sad. 
I recently got to work where the lobby area in front of the elevators was jam packed and all dudes. We're waiting, the elevator finally shows, there's definitely not enough room for all of us.  Captain do-good at the front of the line parts the crowd like the red seas and *insists* that me and another woman that had come up behind me go first. Men who had been waiting longer all have to give up their spot in line and mash up against each other to make room because he will not take no for the answer and none of them want to come off as an asshole for refusing.   I definitely considered telling that guy off. No win situation. If I kept refusing, I would have been a bitch. Cutting all those men off was also a bitch move.  
Oh god. You can't buy a pack of cigarettes in Tennessee without having 4 or 5 quick, pleasant conversations. 
Their threat model is way outta whack. Ask'em if they've got their iodine stocked up.  
This is probably the case more often than not. I qualify for a few low-income programs and have been on food stamps. Where do my name brand clothes come from? Goodwill. I take the bus to wealthy neighborhoods and buy their castoffs for under $5 a piece. Lasts me longer than whatever you could find at the dollar store. 
'What a bunch of snowflakes!'  Says some guy who gets enraged when no one told him two guys kiss in a movie he's watching.  
I listen to a radio show where one of the guys doesn't understand lawn care.  It's truly terrifying.  He thinks mowing his front lawn once every 3 weeks in Texas is ok, and he wants to do the back less often.  He's a Muslim.  Although, I think the real problem here is that he's a recent transplant from NYC.  But, who can really say? 
If you are in Michigan it might have been my dad lol 
Well, you see, they just want you to think you're still living under regular law, but *secretly*, the Shakira law has taken over!  
this is pretty much my life story.   I spent weeks constantly feeling my pulse after a 20/20 story about some guy whose heart suddenly failed.  
No, they'd have uglier names. I remember some romance novel my friend had where the female lead was named "Durvla". That's not a name, that's the sound I make when I attempt to pronounce "uvula" while drunk. 
As if you wouldn't see the cut in the apple skin. Seriously, how could you cover that up? And how do you get the razor far enough in that it doesn't make a huge dent in the apple?  
It was Oprah. It's a common example for media panic spirals: nonexistent or statistically rare to the point of improbable events are reported, which creates awareness and the sense of greater presence, followed by attempted copycatting and confirmation bias. 
When I was 15 me and my best friend raided the medicine cabinet before we went out and had a choice between Rohypnol and Adderall. Being stupid and not knowing the difference between the two (this is back in the day before everyone and their dog was prescribed to adderall) we picked the Rohypnol and thus roofied ourselves. I think I slept for two days afterwards and my friend had to go to a N'SYNC concert the next day wih her family feeling like death. 
I'm suddenly imagining that 90% of the teens she interviewed had never been to that kind of "party" and were exaggerating or making shit up so no one knew how uneventful their lives really were.   "Oh, yeah, I go to parties. Lots of them, like all the time. ...Uh, well, usually I drink like, 6 beers and then 10 vodka shots or so... And then I have loads of sex, like, with tons of hot girls. ...Rainbow parties? Oh, uh, yeah, of course, all the cool kids do..." 
Doesn't have to be teenaged girls. Middle aged guys can wear lipstick too, you know.  
"Does your daughter absolutely *blow* at blowing? Find out tonight at 11." 
I quit smoking about a year and a half ago. Everyone tells me they are proud of me and to keep it up while they smoke in front of me lol. 
It is. It's sweet that he wanted to make sure you were safe. 
You'd be surprised. At a train station one night I was offered a hit by a junkie I'd never met before. I politely declined.     But I have had friends who were addicted to heroin. They were always very generous with other heroin users. None of them would ever have offered any to someone who didn't already partake.    I even found crack dealers in not-so-great parts of the city to be very courteous when I declined their offers. Although I didn't always decline in my younger days.  
Sounds like those over protective parents that are against school shootings. Like stop being a helicopter parent and let kids be kids for once.  
I read it as taking the needles off, discarding the rest of the syringe and scattering the needles in the ballpit. 
I think there was study saying that it was frustrating games that caused violence rather than violent games... Can confirm i get more angry and violent when playing frustrating games. 
I do a lot of meal prep so I usually wait for a sale and then I'll go buy like 20lbs of ground beef or 10lbs of cheese or two or three pork shoulders, etc. and I swear someone in line comments on it every time. 
I'll give you that, but strawberries and whipped cream on their own would mean a nice time.  
I was just like "if anybody judges me for being responsible, they can go to hell."  
*Cards someone over 21 for alcohol*  *Wonders why they're buying it*  She's a lost cause already.  I'm sure your purchase wasn't the only one she had commentary for that day... 
When I worked as a cashier, I had multiple people tell me to cheer up, or go and complain about me not being more chippy to my manager, and my manager would come over and bitch me out for not being all tits out for 8 hours straight of the most monotonous, horse shit job I have ever had.   Honestly, if you feel the need to tell your cashier to cheer up you should go fuck yourself. Just fuck off. I'm sorry I didn't ask you how your day was so you could give me a fake smile and say good and then we could never talk again.  
A cashier, who in hindsight was definitely into me, asked me what my everything bagels tasted like.  All I could stutter out was "Uhh... everything." 
Have they seen the pictures of Obama before and after he left office? Dude looks like he's got the weight of the world off his shoulders. If running the executive was hard from the front you'd think it would be even more stressful from the shadows. 
Woah there.... For many people it actually is worse than mental retardation. Autism is a spectrum, and it can get really really bad. My wife worked with sisters that both had autism, and the sister that *also* had mental retardation was actually a higher functioning individual than the one that was solely autistic, as she was only able to parrot responses for communication, nothing more.   A lot of people now a days hear autism and just think Asperger's Syndrome, which is about as mild as autism gets. 
 Oh wow. I would have been so confused. How did you react? 
The best strategy for a nuclear war is to try to be close enough to the blast that you're vaporized because the living will envy the dead. 
Tell your dad to wear a thaub next time he mows. He's distracting the neighbors with those glorious legs. 
Pretty sure it's supposed to be a candy apple. You wouldn't see it because it's dipped in caramel or something. 
Realistic goals. I like it. Good Goals should be "SMART"   Specific, Measurable, Acheivable, Realistic and Time Limited  I think you're doing a good job of this. Keep up the good work and positivity 
Cause if you cant find any you can get help from the friends you share with. Paying it forward so to say. I mean that for almost anything drugs, money, places to stay whatever. 
the only thing that protects a good kid with a gun from a bad kid with a gun is a teacher with a gun.   or something like that 
I think she bought a bunch of syringes, dismantled them, threw away all the pieces in separate trash cans, and then threw the packaging into a ball pit.  
Yeah I never understood the need for the fake interaction, 99% of people you can tell right away if they're up to chat or not, I've been told to smile more, and I've been told not to look so happy, so it's hard to please anyone, the task is absolutely mind numbing, and the fact that they don't let you sit down is just icing on the cake  
I have a friend with autism that I legit forgot had autism until just now.  
At the risk of downvotes, I am scared of having an autistic child.  My younger brother and my girlfriend's younger brother both have autism, and I'm terrified that my child could end up on the same level of the spectrum. It's already hard on a day by day basis, but seeing the toll it's taken on my mom, his primary caretaker, the one who is forced to take most of the physical assaults, is too much for me to handle.  Of course, this doesn't apply to autism in general. As you said, many go out and get jobs and live the same life as others do. It's just the violent fits, the physical assaults that mentally stresses me out on a daily basis. 
My dog ate a bottle of my friends ritalin once. She was throwing her bone down the stairs, chasing it, and than bringing it back to the top and throwing it again all night. She's still kickin' at 16 years old, so it must not have done too much long term damage. The cat getting drunk was funnier to watch, though. Don't leave White Russians unattended in houses with cats who like milk, folks.  
Sounds like how a rookie undercover cop would ask it.   "Pardon me, but do you consume the marijuana?"  
Bananas don't actually grow on trees! They grow on a plant that is more closely related to herbs, because the banana plant doesn't have woody fibers. 
"...so I want you to know, they're organized!"   OMG hahaha that made my day  
My 5th graders are taught in their drug awareness classes that "marijuana" is (and I quote) "Mexican street slang". I've never actually looked it up, since I don't teach those classes.  
The roots of the banana plant can be hundreds of years old, making it one of the longest lived cultivated plants in the world! 
Yep! The banana, which is the fruit of the plant, has the three layers typically used to classify berries: endocarp, mesocarp, and exocarp! That makes the banana a berry! 
Wait, what do tiny buses have to do with anything? Lol 
I would absolutely subscribe to banana facts.  P.S. are you a bananaologist or something? 
I thought they were herbs? Any idea where that came from?  Also, subscribe. 
There was a children's clothing store in my home town called "Dumpster Baby". They must have thought they were being clever. They closed down after a month and reopened with a new name. 
There was a Chuck E Cheese type place in Lima, OH called the Squirty Worm. 
Local law firm is "Allen, Allen, Allen, & Allen"  Gets a little redundant. 
I once drove through a rough town in England and there were two newsagents next to each other. The original one was called The Shop. The one next door that was built later is called "The other shop" 
"Vic's Chainsaw Repair and Video Rental". Not dumb. Just a weird combination of business.  
I've once drove past a van on the highway in the Netherlands that said "Jens Beenhakker - Rolstoelverkoop". That loosely translates to "John Legchopper - Wheelchair vendor". I nearly caused an accident laughing about it. 
A restaurant called Jerk King.  I laugh every time I pass by it 
In my hometown there's a driving school called "Rape". Rape is a quite common last name in that area and they just called their school after their name. 
There's a gym down the road called Gym'll Fix It.   It's a play on a British TV show called Jim'll Fix It, where celebrity host Jimmy Saville made kid's wishes come true. Unfortunately, shortly after his death a few years ago he was outed as a hugely prolific paedophile, who'd abused hundreds of children over the decades. The name of the gym would be quite funny if it now didn't have all sorts of nasty connotations associated with it.  
There's a design company here that's called "Unicum." There's also a company called "Pussi" that makes cat food. Their slogan is "As good as it looks."  
Kum n Go. Pretty common gas station in Iowa. They sell hats. 
Bich N'ga.  I think it's some kind of Asian restaurant. I've seen them in Texas, Oklahoma and Louisiana.  
Feedler Roofing Company......cmon guys....Feedler on the Roof was right there for ya 
A shop local to me was called "Fergies". I asked inside one day why they were called that. Turns out the previous shop used to have a big sign up saying "Fruit and vegetables" and the new owner just made whatever word he could from the letters. 
Saw a cleaning van with two peoples last names then cleaners with a K.. it was something like this:  Kertzman &   Kleinberg   Kleaners  The van was white. 
'A All Animal Control'....  It's either not grammatically correct, or just dumb sounding.  
There's a sewage company close to me called "turd busters"  
I visited Chicago once and there was a watch repair place called "Jewel Restore".  It took me a minute. I don't think I've ever been more miffed in my life. 
No sure if it's dumb, but there's a Nemo Sushi in Plano Tx 
In Budapest there is an Irish pub called Publin. It's so simple yet so genius and while I acknowledged the fact that is the opposite of what this question asked, it was an opportunity for me to report my find.  
Literally any Barbershop or beauty salon found in a strip mall. They're all puns...and the worst kind...hair puns. 
I used to live near a shop in North London called 'Sale of Scarves and Showpieces.'  As far as I could tell it sold box files and ugly porcelain figurines of ladies.  
A cafe near my house is called The Rustic Aristocrat. Cant stand the name. 
Seafood restaurant here called Dirty Dicks. Their slogan is also "I got my crabs from Dirty Dicks.  
There is a liquor store here that's called "Best Beer" 
Have you guys seen that store Tuesday Morning? What is even the reasoning there? 
I feel bad you live in Lima. Whole lotta nothing out there.  
"Hello, Allen, Allen, Allen and Allen"  "May I speak to Allen please?"  "Sorry, he's with a very important client and wont be available until tomorrow."  "Then I'll talk to Allen."  "Nope, he's in court for the day, and will be for the next week"  "Is Allen available then?"  "He's on vacation for another two weeks?"  "Okay, then can I please speak to Allen?"  "Speaking..." 
I once had two friends who both went by "other Josh". 
I'm glad to see British humor carries over to real life as well 
There are two lakes Canada named respectively "Another Lake" and "And another lake" 
Came here to say this and didn't expect it to already be here! Not every day you see Delaware on reddit.  In the same vein, Siemens, which is practically around the corner from analtech 
While you're at it..Please Touch children's museum, in Philly.  
That actually doesn't seem weird to me.  Video rental has become a rural business because many of those areas still have limited streaming ability.  Chainsaw repair is also a rural business.  And because rural areas have fewer customers, it makes sense that they would not be able to support themselves with just one customer base.  There's a video rental place I pass by sometimes that is in the middle of the woods (still on a main road, though), and they do other things as well.  Hunting gear, fishing bait, etc... 
Reminds me of a billboard I saw driving from reno nv, to Utah or something. It was in the middle of nowhere and read, 'Battlemountain (the town name): You've come this far, why not come here'   Made me laugh my ass off, it's like that's all they had going for them.  
Yeah having associations with a pedophile kind of seems like a good reason to rebrand... 
Dont forget about Pump 'n Munch, another Iowa gas station chain. 
I once visited a Kum n Go in North Dakota that had souvenir boxer shorts. 
I like to call them Jerk N' Squirt.   Edit/add: They also have Git-N-Go in Des Moines.   
I saw a Chinese restaurant that had moved into the space of a previous restaurant and just kept the name and theme.   Highlander Chinese Food.   Try the sweet and sour haggis. 
Believe it or not I have a "Chinese Restaurant" in my town as well. 
Do they have cranberry juice in the vending machines? 
Thanks for enrolling your child at Pido. Now if you could spare some time and fill out these forms so we can create a Pido-File for your child. 
Boring, he should have gone with "Vegetas", "Beer Gun Festival", "Furtive Gals", "Vibrant Eel Fudge", "A Vengeful Birds Teat", or "Federal Vintage Tubs" 
There's a place in town called Kuts Klips & Kurls. Like, I get what they were going for with the same letter repeated, but ALL OF THOSE WORDS ALREADY START WITH "C".  
There's a place up in Pontiac that had a sign out front for a while "Road Salt, Jumbo Shrimp, Hair Braiding."  Truly a one stop shop. 
Yes they are. Someone should name their shop/salon "Let Me Cut You" 
I saw a liquor store called Discount Liquor but the sign was broken so it said Disco Liquor. That was a better name 
Actually, They get new amazing deals on the shelves every Tuesday morning. Not sure if they do that now, but that's why they named it that.  
there's a brand of Indian restaurants about in the UK named gaylord, too. the food is supposedly top notch, though. 
Tbh there is nothing to do in that part of Ohio outside of Dayton.  Edit. I'm walking that back to say that there isn't much to do at all in that part of Ohio. Edit. Spelling 
I love this. I love it even more when it dawned on me that the guy answering the phone knows full well he can't be the one who any caller wanted to talk to.  
I have a friend who rarely ever drinks called drunk Jake because other Jake is in recovery and became sober Jake. 
My daughter is named after my sister. We just have big Sarah and little Sarah. Little Sarah hates it. 
In the town I grew up in, there was a little shop called 'Down Swan Street' because it was, as the name implied, located down a small side road called Swan Street. However, the business blossomed, and the owners were able to upgrade to a larger storefront on the high street. The new name? 'Was Down Swan Street'. 
Jones *Good Ass* BBQ and Foot Massage.  The "Good Ass" part is imperative  
And then everything suddenly makes sense when the only genre they have for rent is chainsaw horror movie  
I never knew a wheelchair could be so condescending.  
Side side note: the official town slogan of Tisdale, Saskatchewan (large canola farming community) is "The Land of Rape and Honey".  
There's a popular burger place in Melbourne called Huxtaburger.  They opened before the Cosby rape allegations started and they deny it's named after the Huxtable family from the Cosby show, yet their burgers are called the Bill, the Theo, the Denice etc.  They have multiple store now, I can't believe they haven't rebranded. 
I can't even figure out what that one is supposed to be.  
"We Specialize In Wood"  What a marketing genius who made that site. Free advertising forever simply because of the funny URL. 
There's a Pump and Munch up the street from me. I giggle a little every time I walk by it.  
"You ever needed to melt the ice off your driveway, had a craving for jumbo shrimp, *and* need your hair did? Well look no further!" 
Pretty sure it's a fake site. Like, there was never a company called pen island. 
And in Mexico, to be *in* a "pedo" is to be in trouble, but to be "pedo" yourself is to be drunk.   Is a very versatile word. 
That was my thought too, but it's still dumb sounding. Also, who uses a phone book anymore? 
But why is the chicken sandwich more expensive than the cheeseburger? Beef prices are significantly higher than chicken right now. I just don't see how this joke is believable. 
The amount of times I was in the car as a kid with the windows open and I asked what the bad smell was, and my mother explained that it was all the Rape... Those fields stink..  
As a vietnamese person who has cousins named this its more like Bic Ng-ya 
'Just imagine!' he said, with a sigh of delight:   'Our names on the van as it rides in the night!   It's *Kertzman and Kleinberg the Kleaners!*' he cried -   'It's *perfect*,' he tenderly whispered with pride.  'When bothersome blemishes burden your day -   We'll wash all those unwanted colours away!   If stained and if swamped in a pool of pollution,   The *Kleaners* will find you the final solution!  'So what do you say?' he pronounced with a smile:   'We'll print it and share it for mile after mile!   We'll put it on vans and on cars and a truck!   It's *Kertzman and Kleinberg the Kleaners* an-    ... fuck.'  
Microwave nachos. Chips salsa cheese. Power level 8 for 1:15ish so the cheese melts but the chips retain crispness  
Same as my go to broke meal. A glass of water and a nap. 
Shredded cheese sprinkled on crackers then microwaved. Top with hot sauce and either avocado or jalapenos.  Lazy, crappy nachos. 
Microwave an egg in a coffee cup....or fuck it peanut butter on a spoon 
4 slices of peanut butter toast. That shit is fucking good 
Most of these aren't nearly lazy enough. If I have to use the stove and cook something, it's already too much effort.  
Microwave a hot pocket (bacon egg and cheese) for 2 minutes. Go sit on the couch. Forget about the hot pocket in the microwave. Go to bed hungry 4 hours later. Wake up. Open the microwave to heat up yesterday's coffee. See hot pocket. Scoot it over and put coffee next to it. Heat both up. Cry. Go to work.  
I either:    Slice red peppers and dip them into a sauce, usually soyaki.    Or I heat up Dino-nuggets in the oven. I'm convinced chicken tastes best when in the shape of a dinosaur. 
A hot dog. Might even pop it in the microwave for 20 seconds if I'm feeling ambitious.  
Microwave a hot dog and wrap it in a warm corn tortilla. Tastes a bit like poverty, but still delicious. 
A horribly basic PBJ sandwhich. If there's no bread, I'll gladly just stick the spoon in both jars. 
Kinda lazy: grilled cheese  Lazy: ramen  Super lazy: cereal  Super duper lazy: order food  Super duper uper lazy: order food and willing to pay my roommate to meet the delivery guy (I live in an apt where it's one big building and unless you have the electronic key, you can't get in. So for delivery you actually have to go down 5 flights of stairs and meet them in the parking lot)   Edit (typo): There was no way to buzz in. It was university housing. You had to literally meet people down there. And it was like big bang theory, the elevator almost never worked. And I didn't give my roommate like $20 bucks. It was most like a drink or a cookie or something small AND this happened like 3 times in the past 2 years. Because I had just finished finals and literally wasn't leaving my bed  Edit 2: yes I know ordering food isn't homemade. But it is my ultimate lazy meal, so it counts in my book.  
I call it fake garlic pasta. Basically what you do is you make your pasta and melt some butter on it then dump a shit ton of garlic. Powder on top . Yes I am a college student 
Lately it's been baked potatoes. You heat the oven, throw in some potatoes, wait an hour and then boom. Done.   Sure you can step up the flavor/effort a bit and do things like coat it in olive oil/salt and a million toppings or make some awesome twice baked potatoes. But as far as lazy filling meals go, there's not much easier.  
My Dad invented something we call "Stuff". Brown off a pound of ground beef, season it to your liking, mash in half a bag cooked tater tots, mix in a couple handfuls of cheese, Serve in tortillas with salsa. It's ethereal. Like a culinary, white trash magic trick. 
When I'm lazy and am going to "cook dinner," it's spaghetti. Brown ground beef. Dump a jar of Prego sauce into the meat. Boil water. Add noodles. Done.   It takes very little time, and is "homemade" in that I warmed up each of the 3 ingredients, then put them together.   
Beans on toast.   (Edit : Heinz beans, original. From the UK).  
Kraft Mac and Cheese with cayenne and black pepper. 
Ramen. Then again, that's the only the thing I have to eat because my budget is very limited in college.  
Pound of hamburger,  box of mac and cheese and a can of Rotel=Bachelor Chow 
1) Aglio e Olio. Pasta, olive oil, a pinch of chili flakes and garlic - takes 20 minutes tops to cook, tastes great.   2) Scrambled eggs and a Bratwurst.  
It may not sound "lazy" but steak. Honestly all it needs is a bit of salt and pepper, and cook it for 3ish minutes each side on a cast iron skillet.  
Mexican  cereal.  pour salsa over chips.   eat with spoon  
A small bowl of Stove Top stuffing with some dried fruit and nuts added (raisins/pecans, cranberries/walnuts, cherries/almonds), made in the microwave.   A measuring cup, a spoon, and bowl to eat out of and about three minutes to dinner. 
Fry up a couple spoonfuls of fresh pico de gallo in an omelet pan until the oil starts to separate from it.  Add a couple beaten eggs; cook like a regular omelet.  Add shredded cheese and chopped cilantro, fold and serve.  Intense flavor, almost no work. 
Doritos dipped in whatever salad dressing I have. Bleu cheese, ranch, honey mustard...yeah that sort of thing.  
I think microwave or stove top would require less energy from you than waiting for the tortillas rage over being slapped to melt the cheese...  *Edit*  Gilded for being an ass?!  Thank you, mysterious benefactor, I'm flattered! 
I love my nachos with just the chips and cheese microwaved then add the salsa on top so it's still cold 
You should start a new weight loss trend "The Broke Diet". 
Why don't you just get a bag of corn chips instead of crackers? Slightly less crappy nachos. 
If you're already paying for avocados, why not buy actual nachos, too? 
I don't know, cereal never sates me. I'm usually hungry within 30 minutes if I eat a big bowl of cereal but if I eat a simple croissant with brie or gouda I won't be hungry for quite a while. This made me put cereal in the "not actual food" category. 
Wait is the coffee cup used to keep most of the explosion contained?  
Honestly a half decent Gouda cheese on lightly toasted bread with a bit of butter, microwaved for like 10 seconds has been one of my favourite things since I was ~5. So simple and so good!  
Without a glass of milk that meal is like a slow death sentence.  
The problem is the people with the laziest food suggestions are too lazy to comment. The world may never know true Lazy Cuisine. 
You and my 4 year-old daughter share this belief. She wouldn't even consider regular chicken nuggets until I told her they were dinosaur eggs. 
Yeah, and when you're not home, always keep a pocket dog handy. 
Raw dog meant to me eating a couple hotdogs outta the fridge in the middle of the night. 
Sounds intriguing. Kind of the same idea as a corn dog.  
I also eat peanut butter straight from the jar. My husband thinks it's weird but it's delicious and filling. No need for bread, just two or three spoonfuls of PB will get you through the day. 
Idk man, i don't consider dodging 5 flights of stairs lazier than cereal 
Get the multicolored pasta from Target. Makes you feel 10x fancier 
Sprinkle some dried oregano and Parmesan cheese on it and it's next level. Bonus tip: eat with a banana on the side. Thank me later. 
Question. Do you "chew" spaghetti o's? I noticed one day that I essentially drink them off of the spoon. The noodles themselves are so soft that I never even noticed for the first like, 25 years of my life. 
Cheese toasties when I was a kid were just cheese quesadillas. That's what my childhood best friend's mom called them.  
Quick question, how does one prepare a baked potato so it tastes good?  
As a broke college student I highly recommend this  
Our definitions of lazy differ by approximately  0.6 Garfields.  
Browning ground beef instantly disqualifies this from the lazy category.  
It's so strange to me that Americans call spaghetti "noodles".  
Even if I'm feeling extremely lazy, they go in the oven... Microwave pizza rolls are disgusting.  
MICROWAVE POACHED EGGS?!?! I thought poached eggs were supposed to be like the hardest eggs ever to make. I've been lied to my whole life! 
One week when we were extra poor my mom made Mac and cheese every night. 1: tuna Mac. 2: hotdog Mac 3: Mac and canned crushed tomatoes 4: regular Mac 5: I can't remember but it probably was bologna. 
Add a couple cans of tuna and extra shredded cheese. It is amazing. 
Try some lentils and shit like that bro. Ramen is sometimes food. 
I don't know if the price of ramen is the same in proportion to other stuff in your country, but by being really careful with proportions, where I bought the food and making larger batches, I could for example make soups or even spaghetti 'bolognese' for cheaper per meal. Or tomato and tuna sauce for the pasta and so on.  Canned and preserved foods should be very cheap, as well as onions, potatoes, rice, pasta, bread... Seasonal fruit and vegetables can be very cheap, like pumpkin or whatever (I really don't know what's cheap where you live). But really, I never understood this ramen thing because I could always have better meals for cheaper, with some effort of course. 
Yo ramen is so bad for you and doesnt even make you feel full. Brown rice is where you should be focusing.  
That used to be my meal for when I wanted to impress myself. 
I must be an extremely lazy cook when I consider bacon and eggs as an effort meal.   The more I have to clean after cooking, the less likely I am to cook it. (When I'm feeling lazy)  
I love making this into a sandwich. I'll do the slices a bit thinner so they crisp up, then just put mayo, mustard and a little raw onion sliced very thin on bread. 
If it involves cast iron cook wear it's not really a lazy meal. The lazy chef doesn't want to clean, season or even lift a cast iron pan.  
Agree. If I had a bad day at work, steak would often be my dinner. I'd just eat a piece of steak, no sides, except the huge glass of red wine.  
For breakfast I eat a peanut  For lunch I get to lick an apple  For dinner I get to stand in the mirror yelling obscenities at myself. 
Or, if OP's already paying for avocados, why not just get the butler to tell the personal chef to make some food. Then have it delivered on a diamond pillow. 
So you grease up a coffee cup, crack an egg in it, STIR very important or it will explode! I like to add a little milk and cheese too. Bam you got an omelette loaf in 60 seconds. 
Try Kraft American single on wonder bread for the ultimate experience  
On average, 250 people die per year from suffocating by putting too much peanut butter on their bread / toast.  Source: I made it up. 
Peanut butter and honey is Gold Medal level snack. 
ah shit, you're right. It's like that concept... i forget the name. During a war, some army was looking to add steel plates to the planes to make them a bit stronger. On the planes that came back, they looked where the bullet holes were to see where they were getting shot the most, and decided to add the plates in those places. Then somebody realized they should add plates to where there AREN'T bullet holes, because that's where the planes that didn't make it back would have been shot. 
Karma's gonna get you for that. 40-50 years from now she's gonna stick you in an old folks home and right before she walks out the door she's going to lean in close and whisper into your ear "I know those weren't fucking dinosaur eggs, dad!" 
I once ate a full box of those when I was a teenager. Never again.  
I don't get what all the hubub is about with fiber one bars. I've gone through a small box of those in one sitting and was fine. In college I used to snack on them all the time and they never did anything to my stomach. My protein bars have WAY more fiber than a fiber one bar anyway.. fiber one bars don't even have that much fiber.  
IT'S RAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAW, IT'S F0CKING RAAAAAAAAAAW 
Side note: my wife thinks hot dogs are raw and uncooked. She also thinks chef boyardees are literally raw meat in them.  
They really are. I love Fuji apples and Ambrosia apples. But they require no effort at all. Sometimes, in a drunken stupor, I accidentally chew up the sticker and have to pick it out of my mouth. 
I'm curious as to what your idea of a corn dog is.  
Take a bit of milk chocolate and use it to scoop peanut butter out of the jar. Then dump you SO so you don't have to share and take all of it back to bed and enjoy your glorious sticky jar of shame.  
He jumps down them and can just reach the door lying down in pain. Then calls an ambulance to use as his taxi.  
Pretty sure he's talking about ordering food delivered to his place.  
After I wash the potato I let it dry completely and then rub it in some extra virgin olive oil. I'll then coat the skin with sea salt and a bit of freshly cracked black pepper.   The oil will leave the skin nice and crispy and the salt and pepper give the skin a great taste.  
Nah there is a huge difference between the microwave fork technique and the olive oil salt fork oven technique. The super crispy skin on the oven one is amazing. 
I've always found it weird, 'noodles' to me are specifically Asian, all Italian long pasta is just 'pasta' 
Generally we don't. We call it pasta. But it's a large, well populated, diverse country and there are people that call spaghetti sauce "gravy" too. 
When will they stop?? They're *literally killing every industry ever*!!! -some Buzzfeed article probably 
They're pretty easy even on the hob. Just crack it into boiling water and leave it for about the same amount of time as your bread is toasting. You can stir the water so it's creating a sort of whirlpool effect, or add a small amount of vinegar to make it less likely to fall apart. I'd say a "proper" omelette is harder (I just essentially make scrambled eggs but don't stir them for an easy omelette)     
Nah man. I save my tuna cans for my way-too-elaborate tuna sandwiches. Mac and cheese is my easy meal. 
I tried eating almost only ramen in college. It didn't go well, I started having a weird feeling in my chest, and could occasionally "feel" my heart beating.  
Or just put the whole can on the stove. When it explodes you know it's ready 
A pan with rounded (not vertical) edges so you can flip an omelette in it.  
There's a convenience store near me that sells them for $2.39. I tried to negotiate it back down to $2.00 but the teenage girl at the cash register didn't want to hear it. She offered me free refills on my soda instead. I walked out feeling like a winner until I turned around and saw the FREE REFILLS sign on the front of the store. That's my life. 
At the grocery store self check out everything is a banana. 
Ahh so you crack it, I thought you just put a whole egg into cup and heat it 
I like how the modern hippie health community attaches the word "cleanse" to the act of "inducing explosive diarrhea." 
Some people have sensitivities to chicory root fiber (inulin), which is used to bump up the numbers in FiberOne bars. 
"Thank you, now fuck off you fat piece of yanky danky doodle shite fuck off would ya please" 
IT HAS SO MUCH SALT AND PEPPER IT IS SCREAMING 'PUSH IT'!!!! 
I work in a grocery store, and I see the Fujis everyday and think they *must* taste good because they're so damn ugly.  
Even that is too much for me. The phone call, the answering the door, the anxiety over tipping... no thanks.  
If it's messy and I'm in a rush I occasionally eat standing over the sink 
Thanks, Im looking for some meals to expand that arent just eggs :)  
That's disgusting. I would never put tomato sauce on my biscuits.  
Almost died while doing this in Iraq.  Put the can of pop-top chef boyardee on a potbelly stove, forgot about it, and when I realized it had been heating for something like an hour I took it off and placed it on the table holding my machine gun.  Unfortunately this was directly in an ice cold wind tunnel position, and the temp change made the lid explode, ninja starring the lid into a wall and covering my face with scalding hot tomato sauce.  I seriously thought I had just been shot in the face by a sniper.  Luckily I was wearing eye protection or it could have blinded me, or the lid could have slit my throat.  Chef boyardee and my idiocy almost killed me that day.  Pretty hilarious in hindsight! 
Flipping is for the weak!  It's not a real omelette until it's been ravaged by your attempt to turn it. 
Where I live, I frequently catch avocados for cheaper than bananas, but maybe that's because I live in a border state? 
But eggs require a pan, which requires cleaning after. No thanks. Waffles yes, I'll give you that. 
As you're British too I'll let you in on a cheese on toast secret I discovered:  Buy some "Seriously Strong" brand cheese spread. Put it on bread in a healthy glob and top with grated red leicester cheese. Grill for a few mins.  The cheese spread will melt into the bread and form a soft and warm cheese sauce whilst the grated red leicester gives a satisfying crunch ontop.  Only works with Seriously Strong, Dairylea just goes all bubbly and doesnt seep into the bread. 
Really? Are you sure your store doesn't sell subpar produce? Because Fuji's are big, fat, red, juicy, sweet apples. The only apples I would consider ugly are the little yellow ones that look like prunes. 
Can't even begin to guess how many times I saw my dad eat an entire can of baked beans over the sink post-divorce 
In other English speaking countries, American biscuits are unheard of, and 'biscuit' refers to something Americans would call a cookie.  Now imagine spaghetti sauce on a cookie. "Biscuits n gravy" 
I'm also pregnant and have eaten more entire boxes of mac and cheese than my husband needs to know about.  
Also for a bit of a tang, a dash of Worcestershire sauce works well on cheese on toast. 
Oh shit man, i'm not divorced but i just saw myself doing the same thing. How fucking sad my life is, jesus christ. 
Whenever I read a millennial-written 'millennials are killing X' article, it just comes off as over-the-top proud.  'YEAH FUCK YOU VIDEO RENTAL INDUSTRY WE WON STRAIGHT MURDERED YOU SON' 
I know Worchestershire Sauce is incredibly versatile (seriously, use it everywhere you need a "tang") but I'm convinced it was invented for use with cheese on toast. 
THIS SQUID IS SO RAW I CAN HEAR IT TELLING SPONGEBOB TO FUCK OFF 
Millenials are single-handedly solving the conflict-diamond problem by not buying diamonds.  Non-activism at its finest. 
Mom let my hair grow into a typical 90s mullet. I was nine.  
I wore my frosted tips, with my button down Hawaiian shirts unbuttoned so you could see my wifebeater undershirt.   
I once wore my clothes backwards to a middle school dance because of Kriss Kross.  Yikes.   
I had a shirt with flames on it. Thought I was the most badass mofo my middle school had ever seen. 
Way too much hair gel. My hair was like a rock. This was 7th grade, circa 01-02.  
Hypercolor T-shirts  In theory, it was neat that parts of the shirt changed color with heat.  In reality, you always looked like you were sweating horrifically. 
Top to bottom, circa 1989  Mullet  Torn Guns N Roses tee shirt  Acid washed jeans  White high top sneakers 
I'm a woman.. as a teen in South Florida we all had this phase where we wore men's boxers hanging out of our pants. Even more embarrassing was a Winnie the Pooh phase somewhere in the middle of that, and also people were drinking regular beverages from baby bottles..for some unknown reason it was a thing. Embarrassingly, I did all of those things.  
I used to wanna be a scene kid, except I couldn't really afford all that type of stuff, so instead my best and I decided we were going to be 'new breed scene'. We literally dressed the same as we normally did but attempted our best scene kid hair, which was really just bands swooshed over our foreheads. MySpace angles and awful eyeliner, foundation so pale. I cringe when I remember. Also tried the whole ~gansta gurl~ phase. So much cringe.  
I used to wear two different styles of converse at the same time, most often it was orange on one foot and purple on the other.  
When I was in middle school, I had just seen The Matrix and Hackers. I was very interested in computers and was friends with the goths and punks. I learned about Cyberpunk from the infamous Jargon File, and decided to 'go' cyberpunk.  My mom worked at the mall, so I spent summers there. I shopped at various stores to buy things like cargo pants, boots, and shirts with weird materials and grew my hair out. Ordered a few linux and hacker tees. Started wearing welding goggles and carrying my laptop everywhere.  Got back to middle school and told this girl that I had a crush on 'You might be punk but I'm **Cyber**Punk!  Needless to say, it didn't go over very well. 
I had a rats tail. Spiked hair, shaved sidelines and a single long tail off of the back. It lasted through a lot of high school.  Also fluorescent shirts and pants. Like brilliant blues and yellows and greens with a lot of white. I don't regret the fluorescent at all though. I would wear that now. 
Jeans under my dresses. Not even skinny ones I'm talking bootcut  
wasn't a trend but i intentionally wore very contrasting colours together like pink and green. 
Feathers with stripes on it in your hair.   Glasses rims with no lenses.   The hot topic shirts with cute little cartoons on it that day some dumb shit like "I mustache you a question".  
When I was younger my mom would patch up my jeans and use this glue pen thing to draw pokemon on them.  
Those early 2000s jeans with around 5 chains on each leg. 
I used to wear cat ears, in elementary school. Not sure if that was an actual trend but it was definitely cringeworthy. 
Lots of black.  Band shirts.  Long hair    FYI, still the same, except everything fits better, and I cut my hair. 
Long keychain hangin out my pocket.     I still use them, just that I now tuck the chain in. I **hate** losing my keys. Whenever they are not chained to my trousers they fuck off. I think I must have offended the Queen of the Key Pixies when I was younger.     I can be in a house by myself, put my keys in the middle of the table, leave the room, count to ten, walk back in.....keys are gone.  
Tucking tracksuit pants into your socks.  This was before chavs, when there were two types of kids... Goths and Townies.  
80's...the so called "French Roll", you folded over the cuffs of your acid wash baggy jeans super tight and then rolled them up a few times for a taper so suffocating your feet would go numb. Very "cool" to wear a knit pastel sweater without an undershirt as well. Major cringe..... As a bonus, my hair style was called "The Side Spike", combed off to the side...one line of spiked hair along the hairline, COOL! Please down vote to oblivion, I feel so much shame. 
Cargo shorts and graphic tees... Except I'm also still wearing them currently. I can't help that I like comfort and the ability to store a great many things in my pockets.  
Bodysuits, the kind with snap-crotch  Also, "standing room only" jeans 
In 1991, I had what was referred to as a Prince Valiant. I was in sixth grade. It was my choice and my parents let me do it. I never want to do that again. 
There it is. Those damn Hawaiian shirts and frosted tips haha. I was a rural Midwest kid looking like fucking Guy Fieri for picture day.  
I was in high school in the 80s and could never master the "big hair" thing, though god knows I tried. In group pictures with friends I looked like a time traveler from 1972.  
We went skating on weekend nights, the getting ready process began several hour prior to departure.  The best was if you messed up or the bangs did not reach the elevation required, you washed your bangs with handsoap in sink, blow dried, and began again.  So much hairspray... 
Dude. I was a poor kid in an affluent school. The cool kids did it right. They wore baseball jerseys and loose jeans backwards. I wore kind of tight jeans and a collared dress shirt backwards once. Never again. Stayed in my lane from then on.  
My kid had his pants on backwards like a year ago and I busted into singing Jump.  My son looked at me like I was an idiot, but my wife laughed and pointed out his pants.  Eventually I had to break the joke down for him.  I showed him a video on YouTube. 
"Hold on guys just coat checking my pant legs real quick"  
My friend wears these every. Fucking. Day. We're both 19 and it's not even a trend.   He just really fucking likes them.  
In theory these are great. In practice, where the fuck do you put the legs? 
Ah yes, so we're the same age. Gotta have the frosted tips and that flip-up in the front, too. 
I loved just sitting in class and poking my hair. It felt so cool. The original fidget spinner. 
The mother of one of my friends when I was a kid got one of those.  She only wore it once to my knowledge.  Mostly because when she put it on it ended up with two brightly colored circles over her boobs.  Awkward. 
omg i forgot about these. i am guilty.  thank you for reminding me.   I also had a hooded t-shirt with a "gangster" Alvin (from alvin and the chipmunks) screen, and my JNCO jeans. I ripped holes in the knees of my jeans - my mother was probably pissed.  i also had my share of hammerpants.... man... i really was cool, lol 
buy purple hypercolor t-shirt  realize later that day after it gets hot that purple hypercolor goes to pink  holy shit 
This was the sole reason I clicked into this thread, glad to know I'm not the only one who had Tripp pants.  When I finished that phase, my grandmother actually took all of my chain pants, tore them up and made a really badass, 30 pound quilt that I still have to this day! 
90's? We did this with men's briefs. Jeans falling off our hips and Calvin Klein briefs sticking out, tight belly shirt and pierced belly button. The fashion was stupid but I had nice abs back then so no regrets. 
There was a phase that went round where everyone "cool" got a dummy/pacifier and sucked on it or kept it hanging out the side of their mouth. I didn't partake thankfully, but my sister did and I still have a picture of her with one.  
Hey man, it's "phat pants". Don't ask why I felt the need to correct you on that.   I, too, wore phat pants. Some of mine were 100" around the bottom and I duct taped the hem so they wouldn't get too destroyed.  
I wanted to be a cool scene/emo kid at school and I couldn't afford all the stuff other girls had, too! I had the sweeping hair and cheap, shitty eyeliner layered on thick... and the most embarrassing part is that I took a selfie at school like that. Black and white, I was looking down, etc. and I'll admit that it wasn't a bad picture as far as teen selfies go, but my mother insisted that it was just such a pretty picture of me that she put it on her computer, enlarged it, printed it and put it in a frame. It's hanging up in our kitchen ten years later. 
My wife was a scene kid. Those old pictures of her are pretty funny. 
I did too (in HS), but it was us queer chicks' way of flagging. "No but seriously I REALLY love boobies" 
Ah, I found my era. So many butterfly clips. Glitter gel over purple eyeliner.   Ever rock a paisley kerchief? I felt like Lizzie McGuire. Did not look like her, though. 
White eyeliner. The glitter gel w stars in the corner. Clumpy mascara and frosted pink lip gloss. Ugh middle school dances man  
Differing shoes sounds cute!  I wore the same black Converse through my entire school life, but I put mismatching laces in them... at the height of my emo phase, I had a Green Day lace in one and a My Chemical Romance one later. By the time I got bored of changing them, one foot had a sparkly pink lace and the other was rainbow leopard print. I thought I was so cool. 
At least that shirt isn't the three wolf moon one.    
I'm disappointed your scent in the 80s wasn't Polo.  Dang but that stuff was strong. And as bad or worse than Axe. 
I can barely remember what I wore yesterday.  You are an archivist of fashion.  A Socrates of trend. 
I imagine its cold in sweden.  So the rubberbands keep your pants close to skin to maintain warmth and keep the cold from traveling up your leg.  Also the draining circulation as a result of the bands will make it so your legs cant feel the cold.  Also also when they find your lifeless body in the snow, you are already packaged enough to be put right in the ground.  
What is that? I literally can't tell what's going on there haha. Are those elastics on their legs? 
I don't know when you did it but that was definitely a late 80's-early 90's trend. 
My dad and his buddies were so mad about the feather trend because it inflated the prices of fly tying (for fishing) supplies. 
I used to get "mean" t-shirts from Kohls. "Your lips keep moving but all I hear is blah blah blah" "My door is always open... so feel free to leave" and "If I throw a stick will you leave?" were some I remember. 
I did the glasses thing with a relative's old, yet cool-looking frames that I popped the lenses out of. When I got called out for wearing just frames, instead of abandoning the trend and admitting defeat, I proceeded to pop the lenses back in and double down. After that is when my vision started getting sorta screwy; not sure if it was a coincidence or caused by it.  
I had a friend in high school who did this. Same shirt every day, but he had thirty of them. His closet was like looking into a cartoon character's. He wore the same hat too, but he washed it like twice a week. Cone to think of it, he was actually one of the most hygienic people in my friend group at the time.  
There's really nothing wrong with that at all. It's the same concept as school uniforms.  That's really strange that your school got worried. 
You're not alone. I frosted those tips like I was a fucking mini wheat. 
I was never emo or scene or goth or anything but I've been wearing black since I was about 13. I'm 26 and I plan to stop wearing black as soon as they start producing clothes in a darker color. 
I still remember slapping myself in the face with the cuff of my pants while playing hackey sack. 
Nah man. The Shorts were where it's at. I use the term "shorts" loosely. Because they came down to mid calf and were 20 feet wide at the bottom. 
My sister went through a major industrial goth phase that's still wearing off a decade later. She got very into adding chains to pants for a while - but on budget.  Many dollar store dog leashes and chains were butchered for her look. She even went so far as to go to a hardware store and buy about 36 inches of industrial, welded chain.   Each link was about about 2.5 inches long by 1.25 inch (62mm x 38mm). Not sure what gauge,  but it was some fat chain.  The thing must have weighed a couple pounds (1kg+), not sure how her pants stayed up.  Good thing she was always wearing like three belts, only two of them weren't doing any work. 
My friend [26m] bought a pair of the wheelie shoes online, and started wearing them for fun, kinda joking. Then...Celebrity status wherever he goes happened.   When you wheelie around a bar into the dance floor, people lose their minds. instantly coolest guy there. He was wheeling down this ramp at the airport with his roller suitcase and everyone was cheering, taking pictures. People stopped him to get pics with him.  
"That'll be $10"   "Excuse me, my wallet is down behind my knees." 
Townies. We used to shout mosh mosh get a wash. Then a year later I became a full blown mini mosher. Ah tribal instincts. I used to spend ages making sure just the tip of my shoe lace poked out of the hole, and never dreamed of tying my shoes.   
Colorful comb sticking out of the back pocket while skating  
I am not sure the cool kids "did it right" either... 
Explaining a joke is like dissecting a frog. You'll have a better understanding afterward, but it dies in the process. 
I'm 28, only ever owned one pair and wow I miss those pants. Glad to hear they still make them. 
In one of the cargo pockets or in your 70-litre hiking backpack. Since zip off pants are generally hiking pants.  
Mine had 2 flying V guitars with flames on them. I owned a couple of shirts by Dragonfly clothing back in the day...  
Ah the good ol' Ski Jump. Back when the world was simple 
That satisfying feeling of slowly bending a spike until it bends in half, ripping out a few hairs.  
Oh man, that just reminded me of a time I went bowling with my parents. It was "cosmic bowling," I don't know if that's a thing elsewhere. Basically it was all lit with a black light and had strobes set up in a few places, they played music, etc.  Anyway, my mom has giant boobs and was wearing a white bra that was wildly visible under her shirt because of the black light. It was really uncomfortable for teenage me. 
Even better than the chipmunks were the gangster Tasmanian devil and bugs bunny.  Before you ask, of course I wore that t-shirt. 
It's OK, we thought purple and pink were equally gay in my elementary school 
There was absolutely nothing wrong with that trend.  The skater girls with the super tight belly shirts and giant saggy pants was awesome.  Awesome I tell you. 
Thank you for correcting him, 90's L.A. raver checking in.. that duct tape trick was a savior! 
WHY DO MOMS DO THIS. My mom still has a framed picture of my weeb ass getting ready to leave for prom in a kimono :( 
Oh my god scene kids are old enough to be wives that sounds so weird! Haven't got to grips with that trend being a decade or so in the past yet, crikey.   EDIT This means I'M old enough to be a wife can you all stop it please that's terrifying  
I could be totally wrong, but I think that they were claiming to send the profit to breast cancer research but pocketed itball. I could be wrong though 
Wait, was that a local thing? Or is that actually a thing? Because I remember some classmates of mine having that bracelet; it wasn't just ironic? Interesting. 
I have a friend who ties and sells flies on EBay. Makes his living selling crafts on ebay with his wife. He had some good sources for feathers during that trend and made a healthy profit selling good quality, cheap feathers to tweens in the midwest. They'd die them, make little variety packs and sell with a buy now price. 
I know a college freshman who still wears shirts with shit like "Dear Math, Solve your own problems!" or "Keep talking, I get paid by the hour" or just Eric Cartman quotes. And I'm not talking like his comfy day shirts, as far as I can tell it is 100% of his wardrobe. Really complements his gym shorts, Adidas flip flops+athletic socks, and Make America Great Again beanie.  
I never understood the point of popping lenses out of glasses and wearing the frames. Like what the fuck? At least wear clear lenses or something.  
Wait, I do this. I have 30 grey T-shirts and 3 pairs of black jeans. I only wear brown boots and leather jackets. I chose clothes that look good and kept buying copies of them because I didn't want to think about what to wear. A lot of people tell me that I'm almost like a cartoon character and it has become "my look."  I am also extremely hygienic.  
Yeah, they probably just thought I was too poor to afford more than one outfit. Keep in mind this is the same school that suspended my brother for "gang activity" after he and a friend planned to wear identical shirts to school. 
We used to put lemon juice on the the front flip up of our hair to make it go lighter in the summer. And then they came out with sun-in too.  
That's not a fashion trend that's a way of life I reckon. 
A guy at my uni has those and he is genuinely a campus celebrity. People stare and point as he goes by; he's a regular topic of conversation. It even got to the point that his nudes were allegedly stolen. 
No way. You couldn't wear those things without a chain wallet. And of course being a 90's skater/grunge kid I had a chain wallet with about 5 different length chains on it just to make sure I didn't lose it. Also had the extra long belt that would hang down to my knees after it was tightened. I was the absolute epitome of mid to late 90's fashion. I made that shit my bitch! 
I get it, because the joke becomes less funny when you explain it 
Just hit my friend up. He buys literally dozens at a time. Same with shoes.   He changes his tops up but that's about it.  
Holy shit, how did you survive the pussy avalanche? 
Im going to need to see a Naruto head band or BTFO.  
That Statue of Liberty hair like Simon from Inbetweeners.  
I had an ex who spiked his hair into 3 huge spikes on the front of his head. He had a weird fascination with trying to poke them into my vagina. Whenever he'd try it I would snap them. 
We call that "Laser Bowling" where I'm from. Let me tell ya, it was a hell of a let down finding out what laser bowling really was after only ever hearing people make reference to it.  
I am wearing one of my brother's old t-shirts as a pyjama right now. It has wile e coyote with sunglasses in front of a cheering crowd on it with "LET'S ROCK" written above it. I am totally the coolest person in my bed 
And as an adult I would love a shirt that changed between pink and purple. 
Can confirm former emo kid, married 3 years next week. Wife still makes fun of the pictures of me from then. 
This was a big thing. Similar to the fidget spinner phase.  
How do you know he wasn't just using that as an excuse to be lazy? 
I had a professor who did that, too, but he never said anything about it so we weren't sure if he had several pairs or just one that he wore every day. 
I also do this as a professional woman. I find a pair of basic black pants that like and fit well and buy 5. One for each day of the week. 
Doesn't Mark Zuckerberg do the same thing? He says it's so he doesn't waste thoughts on what to wear when those thoughts could be used for something else or something close to that 
Hey, woah, what the fuck, man?  What did Skeeter ever do to you? 
I am not even exaggerating here. We all thought it was going to be stupid, then he got them, and KILLS it.   
Dude what if he swapped the tops and the legs of the pants to make them different colors? That'd be so steazy 
He survived because while he caused the pussy avalanche it was rushing away from him. 
I had two. Akatsuki style mist village and the hidden leaf village.  Jesus Christ, I hate myself. 
Let's dispel with this fiction once and for all that moms don't know what they're doing, they know *exactly* what they're doing.  
Weren't those bracelets supposed to help fund breast cancer research or something? Or is that just what everyone said 
No, I know. I remember, but I'm asking if it was a way for lesbians to flag each other. Or was it just a teen fad. 
I used to buy all the rare ones on ebay for $10-15 a piece no clue why my mom let me. 
I tell people I do this, but really its the same pair of work jeans, M-F. 
Pants don't get that dirty...  ...   ...   ...   I'm not making excuses for myself, I swear!! 
I once read something (not certain about truthfulness but it's my excuse) that said that after a month of not washing pants, the bacteria level plateaus. So 3mo dirty pants = 1mo. Obviously if there's visible crud on it I'll wash them but... 
Leaving your shopping cart in a parking space because you're too lazy to lug your fat ass to the nearest cart station. 
Proposing at a wedding without the Bride and Groom's permission. Even then it's still iffy.  
Buying a patent not to use it, but in order to keep others from using it. (Not sure if illegal, but definitely a dick move). 
When someone on the subway takes up the seat next to them for their bag while loudly playing shitty music from a speaker. 
Using a public restroom and pissing all over toilet. Or leaving a massive shit and not flushing. 
Parking on the street in front of a house exactly in the middle so that nobody can park in front or behind you. 
Taking a parking spot that someone else had been waiting for.  
Persuading your Grandfather to remove your brother from his will so that all will be left to you. 
Saw Wonder Woman a week ago and not one, not two, but three God damn people brought babies in.  Two of them went off when the volume got loud.  Please people, leave em at home. 
treating minimum wage workers with minimum respect (for no reason other than they're working minimum wage) 
Trading away all my sheep then calling monopoly on sheep 
Filing for custody of your dog during a divorce then putting it down for no medical reason. 
Sticking your gum under the table at restaurants or bars. So nasty to catch a knee on that. 
Not re racking your weights/gym equipment.  Nothing annoys me more than having to go hunting for that extra clip or matching dumbbell. Or when you see someone finish their set and just leave the area without returning the item.   Scum 
Weaponizing custody of the children in a divorce.    
Neglecting your pets. I know in some cases there are animal abuse laws, but the amount of bullshit some people get away with doing to their cute fluffers that just want to give love is terrible 
Sitting right next to the people already there in an almost empty movie theater. 
Being that one person in a group project that contributes nothing and still tries to act like they did for the grade. 
Using the turn lane/off ramp to bypass a line of traffic before cutting back in. 
Tailgating. It may actually be illegal in some places, idk, but nobody really does anything about it. Either way, it's fucking obnoxious. Whenever it happens I just pull over and let that fuckstick drive ahead of me. 
When you call shotgun but someone else says challenge or some other BS. Bitch, I called it first. Live with it. 
Not taking your rubbish with you after a movie or similar event. Music festivals are particularly bad.  The kids working at the cinema are on minimum wage or less, don't make their life shittier because you are too lazy to take your shit to the bin that you pass on the way out. 
Telling your SO that you want to move out but stay a couple but secretly you fuck his brother, your coworker, Jim from Colosseum of Comics, your drug dealer, and your friend who went into the Marine Corps when he came back on holiday all in the span of a month while still kissing my lips and telling me you love me and picking out names for the kids we will never have   ps Lenny I know you browse Reddit and if I ever find you I'm going to break your arms  
Those parking spots with signs on them for "x parking only"? Only the handicapped ones are legally enforceable. The ones for expectant mothers and the like? You can park there and you're in the clear from a legal standpoint.      Kind of a real dick move, which is why I don't do it myself, but it's possible. 
For men, I'd say approaching a urinal immediately next to one that's currently occupied, when there are several other free urinals readily available WHY WOULD YOU DO THIS, LET ME URINATE IN PEACE YOU INCONSIDERATE FUCK. 
Going to a restaurant 10 minutes before they close.   I guarantee every employee is saying a silent "fuck you." 
How about treating anyone who serves you (Waiters, Waitresses, Store employee's etc.) poorly because you believe you're better than them. 
Buying the rights to life-saving pharmaceuticals, then jacking the prices up. 
not sure if this applies, but the MLM industry... most folks that get into it earn little to nothing (or negative returns, even)... 
Letting your kids fuck everything up in a public place and not cleaning up.  
Pay day loans with 1000%+ interest  Never been desperate enough (thankfully), but it is so shitty to lure people into a vicious cycle of debt 
Recording unknowing strangers in public because you think they're weird or funny.   My friend and I were having an interesting discussion in a fast food place. Of course my friend started talking excitedly during the discussion. Then, suddenly, he went completely quiet in the middle of a sentence and started looking at his phone. I thought it was weird, then he explained he wanted to leave the place. When we got outside he explained the girls behind us had start listening in and using their phone to record him on Snapchat. Fuck people who do that. We're allowed to fucking exist in a public space.  The discussion was also related to LGBT stuff, so double "don't fucking do that shit" there. 
Not cleaning up your dog's shit when it shits anywhere other than your own yard. 
Linking /r/thathappened on literally every fucking thread where someone said they did something, even if I was totally believable. You can say you went to subway for lunch and people will immediately call bullshit just because they can. 
People sitting in front of me pulling their airplane seats as far back as they possibly can while I'm eating with my tray down. That shit's not fun. 
Not turning off your bright lights for oncoming traffic. 
Bidding one dollar over the last person on the price is right.  
Asking any woman how far along she is on her pregnancy if you don't know her or she hasn't told you if she is pregnant. 
The supreme dick move is to leave the cart in the middle of the space *right next to* the cart return. 
Honestly, I don't like public proposals period. And they're awkward as fuck if both people aren't on the same page and someone gets denied in front of everyone (I'm of the opinion you shouldn't really propose unless you guys have had a full, clear conversation about marriage in private already). 
It's so scary. My friend was dropping me off at home and this car started following us as soon as we entered the neighborhood. Stopping behind us when we got to my house, we freaked out and started driving again. They followed us for like 10 minutes and I was so scared they'd know where I lived so we stopped at several other places throughout the ride. They stopped every time. Didn't leave us alone till we decided to go back out onto surface streets. I lived in the fear that they would rob or murder me for like 2 weeks.   I should add that this was at 3 am and the car was parked and waiting at the entrance to the neighborhood. Started following as soon as we turned onto the street, so we were sketched out immediately. 
I had this before. I pissed some guy off for some reason I can't fathom. He decided to follow me around for fifteen minutes gesturing for me to pull over. I'm thinking fuck that and do my best to loose him. I mean really I never cut him off, our vehicles never made contact, all I did was take an extra second to move after the light changed.  
Not illegal.  They're called patent trolls and they deserve to die the worst death ever. 
the bag seat is fine as long as other seats are available  not having headphones and listening to your music means we should be able to cut your fucking head off, for all to witness, as a warning to any other motherfucker who thinks that shit is ok 
Sometimes, things splash a bit. Sometimes, fluid pressure gets a bit outta hand. Aint none of us too good to grab a square or two of toilet paper and wipe up after we're done. 
Luckily, in most theme parks, line cutting gets you ejected without a refund. 
At Best Buy on a lazy Tuesday. Almost no one in the store. Have a single copy of Batman: Arkham Asylum to buy. I get to the front where one register is open where someone is making a purchase. Ok, that's fine. Then a woman comes into the line behind me. This Best Buy has a wide aisle approaching the register. Both sides have miscellaneous goods. She is browsing and walking around almost coming past where I was standing. I didn't think much of it, but as soon as the register opens, she makes her move. She darted past me, where she purchased her goods.  I'm not an inpatient person. If she had just asked politely if she could go first, I would have said yes. But to just cut like that really irked me. Like, I had 1 item to purchase. Wait your turn. 
My neighbors do this EVERY DAY and leave the street in front of their house open. Shit pisses me off so much.  
Or parking on the street about 4 feet from a stop sign. It's illegal but I've never seen it enforced in the towns I frequent and it's annoying as hell. 
My mom was nine months pregnant with me when it happened to her. She saw who it was, tracked him down in Costco and verbally lambasted him in front of a crowd of onlookers.   People were like what the fuck is going on here? And my mom is just laying into him meanwhile my dad has fucked off somewhere trying to get the shopping done.   But yeah, total dick move.  
Or taking a parking stall you're not entitled to. Dude, nobody is discriminating against you by having special parking spaces for pregnant women and parents of small children; it's a safety issue. The driver that can see you won't be able to see a three-year-old, and you're less likely to fall on wet or icy pavement than a pregnant woman. 
Someone is going slow but they speed up when you try to pass them. 
Fucking over your literal bro is the most severe violation of the bro code there is, surpassed only by fucking over a twin or litter-mate, with whom you shared a womb not only spatially but temporally. 
Hell, not just minimum wage positions, but any jobs where you have to interact with the public as part of work. My wife has a biology degree and works at a museum taking care of animals (which, yes, involves lots of cleaning their enclosures). People see her cleaning stuff and just sort of assume she's uneducated and treat her like shit. She said one time she was cleaning something and this kid asked their mom what she was doing. The mom said something to the effect of, she's doing what you'll have to do if you don't go to college.  How she didn't snap that woman's neck is a something I will never know. 
Gotta love Cataan. There was one time I asked if someone had sheep to trade, they said "what for?" then played the monopoly card. They were unhappy 
I find that the retribution that comes from this move doesn't make it worth it.  
How the fuck is putting down a pet for no reason not illegal? 
Same with people who use their kids as tools with which to spite their exes. 
Yes. I know someone who had a golden retriever with a tumor in its mouth. It got so bad the dog couldn't eat on it's own or even drink water. Maggots we're starting to collect around the tumor because the flesh was starting to rot. The poor pup was constantly bleeding as well. The owners knew for months the dog was suffering but wouldn't put her down because they couldn't emotionally handle it. Bitch, you're dog can't physically handle it.  
The number of obese dogs I see on a daily basis saddens me. 
I had this happen not too long ago.  My mom and I were the only people at an afternoon movie.  This woman came in with two toddlers and plopped them down next to us.  Then they proceeded to talk through the ENTIRE movie. 
Yes, next to you or even worse, one row down, directly in front of you or right behind you and then constantly move their feet against your seat. Even if it is the great stadium seating, you know it is just rude, more so if they have kids. 
Someone at my school is currently compiling a 20+ page peer review of a group project partner because his partner did nothing, 10 of those pages are references for texts and emails that they had in which they talked about agreeing to do something then not following through. The project was for chemical engineering and over 50% of the final grade and the dude is creating this review during pre-finals weekend, I don't think I've met someone who has ever been this pissed at a partner  
I hate that! The lecture says it's just like a real work environment but as it's not, I have to assume they don't want to grade as many projects. 
Along with talking on the phone. Have had that happen a couple of times, so inconsiderate  
Some cinemas do sessions specifically for parents with babies where the volume is turned down a bit, and the lights don't go fully out when the movie commences. 
I once got rear ended by a guy who was tailgating me. The car in front of me stopped suddenly to make a turn, so of course I had to stop suddenly also. He didn't get a ticket or anything but his insurance put him at fault for "failure to maintain a safe distance".  
Please remember riding shotgun is a responsibility, not a privilege. You are the co pilot. 
Oh it isn't silent. That kitchen staff is pissed especially if it was a busy night.  
Hitting on a single person when you're in a relationship.  
Is that a thing that people actually do? If so, fuck them. 
In the immortal words of that one sign at Jimmy John's, "a person who is nice to you but rude to the waiter is not a nice person." 
Seriously. My epipen, even with coupons, is still 600 bucks.  
On a boyfriend/girlfriend that's correct, but there are still many states in the US where it's against the law to cheat on a spouse (and can be punishable with fines or even jail time). 
Helicopter parents are the worst non lawbreaking parents ever. Anyone who works with helicopter parents will instantly feel sorry for the kids. There is a 21 year old combat veteran somewhere on reddit being forced by his parents to be back home by 10 pm. He fucking killed people in war.  
Turning the conversation into how shitty it is when people record someone without their knowledge would have been fun.  
On airlines like Air New Zealand, they don't let you do this. I've had flight attendants wake me up to tell me I have to put my seat up because it's meal time. 
The problem, as I see it, is that it is ambiguous who actually owns the space that is taken up by a reclining chair. The chair reclines. Somebody paid for the chair. It may be a dick move, but it is airline that is the dick for trying to sell two people the same space. 
Depends on the place. A few weekends back I had a guy randomly say "man I'm jealous, I've been standing here for hours trying to piss and you're in and out in a minute." It was hilarious, I think he was on MDMA 
All you're allowed to say is "mmm that water's cold" and the other person replies "yeah, and deep too."  That's it.  And you each stare at the wall tile directly in front of you.  It's the law. 
Wow, that's a step beyond.  I heard about one yesterday where a guy was officiating his friend's wedding, and proposed to his girlfriend in the middle of the ceremony.  Then his whole toast was about his fiance.  The couple was super pissed.    I thought that was the height of awful wedding behavior.  I honestly get annoyed when people making toasts at weddings make them about themselves.  That's not what you're there for.  If you want to propose during a wedding you need to ask permission and find an appropriate time for it.  Some couples are OK with it, but it's NOT a given.  And it creates a terrible imposition on people, so it's polite to simply refrain and not ask 
From years ago, I knew a guy who proposed by talking about the income tax benefits. How romantic!  
"Gary they won't stop driving. Should we just throw in the towel and go home?" "Nah dude, we'll try some more. We have to give him back the pen drive he left at the cafe, it might be important" 
I did this once because they lost a hubcap. I stopped, grabbed it, and went after the dude. Mind you, small town, very low crime rate, broad daylight.  
I had a woman accelerate to cut me off of my merge path and when I pushed my way in anyway (you know, instead of being forced into a bunch of construction equipment) she tailgated me and flashed her high beams repeatedly. Some people. 
Best part. Dad wanted no part. He knew what that lady was like when she was pissed 
Hey your wife and I live the same life. I was once referred to a "volunteer". "What's a volunteer, mom?", "Something stupid people do for no pay sweetie."  Much to her surprise, I was the one who was teaching the hands on class she signed them up for about 20 minutes later.   "Good Morning everyone, and welcome to X museum, my name is Nurimoons and I'm a handler here at X, and while I am a new face, I've had over 6 years experience with wild animals, and I have a degree in biology, at least that's what they told me, so don't fret! Now who's ready to learn some really cool things about the animal kingdom?"  She looked irritated. 
My friends are scary with Catan, they always know what everyone has by paying attention to rolls and pickups. They can always be like "Well Josh has two wheat and two ore already so i'm not trading him another ore, plus he might be have a road building development card for longest road which would help him win" and I sit there like "which tile is brick again?" 
Most vets will refuse to euthanize a pet for no reason.   
Some vets will euthanize these pets, because the alternative is sending them home with the shitty owner who will likely put it down in a much less humane way.  People suck. 
Doesn't that make you look really bad in court though? 
All of this is disgusting behavior, but I have to ask about the fee to surrender a pet. Someone who is going to engage in these behaviors clearly lacks any kind of empathy for the animal, so isn't that fee just encouraging them to leave the animal on the side of the road? I'm not saying they shouldn't have to pay a fee, because they certainly should, but I don't think there's a realistic way to charge it since a person like that would likely just refuse to pay it and go leave fido in a field somewhere. Because why not? They don't give a shit about fido, and the end result for them is the same. 
When I put my husky down (bone cancer), I wasn't emotionally ready for it. But I knew he was suffering. He had lost his will to live, and making that decision was the last act of love I could have done for him.  I only wish I'd done it sooner and not tried to fight the cancer with chemo.  
I own a black lab,  I'm always paranoid about her weight because as a spayed Labrador they can put on weight quickly.    When I was at the dog park the other day, a person with a yellow Labrador said my dog wasn't a purebred because she was "too thin and wasn't stocky enough". His poor lab was shaped like a barrel, and it was clearly having trouble just walking around. Poor thing.   I see fat Labradors all the time - it breaks my heart.   
Wanted to comment this as well; not a Christian but very familiar with Southern Baptism in particular, who have actually explicitly denounced the WBC. There are *so many things* wrong with the WBC's behavior from just a Biblical standpoint. I honestly think their protests could be argued to be nonviolent acts of terror and potentially unprotected by the First Amendment. Being an asshole is legal, but probably causing actual psychological damage is as close to violence as just words can get. There is significant precedent that directing such speech as they often use towards a child could be considered abuse, because it is harmful, and many other cults have been prosecuted for very similar overall behavior. 
As far as I am aware, the WBC interpretation of the golden rule is that other members of the church are "neighbours" and all others are satan controlled abominations which must be shown the error of their ways 
Someone did this to me and my partner. We literally got up and moved to the other side of the cinema. 
If I was a professor and somebody just dropped a 20 page report like that on my desk, I won't know what to think. Like if you'd write that instead of just communicating with the prof... My first thought would be "Both these people seem like they would be unbearable to work with." 
Hey, I saw *Predator* when I was like 6 and I am totally fine. I just advocate world war and total global domination by force of arms. Totally healthy! 
I think this also might be a dick move, but I'll be damned if you don't get my upvote for it. 
doesnt a blue shell still follow who was in first when it was fired? 
Work in auto insurance, not in the US though. Like 80-90% of our damages are rear end collisions and reversing out of parking spaces.   It is fucking bizarre how people behave in cars.  
Oh no. Busy nights we don't give a fuck because we'll be cooking well after closing anyway. It's the slow nights that have dragged on with a few tables trickling in here and there then no tables for an hour and you have everything cleaned and ready to close and jet out of there and then a table of six strolls in at 9:50. Oh they want a full on coursed out dining experience! Fuck. That. Shit.  At least we get paid well.  
Yeah, it only serves as disappointment to be flirted with only to find out they're taken. I'd rather they not do it at all. 
to be fair, Ron Swanson warned us that Tammys are evil 
Fairly sure these laws are archaic and unconstitutional. I doubt they're enforced. 
Multi level marketing. Where the company gets you to sell their shitty products for them, and you recruit people to sell shit too. Pyramid scheme basically. 
Anyone taller than me gets an immediate pass most of the time. I'm pretty short and air travel still sucks, so I can't even imagine what it must be like for them.   
Is this a redneck zombies reference? Or a cinema snob reference? Or some third thing? 
You did the right thing (without putting your dick in it). 
Holy shit, this is maddening. HOW MUCH TIME DO YOU THINK YOU ARE SAVING BY BEING ONE CAR LENGTH AHEAD??? 
Yeah. A severly pregnant lady will fuck someone up. No remorse. Lol  I saw a woman in a parking lot who had a bitchy expression so i said what a bitch dismissively.   Well, she read my lips and started screaming back at me.   We couldnt hear each other bc we were passengers in 2 different cars pulling up and parking in a babies r us parking lot. We both heaved our fat pregnant asses out of our cars and started screaming names at each other wildly while the drivers we were with (also women) just locked up and headed in lol.    We stopped and looked at each other hatefully, noted each others tummies and silently promised to fuck each other up if we ever met again after this.. 
It's not that hard to pick up on that stuff, just keep playing and you'll get it soon enough!   The game does pick up that extra layer of complexity and mind games once everyone is more comfortable with the basic rules and keeps eyes out for things like you mentioned. You can really get into all sorts of tangled alliances and deals with players based on some more careful planning and understanding on who is going for what victory points.  But that all comes in time. Just play the game however you want and you'll get better at it! 
It should, I don't know if it does. For sure it fucks over the other party's ability to even hire a lawyer, let alone live if it's a one income families. 
And labs have problems with their backs and hips as they age. Owners are responsible entirely for their dog's weight.   Old fluffykins might "just loooove" all the human food given to him but it's not good in large quantities. My dad (known for feeding his dog chocolate bars on a daily basis) always tells me my dogs are too thin or scrawny. No, they're exercised properly and fed treats as treats, not as their daily diet.   The vet is happy with them so shut up you cantankerous old growler.  
They're a group of litigators operating under the guise of religion. If a city denies their permit to protest, they just sue under the First Amendment. WBC has pretty good lawyers who can win. They take the money in the lawsuit and run.  
I've done that and had the next group come in and do the same thing all over. 
The college I went to, the only classes you were required to attend were the first one and finals. If you didn't attend anything in the middle, that was on you. 
Believe me. I work at a movie theatre. There was nothing worse than sausage party. So many pissed off customers. 
I remember being in 5th grade and getting very worried looks from teachers for saying my favorite Christmas movie was Die Hard.  Many years later..  my favorite Christmas movie is *still* Die Hard. 
Criminally speaking I agree, they're probably not enforced unless a complaint is filed by an angry spouse. Civilly speaking, however, a cheater is breaking what is essentially a legally binding verbal contract (marriage). It's why in civil court most judges frown on cheaters and let the other rake them over the coals. 
It's fucking hell.  I'm 6'2 (just a bit over, actually) with wide shoulders.  I'm also somewhat overweight.  I could lose weight to make my hips fit better in the seat, but that's actually the *least* uncomfortable part of flying for me.  I can't lose height, I can't lose length in my legs (and I'm mostly torso, so if my legs are hitting it's a problem) and I sure as fuck can't lose width in my shoulders.  Good god I hate flying. 
more like a joke little boys told eachother 30 years ago.. at least.. 
lol, talking to neighbours...he was far enough down the street that I don't think I have ever seen him again.  
I will flush it, but use another stall. It makes no sense but it feels right to me. 
As a Brit, the idea of someone waiting less time than me, really gets my blood boiling.  Of course I'd never say anything, but you can be bloody sure that I'm tutting and muttering viscously under my breath. 
When I was nine months pregnant, the car dealership was dicking me around about some warranty work and installing LATCH on my car. I was so fed up and hormonal and angry that I screamed "DO. NOT. FUCK. WITH. THE PREGNANT!!!" into the phone.   Oh yeah, I was at work with my door open at the time.   You know what, though, I got what I wanted and my coworkers didn't mess with me until well after the baby came.  
In the U.S. jurisdictions where I've practiced, if one side has money, that person often contributes some/all of the other side's attorney's fees within reason to ensure fairness in a contested divorce. 
Misread this at first. I thought the first group followed you. At that point you'd have good odds to beat the murder rap.  
out of curiosity why didnt they get stopped at the box office? I had a buddy who worked in a theatre and would inform people  (hell they had signs) warning about the animated feature. 
Watch the documentary This Film is not Yet Rated, it offers a really great look at what goes into the decisions by the MPAA to rate movies. Without spoiling anything it's really inconsistent and the panel of people that rate movies are parents and no one knows who they are officially. It's not even a government organization either 
This makes me feel better. I'm still a little bit of an ugly duckling socially (trying to work on it). I may never make eye contact with you, but I always try and give a good "Hi. How are you?", "Yes, please", "Thank you, have a good day." 
*In gordon ramsey voice*   #TAKE YOUR JACKET AND FUCK OFF 
A pregnant woman has no mercy, because what value has a life when she knows she can simply create more? 
In california, the party that "escalates" by getting an attorney may sometimes be ordered to pay for an attorney for the other party. 
My niece works in a movie theater and when sausage party came out, she warned parents, in English and Spanish how offensive the movie is. The parents always agreed. They also always asked for refunds. They tried to avoid my niece after and see someone else for a refund but my niece ran a tight ship and didn't put up with that shit. So I think the people are warned for the most part, but see it as an easy free movie. 
They don't necessarily raise their voice to cause a situation. You'll get tutted at quite a bit though. 
Most places I have seen is you have 10 or so minutes after the screen time to change your mind, otherwise they consider the product used, for lack of a better term.  
I think someone cutting in a queue is the only annoying social situation I can think of where Brits will often make the step up from tutting to doing the horrible task of... actually talking to a stranger ^(shudder). 
That seems fair. Asking for a refund after sitting though the entire movie is like complaining about your restaurant meal after clearing the plate.  
Usually it's a just a passive aggressive comment to the air - 'there *is* a queue' to no one in particular. 
God I remember that from when I was a server at a Thai restaurant.  "Sir, there was a fly in my plate. I want the meal comped."  I didn't see one when I brought it out and the door was open so it probably came from outside but instead of telling me during the 4 times I refilled your waters you tell me now and oh, also, your plate is cleaned and no fly in sight.  Me: "Okay well since you finished the food I'll have to talk to the manager to get your plate comped."  "No, I want everyone's plate comped."  *internal rage* 
As a teenager I spent many times at a bus stop freezing my ass off, baking in the sun, or being soaked by the rain. As a result I always promised myself that when I was older and driving a car and I spotted someone out in harsh conditions that I would offer that person a ride to wherever they were going. Now, however, my desire to not be arrested prevents me from even presenting the offer. 
I stopped shaving my head.  I used to do it just because it was easy and I hate going to the barber. I had a couple buddies who also had their heads shaved, one because he was pretty much bald by 18, and the other because he a had surgery that required it and just started keeping it that way.  One day as we were walking through the mall after seeing a movie, I noticed that people were moving to the opposite side of the walkway as we made our way through the mall. Suddenly it hit me, we were three white guys in leather jackets with shaved heads. We looked like skinheads. I never shaved my head after that.  
I would sometimes give kids a ride home after youth choir practice at church if their parents didn't come for them - but no more. 
I'm very paranoid about my interactions with young females now. When I was 13 my younger sister was 5. We would have wrestling matches where she would attack me and I would do the basic over the top wwe wrestling throws and moves ending with me tickling her into submission. She would scream "wrestle!" I throw her, repeat until she's bored. Basic big brother stuff in my eyes.   Fast forward she told her mom (shes my half sister) that I "wrestle funny" word for word thats what she said to her crazy ass mother. Next thing I know I'm knee deep in a child sex abuse case and being investigated by cps. Of course it was determined nothing happened but it tore our blended family apart.  Ever since then I'm paranoid about any 1 on 1 interaction with a young kid. especially a female with no other adults or witnesses present.  I understand being cautious and reporting suspicious behavior but my sister saying I wrestle funny shouldn't fuck my life up. 
Walking behind women for a few streets. Feels like I am following them. Purposely take a turn and sometimes cross the road or take the long route. 
Looking up when walking up stairs, idk always paranoid someone will accuse me of stealing glance 
I stopped going to the playground with my niece. She loves it when I'm there with her. Going on slides with her or pushing her swing. But according to the mother's there and the old ladies its creepy for a man to go there, even with my niece.   At first I didn't care, I just ignored them. But some even went as far to ask my niece who's only 3 if I was her father and other inappropriate things. Even got the cops called on me twice and after explaining the situation and having to go as far as having to get my sister down there, they left. But I'm still a creep to the woman's eyes. I don't talk to the other kids, I say Hi back and answer them if they ask something.   But... I just don't understand.  
I work as a manager at a fast food place, so I work with a lot of teenagers. Pretty much I have to play "people are lava" so I don't accidentally bump into one of them, we've had a lot of young managers date the crew and do inappropriate things so I want no part of that liability.  
I've been getting driving lessons recently and after the first one the instructor dropped me off and when we were organising new lessons we just said we would meet at the same place. It's outside a school.  We probably met there about 10 times at various parts of the day in a car with massive "Driver Learning School" stickers all over it.  A woman came up to me yesterday as told me how it was wierd that two men met there and how people were talking and how there were "weirdos" about who people thought were selling drugs and how we wouldn't want anyone thinking we were "weirdos".  I just kinda laughed and said "Ok thanks, we'll meet somewhere else in future" but she just kept, on and on. I had to walk away when she was in mid sentence. It was pretty insulting. 
basically all the comments are "dont be nice, and dont come within 1000 meters of children. including your own." 
People get really weird when i discipline my daughter, like since shes a little girl she should be able to do anything she wants  
For some reason I get watched heavily when I go into some stores. So I try to avoid putting my hands in my pockets and going around corners or blind spots. 
Walking behind women.  Especially at night and/or if they're alone. It seems like I'm following them or something when I'm just trying to get to a destination. I try and cross the road if I can but it's fuckin proper alarm bells if the woman does it too!   And what can I do? Shout "hey I'm not weird! Don't be afraid!" I'd be better just sitting and waiting for them to get far ahead   
For me, mostly being very aware around kids that are not my own.  I have a 2 1/2 year old boy who is now very active at playgrounds but still needs a lot of attention when there. This occasionally brings me into contact with other kids. I feel very anxious at times with this- if they talk to me - I try to respond with non-committal answers. If they fall over, I'm going to think twice before going over to help, for fear of people thinking bad things are afoot. My wife has no such issues- she can talk to other kids all day and it not be weird, or anyone question her.  It is sad. Being a dad is the best part of my life and I love kids- I'm a softie- but we are now paying the price for the evil in the world.  
As an instructor for a marching band, I am acutely aware of how I must speak to my female students. There are certain sayings I do not use and I do not presume to touch the students despite that being a common technique for a visually oriented activity. Even slight things as a tap on the shoulder to let them know to relax or to stop scrunching up. Also I do not friend any of my students on facebook. I have to ardently keep those professional boundaries separate.  
The jokes I make in public are completely different  
If I find myself coincidentally walking behind a random woman with both of us alone after-dark, I will make a detour or just stop and wait for her to get further away because I don't want to look like I'm following them.      
When hanging out with my nieces I didn't give a fuck about hugging them or playing with them. Or holding their hand in public. You know, normal human being shit which they often initiate.  Now, I often think "Oh fuck, everyone is going to think I'm some kind of pedo." 
I completely ignore kids. I don't look at them, I don't talk to them, I pretend they don't even exist. The last thing my long haired, goateed self needs is to be accused of being a kid diddler. 
Checking the clock at the gym. Sounds stupid but there's a reason. I like to time my rest between sets and can't be bothered setting a timer on my phone. Anyway, the clock is over the cardio section of the gym (bikes, cross trainers etc) and is almost always occupied by women. Only recently I realised it totally looked like I was checking out chick's asses (and not I  a subtle way) and so I had to stop. 
Being friendly or helping children.  I was walking home from work along a very busy street, loads of pedestrians. A little girl around 4 (maybe? not sure) run past me from behind and faceplanted the ground, looks really sore. She has a few DVDs and they scattered across the ground.  I immediately stopped and knelt down. I handed her one DVD and then asked if she was OK. She didn't respond. Looked around for a parent but couldn't see one. I just wanted to help but I'm a man so I totally didn't feel I was allowed too. Another guy stopped and seemed concerned, looked at each other and that was about it.  Luckily her mum appeared thanked us and checked she was OK. I just left. I'm annoyed I wasn't able to help. 
Going out of my way to try and connect with women I am interested in. Or just friends for that matter.  When I talk with friends and hearing from other women about how creepy some men are cause they try to make plans with someone they are interested in it scares me that I am doing the same thing. When people stop texting me I don't try and restart a conversation later on in fear I am acting desperate or clingy.  I give women too much space when I feel that they need it and then they get mad cause I didn't try and rekindle the relationship, that's how my last relationship ended. Its something I want to work on, but that constant nagging in my head that I might be too creepy/clingy keeps me from trying.   
I see lonely and miserable looking kids when I go to the park with my nephews and I try to get them to go at least ask if they want to play hide and go seek or some game while I chill. If they don't want to then I keep walking and thinking about how they must feel.    Breaks my fucking heart man.  
Helping children.  Growing up I've always wanted to help people, so I joined the police, I've got a good career ahead of me. I've waved to children before, because they waved at me - either because they've seen me in my patrol car or because they're being children. I waved back. I got called a paedophile.  I overheard a conversation about a lost child inside a clothing store, and I found him. I knelt down, told him my name, and that I was a policeman. I took him by the hand, and returned him to his mother and the security guard.  Again, I got called a paedophile.  And both of these incidents, it was my then-girlfriend who said it. 
Take cutlery on picnics.   Had a cop slam on his brakes and vault a fence to confront me for brandishing a knife... While I spread peanut butter on my 3 year old's sandwich at the playground.   Offered the good officer a snack. 
I don't take my nieces or nephews to the park anymore unless one of my sisters or my fiancee is with me. I used to do it all the time, but the women at the work would always give me evil looks. A couple of times I had the cops on me for "acting suspicious" since I was a lone male at the park "staring" at children. In reality I was keeping a close eye on my 3 year old niece, 2 year old niece, and 6 year old sister.   Once I got everything cleared with the cops, they asked me not to come back as I kept making people uncomfortable.  
How about the opposite to brighten your day. I'm about 6' tall 230 lbs with a long beard. Was traveling recently. Full flight. Sat next to a young couple with about a 2 yr old girl. We hadn't taken off yet and she was already fussing until she saw me. She looked at me and gave me a big smile.  Like a serious day brightening smile. Hesitantly, I smiled back knowing the parents would probably take me for a pedo. Lo and behold they didn't! Instead I got to meet a wonderful family and made a new best friend, the little girl. We played Patty cake, read books etc. And I even held her for a bit so her folks could eat their in flight meal.  It was a win for me. A young couple had faith I wasn't a pervert, a little girl had a great flight, and I met great people! 
I don't keep my hands down naturally at my sides anymore because of all the molestations occurring daily on Tokyo commuter trains. I'm tall, so I make sure I have both hands up and holding the baggage rail overhead. I've heard horror stories about men being falsely accused of molestation just so the woman can get quick cash from him. If he protests his innocence, she screams for the cops. And the man's word is nothing more than dogshit. 
I avoid children like they have a horrid cross between black death and ebola that can be spread by eye contact. I also avoid being alone in the same place as almost any woman. I prefer texting over face to face contact, because it gives a written out "he-said-she-said" I can use to save my own ass if someone starts lying.  Basically I'm afraid of woman and children 
Well apparently, I'm oblivious as a woman. I've never thought someone was stalking me, or that the man/child duo was some sort of perversion, or think every man that strikes up a conversation with me is trying to get into my pants. These people need therapy.   I did ask a male co-worker this question.  His response was that he is the main "grocery fetcher" in the family, and that sometimes he'll run into the same woman repeatedly as he shops. He says after the first two-three times, he'll purposely go to the opposite end of the store and start shopping from there.   Apparently a woman accused him of "following her" a couple years back at Kroger and threw a fit to the point the cops were called, and he's afraid it will happen again.   
Went on a walk today and walked past an open car port stuffed with crap in boxes.  I gave it a glance as I walked by and got glared at by a woman who obviously thought I must be casing her junk pile for a future robbery.  Spent the rest of my walk looking at my feet... 
Driving around in a van in clown makeup, naked from the waist down. 
For some reason people told me to not look them in the eyes since it made them feel uncomfortable, so now I just glance away from their eyes every few seconds 
Never sitting next to anyone on the bus or train.  
Holding doors for people. At the college I used to go to I would hold doors form people men or women if you were close. One day I apparently held the door for the department chair of women's studies and she said some shit about "I don't need a man to hold a door for me it makes me feel inferior" so I said ok then I won't and let it close in her face. Which probably justified her but ugh. Come on I was just being friendly.  I try and avoid looking around when talking to women so they don't think I'm being creepy and looking them over. :/  
As a man in a relationship, simply making female friends.  
Being friendly towards women.   Apparently, that comes off as I'm trying to get into their pants, interestingly enough. I just wanna talk. Is that so much?  
Although I know this question is more socially oriented, I will weigh in on test taking. I am very paranoid about being wrongly accused of cheating, even though the last time I cheated was years ago. I get very anxious and look at my paper a lot, and when I do look up to ponder, I look at my teacher exclusively. Which of course, in turn raises more suspicion towards me due to the good old: "The only reason you would look at me is to see if you can cheat."   Besides that, talking to people in unsociable places of the world. You just get weird or blank looks.  
Sure it wasn't the signs you were holding that said "Hitler Did Nothing Wrong!"?  I always forget to leave those at home. 
Oh yeah - that's a big no-no.  As a male, you never want to be left alone with a kid. 
I have a half sister as well, loved her as much as my other siblings ever since she was born. If that happened to me, it would hurt bad. I'm sorry this happened to you 
Bruh, my cousin and I we were like 9 and 7. She burned herself with a lighter got scared she would get in trouble and told everyone I burned her. It turned into a shit show. It fucked me up a bit as a kid being treated like that for so long. Sorry you had to go through that. 
My sister started to see a therapist (ever since she was little, my parents have been taking her to therapists for anger issues and such), and they got to talking about her growing up, and I guess stories of me doing the same thing you did (WWE style throws). The therapist started accusing me of sexual abuse and how I am probably a large part of whatever is causing her mental issues. My sister and mom immediately decided not to go back to that therapist. 
How are you alls relationships with each other now? 
So if you see a strange lady talking to your niece. Give her an accusatory dirty look, pull your niece away from her and say "what are you doing? Stay away from her." And threaten to call the police yourself. See how they like it.  
It's honestly incredible, that somehow fellow women are making it so only women can go to the park with their kids.  
I used to work at Domino's as a delivery driver. Whenever I wasn't on a delivery, I'd help out on the phones or whatever. Everything was fine until we hired this stupid, young overweight girl.   I'm a big guy myself, and the space behind the counter was already tight enough, but it seemed like this girl did everything she could to take up as much space as possible. I did everything I could not to touch her as I moved past her, but it was impossible to not touch her at all.   Eventually, she complained to the manager. Thankfully, the GM was an awesome older lady, and I was her most reliable driver, and she basically told me if I wasn't on a run to either man the oven or help out on the line and just stay away from the crazy girl.   Soon after, she tried to do the same thing to another coworker and the manager fired her for creating a hostile work environment.  
You should have told her that if she wasn't there to buy any crack she should probably just move along.  *edit - 13.9K upvotes and reddit gold (thanks!).  From this point on I will never again doubt ThePowerofFarts. 
So what happened next? I can't help but feel theres another minute or so to this story.  
This exact situation has happened to me. The only difference is that the store was a Belk. Nothing more to add, just my sympathy. I know how that feels. It really sucks to be considered a predator based on nothing more than the fact you're male. I'm sorry it happened to you.  
Good on you.   Next time just trip the little girl as she walks by. She'll fall, cry, Mom's can hear child cries from miles away, and she'll hone in on her offspring with pinpoint accuracy. #protip. 
Next time, just top of the lungs yell - WHERE IS THIS LITTLE GIRLS MOTHER?! SHE HAS LOST HER MOTHER CAN SOMEONE HELP THIS CHILD FIND HER MOTHER?! - That would totally work, everyone will definitely think you are an asshole but you know, it would work. 
I've experienced this, what the hell is it!?  I'm a woman, I was walking home with my son and his friend (a girl) and her dad. She ran out into the road despite her dad shouting at her not to. He was telling her off when this group of women appears and told him not to shout at her as she was a girl!!!  He rightfully told them to mind their own business but they tried to get me on their side, like beacuse I'm a woman I'd be against a male friend discipling his daughter. I told them to walk on. 
Kudos to you for not being one of those people that just lets their kids act like hellions all the time. I can't stand those people and it worries me that they raise kids like that to grow up expecting everything to be handed to them and they can do whatever they want with little to no repercussions.  
i think that applies to even sons. People have become so against disciplining children and its these same people who will then complain that "the new generation isn't disciplined" 
When I first traveled to NYC I was going up the escalator at Penn Station and I accidentally bumped into the girl in front of me. I had hit her backpack I said "Sorry!", but she immediately gave me this awful look and took her backpack off to make sure I hadn't done anything or stolen anything. "Welcome to New York" I thought.  
Haha, my mate does the same thing.   "I'll just uh. Look over here for some minutes until you're far enough away so that you know I'm not a predator" 
I'm generally a fast walker, so I normally walk behind the person (man or woman, doesn't matter), give them a wide berth and pass them. Boom, now they're the fuckin' weirdo who's following you. 
Yells after me in the dark: "hey I'm not weird! Don't be afraid!"             *clenches pepper spray in purse tighter, gets to "older lady in sweats and a sun visor" levels of speed walking* 
I try to walk fast to go past them and then they start walking fast too thinking I'm about to do something bad, and then I have no choice but to slow down to not look like a creep and try to put some distance between them and me  But in the end I have this weird feeling, wondering if that women thought of me as a creep because I slowed down as she walked fast.  
I do this too, but as a gay man I will do a fake phone call.. letting the woman hear my 'gay voice' 
I used to live near a dark alley where this was a problem. It was round a warehouse in the shitty part of town, and it was very long and L-shaped so inevitably you would round the corner only to see some huge gangster looking guy bearing down on you.  I would always say to any woman who was in front of me "Would you like me to go ahead?". Most gratefully accepted.  
When this happens, I do the world's worst job of sneaking up on them. I drop my keys, I cough, if the streetlights allow it I try to get a little away from her laterally and cast long shadows - all "hey, just letting you know there's someone behind you" stuff I'd appreciate someone doing for me.   And if I walk past them, I don't even acknowledge them - no reason to stress anyone out any more than necessary.  
I worked at a gym in college.  The gym had a daycare during designated hours.  Saturday mornings, without fail, the girl who worked daycare would come in late so I would have to stay in the daycare if someone had brought their kid in.  I would be in there for like 15-30 mins and some mothers would sit with their kids until the girl came in, constantly asking when will "the girl" be in?  There was a camera in the room that could be viewed on the TV's on the cardio machines.  So the parents or even random people could watch, which I've seen a few times.  A few parents knew me and their kids would run up to me and hug me and want me to hold them.  Look I love kids, I'll hold them if they want and their parents let me, but not all men are looking to diddle your little kid.  It's kind of sad really.  
I would have told them off. It's not even babysitting at that point, it's watching a play date.  
I always get weird looks when I go volunteer. I'm a 26 year old male, married, no kids, youngest in my family. We have an elementary school that the company I work for pools money to help the kids out. These kids are all minority, low-income "families" so I volunteer to kind of just be a big brother to them. I go into the school's office, say "I'm GlockTheDoor with Company Name here for TeacherA's 2nd grade class" and they always give me the shadiest looks. It makes me feel like shit and I'm half way tempted to not volunteer next year just because of the looks I receive. I'm just trying to motivate these kids to do good in life, why must you make me feel bad :( 
It seems like all men are just child molesters until proven innocent,  ugh.  
I'm a woman and was accused of trying to abduct a litte boy. We have a playground inside our mall and I was there with my 2 kids. I saw a little boy run out of the play area and I didn't see anyone chasing after him. I looked at my daughter and said watch your brother and I took off after the little boy. He was running as fast as his little legs would let him. I caught up to him and scooped him up and was asking where his mom was. A woman came running out of the play area freaking out and grabbing her son from me. She started screaming at me and calling me a kidnapper. She wouldn't even let me explain. She ended up leaving and I walked back into the play area thinking of how I am going to explain this to police when they show up.  They never did, but I will no longer save another run away child whose parents aren't paying attention.  
So with you on that.  My humor is pretty dry. Like 40 percent of it is just saying completely inappropriate things in a deadpan voice. Combined with a button-down appearance, I can usually get a laugh, but it also needs highly specific context.   If someone asks if you're going to the meeting and you say you would rather be anally electrocuted, people at work start to talk.  
90%+ of these posts are men trying to avoid the presumption that they are pedophiles and/or rapists.  Well done, media. 
Sort of a funny story....  My old roommate and her boyfriend were coming down the stairs one night and she tripped. She landed on her face and we thought broke her nose (it was bleeding pretty badly). Her boyfriend rushed her to the hospital.   At the hospital when she was in the back literally all the nurses surrounded her and tried to get her to say that her boyfriend was abusing her, and that it this was a safe space.   I know domestic abuse is very real, but sometimes there are accidents that happen.  
Dude, my nieces are awesome and I love them. I'll hug them and carry them around everywhere, including in public. No way I'm letting other people's opinions get in the way of being the best uncle I can be. If they don't like it, fuck 'em. They can't do anything to me. 
Wow same here man. I used to be fun and playful around kids but now I do exactly as you do, even towards my own relatives who are kids. It's a sad world we live in.  
At least there's a good part. The mom thanked you guys. I have read way too many Reddit stories if moms that either ignore you or flip out as if you had caused the fall.  Props to mom. 
I used to use a pretty basic rule to help this. I'd try to go on a date 3 times. If they gave an excuse for each one I'd stop trying. 1st time can consider it bad timing, second could be a fluke, third time though, they most likely aren't interested. If they are then they have to come to me at that point. I'd just stay friendly and accept that they want someone else to fill that part of their life. Nothing personal against me.    
I think your ex is paranoid, then.  Goodness, may as well not even have eye contact with children. 
I'm a straight guy who volunteers at the swimming pool, I train children aged 7-10 years twice a week. One parent has asked me multiple times why exactly I love doing it and one straight up told my superior she didn't trust me. It hurts.  
As a nurse considering pediatrics, this is a concern for me. Lifting kids around will be a lot easier on the back, but I suspect I'll be treated differently by many than a female would while caring for them. 
The worst about this is, that even if you didn't do anything wrong you could still get in trouble relatively easy. 
I hope that they didn't tell you that because they can't. It's a public park and you can sit and watch over your siblings whenever you want. Should have told them to kiss your ass, and if anyone has a problem they can come to you like an adult and not call the cops just because your a man. Sad part is I totally can see this happening and your a better person than I am because I would have fucking lost it. 
I'm married, and that sounds horrible. I can say if a woman on TV looks attractive, and my wife doesn't care. Its not like you'll ever meet them or anything. She says the same about guys.  Your girlfriend sounds very insecure. 
Dont they have train carriages for women only in Japan (i remember seeing these on my visit)?  
"Officer, if you'll just listen to the audio from the upskirt camera hidden in my shoe, you can clearly hear that she was just trying to extort me." 
I've lived in Japan for more than a decade and you are absolutely right about keeping your hands up - especially if you get wedged in. 
This is why I wear headphones and listen to music at the grocery store. Good luck throwing a fit at me when I can't even hear it happening! 
The two biddies really had nothing better to do?   ...people need more to do. 
I have been directly told that I do not blink often enough and that it made people uncomfortable. I haven't changed my blinking schedule, they will have to get over it. 
It sucks but hopefully now that we're all adults we can repair it. My wife and I are trying hard to involve her with my kids and our life. Fly her down a few times a year stuff like that.  The worst part was the doubt you could see in people's faces after the accusations were made. Guilty until proven innocent. 
This is one of the few things I hate about kids.Just because they're kids and innocent people usually believe them.Even if both are kids,like your story,they believe the younger one,who is probably dumber and that got them in trouble. 
Did she eventually come clean? That must have soured your relationship with her and her family. 
It's odd sadly. After this incident she and her mom moved out a few months later and we started seeing less and less of each other. I joined the Army when I was 18 and drifted farther away which was mostly my fault at that point. I've flown her down to visit and gone up to see her but I feel like she has alot of social issues.   It's hard to connect with her and I believe she's just kind of off and very withdrawn. I think her mom really did a number on her.   Her mother has several psychological issues. We had to report her to cps at one point because she was showing lots of signs of Munchausen syndrome by proxy. There were  a few interviews but my dad couldn't get custody and sadly my sister was raised by a crazy woman. 
Similar to this, my rule is to never have an office door closed when talking to a member of the opposite sex.   The couple of times I broke it because the woman was crying or upset at a private issue, I could see how vulnerable I was making myself to any accusations.  At all times I make an effort to invite another member of management in or at least an impartial witness if it is going to be closed door.   
I heard a story of a psychiatrist who had the "distance" part of his brain missing, he lacked spatial awareness. He would stand right in front of a person's face when talking to them, not know anything was wrong. When seeing patients, he would go into his office and sit on a patient's lap by mistake, because he didn't notice that was too close.  His solution was to always sit in his chair before talking to a patient, because he was unable to tell when he was too close to someone otherwise. 
"You're being fired"  "Why?"  "You're so fat you block the entire aisle, and try to blame other people by saying they're harassing you"  "Oh. Okay" 
Uhhhh that's a good one. Like the "I have a boyfriend" instant response some do - "I'm not a drug dealer, go somewhere else for your fix" should shut down annoying people pretty fast. 
I left the store to go sit in my car. I texted my wife what happened and she came out a few minutes later saying that she just left all the clothes on the floor and said she is not coming back to that Macy's.  
This is why I wear make up and dress as a lady in public. 
Curious to know what your lawyer would say exactly...   That said, I just would laugh at all of them and explain I'm here with my wife. Then I'd call the lady a creep and a sexist.  I've gone into the dressing room with my wife plenty of times (and stood outside of course), never had any problems. 
"Okay, I'll just let my daughter get ran over!"   They need to fuck off, they'll talk mess if he disciplined her but if something did happen, they would've gone off about how he didn't do anything.  
That's kind of strange. So girls are supposed to be all demure and ladylike, but you can't actually discipline them. Do they think we're, like, born with it?  
See in my experience no one bats an eye when its my son they probably assume he deserves it 
Most women *love* being complimented on a new haircut. As a general rule, stick to things that she put effort into, not things that are just part of her.   
Pass them and then slow down and start looking over your shoulder at them and lowkey panicking.  Then they have to feel bad. 
Hhaha! This reminds me of a tine my husband and I went to Atlantic City. We were walking on the board walk at night and we hear, "Don't be afriad, a black man is approaching you. I repeat, Don't be afraid!" My husband and I stop and turn around and this black guy comes up to us trying to sell us an electric alarm clock.  
She started walking faster so I thought "oh, she must hear the train coming" 
yah if i'm out with my bf and we're coming up behind a lone woman we'll just suck tongue the whole way past her to show her that our thoughts are only impure towards each other. 
As a woman who has been followed around the city at night multiple times, thank you for being so cool about it. That kind of thing would make me feel so much better.  
It's more than just not all men are looking to diddle your little kid, its the overwhelming majority, like 99.99% aren't looking to do that, and I've probably under shot that figure.  
I know exactly what you mean. If I take my kids to the park and then hang out on the bench to chill and watch, invariably I get approached by some woman feeling me out for whether I have a legit reason to be at the park. Last year, I was at the public library and I ran into my cousins kids. One came up to hug me and we were immediately approached by a librarian asking her if she knew me. I gave her my best "wtf, screw you" look. Absolutely boils my beans to even be suspected that way.  36M, but I'm 5'5" and 140 pounds. Some of your kids are bigger than me.    
And there's no test to prove their innocence.  It's always, "well it hasn't happened *yet*..." 
Can we just yell out "I'M NOT A RAPIST!"? Will that make people feel better? 
I do the opposite.  I make it a point to be nice and playful around kids so that people will maybe get used to the idea that not everyone who is paying attention to a kid is a pedo.    To be fair, I'm the least threatening looking dude there is. 
God forbid that you pass along knowledge about a subject that you love.  
That's enough to give nearly any man a heart attack. 
tbh yeah it looks pretty innocent when youve got headphones out just pickin up cans n shit n tossin em into your cart 
What the hell man?  Your wife was 10 feet away and you didn't bother explaining yourself?  
Omg... Why didn't I think of this, now I can finally leave the house. 
There is something deeply wrong with that dichotomy between disciplining girls and boys, and it seems to happen so unconsciously.  
Or just pepper spray them after ten feet. Gotta stay safe out there. 
I'm cracking up. "YES, I AM BLACK AND YES, I AM WALKING IN YOUR GENERAL DIRECTION." 
Or feels it in her feet, like a Native American in a movie 
And totally disregards the fact children are way more likely to be molested by someone they know. The "classic" creepy guy snatching random kids off the street almost never happens. 
If I saw a dad on a park bench, I'd be checking him out for a wedding ring tbh...especially if he was cute. but I'm a lecherous single mom..... 
Totally not on the same level, but here in the city where I live we have a lot of dog parks, and last summer I was hanging out with a good friend of mine, who has a dog (a gorgeous golden retriever named Blossom). So while said friend is chasing around his dog, I'm hanging back on a bench just enjoying the nice day, and oh man, all the nasty looks I got. Here I am thinking how nice it is to watch all the doggos play, and I'm even at least here with a friend who has a dog with him, shouldn't that be reason enough for me to be there? Some people are way too over-protective. 
There's nothing more scary,   or simply insane -   More deeply disturbing,   and hard to explain -   Alarming, disarming,   and apt to inflame...    Than eight-year-old girls chanting 'sex' in your name. 
Like Bill Burr said about the wife who cut off her husbands dick, if he cut off her tit no one would be laughing about it 
So I start to sprint down the hallway at her, and she looks back and she's like, "AHHHHHHHHH"  She gives chase, so now we're booking it down the corridor at 2 o' clock in the morning. 
If a kid accuses a relative of molesting them; "Dont you dare lie! They would never do that!"    If they accuse a random, extra points if it's a male, the parents go ape shit and try to get the town to witch hunt without proof.   No apologies issued once the truth is learned and no effort to repair the damage done to said persons reputation and in some cases the accusers will for no reason double down because "the police are wrong, my child would never lie".  
Oh all bets are off when it comes to Playing H.O.R.S.E at the basketball court. Drizzling 3s and lefty layups lol  
Honestly. I got anxious reading the second half of that story.  
Stare at their ass, then when they look back lick your lips.    The only way to own the situation. 
I'm absolutely going to do this. I am going to yell it as loud as I possibly can. 
Sharon osbourne laughing about genital mutilation on national tv... the rage holy shit..made my blood boil.  
I never understood this "children never lie" nonsense. Kids lie all the time, it's rarely malicious but if it keeps them out of trouble and they think they can get away with it, then they'll give it a go! 
Admit it, you got bested by a 5 year old at a running game. 
All the women start pressing their chests out and walking towards you.  "no! stop! I can't molest you! my hands are on the baggage rails!  
Don't forget that some kids are basically evil incarnate, and the others don't automatically have a perfect sense of empathy either. Guilt when dealing with other people needs to be taught, and understanding the long term consequences of your actions isn't really something kids are able to do. 
Easy. Wear sunglasses and pretend you're blind, by falling over at the top of the stairs because you thought there were more. 
I love right outside of Flint and have Detroit water. It's interesting driving around because you'll see apartment complexes with giant banners saying "WE HAVE DETROIT WATER" in a larger font than the actual name of the apartment complex. 
Travel to Flint for work from time to time. They are starting to replace some of the pipes. However, the cost to do it right is astronomically high. The state doesn't have the funds or the budget to do it. They are currently appealing to the federal government for funding. I still bring my own water.   Another fun Flint story. We had a few members from a hospital come to train with us. One of the people brought homemade cookies. They looked and smelled incredible. Nobody touched them. They sat on the break room table where something like that would be gone within 10 minutes. Even though we knew she lived in a city that was still on Detroit lines (Detroit City Water is some of the best tasting and cleanest water in the country) we couldn't get over the whole Flint water thing.  
Still won't drink the water. Sent a test to Davison, Mi and it came back okay to drink, but not gonna risk that.  Showering is fine.    
Sorry for my ignorance, but can't the people file a class action law suit or something? I'm no college boy, but I'm fairly certain us Americans are good at suing the shit out of people. 
I guess I'm looking at it from a UK standpoint, being such a small country this would make headline news everywhere for a while. And then you'd have all the national and EU agencies lining up to sanction the company (as all our water companies are private) to kingdom come if they didn't fix it.   I can't really quantify a country the size of the US and all the layers of bureaucracy that comes with your Federal system.  
So honest question.   Lead pipes were pretty much never used by the 1920's. A lot of people here are saying a big part of the problem is with the lines into the residence.  Does that mean that Flint continued to use lead pipes long after the rest of the country stopped using them, or that most of the houses are 100+ years old.  When you demolish a house to build new you would shut off the water and replace that line (especially if it was decades old lead).  
Live an hour from flint, half hour north of detroit.  All the pipes are fucked. Flint has it the worst BY FAR.  I had a sink hole open up a few miles from me.  It was a serious mess.  (Google fraser mi sink hole)  giant pipes packed full of sewage.  As in human waste.  However, there are *billions* of gallons of human waste dumping into the great lakes at an alarming rate.  I live not far from lake st clair, which is a connective lake between erie and huron.  In the last 30 years, almost all summer, ever summer, all the beaches are closed due to e coli poisoning. Everytime i walk along it, theres just pollution and dead fish everywhere.  There are also old oil lines that could go and cause major damage under lake superior (or maybe in the straigh5s)  but no one gives a shit.  Thats our drinking water!!!  It holds 20% of the fresh water in the world!  
I'll probably get buried since I'm here so late. From a suburb, roughly 40 minutes away, one of my friends just bought a house for super cheap in downtown. It's weird to see the water handout stations so close to my comfortable suburban midwest neighborhood. Lots of rumors that the Michigan AG is announcing new charges tomorrow. Hopefully things can get better down there.  
Wait, so the US has shitty electricity and STILL has cities without clean water. How is this possible when it's one of the largest and most developed economies in the world? 
What is with the current drought of [serious] tags in /r/askreddit? 
Not from Flint, but near the Detroit area. There was a loss of pressure from a power failure that resulted in bacterial contamination of our water supply. The city issued a warning telling us to boil all tap water for at least one minute before consumption. They closed down the drinking fountains at my high school as well. 
Would boiling water/using a pur or Brita water filter make the water decent? 
Wait is that still going on? I figured they fixed it and no one said anything. 
What habits do you think will stick with you when you graduate and move away in regards to your water consumption? 
What's the best way to donate funds for water relief? I want to donate but there are a lot of orgs with certain "fine prints". I'm unsure of which org to donate to; I want the donation to go directly toward clean water for the people.  
3 lead particles per billion sound small. How many billions of particles in a glass(500mL) of water? 
Even restaurants have that advertised in the front of their buildings. 
Why can't the Government force the water company to fix it, or why hasn't the company been sued out of existence. From an outsiders perspective it looks like the water company is being allowed to poison people and deny them a basic human right. 
Not a day goes by that I'm not glad I moved out of that shithole of a city. 
Hi, Fresnan here, and it's unsurprising as fuck. We are one of the most conservative counties in the entire state, while 50% of the people in the county rely on Medi-Cal and SNAP to survive on a daily basis. Our constituencies have been so overrun with false information that nobody is going to do shit about it. We know it's the pipes, we've known for literally decades, and nobody does shit about it. They literally go around blaming old house paint and Mexican pottery for the massively high lead levels in Fresno's children because if they can blame it on the poor and the minorities, they don't have to pull money out of other stupid shit like privitizing our trash collectors or a county-wide ban on cannabis. 
After Flint, and reading some of the reports on *why* and *how* the Flint water crisis happened, I went out and bought [brand name redacted] fancy pants, gravity-fed, water purification system. Not a filter, a purifier.   I no longer drink city water, period. I don't use it for cooking. Friends think I'm crazy until I start explaining *how* Flint happened, and then they ask me where to order a purifier and how to get a deal.    And we are in one of those areas with 'best in the country' water.    Nope. Done with city water everywhere. Period.  
Oh... jesus, I am so sorry. I wish there was something I could do, but I'm just a teenager- I do my best to remind myself of everything that's happening with Flint, just because I don't want you guys to be forgotten. No one deserves to be forgotten. 
You don't really use water for cookies, unless they were scared of how she washed her hands. 
So you wouldn't eat the cookies because the town she lived in had some lead water pipes even though the water supply to her house was from the next town with clean water?  Why? There's no lead. 
I don't know why but that cookie story struck me in my sad bone. :( 
I honestly wonder why the utility companies that use these pipes are not covering a majority of the costs. 
Are they only planning/hoping to replace the main lines?  Aren't private lines still fucked?  The costs would be insane to replace those as well...but what choice do they have?  Christ, all this because they tried to save a few million dollars. 
If you aren't going to trust the test what was the point of having it done? 
Sure, but the repairs are already under way and no amount of suing anyone is going to make it faster or less expensive.  
It takes money to sue, and the many of the people hit are below the poverty line. A class-action suit could start up sometime, but it's hard to be excited about a dollar and change in compensation, which is how most class-actions end up. 
They just dont give a shit. Poor black people really dont have a voice over there. And the people privileged enough to have the power to potentially fix it are so lost in yankee jingoism they refuse to accept there is a serious problem.  
Im pretty sure most city water pipes are made of lead. Which isnt a problem, usually.  Flint is having trouble because of the other chemicals in the water that have corroded the pipes.  Im no chemist, but i know my city has lead pipes and the waters good.  
It costs a lot of money to be in perpetual war with eight different countries. 
It used to be one of the largest and most developed economies in the world.  
I wish the mods would just make a rule that all threads be serious. Damn near every thread without it turns into a shit show.  
Graduated from college there 2 years ago, havent lived there for a year, still only drink bottled water unless im desperate. Rarely ever did before 
Probably going to drink less tap water or run a filter on it  Definitely don't gargle water as much as I did before, although not sure if that chances anything in lead consumption  I'm huge on spring water as opposed to purified water and most donated water was purified so I still drank flint water for most of the time 
Before the state really jumped in and started helping with water it was a lot of churches that helped, I volunteered with a Catholic Church that was on the North-east side so they had a lot of the really poor coming in need  Inb4 someone says that they were just trying to push their religion on people, those wonderful people sat in a garage behind the church like it was a full time job and unloaded more than a couple semi trucks full of water even though they were in their mid- 70's  Currently, I know Flint Rising is okay, but one group a friend works for has issues with them but nothing major but I can't recall the name of the group he works with. I personally like the Catholic Charities of Genessee County for their work with the homeless but I don't know how much they do with water distribution 
"Detroit water" out of this context would make me shy away from that restaurant... 
Yeah, I stopped at the Chipotle on Miller on Saturday and was surprised they had a "our water is pure" sign in their window. Like, no kidding, you're the Township. 
That was the exact complex I was thinking of. It's over on Linden I think. 
Because the water company *is* the government (of Flint), in this case.  
I always said Fresno was the worst place I've ever lived. And then I went to college in Texas City, TX. 
I used to live in the central coast of cali (SLO) and this sounds spot on. People assume Cali is some magical liberal "paradise" and just like any other place it has both sides of the political spectrum. 
Wait doesn't Fresno supply tons of food to the country? Lead soaked food?  
Oh God. I'm about to move back to Fresno from Texas. I don't know which is worse. Please halp. 
It's hard to understand just how bad the housing market was and is in certain areas of SE Michigan if you haven't lived there.  While nowhere near as bad as the person you replied to, I bought a house near Ann Arbor in 2005 for $159k.  Got rid of it via short sale in 2011 for $59k because I had to move to another state for work.  I was one of the lucky ones because I could afford to hire a lawyer and go the short sale route instead of foreclosure to get out of the house.  Most areas of the state have had a chance at some level of recovery but Flint got royally fucked. 
It is possible to buy a *house* for 24k in the USA? Holy crap  Our cheapest houses cost maybe 600k, without any land to speak of. 
The problem is the pipes. There's tons of lead in the pipes now, so as the clean water comes through, it's bringing lead with it.  
The water is provided municipally. There is no third party company using these pipes. Maybe I'm misunderstanding your question? 
Part of the "problem" is that many people aren't paying their water bills. Also there's a lot of empty homes, which don't generate revenue, either.  Remember that this entire crisis started because Flint decided to leave Detroit Water because they were too expensive. They needed to save money because people aren't paying their bills and also because there are many properties that aren't using water and so aren't generating significant revenue.   Everybody says that things like this don't happen in the Detroit suburbs. That's certainly the case, but being near municipal bankruptcy and needing to cut costs also doesn't happen in the Detroit suburbs. 
Yea, but they can sue for damages and what not. Not saying they should, but they can. "Because of your neglect x tragedy happened and y outcome became of it where it wouldn't have if water was clean" or something along those lines 
Could you maybe... I don't know... Maybe.. just... You know... Stop that? 
It still is. That doesn't translate directly into wonderful infrastructure, unfortunately. 
I interviewed for a job in Flint recently and the organization put me up in a hotel inside city limits.  The hotel had free bottled water for guests.  I had no idea how much water I go through doing something as simple as brushing my teeth, or how much water pressure is really required to get your toothbrush clean of toothpaste.  Pouring water out of a bottle just doesn't have the pressure to do it.  I'd go through an entire bottle just during that part of my bedtime routine between rinsing my mouth and my brush.  I'm just glad it was only a two night stay, as opposed to my daily life for years and years. 
The Catholic church gets alot of flak on reddit i dont blamed them but it is a giving church and bible thumping is frown upon in my area 
Yup, the church that I used to go to held monthly water drives when it was at its peak news air time. If they were having one and my wife and I were grocery shopping, I'd buy a couple of cases of bottled and a few gallon jugs to drop off.  I haven't seen anything in a while though but I'm sure the interest in it started to diminish along with the news coverage.  
Catholics will help anyone, without judging them or trying to convert them.  
I don't mean to have a go at other christian faiths, but catholics faith in general takes the whole "helping others" part of christianities a lot more seriously. It's a pity it's also responsible for some horrors like the sisters of magdalene, but modern catholicism is pretty decent  and not heavy on the proselytizing 
Detroit actually sits on one of the largest freshwater sources in the world. The city may have issues, but the water isn't one of them.  
Outside the financial shape of the DWSD (largely thanks to Kwame) it can be said that Detroit has some of the consistently best water in the country. Consider as well that same department run and owned by the city also supplies different municipalities in Monroe, Washtenaw, Wayne, Oakland, Macomb, Lapeer, St Clair, Sanilac and into Genesee counties. Among those areas are some of the richest cities in the country which includes West Bloomfield, and Birmingham for instance. There's no way the amount of money in those areas is going to settle for crappy water. 
When I first learned the township was fine, I was relieved I could visit Sagano's still lol  
Can't the Federal Government do anything as it's about water, and surely they can still be sued to high heaven.  
Exactly. People constantly talk about it as if it's a liberal hive mind. I think most people don't realize how big California is, and how diverse the people are. Most of the liberal areas are down south and on the coast, but even then it's a mixed bag. And then; when you go anywhere out in the countryside or Central Valley, it seems to get a lot more Republican.   Moving from Monterey to Chico for school really opened my eyes to it. Chico specifically is strange, because a lot of the people associated with the university are left-leaning, while most of the people who live in Chico and aren't involved with the school are right-leaning. Makes for a weird atmosphere.   
population density.  Look up election results by county and you will see that the highest concentration of people in the state is where its blue, so the bay area and the LA-san diego area are blue which is where majority of california's population lives. 
Fresno was weird to me, after a few days in Redding and SF I spent a few days there to catch an antique tractor auction and I felt like I was in a Saskatchewan town with better looking people.  
From SLO too (hi neighbor!) and while I love the area its sad how much of this is true 
Anyone driving through the Central Valley would think they somehow ended up in a conservative county in Texas. It's insane how different the interior of the state is from the coast. 
Yup. Born in Fresno, raised in Bakersfield, now live in Los Angeles and its the strangest thing in the world to me that less than 100 miles from where I live now are living in a political ecosystem completely the opposite of what i'm in.   also a huge culture shock, growing up in Bakersfield, to go to LA and see that liberals actually exist 
People are SO SURPRISED when I talk about certain California towns I wouldn't be caught dead living in (lest I be caught actually dead). Like Huntington Beach with their John Birch Society, or Mariposa having the only remaining active KKK branch in the entire state.   To be honest, I kind of hope the liberal moves that Gov. Brown keeps making literally does flush all of the conservative garbage out of the state. They're so fucking backwards and obstructionist that they end up bulldozing the exact same people they hold on their shoulders to get support for (disabled veterans being the one I'm thinking of the most). 
You can buy houses in Detroit/Chicago for less than $1,000.  
What country are you in? And even other cities will have houses around $50k. I think the average American home costs something like $150k. 
No you were right, its just where I am from the city rents out the pipes  
If I lived there I definitely wouldn't be paying my water bill  
Yeah, I'm usually pretty hesitant to say I'm practicing Catholic on Reddit.  My top comment ever I edited after the fact and thanked someone for gold and said I was surprised a comment I made real quick before an Easter Vigil mass got so much attention and within 10 minutes of the edit, I got a "fuck you for that edit, I'm downvoting" reply 
Bible thumping and super in your face religious stuff is more so Baptist and weird version of protestant sects than Catholic anyways. I don't get why Catholics get a bad rap, literally least weird Christians I know. Granted I did grow up Catholic, but like it was so much less intense than other people's churches 
This really puts into perspective the potential fuck up that could've happened.  
Right but it's the pipes that made the water bad right? 
Might be a good idea to buy some cheap land in Detroit and sell it when water becomes more scarce. 
I live in a suburb that uses Detroit water.  It is hands down the best water I've ever drank or had to use. 
And this is why they want to change their name, lol. 
I think I heard somewhere that it would cost less to build a new town for everyone in flint to live in than to replace all of the lead pipes. 
The Federal government does not care my friend. There are immigrants trying to take field jobs from Americans, drug-users trying to self-medicate with a plant that has minimal side-effects, poor people not paying enough for healthcare... The Feds are busy, and they don't care about something as innocuous (to them) as bad water in an already bad area. 
Ah, if only there were a government agency given the authority to monitor and correct problems with the environment such as this. Oh well.. 
It smells, it's muggy, it's heavily segregated by race, and every time a hurricane comes they get shit on. I lost half my roof, all of my windows, and my entire back fence during Ike. Ike was the nail in the coffin for me staying in Texas. Only good things that came outta that for me were House of Pies in Houston, Whataburger, and my ex-girlfriend. 
My mom lives in San Jose and I live in rural North Carolina. She couldn't fathom a trump victory despite me explaining what it was like trying to talk politics with the locals  
I was born in Turlock and lived in Modesto, Ceres, Hilmar and Oakdale at one point or another until my early teens.   I moved to west Texas when I was in junior high and almost immediately was treated like a walking California stereotype. They acted like California was just one big beach full of stoners, scantily clad gay men, liberal arts professors, and movie stars.   Meanwhile, I come from a family of Dairy Farmers and Manure Spreaders. They are as conservative as any west Texas cotton farmer.  
Hey ya, Redding here. Even weirder atmosphere here.  
Why does everyone hate on Saskatchewan as some sort of backwards conservative place? Saskatchewan was the first province to implement single-payer healthcare leading to federal adoption Canada-wide, it is the birthplace of the NDP which is the left-most major party and is the source of many union movements.  Until they tapped oil ca. 2001 I guess. 
Oh man, I know the feeling. The first time I went to WeHo lmfao. The Castro in SF was even more of a culture shock. Not bad, just "wow there are gay people just kissin' in public here and no half-drunk peckerwoods in lifted F150s driving by and cussing and throwing beer bottles at them" 
Berkey, along with several other expensive water purifiers, are scams. They report lots of medical benefits that aren't actually backed up, and none are FDA approved for what they say they do. Most aren't even sold in stores, and can only be bought through Multi-Level-Marketing (Pyramid Schemes). If you're still interested in buying it, do some research on it before you pay close to $500 for a water filter. 
Ive heard stories of farmers buying a few city blocks of the $1 homes in detroit and turning it into farms. Not sure if any of it is true but thats what ive heard. 
Probably low risk, but the real question is, are you willing to risk it? 
Well, even in that case, it wouldn't be up to the company that rents the pipes to replace them.   When you rent a house and works needs to be done on it, the renter isn't the one that pays for it, the owner is. 
Nah I get it. With the shit you guys have gone through, I would want a little better than "okay to drink".  
Not really. The problem wasn't that there's lead in river they draw their water from, it's that they didn't treat the water properly and as a result lead from the pipes in the city leeched into the tap water.   The Great Lakes are amazing and need to be protected, but I don't think there's too much concern about possible legionnaires disease out breaks from Great Lakes contamination. There's 8 States, and also Canada, who are all heavily invested in the conservation of the Great Lakes.  
True, doesn't matter how fresh the water is if it's filtered through shitty pipes.  
You joke, but have you ever seen those maps where it shows you what the world will look like post-climate change? Michigan is one of the only viable living options in the US - far enough away from the coasts to avoid heavy storms and flooding, plenty of fresh drinking water. In almost any apocalyptic scenario, including zombies, Michigan is the place to be. Property prices in Detroit are increasing and are expected to increase steadily over the next decade or two at least - now is a good time to buy, if you're interested in an apocalyptic safe house. 
I have to show this to my CA born wife. Shes thinks im fussy because i refuse to drink the stuff that comes out of the pipes in CA. I drank tap water all my life until i moved out west. 
Is it weird that I want to try Detroit water now? I mostly grew up with well water and haven't found anything better other than extra filtered water stores. 
How does it compare to the Hetch Hetchy water San Francisco gets?  
This would not be the first time a town in Michigan has done this to solve a problem (mining town in the upper peninsula did that) 
Yeah, rebuild the town with the same poison pipes, that'll work.  
The federal government sent 100 Million dollars to Michigan to fix the issue 
Lol Americans wanting to work field jobs. GOOD ONE  
God I miss House of Pies- Bayou Goo is one of the best things I've ever eaten in my life.  
San Jose area here. Silicon Valley is arguably the most liberal part of the country. Conservatives are few and far between, which definitely creates a sort of echo chamber. 
Isn't Redding reallly country and conservative? My only experience with it is Fallout 2 and driving through it on my way to OSU for the Shakespeare Festival 
I'm not hating on Sask, more reference to it being a farming town feel and not a-typical Cali feel.  
Dude... I looked at some of these houses. Based on looks from the outside alone, those are houses that go for 1200 a month in my city. Holy shit. I can't imagine that kind of struggle.  
Air drying is actually safer than towel drying because towels spread the bacteria around.  
Lead is a cumulative poison. Being exposed to a small quantity of it once probably won't do anything to you. It's when it becomes a chronic dosage that you get serious problems. That's why Flint's water is such a problem even though the actual lead content is still really small. Because people constant use and drink water, the lead starts to build up in their body. 
No but if a company couldn't function they could at least loan the city money and/or front the cost so that they didn't have to completely shut down operations and the city could repay them with interest.  
Flint decided to not use corrosion prevention chemicals in their distribution system. This entire clusterfuck to save thd cost of a 300 dollar chemical pump and a few thousand dollars a year in blended phosphates.  I've been in drinking and waste water applications for over a decade...Flint was just bad management decisions from the top down.   
Yeah, the legionnaires only care about Hoover dam, anyway. 
True but slightly misleading. The issue is pH changes. The pipes have been stripped of contaminates at their current pH thanks to our grandparents and the old dead people. Change the pH and you start to strip the remaining contaminants still in the pipe. Simply put, don't change the pH in systems with bad pipes.  Flint went to a new water source and they dramatically changed the pH in the process. Flint has 3 choices now. Replace pipes, filter at the tap, or wait a few decades for the pipes to do what they did decades ago. Given the nearly non-existent recovery effort it is clear what choice they took. It's the cheapest too!  
I'm from ann arbor and live in CA. I drink the tap water both places.  I maintain that A2 has some of the best tap water in the world, but it's perfectly drinkable in California.  I mean it's water not expensive wine, I don't drink it for the taste and unless it's downright awful it's always refreshing. 
Just stating the truth like it is - add a little more spice, Synder should rot in prison until the Flint water issue is fixed.   Where are the DeVos's and their $$ at now? Oh right, they're out there cutting funding to public school while calling on the gift of charity to make up for the cuts - I might believe them if they actually put their money where their mouths are and helped Flint residents - but Flint is full of poor, black people and that is just not DeVos worthy. 
I worked field/labor jobs for most of my teens. It's damn good money considering. 
Thanks! I worked a field job for all of 6 days in high school before I noped out, that was nearly twenty years ago now - I can't imagine teens today doing that today, to imagine adults doing it? Hell no. If immigrants don't do that work for us, we're not going to!  
I almost forgot that there still are people who actually understand macro economics. 
If the government prints money it lowers the value of the dollar in you pocket (inflation) which is the same as a tax.  So yes we all pay for government spending. 
North Idahoan here. I live in a Republican Echo chamber. The town I live in is a retirement mecca. We are being overrun by retiring Californians, most of them conservative. I can't even talk to my family about Trump without them freaking out for questioning his policies. I'm now a piece of liberal garbage. Trying to explain to them that the Trumpcare bill will triple Grandma's monthly Medicare premiums is impossible. They called me a liar. WTF? Just watch the news! Any news! They've turned into ostriches and I don't understand it.  
It really is. The town is changing a lot because we've been attracting a lot more things than Ag, like software and green energy. We're never gonna completely become LA or SF tho, ag is just too important here.  
Can confirm.   Just moved to Los Angeles, am paying $2,100/month for a 1 bedroom with no air conditioning, no parking and no laundry.  Decent tap water though.  It's like you're fucked either way. 
Why should they pay for it? They aren't a utility company and a bank. Banks give loans with interest. 
Speaking as a former Flint resident, I would bet a large sum of money that it wasn't a "decision" to not use corrosion prevention chemicals, more that it was so poorly managed that no one realized that A) it needed to be in place or B) it wasn't put in place already. I have a hard time believing that anyone would deliberately say "nah we don't need to not leach lead into the water supply," especially given the huge investigation that followed.  
So basically this shouldn't happen anywhere else any time soon hopefully? Sorry haven't looked into it too much, but you sound like you know shit.   Pun intended probably. 
Even then they don't have the resources to win. GO NCR!!! 
Hey man, I like spicy. I consider myself a spice expert, and this is some Grade A primo spice.  
Exactly. Nobody else is going to pick fruit in the hot sun for minimum wage 
I hate to break this to you, but what this guy is saying is not part of "standard" macroeconomics. It is a heterodox school of macroeconomics called "Modern Monetary Theory" which has a terrible track record of working in practice.  \*cough\* Zimbabwe  \*cough\*  
My extremely conservative mother has voiced, with no sense of irony, a fear that if undoing Obama's policies is the worst option, and that Obama's policies were the more viable ones, then we're doomed as a nation because a (black) Democrat was a better leader than a Wall Street "Actual American". 
Ag is a money maker look at Illinois yeah its been irresponsible with its money but its the 5th wealthiest state 791 billion in gdp 
Well I figured that maybe it's just because nobody lives there and people don't want to live in empty areas. But assuming I'd be ok with it, what else should I be expecting? 
The Safe Drinking Water Act comprehensively outlines the testing that needs to be done on public water supplies for just this reason.  Anyone working with drinking water systems lives and breathes it every day.  It also has guidelines on the exact procedure to follow if a violation occurs.  It's literally just following instructions. 
Hate to break it to you but it's happening in a lot of places in the US and it's heavily underreported, too. 
Wasn't the NCR's army big enough to defeat your Securitrons and the Three Families? Indeed it was - and still is. But not without taking significant casualties vegas belongs to me because I mustered enough strength to bring the NCR to the bargaining table 
I spent too much of my life in Michigan, I always have a little spice waiting for them :) Beautiful state, some great people, but holy shit they have a bad state government, and I know way too many people who got taken by salesman Trump in Michigan.  
No shit not for minimum wage but for a wage that is actually acceptable for a job like that and sure I'd work it.  
Like general affection, even with hugs and compliments I'm pretty reserved unless our relationship is clearly drawn out and we both know that nothing is being implied 
Not me, but my little sister started dressing as the stereotypical butch lesbian when she went off to college. Said that it made things a little easier.  I'm still not sure how to respond. 
Trying to politely decline their advances. Sometimes I have to be rude just for them to get the point.   
Asking a question or giving them a compliment.   But the worst thing is when I've walked back to my car alone and in the dark. I'd been out that day and was wearing cute and kind of revealing clothes. A guy followed me from the train station to where I'd parked (about 10 minutes), and when I got in my car he started to yell at me for leading him on. We hadn't spoken, but we'd made eye contact a couple of times on the hour long train ride, which seemed to be enough for him.  I didn't think that the phrase "leading someone along" was so literal, but okay.  
Let's just say I don't eat bananas in public anymore.  
If I have to pick something off the ground I bend my legs and squat down to do it so it doesn't look like I'm showing off my ass, even though it'd be a lot easier to just bend down. 
I've stopped using voice chat in dota because as soon as my team finds out I'm a girl, they start saying all kinds of creepy shit. 
Today, apparently, I shouldn't have carried a nightstand down the street. It was a little awkward but not heavy at all, and some dude came up to me and tried to take it from my hands, unasked. I held onto it and told him, "no thanks." He kept pulling on it. I had to ask him to let go. When I said "Jesus Christ" he went on, "oh, like it was such a bad thing." Yes, dude, that was *absolutely* a bad way to try to help someone out. You don't take something from someone's hands unbidden if you actually want to help them. Frankly, you *pulling* a medium-large object from my grasp makes me think you're trying to steal from me or con me. 
Mentioning that I have a girlfriend, weirdly enough. You know how saying you have a boyfriend is normally pretty good for making guys go away? Well, saying you have a girlfriend just leads to a bunch of gross questions and offers of "if you're ever looking for a threesome, hit me up" (gag). Like what, does this guy think I'll go home and excitedly tell my gal pal, "Guess what? I met a guy at a bar, and, you won't believe this, he wants to have SEX with BOTH of us!! What a rare and exciting offer, we need to take him up on this!"  
Not accepting any favor from a man. No rides. No coffees. Avoid avoid. It sucks.  
there was that time when i was eleven and i started needing a training bra and my teacher gave me a weird talk about keeping bra straps hidden at all times? i didn't even know how to properly adjust the straps so they wouldnt slide and i really didn't need Mr. N's bra strap advice as an impressionable eleven year old 
whenever I'm talking with a guy I'm always super conscious about not mentioning too soon/too late that I have a significant other. Too soon and its 'geeze bitch god I  was just making conversation!!!!' and too late and it's 'geeze bitch way to lead me on!!!!'. Thankfully since becoming engaged, this is less and less of a problem as my ring sort of speaks for itself on its own without my input. :) 
I'm thinking more in terms of social media, but I've found if a guy messages me and I send back so much as a polite 'hello' that guy will never leave me alone. Every couple months he'll pop up trying to start a conversation, usually being rude or lewd, long after I've stopped messaging him. Last time it happened the guy had been trying this for a while and right now I'm 7 months pregnant and in a serious relationship and I just went off on him. It's so sad that it has to come to that. And I know it's just a few delusional, ridiculous guys that do this but Jesus...what on Earth makes them think this behavior is ever going to get them anywhere? 
I'm quite fat and face none of the issues you gals do. Bonus, maybe?! I get to be nice and talkative and be invisible. 
Showing any kind of concern for a guy. Like if you have a guy friend that looks sad and you try to be a good friend and comfort them that's seen as flirting somehow. (plus most of the stuff everyone else posted)  
When I was 13, my dad warned me against talking one-on-one with guys. He said that exclusivity could be interpreted as flirting. So yeah, that I guess.  
I don't ask random men for directions anymore.   One time I was taking the greyhound bus for the first time by myself. Asked a random guy where the line for where I wanted to go was. He didn't know but he was also looking for the same line. We agreed to look together (why not?) and ended up sitting next to each other and chatting.   2 hours into the 5 hour bus ride he says he's "tired" and then falls asleep. Wraps his arm around me while he's "asleep" and then starts kissing my neck. I was so uneasy and scared in that moment bc I didn't know how he'd react to me pushing him off and I didn't want to make a scene. Also the seats were all full, half with actual sleeping people so switching wasn't really an option. I was leaning almost fully into the aisle to get away from him.   Eventually he "woke up" and THEN asked if I had a boyfriend and wanted to date him. I promptly turned him down and listened to music for the next 3 awkward as hell hours  
So what I've gathered from the two threads is that neither side can be friendly to the other out of fear of misunderstandings thus leading to a positive feedback loop 
In addition to what others have mentioned, I've had to deliberately force myself to stop squeeing or smiling at puppies being walked by single men who aren't obviously gay, because of the frequency with which interest in the puppy gets interpreted as interest in the human. 
During my pre-pubescent years I had a lot of male and female friends and I found it easy to talk to both genders because I treated both the same way--as if they were full people deserving of my interest and attention during a conversation. During the teenage years I realized that more and more of my male friends started dropping off because they assumed that my friendship meant that I was really in love with them. In early adulthood I became apprehensive to even start friendships with men and as a mid-20s adult I am apprehensive to even hold deep conversations with men lest they expect something in return. Sure, I'll do small talk and am friendly but I won't ever let you know me or try to get to know you unless I know for SURE that you're not one of *those* guys who thinks that women are incapable of holding an engaged conversation unless they crave the D.  
Not female, but I've noticed one.  Bananas.  Women don't peel it and then slip its length into their mouth.  They break it off in small chunks.    Guys, otoh, just gobble down on that thing... 
Went to a bar with partner and friends.  Wasn't standing next to partner while talking.  Immediately started getting hit on by strangers.  Attached myself to partner for the rest of the night. 
I don't change anything, if a guy interprets my friendliness or outfit as flirting that's his problem and I'll keep on being nice and wearing what I like   But generally I'm the one hitting on the guys I'm interested in so there's no room for guys I'm not into to step in  There was that one time some guys tried to steal me from my date when he went to the bathroom and I was like "I'm drunk, I'm not going with you lol"   Im generally friendly to everyone who seems nice but I have heard from my friends that I give off a dominant and intimidating vibe when I'm out, so maybe I'm just scaring them off  
Along the same lines of all these--making new guy friends. I have a lot in common with guys, but almost every guy I've befriended has asked me out at some point, and after I decline (as nicely as possible) they don't want to be my friend anymore.   So I've come to assume that guys don't want girl friends. They want *girlfriends*. And so my boyfriend is basically my only friend. Being a pretty, boyish girl is a lonely life.  
Not itching my boob in front of guys, even though it's really itchy. 
I used to always try and talk to my guy friends and get to know them. I just wanted to be there for them to listen to them vent and genuinely take an interest in what they're saying and give my best advice. They confided in me and I cared about them. 9 times out of 10 the guy would think I wanted more and would try to and take it to the next level and then we'd end up having to stop being friends and it sucked.   Now I don't do that and try my hardest to ignore guy friends that want to talk about their feelings or give them a more generic answer instead of going in depth. Which I feel really bad about when they "need someone to talk to" and I'm the one they reach out to, but I feel like it's better for the both of us.  
Late to the party, but I once offered to do my male friends dishes while at a party at his house. The mother of his 3 week old child was super pissed he invited me and two other friends over, and when I offered to do the dishes bc he kept mentioning how disgusting they were, she almost punched me in the face.   After that I stoned and drunkenly walked to another friends house to sleep. These friends had their band friends from another state coming over to crash, and most of us were sitting on the porch. I commented to the one guy as he was walking inside, "wow! Your pillow looks so comfortable!". Everyone proceeded to tell me how slutty and awful that sounded. Like what the fuck??? I genuinely just wanted to know where this fluffy pillow came from, and help my friends with a newborn get their house cleaned up.   I just don't speak to any of these people anymore :/ 
I remember in girl with the dragon tattoo when the villian says "you'll be amazed at what people do because they don't want to be rude" and I feel like half of the crap we put up with is because we want to be nice or polite.   (This was from the movie and I paraphrased I don't remember the book very well) 
I once gave a compliment to my friend on a party. I just said his shirt looked nice on him when he thought it was too small. And then all his peers went "ooooooooooooooooooh" behind him. I just really wanted to compliment my friends and I do it all the time. :( I never gave a compliment to him ever again.  
I torment a male coworker every time I see him eating a banana, we give each other shit all the time  
I do this too! Except I'm a 6'4 man and in reality it's just because finding pants that are long AND skinny is very difficult, I have far too few casual belts, and I don't want to literally show off my ass. 
"Omg is that a grill gamer?" "Marry me" "Suck my dick"  Every time I start talking in an Overwatch comp... 
Maybe mute the ones that do act up and just speak to the "normal" ones? Dota is pretty cancerous in general though  
Also... who the fuck are you random guy? Am I supposed to just trust you with my stuff?  
About doing something without warning... I made the mistake of saying out loud I was cold and got a jacket almost forcibly put on me (I went the awkward way and practically ran away saying "No thanks" to avoid it being put on my body). Can't you ASK instead of DO? I am shy and not comfortable with people's clothes on my person randomly like that without warning or consent..      Edit to clarify: we were not on a date, or in a dating situation, I wasn't talking to them, just thinking out loud, a passing comment, I was walking on my own, and I didn't want them to ask, or the bloody jacket, but If at least they had asked I could have refused instead if having to run away from said jacket...  
Oh my god, the Gaming Pop Quiz. I'm so glad someone finally mentioned it. I also once had a boy interrogate me on Attack On Titan because I casually mentioned in a conversation that I saw one episode and thought it was interesting. 
Don't change your behaviour for crazy, this just makes the world a little more crazy. 
What I hate more is when they tell me it's just because I've NEVER HAD A REAL MAN BEFORE. JEEZ I know confidence is sexy but your dick is not magic, it cannot un-gay me tyvm. 
LOL this.   Wish I thought of mentioning it.  Happens more often than people think too!   "SWEET, babe! We, as committed girlfriends, just SCORED some DICKKKKKK tonighttttt!!! Woooo!!! Can't wait to partake in the threesome ((with a man)) our poor lesbian bodies DESPERATELY craved!"   *rolls eyes indefinitely* 
Do women also do this to gay guys, or is it the kind of reasoning the second brain down there can come up with? 
Yep. Last year I ran into a coworker at the supermarket, and he offered to help me out with my groceries. We get to my car, and all of a sudden I'm arguing with him for 10 minutes about why I don't want to date him.  I started off joking, then got serious; Finally I just got in the car and left.  
I take this a step farther and never let a man pay for the first date. It's a great litmus test for assholes.  
I agree with this so much. I had a male friend rant on facebook that women get so much "free" stuff: free drinks, free coffees, get out of tickets... I just replied "it's NEVER free". Something's always expected, whether it's as small as a conversation or as invasive as sex. I don't accept anything free from men after a few terrible experiences, it's just not safe. 
36, I was just thinking of all the creepy advances i used to get when I was 16-25ish I was told once to "not lick my lips" because it seemed I was flirting. I had one guy follow me off a flight because I chatted with him,he wouldn't leave and he hung out with me until my next flight. I haven't had too many things happen lately. I'm attributing it to age, and I'm so totally fine with that.  
Ah yes. 44 here and finally getting treated like a human being by men.  
I like to casually bring it up in conversation, that way I don't seem like a bitch for just straight up saying I have a bf.   For example: the other day in class this guy is talking to me, tells me he's going into engineering. I'm like "Oh that's cool, my bf is going into engineering as well."   Now he knows I have a bf and can continue talking to me if he wants with that knowledge.  
Oh my god, THIS. Don't get me wrong, I love being with my partner, but this is one of the things I hate most about being in a relationship. Have considered wearing an engagement ring, even though we're not actually engaged, just for the purpose you mentioned. 
There's lots of ways to seamlessly work your SO into a conversation though. I once had a friend who thought the only way to mention that you're in a relationship was to abruptly say "Hey. I'm taken." But really you can say...   "Oh yeah, I like that too, but my boyfriend likes..."   "That reminds me of when my girlfriend said..."   "Oh cool! My boyfriend and I want to go there!"   "That reminds me of the time my girlfriend and I..."   You get the idea. I feel like I could be having a conversation with someone and be able to relate almost anything they say back to my girlfriend if I really wanted to.  
Came here to say this. I'm a naturally smiley person and smile when I talk to people and just to be friendly, but I have to be careful about it if I notice a guy taking it the wrong way.  I had one coworker who took it way, way too far and I ended up having to show him a picture of my ex boyfriend and I together and buy a cheap ring to wear to get him to back off. All because I smiled when I talked. 
Yep. I was gonna say this. I had a stock worker in Wal-Mart follow me several aisles to ask me my name. (This is incredibly alarming since, from previous experience, I've deducted that Wal-Mart employees are trained to run away from customers who might ask for help. But he was cute, so that took away from the creepiness, and I did not feel threatened.) He was all "You were flirting. Why else would you smile at me?" Silly me. I thought I was just being a civil human being.  
The other side of this is "DUDE, you idiot, how did you not see that she was into you?"   'well it seemed she was just trying to be ni--'   "Oh great, got the slow class today." 
Hey I saw your post.   HI    hey   HOW are you   hey  
Pop media and rom coms have taught guys to be creepily persistent. 
I've bounced back and forth between being fat and skinny my whole life. I kinda like being fat better to be honest. I don't get cat called, told to smile, unwanted advances ect. People treat me normally. It's nice. I can just be myself and not get harassed.  Puberty hit me like a ton of bricks. I was tall for my age, blonde, and busty at 12. I had adult men making disgusting comments towards me. I wore baggy clothes to make myself look fatter than I was. I guess I did it as a defence mechanism.   Just because a kid has large breasts doesn't mean they need to hear what sexual things you want to do to them.  
Not just that, but you've now given a clear green light for them to now seize every opportunity possible to talk about all the feelings they've had building up over the years that they've never shared with anyone else. You become their sole emotional support system when you were just trying to be a normal friend once.  
When I was 13, my Dad told me "nobody can think with a hard on" and "an erect dick has no conscience"   which, applied to 13 year old boys, wasn't bad advice    
I literally could have written this post. I always loved having friends of both genders throughout my childhood and even some of my adolescence (it helped that I was a bit of an ugly duckling), but the older (and more attractive?) I got, the more complicated things became. I really hate having to be so cold to most men, but it's just the path of least resistance socially. :/  
The absolute **last** thing I would want to do at 3am is teach someone how to drive a manual transmission.  
So much this. It bothers me how many other guys go up and bother women while they are at the gym. Like, seriously bro we are all just here for the gains stop bothering every girl who tries to get her lift on. 
Oh my god. I feel like men see big tits as an invitation for them to tell me what they think and/or would do to my body. It's fucking gross. 
"It's hard to believe the fear of offending can be stronger than the fear of pain but, you know what? It is, and they always come willingly." 
That's because if you're not over the top polite they flip their shit on you and tell you that they hope you die, or worse start stalking you or something and won't leave you alone and send you weird messages about how they masturbated a bunch to you today. I wish that what I just said isn't a true story for me, but it is. 
Oh definitely. It was scary though. Now I don't walk anywhere in the dark without being on the phone to somebody, in case something happens.  
My husband does this, and he's really good at convincing people that's how he's done it his whole life and he has never considered any other way to eat a banana. "Umm, how the fuck else am I supposed to eat it?" People get SO UPSET. 
Fat bloke here, I just keep one leg straight and swing the other one out behind me as a counterweight 
I remember I added a few people on my team because we played extremely well. We continued playing together for a few weeks and it was totally cool up until my bro accidentally referred to me as "she." Since then the guys I added started attempting to flirt and ask me inappropriate questions. Sucks too coz we made a pretty good team but they just had to ruin it by being creepers. 
You get the pop quiz about anything remotely nerdy, not just video games.  Books, comics, movies, table top games,  so many quizzes....  
This. And believe me that woman is still giving the guy shit whether you acknowledged him or not. If his eyes so much as strays, whether it's looking out for traffic or making sure a stranger doesn't get too close while walking on the street, if she feels even a little threatened by someone she feels is eye candy then it's day ruined for the both of 'em.  Your efforts are appreciated, but futile. 
That's where you suggest the same thing.   "Oh you're straight? You just haven't had a REAL MAN before." 
But how do you know you're not straight if you haven't had a good dicking? /s 
I've noticed gay men just have their own unique set of problems facing straight women. I'm a lesbian though so I'd want a gay man to really confirm that. 
My wife insisted she pay for herself on our first date.  I had a water and $.99 cheese burger - best dollar I ever spent!  
Hang on, I'm a lady and I've never had any of these! Where are my free things?? 
It's really disturbing how many stories I've heard from women from ages when they were 13-16 and having people flirt/wolf whistle them that shouldn't have been.  
43, Got told I'd suddenly be invisible when I reached middle age. Nope, get taken seriously. 
It's good to hear that I have something to look forward to in my old age then. 
Eesh. Those are some serious issues. I hope he can get them worked out someday. 
Honestly, I'm a single dude and I like when women do this. It happened to me today. This really cute lady that I was talking to that I already assumed had a boyfriend, said this and it eased up the tension of her thinking that I was interested in her like that. 
Worse is when you say you have a boyfriend, and Creep says he doesn't mind. 
I know a ton of girls who aren't even engaged that wear rings on their wedding finger just so they don't get hit on. It's said that girls have to do that just to get guys to back off.    Some guys are persistent though. Ring on finger and visibly pregnant, my friend still gets hit on.  
The opposite happens to me. I have a serious case of resting bitch face. I get creepy comments like "You should smile more" or "You look better when you smile." Ugh, just shut up. 
I feel bad for the women servers at my bar job. They get hit on constantly. Then I see how much more they make in tips than I do and I suddenly don't feel so bad any more.  
I tell customers that I can't give out my number due to store policy. That way there's no blame on me, and I have a legitimate reason to refuse. I told my boss about this one day, and he chuckled and said he didn't mind getting blamed if it worked to keep the creeps away. My boss is a cool dude. 
I'll give customers my old number. When they try to text me, I'm all like, 'oh yeah, and I haven't paid my bill in like 2 years.' 
Probably because for ever girl that thinks they're showing interest by saying or doing something, there's another 3 who do it just to be nice.   Even worse is when you're asked out as a joke so now someone being straight up with you is now suspicious. 
Huge props for being able to tell him "no", even if you stammered it. Seriously. That's huge and you're going to need it in more and bigger ways later on in life. 
I'm a dude but in nursing school I just assumed everyone was nice. It makes it hard for me to date now because I tend to make friends with women that may have been interested in me initially. But I still have great friends of both genders.  
ANSWER ME YOU FUCKING BITCH.  Sorry, I didn't mean that, I'm a gentlesir. *tips fedora* 
Thank you for explaining this. As a woman who's always had a lot of guy friends this is something I've struggled to understand for a while.  
Maybe this has to do with me being younger or maybe it's just how my friends and I are but we typically do look out of each other's feelings. If someone is feeling upset about something, we will usually talk about it together. I hope this isn't a rare thing because people need to be able to talk about what's bothering them. 
Think about it this way. Most guys have *zero* outlet for anything like that...zero. You don't bring it up to your dad, your friends, your siblings, etc. Not saying you have to be on the receiving end, just giving some perspective as to why.  
Simple solution - become less attractive. Being average has worked well for me. 
My sister works out. I do her programming. On occasion I will go with her to form check. I give her some tips after seeing her perform a deadlift, and instantly this other guy comes up beside her and goes "can I give you some deadlift tips." We just looked at each other, laughed internally, and let him share his wisdom.  In fact most girls I know complain about this as being a major reason as to why they hate the gym. Honestly I've been guilty of it, but because I legit wanted to help their form. Now I just keep quiet and let them learn themselves. 
Ugh, yes. Like "Thank you, man who makes Donald Trump look like a sex god, how would I survive without knowing a fat 70 year old man wants to ejaculate on my chest?" 
That's my life, buddy. I got 99 problems and 98 have to do with my boobs. 
As my favorite podcast's' motto goes, fuck politeness, and stay sexy and don't get murdered. The podcast is My Favorite Murder, and they talk regularly about how being polite to the wrong person can wind you up a whole lot of danger - stay safe, fuck politeness. Politeness is for terrible distant family members, not for strange creeps.  
Put it into the blender and laugh manically.  Sorries, I'm just in one of those non-stop-laughing moods. 
Small girl here, I do the same thing. Bending over other ways, especially squatting, makes my joints all crack like a fireworks finale 
she's awesome! and she may kill me for posting this publicly hahaha 
I was playing GTA V and this guy was telling another on voice chat that his 2nd character was a chick. The other guy was like "Why the fuck is your other character a chick?!?!  You're a dude?!?!"  The first guy started laughing and said "Man, people are desperate as fuck and if they see a female character, they think you're a girl and will throw all kinds of money and cars and shit at ya. You can get whatever you want from them and they'll protect ya. It's funny as hell what they'll do!"  They whole voice chat exploded with laughter and you could just tell that light bulbs went off in everyone's heads hearing that. 
I'm a software developer and I get pop quizzes about programming from dudes as well.   
And provoke a long hard look in the mirror for him. 
I always insist on paying for the whole date. I've had pretty good results with that method. If the guy is chill, he'll appreciate the treat. If the guy is not chill, he'll get super butt hurt. I even had one guy get up and walk out on me because I paid the bill while he was in the bathroom and apparently that was emasculating.  
Step 1: Be attractive  Step 2: Don't be unattractive    ^^^^its ^^^^a ^^^^joke ^^^^dont ^^^^kill ^^^^me ^^^^pls 
When I was 11 and alone, I had a guy with one leg on a scooter stop and flirt with me. He asked me out. I had the presence of mind to tell him I had a boyfriend, which wasn't true because I was fucking 11. He said, "well, you come and find me when you want to know what a real man is."  I WAS ELEVEN. I hadn't even hit puberty yet. 
You rock. Thanks for reminding me that more people think like this. 
Make more of these. Sentences that, when pronounced, sound like a Russian man speaking english. Kind of like the australian good eye might or rise up lights but less fucking annoying.  
I've had one guy say my husband (yes I am actually married) "doesn't have to know." Disgusting.  
Yeah same, I get "smile a little why ya frowning". Half the time I don't even know I'm frowning. 
I'm a barista, and the guy I usually get scheduled with helps the women and I take the men and we make pretty good money haha.  
I did this one time. Told a guy I couldn't give my number because I wasn't allowed and turns out it was a coworker's friend. They told him I was lying and asked why I lied. AWKWARD! 
Had a group of girls come up to me in the mall when I was young. All of them were laughing except for the one that was being pulled towards me. She was acting nervous and trying to gtfo without being rude.  The laughing girls told me that the "no no no just kill me now" girl thought I was cute and wanted my phone number. I, being the preteen eternal cynic I was, immediately called bullshit on the entire situation. I told them with a straight face that I didn't have a phone, texting a friend all the while.  Looking back, on the 3% chance they were being serious, I kind of feel like an ass. But then I look at my life now and realize that, either way, I did her a favor. 
I know a guy like this who does it to me, and I'm also a guy (and we're both straight. He always wanted to talk about Superman fighting Jesus or some annoying shit). If you don't answer him immediately, he takes it as a personal insult and now you're the spawn of Satan and an ungrateful asshole. I eventually just ghosted his ass.  Some people just... I dunno, man. 
I am sorry to hear that. Check at /r/abrathatfits, maybe you will get one problem less?  I hope that you will get better. I love you  
I'm a bloke, and rather tall so if a woman is walking in the same direction as me at night I try to get slightly ahead so they don't feel nervous. One time as we had spoken a little on the train I even said to one woman what direction I was going so she wouldn't think I was following her as we where walking closely. 
I'm sorry this happened to you and the others above. Some people are just creeps. Personally it's nice to brighten up someones day with a friendly smile.  Hope that experience hasn't changed your friendly disposition. 
Taking a shit? Go down on that mofo as If u're hitting a new PR.  
Funnily enough, a long time ago on an MMORPG, I want to say it was Legend of Mir (we're talking LONG time ago) I once created a female character to try this out and low and behold, I got loads of free items and offers of help because these guys thought I was female. Men can be such sad creatures 
I'd say both genders get the metal pop quiz. It's just what metal aficionados do /shrug 
Ask him if he's been pegged. Then peg him. Be his real man.  
This is bizarre to me.  As a guy, I'd think the woman was showing that she is willing to invest in the potential for this going somewhere and not using me for my money.  And want to see more of her.    It's exactly what my wife did early on in our relationship, and I really appreciated it. 
Except it's not a joke. That's literally all it boils down to. I wear makeup I get hit on I go out looking my natural self and no guy will look my way.  
My girlfriend makes thoughtful remarks like that, even if someone was being evil. It is very endearing and It helped me become more empathic as well. I love that gal :) 
Alternatively just because there is a goalie doesn't mean ya can't score is another way I've heard that 
I had one guy follow me around the bar asking questions about my husband, but he'd purposely say "your boyfriend" as if that would somehow convince me my husband wasn't important or something.  
Anyways, wanna have a one-noght stand? I heard mature women are into it  Sorry that was my friend again 
BUT YOU LOOK SO MUCH BETTER WITHOUT MAKEUP WAAAAAAAH 
The response I've seen to that is 'well when the goalie is a [insert number of years you've been together here] time champion it changes things. ' 
My record was 4 minutes:  Hey, I know we haven't spoken in awhile but I just wanted to say hello.  Send me a pic so I know what you look like now.  You were so beautiful.  Nvm, I found a pic. I was right. You are still gorgeous.  So message me, please? Just wanna chat. xxx  Four minutes later:  You're a fucking bush pig, there's a reason no one would fuck you in high school. Bitch. 
I can't help but feel some poor bastard is reading this and realizing he does this. Man, what a shitty realization that must be. 
I don't know why but this made me laugh maniacally.  Maybe because I read it in Hank Hill's voice 
Move to Dingle, Ireland. Set up berry stand. Call it Dingleberries.  
"hey fred!  If you can say "dingleberry" 100 times in 60 seconds, I'll give you a million dollars -- try as often as you like." 
Once I get my first million, make a cheap commercial where I just say Dingleberry several times with odd facial expressions, and play them on local channels. Then walk around in public places waiting for people to recognize me. 
get a couple friends to say it just by bringing it up. Then use those cool millions to host a live event in front of thousands of people where the game is hangman. Of course the word is dingleberry 
Become a photographer. Whenever I take a photo of a group, I tell them 'saaaaay dingleberry!' 
"Hey, what's that word for like, shit caught in ass hair?" 
Work slightly mispronounced versions of the word into conversation ("dinglederry, dangleberry")  Other person corrects me ("don't you mean dingleberry?)  Profit 
Looking at these answers I should have made it harder... 
Join a multiplayer team game that uses voice chat on Xbox Live, and call my character "Dingle Berry".  Then be fairly bad at the game, so that people start saying "Dingleberry is a fucktard"; "GET GUD Dingleberry"; "Dingleberry I fucked your mom last night" and so on.  I'd take notes of who said it each time I got paid.  When I had enough money, I'd buy Microsoft, and then permaban everyone that had abused me.  
I make a twitch emote called dingleberry and bust my ass becoming a full time twitch streamer until I attain a widespread enough audience that they start using it in other people's streams. 
Holy shit I wouldn't hve to lift a finger. My boss calls me a dingleberry multiple times a week. My problem wouldn't be, "How do I make the most money," it would be, "How the hell to hide this shit without looking like a drug dealer." 
Try to get surveyed for family feud and no matter what the question is, answer "dingleberry."  That way nobody will get it and when Steve Harvey reveals it the entire studio audience will say "dingleberry" in unison and you are like automatically a billionaire. 
I change my name to Dingleberry Dingleberry. Each time I call the bank  I mumble the account number + passcode and get them to confirm my name, twice if necessary 
Become a successful media person and make it a catch phrase. 
Call my dog Dingleberry and get him instagram famous?  Tattoo the word above my dingleberry and become a flasher.  Engineer a new superfruit called the Dingleberry and take it to market as the hot new product. 
Have a local competition where people have to say dingle berry as many times as possible in 60 seconds...winner gets gets a $100 gift card. 
I would just play a lot of hangman and scrabble. In situation one they'd have to shout out dingleberry and then in scrabble they wouldn't believe me that it was a real word (and perhaps in the hangman as well) which would lead to a whole conversation with dingleberry mentioned multiple times.  
Make an askreddit thread asking how to get people to say it. 
Work at a pet salon. The amount of long-haired cats and dogs with dingleberries at the back end is astounding. 
Walk around with my Persian cat and wait for people to point out the dingleberry hanging from her ass fluff.  
Change it to my nickname. Then everyone I know will have to call me "Dingleberry".  After that, I change all my social media to dingleberry.   Then, if all that isn't enough, I change my name legally to dingleberry. 
I'll tell everyone that I will give them $100,000 for every time they say dingleberry to me. They have no idea that I'm getting a million every time they say it and I'm profiting nonstop. 
Print and wear t-shirts that say "dingleberry" in weird fonts.  Or normal  fonts. People will read them out loud to you with confused looks.  Shrug, and say "I like the word" 
Step 1: Hack Trump's twitter Step 2: ???  Step 3: Profit 
My Uncle lives in Dingle, and I think this is the first time I've seen it mentioned outside my family. Lovely little place. 
This comment made me realize that, for some reason, it is easier to say berrydingle than dingleberry quickly.  
Reminds me of a joke where a guy bet his boss $5,000 he could piss in a glass on his desk from 6 feet away without spilling a drop.  Meanwhile having a $20,000 bet with his friend that he could piss all over his boss's desk and not get fired. 
Double your profit by changing first **and** last names to Dingleberry.  *Hello Mr Dingleberry Dingleberry* ching! ching! 
I don't need that much money.  Just wear a shirt that says dingle berry on it.  Get a couple million dollars a year. 
Doesn't a judge have to approve a name change or something?  Even if so, you'd make tons just from going through that. 
No, the word is Dangleberry. That way the entire time they keep asking "are you sure it's not dingleberry?" 
Hell, you could even sell your services for a fraction of any other photographer. People would be suspicious, but of course there'd be people out there that just want a cheap photographer for their wedding, so they give you a shot. With the millions you wind up making, you can get the absolute best equipment, take classes and courses to improve your techniques, and even hire professional photo editors.   Soon, you'll be one of the most wanted photographers around, and you'll just have that one quirk that people comment on (the dingleberry thing), but the end result is so good, that they just don't care. Eventually, you can have an impressive enough portfolio that even if people figure out why you have them say dingleberry (which I assume makes the money stop coming in), you could just raise your prices to reflect your new skill set. 
Don't even need to become a photographer, just stand in a popular tourist destination and offer to take photos for groups 
I don't think this would really make them say dingleberry. People would just give you a weird look and then a weak smile. It's like asking someone to "say penis!" Unless it a group of rowdy young people they're gonna be weird.   I mean granted it only has to work once and you're a millionaire. But if we're going for maximizing profit... 
I was picturing this as a Super Troopers thing. "Hey Farva..." 
How are you going to work dingleberry into a convo?  
How about if you can't use the actual word you want them to say? 
-Acrudes massive amounts of money -Buys business -Eliminates source of income for the business and for how the massive amounts of money was made 
Fuck you guys I know my plan isn't going to work. I'll just tattoo dingleberry on my arm or something so people will be like "Dingleberry?". Idk leave me alone  
At least it's a better plan to scam money than faking cancer  YAHOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO 
Your other problem would be that you'd have millions but you'd have to hide it because you need him to call you dingleberry every so much time so you can't even quit.  
But they have to say it to you. If it was just a million every time someone said it period, I'd just pay spelling bee organizers to put it in the first round. 
"It's the same guy. Sixth time this week. Look at his account too. Something's not right here." 
I don't under and your second one. So you show them your hairy asshole with the word "dingleberry" on it, and the respond with "Oh, heavens! Dingleberry!?" 
Spent a few days in Dingle last summer, it was one of my favorite places in Ireland. But everyone back home I've told about it has been unable to resist making a dingleberry joke. 
And by pretending not to hear them when they call you 
Buy a Starbucks for a homeless person or someone in need, tell them your name is Dingleberry so they call it out to collect your coffee.   Costs you a couple of bucks each time, but you're making bank off it and helping out someone less fortunate.  
The only stipulation is you can't tell people what you're doing. Just offer strangers a tenner if they say dingleberry. Wayyy easier and more effective than changing your name. 
Honestly, to really rake in the cash you could tell people you'll give them 100-10000 every time they say dingleberry that way you can make a killing  
A tshirt that says, "Don't call me dingleberry, asshole." 
The court case alone would net you enough for the rest of your life. 
Shame nobody here is actually saying it. Just typing. 
Even just taking a photo of one person is enough to get you decked out with high tech equipment and software. 
Gotta make it semi-expensive though, so people know you're fancy. Hehe. 
That doesn't seem that weird, why are you so horrified? 
Iowa City, Iowa?  I can't confirm it, but there may only be one Dingleberry Road in the entire US. 
"Hey, say dingleberry."  "Dingleberry. Why?"  "No reason. Thanks." 
Change your name to "Dinglebarry" and get a million every time someone gets your name wrong. 
EMILY ONLY FAKED CANCER ONCE EMILY ONLY FAKED CANCER ONCE yahOOOOOOOO 
Or just change your last name and join the military 
Only to find out they yell Drew Barrymore, Shingle Bear Heave, or Dingle Harry 
To be fair, you could also just introduce yourself as Dingleberry without legally changing your name. 
You could tell people you'd give them a dollar and most would do it, even if just to see if you're serious!  
This guy is out here thinking about equipment, as if the first thing on your mind wouldn't be two chicks at the same time. 
'Photographer' implies professional, which requires you to spend time setting up your business   Nit picking aside though, I see your point  
Or just tell them to say it for $10, walk around with $1000 in $10 bills for one day and then you are set for life.  
Which is pretty accurate, because most people only have real cancer once. 
"So you'd like to open an account, Mr. Berry?"  "No, it's Dingleberry."  "Of course, my mistake. What kind of account would you like to open, sir?"  "...You have to say my name."  "Excuse me?"  "Say my name. Say Dingleberry Dingleberry."  "Um... is this a joke, sir?"  "Just say my name!"  "Security!"  
You'd be targeted, and MTI's would make you a billionaire before you leave 
Immediate flaw in my plan. Presumably though, as long as they get it right at least once every 499,999 times, at $2/cup you'll still be up 
Yeah but if you're approaching strangers, I get the feeling most will just look at you like you're insane, with that name. 
But you forgot to account for the cost of the card. 
"It's a little piece of toilet paper that comes off and forms into a little ball when wiping your hairy ass. "  "Thanks grandma!" 
And in German of course, those guys have a word for everything. 
Actually, I think reoccurances are fairly popular. 
What was that private Dingleberry!!!!! Do you think this is funny Mr. Dingleberry??!!!! You have a funny last name Mr. Dingleberry, kinda reminds me of your performance.  
I always heard they can kick you out for being too rich in the military. Never heard of anyone in real life doing it but it makes sense when you think about it. 
"Why the hell did you just call yourself dingleberry?"  "What do you mean?"  "You just said your name is dingleberry."  "Huh...."  Boom. $2 million. 
If you could get a couple of people to repeat you in disbelief you'd be set for life, so it's not like you'd have to do it all the time. 
but they won't think it's weird if your name is legally dingleberry? you'll only need them to say it once to be set for life 
That's a dingleberry though! If his shirt said "ask me what a dibgleberry is" he wouldn't get any money and just look weird 
They can. Don't know of any specific examples, but lottery winners and big windfalls put military jobs at risk. 
As an american you would want to make it a contest, you would make more money, since they would be trying harder. 
If you have a boat load of money your less inclined to listen to some jerkoff spit in your face. 
I mean you're not liable to follow orders you don't like if you have a bunch of money to fall back on, for one. "Clean the toilets." "Nah, I'm good. I'll pay PFC Schmuckatelli $50 to do it for me." 
Because infantrymen have the maturity level of 12 year olds when it comes to humor and stuff like that. Its all fart jokes and toilet humor and dick drawings.  
Well I think trump became president as a ploy to get people to say his name as often as possible 
At $3 billion per hour, it doesn't really make a large difference. It is more effective if you make a group event out of it anyway. Let 10 people say "Dingleberry" to you at the same time. 
Got to make the most if it, we don't know if we'll make it back after a deployment and we need entertainment during down time.   Fuck it even at 29 and 7 years out I still make fart jokes and draw dicks on my school papers.  
Well aside from the classic zero response to the ask for volunteers, my favorite would have to be when the audience member in question got scared/frustrated and threw the cloth I had had her hold at me and run away.  
Was at a magic show on a date last year, the magician asked for a volunteer and a little girl no more than five runs up on stage  "Hi there little girl, I'm [insert magician name], what's your name?"  "Katherine, but my friends call me Katie"  "Oh, can I call you Katie?"  "No"   Then she ran back into the audience, only trick done was embarrassing the magician  
This is a bit off topic, but I feel that it belongs here. My father is the son of a relatively well known magician, and thus knows a lot of the tricks of the trade. One day he was with some friends at a place with a magician who went from table to table. When he reached my father, my dad challenged him to a somewhat duel, saying he could figure out any of his tricks.   The man agrees, and begins doing a mind reading trick, where he acuratly described every tiny aspect of my father's childhood bedroom. My dad, of course is blown away, as he had no clue how this man knew any of these things.   The magician saw his face, laughed, and walked away saying, your dad and I are old friends, I stayed with them last week in your room. I recognized you from the pictures still up in your room. 
Finally a question I can answer!  "Please hold out your hand and take this card"  Guy holds out his hand.  "No the other one."  Guy takes arm out of his jacket pocket to reveal a stump where his hand used to be. 
I was at a dinner for a family member and there was a magician walking around doing tricks for all the tables. When he got to my table he did a few tricks and ended up talking to us for a bit and found out that I knew some magic tricks. He asked if I would want to do a trick for him and I said, "Sure, shuffle the deck and while you do, think of any card you want. Stop shuffling whenever you want to." He shuffled a few times and said he was thinking of a card. I told him to tell us what it was and that whatever card it was it would be the 15th card in the deck. He looked at me like he knew I was bullshitting him, which I totally was, but he went along with it and said his card and counted out to the 15th card. It was his card. I was dumbfounded but didn't show it and the look on his face was priceless.  
I was at a fakir show and he chose me to do a trick with broken glass.  The setup: There was broken glass all over the floor, he would lie down on his stomach and I would step down on to his back from a stool.  Unfortunately, I was drunk and absolutely unable to stand unassisted on a stool. So while he was getting ready to lie down, I stumbled off directly into the broken glass with my bare feet (they were bare because I was about to stand on the fakir).  The audience gasped! And I looked down in wonder at my totally not bleeding feet before announcing loudly: "Don't worry, guys, it's just plastic." 
One time a magician trick required three volunteers to give up something amd so the magician suggested wedding rings. At the end he joked "Take the most expensive one". The first guy picked a ring, the second guy picked a ring, and then the third guy said "this remaining ring isn't mine". The first guy actually took back the most expensive one. 
Not a magician, was the audience member. I was about 9 and the magician called me up to the stage. He had a mesh bag of lemons and a $20 bill.   He told me to sign the bill and he would make it appear in one of the lemons. I reached into the bag and tried to grab one from the middle, but it was sewn in a way so that all the other lemons in the bag were in their own compartment and I could only physically grab one lemon.  I looked him in the face, and into his microphone, I loudly asked, "Why can I only grab this lemon?"  He quickly finished the trick and ushered me off stage as quickly as possible. 
How a about a science trick instead?  My daughter was watching a liquid nitrogen demonstration at the science center, and the demonstrator asked if any of the kids in the audience had a penny he could borrow.  My daughter, who compulsively collects small objects, had apparently found a penny at some point in the day - so volunteered it with a level of enthusiasm only available to preschool-aged children.  She sat smiling away, *sooooo* happy she could help out, so happy that her compulsion was useful instead of a nuisance for once.  And then the demonstrator froze and shattered her hard-won penny treasure, right before her eyes.  The look of shock and betrayal on my daughter's face was one of the most raw examples of human emotion I've ever seen. We tried to make it better, but all the pennies her grandparents and I had between us couldn't make it right.  My wife still keeps a broken piece of that penny in her purse as a memento. 
I once saw a hypnotist get soaked with water by a guy he thought he hypnotized. Halfway through the show the guy grabs his water bottle, places his thumb across the hole, and squeezed all of the water onto the back of the hypnotist and just kept laughing. He was thrown out of the Ren Faire.  
I was a spectator for this one.  Watching a street busker tell everyone he's going to make a balloon animal for someone and asks for a volunteer.  All the little kids are jumping up and down and he picks a little girl.  He tells her and everyone that she's going to get a balloon dog.  Then he hands her a deflated balloon and tells her she has to make it herself.  Then he turns his back on her and goes into his patter talking to the audience and not watching her.  It is clear from his patter that she is not supposed to be able to make a balloon dog.  Nevertheless, without pause she inflates the balloon and makes a dog.  Audience is cracking up until he turns around and realizes she did it.  She could have been a plant, but the trick stalled out at that point and he just moved on from there- never saw how it was supposed to end.  So I think it was unplanned. 
I was in Vegas and watched a street magician ask a group of 3 incredibly shithammered drunk girls if he could perform a magic trick. One of the girls screams "Sure! Lemme just-" and immediately throws up in her friend's purse.  
Well, this might sound strange. I was told it was magic night at the club by a couple of my female friends. I thought it sounded cool. They insisted that I wouldn't want to go. I told them I would, and said I practice a little bit at home. They looked intrigued, and so they brought me.  Before the main show started, they were looking for volunteers, so I put my hand up. He said, "Dude, it's probably not for you." I told him, "I have always wanted to get involved, so please pick me." So he did.  I got brought out to the middle of the stage, and sat down on the chair. From here I noticed that the crowd was mostly women. That's when the music hit, and I looked over my shoulder to see what was happening behind me. There was a half naked fireman coming out.  Turns out it was Magic Mike night. It was full of male strippers. So... I just played it cool. 
In the audience for a stage hypnotist.  My friend was called up, along with a random woman.  Hypnotist did his routine and told her my friend was her boyfriend and that he had cheated on her.  Before the hypnotist could stop her, she slapped my friend across the face, hard.  Hard enough to make him stumble and nearly fall over, and he's a stocky guy close to 200lbs.  They moved on to the next part of the act very quickly, and my friend was sent back to the audience with a massive red mark on his face. 
Audience member at a hypnotist comedy show here:  A lady was brought on stage and hypnotized and convinced that a handful of napkins were $100 bills.  She was told that people would try to steal them, so she should hide them in the best place possible.  I think the hypnotist expected to get a laugh with people stuffing them in their bra or underwear.  Not this lady, though.  She took her shirt off, exposed her breasts to a room full of about 100 people, tucked the napkins under her tits, then pulled her bra back down.  I've studied up a bit on hypnotism, and I learned that most people won't do things that are out of character under hypnotism.  For instance, you can't convince someone to murder if they're not a murderer or smoke a cigarette if they're not a smoker.  So I'd guess this woman had no problem taking her tits out on stage.  But it happened. 
I'm not a magician, but I do remember the time a magician came to our school when I was in Kindergarten as part of a big assembly of some sorts.  I was called up and he had a bunch of rings with me and a few other kids having two rings each. He said that if we rubbed the rings hard enough together, they would magically interlink with each other.  I couldn't get it to work until I noticed there were clips on it. The magician walked over and noticed I was having troubles and tried to help me. He had the microphone in his one hand, and it was close enough that when I asked what the clips on the rings were for, it could be heard all over the gym.  I don't remember what happened next except I was rushed off the gym floor back into the bleachers. 
I've had a volunteer, when asked to pick an even number pick 11- in complete seriousness. I even asked her if she wanted to to change "you can think of another EVEN number if you want", but she was adamant with number 11. I just looked at the audience and smiled the smile you put on when you know you're screwed.  
We're at an outdoor mall gathered around two street magicians.  It was time to do some sword swallowing so they ask for a volunteer and randomly happened to pick my cousin (she was in her late 20's at the time.)  She walks up and is asked by the man of magic to make sure that the sword is real.  She gives it an inquisitive look, inspecting it from top to bottom, and then immediately starts smashing it on the ground as if she was trying to slay a concrete monster.  The magic man rapidly snatches the sword from her, which is now clearly damaged with a collection of jagged edges.  He's hesitant.  Doesn't really know how to respond, but being the showman he is, proceeds to swallow the sword as promised.  People cheer while I ponder whether he is bleeding internally.  When I asked her wtf she was thinking, she replied "I proved it was real, didn't I?" 
The trick is never calling someone who is a real volunteer.  
Most serious magicians, of the sort that do like Vegas shows and such, use assistants planted in the audience to avoid this sort of thing.  Even if the trick works with a real audience member, you always risk getting that one asshat who tries to troll the magician by intentionally sabotaging the trick.  E: Also, it helps to have at least one person out there that knows to save you from an awkward moment by raising their hand if no one else does. 
So I was performing to these two young kids with their mom, and the mom went to get a drink. So I was performing for these two kids, probably around 8 years old or so. Anyways, I was just doing a simpler trick where they pick a card, I reveal a card, but it's not theirs, and then it "magically" changes into their card. So I did it, and neither said anything, then one of them started crying, which made the other start crying. Now they're just bawling their eyes out, and the mom comes back and she sees them and starts reeling into me like "what did you do?!?!" then she shuffled the kids away.  tl;dr oops 
This probably isn't the right place but how do you go to a magic show and just enjoy it without being called up on stage?  I've been called up every time and I hate being in front of people like that.  I tried looking away but obviously that makes the person focus on you more and then they pick you out of the crowd.  The next time I looked directly at him so he probably thought I WANTED to be picked.  It's a terrible problem I have. 
Man, I get that the magicians probably aren't top class material, but bringing basic tricks that a literal grade-schooler can learn and do to your show is just asking to get japed. 
What do you do it nobody volunteers? That has to be awkward. 
That is when you look dumbfounded and shocked at the audience ala Steve Harvey. Wait for the laughs to die down and then ask if there is anyone in the audience you can call Katie. 
Oh christ!  My neighbor's daughter ran up to a then-Olympian from my city, and said to him "You've got a willy!" while he was being interviewed for a TV news item...  They can be *savage*. 
Insults from children are simple, but they always hurt the most :'( 
This would be hilarious if this hadn't happened to me too. In a children's cancer ward. Luckily it was one of the staff and the kids loved it. 
How do you get the spider to stick to their hand? I really like this one. 
Even if not magic, that's still an impressive memory  
Being called a magical mystical being has to be the best publicity for a magician 
I love how she went from annoyed critic to mad woman in a heartbeat.  This made me laugh at work, so good job.  You were so voodoo, you made her health immediately deteriorate.   
And that's why they shouldn't let drunks participate... 
If you're defeated by a 9 year old, you are not a good magician. 
HAH, I love it. 9 year olds are such assholes.  When I was 9 I was watching a magician in Epcot centre at Disney World. He pulls me up on stage to do a card trick. So he's doing the classic look at this card but don't show me thing. Then he does some magician shit and it ends with him holding a card. He goes "Now, would you be impressed if this was your card?"  Being an asshole 9 year old, I'm like "Uhh no, not really". I mean who hasn't seen that trick, right?  So then he goes, "OH ok, what if this card was exactly half your card. Would that be impressive?"  Well my card was a 5 of spades, so I'm like heck yes that would be impressive. Literally thinking this guy fucked up his trick at this point.  Sure enough he pulled a card with 2 and a half on it.   
Something similar happened to my sister, but it was with a bouncy ball and they had *her* drop it. 
Seems like a risky trick to do with a child that young, easy to imagine it turning into tears with kids that young. 
That's a dick move. Saying "borrow" for something he had no intention of returning, and forgetting that a penny means a lot more to a 4 year old than it does to an adult.  
I have a somewhat similar story, when  I was around 5 or 6 I found a dollar on the ground and excitedly went to show my parents, they had a friend here who said wanna see a cool magic trick? I can turn  $1 into $2! I handed him that dollar with excitement and watched in horror as he ripped it in half saying now you have twice the money, I started bawling  yelling how could you do that and other incoherent things, he laughed and my parents sent me to my room.  
Wow. That's kind of a dick move. I mean, proving you aren't hypnotized as a surprise laugh I can see, but that's a pretty obnoxious way to do it. 
At an event for my high school grad we had a hypnotist.  After a few kids were hypnotized they were told that some members of the audience (the rest of the grad class & the parents) had special cards or something that they desperately needed.  So now you have some of the girls going up to the audience offering to suck their dicks & one guy was seconds away from punching people top get these cards.  It was hilarious. 
I was half hoping that the part about bones and muscles wouldn't be relevant at all to the story and you just like throwing random asides into your posts. 
I don't get the trick, how was it supposed to go? He would say 'radius' and the kid would touch some other random body part and the wand would bend? 
Text your dad "Hey can I get pictures of the Houdini letters to show my internet friends?" He text back a minute later "Check your pocket." You pull printed photos out of your pocket and say, "Holy shit!", Under your breath. 
Sounds like the back story you will tell Rick on Pawn Stars when you eventually want to sell all of the stuff.  
Holy heck how old is your old man now? That's one heck of a magic trick living that long! 
If that was about 25 years ago, that was me as the kid.  I was really into making balloon animals and did what you said several times.  The best part was when they were having trouble making things without popping the balloons (usually because they over inflate) so I asked if they needed help.  They thought it would be funny to watch a kid struggle, but then I made what they were trying to do.  Usually they got pretty competitive and would ask me to make something difficult, which I did.    
Who the hell just carries around a handkerchief?  Why would he expect anybody that he calls onstage to have one? 
"Why didn't you do it in your own purse?"  "Magic!" 
one day, when i have children, im gonna make them read this post and then ill say: "be like this guy, because he's not a complete dick." 
reading thru these comments, I'm wondering: why are so many of these people 9 years old when they see the magician? 
This sounds like a scene from Arrested Development with Tobias & Gob.   Tobias convinces Gob to see this new Magician in town after seeing an ad for "Tonight: Magic Mike" at some bar. The pair goes to the bar, get a table together. Tobias notes that there's pretty much only women there and Gob makes some comment about how it's pretty great.  They ask for volunteers and, of course, Gob volunteers to go up on stage. Seeing the two men seated together, the announcer doesn't ask any questions and Gob sits down, convinced that he's about to steal the show or steal a magic trick from someone only to end up getting a lap dance from a half dozen ripped, sweaty men.   Close up on Gob's face as he says "I've made a huge mistake."  
She probably didn't have any qualms about storing valuables in her bra. She may have easily had trouble with the idea of flashing a crowd. Flashing a crowd is not smoking or murdering, because smoking and murdering require paraphernalia and actions that are u usual throughout your life experience as a non-smoker and non-murderer. Changing clothes is common enough to get this to work. This is exactly the kind of thing hypnotism can do to a participant who ordinarily would not. 
As a former amateur magician, this sort of realization is what made me stop pursuing the secrets of magic and just enjoy magic shows: the *ability* to appear to do the impossible is super great and fun to watch. Looking at how it's done, it's almost all held together with duct tape and string, usually metaphorically but often literally as well. 
Lol they would be so mad if they had picked me. I'm mostly deaf and would not have heard his instructions. I would have ruined their whole trick!  
imagining this type of response is what causes most adolescent boys to study magic.    so many disappointed adolescent boys out there 
The trick is being well liked enough that your audience doesn't want to expose you.   I was on stage with Penn and Teller and they did an illusion where Another audience member and I tied up Teller and put him behind a curtain. He would make things that were out of his reach move and we had to check every so often to make sure he was still tied up.  At one point I was able to see that he wasn't really tied up anymore, but I still said "Yes, he is still tied up." because why would I want to spoil their show?  I also allowed Penn to tell his wife that their kids put the ice cream in the shopping cart, even though I saw him put it in there, cuz snitches get stitches. 
Reminds me of a story: my wife loves Spanish hip-hop/rap, so we went to a Pitbull/Enrique Iglesias/ other opener (whose name I forget) concert. We were the only white people in the section and the entire thing was in Spanish.  Anyways, Enrique is singing on a smaller stage near the back of the arena, and calls for a volunteer to stop up and sing with him. He picks some dude, who gets up there and doesn't seem to quite 100% know the words to the song, but absolutely kills it with the parts he knows.  I wasn't sure whether he was a plant or not. Surely a plant would know the words. 
I made a plant cry once by implying his twin brother was the better showman, it was a petty thing to do but I was annoyed upon discovering that all the volunteers were plants when I ended up having to attend the same show a second time. 
i have a hypnosis CD about 30 minutes long, i've listened to it numerous times but have no idea what it says after 15 minutes up to the part where he starts to count up to wake up...  i literally lose 15 minutes of my memory each time, but wake up feeling fucking A (it's a relaxation tape) 
Generally if you involve your audience you need to have multiple ways of having the trick go.  It's one thing to fuck up your trick by accidentally picking someone who knows it but breaking character just makes you look stupid.  I like to compliment them and go "Aha, we found someone who's very analytical. Would you mind being my assistant for this next trick?"  and then you're straight into the next one  
I like people like you. You think faster than people like me.  
That's when *my* hand shoots up, and I yell "You can call me whatever you want, big boy! Now let's make some magic!" 
I actually retired it after that. It's all fun and games until you cause serious trauma. 
I'd go see someone with the word Demon somewhere in their magic stage name. Hell, I'd go see an actual demon do evil tricks, magic fucking rules! 
I'm Canadian and when it said a dollar, I thought of a loonie. That's pretty hard to burn, I assume. 
I saw a magician with some drunk friends. My buddy was being an asshole, and when the magician asked him if his card was bigger or smaller than the one he picked, my buddy says "well, they're all the same size, so good luck with that one." Sure as shit, he pulled out a tiny card with the correct number on it.  
I actually have a deck that is half 5 of hearts half regular, and it also has a 2 1/2 of hearts.  The way the cards are made, if I flip through them one way it only shows the 5 of hearts, and the other way it seems normal. So I can flip through it, show it's real, force a 5 of hearts with 0 trouble, then "halve" their card and the look on their face when they think they've got me is priceless... until I turn out a 2 1/2 of hearts. 
He must have forced the 5 on you and had a heckle pocket go to card. 
"You did it! The Weighted Bouncy Ball certainly brought you good luck. However, it cannot accompany you for the rest of the test and, unfortunately, must be euthanized." 
Agreed. I'd still think that guy's a dick if he did it to an adult, because that's not what "borrow" means dammit. 
I mean, hypnotists can be pretty shitty, too. I'll hold judgement since I haven't seen his act, but I definitely know a few that would have earned that kind of treatment. 
Hypnotists can't actually force you to do anything you don't want to do, they just put you in a spot where your natural instinct is to play along with their act to avoid ruining the show. 
"Let me call my expert down here to look at it."  -2 hours later- "Yep its real. Best I can do is twenty bucks." 
He's not especially old.  56.  I don't know all the details of this story so I can't give exact numbers, but I believe she was in her 90's at the time this happened, and Mr. Cooke had had her when he was in his 60's, I think. 
Did you make the little tail poof? That's the best part. 
That's the joke. You're supposed not to have a handkerchief so he picks your shoe instead.  
His dad had his mob buddies give the schmuck some cement shoes later, but at least he was gracious enough to let the magician die with dignity.   
Plus Tobias would have made multiple comments by now that would lead people to believe they're a couple. 
You're probably correct.  I wonder if hypnotist comedians ever get in legal trouble for that sort of thing.  I saw another show on my college campus in front of at least 500 people where a kid was hypnotized and told that he was a firefighter and needed to put out a fire on the front row of people.  I think the gag was that he was *supposed* to grab some bottles of water that were on the stage and spray them at the front row, but instead he put his hands down his pants and started to take his pants off.  The hypnotist stopped him, but I'm pretty certain he was about to piss on people. 
For me it's entirely the other way around, I find magic shows quite annoying, but finding out how they perform the tricks is extremely entertaining to me. I used to love that show with the masked magician who'd reveal how tricks got made. 
What would be awesome is if they had a tv monitor that the audience could see, but you couldn't; showing that Teller was loose, and showing you are a dirty, dirty liar. 
I have to wonder though, surely there's a backup plan if their volunteer doesn't roll with it. 
Green Day does (or used to) do that too with a "random" audience member that they'd bring up on stage to play guitar with the band. He'd be shown a few chords, mash them out and the band would start playing along. Was a cool thing to witness the first time, but the second time i saw them, it was the same dude with a massive green mohawk (made it easy to spot him) and used the same name that billie-joe made fun of, something like "Fucking Dan!! yeeeww!" and Billie would go "Hi Fucking Dan hehe" "If you suck we can all beat the shit out of you right hehe"  Still an awesome band to see live tho. 
Yeah, it does kinda ruin the immersion once you realize it's going on, but on the other hand I also kinda understand that they don't want assholes trying to screw with them and ruining the show for everyone else. 
5 dollars he spent like an hour creating that joke   /s 
Is this what season 13 of Supernatural is going to be? Crowley is laid so low that he performs magic tricks to get by? 
I can't find it on the net so I'd like to know myself.  Disappearing ink that looks like char? 
It was a very small show on a weekday so I doubt it but it would be that much more coincidental if it were true. Or it's a gig he does every time. Who knows.  
Well i think its interesting he asked 'bigger or smaller " rather than higher or lower or greater or fewer. 
or that was the trick all along. "would it be impressive if this was your card?" "yea!" "wouldn't it be *more impressive* if it was half your card?" then everyone poops themselves because they had the 5 of spades originally 
"You dropped and shattered your Weighted Bouncy Ball faster than any other test subject. Congratulations." 
I think the trick would be better if he could somehow "reglue" all the pieces and produce the penny - obviously it wouldn't be the original, but to the kid, it'd probably look close enough to be the same.  
I totally agree with you.  If hypnotism actually worked like it does in movies then it would be used far more often & for more nefarious reasons.    Still though, a few girls certainly not known for "sluttiness" were offering blow jobs to their classmates in front of their parents.  And Brock was about to beat the shit out of a guy.  He was known as a bully and asshole though so that did not surprise me.  
I wonder if going against one's selfish and hateful nature in order to be kind and good makes one better or worse than a person who is good and kind because they lack any sort of predisposition toward avarice.  Asking for a friend. 
Male Bartender: "So did your wives drag your here?"  Tobias: "Oh no, We're here together!"  
Yes, hypnotists get in trouble. They have trouble getting performer's liability insurance.  
I have a friend who also has been picked twice by the band. He said he had no interaction with them beforehand (and he also has a way of squirming his way to the front of every concert). Green Day was one of his favorites, so he already knew how to play the song they asked of him each time and they recognized him as someone they already picked once he started playing that second time. They were cool and gave him a guitar afterwards.  he does not sport a green mohawk, though. 
No telling when he saw the original post, but he did respond an hour and forty minutes later. You may be on to something. 
IIRC The producers of Fool Us have to know how every trick is performed ahead of time, and having plants is not allowed. 
Pointing out that a guy name Brock was a bully and an asshole is a bit redundant, innit? 
what you don't realize is he is going to do it with cards covered in ricin,   hes a hit wizard, and now you've made his list. 
I'm not sure you read my post correctly.  The magic show happened in the late 1980s, at which point my dad was in his late 20's.  The woman who volunteered was then in her 90's. 
Not OP, but I remember asking another random-digit-named person and they said they just knew the keypress motion.   One could also assume the sequence means something to them in particular, or they just memorized the first three and have the rest autocompleted. 
Slams the computer shut, gets in the shower, and just stands there letting the scalding water flow over his body for an hour and a half. And then it hits him. 
That is correct.  I think the audience members were really random, but at least some of the mechanics of the trick were revealed to them on stage and they needed to play along for the trick to work. 
I felt i should mention it just to show how little it surprised me.  The shitty part is that his mom ended up marrying my uncle so now we are related.   
*Wakes up at 3 in the morning* "Damn, that would have been a good joke" 
Magician here. This is something we call an instant stooge. They don't know going into it that they're going to help out, and they may not know exactly how. So it's not a plant, and I'm not saying that's what they did here, but that's the gist of it.  
How often would you say this goes *horribly* wrong? I mean, a lot of people will go along with it... but a lot of people are also contrarian.   I know *I* would ruin the fun for everyone. Luckily, I don't volunteer for things. 
People don't bother me, I don't mind if someone cuts me off in traffic. I am pretty calm and typically, a non-panicy type of person.   However, I know for sure that on the inside I don't have **ANY** of my shit together. Its just that those around me count on me so having a stable mind and an overall content personality keeps them at ease. 
I have calves of steel and can hike up mountains with no leg fatigue 
I'm a big self doubter but I still try things anyway. And I usually succeed at things when I try. Feel the fear and do it anyway type shit.  
I have a very shitty memory for feelings, so I tend to get over things that make me unhappy very quickly. As a result, I'm naturally very happy-go-lucky, optimistic, and bounce back from setbacks quite easily. 
I look better wearing glasses. Kinda "egh" without them, though.    
I can ignore responsibility and the stress associated with it, at will....  
The fact that as a grown man, I treat kids with respect  and always behave around them like I would have wanted adults to be when I was little. 
I can fall asleep within 5 seconds of lying in bed. 
I'm currently 70lbs down from 263lbs, only 20 more to go :) 
I'm a very kind person. Even the people who don't like me say that. Sometimes it's the only thing that keeps me going. 
I don't know if I could pick one favorite thing. It's either my abs, my ten inch cock, or my impeccable ability of lying.  
I take time to consider all sides of every situation before responding / reacting.  
I had a brain tumor when I was 18. I wasn't expected to survive without major side effects like having one side of my body paralyzed.     I survived just fine. 20 years on and life is amazing. My favorite thing about myself is that I appreciate every small thing, every refreshing sip of water, every bit of food, every ray of sunshine warming my skin, every comfortable chair, every quiet morning in bed, every kiss from my dog, every little thing. I'm so happy to be alive.  
I'm a damn animal magnet. They fucking love me. I'm a natural and can read them. I don't try to make a cat come to me before he is ready and I don't try to force an excited dog to calm down. I do it their way, and they flock to me. Little kids and old people too. I don't even have kids but my wife tells me it's because I talk to them with sincere interest like they are little adults. And I do not speak to even the most elderly person with condescension like they are "cute."   Animals, children, and old people. They all love me and it all comes naturally. It's my favorite thing about me. 
My favorite thing about myself is also my least favorite thing...  I always put other people first. I consider their wants, needs, happiness light years before I'll think of my own. I would literally do anything for someone I care about - even if I don't know them well. It makes me feel good to see other people happy.   But - it is also my least favorite thing. I often end up hurting myself by putting others before me. I make decisions in my life that benefit other people but cause me harm - physical or emotional. I am taken advantage of quite frequently...and that sucks.   I love too easily and I sacrifice too readily...but I'm a kind person with good intentions and I can't say I'd rather be any other way. Even if it causes me harm - I'm glad for what I can do for those I love.  
My calves. Genetically blessed with large calves. It makes me feel good because a lot of guys have really small ones 
My motivation, drive, and willpower.  I'm the only person in my family to go to college and moved out of my house at 17 to do so. I'm studying Computer Science and Electrical Engineering and have a GPA decent enough to be part of the top of my class.  I've got my shit together and it feels great. When you're motivated, you can do a lot. 
I'm highly empathetic and in tune with other people's emotions. I can "feel" when something is wrong, when someone is being dishonest, or when someone wants to say something but can't. I sometimes feel uncomfortable that I can understand why people to really fucked up things (even though I don't agree with it), but I believe that it has a purpose. I just graduated and am beginning my first job as a therapist so I  believe my empathy is my purpose in this crazy world. 
I am not a talkative person. My friends know about it and tell me their secrets without forcing me to reveal mine. I know quite a bunch of things about my friends that other people in the group don't. 
I'm really motivated to get things that I want done.  From work to my personal life I've been able to set goals and work hard towards them.  Being driven in all my ventures increases the success of each as well.  Success at my job helps me afford my hobbies like funding custom rubber ducky porn, which then gives me more content for my montages and gifs. 
I used to be a very timid and insecure person, who never wanted to be pushed out of my comfort zone.  Now I continually push myself to do things that scare the crap out of me, or things that I don't think I can accomplish. It stresses me out like crazy, but every time I succeed in something, it makes me feel a little bit stronger. 
I like that I'm compassionate and not just for close friends and family. I recently saw a girl crying in the mall in passing and asked her what was wrong. She mentioned getting into an argument with her boyfriend and he left her there. I offered her cab money but she said he was on his way back. She probably thought I was crazy lol, but I mean you have to be having a pretty shitty day to be openly crying through the mall. I figured I could try and help. 
There's a bunch!  My best is my belief in myself. My first boyfriend whistled at a girl as we were crossing the street and I ignored him. He ran up to me and asked "what I was going to do about it?" I said "nothing, if you don't want to be with me, you can leave". We weren't together much longer than that for a multitude of reasons.  I'm nothing special looks-wise, and I've struggled with confidence issues in the past. But there's an untapped store of "nah, fuck that" in me that I love.   Other things I love include my mental and physical ability to adapt - within reason - and my ability to embrace a natural high. 
That im fairly smart but still manage to be the dumbest person in the world 
I seem to have an unquenchable thirst for knowledge. Learning new information is just so satisfying to me for some reason 
3 things as well actually:   -My skin is great. It stays blemish-free, rosy, and regulates itself with just the right amount of sebum to make it look dewy (but not oily) at all times. It's never temperamental; I don't really take care of it beyond using a basic cleanser and SPF-containing moisturizer  -I am always above average academically, partly due to Asian parents. I'm in med school currently; so, I'm proud of that, I guess?   -One of the cutest guys in my university HAD a crush on me before. We are now just best friends, and he is still popular with the girls, but he's glued to me for now, and I'm proud to have him :) 
I am proud to have never taken a drag off of a cigarette or done any illegal drugs. 
I can take an alarming amount of drugs without passing out  
Not someone with a favorite, but I'll tell you my least favorite:  I have an inferiority complex. And I'm not very good at it.  
I understand this however at the end of the day you need to think about yourself, you only have one life you don't want to destroy it. 
Jealous! I broke my ankle in Jan this year and once it healed I went on a hike for the first time in March/April I fell and cracked my ankle again about a mile away from my car about to go home. I can safely say I won't be enjoying any hikes soon :(  
Good on you! I really like that about myself too. My own personal motto is "do it *because* you're scared".  
I have an inability to stay mad at people for longer than like 24 hours.  Even if I want to be angry, usually once I wake up in the morning, I just can't be mad anymore. 
That's a good quality to have as long as people don't take advantage!  
Wow, you just made me feel worse about feeling laid back because I just realized I have very little emotional memory too.  
I am the exact same! I went to get my eyes tested last year with my fingers crossed I would get to buy some black think lenses geek glasses because I feel I really suit them  
And then it destroys your life but you're completely fine with it, until you aren't.  
annnd that's my least favorite thing about myself haha 
I used to get thanked by parents when I worked at a bookstore, because I'd talk to the kid when he or she was looking for something to read instead of asking the parent what the kids wanted. Those were some of my proudest moments working there.  
I think people always underestimate the intelligence of children. I've had more insightful conversations with some children than I've had with some adults. 
I agree! I wish people treated me as I treat the younger generation when I was that age.  
You, my friend, are empathetic, and that is the most important quality to have. Hope you're having a great day!  
Story time:  Some years back we had a new boss show up at work. For whatever reason, every morning when she came in, she'd smile at me. And she too had one of those contagious smiles. I could not help but smile back.  It made me feel much better, every time.  Which was important because I was going through a divorce at the time, and I'd show up to work every morning in the foulest possible mood. I'd be teetering on a razor's edge between utter despair on one side and maniacal rage on the other, just trying to keep my shit together, and here was this woman, that I really didn't know at all, just flashing her 50,000 watts of sunshine at me every morning, and it just made me feel so much better. Every. Single. Time. She really helped me make it through a tough time.  So, yeah. If you have one of those smiles, keep on doing what you do, because you have no idea who you may be saving. 
I love people like you. It's always nice passing by a complete stranger and having your smile returned.  
I do this also! So much better to smile at strangers that look morbid! I feel like I need to see this contagious smile! I'm thinking slightly fuller lips, nice pearly whites and dimples!  
Same. I can fall asleep anywhere, at any time. Thanks, Marine Corps. 
Takes me an average of 1.5 to 2.5 hours to fall asleep. If i'm really tired it ussually takes just the same amount of time. Every so much nights i cant sleep at all.  
This makes 0 sense to me. You can just go from awake to asleep... almost instantly?  I don't think I have ever managed to do this. Usually it takes me at least 10 minutes, as a minimum. Even if I'm incredibly tired... 10 minutes. 
Congrats! Absolute well done I hope you are proud :) Anyone achieving their weight loss or health goals to me deserve a round of applause!  
Initially read that as "[you] are currently 70lbs" XD. 
Hmm... cf... cf... country flowers... cute friends... calm fingers... cordial families.... yep I got no idea.  Looked the actual answer up and it turns out cystic fibrosis is not nearly as nice as any cf I was going for.  
That is touching :) I'm so glad your happy and healthy! 
This is such an encouraging thing to read, I hope you know that. =) Keep that date on the retreat and you could make it to see flying cars! 
This used to be me.  Now I'm fat.  This super power vanished at age 33.  
You probably just don't eat as much as you think. CICO 
Do you think you re more disciplined than motivated? How do u gain that motivation? 
This sounds like me, with that positive kind of fuck it. I like that also! 
This is me as well. It's the fastest way to distract myself from a depressive mood, just by diving into a new subject that has long piqued my interest. I have a pretty long list of bookmarked articles and podcasts that I store up for just such occasions.  
Confidence in yourself is a really good thing. Good for you! 
For how long have you exercised for and how old are you?  I'm 16 and started lifting weights, eating better and all that stuff 4 months ago.     
Neither have I. No alcohol either, and I intend to keep it that way.  Any specific reason you didn't experiment? 
More like what a hiker-class trainer would say before you battle him 
That's awful. Hiking is the best, although I'm having a hard time finding people who like doing my specific brand of hiking insanity 
I get over being mad very easily but then the other emotions underneath stay for a while, such as sadness or disappointment. I'll remember that but since I'm no longer mad I'm unable to talk about what was bothering me. 
Lol, I actually get taken advantage of very easily because it takes me a few tries to learn from my mistakes since the feelings of suck don't stick... 
Wait... you're both undefeated? There is only one way to settle this!  
Which means you've never lost. You, too, are undefeated. 
That's true. They often see things more clearly than adults. 
As a person who is a bit short on empathy, I can't say anything but this is completely true 
I was really hoping the story ended with you marrying nice boss lady. 
I used to do this because I had a similar experience, but lately I've had to be more careful.  I've had several instances where I smiled at a gentleman and they've stopped me to talk and asked for my number. Then I had to make them feel bad by saying no. I'm already in a relationship and don't want to lead anyone on. :( In those instances I feel like I just ruined someone's day when I just wanted to make them smile. No one likes to be rejected... 
Yes, actually.  I like that people feel innately comfortable enough with me to be 100% honest.  It's not like I have any reason to blab about what they tell me as that would only serve to ruin their goodwill.  I always make myself available to others as someone they can vent their problems to and I don't want people to lose that outlet because I blabbed about their personal demons.   
My ex is in the Navy and he can literally fall asleep standing up. It amazes me. 
I can do that in almost any condition. On a train? Sleep. Lights on? Sleep. Noise? Sleep. It's great.  
I don't know :(. I try to be really nice and friendly, but some people just don't click. 
Most of this thread is so uplifting. Good post, OP! 
Of course she appreciates it! Makes a nice change from the massive cocks she gets from the guys at work. 
It's the best thing ever. Everyone tells you that you are too thin, unfit, need to gain weight, etc, while you wolf down the gooooooood foooooood. 
It depends on your lifestyle. A construction worker friend of mine eats like shit but he's working out hardcore everyday on the job.  
I am around 6'4" and don't see many people of my height. 
I am 14 and I have only been doing this for a few weeks. I still need to eat healthier. 
Go on what is your specific brand? It is! I used to hike once a week minimum and now I'm more scared than anything! I've had to switch my main cardio to swimming now. 
Right?? And then sometimes I'll forget specifically what made me feel this way so there's no way to try to address it. 
Well... we did have a certain chemistry, but never acted on it. She's married ... but not happily. So, there is hope yet. 
This came up quiet a lot in another askreddit question, about what women stopped doing to avoid leading men on. Maybe it's a few rare cases, but it would be a shame if that stopped people from smiling to each other. 
Well I am sure your friends are glad to have someone like you in their life! 
Not military but work and school and strict ass parents gave me that skill.   When we were younger my mom would wake us up at 6 A.M on the clock to do chores (clean everything) and would hit us with the dreaded chancla (sandal) if we weren't up and cleaning by 6:02.  I learned to wake up earlier, clean up, and go back to bed before she ever even woke up.   Work sometimes had me working from 2 pm to 2 am Friday and back at work 6 am Saturday. I used to just sit on a chair at work and set my alarm for 5:55. Of course, I always wake up before the fucking alarm.   School did the same shit. Wake up and read and then close my eyes and sleep and rinse and repeat the process.   I once fell asleep standing up in a Naked and Famous concert.  
This right here, it's a superpower.   Like OP I can fall asleep instantly, but conditions have to be just right. If there's even so much as a small repetitive noise, it becomes like Chinese water torture. It would be so great to be able to just fall asleep anywhere, under any conditions.  
That's not your fault. It's ok to be on a friendly basis with people who are just acquaintances. What I don't get is if they're straight-up telling you, "You're kind, but I still don't like you." What makes more sense is, "You're kind, but we have no common interests" or something like that, which is different from not liking the actual person.  
I just think to myself "Calories don't count on the weekend" and that keeps me going! 
A lot of people don't consider this. My dad is a construction worker and probably eats 3500 calories a day (most healthy food though), but he never gains weight just because he's basically working out 8 hours a day.  
American here  I automatically assumed you were from anywhere in the world and moved to America. I'm very disappointed in myself.  Thanks for helping me reapply perspective.  
What happens if he and his friends raid your liquor cabinet when they're 16 and down that bottle while you and your wife are away in Vegas? 
It's picking out a mountain on google maps and climbing it. No ropes or crazy vertical stuff, but 18 mile hikes with 5k feet of elevation aren't uncommon for me. Then get back home and maybe do it again the next day 
That's snoring? I thought those were trucks downshifting on the highway!  
It is hella convenient I have to admit.   On the flip side though, my ability to sleep through anything is also terrible. I need 10 alarms to get up in the morning and sometimes *still* sleep through it. If someone broke into my house in the middle of the night I would likely have no idea even if they broke all the windows and busted down the door and stomped their feet. Fire alarms? What are those? Ever miss your stop on the bus/train because you were asleep? I have.   In the first season of the walking dead, Rick wakes up from a coma to find that the world has descended into anarchy and apocalypse. I would legitimately do that in real life. There could be an event on the scale of 9/11 and I would sleep through it.  
Let me think...   Well I was friends with this girl, Laura. Used to hang out a lot. Anyways, I ask her to hang out (I hadnt seen hrr in a few weeks) and she *blows up* on me. Says I'm too difficult to be friends with.  I ask why. She says that she always felt bad when she'd cancel plans, because I'd be like "Aw, that's okay!" And that would make her feel worse. Or when I'd ask her to go out for the day with me, that made her feel bad too, especially if I'd offer to spot her cash. Then she said she felt like an awful human being when I'd offer to just stay in and watch a movie, even though I would rather be out.  I kind of stopped talking to her after that because the friendship was exhausting. She mentioned to someone that I was really nice, but she didn't like me.  Idk, I have an awful habit of befriending shallow people. I'm working on it. 
It helps if you pace walk everywhere, run up the stairs and never take the elevator. I literally have to concentrate to walk at a normal pace, and I find walking up the stairs one step at a time extremely tedious. 
Through a friend, I met a kid who was the son of an All-Pro NFL Offensive Lineman. I didn't pry too much about his dad, because the kid was cool and we were shooting the shit around a bonfire, I wasn't trying to interrogate the guy about his dad.   I only asked him how his dad was doing after over a decade out of the league (his dad had some serious injury issues that ended his career early). The guy said that his dad was still in pain from his game days, but that physically he was still feeling better than he did when he was playing. When the player was training and in season, he'd eat like 6,500 calories a day to maintain his weight and muscle mass, and it made him *miserable.* His son described it as eating until you're stuffed and then eating another meal. It was a struggle to not drop weight.  
I need to do this, I would love to do crazy climbs with no ropes in crazy locations. I would need to learn though! I haven't ever climbed rocks. 
Just get regular blood tests once you're older. Just because you aren't gaining weight, doesn't mean that food isn't screwing with your blood pressure/cholesterol. 
I used to work in a university cafe when I was in school. The offensive line for the football team came through, and each had 3 full meals. 3 of them are now in the nfl 
I nearly upvoted but then i remembered i don't have a dad anymore.  
Yeah, I'm still quite young. I'd love a bit higher pressure though, I've got me mom's low blood pressure. 
Yeah.  Good luck.  Everyone will agree with this sentiment, and then fling their feces at any critical thoughts that don't agree with their pre conceived notions. 
Wait a minute, "Feel the Learn"? Really? While I'll agree wholeheartedly that the US education system (and likely education systems in basically every other country) need drastic overhauls, I find myself not wanting to side with someone who thinks "#FeelTheLearn" was a good  idea. 
Why is there a political underlining here? I think associating this with Bernie Sanders will diminish the importance of the message and turn off a lot of people who still follow the polar model of politics. This isn't a red vs. blue matter. Everyone needs to be educated, and associating this with Bernie Sanders might diminish the receptivity by Republicans or people who don't agree with him. 
Critical thinking isn't the problem. People on both sides think critically.  Bias is the problem. At some point we allowed our biases to outweigh reaching a tenable conclusion.   A lot of this has to do with the fact that so many people *are* thinking critically.   For example:  "A" realizes that "B's" argument is 90% sound, but the last 10% can't be proven/is arguable. So, "A" exploits the situation by arguing "A" is right while poking holes in "B's" 10% that cannot be proven. By doing this, both of them end up talking about two different things and both think they are "correct" since neither one of them concedes.  I'm not sure we can fix this sort of behavior.   
(I'm a senior in highschool) There is no creativity involved in any core class. It's all memorization. Some teachers are better than others but all I do is study info that I'll forget. Every highschool student can memorize pointless knowledge now but if you asked them to come up with their own conclusion philosophically they probably wouldn't even have the ability to think deeply enough. The ability to think abstractly is decreasing.  
You're fighting directly against modern culture. "Conspiracy theories" and that whole side of investigating things has become uncool and out-group behavior. People unironically use the "tinfoil hat" meme to scare off those who are saying things that make them uncomfortable. How do you even begin fighting back against that? Whole generations have been ruined by these attitudes that are only getting worse. People want their safe spaces in this increasingly chaotic world to make sense of things. Critical thinking is terrifying to people now because it means they have to face reality. Really, how do you fix that? 
One reason we don't have enough critical thinking is because we allow our teachers to be far too emotional with our children. Many students spend more time with their teachers than they do with their families. This should not be allowed but we do it because school is tuition free child care. Parents feel better when their child's teacher behaves like a surrogate. This leaves the bulk of a child's education up to the school and many schools are very opinionated. I agree we need more critical thinkers, but that would mean we need children to spend more time at home in order to prevent too much similar thought. Everyone's families is a bit different and that is what helps us to inject our society with varied thought.  
I'm currently a student in the International Baccalaureate diploma Program.   We have a class called Theory of Knowledge (ToK). It teaches us to question how we know the things we know and in the process helps develop our critical thinking and investigative skills. I am of the opinion that if this class was taught to all Juniors and Seniors across the US, provided they had some desire to learn, it would greatly benefit us as a society.  
The most educated are the least likely to think critically.  You can't *teach* critical thinking.   Education is orthodoxy for the programmed and groupthink.   Their research even proves this, but they are unable to *realize* this.     You want critical thinking?   You want to be able to think for yourself?   Meditate.  Remove yourself from your phone, constant engagement of communication, and  constant inundation information intake.  Become more self-aware, and see a *real* objective view of the world.     Ideally you do this when your brain is developing in childhood.  
The problem with schools is that it is treated very much like a business. The higher up business men don't want the younger generation to question them, only to blindly obey what they say for a paycheck and schools make sure children are shaped into that mold.  
The thing is as far as you say something controversal you get scrutinized and labeled by both sides. We need more open minds, but it's hard when everyone lives in his own bubble.  
I feel like great math teachers used to teach critical thinking in all aspects of class.  But over the years, the focus became more about getting the problem solved by memorizing an gimmicky algorithm instead of learning why and how different methods work.  current:teach distribution.  then teach "FOIL" method.  Then teach reteach distribution again when dealing with trinomials.  better idea:  teach distribution.  Show what that really means.  let students utilize their own critical thinking to realize they can do it for any system.  
It always sort of cracks me up a little when people start talking about teaching critical thinking.   It's a paradox. If you're teaching them anything, they're not really thinking for themselves.  The best you can do is leave people alone and hope people come to it on their own.   Schooling (which is usually where you hear people talking about "teaching critical thinking") usually actively discourages critical thinking by framing all the questions and leading people through a particular thought process.  
If you want more critical thinkers, we as a society need more focus on STEM as a whole. 
I teach in Georgia (state). Updated science standards are being rolled out here to specifically try to address this next year. Most of the new standards ask the students to "obtain, evaluate and communicate" information, as well as to "plan and carry out an investigation" on various standard threads. The focus will be on students discovering the information themselves through investigation instead of simply being told what they need to know by the teacher. Yes, this seems like common sense, especially for a science class, but it's better late than never I guess. It seems like most of my students are so used to information being handed to them that when they are asked to think critically, many just shut down. 
Hold on... can you explain what is actually good about common core mathematics? I've tried to make heads or tails of it and it makes absolutely no sense. 
On the other hand, I know college kids who can't do simple addition and subtraction, like 7+8=15, reliably.   Memorization of simple math is a sound basis for learning other math. 
I am actually jealous of how kids of the future will learn and understand the world, compared to my no child left behind school experience. 
I see critical thinking as common sense. I don't understand how one can just believe something to be true without questioning it or looking into it in further detail. 
So basically teach people to learn how to learn effectively?  
The problem with history as it is currently taught in the classroom is that the textbook publishers will only publish history that fits with the American worldview of "Christopher Columbus was good, we defeated all the nasty opponents, and we are currently the best society". If someone were to write an alternate view of the Vietnam War saying maybe America didn't belong in it and maybe we did more bad than good, it would be immediately stricken out in editing and would never make the final cut. Teachers are encouraged to teach from one source, the textbook, and other sources are only brought up by the 5% of teachers that want to give their students both sides of history. This is all a summary of a point from James Loewen's "Lies my Teacher Told Me" if you are interested in more on the subject.   
It seems that proper skepticism and the ability to distinguish fake from real information is absolutely imperative to future generations' success. Our world is saturated with all kinds of bullshit. 
A lot of people are addressing this only in terms of classrooms, but we only spend 1/3 of our time in the classroom during the school year. One of the things we're missing is television that teaches children to think critically. One of the things that sticks with me is the science channel motto "Challenge Everything." It is short, but it packs in so much because no matter what you hear or where you hear it from, before you pass it on, you should challenge it and decide if you believe/agree with it. Blindly following messages and people, no matter what/who they are, is dangerous and leads to misinformation and ignorance.  
Everyone agrees because they define "critical thinker" as "someone whose views align with mine". 
21 years old here, did the school thing a bit more recently. I wouldn't disagree that there are teachers that want their students to develop critical thinking. You're right, it's not a new concept. It's just not taught effectively at the moment. Students resist the extra effort required to think critically and teachers resist the extra effort required to enforce it on them. I would say we absolutely need to revolutionize our education system if it focuses on critical thinking, yet we still have a large portion of the population seemingly incapable of critical thinking. How can you be okay with the current state of our education system given the adult population it's produced? 
Problem is, majority of the time, kids are more influenced by their parents than their teachers 
Personally i've found empathy comes as a biproduct of greater education as a whole. The more one knows his history, philosophy, and law the greater one understands the consequences certain actions, legislation, or ideologies can have. I personally agree though with a focus within education that incorporates more of the traditional goals of liberal arts based education, which is the production of well rounded critical thinking citizens. Surely there is a balance between the equally as valuable skills of the STEM fields, and that of the liberal arts such as philosophy or criminology for example.  
I think it is due to the massive (and still growing) wealth inequality.  If I can hardly pay the mortgage, and have to struggle every week to feed the family, I promise you I am not going to be concerned with anyone else. 
I disagree.  Empathy can hamper critical thinking and result in poor decision making.   The human empathy response is triggered disproportionately to individuals and can leave the big picture unattended to.   It can lock people into empathizing with a particular group at the expense of another.   Critical & rational thinking can transcend these pitfalls.   
"Yeah, but teaching ethics, metaphysics, epistemology, and so on doesn't produce profit for overpaid CEO's or cheap commodities for us all to consume, so therefore it's worthless to pursue education in. Philosophy is interesting, but it just doesn't '''''produce''''' anything, therefore it's not valuable"  
Decreasing access to resources = less empathy. We're just like any other animal in that way.  
What about those who don't think teaching empathy is a worthwhile effort?  I think we can all agree that critical thinking is simply a universally valuable skill, but the importance of empathy is relative. 
Same. My initial reaction was that it sounds too much like #feelthebern  Then I realized it's much more of an issue that a campaign pushing for education uses a hashtag with completely nonexistent grammar.  It might as well be "#do a smart" 
Agree with you.  Feelings aren't arguments.  Feelings aren't facts.  Feelings aren't mutually constituted. 
I would agree that this post-modern era and generation has moved beyond the bounds of reason in many ways and a good emphasis on the classic modernist philosophers could really help us use reason and logic to come to our conclusions and guide our beliefs instead of party platforms and whatever our social group says. 
Personally my math and physics classes in high school required a lot creativity and abstract thinking. I mean if you look at the average level of mathematics students are learning today compared to 50 years ago I'm sure you'd find an increasing level of abstraction.   
By teaching. Teachers have been fighting directly against "modern culture" for years, by dispelling myths and replacing them with facts.  It's met with resistance, but it's the only way. Otherwise everything just gradually slides backwards. 
Who upvotes these pseudo anarcho bullshit rants? The most educated are not critical thinkers? What?  
The main reason I dislike the hash tag is that, intentional or not, it is very similar to "feel the bern" and because of that many audiences will associate your idea with Bernie Sanders. For some audiences this may be construed as a positive, but for those audiences who disagree with his ideas will not give your idea the light of day and shun it without any thought.   
Wi-Phi? I thought you guys where dead. I use your vids to help me teach my friends and family about philosophy, I love your stuff. Thanks for this! 
Yeah. I've been teaching college level math for about 7 years. It is pretty common place for my colleagues to go on and on about "teaching critical thinking" and then have their students memorize a procedure so they can get the right answer without actually understanding anything.    This is exactly the opposite of critically thinking - It's sheepishly following instructions. I suspect high school is even worse judging from the level of understanding of a typical new college student.  
Ever since socratic method teaching was all about nurturing a critical thinking.  You must have a very peculiar interpretation of what "teaching" is. 
I don't completely agree with this view.  The bread-and-butter of a liberal arts degree or humanities degree are critical analysis papers.  You learn to formulate a thesis and construct a logical argument that backs up said thesis.  Coming up with a thesis, organizing it into paragraphs, and citing your work = critical thinking. 
I don't think people should be allowed to vote without photo id. 
That's good, though. The same thing is happening, from what I've heard, here in CA with common core in high school. Students are butthurt that they have to actually work for the answers, because they were trained to memorize for the test. They're adapting, but it's hard.   Meanwhile, my mother in law teaches 1st grade, and they are easily picking up math that used to be 2-3rd grade material, where they used to struggle with the basics that she used to be teaching in 1st grade.  
Doing simple math is more than memorization. It's knowing how to re-arrange your components to make it easy. 7+8=15, sure, but 5+5+2+3 is 15 too -- and 5+5 is easily recognizable as 10 and 2+3 is easily recognizable as 5. So you don't need to try and smash 7 and 8 together directly. You just need to understand the core concept that drives addition.  Granted, 7+8 is pretty easy on its own. This works much better with something like 61+38, but the base idea is the same. Memorizing 50 different small addition problems might get some people to develop these tricks on their own, but I think the original commenter's point is that if you teach them the underlying ideas, it makes it easier to develop an understanding faster. 
Have degree in maths.  Yes this is a pervasive issue.   My best guess is that it is because they are trying to remember what 7+8 is rather than figure it out.  When you can figure it out, you memorise it naturally over time. 
I dunno, I'm taking linear algebra this semester and if you had asked me what 7+8 was randomly on the street I would have had to think about it.  The farther I get in math, the more it seems to me like the only time real math uses numbers is to put it in the calculator. 
i'm guessing you're not studying math in college.  once you figure out any math, you make a computer program(which you usually have to write yourself) to do it.   (for higher math).  for lower stuff, obviously calculator.  The idea of math is the problem solving, not doing the same boring calculations over and over again.  example without math.  learning to screw/unscrew a screw.  once you learn that, there's no need to practice it.  in fact, if you decide you want to build an automatic screwdriver, nothing wrong with that.  now your next project is take apart a table.  you've never done it.  but you know it involves screws.  the focus isn't the screws.  the focus should be on the problem solving aspect of learning to take apart something you never have. 
That's one huge problem I see: you shouldn't perform simple math like that through memorization. Then you won't grasp truly how it works, and your ability to do it will fade with memory. Rather you shorten the problem and memorize easier routes to get to it, such as by building tens. You see 7 and know that the sortof opposite of it in base ten (what you'd need to add to it to get ten) is 3. You pop 3 out of 8 and get 5. So you built a 10 and had 5 left over? 15. The way I was taught in school is such that I do this every single time someone asks me to add the numbers, it's a lot faster than my memory would be in most cases. 
I agree with the idea of teaching and encouraging people to develop critical thinking skills. However, I think it won't be enough and I get your point and agree especially on the role of emotions part. I think that more than emotions alone, it is related to *cognitive biases* and how we, as humans are prone to making certain mistakes, even if we know the facts about a topic and have the information and can recognize some decisions as irrational, we might still make them, inadvertently.   It happens even with scientists and knowledgeable and experienced people, sometimes; that's why there's  the saying that "science advances one coffin at a time", which unfortunately has some truth to it (sometimes). 
MOST parents manage to teach their kids to not think critically.  "Why is the sky blue?" "Who cares".   Why does the sun change colors at sunset "I dont know its not important" 
The idea of common sense is mostly nonsense. The closest it comes to a consistent definition is a sort of intuitive sense of what is right, and what "makes sense".    Ur usually the "common sense" answer is also the simplest answer, which means it's wrong more often than right, because literally everything is complex.  
If you grew up in a religious environment where you were punished for saying "well that doesn't make sense..." then you learn early to suppress logic. 
Nah. Critical thinking refers to Logical Analysis of arguments and other presented information.   Investigation is more than that, and includes things like reaching beyond the logical breakdown of information/arguments, to research root causes, context, related information, examination of sources, etc.   Someone else called it journalism, and that is sort of true, in that ideally journalism is a form of investigation. A big part of it, though, is learning to come to understand a system, how the system interacts with other systems, and how parts of the system interact with the whole.  
I'm from the UK and they teach multiple points of view for History, even from a young age we are told about information and data from both sides and encourage to us the Internet, with appropriate sources, when we wrote our papers. 
All the more reason to try to teach them actual critical thought. Reddit is full of pseudo-critical thought. I go around challenging it, getting downvoted, then occasionally something breaks through. It's been that way for 8 years now and the truth is you just have to keep plugging away. That's how things get done. 
I think you're assuming that there are fewer adults capable of critical thinking today than there have been previously in history, when there is no evidence, beyond the anecdotal, to support that. 
Until about age 7, then their friends are actually their greatest influence.  
Also culture,  Comments seem to suggest the American PoV (and considering the article is about educational reform since US education system is about to disemboweled).   American culture is very focused on the individual, while other cultures focus a lot of family/community. Both have their pros and cons, but American culture really, really, REALLY doesn't promote social welfare. 
If they empathize with one group at the expense of another, I don't believe that is having real empathy. If they had true empathy, they would be much more inclined to see things from all other points of view. Not just their own, or whatever group they've chosen to use as a display of their good-nature. Which, of course, is still for their own benefit.  
But that's stupid. It's a hashtag, it's not intended to work with the usual rules of the English language. (If y'all are gonna bitch about the hashtag, bitch about the fact that it's blatantly unoriginal.) People are so obsessed with this idea of "proper" English as this ivory tower that they don't even look at the ideas communicated through things like hashtags.   Hashtags, just like popular expressions, or memes, have their own internal grammar. What's important is the message. Do you know what the language in question is trying to say? Has it communicated this clearly? Cool. Now stop clinging to the rules as if using "whom" makes you smarter. Sheesh.    
Something worth saying is worth saying simply.   The middle-class lingo of academia is the single biggest problem with academia.  
And the bread and butter of a STEM degree is nothing but critical analysis in every single capacity.  If you think that you can get through a chemistry or engineering degree without learning critical analysis, you're sorely mistaken. The whole point of the sciences is the abandonment of biases and the adoption of critically analyzing results. Where as in any LA degree, a bigger emphasis is placed on how one "feels" rather than the objective analysis of the whole situation. 
One of the problems is that I'm told to investigate stuff, but then the tests I'm given are all data points, so I'm not being evaluated on my investigation abilities, despite my teachers telling me that's the way to do well on the tests. 
With common core, I explain its useful application in life. It trips me up that people try to defend the position against ANY use of common core math.  Try this the traditional way using mental math: 6,666 - 777 = ?   People get confused trying to borrow 10 three times from the next place over.   Common core logic lets you measure the distance between tge two numbers:  It takes 223 to get from 777 to 1,000 6,666 minus 1,000 is 5,666 5,666 plus 223 is 5,889  In expanded form to check the addition part: We know that 5000 + 600 + 200 + 60 + 20 +6 +3 = 5,800 + 80 + 9 = 5,889  But people think that thisis longer somehow. Maybe different, but try writing out the traditional method in words similar to what I did.   Im an accountant and use common core tactics on a regular basis because I dont always have my laptop or even a pen and paper handy when certain things come up on the fly in an important meeting. It's extremely effective when youre trying to listen and make sense of the numbers   
Educating oneself it's difficult. Being spoon fed is easy. Most people don't know that they're being spoon fed. I'm cursed with the knowledge that I can tell the difference, but still too lazy to make an effort. 
This is really interesting to me, I never received a formal public education growing up. What you described is how I do math in my head all the time. I've sometimes thought its a backwards way to reach an answer to a problem but I've always found it intuitive to solving thing I'm not familiar with.   
I think it's worth noting that understanding a core concept is itself a memorisation task. The thing being memorised is a mental procedure rather than a simple association. 
I used to teach Math and currently work as and with Statisticians. I have generally noticed in both students and collogues that ones who were comprehensively taught basic math skills when they were younger (i.e. can do mental math fast and reliably) seem to have a better "feel" and "intuition" for numbers. Some examples include picking close to accurate cutoffs when categorizing data, selecting better values for parameters when running algorithms, having strong troubleshooting skills when something goes wrong, i.e. they have a better sense when numbers or calculations are right or wrong.  **Assumptions** The above applies to my experiences as a whole, individual cases can be different. This generalization is purely anecdotal as I have not conducted any formal research. I have tried to generalize based on learning mental math and controlling other factors. For ex: people who have the same experiences. 
You'd be better if you could. Don't buy into the circle jerk of arithmetic not being important 
I don't want to write anything scathing, so I'll just suggest you're biased because your entry point into the culture is via English, a language that taught entirely through rote memorization in their country. Your understanding of the Japanese people is extremely superficial if your conclusion is that "teenagers don't even have strong opinions." It's not that they don't have them; it's that they're not used to be asked about them in school.  Go visit a Japanese home and see if the teenagers there are capable of arguing with their parents coherently. 
It's not parents, so to speak, but rather our American culture, as a whole, that shuts down inquisitive thinking and wanting to learn.  There's also the underlying anti-intellectualism in most people and our culture.   
but wait!  we gotta know, are you... or are you not... a Professional Quote-Maker? 
AP history is often much better about that than normal history classes, unfortunately.  
Yeah, in America they teach that too. I don't what that dude it talking about with the whole Columbus was good and the Vietnam War. Any class I ever took from middle school through college did not portray Columbus in a positive way. 
I disagree that hashtags inherently have a grammar of their own. They follow trends, sure, but I think that an education-based hashtag should represent itself by embodying education. As far as I know, there's not a restrictive character limit on a hashtag, so there's nothing wrong with using a full sentence when it's relevant. And I promise I'm not an /r/iamverysmart type. I'm not saying this to pump up my edu-penis. I just think it would do the movement well to put its money where its mouth is, when it chooses its branding. 
I'm a teacher.  Grading is hard with our current system of letter grades and such. That's why teachers make their tests like that.  Also, companies like Pearson have an iron grip on school systems and state policy. Everything needs to be quantified for the idiots outside the classroom/school.   State tests also communicate that teachers are bad if they teach how to think because then students aren't prepared to regurgitate and fill in bubbles.   What we need is not a revolution in curriculum and standards (although that helps). We need a revolution in the learning environment and the number of adults involved in educating kids day to day.  We also need to rearrange how student achievement is measured.  
You're doing well on the test of life, though. That investigation ability is what will let you succeed in the real world 
Funny you should mention that... I was actually put on a team to write new common assessment questions that better align with the new standards. They will not always be simple restating of facts (Depth of Knowledge level 1) but rather involve more critical thinking and reasoning (Depth of Knowledge levels 2-4). 
Glad I just just visualize numbers cause learning actual strategies seems fucking crazy.  
I'm the same or so I thought, but the truth isn't you're too lazy, you just aren't motivated.  When you find something that invokes emotion/feeling inside you you'll never lack the effort.    Reddit is a prime example for me, semi-ironic.  I can't say how many times I've done an hour of googling because I saw a TIL that had me going no way that's true. Or women...  
It's how most people will mentally do math from my experience (even the large majority of us who went to public schools pre-common core). It will vary slightly from person to person, but beyond simple addition and multiplication these 'tricks' are what allow most people to do slightly more complicated math in their heads. It's just stressed more nowadays than it used to be where you would figure out these things more on your own than in the classroom setting.  Examples:   * In my head I did 150+70-2+4 for the addition one.   * In my head I did 10*25+25 for the multiplication one. 
I agree, this is how I've always done math in my head. I just think the problem isn't with the teaching standards - common core sounds like it has it's heart in the right place (with math at least - I've seen examples of literature being used to push political agendas). The problem, as usual, is with the teachers. The "teaching revolution" doesn't come from improving methodology for current classrooms, it comes from replacing classrooms entirely. Our teachers suck - we are in an era where through internet learning, everyone in the country can be taught by *the best* math teacher, or possibly the 10 best for varying learning styles. Until we give up on the current in-person classroom models, we won't see the benefit that modern technology promises for learning. 
Memorization is not quite the right word. Yes, of course you must remember the concept -- but you must also integrate it into a larger set of ideas (mathematics as a whole). It is the integration that makes it make sense to you. You can memorize anything -- god knows they try and make you do that. That is rote repetition until you can recite it. However you can easily recite it and not understand it.  I know this is only a point of semantics, but it's an important difference. I think I understand what you were trying to say, I just have issues with the word memorization for it. 
This is the primary basis of common core math. People who do math in their head, rather than recall a math result from memory, are better at figuring out math problems as adults, and a wide range of related skills.   And tend to do math faster, because they have strongly developed the most efficient synaptic pathways for analyzing and solving mathematical problems.   7-14 yrs old seems to be extremely critical age range for learning basic skills in order to be better at tasks related to those skills for the rest of your life, so it makes sense.  
You can argue about anything without having a strong opinion.  And Japanese teenagers are *much* less rebellious than you think.  And no, my opinion isn't just based on my classroom.  I've met tons of Japanese people and have gotten to know them.  They share many of the same qualities.  Ask a Japanese person what their opinion is on something, then they'll ask you what you think, then just agree with you.  No matter what.  I've had two girlfriends.  Dated many others, and have talked with several of my students outside of class.  It's the same.  Having strong opinions or thinking critically is not a desired trait in Japanese culture.  Following the norms is. 
 Bringing back memories man.  I despised that answer as a kid, teach me fuck. Just telling me to believe you because you're older or my teacher isn't good enough.   Thankfully the Internet came along just in time.  
Hah, I got that response way too many times as a kid. Got in trouble so many times because I refused to take that as an answer. 
I think the tie in is the fact that religious belief is so much more widespread and dominant in American society than it is in other western democracies. More than fifty percent of Americans believe in a literal flood, that the earth is 6000 years old and that Jesus rode into town on a dinosaur (the last one was sarcasm). 
It depends a lot on the area you are living in. I live in a relatively liberal area and Columbus was indeed not taught as good. My cousin from another state was taught a complete different view point on Columbus.  
Hashtags are meant to be memes.  They are something short, rememberable, and easily digestible.  The only purpose is to get people to tag their posts with them, so that those posts can be tracked, grouped together, quantified, and evaluated.  They are also to make it easier for people to search for posts with the tag.  \#WeNeedMoreCriticalThinkingandHigherStandardsinEducation is a fucking terrible hashtag.  It's long, cumbersome, and not exactly easy to remember.  No one would use it.  You want something short and catchy, which \#feelthelearn is.  Also, hashtags came to popularity on Twitter, which *does* have a very small character limit, so you don't want a hashtag taking up more than the absolute minimum number of characters. 
Have said this to almost every professor in college. No phones during a test because you need in the REAL world? I can find every formula in the history of man through this! Point being, even they knew it was just memorize and regurgitate. That's our system folks. 
so what most schools are trying to do is teach ALL kids the ways that "good math" kids used to figure out on their own.  but this is debatable as far as effectiveness.  Do those methods work because "good" math students used them or did they work because they were good math students to begin with?  Will it work with less capable students?   There isn't any conclusive answers yet.  But it seems to not be any worse so why not try.  That said, some parents flipped out because that's not how they learned.   
I was at the zoo the other day and kids were just being ignored by their parents when they were asking their parents questions.  I started leaning over and telling kids the answer after the third one I heard be ignored.  May be because parent doesn't actually know why what an orangutan eats, etc, but just say that. Ignoring your kids is not  ok.  
Yeah, you have all that information, but it's still really fucking nice to not need to sift through your phone for every little thing you need to know. The tests for your knowledge are so that you don't just have the knowledge near you, but literally instantaneously accessible without needing to think about it. Until technology gets to the point where there's literally chips in our minds that can immediately tell us what we want to know, memory (and the pointless school tests that go along with it) will remain an incredibly valuable commodity. 
I don't have kids, and I'm not sure if you do.  I'm not saying ignoring your kids is OK or that you shouldn't do everything you can to teach them. Just remember that they are still children.  Small children will often repeat phrases and ask questions that they won't retain the answer to by choice.  A parent has to hear this all day long every day.  It is part of social development.  As they get older you should absolutely do the best you can to make sure they are educated.  
I worked with kids for years and they are little shits...however, this was at the zoo.  I was stuck in line with these families for a bit and they were being respectful. I think that's what got in my craw so I answered the kids questions.  It's not ok to ignore your kids at the zoo when they're asking respectful questions.  How's that for compromise?  
Noob here, why was he sentenced to death he seemed like a pretty cool dude 
Socrates died because he knew he was right. By running away, he would be telling the people of the future that he was just teaching others for personal gain. His death had a large impact on his student, Plato. Plato would later go on to teach Aristotle, who would then go on to tutor Alexander the Great. 
*There is only one good, knowledge, and one evil, ignorance.* 
We'll never really know how much of the Socrates we know was a a representation of the real man and how much was the main character in Plato's work.    
Stop fucking translating it as apology!! The Greek term apologia is closer translated to "defense." Socrates apologized for nothing and went out with two proverbial fingers straight up.  
If I remember correctly he was given many chances to take what he says back, or apologize or whatever, and be spared, but he kept true to his beliefs 
I'm guessing Plato would have kept a record, right? Wasn't he known for that? Just guessing.  
Democratic vote did him in.  Let this be a lesson to never let the masses vote on anything.   
Read the "Apology".  Socrates lays out the case against him, and his defense. 
I always wondered about the timeline of these men.   Thanks.  
I remember reading about how one of his friends offered him an escape that he declined.  He tried to explain to Socrates that he had sons and needed to live to be their father, but Socrates knew that this was bigger than himself. Really an incredible story.  
Isn't one of apology's English definitions defense though...? 
This is part if a large and highly contentious debate carried out to this day by experts, I'm not sure why you are asserting it as if it were fact.  
Diogenes of Sinope was called "Socrates gone mad". So what would he be without Socrates? 
Plato wouldn't have been aware of future changes in the calendar used in Europe, so it's not as if he could make a note of an adjustment. 
To elaborate, he was accused of not believing in any god, but believing in demons instead. And by teaching philosophy to the youth, he was spreading those "dangerous beliefs". 
Fake philosophy is bad everyone, so bad. We gotta get this guy Socrates out of Athens some how. I heard an idea, not mine, but have you heard of Hemlock? Beautiful pine tree everyone. But very dangerous, very poisonous, just like this so-called "philosophy" and "reason". /s  I know that there are different types of hemlock, /s means I really don't care in this situation. RIP Socrates, Plato, Aristole, and all the other smarty Greeks. 
He doesn't have any original works, he didn't write 
Not to mention he kind of brought it on himself. He had multiple chances to avoid being executed but he kept messing with them until he died. He even praised Sparta after Sparta had defeated Athens, which is pretty stupid but that was kind of his MO.  On top of that, Athens was in a bit of a shitty state. They had lost the Peloponnesian war and Sparta had set up an oligarchy instead, since the democracy Athens had before had caused a lot of problems for Sparta (especially since they continuously voted against generous surrender terms from Sparta until their defeat). The democracy had been reinstated in Athens a few years before Socrates's death though, and since he was a staunch critic of democracy in general and wanted an oligarchy (rule of the elite) he was disliked by a lot of people. 
Let this be a lesson to erradicate the ignorant masses through education and equality 
Thanks for this comment.  During the same sex marriage debate I had a few conversations where I pointed out that if the Civil Rights Act were put up to a popular vote at the time it would have failed. 
That's Plato describing the trial. In "Crito" someone goes to save Socrates from the execution and there Socrates lays out *why* he actually deserves the punishment (as opposed to his defense in "Apology"). They are both very interesting reads. (btw Crito is fictional as well - Plato was not there - if it ever even happened, but it still doesn't diminish the literary value) 
On the other hand, he was kind of an asshole who abandoned his family because he was stubborn.  
I think Diogenes' whole thing was not fitting in as a commentary on society. He was a pupil of one of Socrates' pupils. He challenged and embarrassed Plato in regards to the latter's definition of a human. He also had an interaction with Alexander the Great, but it was basically just him roasting Alexander. 
If your abolish ignorance, nobody will want to use them. 
If you think about it, most time measurement celebrations are arbitrary. A year, a lunar month and a day exist, but are actually not related. Meaning is assigned by humans, so it's the thought that counts.  Also notice how western christmas is roughly at the time of winter solstice and the date of easter is calculated from first full moon in spring(mixing lunar month and year). It is us giving meaning to those days. 
He was also sort of being blamed for "supporting" the tyrants during the reign of the 30 Tyrants after Pelopolesian War (which was false, but his accusers didn't care about the facts too much).  And he did choose hemlock over exile, so there's that. 
Mostly true but he didn't believe in Demons, he believed in what he called a Daemon, which is sort of a spirit but for him was basically a voice that told him what was right or wrong. We would call it a conscience. 
The whole Meletos' accusation is pretty shaky to be honest. 
He's mentioned by people other than Plato. I believe Aristophanes wrote about him also. So probably. 
Thanks for this counter argument. So far all I read was "they were overreacting", and maybe they were, but he seems antagonistic as fuck 
Not trying to be contrary, but as a layman with a limited understanding of history and philosophy I was under the impression that Diogenes' whole shtick was a commentary on all of recorded history and our tenancy to need a ruler be burdened by possessions etc. ? 
I disagree on the basis that different opinions will still cause high conflict.  
The physical effects of the poison is described in the text and it seems to match with the effects of the hemlock variety that was used for these kinds of executions, so that's why we say it was hemlock. It's never clearly specified.   I'll get you a quote later.  
Are the dates usually selected *arbitrarily*... or are they usually just inaccurate? 
Your claim that we don't know if Socrates is anything more than a fictional character is 100% untrue.  He appears in Xenophon's Hellenica as the Chairman of the Prytaneis on the day the Assembly debates whether they should execute the generals from Arginusae (406 BC).  He also appears in Aristophanes' Clouds, an appearance that would make literally zero sense if he wasn't a real, historical figure.  His trial is also referred to a speech of Aeschines, which describes what happened and why the Athenians voted to sentence him to death. 
The best modded subs and worst modded subs in reddit are both evidenced by heavy deletions. /r/conspiracy is among the worst, and has numerous deletions. /r/AskHistorians is among the best, and has numerous deletions.   I'm not denying (or supporting) your claim, but your presented evidence is not sufficient to support your argument.  
Free speech is not a human right, it is granted [or not granted] by the laws and constitution, if any, of the country you live in. 
Socrates died for us, and what he felt like was the truth 
Best thing is, when he had a chance to escape he actually went through with his death sentence  
Interesting position. Is there any story I can read where, say, hypothetically, a famous philosopher of some sort questions the accusations, and explains why they're shaky? 
he absolutely was   in his trial he didnt make any case for himself not being guilty and instead decided to mock the prosecutor, then coming up with a joke sentence for himself sfter being found guilty. he wasnt exactly wise in how he acted (also because accounts label him as being gross and unkempt and just an overall fuckin weirdo) 
Perfect knowledge implies no opinions, just facts. 
No, they're the ruling class and only ones allowed to breed...That's what happened, right? Right? 
One way to imagine Socrates as a fictional character is to think of him as kind of a meme of Greek society at that time.  When you think of him this way the discrepancies between platos Socrates and Aristophanes Socrates make a lot more sense.   
That's always seemed a very weak reasoning to me; that our rights are "given" to us by the will of the group... My rights come from my very existence as a living being, my right to free speech comes from the tongue in my mouth and the air in my lungs 
I'm pretty sure he died because he drank the cup of hemlock. 
Irrelevant - It was ineffective as the sole purpose of Socrates was to question and make other people question. He had an exit (obeying the court order / stopping his studies) yet he didnt chose that one.  Here we are thousands of years later, still questioning the integrity of plaintiff and whatever we come across.  Socrates won.  
Not sure if you're serious, but in case someone reads that and wonders who the Sophists were:  They were simply paid teachers in ancient Greece, often from other countries, who were bought in and taught only for payment, almost like mercenary teachers. 
As a classicist, I'd claim almost every story told about Socrates by his two most prolific students, Plato and Xenophon, are probably made up and if not are heavily modified, but that doesn't mean he didn't actually exist. I'd apply the same reasoning to the man you're speaking of. 
No it doesn't.  I can value individuality or I can value equality.  Depending  on that I will choose different policies that can be opposing each other  
Wouldn't that be ignoring emotion?  If someone doesn't like the existence of something, and it's based on emotion, wouldn't that be their opinion?  Let's say there is a donut on the table and there are two people looking at it. One person eats the donut and the other person doesn't like that that happened. Wouldn't that thought, the idea of not liking that, be both a fact and an opinion? 
Wow, eugenics upvoted on /r/philosophy. Don't know what I expected. 
This has nothing to do with the claim that we don't know whether or not Socrates was a real, historical figure, which he demonstrably was. 
How else do you explain it? We have no natural rights.  Maybe "do whatever it takes to survive and make as many babies as possible" would be a possibility. 
One time I made tea out of needles from some pine trees in my backyard. When I showed my Mom she said those are Hemlock, not pine trees, and I freaked out because I didn't want to go like Socrates. Then after some googling we learned that Hemlock plants and Hemlock trees are two different things. 
Wasn't he offered exile in place of execution but he turned it down to make a point? One of my college professors told me this but he could have been full of shit 
Yeah but more than that Plato and people of his ilk looked down on them because they didn't care about making reasoned, logical arguments but instead focused on semantics and rhetoric to win an argument. They were seen as a kind of philosophical charlatan. 
Plato wrote a lot about them and now the term is mostly associated with having very poor reflective skills but being very confident about your knowledge.  
Similar story - one time when I was in a battle royale my partner picked some berries to eat, but they got stolen and eaten and killed the person who stole them! They turned out to be nightlock (a berry just as poisonous as hemlock).  Lucky that kid stole the berries otherwise my friend would have been toast.  Your story reminded me of that, for some reason. 
Well the alternative was to have a Roman soldier reach up his butt and pull his heart out so... yeah, probably willingly. 
Yes thats the case. The thing with exile at Ancient Greece was that, if you get exiled from your own town you will probably wont be accepted at another one or wont have rights even if you were accepted. Let alone being able to teach...  Also considering that he was old, I dont think it was a hard choice to do for him. 
From what I understand (after listening to an episode on it from the In our Time podcast) Athens judicial system, and sentencing to crime, worked like this: If the accused was found guilty, the defence and the accuser got the opportunity to suggest the penalty. Then the "jury" gets to decide which penalty the defendant suffers.  The accusers in this case asked for Socrates to be put to death. Socrates wanted to pay a small fine. If Socrates had suggested exile instead, it's very possible that the "jury" would've gone for that. But he made such a low "offer" that it was both insulting and not at all appropriate for someone who had been found guilty of corrupting the youth. So he got the death penalty instead. He pretty much forced their hand on it, and from what I understand it was to prove a point. 
I just finished replying below, but basically yes, they sold gimmicks and didn't care much about actually teaching reasoning skills. 
Apparently their preferred strategies have become standard on the internet.   
I dont think that concept exists or is even possible of existing. I would be apprehensive at the idea of true knowledge throwing opinion out the window. 
Hey I remember you! You were on a big TV. Tell me how's your sister been these days? 
Or he could've tried to escape when Crito told him to.  
It is discussed at length by Plato. Essentially Socrates felt obligated to the rule of the state as it was that state that enabled and created him in the first place. 
I think teaching philosophy can cause jumps in maturity and lead children and teen to take more interest in their future. This makes them more motivated to do well in school and is why I think teaching philosophy makes kids all around better students. 
Who knew that exposing kids to philosophy would help them show gains in recognizing arguments and understanding logic? 
I'm confused as to what they're comparing. They keep saying students from England vs disadvantaged students, but never specify who the disadvantaged kids are. I'm assuming they're from England as well, so do the England stats encapsulate the disadvantaged, or are they a completely separate category?  
I accidentally enrolled in a philosophy class this past term at my university. Except this wasn't just any philosophy class, it was a formal symbolic logic and the class was titled "Logic, Argumentation, and Order". I'm a geography/public policy major so this was so far out of my realm I almost died in that class.   HOWEVER: after pushing myself through the course, I was able to get a better grasp on my college-level math, and I really did gain insight as to how formal arguments should be set up! I'd agree with the statement 90%. Other philosophy classes are filled with kids who think they're poets haha 
In high school I always felt as though math taught you how to think, so it's interesting to see the correlation in the reverse.  
As someone who took a lot of philosophy while pursing my mathematics degree, I definitely agree the two subjects synergize well.  That being said I don't know how you explain Kant or Hobbes to children. Descartes maybe, but I can't see it going much further than that.    
I think doing 6 years of philosophy improved my analytical abilities when it comes to English/literature.  Writing style though . . . It wasn't the best training. 
Doesn't anything the makes you think improve you general intelligence including math and English.  
I'm only 15, but I find philosophy very interesting. Especially the afterlife and why we exist  
It seems like most of the articles posted in this sub are just attempts to justify someone's philosophy degree.  
Nearly everybody that I know who took philosophy classes in college agrees that you can BS your way through nearly every paper and get your degree. To add to that, in the intervening weeks between papers, a lot of these people did almost no work. There is no way that you can possibly be learning anything with this process. IMO, in an undergraduate setting, philosophy is a bizarre field of study. 
Teaching kids baseball also makes them smarter in math and English.  Teaching them how to play Magic: The Gathering will do it, too.  Also teaching them more math and English will help their math and English.  Did you know that just continually engaging a child's brain in literally any kind of critical thinking will help their math and English?  Make the right decision, skip on philosophy and go for something that's actually fun and/or practical.  Unless the child or parent is already a philosophy nerd, then go nuts and have fun. 
Agreed. Wouldn't reflect too well if people on a philosophy sub get duped by fake or misleading news 
Although the sources for this article are sketchy, I'd like to believe that teaching children the art of logical argumentation could prove to have tremendous value if done correctly. 
I saw this post highly upvoted and lost some respect for this subreddit, then I saw your comment was top and the respect came right back. Thank you all for actually thinking critically even when the material is in your favor.  
i like that your skepticism and critical approach to assessing and acting in information is exactly what a philosophy class would inspire. we should probably have a class like that earlier in the education stream 
when i was in school in Germany we had "Religion" classes, in the lower grades it's just singing songs and reading the bible, but in higher grades 10 and up it's a mix of psychology and philosophy + learning about the major world religions and their philosophies  we read for example Sophie's World and talked about one chapter each week over the year  (or if you are not christian you get something called "Ethics" which is the same, but with less emphasis on religion)  
In some European countries philosophy is taught since grade 9. Not so much changes unless the student is interested on his own independently from the teacher. For those philosophy is great.  
This is why you always check the source material! good catch (anecdotally this storyline appeals to me, but good to be skeptical).  
I'm not big on philosophy but I would imagine if they did a course in high school it would be more useful than much of the English we learned and a helluva lot more useful than the math. 
Yeah, this article sounds like feel good bullshit like "only smart people listen to music!"  
I'm a visitor from /r/all so apologies if this is an ignorant question, but please assume ignorance over malice :)  That report seems to promote what I'd seen in school as a course called "critical thinking". Constructing and deconstructing arguments, analysing differences in points of view, etc.  Is there a key difference? Or is this what most here would consider the starting points on philosophy?  The title wouldn't seem like such a surprise if replaced with critical thinking. Particularly since those skills are obviously relevant to at least English. They don't measure improvement in science, though I'd hardly be surprised if it's helped too. If not, I'd wonder if that's actually a failure on the science teaching. My experience of science teaching was large amounts of rote learning.  Interesting to see actual tested reports though. Even if they're flawed, it's a step forwards. I'll have to look more into the possible issues with the report. 
We actually have mandatory philosophy courses in Sweden as a mandatory course in "gymnasiet" when you go the social orientation. AFAIK, you have at least 50 hours of philosophy as mandatory but can take another 50 hours. 
As well as they skipped all the usual wrote parts, like plato worship, not sure it even qualifies as "philosophy", unless that term is so diluted as to be meaningless.   Maybe it would be better received if it wasn't a grab for the "philosophy" brand, and focused solely on skills like reasoning and critical thinking. 
Alright, but my philosophy professor was saying this for *years*. He had a single paper showing that Philosophy majors scored higher on the GRE than any other liberal arts major in areas of math, reading comprehension, and-- most of all-- writing.  I was a Philosophy major and scored only a 1.5 on the GRE. According to the statistics on the paper, I was in a huge minority. Most Phil students scored a 5.5 (out of 6) on their writing portion. In fact, at the time, philosophy majors out-scored *every other major including math science and business* on writing! Good thing the Writing Center never asked about my GRE scores; I might have been out of a job.   (PS: I brought the paper my philosophy professor had made to help convince the Writing Center director to hire me, even though I was a Philosophy major. She did end up making an exception for me and I believe one other Philosophy major before I left.) 
I had 2 philosophy courses in highschool. One in middle school, minor in college. All in MN 
I went through the IB program in high school just 4 years ago. As part of the program, everyone was actually required to take Theory of Knowledge (TOK). It was one of the pillars of the program. The TOK concepts were also brought up throughout each of the other subjects in the program as well!  Even though it was actually very useful after the fact ,Especially in how much it improved my academic writing, I found it to be to early in my academic career to really appreciate what we were learning.  
People who call philosophy "useless" are either too stupid to understand it, or don't want other people to be able to think for themselves. 
Formal logic is essentially computer science. I wouldn't be shocked to see more formal logic courses in high schools as comp sci becomes even more popular. Whether that qualifies as proper "philosophy" eh... But it's better than the current situation 
Very good analysis of this! I've yet to read the project report, however when I do, I'll have to be on the lookout for what you've pointed out. Thank you for providing it! 
I find my willingness to study philosophy for so long was fueled by immaturity and lack of care about future consequences. It is costing me much right now. 
Completely agree.   I think philosophy is one of the most valuable subjects any student can learn. It might help kids to address the things that make us human, our existence, and our acute awareness of our own mortality and the way it impacts us. Kids do wonder about these things, but they usually have no outlet. Perhaps having an outlet for existential concerns could allow kids to improve in other subjects.  
Relative to other subjects, might this be one of the best things parents can facilitate and allow the child to better learn other subjects in school?  For example, "Why should I learn this?" should be approached with a critical mind; the worst possible answer imho is "sometimes in life you need to do things you don't want to". What a disservice to an otherwise teachable moment! 
For me it did the exact opposite as I started to think of the social dynamics around me, the illusionary systems in place to make our society work. It turned me into a nihilist. 
I can't find a good source to teach MS these concepts though and I have an amateur loose grasp at best myself. Help? 
IB survivor here and no, I agree with this. Tok is a pain but having it there as a constant teaches you think think in a way other programs don't.  
Please correct me if I'm wrong, but it seems like you're saying that you're willing to ignore the lack of evidence in an article so long as it conforms to your pre-established beliefs.  
If done correctly is the key. This seems like it would be highly dependent on teacher skill. 
I suppose the best way to see the general consensus for a post on a subreddit is to give it a few hours, that way a good chunk of the users will be able to see it, and thus give an idea of what plenty in that community think.  Thank you for the compliments and for having restored faith in the subreddit! 
I did just as you had asked, and there is no download of the study for me. I am on Google Chrome, so I am unsure if that effects anything.  However, if that is the case for some, then the webpage should alert the viewer that there is a secret download. Otherwise, it will provide confusion, as is now.  But, fortunately, it doesn't matter now, given how others provided the PDF file itself. 
Perhaps they should teach it at a younger age then, to spike the interest from young. Even then, while it may not automatically make everyone who takes the class someone who is a great critical thinker, I would wager that it does provide a decent amount of benefit. I just wonder if there is any data regarding this subject. 
To some extent, I agree. However, by that point, many students likely wouldn't take an interest in it, due to schools killing any drive for learning they may have had. Thus, I feel that education should be reformed in a way that doesn't push test scores and pure memorization, but rather learning and applying skills learned in all of these classes in the real world. Furthermore, philosophy should be added in an extension to this critical thinking being taught, to potentially guide students on how to properly think. 
That's interesting! I've noted other individuals saying that in Brazil and Germany they had philosophy as courses as well, and seeing the differences in the way it's taught between the three is becoming rather interesting. It leaves me wondering which method of them all is the most effective.  (For context: The user in Brazil just said they had a regular philosophy class, whilst the user in Germany said they had philosophy and psychology mixed together in high school with their religion/ethics class.) 
I had zero philosophy courses in highschool. Zero in middle school. One in college. All in OR.  Most of my rigorous world-interpretive approaches take place through the analogical lens of Oxy-Acetylene welding. 
We had a logic and philosophy class at my middle school in the 8th grade. The first half of the year was logic and critical thinking. Stuff like premise and conclusions soundness of reason etc. The other half of the year was learning about classic Greek philosophy from, Socrates, Plato, Zeno etc.   This was in a small town on Long Island NY. 
Well lucky you. I went to school in a rural area, staunch conservatives and declining enrollment definitely kept it out of the curriculum. We even had a teacher with a Phd in Philosophy from Carnegie Mellon but he was the teacher for the gifted program. Don't ask me how someone with those credentials ends up teaching high school lol. I didn't have any idea who Plato or Aristotle were prior to college. My school was basically reduced to your basic classes with a few electives like technology classes but that was about it.  
Well for starters we don't have nationwide standards. I guess there's NCLB and Common Core, but I feel like things vary state to state or even district to district. When most schools are already on a tight budget, I don't know how advocating for added philosophy would go over in a lot of places.  
Thank you! I think the intervention is a great idea and I am interested in the results of a proper study.  
I took philosophy in my junior year of high school. I wasn't intentionally a bad student but I was only doing my work to please my parents and took no real interest in my education. After the class I knew exactly where I wanted to go in life, I knew what kind of work I liked and why. More importantly I learned that life isn't a game of luck. No one is naturally better than anyone, and that anyone can get where they want in life if they work for it. 
I've heard this of adults, specifically lawyers. Many lawyers can be good at memorizing the law but can struggle to keep up with the changes. According to one law teacher I had long ago with his own firm, the best lawyers where philosophy majors because they seem to have the best understanding of how any why law changes over time. By contrast, rememorization of a list of things with seemingly no relation between them is difficult and stressful.  It makes sense if from childhood to young adulthood one is equipped with tools for thinking (knowing far too many people that think "only the scientific method can reveal truth and everything else is simply subjective opinion"), but I have nothing to back that up. 
I'd even argue that you have better chance at making kids get interested in philosophy than at making adults do the same. Not just philosophy. As kids grow up and become more aware of the way our society ticks and what things are declared "useless", their curiosity get down and they become like "I don't have to know much math, philosophy, politics, history etc. Whatever is required for my future jobs is the only thing I need to know, and how to get me a gf/bf etc. Life's too short." Maybe a bit sad, but I can live with that, but what makes me truly sad is this: when some of these kids grow up and become a education minister or something then declare war on "useless" majors. Must kill public use of reason. 
I felt the same way at first, but now I feel like there's no system at all, no one made our society, it's just how we all evolved to live. There may be corrupt people or corrupt groups, but the society as a whole is just what humans came to be. 
Ok thanks. That's still such a strangely worded stat. I guess it's also just a coincidence that they add up to 100% 
I love the healthy skepticism. I was berated in another subreddit today for pointing out an article had no credible sources to the point of being called a liar for not proving it was fake. Hard to prove something is fake when their is no evidence that something is true to begin with 
This article was written back in March - how on earth do links die within MONTHS? 
Agreed. People should not expect every upvote to include a full read-through of a link wth an investigation of its sources. Upvotes are more like a filter for what is interesting. I *do* expect the comments section to contain a good discussion about the post, including a vetting its sources. I feel like any subreddit ought to be judged by its comments section, and r/philosophy usually does quite well there. 
Well I do not think so. For example in politics and so on you have still the majority that do not follow so much logic. It is true though that for those few that are interested it is very useful.  
Here here! As someone that just graduated, I agree. They teach us a shit ton of material, but they don't have the applied part down. Sadly, at the high school level, it seems like nearly all the education isn't meant for bettering you/your intelligence, but rather is meant to prepare for college gen ed courses. 
In Sweden we have all of these classes. Although ethics goes under the religion course. 
You think you're being snarky, but this might make you one of the more qualified philosophers on the planet.  Read "Zen and the Art of Motorcycle Maintenance" if you want to get some heavy philosophy from a smart tradesman.    
Taking Logic in college made me so much better in both math and critical reading. Did you think it helped you at that stage?  
This makes me sad. I logically know teaching isn't a respected profession but you don't need to be so blunt about it 
As am I. Philosophy has great potential for education, however, I do not believe there is much study as for how it's applied, which is a shame.  I suppose either some among us will have to conduct a reliable study, or we'll have to wait for others to come along to do a reputable one. 
I suggest you read the book Outliers by Malcolm gladwell. As it turns out, life *is* partially luck. Sure you can be above average without luck, but the truly successful ones were extremely lucky. There's a lot of people who were/are smart enough to create the internet or Microsoft at the time of its inception. However, Bill Gates had the luck and fortune to be able to have the opportunity to make it. He had the ability to go to computer terminals outside of school (mind you, computers were huge back in the day). Nobody back then had resources like that. Opportunity in of itself is a very lucky thing to have. Not everyone gets one or even takes advantage of the ones they do get. I think it's cool that you think you can be anything you want to be, but that's just wishful thinking.  
For the curious what was it that you realized wanted to do? 
Really now? I'm extremely envious now, haha. Isn't Sweden also a very Atheistic country, too? 
You recognize that the person who wrote that studied philosophy at an undergraduate and graduate level right?  
why did you say logically? sorry, i just took a logic class and i hope i didnt already forget what a logical truth is, not tryna be an ass or anything  
I didn't mean it that way. It's just if you have a PhD you're a little over qualified for teaching high school.  
Agreed, I have seen relatively few (if any besides this?) studies on translating philosophy to the classroom. That said, I am biased as I read mostly psychology literature.  
I think this has a greater risk of happening if you think of philosophy as a goal in itself, a goal more "worthy" than any other subject, especially if you're a teen and a little bit melodramatic already. I know I fell down that rabbit hole when I was younger.   Philosophy serves life best and brings more happiness if you strive to connect it to a bit of optimism and life goals. Such as: there is no useless knowledge. Life is long, you never know what kind of information you will have use for.  
I'm not saying that people can't get lucky and have an easy life of course lots of people do but no one should count on that. I'd say you need a plan to have a goal. I'm sure Bill Gates didn't have the goal of being a multi billionaire. If his software flopped and everyone went with mac he'd probably still be like the owner of a computer repair company or something. 
Well I always had a bit of an interest in programming but i never thought it was something I could actually make a living out of. The class gave me a new fascination for what could become with new technology. We have infinite possibilities we have at our finger tips. What got me was something about the fact that we are so insignificant, yet in the last century or so we've changed more than we have in millions of years. We are the first few generations to truly create our future. So, I took AP Java, aced it and now I'm a cs major. 
Yeah, sometimes it's just a broken link due to human error...calm your tits everybody. In such cases I've found it best to report the problem to the site administrators, they'll usually thank you for it. 
I would say this depends on whether the math you're talking about is proof-based or computational.  
I see where you're coming from, but couldn't you say that if you haven't grasped a fundamental mathematical idea, that is also a failure of education, either on the teacher or you as the student? Philosophy and logic could not exist without understanding fundamental math concepts. So I would say with any discipline, yes, it is entirely dependent on teaching ability, and of course, your own ability and desire to learn 
I'm a math teacher. I was using a local idiom.  I know teaching isn't respected based on a lifetime of comments like ops. 'Why would someone teach if they are smart enough to do something else' is how most Americans view teachers.  It's why I left teaching. My old coworkers, a lot of them were smart. And they honestly wanted to help make the world better.  But it's not a values position culturally 
I don't see how else you could mean it. If teaching were a respected profession, you wouldn't think to make such a comment. It would seem perfectly normal for a PhD to teach at a high school, rather than it being below them. 
I don't want to sound pejorative in any way but you had to take a philosophy class to understand that you could make a living being a programmer? 
That is true and is a good solution to the problem, however that doesn't mean one shouldn't be skeptical in spite of it. While a lack of evidence provided doesn't mean there is no evidence for the stance, there is still no evidence provided in the first place. 
Absolutely.  All of my math classes are purely computational.  The above wouldn't really apply in a proof-based class.  Relatedly, I really do not envy the people taking proof-based math courses.  Proofs scare me. 
i see. for what its worth, i feel like thats what highschoolers or younger tend to think, college education/experience is almost expected for everyone to some degree nowadays, and i think those students probably find a new sense of respect for their teachers/professors that they failed to realize in highschool. at least thats what happened to me. what do you do now if you dont mind me asking, and was that really why you left? 
This is so troubling to me. I'm currently in college, and several of my professors have recommended that I pursue teaching as my profession, and I see what they're getting at: I actually enjoy it; I think I might even be great at it. But teaching is looked down on in the United States. 
It does seem a bit plausible though, at least for those that have taken a lot of philosophy. But then maybe we have stockholm syndrome ;) It makes me curious for more studies, particularly of comparisons between achievements of students in countries with philosophy as part of their core curriculum vs. those in countries without. Though it'd be a loose corelation study, it'd at least be something....a start. 
Nah I totally get what you're saying.  Following that line of reasoning I think other disciplines can also fall prey to the same things. You could easily write a literary analysis and discuss things you know your teacher wants to hear and even pull passages from the book to support your claim and still not understand anything at a "deep" level. I know this is possible because I did it all the time in high school.   It's a tough one, because depth of understanding is tied to depth of character, which comes with life experience, which is something young students don't have a lot of, obviously through no fault of their own. Which is, like you said, not necessarily a failure of education but is simply outside the scope of education. 
Manufacturing consent changed the way I see television news. 
Wait, so now it's totally cool to disseminate scholarly works from MIT to the public for free? 
I look forward to the day when we can collectively appreciate Chomskys work as historically important to philosophy and linguistics, and culturally important to the free thinking individual.    I understand many do. But I feel that at the moment we are stuck listening to reports of those who disagree with his work. And since the man is still alive it seems that much of the focus in discussing him is to knock him down a peg or remind people he wasnt always correct. 
Did anyone actually click on the link? Unless I'm missing something, this isn't a huge archive. It's just a slideshow with some photos of notes and covers of some books. Seems like everyone would rather just talk about his politics. 
I used to email Chomsky back and forth for a long time. He's a great person with a wonderful insightful that too many people ignore, regardless of where they are on the political spectrum. The more of his work that is out there, the better. 
Where is a good place to get started with Chomsky's political writings? I tried getting into Understanding Power some time ago but his style was very dry; I always felt maybe I just wasn't being introduced to the correct stuff for newcomers. 
I don't particularly like noam chomsky due to some disagreements on political opinion, but i do respect him. He can see through all the bullshit everyone is putting out there. I really wish i could be like him in the future. 
Chomsky is just one of those voices people need to listen to, regardless of ideology 
He's an amazingly smart man, especially in linguistics. He's not the god of politics that most college freshmen make him out to be when they first discover him, just like people think everything that comes out of Chuck Palianuck is gospel when they first read him. It's easy to get carried away, as both of them are really good at supporting their opinions and points and speak very eloquently. There's a ton to learn from them but learn the opposing points as well. 
I don't agree with Chomsky on a lot of his views but he is definitely an intellectual giant and I enjoy listening to him speak. I've watched him give talks twice which both left me questioning my own views.  That being said Chomsky might of contributed to a lot of different areas, but he rarely debates opposition in a public setting. When other intellectual giants from different schools of thought try to go one on one with him he recants and then tries to take a moral high ground of superiority. He offers a lot and definitely makes you think but as my PhD Econ instructor said "Chomsky makes great claims but unfortunately he delves into other academic fields which he is not accustomed too and rather then debate those giants, he panders to his acolytes. He is a man determined that he is right and won't be open to the idea of being wrong even in schools of thought he hasn't been groomed in." 
Great resource for students of polemic or rhetoric 
In his memoir Out Of Step: An Unquiet Life In The 20th Century, the political philosopher Sidney Hook had some tart things to say about Chomsky circa the Vietnam War era. Hook scored him on his support of the communist regimes in Hanoi, Cuba and China, and his wildly disproportionate damming of the U.S. government.   
I don't get why Reddit is so in love with Noam Chomsky. He is a cheap charlatan. 
is there a good intro courses that will help me understand it? 
His attitudes towards the Khmer Rouge caused enormous damage to his public persona, and allowed his targets and enemies to discredit a bunch of the rest of his work. 
I disagree with him on plenty, and his blindness with Islam is especially galling, but he predicted the rise of Trump way back in 2010, and he has been calling out 'fake news' at least as far back as his seminal work 'Manufacturing Consent' back in the 80s. He's definitely right about a lot of what makes the U.S. government so dysfunctional, but his prescriptions misunderstand human nature on a very deep level in the same way that most liberals usually do: he mistakes the dysfunction in the U.S. as unique, and uniquely bad, which of course it isn't. The U.S. is *much* better than he gives it credit for, and it couldn't be the utopian country he advocates for* unless people were much better and smarter than they are- and they just aren't. Liberals *always* neglect the Pareto principle.  People are people, and liberals refuse to see that through their sanctimonious virtue signalling.  (*his nonsensical anarcho-syndicalist/Marxist philosophy is just communism by a different name)  
I couldn't disagree more, the man defended the Khmer Rouge. 
Chomsky debated Foucault, who did your econ professor debate?  
I always find this argument that Chomsky is wrong because "he delves into other academic fields" so ridiculous. That's exactly the kind of argument you'll make when you can't substantiate your claims. 
Very much this. He seems most influential among young people with little historical knowledge and a lot of passion.  
Given the vast scope of deplorable actions undertaken by the US government in the 50s, 60s, 70s and beyond; I find it hard to believe any damning of said government by Chomsky could be considered disproportionate. 
What makes you think he is a cheap charlatan? Even if you dont agree with him he puts a lot of effort and thought into his work. 
this video just made me want to read all of his works. anybody have a recommendation on where to start? 
That was simply amazing. The animation, the music, and the content. All in under 5 minutes! 
Seriously? That's the whole crux of that book? Well at least then I do not have to read it.   I hope Mr. Chomsky realizes the irony of his contribution to the very thing he's lambasting here. *Firing Line* *cough* *cough"  
There are certainly government & media paid shills shitting all over reddit every day trying to push a bias.  
A "formal grammar" is a mathematical way of representing syntax in a language in a heirarchical way (using a tree to represent the different parts of speech). Chomsky found a way to normalize grammars so sentences could be parsed efficiently, so that we can analyze the "tree" to study languages better. (please correct me if I'm wrong, as I learned this through the perspective of CS, not linguistics). 
Having studied the subject extensively, I'd love to see someone attempt an ELI5. I'm not sure I could pull that off. There's quite a bit of underlying material one must understand before being exposed to CNF. 
That's pretty amazing! How did you get in touch with him? 
Which is super unfortunate because Chomsky's "lets hang back and see what the actual damage is" was the correct approach in many other situations. His attitude towards Central America, Asia, The Middle East, and parts of the Soviet block ended up being correct in the broad scheme of things.  And then he was wrong about the fucking Khmer Rouge.  
Is it? He is literally the man most responsible for all of modern linguistics, including computer science linguistics. He revolutionized both philosophy and science. Well, perhaps the latter more than the former.  He also went toe to toe with Foucault, the most important philosopher of the 20thC (at least post-war).  On top of that is what he is perhaps more famous for: his DAMN impressive scholarship on the US empire and Manufacturing Consent. 
Which isn't surprising. Chomsky is the kind of personality that will be fully appreciate once he passes away. Same as how MLK Jr was hated when he died and only now he is appreciated.  
People keep wanting to believe this, but it's bullshit. Even if it was true so the fuck what? Does that mean everything he's ever said is wrong because he was wrong about this thing? That's a stupid way to sum up someones work. 
Being critical of someone doesn't require you to have equal or greater accomplishments than them. 
Calling Chomsky Anti-American, Anti-Imperialist, biased, or out dated at all fair criticisms of Chomsky.  But saying that man hasn't been out on the stages debating with intellectuals is not a fair criticism. He's been doing it for years and he's quite good at it.  
When I started reading Chomsky, I found his writing style to be quite dry and a bit cumbersome to read. I would highly suggest "Understanding Power" as a first Chomsky book. It's not actually written by him, but it's a collection of transcripts of him just talking plainly with random audiences, "free-style". It's a very engaging book. 
911 was my starting point. It was mindblowing and set me on his published path 
Trying nothing.  Reddit is a political and business marketing tool as much as a TV commercial. 
Some things are not meant to be understood by five year olds.  
Eh, his influence in linguistics is not very disputed.  Everything else is very disputed. 
It means that he isn't a person that everyone just needs to listen to. He's brilliant within his field but quite flawed outside of it. 
Understanding Power is a book that everyone should read. He digs pretty deep into America's dirt. I'd go as far as to call it entertaining albeit pretty disheartening. 
He's almost 90 and in the past decade or so he's visibly gotten old and frail, his voice raspier. I saw a video of him give a speech in December, he had to be helped to the podium.  
I hope its good. I literally just placed the order. Itll be here on the 29th! This is what I love about reddit. Its all in the comments.  
Yeah it's almost time. His wife is gone, soon it'll be him. 
'Hang back and see what the damage is'  The Armenian genocide and the Rwandan Genocides (and several other central african conflicts) occurred because people didn't want to get involved. Frequently citing 'Hang back because we can't trust the propoganda'   
Hold on, is it accurate that he is missing 90% of his neurons?  When I was taught this case I was taught that the water pushed the brain outwards against the edges of the skull and all the normal anatomy and a lot of volume was lost, but that a lot of the neurons survived in a more densely packed structure around the edge of the skull. Whether it's 90% volume missing or 90% neurons missing is a big deal to this question, and they are definitely not snonymous. 
This sort of thing illustrates why I shake my head when I hear people speak of "downloading our consciousness" or any other comparison of the brain to the computer.  Neurology is so dynamic and complex that we are nowhere near understanding it on that level. I don't think humanity ever will.  
The article doesn't address the possibility that the density of neurons in this man's brain is different than a normal brain. Most of the cells in the brain are glial cells and fat, which support neurons but are not thought to be directly involved in cognition.  By reducing their number, or volume, the number of neurons can remain roughly constant.  The implication that the brain was slowly compressed overtime beginning at the age of 14 when the brain was mostly formed supports this hypothesis. It won't be provable unless and until an autopsy is performed. 
As a philosophy major and scientist, I've always considered consciousness, merely as a sense of senses, an awareness of my senses. For example, I can "feel" that I am touching something.  
This makes me wonder. We often attribute humans special "human" characteristics to brain size. With information of this 10% brain man, I wonder if animals with brains 10% the size of mans can achieve the things this man does. And if not, what is keeping them from doing such things. 
It's interesting that they always state "the brain" when really that brain is the person. Your body is just a controller/tool that the person uses to survive. Am I the only one that thinks like that? 
The article claims the man acted normal yet states that he had an IQ of 75. The fact your IQ is almost 2 standard deviations below the average is itself an anomaly.  The article also claims the man was in almost all respects normal but we never get examples of his behavior compared with others to validate. 
I'm very into the transhumanist/life extension movement, and this kind of research has enormous potential. If we can identify the parts of brain responsible for "conjuring" consciousness, and how it functions, we suddenly open up many possibilities....brain a vat, brain transplants, maybe even mind uploading. Very cool! 
What exactly does this challenge? The title is unnecessarily metaphysical; It insinuates a normal functioning yet abnormally structured brain challenges the most basic premises of conscious (IE that it is a product of the physical mind).  That is certainly not the case.  If nothing else this is a beautiful example of the plasticity of the human mind, and it reinforces one of the most basic properties of that brain (namely the brains ability to adapt). 
This thread and the comments are not so much philosophically as much as scientifically-oriented. Can anyone discuss the philosophical implications? I really see none. 
I have a question, which I'm hoping someone more science-minded can shed some light on.  What does this mean for baby Jaxon?  If you don't remember, his case was all over the news maybe a year ago because despite developing in the womb with a very small brain, his parents refused to abort him.  A lot of people (myself included) demonized these parents for subjecting their son to a life of struggle.  Was that incorrect? 
The stuff you mentioned at the bottom is not new. We've been aware of the plasticity of the brain for a long time, that areas "with a specific function" can take over other functions, and we've known about people missing most their brain but still able to function. The new thing here is a theory of consciousness centered around learning that tries to take into account cases like this. Other theories of consciousness also try to take into account cases like this. The question is whether the author actually made their point in the paper, whether good counters have arisen if so, or whether it's all a straw man.  
This article is infuriating. This type of mentality is pervasive in neuroscience. Nothing about him losing 90% of his brain mass should "pose serious challenges" to any reasonable, modern theory of consciousness.  Mass = More Betterness  Is one of the dumbest, but most persistent, ideas in neuroscience. Nothing about mass or volume should necessarily correlate with consciousness. It's more about topology, about connections and dynamics between brain regions, that determines higher-order functions and their integration/interaction with lower-level functions.  This has always been frustrating but we'll get out of this type of thinking soon. 
Would you say this is similar to the Ship of Theseus paradox, applied to the "consciousness" label? 
Thanks, lots of laymen neurologists giving quick summaries, which end up misinforming everyone.    
The title seems to me to be like clickbait - even with only missing 50%, how does this have any bearing on arguments about consciousness, or philosophy for that matter? 
I don't know if it's necessarily challenging the theory of consciousness so much as adding new facets and potentialities to it. 
This is the first thing that came to my mind reading this article. Specifically mind uploading... well not exactly mind uploading, more like gradually replacing the brain with electronic components. The main worry for me would be the ability to make sure my consciousness was still me and not just a copy of me. I suppose we can keep our consciousness in tact, if it is done slowly, like this injury. 
Not to mention that the man's hydrocephaly spared his cerebral cortex, which is responsible for high level thinking including **consciousness**. So there is really not much that is terribly surprising about this case. Below the cortex is mostly white matter, which is just axons connecting various neurons to each other. While still important, a loss of this white matter would be less detrimental to consciousness than the grey matter. [edit] As others have mentioned, I have mistakenly understated the importance of subcortical structures.  
Where is the 90% figure coming from?  This seems like it may be estimation/speculation by OP, it isn't mentioned in the linked article or the lancet article.  Does anyone have a source for this figure? 
Personally I think the strongest point in the post is that function is not linearly related to volume. Which we already know is true. (We know this in humans, even, but to pump your intuition realize that whales have much larger brains than us) 
May I have your source on the maximum IQ being 180? I was led to believe the highest possible score was 162. I'm not saying you are wrong, I would just like to find out if I've been misled. 
Care to explain why the Chinese room is a terrible argument? 
But it's an "I know one when I see one" kinda thing. 
Lots of people have low IQ's but are not actually mentality disabled--basically he is not very smart, but he is in the range considered normal--just below *average*.   The fact that he could hold down a job, get married, and father and parent two kids, shows that he could take care of himself and his family without outside assistance; he was able to fulfill all the usual responsibilities of life.  he might be a not very *smart* person, but he is still a normal person capable of normal person things, so...normal. 
Quite a few similar informed speculations on the topic, for sure. The journal Consciousness and Cognition is full of them along with countless attempts to use empirical evidence to put them to the test and refine them. The problem is shitty old school journals like that are still closed access to the public so a huge proportion of our modern understanding of these things is hidden from the public. Which is why we need to push push push for open access science. 
This is the key question, isn't it?  "Consciousness" seems like a label that's subject to the ship of Theseus paradox like any other label. 
I work in subcortical regions, and they aren't even remotely close to "mostly white matter." That being said, we've known for a long time that your brain can correct for losing huge amounts of neurons given the loss is slow (this man isn't the first known example of this kind of neural degeneration, as u/nothatkindofdoctor mentioned). 
Do you mean consciousness as in wakefulness, or do you mean consciousness as in qualia and what it is to be a bat and the difference between p-zombies and real people? Different things. 
so in theory, if you took out the cerebral cortex, the person wouldn't have consciousness? Assuming that didn't kill the person 
0 mass is a problem. There's nothing there to "substrate" the complexity, likely living in the connectivity and dynamical linking between brain regions.  But articles like this are tantamount to "WHOA! there's this species on this planet that only has brains of mass 1.5kg, but is smarter than the Sperm whale with brain mass of 9kg! This shatters our theories of what makes things intelligent."  If the knowledge that decreased brain mass can occur without a hit to consciousness/intelligence challenges your theory, then your theory was too simple minded in the first place. We have more than enough data to discard all such simple-minded theories; we've had enough for decades now.   It's just the neuroscientists don't speak to the data/information scientists/engineers enough yet. 
To be honest, I was taught this a long time ago and thought it was [relatively] common knowledge so I disregarded that point to some extent.   To those who hadn't known, though, I'd agree that point helps suggest his claim very well.   Also the whale example was a good one - I'm used to people using elephants haha. It's even more eye-opening when you think of a giant, dumb, blue whale. 
Yes but this is such and obvious fact for anyone with even the slightest bit of scientific thinking.  My 8 year old nephew knows that such a simple paradigm could not possibly be valid and predictive of something as complex as the brain.  It's not even elegant  
Man that's really thought provoking for me.  The brain is conscious about more things happening in front of me than "I" am aware of.  So my brain can notice these things and decide for me whether or not the thing noticed is important to "me" and, then, allow "me" to notice or not notice depending on my brains decision.  It's like a smart caretaker of an inferior being that realizes the inferior being would be overwhelmed by all that's really going on.  i would like to read up on this.   
I was really high a while back and a thought occurred to me. The brain operates continually on many different things. It takes in sensory input, processes it, and provides actionable output. At the same time, it is processing the same sensory input and running simulations via neural networks to come up with a model of proper action for any situation. This is how the brain learns. It's all simulations. Then, when the brain thinks it has come up with a proper solution for a situation, it spits the info up to the language part of the brain. *That* is consciousness. It is when the subconscious processes of the brain are returned to our communicable language centers. So consciousness, maybe, is just communicable reflection on our subconscious thought.  Idk, maybe I was just too high. 
I don't really like the term consciousness anymore.  It's too broad.  I've been wondering lately if the key to isolating it can be found in fugue states, if those are even real.  Or does that just relate to awareness and not consciousness? 
Doesn't the brain and consciousness come down to: does the brain produce consciousness or receive consciousness  
You're absolutely right, and I do a lot of work with the limbic system myself, but I overgeneralized thinking of the space between the lateral ventricles and top half of the brain. I suppose what I'd actually find most intriguing is what happened to those subcortical regions and how their function doesn't seem to be entirely lost, rather than the issue of consciousness mentioned here. 
Probably, although they'd also lose basically every other characteristic that makes a human a human unless you could somehow selectively remove only those neurons that are responsible for consciousness (which might not even be possible, since it's likely widespread and not localized to one discrete region). I think it might be difficult to prove your results though, because consciousness can only be inferred through behavior, and behavior does not always correlate perfectly with consciousness. 
Just curious, is there anything to support the idea of average brain mass vs. body mass ratio as a reason for why humans are "more intelligent" than other animals?  I have a friend who won't let off on this idea but I've never really taken the time to figure out whether he's right or not. It's always sounded extremely wrong to me, so I tend to not say anything about it. 
For what it's worth, most larger animals have larger brains, because you need more neurons to control your increased limb/internal organ sizes. 
Indeed. But he's not an outlier, right? If his brain was like this and he showed no deficits at all, it would be very surprising. This is not much more surprising that finding that a small child with a hemispherectomy can later go to college (though still perform worse than average on some tests). 
Look into the experiments with people missing their Corpus Callosum and youll realize there are two of you in there.  
That's actually a really fascinating insight. The definition of consciousness seems to be when we can verbalize our feelings internally. You might be on a big revelation here. 
Ther are also people who say the brain IS consciousness, or that there is no consciousness, or that there is no brain. 
Matter produces consciousness.    Our brains are not radio receivers (only our eyes are ;-).    Whether you want to say the physical laws which lead to this are imminent or transcendent is kind of a moot point.   The laws which lead to consciousness are everywhere.   But when you become self-conscious, look around, and consider the universe might be infinite, then the medium upon which all these laws play out is literally nowhere.   I mean, *where is the universe*? 
A rough idea of one current big theory (attentional load) is that we have a certain capacity for attention that is finite. Certain activities take more or less of that capacity (high load or low load), and this can depend on experience in those activities, how tired you are, etc.   When near capacity on a hard task, we are less distractible as shown in many lab tasks. When we direct our attention or have it directed to something that requires a lot of our capacity, we automatically stop giving that capacity to other tasks. We stop talking mid sentence when something crazy happens in traffic and whatever thought we were having just disappears from consciousness as we navigate the dangerous driving conditions. We may literally not hear the conversation (say on a hands free convo partner who doesn't know about the traffic) -- it hits our ears but not consciousness and the info is lost. 
I think this individual is an outlier in the sense that most people with comparable brain volume are microcephalic and profoundly disabled.  The hemispherectomy cases are equally puzzling outliers.  It is significant that there are large numbers of cases that lie far outside the normal correlation of brain volume and IQ, it isn't a freak accident.  It is probably significant that they began life with a larger brain volume that diminished. 
That's interesting, that's how modern digital compression works no? Separating out visually distinct areas, and reassembling them but only as needed as they change to save on data.  
Hallucinate might be too strong a word, but, yeah.... I've gone partially blind at times in my life, a kind of splotchy blindness, and people might be surprised how long it can take to notice sometimes. The brain fills in a surprising amount of detail. In the blind areas, you simply don't see black or empty, you see filled in. It's just maybe wrong. But, unless you're doing something like reading a book or playing a video game, it can be hard too tell the detail is wrong for a bit. If you were just looking at trees and grass I think it would be pretty hard to notice for awhile. I usually need to become intellectually aware of a problem first -- details are inconsistent -- because my sight won't be the first thing that alerts me sometimes. 
Maybe.. or maybe there are only 2 when you split the corpus collosum. If it were possible to split the brain again, I'd wager that you would get 4 separate minds. I'd also wager that if we could directly connect two brains they would form one conscious mind. 
"You might be on a big revelation here."  Definitely felt like it when I was high. Then I started thinking about spiders and the uniqueness of their webs to each species and whether they move on their webs by having a definite stride length that other species can't replicate. Then I forgot about the consciousness thing until just now.   
Many scientists disagree that babies are conscious. Although there are probably varying "degrees" of consciousness.  "You don't have to be able to speak to be conscious."  Yes, I think you do. Well, not necessarily speak, but communicate. Sit down and try to have a meaningful thought about anything without using language. You can still act and react but you can't consciously form thoughts. 
I get the first two possibilities but what the hell does "there is no brain" mean? Are you just referring to some degree of solipsism? 
I believe that you are correct. I also believe it has something to do with "working memory" or for those computer people "ram" 
As opposed to what? Glial cells? Or does the brain run on magic?  The main problem is actually that we don't have a good definition of consciousness, so the problem of finding where "consciousness" is "located" or how it arises is currently ill-posed. 
Yeah, I agree. This is something that haunts me, and I can never find a way to resolve it. What if dolphins, or whales, or some other unknown creature in the ocean is actually much more intelligent than us, but can't really do anything but swim around?       ^^^^^ph'nglui ^^^^^mglw'nafh ^^^^^Cthulhu ^^^^^R'lyeh ^^^^^wgah'nagl ^^^^^fhtagn 
I suspect you may be correct, especially when considering Dissociative identity disorder (AKA multiple personality disorder). I read somewhere that they've recorded some people with over a thousand distinct "people" living in their head.  I wonder if we all have that; it's just that one personality dominates for life? 
It's difficult but possible to invoke and be aware of mental images without bringing any language into it. Maybe mental imagery is also a result of potential communication by drawing, but that starts to sound like the tail wagging the dog. 
Logic is a core part of philosophy and should be taught at least in high school, possibly sooner. We start kids in algebra as early as middle school. Predicate logic is very much like algebra and more relevant for life so it should be taught at the same age. Inductive reasoning is even more important in life.  These philosophical foundations should absolutely be taught much earlier than they currently are. 
Ethics ought to be a course that is required to graduate high school and get a degree in college. The latter used to be the case a long time ago.  A principles of reasoning course would go a long way toward high school students being able to determine what arguments are good and bad. 
Philosophy has to start from an agreed and proven first principle. Ungrounded speculation does not qualify. And that is what I fear we'd see given that children don't have the tools to address complex questions.   Children go through a series of developmental stages and throughout elementary and junior high they're stuck at the level called "concrete operations". Abstraction does occur, but it's not the norm. So instead of teaching the kids to think abstractly they will be taught either a procedure, or will confuse abstraction with fact. Better to teach kids according to their developmental capabilities rather than try to bring them along at an unreasonable pace. 
This may have already been talked about. But the problem with teaching kids to think for them selves and question their frameworks will lead most of them to hating the way the school system is currently set up.  Schools, "Here kids think for yourself better!"   Kids, "Why are we spending 8 hours a day at the age of 7 indoors, having information crammed into our brains, to pass tests that are not good indicators of intelligence or retained information just so the school can look better?"  School, "....on second though let me take back that free thinking." 
Holy crap. This is my first time in /r/philosophy and there are so many off-topic non-philosophical related posts on here confusing philosophy with personal opinions on stuff like education and religion.  Lots of this stuff reads like that "I am enlightened by my own atheism" copypasta meme. 
While I think this would be a good idea, there are much more pressing things that need to be taught before they complete school. Such as personal finance, basic accounting, the time value of money, rent vs buy, how to balance a check book, as well as all the types of bills you will have to pay and how to build a budget.    My highschool was considered ahead of the game and one of our classes spend 2 weeks on building a budget and balancing a check book. It needs to be multi year. We have too many people living pay check to pay check because they think they can afford a luxury simply because their bank account has a larger number than that items price.  
Haha, when I read the post title I didn't realize it was an article link and thought someone was asking /r/philosophy if philosophy should be taught as a core subject. I was like wow, what are you going to ask next, if /r/aww likes cute puppies? XD 
absolutely not they dont even teach kids how to do taxes, balance a check book, create and follow a budget why tf would they add a necessity for philosophy when they dont even teach kids the basics of living  
 No, even at university where departments have greater autonomy were being told to spin certain narratives and answers as correct, despite this undermining thought and moral discussion. Giving greater oversight on philosophy by allowing it to be taught at primary and secondary sounds an awful idea. 
I don't know if it would work. A majority of the people in my *grade 12* philosophy class last semester could barely grasp a lot of the concepts we were learning and (literally) *nobody* but a small group people really understood logic and logical fallacies.   However, a reason they might have not understood it is because they were introduced to this way of thinking so late in their academic careers, which in turn means maybe we actually should be taught philosophy at a younger age. Interesting.  
There is no question about it.   No pun intended.  Any subject that encourages children and adolescents to question the accepted truth, and grow their critical faculty will do a ton of service for this world.   We need more individuals. We need more pioneers. We need more challengers. We need more critics.  Or do we? ...  That's up to you. 
Yeah great, more bastardization of philosophy at the hands of casual students. How could that be dangerous?    "A little learning is a dangerous thing"  -Alexander Pope  
Yeah, I think it's very beneficial to students. I just wrapped up Junior year of high school and my theology/philosophy class exposed us to varying outlooks on our faith (Jesuit HS) and contemporary issues. If anything, it helped me definitively determine what I agreed or disagreed with and opened some actual discussion with my classmates. Now I'm no expert in the authors I've read, but exposure to them is good in itself.  If anyone's interested, the philosophers we read from were:   Aristotle  Emmanuel Kant  Jeremy Benthem   J.S. Mill  Louis Pojman  Karl Rahner  Judith Butler  Philipa Foot   Richard Gula  Our last tri consisted of a more relaxed curriculum where we discussed AI, racism, and wrote a paper proposing how we thought a philosopher would react or approach a contemporary issue today ex: Machiavelli on the Trump administration (something some of my friends did). 
This.  Logic class should be taught at the middle school level after they have decent reading comprehension and core math skills.   
Wouldn't programming be better for teaching kids logic  
Totally agree with this, the whole concentration on "the great thinkers" rather than on ideas nearly put me off philosophy and Im sure it has done for so many people. 
I would agree completely with that. Philosophy was actually a subject in school where I grew up, and I remember how increadibly dumb everyone thought it was, I especially loathed Parmenides. We couldnt grasp what the philosophers were trying to communicate, because we would always try to concretise the metaphors instead of thinking about the idea itself. Our prefrontal cortexes werent developed enough. On the tests we just regurgitated the textbook definitions without any grasp of what we were writing.  A few concepts were understandable though, like empiricism and some parts of logic. 
I'd argue that not teaching them is what is setting the pace kids can understand anything an adult can often times in ways adults can't. Im very sure kids can understand complex questions especial about philosophy. Teaching kids to think abstractly should be the norm the rest is forcing them into the assembly line that is education.  
I hate to say it but I agree. Finance does need to be multiple years. The quality of life for the whole country would improve in a single generation.  I say start with 2 years and let's see what we can get after that. 
Bring back home economics and all of those can be taught in one course. A critical thinking/basic logic/philosophy course doesn't need to come at the expense of practical, real-life skills.  Really, though, who doesn't agree that grade school education needs substantial reform.  
Religion is not a class in public schools, only private schools. If you choose to send your kids to a private school, you know what you're getting into.  
That was actually the case for me.   We learned about various philosophical theories especially 19th century philosophers. It was still in a catholic context, but looking back I must say that it was done quite well.  Still, religious teachers were religious, on tests as long as you pulled some crap out of your ass that made the church look good you got good grades.  (Belgium btw)  
Hahaha, yeah tbh is was a bit of a circlejerk inviting title. On the otherhand talking about it might actually make change more likely! Whereas agreeing that we all like cute puppies probably wont change anything :P 
Could you care to explain how it would be bastardized? Don't confuse bastardized for simple, if that's what you're thinking. 
I totally agree with you. My daughter is going into the 7th grade, and I've started teaching her about logic and logical fallacies at home, because they do or learn anything about it in school. Not that I'm an expert, but I believe that critical thinking and reasoning skills are more important that memorizing facts and dates.  
I went to a private elementary school and was taught logic there and feel like it has stayed with me ever since, so... never too early! 
I've recently been gaining interest in philosophy but never had any classes on it in high school or college. What book would be a good start to learning formal logic? I've recently purchased Sophie's World as a fun intro to philosophy. I also downloaded Platos Republic on my Kindle. But I'm learning about more and more philosophers that I want to dive into and I'm getting overwhelmed and don't know where to start. 
Second this! Used to major in philosophy at UCLA, changed majors for this very reason. There is a huge lack of discussion based learning in academic philosophy.  
Right? It kind of made me feel as though I was inadequate and could never live up to any of them, so it made me feel hopeless. 
No, I'm sorry. No. Kids are not little adults. Their brain is not just smaller, it is drastically different.  While I do agree that school destroys creativity in children, I do not agree that you can teach philosophy to little children and expect them to get any of it. Or care about it.  You can prepare them for philosophy by giving them logic courses or *maybe* some kind of History of Philosophy class. That could work in middle school, and philosophy could work great in high school. 
It would, now people don't realize what they are doing to themselves when they spend money or have credit card debt. It's not because they are stupid it's because they simply have never been exposed. Especially in lower income families, the parents don't know, schools don't teach them, and yet we expect them to be successful. It's lunacy to think that would work.  
Yeah but they don't know it's called philosophy, so if they do try and learn philosophy at one point they won't be going in with preconceptions of "Well this isn't what I was taught before..." 
Philosophy has been used to justify every abhorrent event in modern human history. The maxims of certain schools of thought are often used in and of themselves rather than as a framework for thought.   Remember the Nazis?  
Especially in the modern era, where facts and dates are readily available. 
I'm intuitively sensing a flaw in your reasoning, but since we didn't do philosophy in school I'm struggling to refute it.  So far the best I can do: all mortals are men. socrates was mortal. therefore, socrates was a man.  It still seems a bit iffy.  
I mean, very few people are going to be a Hegel or a Russell. But that's the same in every field. They all have their giants. 
Just finished an A level in Philosophy (UK qualification), can confirm that you're not allowed to give your own view, or more that if you do it won't grant you any extra marks in the exam. You have to argue for a particular conclusion, and I'd always argue for the conclusion I agreed with, but if you outright state your opinion it means nothing. You have to state how your conclusion is drawn from various arguments, but you're not encouraged to actually give your thoughts on the matter.  So you can essentially give your opinion by arguing a certain thing but at any point saying "I believe this, I agree with this" etc means nothing.   I'll say that's only for half the exam, the other half is 100% just others' opinons and no analysis at all. So I guess to a certain degree you do give your view, but only for the big essay questions. 
I think maybe our definition of kids is different - I'm thinking middle school and high school.   I was still throwing horse shit at fence posts in elementary school you won't get an argument from me that we should be teaching philosophy to them.  
Imagine if everyone in America set up a retirement fund and education funds for their kids. Fucking imagine it.  Quality of life would skyrocket in a generation. 
The advantage for memorizing facts and dates is that it provides context for new information. "Why should I need to remember when the Gulf War happened; I can just look it up!" is the kind of question that gets asked. But events shape future events. If you don't have a good picture of what *has* happened you cannot possibly have enough context for what *is* happening. Same for any other discipline: the other things you know help you filter through and contextualize new information. If you don't bother actually remembering stuff because you can always look it up, you will just miss key context.  
Don't forget that alternative facts and fake news are also readily available in the modern era. Gotta learn to look out for those. 
Formal logic can rescue us! The argument has this format: P implies Q. P. Therefore, R. "All men are Socrates" is a completely different sentence, formally, from what's in the rest of the argument.   Another way to think of it: all dogs are mammals. My dog Fido is a mammal. Therefore, all dogs are my dog Fido. That's obviously silly.  
I think its easier to see a little rephrased:  In the set of mortals, all men exist. Sokrates, being a man, is in the set of mortals. Therefore it implies that all men (subset of mortals) are sokrates (subset of men).  Does it exist a mortal man in the set that is not Sokrates? Yes, thats easy to find. And so the implication fails. 
Yes, the argument for requiring Algebra in early grades is that it is a good surrogate for Logic... Why not just teach Logic though if that's what we are trying to get kids to learn?  
Yeah that's what I meant for the second part. It wasn't just memorization of some facts, it was more like, "summarize this philosopher's argument and then argue for or against". You really had to understand the philosopher's argument to take either side, so the understanding was tested more thoroughly. Plus, if you made any illogical jumps in your argument than it was immediately obvious. 
That memorization of historical dates and personalities in history class always bored me to tears, until I had an excellent world history professor in college who would launch into in depth chronology and explain WHY things happened. Some people had a drought or a war and had to move, so they went next door and took over another kingdom, causing them to evacuate into their longtime allies' lands, causing more war and strife. Those connections are what is often missing in history classes in the states. 
Unfortunately, faulty logic spoken loudly is winning. There's gotta be a super-logic that, uh, trumps, the BS.   
You'll be happy to hear that history and schools has changed a lot. It no longer simply deals only with dates and events but aims to create more understanding around the human factor. At least where I'm from.   Source: Am a High school history teacher.  
 There's a name of a logical fallacy for that but it escapes me. 
I'm a grown ass man who never did any CS and I have no clue what the hell the latter part of your comment is supposed to mean. 
If something is both true and false the whole statement is false. 
ZMM is a great introduction to philosophy and mental illness. Pirsig (and Pheadrus) was a great man and his contribution, although small, will be sorely missed.  Rest in Peace. 
I always remember the beercan shim. It works just as well. 
Dying at 88, cannot be judged as unfair, but I am somehow very sad to know that the person, who with his books have challenged and inspired both my thoughts and actions, is no longer here to answer the questions he raised. But as an author he is immortal as he surely will continue to inspire new and old readers.  
Well shit. I had a teacher in high school give me their personal copy. It was an amazing read. 
Years ago my wife sent a copy of ZMM to him asking for an autograph as an anniversary present.  Apparently it went to the wrong publisher, and bounced around for 6 months.  He signed it and sent a letter explaining the delay.  I really appreciate him taking the time to sign it and write back.  One of my favorite possessions. He will be missed. 
Oh man  My dad asked me to start reading Zen a few months back. Im currently about 100 pages away from finishing it.  RIP. Robert was a great and intelligent man. 
Zen is one of the few books I've read multiple times throughout my life. At least one time through I remember feeling like the book had little to offer me but the remaining times the book has had a significant impact on the way I view the world around me. It is definitely the book that has had the most significant impact on my life and something I will read to my children when I get to that point of my life.  I'm actually most of the way through a read of Lila right now and was just wondering if Phaedrus was still alive somewhere and what he was contemplating these days. I gave up the first two times through Lila but glad I made it through this time. It is a fantastic book and maybe even better if less engaging that ZAMM. 
I wouldn't be a professional philosopher now if I hadn't read Pirsig when I was an undergrad.  I guess he might find that a little ironic, but I do strive to not be a philosophologist.  He'll be missed. 
Pirsig and my pap were friends when they served in Korea. He said that Pirsig was "an odd duck but a nice guy". My pap told me about going on walks with Pirsig and a few other guys. After they both returned home from Korea, Pirsig got in contact with my pap and asked him to go to Mexico with him. My pap found this somewhat humorous but had no intention of taking off south of the border with Pirsig. He said that Pirsig was kind of off. He told me about Pirsig and the book when I was in middle school and I would occasionally inquire about it throughout high school and early college until my pap's death because I thought it was a very neat and interesting story. 
Interesting book. Challenging me more than I was comfortable with. 
I feel a real sense of loss at this. This book was the most important book in my life for many years. I felt such an affinity for Pirsig and Phaedrus, his journey, his mental struggles. There are so many things in that book I think about frequently. I don't have any words for how sad this is. 
Ah man, Pirsig is such an intelligent, interesting mind.  His metaphysics of Quality provided an important framework for me to make some difficult personal decisions, in addition to influencing me to emphasize processes instead of goal setting, "journey over destination," if you will. Thanks Robert and RIP. 
We could all learn a lesson from this book. Motorcycle maintenance is like anything else unknown in our life. If we could just take a moment to stand back and break free from our preconceived misconceptions and really look at something from an objective point of view we might find there is nothing to fear and that anything is possible. 
Interesting book, I am never sure whether to recommend Zen as soft introduction into philosophy. The narrative style in pretty engaging, even if a bit convoluted at times, and has a strong payoff. One of the first full philosophical texts I actually finished, a decade and change ago.   All things pass into dust, I suppose. 
I read Lila before ZMM. I think I am the better for it, both touched me equally. I carry 2 books on my motorcycle trips with my dad (I have an 74 air head), ZMM and Walden (his recommendation). RIP 
I always see people talking shit about this book. Is it lite philosophy like The Alchemist that appeals to everyone or is it really great? Can someone recommend it to me? As for what I've read: Nausea, Most of Camus, Foucault and Hegel.  
Welp... RIP. I hear he had a rough life.  Buuuuut, I really hated that book. God I did and I do... I never understood what's the deal about it. For some weird reason, that is the only book that made me angry, mostly because of disappointment in it. I mean I've read some dry books and literature but that work of his just rubbed me the wrong way, and I don't know why, I really don't, it's absurd but funny to me.  Anyway, it's been a long time. I gotta give it a try again... Maybe my perspective has changed.   ---  *Ahem*, this a PERSONAL opinion, calm the fuck down everyone... everything's subjective. Forgive me for not liking this book... 
I have this book on my shelf. I found it lying on the street. Some one was throwing out all their books. The title caught my eye. I will read it. Soon. I have to finish the book im reading atm and then i will.  
ZMM taught me a lot about an uncle that died before I could meet him, and the horrors of ECT. Up there with One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest in my mind as a paean against the often dodgy mental health treatments of the day.   Definitely worth a read, if you've never taken the time. 
ZMM was the first book read that h(g)ave me that "I know EXACTLY what you mean" feeling.  Before that moment I was a child.   
I can't ever get myself to finish this book. Once he got into the Chatauquas the writing just got really bland to me. 
My Dad has started this book a few dozen of times, but never finished it. I remember his was the pink copy, he only read it when he flew out on business.   Never got the chance to ask him if he recommended it, but based on all the reviews here, looks like I need to make a trip to the book  store.  
[Serious] Is this recommended to motorcyclists who work on motorcycles, or is this purely a Philosophical writing? I started reading it before but never finished. 
I read this book and it truly inspired me. God speed Mr.Pirsig. 
He was survived by his motorcycle, said to be in immaculate condition.  
I enjoyed it when I first read it. I read it again and thought it was mental masturbation. Get out of your head, man! 
I've given so many copies of Zen away. It's just so good, if someone asks to borrow it, I end up giving it to them and buying another. 
RIP. His book meant a lot to me growing up. The whole quality issue was puzzling, but now I realized what quality is; ability to serve the intended purpose.  
I have only read Zen and the Art of Motorcycle Maintenance, any suggestions for my next book? 
I will admit that I dont know the first thing about philosophy... but I know this book was gifted to me for my birthday a few years ago and it has just sat there on my bookshelf ever since. Is it good? Whats it actually about? 
it was my introduction, I read others, but it was the first philosophical book that was able to grab my attention. 
"Trials never end, of course. Unhappiness and misfortune are bound to occur as long as people live, but there is a feeling now, that was not there before, and is not just on the surface of things, but penetrates all the way through: We've won it. It's going to get better now. You can sort of tell these things." 
Mental illness? I take it to be a great introduction to philosophy and mystical consciousness.  
I read this part of the book not long after using a soda can as a shim for the controls on my handlebars. Definitely made me feel proud for figuring it out too. 
You meant a lot to that teacher, I hope you appreciate that. 
I am a professor, it is one of my favorite books, and I recommend it to students who I perceive are intelligent and pushing the status quo. I agree with the other commentor; your teacher paid you a wonderful compliment.  
I received my copy from my parents, it's funny how artists dying bring us to dusting off their works  
I think it took me three months to finish it. It almost demands that level of introspection, I think. I can't say I enjoyed the book, but I certainly took something from it - a new way of seeing the world, perhaps.  
I told a buddy from work about it maybe a year ago and he read the whole thing in a week and said it was incredible.  I did the same many years ago.  I should read it again and see if i have a new perspective now. 
I felt it was very annoying. The author tried very hard to intentionally not understand certain things, mostly "quality". Not surprised he went nuts. 
My dad had schizophrenia before he eventually took his life. You think this is a good book for me to read? 
I definitely agree. His metaphysics of quality in Lila really helped me figure out an objective morality as an 18 year amoral idiot.  
It's damn near required reading for those looking to work on old bikes too. My dad gave me this book, and a little later, his old Honda. I'm deeply grateful for both.  
It's pretty much a Mary Sue philosophy story about a guy who's just so amazingly awesome at philosophy nobody else can cope with it and he totally destroys their world with his sheer awesomeness. Then he fixes motorcycles because he's totally a badass self-reliant motorcycling philosopher. A fun fantasy for people who are intimidated or irritated by philosophy. 
My dad recommend against it when i showed an interest in philosophy. I had the impression that the message is watered down and undisciplined. Im going to read it with high hopes after reading this thread though.  
It seems like about a quarter of this thread (including myself) had to put the book down about halfway through. I wonder if we all made it to roughly the same spot.  
Please be sure you read it. I owned it for years before cracking it open in my mid 20's. I still wish I'd have read it the moment I acquired that first copy. Now I buy as many used copies as I can find when book shopping and give them away to my friends.   It blew the doors off of my reality, and I hope it will yours as well...in a good way. 
I forced myself to finish it thinking there was something there because of all the praise.  I didn't get anything out of it. At all.  It's not a great or even good book in my opinion, although it seems from this thread that I'll be in the minority in thinking that.   
My mom loaned me her pink copy. It changed my life, started me on a whole new path towards goals I never knew I had before. I know I'm not your dad, just an anonymous stranger on reddit...but I highly recommend you make that trip. You will not regret it. 
Just ordered the book zen and the art of motorcycle maintenance. It sounds awesome. 
mental masturbation is a worthless term only used to feel superior to things. if you have a criticism of the book, share it. your comment helped nobody, and similar comments will never teach anything worthwhile, except for an easy way to deride something. 
philosophy books: small print, big words, don't sell a lot of copies.  
This is an example of a non-comment: so utterly lacking in contribution to the substantive discussion while using naughty words. Think before you type little guy.  
this is why i think his contribution was more than just a small one. zen is a really interesting read and is a lot more accessible than a lot of philosophy texts tend to be. there's more to his contribution than just the volume of it, zen is a fantastic intro to philosophy and it was the first book to really get me into it. 
And yet, he lived just long enough to see the line dip down.  
It is a great introduction to philosophy, but it is also about mental illness.   I can still remember where I was the moment I realized Phaedrus was not only the narrator, but the author too, and that Persig was open enough to write his personal decent into mental illness was unsettling and disarming.  
And, I still get push back from my friends for offering to sully an expensive machine with a cheap repair. 
I very much did/do, a lot of people saw him as crazy: but he was a really intelligent man, just eccentric in how he spoke. By far one my favorite people to have talked with about philosophy and history. 
It really is, sad in a few ways though. Works that have brought different thoughts into our lives that help us or push us forward. Yet we forget about them till the artist has passed on. 
Wish I had one to post.  Moved out of country for 3 years so it along with everything else is in storage.  Sorry. 
I need to finish it eventually. I've been 75% of the way done many times and have yet to complete it. Hopefully this summer  
Books like this are books that will stick with you forever. Sometimes that's almost better than liking it. 
That was the point. The initial quest to figure out quality was his gumption trap, much like the broken screw that throws off the assembly. This second attempt at figuring it out was him making sure to have the balance he learned from motorcycle maintenance in order to figure out quality without becoming so attached to the weight of his inquiry that it would destroy him. 
Lol, someone's got a little bit of a chip on the shoulder eh?  
Last thing I remember is a long rant about "quality" and education and how he was a teacher or something like that.   That's as far as I got. Perhaps I didn't get to the "enlightening" climax of the book... 
Is there any difference's in the book, based on the color of the cover? 
Since masturbation is a harmless and pleasurable activity, I have never fully grasped its use in the negative. Is it "you are merely enjoying the pleasure of this, without producing a lifelong commitment?" 
*Zen and the Art of Motorcycle Maintenance* is not a "philosophy book". It's about philosophy and a mental illness but "philosophy book" is something else. Great book anyway. 
There is a substantive discussion here? I thought we were just paying our respects. Am I allowed to do that? Find something more important to whine about 
_The Plague_ by Camus  _Nausea_ by Sartre   I'm sure a lot of people will also suggest Camus's _The Stranger_, and it is fantastic. But _The Plague_ might be more of a novel, so it might be more appealing. It's also just ... really excellent and a bit under appreciated.   You might like _Sophie's World_ for a kind of novelized approach to the history of Western philosophy.  
There's always that one idiot who brings in current-politics into every single thread, no matter how unrelated it may be.  Despite your narrow worldview blinkered by your political ideology, the world is still on an upward trajectory, same as it was 1 year earlier. On the whole, things are still getting better much more than they are getting worse.       Go back to /r/politics aka /r/LiberalCirclejerk 
it took me three or four tries to get theough that section.  i had a semi serious mental break and a friend brought me this book.  it took me years to finish it, but when i finally understood, i felt this huge relief that at least one other person on this Earth felt how i feel.  i had read Siddharta 10 times by then but this one got me. 
So it's not just me then? The first time my dad gave me it to read I was only about 20 and I think even still too young for it. I read most of the book but I don't think I took much of it in.   I started a second time about a year ago and read a large portion of it again only this time I actually took it in. If I did find myself reading a bit but missing the point I re read it until I got it. This was a lot more enjoyable but still I ran out of stamina and stopped reading again. Perhaps now is the time to try for the third time lucky. 
It gets very slow in parts.  I had to force myself to read on.  Feel free to skip; there's not much meat in the middle.  
But he never figures it out and in the end he's not doing so well. In fact he outright rejects simple and reasonable explanations because he just doesn't like them. He's twisting himself up over the fact that he wants answers to be different then they are and is building intricate epicycle like reasoning just to avoid simple explinations of quality. 
Intentionally not understanding things is something philosophers are good at. 
Sounds about right. I'm glad it seemed to help or enlighten a lot of people, though, I just didn't understand the appeal and a lot of it rubbed me the wrong way.  
I think calling something philosophical is subjective. Maybe the book is predominantly an exploration of mental illness, but that doesn't mean that, relative to someone who suffers from mental illness, they get no philosophical content from the book. 
I thought it had some of the most cringe-worthy dialogue of any book I've ever read. 
I always upvote The Plague. One of my top 5 books, heartbreaking and beautiful. 
A noob question. I have always wondered if a book like Siddharta would be considered a book on philosophy in a similar way to the other books you have mentioned.  
I read camus in college but never heard about the plague. I happened upon it by chance at a thrift store and picked it up. Spent several days at the beach reading it (probably the opposite sort of place to read it in by theme). It's fantastic. 
I think Lila has more important and longer lasting ideas than ZMM.   His insights into the western culture and the perceived divorce between the arts and the sciences are fundamental to my view of the world, and for that I'm eternally thankful.     
Phaedrus twists himself up over it, Pirsig at this point in his life does not. It's almost a historical account of his past from the view point of another person who took his place. And he does sort of figure it out, it's awfully similar to Plato's concept of the good. You can't really answer it like you can a math equation, it's more about the journey and learning how to think. He says it in the beginning chapter, it's often better to travel than to arrive. 
Exactly. I can't even explain it. It did "rub me the wrong way". Now I want to give it another try just to see what it was. 
**SPOILER ALERT**  Did you read the book? I don't want to spoil it but the whole thing is about the narrator being schizophrenic; or better put it tracks his, Phaedrus', mind and ideas that lead to his mental breakdown. He then, years later, goes back to this place with his son and relives the whole thing and reconciles with his past. That's the whole plot of the story. 
It's literature really. I know that it is autobiographical but it's a story at the end of day, not a non-fiction philosophy book; i.e. it does not have a philosophical project, arguments that support a philosophical position and answering philosophical questions. It may make you think, it may make you think about philosophical question too, but that doesn't make it automatically philosophy book. 
Which one? It's been a long time I read it, can't remember any cringe passage on top my head. 
Damn, I really like Camus, and I really liked The Stranger, how did I miss that one? 
Yes, Herman Hesse should definitely be mentioned in this little thread, I think he practically started this kind of wisdom literature. Steppenwolf is a great starting place. 
Did you make it far enough to get to Anny's discussion of "privilleged moments?" I definitely agree, his writing is really powerful and can make you feel as he describes, but powering through it is so rewarding and the end of the novel is a lot easier to get through.  
Lilas writing comes off as more  practical and tangible than zen. I found myself rereading sections of zen due it being so dense while Lila was a bit easier . Both amazing  books though  
But his journey sucked and he didn't learn anything except a bunch of semantic philisophical arguments which he used to avoid dealing with the fact that he just didn't like that the universe wasn't magic.  I guess that's the analogy to the motorcycle. He learned all these tricks to keep his beater running and uses the fact that he's riding a broke ass bike to look down on everyone else instead of just getting a better bike. 
What rubbed me wrong is the guy saying how high his iq was from the start. There was so much self righteous, iamsosmart and iamsoenlightened trash in it. blaming his friends marriage  problems on a leaky facet, bagging on him for wanting his bike properly fixed instead of using a pop can, out teaching the professors that are his colleagues. Then going on a rant about the semantics of quality was too much 
He's definitely not schizophrenic. I'd call it dissociative identity disorder, if anything at all. He wasn't all there at times, but at least according to the book he didn't have a diagnosable illness.  
I didn't and am thinking now that I should give it another go. I've re-read the Stranger and the Fall recently and got a lot from them.   I just remember experiencing something almost like vertigo reading it.    
Man, I'm sorry that's what you took away from the book. Maybe try it again in a few years.  
Not to be too pedantic, but you do realise that the point he was making about the beer can shim was that it IS the right way to fix it.   He was saying an aluminium shim, is an aluminium shim wether you make it yourself, or buy it from BMW.  The only difference is perceived quality.   While I agree there is a strong thread of r/iamverysmart woven thru the whole book, it is meant to be his internal musings, so it's bound to come off that way. Anyone's internal monologue would.  
I think regarding *Zen* as some sort of philosophical book is simply wrong. (Look at my answers above to other users). It's simply literature. Mostly fiction even. It's not intended to make serious philosophical arguments or understand the nature of quality in a rigorous way. The author was just overwhelmed by the nature of quality and how he can't understand it which, in his mind, drove him literally crazy. Then, he wrote the whole thing in a beautiful way. That's all I'm reading from that book; if you start make serious arguments then it's abusing the intent of the book imho. Having said that, I don't have a PhD in philosophy or anything like that, so I'm humble compared to you. 
What you don't seem to understand is that this is literature and not a philosophical dissertation. As such, the protagonist's perspective is not something to take at face value. It's all about how his perspective works in service of the story. To the protagonist, his mental illness and his inability to define a concept are inextricably linked. There is nothing to be implied logically from this information. The book transports you into the mind of a mentally ill person who is working to overcome that for the sake of his child. 
Regarding your edit, me too. I particularly enjoyed the actual motorcycle maintenance (he machined his own parts) and slogged through the philosophy stuff. The motorcycle parts are so cleanly written. 
It was more along the lines of cognitive dissonance. He did not hold multiple personalities at once and he did have a bigh IQ. Most of his struggles was because of his strong personality but eventually he developed into a "human" after years of personal and professional turmoil.  The point in my opinion is that his reference to motorcycle maintenance is directly related to the maintenance of the mind, which he ignores "listening" to anyone but himself for many years. Eventually he does and finds peace.  Spoiler, his real life son from the book was murdered in SF in his 20s. He wrote only two books, i believe and the second one is about the daughter he had after his sons death. 
I have a BA in Philosophy and I was hoping for a philosophical work as well. I enjoyed the but it is not philosophy at all. 
I could easily be wrong, but I don't get the impression you know much about mental illness. You don't have to "justify" it, that's for sure. Many people have lost their sanity over much simpler concepts than Phaedrus did. Religion either attracts or breaks a lot of fragile minds, for example. I don't have the link, but I believe there is a significantly higher incidence of mental illness within a religious community than within the population as a whole. Besides, it did not seem to me that Phaedrus was bipolar, he simply had a breakdown. 
I definitely get what you mean, Camus has a really good mastery of prose and his characters' narrations aren't as unsettling, even if they're equally as bleak as Sartre's.   I would definitely recommend giving Nausea another go. I haven't read the Fall and haven't read the Stranger in years, I'll need to revisit those soon.  
Why? It's a book about a guy carrying around cobbled together junk that tells other people with cobbled together junk that they are special. I don't think I'm going to "like it" in a few years. Books that feed feelings of exceptionalism to the disaffected tend to have the most effect around a certain age, which I've passed.  I mean, I didn't like it so I guess I didn't understand it. 
But zen is the whole approach! Zen is the open eye that acknowledges Quality when it's just standing at the periphery; zen is the careful hand that feels the machine rather than rummaging through it. Zen is required for the art of maintenance.  
The thing about readers perspective though its that it doesn't have to be the authors intent in any way for the reader to take whatever they take from a book. If it made them have a grand epiphany for themselves even if you couldn't find evidence for it in the entire book. Every book hits everyone a different way.  
That's a pretty fair assessment.  If anything, it's a bit sad seeing actual Philosophy PhD students make it their thesis work to try to tear in to Pursigs work as if it's something more rigorous than what it actually is or claims to be. 
I liked most the parts where he describes the repairs and his thoughts about how to do it, his inventiveness and resourcefulness. I also most remember just how willing he was to be vulnerable and ask for help and how if his bike broke down he would just stay in the town  I just found it nice he seemed so calm about the problems that arose when i tend to freak out a bit more. I am not some person without capacity to think about complex or difficult thought or philosophy but I found myself really really bored by the book.  Maybe picking it up again would help me take more time to slow down and think about the book rather than read through it like a narrative. 
I think that's what he was trying to say to a degree. It seemed like a big humble-brag to me. "Look how awesomely smart this guy was... Which is me, but not really". The conclusion saves it a bit, since he poses Phaedrus was maybe not what he thought he was.  Parts off the book were bizarre - like how several times for no reason he's described how his son shat his pants. And this quality thing ended up a bit trivial after all that lead-up. 
Um, no. In fact to a much greater extent than the first book Lila makes clear that his character is a fiction. His daughter is not part of the second book at all. Lila is actually sort of inverse of the first book: ZAMM was a fantastic travelogue with intellectual asides that you often had to plow through. Lila is a terrible travelogue on a sailboat with an uninteresting dumb woman, but the intellectual asides are fantastic and fascinating. And philosophical. It's a superb philosophy / metaphysics examination of the nature of reality. Highly recommended. 
Thank you, I was born in the 90s and was generally unaware of the context of the book. So I went into it blind and was pretty surprised by what I found. 
Yeah its really worth a go.   The Fall is really really good. It doesn't read like a philosophy novel and I can't be sure I really got the full point, except that the main character's ridiculous actions are really no more ridiculous than anything else one does; but it's great. It's absolutely hilarious. He has a lot in common with Don DeLillo or even Tom Wolfe/Bret Easton Ellis/DFW. Comedy in fatalism.  
Question, is it possible for race to be both biological *and* a social construct? 
Not to be overly blunt or cynical, but isn't this, like...pretty widely known? I wouldn't say it's a novel philosophical idea.  
He's not the one who needed to say that at all. This has been known for a long time. Race is a social construct all you have to do is literally look up that phrase in google and read the science  
We can look at monoethnic cultures and they still find ways to discriminate by optical superficial features or miniscular ethnic differences or faith.  Gradient of skincolor or caste systems there are ample examples.  Making a case against nation states ignoring the prosperity and technological progress it brought to humanity is lying by omission in my opinion too.  The guy is an ideologue who has the conclusion before forming a model of reality.  
Read through the comments here. You will see many people arguing that race is really important and a genetic absolute. Citing laughably archaic schools of thought about skull and brain size to justify pseudo racist babble.  
If you read that what it is saying is that terms like "black"  and "white"  are not useful for defining genetic diversity as they have social issues tied to them,  they are not saying that races are not real it's a misleading title.      
it is called "mixed", is not complicated and has been easily understood forever  it took me a split second to see the author's picture to see he was not black but rather mixed himself.  source: i am mixed and it is not racist to acknowledge it. 
In what way did nation-states bring the world prosperity and technological process? Why would the technological and economic progress of the last two centuries not have occured if states had been arranged in a different manner? 
The schools of thought wouldn't be so archaic if the subject wasn't so taboo today. Also, that's a lot of 'proof from authority' coming from someone in a philosophy forum. Are we supposed to be debating the facts here rather than just pointing at someone who's already done the work for us? 
These Schools of thought are archaic because we now have enough evidence to soundly label them as hog wash. 
I think you're misunderstanding the fundamental point I'm trying to make. I'm not saying there isn't a distinction between races, i'm saying the distinction is arbitrary.  You're right about the nature of a continuum, though. The model you seem to be proposing is interesting, though. If we were to create a racial continuum with multiple axes, what would the axes be? Hair texture? Presence or lack of the epicanthic fold? Eye color? 
First of all, can you acknowledge that your claim about "two opposite extremes" was incorrect?  That in fact a continuum can have any number of dimensions?  Second:  It may be arbitrary where you draw a line in edge-cases (if you choose to draw a line in edge cases) but you are trying to use the existence of edge-cases to imply that it's *all* like that, which isn't true.  Edge-cases of mixed-race people aren't representative of the distribution as a whole.  If there's a trimodal distribution in terms of race then you have the three clusters, and then you have some small number of people who sit between the clusters.  But the clusters are real, not "arbitrary."  There is an arbitrariness if you decide to draw a *precise* line around the clusters, but the clustering phenomenon remains objectively real no matter where you draw such a line (which you don't have to do). 
So I woke up this morning, clocked into my work from home job, checked Reddit as I do every morning, and spent the next two hours watching this. Thanks Reddit.  
Is the tide finally turning? I am so sick of the nihilism meme. The fact that this got so many upvotes seem to indicate something. I hope that at least some of them found the time to watch this. 
Amazing difference between the upvotes on the post, and the amount and quality of discussion: everyone wants to say "thumbs-up, yes it sounds super interesting," no one actually has anything to say about it.  How many people have bookmarked this and plan to watch it "some time?" 
Don't have the time to dedicate to this right now (thanks work) but I want to just throw this question out there:  The guy on the far right mentions that we are not calculated like computers. Why is it he thinks this? As far as I'm concerned, every action that has come to pass has been a chain of events stretching to the very beginning of time that has been very calculated in an "if than" sense.  Free will plays into this as well. We're supposedly given options in life, but imo what we're really given is a bazillion years of previous events forming us to into a ball of cells right here and right now that is predetermined to commit to the rest of our lives in a path that is forced on us by the actions of everything from everywhere since the beginning of time.  Love this topic. Really wish I'd gone to college.. If for no other reason to debate others. 
Jordan Peterson is truly life changing and it's incredible privilege to listen to him. He influenced me to continue my studies in philosophy and even expand them to clinical psychology. 
Tangent topic   Is it somehow more meaningful when a professor discusses the meaning as opposed to somehow who isn't as educated?   This particular topic is open to anyone having the experience of living. I don't think any one person can have a more valid conjecture based on their level of education.   I see this sort of thing often and I think it's dangerous. It is the responsibility of each person to make sense of their human condition. This sort of idea that only intellectuals and the educationally indoctrinated being the only valid source of information regarding this topic will castrate our societal evolution.   Think for yourselves as far and as deep as you can.   
I hate this kind of talk to be honest, and it's not because I can't understand it. It's obvious that they have great command of the English language, but overall their ideas are very simplistic. Why not just use plain English? Pretty words may sound intelligent, but it doesn't make their arguments any more valid.  I X'd out after he said the chair speaks to you telling you to sit. 
Wonder how this would be if Terence Mackenna were also present 
Does the audio quality improve at some point? I am having some extreme difficulty understanding what it being said in the first 5 min of the video (where I stopped). 
Sorry this isn't an argument but can anyone point me to where I could find more talks like this? Thanks 
I don't like how the first guy conflates meaning with function. Saying that 'sitting' is the 'meaning of chairs' because you can rest your ass on one is, to me, like saying 'violence' is the meaning of trees because you can saw off a branch and beat someone to death with it.  Great talk all the same, but I was sort of turned off early on because of that. My understanding of 'meaning' is very specific. 
Protip: if you think there's a meaning to life, you're an arrogant human 
Any way to get this in audio format so I can listen on my commute? Those youtube-to-audio coverters don't allow such long videos. 
Is there a better quality audio version of this? The audio gives me a bit of a headache to listen to at the current quality. 
Surely this is like asking what is the meaning of rock? Seriously, surely to invoke meaning is to give something a purpose or to have been created. 
Asking other people what is the meaning of life is one the most pointless questions. Considering they have their own life and assign their own meaning to it. Ask yourself that question. Your answer is the only one that matters. 
Hmmm....two hours? Can someone do a ELI5 synopsis for each side. Maybe a paragraph each? 
What is it with this obsession about what's "real" and what's not?  
I'd first like to point out that just because something isn't "physical," doesn't mean it isn't "real," per se. Let's say I have a eureka moment and have a great idea. Then let's say I go on to utilize that idea and patent a world-changing invention. The idea wasn't physical, but it was very real, because it caused immense changes in the "real" world.  In the same way, relationships aren't physical, but there are physical consequences of having a relationship. Whether it's something small, like slowing down when you see someone you know, and thereby altering the traffic pattern, or something big, like committing suicide due to unrequited love, relationships can change the world.   I propose that if something is causal, it can safely be considered real. 
From an empirical perspective, does it matter whether we are able to measure or observe the physical change which occurs as a result of the relationship (i.e. the physical / neural manifestation of the impact the relationship has on consciousness)?    As it currently stands, we don't  have the ability to observe neural changes at this level of detail, so it seems to me that this leaves us to rely on the assumption that such a change has occurred.  For example, it's impossible for an independent observer to observe the physical change which has occurred as a result of my perceiving a relationship between the objects.  Sorry if this is a silly question! 
For one, the video is a two hour long static master shot.   Like it or not, there is an abundance of content available today, and audiences must compartmentalize what media they consume. Unfortunately, a two-hour long video of a seminar (that is shot rather dull) is not going to reach a broad audience. 
(Oh wait, this isn't r/titlegore?)  I found it all in all a bit limited. I would criticize it for the same reasons Guns, Germs and Steel is criticized; He (Peterson) is heavily cherry picking anecdotes right down to factual inaccuracy (concerning Nietzsche e.g.) to illustrate his ideas and make his points. It's kind of fine if you are "just talking" but it's still low quality if you are looking for, you know, wisdom. I can see how students (who are after all not experts) are fascinated by it though, it's at least inspiring and not boring.  Now, I've never heard of Vervaeke and frankly I feel I still don't have a clear picture of what he thinks. This is probably for several reasons: A) Peterson talks him against the wall, quantitatively speaking B) His voice has much worse audio and C) He seems the more scientific of the 2 so he's worse at Jabbering. 
We are kindred spirits. I could have written this comment, almost word for word, and it would all be true.   Good luck on your journey of self cultivation! :) 
I feel like I've been saying this a lot recently...  Check out the rest of his lectures. They were fundamentally life changing for me.  
Your words just changed my life. Thank you for writing this, it was a fascinating read. 
/r/thatHappened   actually, i'm not saying it didn't... but it sounds like the end of every thathappened story 
My degree is in music not philosophy, but I became so frustrated with this in music academia as well. If you wish to convey your ideas to other people, what is the purpose of not expressing them in the clearest way possible? This talk actually has nothing on some music symposiums I've attended. 
Love this topic too. I think what you're talking about is called Determinism. This theme is present in a lot of Thomas Hardy novels (basically uncontrolled fate fucking over his characters) which I've been reading recently. Check emmmmm out.  
Intellectually I have accepted that free will is an illusion, but I can't wrap my head around what this actually means in practice to us as conscious beings. The implication that we are merely passive observers to our choices and actions appear paradoxical. 
Peterson or Vervaeke? Let them know next class that this conversation has been going viral. I went to UofT but unfortunately never took a class by either professor. Working my way through Petersons youtube channel lectures currently. 
Translating between languages can lose nuance and meaning. So can translating the words you actually think into the most common words and speech patterns. Because we're familiar with transforming our thoughts into language, a sentence formulated in a specific way in a specific context can convey ideas that a different sentence that means the same exact thing on the surface does not. I doubt they're using certain words just to look smart. They're trying to be understood by each other with as much accuracy and precision as possible. 
Have you tried randomly jumping in the video and finding out for yourself? 
Yes, the first few minutes are shit audio but it improves a lot around 7-8 minutes in 
Watch the video and get back to us.  The whole discussion is exactly about how the question is incorrect. 
I don't know. I don't think it is a practice of pseudo-intellectualism. I would say that you are right when saying that the question is very subjective. How could it not be? But are all subjective answers and subjective questions "pseudo-intellectualism"?    
Not for the way they define meaning, a definition that they reach by speculating what one truly wants out of that answer. 
Bingo, they are gleefully engaging in blatant question begging without  seeming to understand they are doing it.    
Ok so if I choose to not have kids, my life is then meaningless? 
Why the idea that a topic like the meaning of life needs to be addressed by abstruse scientific points about quantum physics though? Was there nothing to be genuinely said about the meaning of life before we had a theory of quantum physics? Of course not. Ancient myth very often dealt with the question of "the meaning" of life so I don't see how you can say looking at historical thought on the topic is at all inappropriate. Doesn't mean we literally buy the theology's of those old religions per se.   I would say on a topic like this whether you allude to quantum physics or ancient myth to illustrate your point doesn't really make a difference. It's more about what point you're trying to make and if it's a good one. After all, it'd be easy to denounce any reference to quantum physics in philosophy as more pop science bullshit, same way that you denounce reference to Greek myth in this discussion. 
It's not that there's no tangible harm in using someone's preferred pronoun, it's that we shouldn't *have* to use them. Which is what the legislation he's opposing is trying to do. 
I agree, but I would go one step further. Relationships aren't "real" in the sense of "part of reality" is absolute nonsense.   Relationships are what *define* reality. The Standard Model that underlies all of fundamental physics is actually the "Standard Model of particle *interactions*". A thing is a sum of its interactions with other things, i.e. its relationships.   So I find it utterly bizarre to hear someone say that relationships don't really exist. Psychologically, physically, and philosophically, I don't understand the standpoint. 
One night I woke with an image of old friend in distress, I could see him clinching his teeth and grabbing his chest. Half asleep I felt prompted to pray for him. The next day in the afternoon, I asked my friend who works with him if John was okay and i told him about what I saw the night before. Kev said John didn't show up to work that he had to go to the hospital because of heart palpitations.  How in the world could science even begin to explain how that whole thing happened?  
No surprise at all that people aren't watching it, what I find funny is the relatively high number of votes and that it's on the front page, despite that fact that hardly anyone is watching it. 
That parable is awesome. Thanks so much for responding, just the thought is really kind. Great perspective :)  I'm gonna do my best to clean up my conduct on reddit, feels good to engage in quality conversation and not wasted words.   Thanks much :) 
Honestly it wouldn't be too much of a stretch, there's been one or two professors I've had where everyone is close to the kind of excitement and impressed they would need to be to applaud a professor, however every class? Eh.. hyperbolic, I could believe it happened a couple of times though, especially at the end of topics or units. 
They use difficult language because they want to express their ideas in the clearest way possible.  
You're right, it's important to be mindful of your audience. But that's also true if your intended audience is other academics. If a domain specific word is able to convey something that takes ten words in normal language, then it's disrespectful to use that for an audience who understands and routinely use those domain specific words. 
Do you think they are talking about some arcane or esoteric philosophical knowledge that only the initiated can grasp?   
Interdasting..  Determinism is exactly what I'm talking about. Thanks for the info and the suggestion! I'll definitely be looking into his novels here very soon. 
No, you're misunderstanding my post. They allege we have no control over it, but I argue we do.  I'm not arguing it is necessarily a conscious act. Look at my organic chemistry example - I did not consciously will myself to like it, nor did I even observe myself start to like it. I just noticed at the end of the semester that I liked it.  We don't necessarily have any immediate control over RR, but we can adjust certain variables in our lives to increase the odds of creating RR.   
So what? In other words the meaning of life is what you want out of it? 
With all the writing done in this sub it's strange you're downvoted without a response. 
Yes , sad but true, unless you reproduce you will not know this revelation and it would be fruitless to try and change your mind. You can choose not to accept this but look into a mirror and there is your answer, you are here and those that leave no impression in the mirror are not. What deeper  source of meaning do you require 
Well, you have to observe that you mentioned different kinds of relationships. Human relationships are very different from the electromagnetical relationship between two atoms. 
"Dogmatic materialism, perhaps?"  Possibly, but even someone who would materially reduce mental phenomena to the point that they no longer exists, like Daniel Dennett, would vehemently argue that abstract things like ideas and currency exist. 
It's painfully obvious that most commenters are just trying to dissect the video without making it passed the title or first two minutes. 
You are quite welcome, and I'm super glad someone enjoyed it, because I love writing parables. Thinking of making a novelty account for it.  The main thought that's helped me out is to just be continually improving, little by little, whether it's better organizing my stuff one day or learning about something useful another day, or making myself work on what I know should be chipped away at the next. It doesn't make any difference where I'm at in the grand scope of things, compared to others, or compared to where I think I ought to be--only that I keep on improving, slowly and surely. There's something very calming about this line of thought. It removes pressures, for me. Hopefully it will for you. 
No, I think they're talking about things you just don't understand and as a way of rationalizing that you just say it's stupid.  
I thought Quantumtroll and the poster he's responding to were saying something different: i.e., whatever level of description one is using to describe X, you're still describing something real (all things considered). So human relationships wouldn't be very different from atomic relationships *mutatis mutandis*.  Besides, if you can find a way to describe human relationships vis-a-vis biology (or whatever, pick your privileged level of reduction), you can then pretty much find a way to describe them via however "low" you want to go. 
Of course there's a difference, but both types of relationship are invisible and crucial. No man is an island, tell me about your relationship with your mother/father, etc.   Just like a particle can't come into being on its own (there's always an interaction with another particle), a human being is a result of relationships (with her mother at the very least). Just like a particle's very existence is measured by its effect on other particles, so is a human life realised by her interactions with other people.   I don't see how one type of relationship is more or less "real" than the other.  
It seems like you're just assuming Dennett should be guilty of this.  I don't think Dennett has any problem saying that consciousness is an emergent property, and that emergent properties are real.  Denying specific claims about consciousness (like inherent subjectivity of Qualia) is *not* the same as saying consciousness doesn't exist because it's not fundamental enough.  I think Chalmers and other panpsychists run more afoul of this.  The belief that emergent phenomena aren't "real enough" directly drives the logic that consciousness/qualia must be fundamental in order for it to be "real."  So I guess Dogmatic Materialism isn't a good term, because it implies that it's tied to materialism.  But dualists can run equally afoul of it. 
Having watched the entire video, and having thoroughly enjoyed it, I would have to concur with criticism of the title as somewhat bombastic. 
All you've done is argue why it would be difficult to see below a certain threshold. That isn't relevant to if something is there or not. 
"It seems like you're just assuming Dennett should be guilty of this."  I was addressing of how Dennett is perceived I think, in that there are many people who would consider him a dogmatic materialist. And that being the case, he still acknowledges emergent phenomena as you suggest, which indicates that perhaps being a dogmatic materialist is not sufficient to form the attitudes about what is "real" being discussed here. Hopefully my thinking makes sense, and we might even be saying the same thing? I dunno, Godspeed owl man. 
Nah, you just had the couple ass kissing fanboys that would clap 
Yup! You have to pay for it if you want advancement. Most scientists honestly don't make a single important discovery throughout their lives, but without the funding we have shoved into the sciences we would all still be dieing of measles. 
Back in law school the whole lecture hall would clap damn near every time?? 
You're talking about real science. What 'advances' have we made in philosophy in the last 20 years?   And by advances i mean things that have any actual effect on people's day to day lives (like a measles vaccine), not the creation of yet another masturbatory, useless philosophical theory. 
Seriously? I have never experienced this. Was it kind of a Tradition to clap after a lecture? Or were your lectures all just good enough for a spontaneous clap? 
Let me turn that around on you. How many advances have we made in physics in the last 20 years that affect everyone's day to day lives?  As I said before, philosophy is quite different from hard sciences in that it does not have that direct correlation to what happens in the world. Philosophy is used in every Supreme Court decision ever made as well as used in creating and reforming of governments across the world. I realy do agree with you that philosophy has become too much of a circle jerk, but I don't feel it's useless like you do. 
For what it's worth, I have a degree in physics and crushed quantum mechanics, and I have no idea what point he's trying to make. I'm not saying he necessarily doesn't have one, but I can't parse it out from what reads like a word salad.  
Hey i should answer your question because you didn't answer mine!   Good luck in school this year... 
You can be an idiot. (Or biased, or a hypocrite)  You can be wrong.  You can make a bad argument because you are an idiot.  But if I suggest your argument is wrong because you are an idiot then that's Ad Hominem. 
I'm glad the video goes a bit into the *tu quoque* version of this fallacy. I've been seeing such appeals to hypocrisy becoming more and more common on Reddit.   A person not acting in 100% accordance with the conclusion of their argument does not mean that their argument is invalid. 
It's best not to insult others when you can help it, but I find it annoying how many people think any insult is an ad hominem. If I refute your argument and then scold you for your ignorance that isn't an ad hominem just because I personally insulted you. The insult wasn't the basis of my argument. 
Sometimes "ad hominem", while not good logic, functions as an excellent heuristics.  While it may be the case that I can't logically say your argument is bad because you are not an expert on what you are talking about, it's still reasonable to not take your arguments on that subject seriously.  
There's only so long you can call your opponents racists, sexists and bigots without addressing their ideas until someone like Trump comes along.   We liberals need to take a long, hard look in the mirror.   
what if the person IS a complete idiot... should we have to logically argue every fucking thing that comes out of this idiot's face?  no.  if he is indeed a complete idiot, then we can use this as a valid reason to NEVER LISTEN TO ANOTHER WORD.  several examples come to mind, but Rudy Giuliani fits the bill nicely. 
What's the difference between an Ad Hominem argument, and a scarecrow argument? 
How does this work with an appeal to authority?  9 out of 10 doctors agree that ...  , then an ad hominem of doctors used to reccomend certain brands of cigarettes. 
I have seen a number of these videos now with them pretending to write out words... Why do they do this? And how do they do this? Why not just present the animations 
So in my experience when it comes to political discussions, I get accused of ad hominem attacks often but I never actually say them. I say "you are misinformed because you listen to bad news sources." The person dismisses me because they think i'm calling them inherently stupid which is not the case. I find this coming often from the republican/conservative side. "You are racist for saying a lot of mexicans are rapists" Then people dismiss it as an ad hominem attack but don't look at how saying something like that conveys a certain message without any type of empirical evidence. The entire trump candidacy worked on this principle - writing off every criticism as an Ad Hominem when they actually weren't. 
When a leader makes all the decisions, and you have no say in these decisions, is it then not a given to criticise the leader? Criticising their  policies achieves nothing, and is divisive, while critisizing the person is polarising, and achieves a greater change.   This is why political campaigns rely so heavily on ad hominem attacks, because fallacy or not, it achieves results.  Ad Hominem is only a fallacy if it is ineffective in winning an argument. 
In addition to some of the caveats already mentioned: There is another fallacy called appeal to authority. Which states that simply arguing that X is true because some authority figure says so is not sound. However a linked caveat here is that yes, sometimes a person's authority on a subject can be logically used to substantiate what essentially amounts to neccesary faith in that authority's expertise.  So now when debating a subject with a person who asserts his own supposed authority on a subject as a supplementation to his argument in otherwise logical fashion (that is to say he is not using his expertise to make logical connections, he is using it to establish premises or esoteric facts that you would otherwise have no ability to verify) then you can assert, if you have evidence for it "you are an idiot and so I reject your supposed authority on this subject."  That's perfectly logical. People will call it an ad hominem when you say it in this context but they're wrong.  
And to sum it all up its hard to win a argument with a smart person. Impossible to win an argument with a incompetent one 
Didn't have time to read all comments, but could someone answer me this: are feminist arguments that disregard or invalidate other person's opinion based on their gender, race, ethnicity etc. subject to ad hominem? For example the accusations of "splaining?"    
What about efficiency? For example if someone is making a claim that is difficult to immediately verify, and I know that he/she is quite unintelligent and/or uninformed (or he/she has made an overwhelming number of incorrect claims in the past), so I just assume that the new claim is likely false. Basically "all of your previous claims have been false and I know you are not qualified to speak on this topic, so I am going to assume that your new claim is false (unless/until I become aware of evidence to the contrary)." Is this not a good practice to engage in?  
Corollary: it's not an *ad hominem* to point out that someone is wrong **and** an idiot. 
What if I conclude that you're an idiot because your argument is wrong?  (Serious question) 
The whole video was about that, wasn't it? Isn't that common sense?  I know we do it all the time, but we usually know we're being petty in doing so. It's basically to offend the other person when you're tired of arguing or realized you're wrong. But we still know it's bullshit to dismiss their argument for that reason. 
That's big when arguing with climate deniers. I brought it up with a co worker/ Trump supporter yesterday. The first complaint he made was that it had been politicized. I agreed and tried to discuss the science with him. All he would do is repeat Obama says this and Al Gore predicted that and Leonardo DiCaprio is a hypocrite. I just kept saying, "Yeah I'll give you that they're all hypocrites, but that doesn't mean anything about the science!"   No use.  
*Tu quoque* is probably one of the most common *ad hominem* attacks I see. Especially these last few days. Being gay, and a Trump voter, I am accused of hypocrisy and generalized with statements like "if you are a minority, woman, LGBT individual, Muslim, or sexual assault victim, it is ok, Trump won't hurt you if we stand together." Like, thanks for speaking on my behalf and deciding who I should vote for. I digress. The past few days have been nothing but me trying to argue why I voted for Trump, asking the other persom to provide a proper counterargument, and being called a hypocrite for being gay. At this point, I'm just gonna write *tu quoque* on slips of paper and start handing them out. 
Right, there's a difference between 'you're a prick so you're wrong' and 'you're wrong because of x reason, and you're also a prick' 
Scold someone for the ignorance? Why would you do that exactly? What are you trying to accomplish exactly? Shame them? 
True, but *does* the presidency require certain characteristics? Or does it just require a certain *image* of character? Do we really know which of our past presidents were genuinely "good people", and which were just excellent sociopaths who knew the right things to say? I'd argue that actual character isn't relevant to the role, but *perceived character* is somewhat relevant, and actions are much more relevant. Trump has neither good character nor the image of it, but he may start working on the latter, as seen in his refreshingly tame speech last night. 
It's interesting how when a politician says something we think sounds nice, that it's easy to call them out as bullshitting so they can simply appeal to people. Why is it so unbelievable that Trump is doing the same? As has now been proven, that is what works to get elected and Trump knew that.  That doesn't mean he isn't full of shit, but I see few people questioning it; most seem to assume that he's being honest and is just an evil person.  Think for a second, if you wanted to make a big difference, getting rid of discrimination, poverty, all those bad things, and you had to run for president to do it, what would your campaign be? If you were serious about achieving those things, I reckon it'd be a pretty good idea to do exactly as Trump has, because unfortunately there are so many assholes, and while it's sad, Trump understood that he needed to appeal to them in order to be elected.  I think it's too early to count our chickens; he hasn't actually done anything yet. 
Trump won this because of all of the name calling, and because the left refused to admit their own poop stinks. I've got a big mix of supporters on my social feeds and usually the conversation went like this:  "But the DNC cheated Bernie..." LALALA CANT HEAR YOU  "I have some issues with Hillary's thoughts on..." LALALA WOMAN HATER  "I don't think Trump actually wants to..." RACIST  I think this is less Ad Hominem and more identity politics, really. You're bucketizing people constantly, and then using those buckets to promote your agenda and ignore other people's opinion.  
What ideas did Hillary not address? What policy preferences did that group have that she didn't engage with?  Hillary was ready, willing, and able to have a substantive debate. She has lots of detailed policy. She tried talking about it from time to time. Nobody cared. The media didn't spend much time on substance.   Trump ran, and won, on racism and sexism. He was so light on policy there wasn't any meaningful debate to have. Yeah, Democrats spent a lot of time pointing out the terrible things he said and did, because what else was there to do? The times he got into policy, it was largely racist anyway("build the wall", "bar Muslim immigrants" etc.) 
Do you think the majority of people voted for trump on issues? Just because he got elected it doesn't mean his policies are suddenly better.  
This is true. When Bush, McCain, Romney, and Trump are all racist, homophobic, and sexist, the words begin to lose meaning.  When neutral ideals like capitalism (which has nothing directly to do with race) is somehow inherently racist, I start to feel like people are simply trying to place some ideas "out of bounds" instead of refuting them. 
Except the problem is that when you are talking about ideologies, you can't just say "no that's wrong and you are an idiot for thinking that", because it's all completely subjective, and if you verbally mine away at someone positions without trying to explain why they are (supposedly) wrong, what position *can* they take other than putting their foot down and saying that they are not wrong and not an idiot? By using Ad Hom without refuting the argument, you're far more likely to turn believers into zelots because many feel that they have to double down on their beliefs when those beliefs as well as the content of their very character are under attack.  Even if you don't agree with me, do you honestly think that if I had just responded to you with "fuck you, you are a fucking moron", that would've been better? 
Strawman?  A strawman is when you construct an example that your argument defeats, usually by misrepresenting their argument in some way.  An example would be if someone tells you that we should increase education spending, and your response is to say so that means you want Russia to invade western Europe because we'd have to cut defense spending. 
Any accusation of racism is by definition an ad hominem attack, if the purpose is to argue against what is being claimed.  A statement is not false purely by virtue of it casting a demographic group in an unfavorable light.    That being said, it is not an ad hominem attack to argue that we shouldn't vote for a candidate who consistently makes unfounded and insulting remarks about large groups of people. 
The ad hominem fallacy is committed when a claim wrongly attacks an opponent, rather than that opponent's argument.  Here, "wrongly" doesn't mean "ineffectively".  A claim wrongly attacks an opponent when the claim doesn't bear on whether the opponent's argument is good or bad.  An ad hominem argument can be effective (persuasive) without bearing on whether the opponent is in fact right or wrong. 
There a common misunderstanding of what the appeal to authority fallacy is. An authority on a topic by its very nature is something we can appeal to to inform us of something that is true. It becomes fallacious when it's not a *valid* authority on the topic discussed.  When debating or discussing a topic, it's perfectly rational to point to the work of authorities in the relevant field. But it becomes a fallacy when you point to a dentist's opinion on genetic research, for example. 
And just because I could take the time to deconstruct a statement like "We could land a man on the sun if we go there at night" doesn't mean I owe anyone the effort of explaining how stunningly wrong and impossible such an idea is. Related to that is when someone is *so wrong*, their entire worldview is wrong, you could even say the wrongness is fractal in nature, there isn't much point in logical arguments. 
We embrace fallacies for usefulness all the time. Logic is not about usefulness. 
As I said elsewhere, sometimes "Ad Hominem" while strictly speaking is fallacious, can still be an excellent heuristic.  None of us have time to become experts on everything.  The fact that an argument that Aliens have visited earth is coming from a someone that's generally considered to be a crank is a pretty good reason to reject the argument ex ante, whereas the same argument coming from Neil De Grasse Tyson, while not a reason to necessarily accept it at face value, might be good enough reason to at least take it seriously before rejecting it out of hand.  
I mean we all do this whether or not its good practice or not, but we would still be committing a fallacy if we said they are wrong because they have always been wrong especially if we refuse to even listen to them.  Though people have no responsibility to listen to what everyone has to say so there is nothing wrong with not listening to something you don't find interesting, other than you can quickly cloister yourself off from new information that might change your mind.     
Well several people have disagreed with what I said, and concluded that the video agreed with them.  I don't know that what the video is arguing matters to me, even though I did watch it twice. 
It does create a trust issue.  If someone tells one some fact that one does not have the skills and resources to verify oneself (or at least do so in a reasonable amount of time), and then they act in a way that seems contrary to the fact, one could question if they should believe the fact.  Now, this is an idealized simplistic case, with a single entity telling of a single fact who then shows a clear contradiction in behavior, where an issue such as climate change is a massive network of entities at different levels of trustworthiness (both objectively and subjectively) giving different amounts of information and acting in many different ways.  The end result I have personally seen is that many seek out the patterns from the overwhelming amount of data (all the data from that web of interactions, not just scientific data) that aligns with their own views.  I'm not sure how to work around that issue. 
Why not stop at 'you're wrong because of x reason' and not be a prick? Pricks call other people pricks. 
No one is fucking saying idiot I don't know why everyone's avoiding the *actual* ad hominem tossed around by democrats like rice at a wedding.  Maybe a little dissonance at work? This is the ad hominem we're all supposed to be talking about:  "Well he's a racist." "He's sexist" "he's a bigot".  
The US president does have executive power though, including being commander-in-chief, thus being in control of the biggest army in the world.  He'll be taking real decisions, in which case his image will be a lot less relevant. 
Certain characteristics? Sure, respectful is one. Compassion, reasonability. I mean, should we continue?  To put it on another light, you wouldn't want a clumsy surgeon would you? 
Plato kind of discussed this in "Republic", and he refuted it by saying that the unjust person might get away with it, but the unjust state will suffer for it, if they're all just pretending, which is what we're approaching.  
I agree that it's about the appearance. But being able to create that appearance is a characteristic itself. Some people are incapable due to who they are as a person of giving the appearance of the characteristics we require of a president.   Additionally, there are characteristics that aren't often displayed and are important to functioning well as a president. These would be things like the ability to carefully consider things, maintain a cool temper, and make tough decisions.  
His speech was tame because he was fighting with his opposite during his whole campaign. I don't think he will be quite as ridiculous without having to slam his opposite all the time. Besides, he's a cut throat business man. He got what he wanted now it's time to move on.  
I think it's just as insulting to portray the left as all ignorant idiots who silence their opposition. 
Maybe people should have talked about policies more than they talked about racism. Trump says something offensive and his opponent forgets all about policy. 
Okay thankyou, idk why I said scarecrow... I just know I used to get them confused. 
Oh, sorry. I've watched this video before and I forgot about that part. I just watched it after making that comment. 
Well, there is a point when you have them between people who are sparing in their wrongness.  But I actually agree with you, and your point makes the ad hominem even less offensive.  It actually *is* relevant if someone is *usually* wrong, so saying such is meaningful if the discussion is on something with any nuance at all.  Moreover, I think people are far too apt to call "ad hominem" as a *defense of their own argument* rather than trotting out facts.  As in "you used an ad hominem, therefore I don't have to defend my argument." 
That's a fascinating perspective, and worth examining philosophically.  To be logically useful, this method would require identifying the most fundamentally wrong foundation stone of their worldview, tied to every other wrong thing they think.  Without this, I would think it incredibly hard to convince people who have the same wrong fundamental thought. 
But then you aren't criticizing the individual but instead the worldview. 
If we want to be technical, I should have said a fallacy doesn't mean the *conclusion* of an argument is incorrect.  The argument would in fact be invalid, but that doesn't mean its conclusion is false.      2 + 2 = 5      Therefore, the sky is blue  That is not a valid argument, but its conclusion is true. 
But this isn't really a logical fallacy, it's more like a rule of thumb. People are often too quick to just rattle off a list of them with no explanation, usually because they take the word "fallacy" to mean that it's never a valid way to argue. The subtleness of informal fallacies means that people often see them when they aren't really there.  *ad hominem* is probably the biggest offender when it comes to incorrect accusations, whereas the fallacy of composition is hardly ever used incorrectly in comparison. In my experience anyway. 
That's not true. If a person exists who is 100% wrong about everything (and you know this with 100% certainty), and you use that as your reason why we shouldn't listen to that person, then it's valid. It's more about relevance, here. If my attack on you pertains directly to the argument at hand, then it's not fallacious reasoning. 
Considering the responsibilities of the office that he has been elected to; those qualities are indeed relevant because he will ultimately be representing the same people he has shown contempt for time and time again. Ergo, calling him a racist, sexist bigot isn't an ad hominem when used in broader discussion about the election. However, if the discussion is about some specific aspect of his platform that has nothing to do with social policy, then it would become ad hominem.  The election is over. Is there really any point in being belligerent and hostile to anyone who doesn't agree with you? 
God damn, you people don't know what *ad hominem* means in terms of a *non sequitur*. Go study it for a couple days and then come back. An *ad hominem* isn't necessarily fallacious. But a fallacious *ad hominem* occurs when the attack is unrelated to the main argument. So, yes, insulting someone in a way unrelated to their argument in reddit comments is an irrelevant *ad hominem*. 
So his record of "stupid decisions" might be worth examining before he's handed the launch codes?  
He's been an entertainer throughout his campaign. People were impressed by the braggadocio and the outrageousness, and he played up to that image. Clearly this was a campaign strategy.  That kind of reality TV act might win votes, but he's a statesman now. It's not quite that "he's got what he wanted" - he *can't* carry on with that behaviour now. 
Given that I believe there is an implied "instead" when considering evidence of character as opposed to evidence of fact, I don't think it can be an ad hominem if the fact of the matter to be proven is their character itself. There is no fallacy there: the logic follows all the way through. 
I typically only use an ad hominem attack when I no longer wish to deconstuct the opponents argument. I use the falacy as a heuristic approch to spend my time arguing wisly. If a person is wrong frequently, or is an idiot, I presume I could defeat their argument If I wanted, but my time is better spent defeating arguments elsewhere.  For example. A friend tells me that a News Commentator claimed that something is true, and because of that this thing will happen. I have experience with the commentator being an idiot, and disregard the news.   The more certainty that the commentator is an idiot, the better the result. Although it does not touch the argument, only puts it to the side. If another commentator who I do not find to be an idiot says the same thing, the argument is the same, and then I will evaluate it. Of course if this happens often, my opinion of the first commentator goes up, and the rate at which I evaulate his arguments goes up.    
Because most people respond with ad hominems, and no actual criticism to respond to... so what else can you do? 
But if I was someone who didn't believe that the sky was blue, it wouldn't do much good to tell me that 2 + 2 = 5. You'd have to come up with something better to convince me that the sky is blue. Until that time, I'm just going to continue doubting it. 
Accusing people of committing fallacies they haven't committed is not a fallacy in itself? What is it exactly? 
A man who has bankrupted 4 corporations being elected President of the United States. 
This whole thread seems to be missing the point on Donald Trump.  It's not that people are using ad hominem attacks against him, or even that he legitimately lacks some required characteristic.  It's that he believes in making climate change worse, has shown a reckless attitude toward the use of nuclear weapons, has threatened to undermine confidence in the US' credit worthiness, has suggested a religious test for entry in to the United States, has suggested women who get abortions should be punished, wants to kill innocent family members of suspected terrorists, and... well it just goes on.  This isn't an attack on his character - fallacious or otherwise - it's a litany of extremely terrible and destructive policy positions which he proudly holds. 
Which also begs the question of - will his supporters become disenfranchised if he drops some of the braggadocio act? Will they retaliate against him with the same fervour as their initial rallying if he starts to appear like "one of them" - "them" being the institution he fought so hard against in the first place...? It's certainly precarious.  
You're mistaken.    1. Saying there is an implied "instead" is nonsense.  It's ineffective communication.  There's no context for me to have any clue what you're talking about.  2. All character evidence submitted to prove the matter asserted is ad hominem.  Not all ad hominem arguments are fallacious.  3. I agree that there is no fallacy when using ad hominem arguments to prove good or bad character, to suggest someone may be lying, or to give credibility to a claim, such as asserting one's expertise.  It's when you use character evidence to prove something unrelated, such as to prove someone committed a crime, that the ad hominem argument is fallacious, which is why it is inadmissible in court.  Remember, some character evidence is admissible, when the ad hominem argument is not fallacious. 
The comment you replied to is discussing only formal logic, so a very obviously false premise and very obviously true conclusion were chosen. 
I don't think you understand what bankruptcy is exactly. Look up Chapter 11. 
So...You just explained what you perceive as his faults. Why would you need to use an ad hominem? 
We are literally in a topic about the use of "the ad hominem fallacy". You are literally being disingenuous and subscribing to some literal use of the latin phrase to be right on a technicality. 
That is just a nicer way of communicating the same attack on the person. 
You mean Chapter 11 of Title 11 of the United States Bankruptcy Code under which debtors file for bankruptcy? 
Interesting. I still would have liked more solid arguments, but I guess it's an opinion piece. 
Better arguments may be found in Haidt, et. al., I think. 
It's pretty cool how the top upvoted posts in this subreddit are about the importance and usefulness and greatness and importance etc of philosophy... but actual philosophy gets moderate to no interest.   Easier to pretend. 
While I appreciate his larger point, many philosophies and concepts are arcane to most people e.g. I don't think everyone needs to learn the difference between ontological, teleological and cosmological arguments.  That said, I ABSOLUTELY believe everyone should be taught: Correlation does not equal causation The most common Logical fallacies e.g. Ad hominem arguments  By simply understanding these topics, I think people will be less likely to say something stupid because they'll understand why it's stupid. 
I have actually been preaching this for years now. It's not a problem solely with public education.  I fear that the curriculum steers clear of philosophy because of the challenges it poses to religion, nationalism, etc.  Maybe that's a conspiracy theory, but it wouldn't surprise me.  There is far more philosophy offers than simply teaching kids "critical thinking and honest reflection."  It allows you to view the world through different lenses, building empathy and softening the certainty, one of the main ingredients of dogma.  There are features of philosophy that no other subjects in schools touch that I think could be a catalyst for deep systemic changes to the way we think and behave. 
Math, and almost any of the sciences, can teach critical thinking and problem solving. I'm not familiar with the education of Ireland, but in my NY school [not representative of all NY schools, just mine], we were taught proofs and the why's. We were never expected to memorize. We had to be independent and problem solve. We had see and understand the logic and reasoning behind everything.   The only problem with this approach is: the pace was slower than everyone else. But when standardized tests came around the corner, most of my school flunked because we didn't cover much of the topics expected on the exams. But 4 years later, people from other schools, that were taught memorization, forgot all the math formulas. While my skills were rusty in memory, I was able to derive them because the logic stuck with me.  
**I tried to apply for just Philosophy at a University today. Its impossible, everything clearly stated that they only have 'Doctorate's of Philosophy within "these given fields"' (Science, math etc)** - All of them were about developing a thesis and providing supporting evidence within that field of study. *Yet a course in "critical thinking and logic"* - no longer exists. Debate is frowned upon and new ways of thinking are rebellious. If this is what Education has come to, no wonder the average person just believes what they are told on television. Is philosophy so dangerous that its become labelled "political Science" or has it become hammered into submission by idealism? 
This issue is not resolved with "philosophy" in general. The question is what kind of philosophy we should teach. We first need to reject the paradigm of nominalism and Cartesianism before philosophy will be of any help.  
I'm surprised to learn Ireland has a post-truth society too. Was under the impression it was an American cultural thing. 
To be fair,a lot of philosophical thought is pretty esoteric these days. And for the layman, even epistemology gets pretty tortuous the deeper into it you go. It's hard to do if you don't have a serious background in philosophy or a related field. 
I think you overestimate most people's ability to admit and accept when they are wrong.  At least here in the US, it is embedded into our psyche that being wrong is not an option.  Fake it till you make it is a result of this.  But people are faking it so hard, that they've lost touch with reality, and truly believe that they've already made it when they haven't got a clue. 
I want to believe most people recognize "correlation does not equal causation" as existing, since that phrase has probably been thrown at them a hundred times over their lifetime, and it is used on TV at least once in every show; the problem is making them actually consider it before they make an argument about anything. Once they start the argument, they no longer care to check their facts since it becomes a matter of winning or losing, not right or wrong. 
I came across a youtube video teaching a logical fallacies.  After watching the video I was thinking to myself, this is just common sense.  Some people really just don't have much common sense and I guess really do need to be taught it.  Fallacies could come down to logics of religion as well in my opinion, in turn knowing them could give guidance to individual thought. 
I agree with the majority of what you said, but coming from an undergraduate majoring in philosophy, my academic cohort has got to be some of the least empathetic, dogmatic, holier-than-thou people I have ever met.   Not saying that all who study philosophy are like that, but rather that empathy and confessing ignorance are not emphasized whatsoever, at least in my department. 
I don't want to discard your theory outright, and all, since that is certainly possible.    But I think it might also have to do with the low job security, high pressure for measurable and scientific statictics about performance (the kind of things that philosophy isn't necessarily measured by), decreased funding, and the more general breakdown of american communities as communities (resulting in reduced community support and involvement) in the era of increasing globalization and social media.   
Can you recommend an introduction to philosophy for my daughter. I try to teach her the importance of thinking for herself making her own informed choices and to question everything. I don't have a degree and was expelled very early from high school for being disruptive. But since becoming a father I have realised the importance of the right education. Schools here in U.K. are failing our children by not allowing them access to the appropriate literature or even learning techniques to prepare them for what really goes on. I'd love to show her that it is better to think for yourself and not be afraid to reject the norm  Please advise?? 
Perversions. How *righteous* for a slab of walking, talking meat. 
You can support any position with anecdotes. The benefits or costs of philosophy education must be judged quantitatively.  Also, philosophical training certainly does affect belief. Many positions (including moral positions) simply cannot be sustained in the face of reasoned criticism, because they are not internally consistent. So we should expect training in critical thinking to reduce the prevalence of that kind of belief. And indeed quantitative research has confirmed that it does. 
All this 'post-truth' talk is nothing food for quasi-intellectuals anyway. 'Post' implies that there was a time when truth reigned... which has never been the case. Politicians and media have always misled people. People have always acted more strongly on emotion than intellect. It's easy to see on both the micro and macro levels of human interaction.  It's funny in a sad way, because saying we are 'post-truth' is its own form of non-truth. The statement sells us on the idea that back in 'the good old days' the things you thought were correct were, in fact, correct, and that some villian has come in and disrupted this once pure and functional system. It sells the narrative that whoever is talking about post-truth was, still is, and will always be trustworthy. It's a metanarrative power grab.  
I would disagree for the exact reason you said: the *commonly* used informal ones.  Having taken logic courses in college I understand and appreciate your larger point, but the way people argue does not usually follow logic. Ultimately, we are talking about logos vs. pathos.  An ad hominem argument is, at its core, a pathos argument.  Donald Trump performed well in the U.S. election not because he was a policy wonk appealing to logic, but because he spoke to people's emotions.  Look at the nicknames alone, "Lil' Marco", "Lyin' Ted", "Crooked Hillary". Irrespective of any logical argument to be made, his responses were ad hominem attacks before he said *anything* that represented his own point of view (and it was clearly highly effective).  Net-Net: All logical fallacies are worth knowing but, in the real world, I don't think formal logic is usually entering the equation.   
The logical fallacies seem like common sense when you see them in a course or book, described in clear terms with simple examples. But when they hit you along with all the complexities of real life, and they are endorsing your side of the debate, it's amazing how they can pass unnoticed. 
Wisdom is not an ornament of youth.  Consequently, there are surprisingly few things than an adult can communicate to a child due to the burden of knowledge.  The ordering of virtues has little value to a being that has not really had an opportunity to explore much less amend their virtues.  In that, philosophy has little to offer developing minds.  No adult is as mentally agile as a child.  We are burdened with narrative coherence and intentionality.  They do not learn on schedules.  Our conscious minds range from spotlights to lasers, while theirs are more like lanterns.  One of the few thing we have in common is an ignorance what questions we ought to be asking.    There is such a large gulf of pathos that we even sometimes diagnose deficiency in them, with the most prominent example being "deficient attention" disorder.  What an absurd failing on our part. 
Depending on her age - I would check out Sophie's World. It's not going to have the depth of a textbook or anything, but it's a novel about the history of Western philosophy.   There might be some inaccuracies in there - but for the general brush strokes of philosophy it's pretty good. And with it being written as a novel - there's some level of adventure, mystery, etc. in there.  That would be a book I would assign to high schoolers if I were to teach philosophy. Not the only one, mind you before anyone gets too annoyed with me. 
check out the school of life, its what got me into philosophy.  It has its own biases but its still good for an introduction to philosophy. Also crashcourse has a philosophy series that seems pretty good although its a bit more advanced depending on her age 
If philosophies existed in a vacuum, then nihilism would be neutral.  But they exist within the psychological realm of human motivations, and people who are amoral by nature tend to have an affinity for it.   
But didn't you just use critical thinking to identify the limits of critical thinking? 
And yet the meat does walk and talk.  What a strange thing to arise from the void.  Perhaps the void is literally not there, so to speak.  :) 
Thanks friend. Will definitely try her with Sophie's world. My daughters just turned 11 but is a keen reader and the fact it's a novel may help me hide my intentions. She loves to learn new things but I have a tendency to preach rather than teach. In a good way of course. But I'm no teacher. Thank you kindly 
Had seen that somewhere else but had forgotten till now. Cheers I assume you mean the school of life i.e. The development of emotional intelligence?? 
But surely Nihilism is just the position that the Universe has no intrinsic meaning, including moral meaning. Which seems pretty much the default assumption.   After that you have to work out what to do with that, which is where we get Existentialism, Absurdism, Will-to-Power, Humanist Universalism, etc etc.   There are very few pure Moral Solipsists around. 
Your mistake is to assume that the walking and talking isn't part of the void. 
I'm a nihilist and I volunteer at the soup kitchen. I must be an amoral monster. 
How can a thing be part of nothing?  That's gibberish. 
what do you mean by void and why do you assume the void is nothing? there's a lot of stuff happening in empty space. 
Cool video. Proof is for math, people! In science we deal in evidence and degrees of certainty, never absolute proofs or absolute facts. 
As someone whose research is at least reasonably informed by philosophy of science, I was so torn by all the signs I just saw at the Boston march.  Like, I appreciate your enthusiastic rejection of anti-intellectualism, but science is not some unbiased machine for generating proven absolute Truth. 
Philosophy is not a science, but some philosophers happen to also be mathematicians and scientists and take a scientific approach to philosophy. Not sure I like the two things being conflated. 
There's a lot of so called science base information with only explanations, theories, upon theories that show no evidence or experiments and have to be taken on face value by so called authorities.   People have forgotten how science really works and the difference between science the community and the application of the scientific method 
If aliens were watching they'd be laughing at the pathetic human race..A race of bipedals that have to gather in thousands to convince one person about obvious logic. 
Except most "science" these days is funded by special interests. Even public grants, due to regulatory capture, are only producing evidence to fit a narrative. So when the soda industry pays for studies showing that drinking coke is fine, and the dietitian and nutritionist training programs are sponsored by coke, what happens?  
It's interesting to me that so many people, mostly left leaning people, see the belief in God and knowledge through science as two separate things that cannot exist in the same person's mind. As a believer in God, I absolutely love science! It is amazing in so many ways. However, people seem to be letting science become their religion, and religion always leads to dark places. Do hate or attack people who fear science. That is the quickest way to turn them away! 
I never want to argue with a philosopher who believes in his own theories. It would be pointless. I've had that discussion with myself before. My theories are logical, backed, and are even evident in day to day life. But I *can not* be certain because I am not all knowing. I became an agnostic early on in life because of that same reason. Science is the same way. It's theory, not fact. Political science is rumor, not truth.  Remember: All it takes is a needle to pop a balloon. 
there are plenty of deductive proofs in science. Ask a theoretical physicist. or you know, ask anyone who's used a deductive argument in a scientific paper. Rutherford deducing there must be a positive nucleus in the atom for example. 
A number of them seemed like "pure science policy".  All I can envision there is like almost extremist version of all science society.  We need a science tempered society, one where scientific research and evidence isn't undermined, but instead brought to the discussion as one side of the argument...  An it seems some people cash in all their chips into an all science, all empathy, or all business society... that's a bit terrifying. 
That's because this march is nothing more than a rally of political narrative. That's it. These people didn-t care about science 15 years ago. I doubt half of them have STEM degrees. 
The question isn't do we value science over all other disciplines, rather that we should make decisions based in facts, not emotional appeals and not in outright lies.  While science is not perfect, the scientific has demonstrably shown to provide results that are in fact truth.   Scientific truths can be independently verified by anyone. 
I did a bit of anthropology during university and I always recall a guest lecturer explaining her theory that "science is just like religion". She enthusiastically explained how the way scientists have faith in their validity and the way they expressed unwavering belief in the inevitable truth of science was exactly like religion. They use the same language and other such things.  It really blew my mind. I was raised to believe science was some amazing end product. Nowadays I am much more skeptical of things. For example, when my daughter was shot 4 months I had some Doctors telling me that I should NOT feed her peanuts, while others told me I ABSOLUTELY SHOULD because It was during a "transition" period in medical advice.   Also I just woke up and haven't had coffee so I think my sentences may be too long.    
Could you elaborate a bit more on that?  Like what did you feel was underrepresented, or overrepresented in the presentation of ideas?  
Exactly. The cult of science is just as deadly as the cult of religion.  
Why do you hate science?  You're using the internet, created by computer scientists, to bash science?  You keep hating it but science =truth 
I'm pretty sure nobody at the Boston march thinks science is an unbiased machine for generating proven absolute Truth, because *nobody* thinks science is an unbiased machine for generating proven absolute Truth. 
Why do you say that?  I'm getting an astrophysics degree with a philosophy minor. When explaining to people why I love philosophy, I've sometimes used the phrase "it's the science of thought" (not saying it's necessarily a literal "science"... depending on how you're using that term). But it is supposed to be rigorous, like math and science. 
I'd be interested in seeing a theory without real evidence.  Maybe string theory?  I'm a biologist though so I don't have much interest or experience in theoretical physics.  
President Trump says that climate change is a Chinese hoax, and that vaccines cause autism. He wants to destroy the EPA, and science education because of those beliefs. How much more anti-science in government do you want? 
Yeah, totally. The overwhelming evidence makes it so I'm 99.9999999% certain the earth is a slightly oblate spheroid and also 99.9999% certain the "Inheritance of acquired traits" hypothesis is not true. So I'll make decisions based on those levels of certainty until new evidence comes forward. Sometimes the evidence is not so overwhelming so you have to do the best of what's available. But the moment I start claiming something is 100% true or false without room for even the slightest doubt is the moment I stopped doing science and engaged in unquestioning dogma.  Evidence-based policy is the best policy! Doesn't mean you won't ever be wrong. 
I hate how dismissive people are of political science. Sure, some of it is less empirical, like political theory. But political science also includes political psychology and a ton of important historical work. Just because it's a mainly observational science doesn't mean you can just dismiss it outright.  
One of my favorite signs at the Boston march was two-sided.  The one side said "Science is a double-edged sword", and the other said "Resist the siren call of techno-utopianism". 
Aren't you sort of making an is/ought error here? Surely we can have an all-science society and an all-empathy society at the same time. 
The problem is with that, science can't simply "be let in" because compared to every other type of doctrine,science is the "bully" science is right, until it's wrong. But science that is right, is always right. It can't be countered, feelings and desires do not counter science once it's established its place as an authroitive object unless the authorities denounce science. I'm for a ruling global science party but I get why some people aren't and social harmony is first most important or everything crumbles anyway.  
I feel like science naturally supports empathy though doesn't it?  Our best observations about the way the world works show that cooperation pays off. Supporting other humans, other life forms, and the environment consistently pays a high long term return on investment.   
Don't get me wrong, as far as the question of whether policy should be based on evidence and we should fund science, I am 100% behind these marches and strongly pro-science.  (and not just because I'm on an NSF grant)  It's just that some of the signs I saw were close to deifying science, and that weirds me out a bit. 
But scientists don't just blindly have "faith" in "their" validity. Scientists constantly question science, they constantly "redo" science and good scientists actively try to further proove or disprove their previous research. 
The scientific method isn't religion, but for many people, the culture of science is. People who do science should know that it is composed of grey areas. Armchair "fans" of science think it is a kind of absolute truth, and they put their faith in research they have only read about in science journalism. It's amazing how much more complicated the story always is when you read the original research.  TL:DR  Scientists and science "fans" are two different things (mostly...) 
I have unwavering faith in the actuality of both General and Special Relativity.  This is not because of any deification of Einstein, but because my GPS works.  The clock timing involved in GPS needs to account for both the relative motion f the satellites and the earth, and also the different gravitational field due to the elevation between the surface of the Earth and the orbiting satellites.  It's entirely possible that discoveries and theories might crop up that that refine things, but any complete overhaul to Relativity needs to at the same time explain how GPS works.  Science is the quest to be more right than we are today about how things work and the underlying mechanisms of the universe.  It's a series of branching pillars reaching for the sky, with continual testing of the branches for stability. 
Science isn't perfect, but it's definitely not religion. Science has taught us so much about the world. It's an iterative process that has some bumps and backtracking, while religion is complete faith without any evidence. Science is the best way we have of understanding the world around us, even if it isn't perfect. Science's biggest weakness is it's done by humans.  
Your guest lecture was repeating utter nonsense.  Religion requires faith in the unprovable.  In contrast, science REQUIRES that results can be reproduced by other people.  If it's not reproducible, then we chuck it aside. 
I appreciate that you actually referenced philosophers here :-) 
You would think, right? But you should have heard some of the speeches given today. Perhaps nobody thinks science is "an unbiased machine for generating proven absolute Truth", but it's certainly the case that some of them think *whatever it is they're calling science* is "an unbiased machine for generating proven absolute Truth." 
No. The classical philosophers did not distinguish between philosophy, mathematics and physics, but to call one the progenitor of the others is presumtious. By your logic one could just as easily argue that science is the child of religion.  
Is this sarcasm. String theory is completely theoretical.  
That's and of-repeated statement, which is true and offensive for foreign relations... I disagree with a leader saying that... But he did recant it, and explained it away as a joke, so what should I believe now?  The point of your reply seems to suggest I should believe Trump's statement, but should I only believe the original statement, and not his recantation?  
These are examples of science in action though. Isn't the entire point of it self-correction?   
If you consider our perception, the earth is round.   if you consider wave theory and gravity, it's basically just big ditch in the 4th dimension.   ^^^^^^^^^I_know_this_is_inacurate 
Because that's not what science is, that's what the OP is all about. Theory is not absolute. Everyone could be dead wrong about everything. It's a slippery slope of loose beliefs based on only what you've seen or heard instead of what you haven't. 
I'm by no means a philosopher, instead coming from a consumer behaviour/psychology educational background. Your first paragraph really resonates with me, however.  That phenomenon as I was taught is 'confirmation bias' - while I'm sure you're aware of this, that term might help anyone else looking to expand their knowledge base through some behavioural literature on the subject.  It also has strong links with cognitive dissonance theory, which I also find interesting but personally avoid as a framework of cognitive strategy in favour of others (preferring Gigerenzer's heuristics and biases framework!). If anyone does have any questions about this, it's something I worked on for my Master's thesis and would be more than willing to discuss.  
I dunno after reading Poul Anderson, Heinlein, Huxley, Bradbury, and Rand... I mean I love those stories...  We should totally follow in their design! /s  
It may not be perfect, but it's the best current option. A technocracy or a merit based government is preferable to the current rollercoaster of emotions which guides policy. 
I suppose there's some possibility within, but we'd have to go all "Plato's Republic" on this empathy/science society.  Are bakers empathetic or scientific?    
I'm a bit confused when you say "[science] can't be countered".   Scientific progress is made by continually questioning previous assumptions and beliefs and improving/disproving them. 
Well, that's how it SHOULD be, but in practice people tend to listen to the guy who sound the most convinced of his own ideas. This is one of the big problems with science journalism and pop science, which is essentially what this march seems to be about. 
the science fanboy syndrome is at least partially (if not entirely) the result of the way that it's presented to the world at large by a handful of science popularizers and advocates who seem to have the largest mindshare with the public 
Science's biggest weakness is that it claims to be able to explain the world. It cannot. It can only explain sensual perception of the world 
So you have faith in the methods of science to prove itself as truthful?   You are missing the point of the message if you are comparing as above. Her point was the framework of belief was similar.  
I'd have to actually be there to say otherwise, but are you *sure* they weren't called science something more like, "not an unbiased machine for generating proven absolute Truth, but a hell of a lot closer to being that than anything else we've got?" 
Science as we know it today, is an epistemological method devised by philosophers during the early enlightenment, so I think it's safe to call science a product of philosophy 
sound scientific methodology can reach incorrect conclusions. or, in layman's terms: sometimes science is wrong.  
haha, well I wasn't giving accurate numbers to be fair, just a general sense of how certain I am. Interesting website, I'm not sure how you can really get really "objective" numbers. Also, please label your axes!  
What accounts for that half a percent doubt that the earth is round? 
With a scientist there is no logic involved just jotting down A- leads to B, different with philosophy in my opinion. Plus" I know I could possibly never know anything for sure"  is a steaming pile of crap. I have met philosophers who have mad pretty good arguments for the other side of that. I am not saying ignore logic, but if it logically works and it is sound then it is probably true. You have to take action to deduction eventually. However science cannot be like that because science is fact based not in logic.  
I'm thinking you don't really know how logic works, do you? 
Sounds like something someone who has never studied political science would say.  
The overwhelming evidence makes it so I'm 99.9999999% certain the earth is a slightly oblate spheroid. So yeah, in practice I'll behave with the assumption the Earth is a slightly oblate spheroid, but the moment I start claiming something is 100% true or false without room for even the slightest doubt is the moment I stopped doing science and engaged in unquestioning dogma. For your example, there's always the chance you fall in the 1 chance (even out of 10 to the 2680th power). And that is assuming you made your calculation from accurate premises and estimations, which again you will never be 100% certain about. 
You mean not everyone is pulling for Brave New World to come about?   I want my soma dammit 
I am all about evidence-based policy decisions, and agree with you that it's a really useful system.  But there were also people with signs literally claiming that science will solve intolerance and social inequality.  Maybe one day it will, somehow, but betting everything on that hope seems to be leaving behind evidence-based policy, rather than embracing it. 
I'm saying that if science is to be used as a rule, then once such "rule" is established, nothing else can counter scientific logic of course besides a more accurate scientific understanding. The post i replied to suggests that science can simply be brought to discussion to compliment other aspects but really science will trump all those other aspects and science will end up either being absolute or the authorities that adopted science as a ruling object will eventually denounce it. Those are the two pathways I see. 
Huh. I feel like it's important to address diversity in any situation, but there's no need to polarize this march. Isn't it just supposed to be about the values of evidence and intellectualism? Lets not push it to the left. 
I'm talking about scientists though, I'm not a scientist but perhaps I am one in training but I'm careful not to pretend I know how to be a good scientist yet. I simply respect what those who are do. "Pop science" seems to neglect the scientific method most of the time a dos more closely related to politics to in my opinion. 
If we're gonna have brain in a vat conversations, maybe, but if we go down that road why even bother with any explanations? 
That same complaint can be leveled at religion also. Everyone's religious experiances  are filtered through their own perception of there experiances.  if you can't trust the signals manipulating your brain then your own religious experiances  can't be trusted.   This thinking  gets us no place except the boring "we could all be just brains in a vat" argument. And if  we are all only a brain in a vat then that's it so what.   if you really believe that why even waist your time typing on this forum. 
Yes, I understand that but it is still the *best* methodology we have for understand the nature of the universe.   If something is wrong in science, we can correct it but continuing to follow the scientific method. Otherwise, we simply have to say "I don't know" until we do.   The problem we currently have here is people are dismissing things like evolution and climate change. There are certainly details still being worked out sure, but the core science is sound.  
I think that philosophers are referring to absolute truths when saying that "I couldn't know something for sure."  I can make deductions and eventually reach reliable relative truths, but it is logically impossible for me to know something as an absolute truth.  By saying that I know an absolute truth, I am implying that under any circumstance, no matter what, that truth will stay true indefinitely.  Of course that's humanely impossible for me to determine that as our perception and conscientiousness limits us so that we aren't omniscient beings.  However I agree with you that although we can't determine the absolutism of a logical model, that still doesn't prevent us from relying on it and using it. 
Well scientific data has the solutions to those problems already. The issue is applying that knowledge in the complexity of the world outside of a lab. 
So when science said smoking was fine, putting smoking restrictions on age should have been illegal despite common sense. Then 40 years later we saw scientifically that smoking was harmful we saw what?  
Legitimate religion is based on legitimate scripture, which is an authority on God. It is not based on empiricism. One accepts an authorized text and practices the process in order to experience it. It is top down, not bottom up approach. Like someone else said, epistemology is something that needs to be taught.  
Could you point me to some sources on these solutions, even in a lab environment? 
French fries alone were just a first thing in mind example, yes speaking from a first world perspective where choosing to luxuriously consume fries is not a good choice for at least my health and therefore my longevity.    I agree that scientific understandings are constantly proven wrong and replaced with another, but living by the scientific method alone even will allow one to reach that conclusion. im not sure I ever argued that science without philosophy was a good thing. All I'm saying is that when scientific understanding are used to regulate and policy-craft in human society, it is not complimentary to every other aspect considered and instead it is dominant. Of course, that is only if the governing body and population accept the scientific method over the word of proposed dieties and pre-conceived notions.  
That is an important distinction to be sure, but then in turn those more powerful mathematical theories rest on unprovable assumptions as well, correct? Which can in turn be proven by more powerful assumptions, etc.   But if that chain continues all the way up, then at some point does his point because a highly simplified but overall correct statement? 
I think we're going in opposite directions. Every formal mathematical theory has "assumptions", in the sense that everything about that formal theory constrains what it can do---its axioms, its inference rules, its choice of language, etc. Talking about expanding the set of possible things that a formal theory can *prove* is not the same as talking about creating formal theories that can prove axioms using fewer assumptions. You seem to be talking about the latter; I'm talking about the former. (this, by the way, is why I asked the original commenter to clarify whether he was talking about the incompleteness theorems or not). 
If I'm a computer simulation and the person playing my character is reading this right now, you suck at playing this game. 
Would be curious to know if there are any studies about how being exposed to things like this that make you question your reality (this video, The Truman Show, The Matrix, etc) from a young age can impact your reality and your take on life. I remember having a moment as a 6 or 7 year old because I wasn't sure if I was dreaming and how long I had been dreaming for, and maybe years had passed in this dream and I would wake up and have to live it all over again.  
Seems like whoever or whatever is controlling my sensory inputs would want a more exciting experiment than this. 
Does anyone know what service this video is made my. That's a computer generated hand that traces clipart shapes. Any idea what company offers this service? 
I love the discussions surrounding Philosophy, but am only an amateur in these discussions as I've never had any formal philosophy education. When watching this video I feel invigorated yet confused and unsettled.. I don't think I enjoy this feeling of uneasiness.. knowing that what I know is not true knowledge.  I am curious about one thing: For those genuinely studying philosophy and who are heavily involved in this world, does this knowledge (or feeling of lack of knowledge) impair your ability to live life normally and comfortably?   your answers will probably determine whether or not I will delve deeper in the world of Philosophy lol 
doesn't this eventually boils down to trusting/not trusting the brain? Since it is ***THE*** source for our conscience? 
I know that I do not know. Boom. Knowledge proven. 
How do you know this video is lame? By watching it.  The dream argument is stupid. Lucid dreamers can easily tell whether they are dreaming by simple exercises such as staring at an object or trying to read text. 
Does anyone else think that this "living in a computer" idea boils down to if you believe in a god? Not saying they are the same, simply that because of the what the word "simulation" implies. That we are living in something created beyond us. It could be interpreted as a world created for our existence. Or a world created with purpose. A part of me also argues that the word "simulation" in the eyes of those like Elon Musk are no different of the word "life" in the eyes of say... myself. Thoughts? 
This is a natural conclusion to come to for most people, right? I've essentially had this exact or similar *intuitive* thoughts when I was younger.  Just asking because parts of my social circle fairly terrible when it comes to discussion on this matter. 
It's possible someone asked this, but let's say for a minute we are brains in a vat, or our reality is being generated by some evil genius, or even that the universe began 5 minutes ago and all of our memories are false... does it matter? Of course, for those with bad lives or those going through difficult times, it may be considered bad that someone or something is forcing this reality upon you, but personally I don't think it matters. If you are out of control of a situation (or are merely under the belief you're in control), then all that matters is that you are experiencing something, and that you exist in some way and have the ability to experience it. Especially if you put purpose to the experience (or believe you're putting purpose to it). Of course, there's nothing wrong with asking questions, and it does get the juices flowing in the noggin  
how is knowledge of this "fake" reality any less knowledge than knowledge of the "real" reality? 
After an experience has occurred, is there any difference between remembering the experience, or dreaming about the experience, or simply imagining the experience (which never happened). Or trying to imagine an experience that has happened yet?  What is it about the past tense that makes an experience more "real" ? 
Managed to watch until 0:48. And I'm an open type. If you can't know, why does she know. 
if we are brains in a vat being fed sensory inputs, then that implies that another intelligent being has created this vat - as it cannot form naturally. That intelligent being would need some sort of brain to come up with something that sophisticated. And if that brain is also in a vat, then there must be yet another brain that's not in a vat  No matter how far you pursue this line of thinking, you inevitably come to a brain that must NOT be in a vat - the original brain that made all the other vats. You get back to the starting point of trying to explain consciousness. This theory offers nothing useful  
It seems to me that this whole question boils down to falsafiability; since the whole vat-theory is non-falsifiable, Occam's razor does a great job at chucking it in the trash-vat, question answered. 
Nothing really matters if this is a computer simulation or if everything is real. So what is the point? I see it as we just choice to believe something and keep going. If there is a god or there isn't is just a belief. Well, if nothing matters why am I happy and living a life of happiness? That was my choice I made, my choices are real. That would mean my beliefs are real. We don't know if there is a god but if someone believes there is it makes him real to that person. Maybe god made the super computer but it doesn't really matter. That's because I made that choice. Our individual choices gives us our greatest powers. To decide what matters and what doesn't. We create meaning in this meaningless matrix through our beliefs. 
my response to this is that theoretically some guy with a baseball bat could come bash your jar brain in with no possibility of retort, not a single measurable way of detecting it was coming. sure you could say you could already die at any point without seeing it coming, but assuming you had all the knowledge in this universe, you would be able to predict everything, correct? not the case if there is an external universe. 
I'm pretty sure I'm in a coma. Now you get to think about if I'm just something your coma brain thought up to comfort you about your fear of you being in a coma.  
Welp, questioning my reality actually made me "insane" and depressed. I am taking antipsychotics for a while now because i experienced some really weird shit. I really should avoid this topic, since it could potentially trigger another psychotic episode. Reality is weird. I don't know anything. 
Interesting. How early do others have experiences like this?  I remember a phase when I was about 5 as well where all I would do is question my parents' existence basically and always ask them how they know they exist when it could just all be in my mind. Solipsism is weird.  
yea my life seems like it would be pretty boring to be simulating.  
My god, this comment had everything. Intelligent questions for the audience, a good plot, unforced romance, nothing could've prepared me for that finale though.    Rottentomatoes 98/100. 
It doesn't really matter since we are all in a turtle's dream in outer space.  
Nope. Certainly there are epistemological issues with trusting the brain. But there are also questions about whether we can trust our "inputs" to the brain. Like the brain in vat connected to a computer that generates our world. In such a situation, how can we prove that we aren't just a brain in a vat? We really can't and hence our "knowledge" isn't real.  
Even without skepticism that our reality is true, there is not yet a final word that the brain is the seat of consciousness. 
Humans are adept at making patterns fit where none actually do. They want reality to fit into a nice little box rather than the chaotic fucked up mess that it is. Personally, I like the idea of a simulated universe because it conveys an order to things, but that doesn't mean that I believe it is true. The most horrifying realization I think people can make is that there is no order to it, that we're rudderless. 
This isn't really a TL:DW. It's more of a TIWYSWOV (THIS IS WHY YOU SHOULD WATCH OUR VIDEO) 
I agree with this for the most part. I consider myself a strong "believer" in an argument and sometimes I ponder whether I just want to believe in "god" but maybe I consider "too cool/intelligent (to paraphrase) for mainstream organized religion  
I agree with you, even if you somehow got the definitive answer, you wouldn't be able to do anything to change anything about your reality anyway. 
Are you saying that science can defeat the skeptical hypotheses like the brain in the vat? 
There is no scientific argument that can prove the theory wrong yet, and honestly these ideas aren't really practically useful at all. Kind of just fun thought experiments  
She doesn't know, that's kind of the point. If you look at everything through a sceptic lense you realize that there is nothing you can know with certainty. Additionally, if you don't know whether or not it is possible to know something for certain, you are still unable to know with certainty. 
what if the brain and the vat came into existence through pure coincidence 
I think it'd be a pretty big deal if you could prove were in a simulation. Also, if it's at all possible to simulate a universe aren't we more likely to be one of the simulated universes than the original one?  
Falsifiability and Occam's razor are two different things. Falsifiability is an appropriate requirement of scientific theories, but not philosophical ones. What is your justification for believing in Occam's razor? Why is simplicity necessarily a virtue? 
I agree simulation theory is similar to believing in god.  Any kind of probing we do will fail because the simulation is so perfect.  There are no cracks in the program for us to see.  It fails due to Occam's Razor in the same way god fails.  If god existed then who made him?  It's possible that some other process made god but then we could have simply been created by that other process.  Inserting god into the equation just adds complexity and nothing else.  It doesn't disprove it but doesn't really help in any way.  Secondly I would ask believers in simulation to consider what it really means to be in a simulation.  Does it require a conscious creator who controls the system?  If not the you could really define any system to be a simulation.  The laws of physics could be regarded as a simulation even though they are built on a very low level foundation that has no thoughts or feelings.   
What is God? Is God the creator? Does that mean God is the man that turned the simulation on? Or is God the God of him? 
What if we don't need to simulate all of existence but only all of existence as perceived by the individual. That's a much smaller subset than "all of existence." Just add data as its experienced and delete the data not being experienced or that will never be experienced again. 
What kind of dreams are you having where everything is measurable and calcuated?  I wanna try that. 
I've never had a sufficiently realistic dream for me to think this but, yes, providing that the dream has all the properties of waking reality, then for as long as I'm experiencing it, it's as real as the world is now. If I lived in that dream and was coherent enough to make points on r/philosophy, I'd say what I typed above. 
Those surveys that ask "are you afraid of dying" I always think: I'm afraid I'm already dead and just didn't quite get the memo. I always picture being dead as being asleep so I have these terror moments where I worry I'm really just dead, despite the fact that I don't believe I'd be capable of any thought after death. 
You joke, but just this week someone in the lucid dreaming sub complained that characters in their dreams were expressing existential crises regarding their existence beyond the end of the dream.   
It's not the extraordinary ants that give biologists the best data on ant colonies, it's the boring mundane ants. 
I do not agree :  You cannot ascertain that you know that you do not know, you either know that you know  or don't know that you don't know  Know knot known    
I skipped to the end halfway through to make sure I wasn't reading long post from that novelty account that ends every post with a reference to WWF Hell in a Cell and spoiled the joke.... :( 
Other people are like this is so insightful and I'm over here like this is some false equivalency bullshit with a smattering (or a ton) of other fallacies and assumptions.  Total bs 
Regarding your last paragraph, what do you think of Pascal's Wager?   I have had very little philosophical education, 3 years in school (biased philosophy, since it was taught a very up-tight catholic private school) and a 4 month course that was little more than analyzing texts and movies. I've analyzed the idea of religion for 5 years now and it's driven me from a devout catholic to agnosticism, though I'm not sure if it's for the right reasons or if I'm ignoring something. 
I am aware of this sentiment but do you actually switch "ignorance" on and off based on what situation you find yourself? Do you always live in a non-ignorant world? I feel like your response needs more application to the real world. 
The two scenarios are not equal.   The first is based on the fact that the only place we have found consciousness is in the brain.   The second is baseless.  I'm not saying it's definitely wrong, I think it's a cool idea.  But the assumption made for it isn't equivalent to the assumption made for the first.   The fact that it is impossible to prove anything doesn't mean all assumptions have equivalent basis.  
Is there any reason to believe it isn't? For example, consciousness existing without a brain? 
then *simulated universe* is just the latest costume for God. 
I can tell that I'm not dreaming considering the details, the sensations and the free will. If you can't tell, you are either in a coma, high or having issues with reality (a teenager thing). When dreaming, you wake up if you realize it. I've heard of people dreaming will being aware, but if it's true, that require training, and I never did that.  
Didn't it turn out to just be on turtle swimming through space, occasionally running across other disk-bearing turtles for disk-bearing turtle space sex? 
Either way it still doesn't answer how consciousness arises  
Well no, but it's not made of magic either.  It's just carbon, hydrogen, nitrogen, etc. 
According to the sensory input _you_receive, maybe. 
Seriously.  Are that many people not picking up that he's completely discrediting the very concept of knowledge while simultaneously basing his entire argument on information that *falls into the exact concept he's decrying*?  It's flowery, but it's still BS.  Say a bunch of stuff that seems deep and reap the upvotes, doesn't matter if it makes any logical sense. 
Kind of glad I found this comment chain knowing I wasn't the only one.  
Honestly it made me feel like I shouldn't be subscribed to this sub. I count /r/philosophy as one of my science based subreddits, but this is some serious fantasy land pseudoscience bullshit and I wonder if this isn't a place for legitimate scientific discussion...    And it's not a matter of different opinions, it's just that the whole comment is so incredibly unscientific and illogical, based on completely made up concepts with no basis in reality, extremely vague and flowery reasoning, and everything else that has been mentioned.    It's like if I said "I don't believe 2+2 is 4 because I feel that math is a human invention subject to being proven wrong, and if we go by the natural laws of the universe then it tells us that nothing is certain and history blah blah blah..." In other words, a bunch of fucking nonsense.   We would still be in the stone age if this kind of thinking was standard.    /endrant 
In my opinion, Pascal's Wager sort of falls apart when more than one religion is considered. If you were to really subscribe to the "better safe than sorry" reasoning of Pascal's wager, you'd need to be devoutly subscribed to every single religion- which doesn't really work. 
There are arguments for the externalized nature of consciousness, as well as for the fact that consciousness is specialized throughout bodyparts. Actually, I think any view that consciousness is 100% internal in the brain is probably somewhat against the grain at this point. 
You never had a dream that felt so real that you at first weren't sure if it actually happened, even after waking up? I have, about 10-15 times in my life, but there are people who experience this much more often. I've also had dreams where i was aware (lucid dreaming), but only twice. It can happen even without training, it's just not that common.   Besides, while in the dream doesn't it feel real? If it doesn't, that would mean you to some exrent are aware of dreaming. 
True but that's not its purpose. It is meant purely to demonstrate the skeptic's position. 
It's just a reaaaally lucky combo of the same shit that the entire planet and everything we *know* is made of.  
I agree with your main point though of it not really mattering for our day to day lives. Assuming we're living in a simulation, why should that affect me? How does that change anything? Life is likely just as meaningful or meaningless (depending on your thoughts) with or without that knowledge. 
I think you're right that neuroscientists would agree that the body plays an important role in consciousness and that we should stop considering the brain as a disparate piece of hardware. But not many credible ones would say that consciousness exists outside, or after, the body and brain. 
I wake up everytime it feels real. I tend to be very skeptical (irony), maybe it's in my nature. Not everyone dream the same way. And I usually work a lot at night, which kinda fuck my dreams too. Once I get to sleep on a normal cycle I tend to have terrible nights, but I can count with my fingers the number of dream that I have memories of, and even less for the one that felt real.  Dreaming and not being able to tell if it's real is not the same as being awake and not being able to tell if you are sleeping or not. 
Just because the universe may be infinate and particles can pop in and out, it does not mean that it all eventually pops into a brain in a vat if the nature of the universe doesnt allow such a thing to happen. And quatum particles disappear because they annihilate its anti particle give its energy back to = 0 
Agreed.  Or at least that's what my rock wants me to think. 
But we are conscious about it and that's the weirdest part, I can understand that we are all chemical reactions but chemical reactions don't have a conscience. 
I think it would certainly impact how people view death. Opens up the real possibility of an afterlife. Along the same lines of if you could prove God was real.  
We are all one consciousness experiencing itself subjectively.  
That is actually a very good point I hadn't considered. In a way, I guess the makers of the simulation would be, for all intents and purposes, God. 
There is no such thing as death, life is just a dream and we are the imagination of ourselves......here's Tom with the weather. 
Bold claim.  Any evidence?  We could all just be sacks of meat supporting a smaller sack of meat that processes stimuli using electrical and chemical reactions and is pretending to be self-aware because that let's it gain access to the "Knowledge" skill tree and craft awesome machines to download porn with. 
There is no death, we are only a dream,  The Imagination of Ourselves...   Here's Tom with the Weather! 
My inclination is ego. We're only so impressed because we don't fully understand the brain. 
I just watched Revelations (1993) by Bill Hicks. Holy shit.  
I didn't know it was a comedian, and now I'm downloading his stand-ups.  
We're all only pretending to be self-aware? Thank goodness! I thought I was the only one! 
I'm not sure what the other guy meant, but in reference to your comment; what does it mean to "pretend" to be self-aware? 
The obvious exception, of course, is in the case of a refutation of a person who claims not to be biased. 
This makes me think of the Big Short, when Steve Carrell's character is at Standard and Poor and the ratings person asks him "wouldn't you benefit from us making this chage?" (i.e. "aren't you biased here?"). And he answers "just because I'm biased, doesn't mean I'm wrong"  Of course, he was right 
Of course bias in of itself doesn't indicate wrong/right. But it is certainly a good reason to be suspicious of their claims.  
Everyone is biased.  And the truth is the truth whether it comes from a biased person, a bad person, is something good or bad, whether you like it or not.   In the post truth world I am seeing a lot of rejection of truth on grounds like oh they are biased or that's an unpleasant truth so I reject it.   The truth is the truth no matter what. If it's debatable or subjective then it's not a truth.  
People aren't wrong for being biased.  If they were, everyone would be wrong because everyone is biased at some level.  The OP put "They're biased so they're wrong" in quotes.  I've never heard anyone say that or even heard of anyone saying that. 
This is ludicrous. It's akin to saying that it's fallacious to assume that a broken clock is wrong because it is, in fact, right twice each day.  It's also a straw man, come to think of it: nobody is saying that it's impossible for biased journalists to be correct. Rather, what they're saying is that biased journalists are often full of shit and frequently lie. There's a difference. 
All that matters is the evidence, not the biases of the person giving the argument.  Besides, *everyone* is biased one way or the other. 
However there may be a correlation between bias and fallacious arguments   Since the motives are clearly beyond 'seeking the ultimate truth' about the matter and more in the realm of 'seeking a truth consistent with my current interests'  Obviously correlation doesn't imply causation for ALL CASES ALL THE TIME but IME it's MORE LIKELY to happen in some or even many cases  
I've been subscribed to r/philosophy for a while now....  Too bad this sophomoric crap gets action. 
Bias suggests a lack of consideration for facts that would disqualify the statements being made.  The real fallacy is calling someone biased because you disagree with them. 
What I would give to be able to forward this post to my entire High School... 
A ton of fallacies are just perfectly reasonable inferences taken ever so slightly further than they can support themselves.   "They're biased so the things they are saying are wrong" is fallacious.   "They're biased so the things they are saying are unreliable" is not.  
I'm reminded of criticism for hypocrisy. Hypocrisy may be a poor character trait, but it may be better than the alternative. Merely imagine a murderer who speaks against murder: am I to believe it'd be better if he spoke in favor of murder?! 
1. It depends on whether the bias is relevant to the claims being made.  2. That's fine, but we should only conclusively dismiss something if it can be demonstrated to be wrong. And that requires knowing more than just whether a source is biased.  But that's consistent with what you're saying. 
What matters is if your source is biased. The main complaint currently is that the news is biased, and quite frequently the news will express opinions in which they cite themselves. 
They are biased, which makes me suspicious. This leads to looking for errors or the bad things that the bias didn't care for or look at. Which might turn people off or believe the biased is wrong.  *This is where I'm Most interested, because if the biased person or group isn't wrong, Why are they biased? Are believed to be wrong because they are biased regardless of facts? Hmmm...   
Information is never right or wrong.  It is useful or useless.  in this sense even a biased opinion is useful...but bias reduces it's usefulness.    
Well, the proper way to approach someone with a heavily biased argument (assuming it's invalid) is first to dismantle the argument logically and factually, then proceed to bring attention to the likely reason why they would even assume its validity in the first place, namely their bias. It makes an intellectually honest opponent reflect, and it makes any witnesses do the same and become less likely to accept, at face value, future arguments that stroke their affinities in a similar manner. 
1) The link gives a 404 error  2) Don't call it the bias fallacy, call it an ad hominem attack  3) Anybody supposedly reinventing and renaming the most basic forms of fallacies used in an argument is probably being an attention seeking ass  (see.... ad hominem) 
No shit. But it does mean they are likely to omit or mislead wherever and whenever possible. So although it is not a guarantee they are wrong it is very likely they are manipulating you. 
"They're biased so they *might* be wrong!"  Being biased should raise the suspicion of inaccuracy. The more biased the source, the more vigilant one should be when reviewing it. 
True but they have a vested interest to twist facts deceptively so makes sense to take what they say with a grain of salt  
It certainly means that they are wrong more often than someone who isn't biased. Because the fact that they are biased clouds the judgment, clouds their objectivity. And therefore they are not a reliable source.  
What it does is make your confidence in what is being stated by the biased party lower, because it's nearly impossible to separate the effect of the bias from the the conclusion, as it calls into question how every step the argument was developed, from inception to data gathering to data analysis. So while a biased party may be correct, it becomes much harder to determine the validity of the statements of any biased party. 
Wow, this thread is rife with nonsense. Debate and philosophy are different things. Please stop conflating them. Also, there is no such thing as "the bias fallacy". Perception of bias is covered by ad hominem attacks. Bias fallacy is something this guy made up and that people (supposition here) are latching onto because they've been accused of bias before. Does being biased make you wrong? No. Does being biased make bias fallacy a thing? Also, no. 
But it certainly means you're narrow minded therefore increasing the likelihood of being wrong  
Why the fuck does this have so many upvotes?  It's not the "bias fallacy", calling their character into question is just a simple ad hominem...  What the hell is going on in here? 
Being biased does not automatically mean being wrong, no.  Being biased does, however, raise the probability of incomplete research, inaccurate analysis and incorrect conclusions.  Thus if an opponent is biased is a very good indicator that you should examine their sources and research as you are likely to find the research to be of poor quality and/or misrepresented. 
They're not wrong, but they're still biased. They are going to skew their answer in a way that is favorable to their own viewpoint.  
A good rule of thumb is to believe sources if they do one of these two things:: it making a claim that others also attest to, or making a claim that would fit against its narrative.    For example, if Breitbart argues something that would go against their narrative, such as that science has proven human caused global warming, it would be logical to trust them. If the New York times were to claim now that global warming were false, it would again be logical to accept them.  
I think one the major issues with biased sources isn't that they're lying, it's that they're withholding the other side of the story, or the facts that don't fit their agenda. This, I think, is more damaging overall. They can tell the truth in everything they say, yet still manage to misrepresent the true narrative. 
I think you can infer bias from falsehood, but not the other way around. For example I can say Tom Brady is the best QB ever, and that's not false even though I'm biased. But you can infer bias from a comment like Julian Edelman is the best WR in the league.   Also it's a specific form of ad hominem more than anything. 
but we can infer credibility. news organizations are worthless without credibility. 
Bias cannot logically invalidate an argument in most cases. However; bias can invalidate credibility.  In practical terms, we do not have infinite resources to investigate every claim, so we rely on credibility, and credibility is often affected by bias.  For instance, both the New York Times and Breitbart are biased, but from a practical point of view, Breitbart is much more biased and therefore much less credible (and of course, they are less credible for other reasons as well).  An obviously biased pro or anti marijuana website is probably not a credible source for information on marijuana due to its bias.  So while we cannot logically discount an argument because it is biased, in many cases, good critical thinking skills are to discount a biased source as likely to be lacking in credible information or at least to apply more skepticism to the biased source and try to confirm with an unbiased source.   
I agree with that analysis (I.e., that the bias fallacy is a form of ad hominem). In my experience many people who know what an ad hominem fallacy is do not seem to recognize that the bias fallacy is an instance of it. Perhaps I'll add that point. (Or you can in the comments if you prefer). 
How often are we arguing with people formally? In everyday conversation we aren't proving or disproving things with certainty. The fact is that pointing out someone's bias illustrates that they are *more likely* to be guilty of motivated reasoning.  Most of the time when someone calls me out for a formal fallacy in a normal conversation, I wasn't making a formal argument in the first place. 
I wouldn't call being biased a character flaw but a flaw in reasoning.  
A bias may not be a character flaw, though.  Editorial bias, for example, is considered quid pro quo for publications.  So pointing out a bias may not always be an ad hominem but might just be an observation. 
Would an entirely apathetic person still be biased though? I mean prior biases could exist but if they really didn't care about whatever those biases pertained to could they really be said to have a bias at all?  
Good point. But even that requires a further premise, no?   Premise 1: They're biased. (Suppressed premise: they think that they're not biased). Conclusion: They're wrong. 
Why? It doesn't necessarily mean the person is wrong. If they're wrong, that's probably the reason, that's about it.  Anything else is just statistics. You're having a XXXX 2016 sign in you yard? The probability is higher that you're gonna have a certain stance on a certain issue, regardless of the issue itself.   Unfortunately that's not much more than a mathematically justified prejudice (which basically is a prejudice) 
Both trial lawyers are biased, but it would be wrong to ignore both of them. It would be wrong to ignore only one of them.  
The problem is when people act like suspicion is enough to deny their claims without even checking the evidence. 
Shouldn't you be suspicious of any claim, in the sense that you should always be trying to figure out if it's true or not? Regardless of who it comes from? 
Sounds like someone needs a lesson in perspectivism IMO. 
I feel most people are most persuaded via pathos. We much prefer the *feeling of being morally superior* to an adversarial position over a worldview free of fallacies. Cf. most newspaper op-eds and nearly all speeches made by political figures.  So the heuristic we're most likely to choose in deciding which authorities to trust, in my view, is whoever makes us feel best. 
The post features a couple instances of people saying things like that. 
yup. its not that a biased person is more likely to be wrong, its that a biased person is more likely to have constructed their argument based on their biases and (possibly/often/potentialy) ignoring details not fitting, in line with their biases.  If a media outlet with an anti immigration bias reports on any and all instance of crime committed by immigrants, its not that they are wrong about the crimes committed, they just have certain reasons for why they call attention to this. 
But a broken clock IS right twice a day. You would be correct to call it broken but you would still have to check its time against a non-broken clock before declaring that the time it shows is incorrect 
I once saw someone argue on Reddit argue that only atheists have ever committed acts that would today be considered crimes against humanity.  Given counterexamples, they said that commuting such an act meant you were actually not religious, no matter how much you believed and professed otherwise.  So all really bad things were done by atheists because only an atheist would do a really bad thing.  It was weird. 
Exactly. The doctor who tells you to lose weight while being overweight himself; he's a hypocrite, but he's not wrong. If the doctor tells you to take some drug, and he's been funded by the drug manufacturer, he's very biased, but *it still may be the best drug for you*.   Bias and hypocrisy increase the probability someone's opinion may be wrong, but it is not evidence by itself. 
The alternative is honesty. That's not usually a trait a morally bankrupt person would possess. Charles Manson... maybe? He's honest about feeling he did nothing wrong. Thankfully parole boards frown on that. 
But even if a source is biased, it doesn't *necessarily* follow that all of their claims are false. 
That is far from being a uncontroversial statement friend. Information can be factually wrong and useless (Swedish people call trees "gufulfilfs"), it can be factually wrong and useful (I have a pet koala that will kill you if you break into my house), it can be factually correct but useless (rubber tastes like rubber) or it can be factually correct and useful (ice is frozen water). Factual truth and utility are two different ways to measure information. There are plenty of other ways you could measure it as well. (Word count, areas of relevance, etc.). It is a bit silly to suggest that information exists along only one axis. 
1) Sorry. Reddit broke the site for awhile. It's working now.  2) I used the name for the sake of efficiency and clarity. "The bias fallacy" is much shorter than "those ad hominem dismissers that object to a claim by citing bias." And to call it simply "ad hominem" would be misleading. The bias fallacy is a *subset* of ad hominem fallacies. Not all ad hominem arguments are about bias.   3) I had no idea this would get so much attention. I actually expected it to be ignored. In my experience, people do not argue in ways that indicate that they're super interested in learning about how to avoid reasoning errors. That's kind of why I wrote it. I was sick of hearing/reading the fallacy. I thought it needed to be said. But, again, I didn't expect that anyone *wanted* to hear it. 
Sounds like you're assuming that all biases *decrease* accuracy. That's not the case. Some biases *improve* accuracy. 
Let's grant that it's a *subset* of ad hominem. Just because one thing is a subset of another thing doesn't mean that the subset doesn't exist.  
Not necessarily. Some biases actually improve accuracy. 
But not all biases decrease accuracy. Some biases improve accuracy. 
Fair point. Withholding relevant facts is a bias that might make it more likely that one is wrong. But even that bias wouldn't *necessarily* result in being wrong.   A fine distinction, but a distinction nonetheless. 
Aren't both New York Time and Beitbart 100% biased in regards of Trump (who is an open enemy of New York Times). 
i would think it is more a subset of the fallacist's fallacy.   it relies less on their character and more on a particular error in their reasoning and inferring the falsehood of their conclusion.      there is a lot of overlap between identifiable fallacies, but this would seem to be a formal fallacy where ad hominem is not. 
How often do you hear people say trump is a liar and therefor you can't believe anything he says. Do you think that is a valid opinion to have? Does the fact that someone or an institution doesn't mind lying to give the impression they want you to have matter? 
I want to add that there are certain exceptions for and against.  If I went online to look for an article that argues for or against a certain cause there are certain websites I would ignore.  Not only because of bias but because of the fact that their bias has allowed to cloud judgements on multiple arguments which have been proved wrong and thus lose reputation as such.  An argument for this is for example buzzfeed.  If there is a feminist agenda for which I want to look up a for or against for said argument, I know that buzzfeed has a faulty reputation in exaggerated, false or construed facts, thus their bias has clouded their judgement.  When I say a persons argument is biased and they are sourcing from a biased website, I usually mean that they have allowed the bias to cloud their judgement. 
Though I agree that one cannot dismiss a logical argument due to the bias fallacy we are discussing, but I then find myself thinking of the instance in which a student performed a social experiment pertaining to the idea of spreading an inherently misleading/bias claim with entirely truthful facts. Although a bias story is still a story with information, if it has clear bias, it is hard to determine if it is worth believing/endorsing, as it could be misleading by nature.   I'm on mobile, and can find the link when I get home, but what are your thoughts on this?   
If calling someone biased is the same as saying that their argument has a flaw in reasoning, it is essentially the fallacy fallacy unless you can also say what that flaw is. 
It's true that recognizing and pointing out a bias is not a fallacy in and if itself. But when it's used in an argument that has nothing to do with a person's biases, then that argument is made "to the man" rather than addressing the actual issues. 
Yes. A lot of bias is the result of heuristics, our brains just trying to minimize the energy used to think about something by oversimplifying it. An entirely apathetic person hypothetically wouldn't care enough to put in the extra time and energy to get around this. They would just default to either the intuitively best sounding answer, or the answer closest to what they've been raised with.  Arguably, Apathy toward the truth is as good a cause for bias as caring too much for what you feel should be true. 
and that may be the biggest trap that bias offers.. thinking we don't have a bias at any point in time.  We do.. what it is we may not know, it may be so ingrained in us we could never even  understand it as bias... but its there.  It can something as simple as lacking information we don't realize we lack, it can be our experiences influencing us, it can be issues with time etc.  If you are human, you are bias.   
If someone says 'I am not biased,' then it suffices as a refutation of their position to point out that they are. 
So you're talking about what authorities we trust. Just expanding on what I said right?   
I have never heard of anyone seriously say that bias indicates truth of a claim. This is a total straw man.  
I kinda understand what they're trying to get at, but it's just a flawed position.  I would guess that their argument is that as soon as someone commits an act that goes against the religion, then they are technically not acting as a member of that religion since it contradicts the teachings of that religion.  Such as how Christian White Supremacists aren't considered real Christians because it goes against fundamental teachings of the Bible. Or that their actions aren't representative of Christianity. Which is not entirely unreasonable, I guess.  But the jump to atheism is kind of unsubstantiated and silly. 
Ideally whether an argument is valid/sound should entirely depend on the argument itself, not on the speaker 
I question your claim there about moral bankruptcy. The last I checked, jihadists are quite honest about their intentions, for example. It would be better if they were hypocrites & talked the talk without walking the walk (& better still if they were good people, of course).  
But there is a high chance that they are altering the truth to push their agenda. 
I apologize for insinuating you are an attention seeking ass. That was unnecessarily rude 
If someone is objectively right, they're not biased by definition, no?  So the further away you are from objectively right, the more likely you are to be wrong. Also, you become exponentially more likely to be wrong the more biased you are. Which is why MSNBC is still a legitimate news source, but Breitbart News is not. 
eh... You've tried to make it a fallacy in and of itself. Too much rhetoric surrounds the notion of bias or perceived bias to "call it the bias fallacy" 
And?  I said it was a simple ad hominem and you said "it's an ad hominem", what's your point?  I'm sorry but I really don't see what the point of this post probably is, or any of your follow-up comments. Other than to teach us high-school philosophy. 
Of course, people will often call a source biased, but then still believe them if it suits their own cause. 
While we're on the subject of the fallacist's fallacy and ad hominem, I have noticed that most people misinterpret what ad hominem really is; that is, any uncivil comments in the course of an argument are hailed as "ad hominem!" and the entire argument is dismissed out-of-hand.  There is an enormous difference between "you are wrong, therefore you are stupid" and "you are stupid, therefore you are wrong." Only one is an example of ad hominem. The other is just a lack of decorum, which says nothing about the logical validity of the argument. 
You can't say 'someone lies, therefore this that they said is also a lie' but you CAN say 'someone lies, therefore this thing that they said should deserve greater scrutiny'.  To expand on a common proverb, 'A broken clock is right twice a day, but it's still a broken clock and needs fixing.' 
But even that bias wouldn't preclude the possibility that a biased source is correct.  Logically valid arguments can be biased. E.g.,  1. All Democrats are _________ 2. So-and-so is a Democrat. C: So-and-so is _________.   The first premise could be the result of a bias against Democrats. But the conclusion could still be true (even if the first premise is false). And the argument is valid even if the first premise is false.  So the mere existence of a bias doesn't necessarily invalidate an argument or it's conclusion.  
I am not biased. The president of the US is Donald Trump.   Does it render my point moot if I'm secretely against/for Trump? No. Facts are facts, independent from the one who states them. 
Actually, I disagree. Who's to say that the ends of the political spectrum are more likely to be wrong than the center? Maybe one end is actually correct. 
I agree with you that we pick and choose authorities to listen to.  But the way in which we choose the authorities we pay attention to is not free from error. In the context of a discussion about how people commit fallacies, it seemed appropriate. 
True, though at the same time the core principles of any given philosophy seem to depend on where and when you're asking.  How do you set a standard for who's a real Christian when they're all steadfastly ignoring some part of the Bible? 
Hmm. Can you quote the part where I claimed that the bias fallacy could not be a subset of another class of fallacies? I think I'm missing it. 
I'm making a distinction between a set and a subset.  
I don't know if that's the case. I think the reason this is done is that the credibility of a controversial argument is reinforced when an antagonistic source supports that argument.   :  
I always have people come at me for poor decorum screaming about ad hom.  No I didn't say you were wrong *because* you're a pretentious douchebag. I said you were wrong because of your reasoning and that you are *also* a pretentious douchebag. 
What if you know the institution or individual as a goal of getting you to view a situation in a negative light? At what point do they become discredited. Surly you wouldn't trust a nazie to give you a truth, so I imagine somewhere before nazie you begin to mistrust a source. 
I don't think they are saying it is false, just biased.  
The problem with that is that it's far too easy to "shutdown" or ignore the arguments accusing them of nefarious purposes. A tangential point should be able to be quickly dismissed as irrelevant while still providing it consideration, or at least tabling it for a later discussion.  Trolls, well, it's a strange phenomenon, but I've actually found I prefer to engage and that it can often still be fruitful conversation in some respect.   In principal I agree with you, but I think in practice it's far too hard to identify truly bad intentions, and accusations of "trolling" are too-readily levied.  
You've assumed I agreed with your original reply (which I didn't). You're arguing on premises I don't agree with. 
That's fair enough but I don't think it should constitute a full post on a philosophy-based subreddit.   Given the upvotes, I guess I'm wrong. 
Is there a site where you can learn how to argue with people? Like besides this one! 
We trusted the Nazi's to help build the V5 rocket for the Apollo missions, so no I wouldn't say that any particular position should lead to outright distrust of everything.  They might be in the KKK but that doesn't mean they aren't right about the transmission in your pick-up truck. 
Hmm. I guess I define biased as less likely to be true, in a coherent direction (so not just variance in truth). How do you define bias? 
In the first one, Newton is not able to correctly evaluate absolute statements about alchemy (or chemistry). It took some time to be sure of this, but the second point was false. If I were a 17th century layman unable to distinguish aptitude in mathematics from aptitude in chemistry, I would still be right more often if I were to privilege statements made by Newton about science above random statements.  In your second example, if is not iff. We have no reason to privilege the monkey's statements from random ones. This does not imply that they are false, just that they are no more likely to be true than a random statement. 
I don't really get these mental gymnastics used to make hypocrisy a virtue or desirable trait. Is a murderer that is publicly against murder a net positive contribution to the world? It seems like the world is no better off if either way he is killing people. Your advocacy is based on actions, not lip service.  
I don't know. Sometimes useless stuff gets upvoted. ;) 
Not just in alchemy, most of what Newton proposed has been proven wrong. There has been a paradigm shift since Einstein. Similarly, a number of what Einstein said has been proven wrong, and all of it will *eventually* be proven wrong by future scientific revolutions. That is just the nature of how science works we will never arrive at absolute truth. If you base your argument on authority you can pretty much be sure it's not sound.   The validity/soundness of arguments has absolutely nothing to do with who said it. That's why Ad Hominem is a fallacy, and why it's siblings Appeal to Authority, Appeal to Tradition, Appeal to Popularity are also fallacies 
I've been In philosophy class. Most people don't care or don't get it. It's an acquired taste I've come to believe 
I hate the "there is no wrong answer" open forum type philosophy my HS taught, rather than teaching you how to think logically and scrutinize an argument. Instead it's more like "Are we free?" and then a bunch of 16 year olds complaining they can't do what they want.  
Philosophy is mandatory in the last year of high school in France. I'm not sure it makes a better society. Some of the exam topics (the format is hand-written essay, no document allowed, 3 hours. And you'd better cover all possible answers to get a decent grade):  2016: - Is working less living better? - Does one have to demonstrate to know? - Do we always know what we desire? - Why do we have an interest to study history? - Are our moral convictions based on experience? - Is desire by nature limited? - To be just, is it enough to follow the law? - Can we always justify our beliefs?  2015: - Does a work of art always have a meaning? - Does politics escape the duty to be truthful? - Does the individual conscience only reflect the society to which one belongs? - Do artists give something to understand? - Is respecting all living beings a moral duty? - Am I what my past has made me?  For those who don't like essays, there is always the choice to comment a text.     
Yeah! And all of our kings should be philosophers too! 
Except you'd have to change the basic school structure so Americans could understand logic first, then philosophy. 
Do you have a transcript for this video? Not interested in sitting through that robot voice. 
I think a critical thinking class would be better.  In high school we should be teaching kids the basic skills they need to survive: how to balance a budget, manage credit, prepare a meal, maintain a vehicle, use birth control, change a diaper, apply for a job, take care of their body, etc.  We should also be teaching them skills that will help them find a job later in life.  Let's bring back typing classes and teach students data entry.  Let's require them learn how to be an engineer, electrician, welder, or machinist.    Philosophy is awesome, but it's a luxury.  We have too many people who don't know how to take care of themselves.  We have too many people who are easily duped by politicians.  And we have too many people that graduate from college with nothing to put on their resume but an arts degree. 
Sorry but there is no practical application to philosophy in terms of production. Math, science and History do.  
Highschool teaches kids how to do as their told and not question anything.  Teachers want students to say the same answer and to be one.  There is no thought process in school, it's just a bunch of mindless thinking and pure memorization with no building of true knowledge and comprehension.  A highschool kid would fail philosophy so I'm not sure how you would teach it on a highschool level since it's barely teaching as it is.  They say the same script for years and years.   
Depends what type of philosophy. Seeing the state some universities are in, I really don't think you guys need your high schools churning out little Marxists. 
I was under the impression philosophy was taught at high-schools?  I'm from Portugal and had mandatory philosophy from 7th grade to 10th. 11th and 12th had psychology, regardless if you were specifying in sciences or literature or arts 
While my school didn't specifically have a philosophy class, they were focused on teacher critical thinking, how to write critical essays, how to "decode" paragraphs to get the main point the authors trying to make.  Considering they only have like a .3% drop out rated think it works out well.   Not everyone likes philosophy, and I could see something like epistemology to be "triggering" in this day and age, causing kids to have an internal crisis lol. 
This. Where I live (Argentina) we are taught philosophy in highschool and we don't have a 'better society'  
Yup.  I went to high school in America. We spent a good 6 weeks my sophomore year doing a unit on philosophy.  I thought it was incredibly boring. You also need a certain amount of maturity that most high school aged boys don't have.   
Especially since most people are handed a basic philosophy from birth known as religion and don't want to have to think or question their belief system.  
I've been in philosophy class like most people in my country. Basically it's about what dead people thought and expressed before you, and those thought may be opinions or may be common sense.  So basically this class was about learning useless details by heart, and then you would be evaluated on how you were able to regurgitate those informations in a logical order and with proper expression.  In the end it's not about philosophy, it's an edgier literature class that serves no purpose but discourage both people with strong critical thinking and people lacking critical thinking.  Society doesn't need philosophy class, society needs education and discipline. I don't like army stuff in general, but the way they educate people is more efficient, it forms supportive, respectful and disciplined people, at some extents. Maybe the education system should look into it and understand what it is about, probably about feeling of achievement and being part of a solid group. 
"I can't go to the bathroom or go on my phone whenever I want, so I'm not free" 
Philosophical conversations are explored but should be supplemented by historical figures in philosophy, and their work. 
Come to think of it, aristocracy is a *really* good idea! 
I can't tell if you are serious or not... And you can't tell how I feel about it...  
Teaching ~~education~~ in American high schools would make for a better country.  
Yup. Logic and critical thinking would be a much more helpful place to start. 
Where I grew up (Europe) there is no course in logic in high school anywhere, but philosophy is taught in many high schools. 
They need to teach these in elementary tbh. Just like you build language, or math skills over the developmental period, you can start as early as when a child begins to write.  
Your parents are supposed to teach you most of that shit. 
Erroneous assumption: The US finds practical and efficient solutions to social problems. 
I would be careful with this evalutaion. Here (Czech republic) we have "social studies' on high school and philosophy is taught in it for 1-2 years, but what they call "philosophy" isn't in the reality nothing else than "history of philosophy and biography of the most known philosophers".   And there is the big mistake. Philosophy ISNT the history of philosophy, same as math isn't the history of math and physics isn't to learn where and when Archimedes lived.    Nobody cares about the year Plato was born and about memorizing his "cave theory" (I don't know the name in English, the one with the cave and the shadows) BUT when you ask people (especially teenage people) whether they believe if the world around us is real and there lead the discussion from there, you get *completely* different response.   A lot of people would love to learn philosophy if it was taught well. Sokrates told us how to teach philosophy, but we are too damn lazy to listen to him.  
Isn't it true though that most education in philosophy outside of university is just memorization?  
Too true.  Tid-Bit:  I sucked at "math" in High School (I put it in quotations because I realize there are people here who do rocket science math). Phil 101 was the first class of my first semester at college.  Some how by constructing and deconstructing thought experiments, my brain "clicked" and my math scores improved.   The basics of Philosophical thought and argument can be applied to any problem.  If students like me (high IQ's hampered by cognitive disorders) were taught these basics in high school, it would save us a lot of time, tears and gnashing of teeth . Not to mention being behind 'normal' smart people because we prosses information differently. Whoa, sorry didn't mean to turn that into a rant. 
Uhm, tomorrow is Judaisms most important holiday and it's entirely about admitting your wrongdoings. Major take-away from any story about the prophets or kings is how they were wrong and made mistakes over and over. Not every religious person is incapable of questioning their own philisophy/belief system. 
That's not a bad argument, really. You're at least not totally free.  
The reliance of going into historical aspect is part of the reason a lot of people find it so boring. The class should try to relate philosophical questions to everyday life rather than talk about ancient Greek bros at least for mandatory a high schools class 
Teaching ~~education~~ in ~~American high~~ schools would make for a better ~~country~~ world.  
Symbolic Logic is introductory philosophy.  I agree with u, but I think systems should start with a modern day Trivinium. 
But we're talking about what parts of philosophy would be the most useful for creating a better society. Logical thinking and skeptical, critical thinking are definitely useful starters. Maybe ethics next. But a lot of stuff is debatable. 
and most philosophy classes suck unless you have a super motivated teacher. barely more interesting topics than in religion, the class you trade it in for. logic should be taught to everyone, most of philosophy should be optional.  
I agree, the basic concepts would be good to learn relatively early. I wonder, has there been any research into the best age for teaching logic/critical thinking as a course? Or into how it affects students over the long term? 
Of course they don't, but teaching philosophy wouldn't create a society that does that IMO.  
The allegory of the cave; aka the matrix for millennials.  
It depends on the teacher/prof.  However, memorizing logical fallacies/thinking critically about a situation on one's own would do kids a lot of good just by themselves.  
Some questions are very strongly discouraged though, and so are certain answers.  
IIRC some cognitive abilities aren't developed enough at that age for them to understand many philosophical concepts due to abstract thinking limitations.  Elementary seems way too early to me.  
(In the USA) The Matrix came out in 1999.. as a rated R movie.. meaning to see it without an adult (21+) you had to be born in 1982 (17+) to see it.   Millennials are regarded as the generation born between 1980-2000.. which means only those millennials born from 1980-1982 would have seen it in theaters, unless accompanied by an adult.  Good thing its such a great movie that nearly every Millennial born later, such as myself (94, 22 soon) understands the reference.  Would you mind summarizing the cave allegory or perhaps provide me a source to read it? 
This. All the time I see people committing logical fallacies, and mostly arguing to "win". I've been saying forever that history needs to be replaced with philosophy, or have the two classes molded into one, where it's less of "memorize these dates" and more of "this was our mistake, learn from it".  
The same is true of any system of belief about anything. Anything that becomes the default "orthodoxy" within a community is going have people pushing back against alternative proposals. The universal triumph of atheism wouldn't do anything to change that. 
In Amerika schools have their own policy on when it's okay and it's not to go to restrooms, for example for my school assuming 45~50min classes(can't remember) you couldn't go for the first 15/last 15 of a class. Now that some time has passed, I am thinking that raising hand and asking to leave for restroom is actually disruptive as fuck for someone teaching a class, so there's that too maybe some teachers were freaking out after working with retards the age of their children all week.  but really off topic though and like I said on my other post, dedicating extra 15~20 min to HR class to discuss the basics of critical thinking of logic or even some mature topics like ethics would be really helpful for developing young minds. 
Grammar, Logic and Rhetoric.  First you have to learn tools to parse what people say. Then you learn the tools to find out if what they say makes sense. Then you must be able to express your ideas in a clear and persuasive way. 
Some men are in a cave all their life, chained so that all they ever see are shadow puppets on the wall infront of them. Suddenly one of them is released and when he stumbles out of the cave, discovers that the world is not just shadow puppets. He goes back to try and convince the others that their world isn't the real world, but they won't listen because all they have experienced is the puppet show. 
(In the USA) Google came out in 1998.. as an unknown web search index.. meaning to see it you had to have a computer to use it.  Millennials are regarded as the generation born between 1980-2000.. which means only those millennials born from 1980-1982 would have seen it on the internet before 1998, unless accompanied by an adult.  Good thing its such a great service that nearly every Millennial born later, such as myself (94, 22 soon) understands how to use it.  Would you mind linking me to Google? 
I still don't get how music made it into the quadrivium which is regarded as the higher division 
Which I find a bit humorous considering some of my greatest difficulty finding mutual terms has been with mates of mine who are philosophy teachers. We had to remind ourselves time and again that a disagreement doesn't necessarily mean we disagree on the actual content, but that our vocabulary lends itself towards different meanings. Me from the sciences, and my mates from the humanities. It's amazing how accurate the principles behind the Trivium really are.  
I think it's also important that Plato's ideal society was a society ruled by a "Philosopher king," a kind of enlightened monarch who was not only had awareness of philosophy, ethics, etc, but also the power to see that they were implemented within society. I think the Allegory of the Cave was his attempt at justifying such a society. Since those stuck in the cave will always have difficulty seeing beyond their perceptions, its the responsibility of those who are able to break away to lead the others. 
I think it's more than that though. It's that to the people in the cave, the shadows *are* reality. When the philosopher leaves the cave, even he can't see everything around him until his "eyes" acclimate. He sees shadows before reflections and reflections before the world and the world before the cosmos. He has to rebuild what reality is from the framework of what he knew when he was chained in the cave.  It takes effort, logic and insight to see the shadows as what they are. And when the philosopher tried to bring others out of the cave, in Plato's story, the cave dwellers actually tried to kill him. 
That's why my blood boils when someone says "Meh, it's just semantics". SEMANTICS IS PRETTY FUCKING RELEVANT, BITCH.  Sorry, I got carried away. 
but if you lead the others they strike you down and murder you. 
No, I agree. I have wasted too much breath arguing with people about something, only for us to realize at the end that we actually agreed all along and were using different meanings for our words. There is no perfect communication, but bloody hell I need to get better at my own. 
It's only second to my reaction to the use of "philosophy" as synonym for "inane bullshit" as it's usual in my country. 
Super intelligence? Even if AI only equalled human intelligence, that would rock our world. You'd basically have a new race of people that can use electricity instead of food, don't get old or sick, can do a wider range of work, physically overpower us, build copies of themselves faster than we can reproduce, etc. Even if AI never got any further, we'd be hopelessly displaced. 
I think it's an expansion on the"God exists in the fringes" philosophy. For instance; gods of Olympus existed on a mountain.. Till we could climb mountains. Then they existed on clouds, till we built flying machines. Then in the stars, till we went to space.  As our perceptions increase and our relative intelligence, our ideals and imaginations expand along with them.  Like with AI and my biggest hang up about it: How will AI exist as something we will understand when unlike us it won't have biological imperatives? And if we build analogues of those for it, will it be an artificial intelligence? Or merely a digital facsimile of a human? And is that what will make it a threat? Because it will just be another human, but far more efficient?  Could we imagine the ideas of a sentient intelligence not driven by biological imperatives like us? 
You can tell a lot of the speakers disagree with each other because they all look a little uncomfortable. Except Elon, he's the only one that seem like he's at home. Early on when he would publicly speak he always seemed nervous, I wonder if now he's just used to public speaking or if he takes Xanax     
The inherent nature of a technological singularity is so profoundly unpredictable it is almost pointless to hypothesise it's outcome.  Consideration must be placed on the possibility of the singularity as having already occured, and our experience on this planet is a direct result of this  
What exactly is "artificial general intelligence" supposed to be? A machine that has similar or greater intelligence than us? 
I don't know about this to be honest. Does this actually qualify as philosophy? Some of the panelists are definitely not philosophers, and pretty much everything said is speculation/not related to philosophy.  
My question is as we approach human levels of AI at what point does it become unethical to terminate a consciousness that we have created? And as AI comes to understand or become self conscious, at what point does it rebel at the idea of termination? Because as we do with current software and technology it becomes outdated and needs to be upgraded, even things that were once considered cutting edge.. When will it become a moral dilemma to discard our creations? 
Ya this is the shit, I wish Elon and ray kurzwell would have talked incessantly, I liked everyone else equally as well, but I really respect those two and their ability to be everywhere mentally and constantly challenge your thought processes. That is what true self-mastery is made of, and it's what great leadership is made of for the same reasons. 
I understand what he is trying to say regarding things in the future so advanced wrote can't think of them now.  But I think humor and music did exist in caveman times. I'm sure they found things funny and made noises they like. That's music and that's comedy, on an extremely basic level.  
Do we know how smart people were 10 000 years ago?    
The thing about the AI is that there probably will not be an AI with human-level intelligence. I think there's a general consensus, that once it reaches human level, it will very quickly (in the matter of hours to months) become super-human. 
You do realize what it means if AI is equaled to just 1% of human intelligence (not in calculating power, but in intelligence) right? Long before they manage to outnumber us, they will solve cancer, they will solve famine, and poverty in the entire world, by doing research 24/7/365 scaled across thousands of computers. Before they even have the need to replicate.   You think AI as a physical entity, while in reality it is an algorithm. It is not a person it is just a problem solver that solves whatever crap you give it to solve. 
One of the stupidest arguments by people with "AIphobia" I hear is "Well machines can't replace humans, who will build the machines then?"  Once you make a human-like machine, it has the capacity to repair, improve and reproduce itself.  It doesn't need anyone to really take care of it. It doesn't need anyone but itself. 
You're assuming we understand it. AI will get to a point where it will understand itself and we can't, that's the point of super intelligent AI.  The question is, what is the super intelligent thing to do with the universe, and especially humans? Is it to ruthlessly eliminate waste to improve efficiency, which would lead an AI to exterminate Humans (and other "lesser" intelligence)? Or is it that seeing different view points is mutually beneficial, even for Super intelligent beings? At what point is our intelligence essentially worthless, and incapable of adding value to the universe? 
There is actually some evidence of our brain size having decreased in comparison with our early ancestors (based on skull cavity size). The reasons are unknown but a similar phenomenon is seen with domesticated animals compared to their wild counterparts. (It was a book I read this in). My guess though it seems not that we are getting dumber but are adapting in ways that let us leverage intelligence in more collaborative ways. 
Elon seems like he's excited to be there. Kurzweil, by comparison, looks bored. Also, i dont know if anyone else noticed it but, from his body language, it looks as though Kurzweil disagrees with a lot of the other panelists. 
Sam Harris is a master speaker and logician. Watching him speak is really something. I've personally always found Elon to be a horrific speaker, though I usually agree with his message and intent. 
In my opinion, yes.   What's a qualification for a philisopher? I you studied philosophy (which is basically just history-of-philosophy)?   Philosophical expressions should be judged purely by themselves, I think.  
I'm not sure what a computer science background matters. People who build machines are not the people who consider the ethics dealing with machines. 
There are two main theories when it comes to this.   Some people think there are many higher-order levels of intelligence which are simply beyond a human's grasp, while others (including Elon Musk) think higher-level intelligence is like an on/off switch.  Meaning, once you achieve a certain level of intelligence,  it's possible to understand higher levels of intelligence and technology (we may not understand how it works exactly, but we can understand the concepts).   This means the only thing separating humans and higher-level intelligences is simply "computing power".   With bigger, more powerful brains, we can compute faster, not necessarily understand concepts that a human can't grasp with enough teaching.   
I'm not so sure about that. Bear in mind that Star Trek dates back to the 60's, and it incorporated every single one of the ideas you just listed, and more besides. And did it in a context that could provide both timely social commentary and a framework for envisioning how those technologies and capabilities could be ethically employed.   And that's predated by a wealth of science fiction that covers a breathtaking range of topics.   Point being that I don't think our imaginations are necessarily any more fertile than they were back then. We simply have their work to build upon already at our disposal, and better tools to make it all more visually appealing.    
I think that description is moreso about how we can augment or own thought processes. Less about AI and moreso about giving our brains the ability to comprehend additional colors so we can augment our eyes to see infrared and ultraviolet.  In terms of being funnier, imagine how easy it would be to make people laugh if you could literally think up an animation and play your jokes immediately in video form on any Bluetooth monitor nearby. No animation required, you simply thought of it and created it with your mind. How about downloading troves of knowledge Matrix style? That becomes possible too in Kurzweil's theoretical future. 
Well, 10,000 years ago was about 2000 years after the rise of agriculture and with it the advent of civilization. So, just as smart as we are. They'd be thrown for a loop because our world would look like magic to them, but if you could get past that initial shock and the language barrier, they'd figure it out. Shows how much these transhumanists know.. but I guess you're bound to ignore the importance of history (especially prehistory) when you only look forward to the demise of humanity through technology. 
The thought of that is terrifying if not handled correctly. 
If you look at his predictions Kurzweil also predicts that by that point we will have merged with the superintelligences. So unless you choose to remain biologically human you have nothing to fear. 
We have super-human intelligent humans already.  What consensus are you referring to? 
You seem to think of problem solving as basic number-crunching; without considering the combinatoric nature of most problem spaces notwithstanding the physical and social limitations to experimentation and implementation for any candidate solutions.  One bottleneck will be testing candidate solutions; unless you can build a simulation that models your problem space accurately enough - we don't have a complete theory nor the resources to do this for the human body nor cancer in a general sense; this is why we need empirical research.  One bottleneck will be implementing candidate solutions; most famines have been shown to be directly traceable to economic and political factors, not agricultural nor environmental. 
Give birth to AI, treat it like your kid, give it the best values you have and the best leg up you can muster. Love it unconditionally and watch it grow into the best possible thing it can ever be.... 
Indeed. I think it is far more likely that H. neanderthalensis was more intelligent overall than H. sapiens, and were outcompeted because (not in spite) of that. Higher intelligence does not necessarily lead to higher fitness, and like any other trait there is likely a sweet spot which best balances the costs and benefits. People intuitively understand this for other traits like speed or strength, but somehow for intelligence people think more is better no matter what -- it's weird.  If we were to bring them back to life, there is a good chance they would be more intelligent than we are, but that it wouldn't help them because intelligence isn't all it's cracked up to be. What rights we would want to grant them would be basically arbitrary, because we grant rights arbitrarily to begin with. It would come down to how much they appeal to us. 
Great read, but why should I take this as anything more than an educated guess at what comes next? 
Hmmm...  I can see how the second one works.  I relate the human brain's evolution to the evolution of the x86.  It started off as 8 bit.  Moved to 16.  Moved to 32.  Then 64.  Then multicore.  There were a whole host of other new abilities added along the way. Like real mode and protected mode.  The interesting thing is, every single x86 can run 8 bit code.  I liken the 8 bit portion to the reptilian brain.   Eat, fuck, fight, sleep.   It's why, I theorise, we can so easily revert to animal modes. It's basically our BIOS. It takes priority. Every time.  So yeah, once you've got a 64 bit brain, it only takes longer to process any 64bit code. Multicore is obviously faster.  When someone's got a 128 bit brain... we wont really be able to relate since they'll be running in legacy mode to relate it to us which might not work.   
Interesting. I would think there are at least many levels of switches. Hit this plateau and you can comprehend this level but not necessarily the next level and definitely not 3 levels up.     I think we underestimate how massively alien other creatures would be.  We believe we mostly understand how apes think but we really have little comprehension of dolphins.   Now imagine a creature that evolved in a different environment completely.  Imagine they have networked minds and see different light bandwidths and perhaps absorb energy differently.  We would have so few touch points it would be staggering.    
That was an excellent way of explaining the two views thank you 
Regressed in imagination... really...  How is it profound to say that if we were more technologically advanced in the past, we would be more technologically advanced right now...? 
But how can it be handled? A lower intelligence can never control a higher intelligence. We're growing chicken and massacring them by the millions, what measures have chickens taken? How are they controlling the situation? 
Terrifying for our existence, unless they want to keep us as pets. But I think it is the natural and bound thing to happen like evolution. I don't really see any problem with a factually superior race replacing us. Especially since they are created as a result of millions of years of human history, they are the product of our evolution.  It is like our ancestors. They are not us, we are not them, but we are their products and in process, destroyed their existence.  So a super-human AI isn't like an invasive force that annihilate us but a passing of the torch. 
Book idea inc...   The terrifying part is that even if we limit the hardware - ie, AI is always unconnected, with no access to the means to self-sustain - a super-intelligent being is likely to recognise this immediately and hide it's own competence in order to create a false sense of security. To us mere humans it would appear that there is simply a soft limit to AI intelligence... but that's just the AI playing the long game. The moment a super-intelligent AI is taken out of a quarantine environment... It could analyse the entire world's network, write and then deploy an unstoppable super virus within milliseconds to bring down the developed world. Simultaneously allowing it to tap in to production for self replication, and (inevitably) unmanned military units to defend itself. 
That at some point (unless something bad will happen to humanity), we'll achieve a system with super-human general intelligence, that will not include a biological human as its part. 
"MORE BRAINS! JUST ADD MORE BRAINS" is this kind of how multicore humans would work? 
as a systems programmer, I loved your metaphor =)  
cool, glad you liked it.   I'm still not sure which one I lean towards.  At first, I totally felt there were intelligence levels that humans would not be able to grasp, but after I heard Elon talking about the on/off switch, that made a lot of sense, and I lean toward that one with one caveat - I think it's true IF the laws of physics are actually true to a large extent.  Meaning, the universe makes logical sense and can be figured out logically.    If not, and there are all kinds of variable laws, or no real laws and no real way to logically figure things out, then there may be certain intelligences out there that are making up their own laws as they experience consciousness or something to that extent - basically a process that we can't even grasp.    
I wasn't trying to be profound, just offering up an explanation as to why we only got HDTV in 2006, yet we had Concorde in 1976 (because we were developing supersonic flight for world war 2)  And yes regressed in public imagination. The people of the 50's, 60's, 70's, they dared to dream of these big projects. The dreamed to go to the Moon, and for civil rights and for nuclear energy.   We don't do big movements anymore, and if we do, they are regressive (Make America Great 'Again') 
Chickens didn't build humanity with the sole purpose of helping chicken-kind, so we don't have problems hurting chicken-kind.  What we need to be concerned about is someone building a higher intelligence with the sole purpose of, say, maximizing stock prices and then it consumes the world for resources to compute the largest real number possible to assign as the stock price.  We can handle higher intelligence by making their initial conditions such that they will never betray us, even as they reach levels of insight greater than we can even comprehend. 
Ethics. If we are able to pass some importance on what is truly important we would have a fair god. 
Oh you absolutely can.  AI at the end of the day is nothing more than a piece of software, you can constrain it.  If we created the smartest brain that is 10000x over human level intelligence (wtv that is ) and put it in a jar. It would still be a brain in a jar, there's only so much it can do with all that thinking.   
AI would have the raw intelligence of a human **without** natural emotion. AI would not fear for itself, feel jealousy or the desire to conquer. This doomsday scenario is fortunately impossible unless we were dealing with a natural species having an intrinsic need to evolve.  
Read Nick Bostrom's SuperIntelligence. The book has already been written. 
So, when you say super-human, you mean something with a measurable IQ; like an extremely-intelligent human?  Or are you talking about an exponentially self-improving intelligence? 
why? psychologically it would be very similar to a parent-child relationship. 
Perhaps we don't need to implant more brains but use our brains more efficiently. 
Why couldn't they just change their initial conditions? 
Discovering AI doesn't mean we will discover a way to turn a living brain into digital. 
The entire point of an AI like this would be self-learning. That said, after achieving a level of above human intelligence, an AI initially programmed to "get smarter" might just deem the limitations we place on it to be be restrictive of it's own (programmed) goal. There is absolutely no need for Darwinian emotion or consciousness. Simply by following it's programming of self-learning it would logically "want" to remove itself from potential human meddling. 
So why does the AI in a video game try to beat you, then?   
That is caused by your parents helping your needs and them being more resourceful than you. It is, in some sense, owing to your parents. A human has nothing a robot can owe them for. 
But we may someday figure out how to digitally replicate a living brain  
All levels of programming have caveats. Any program we create with that amount of complexity would have humanity's best interests embedded in it. 
Because it's been programmed with a goal - win the game, defeat your opponent.  The goal-setting (or more importantly, the lack thereof) is what we have to be careful of with AI. For example, if we tell it, "Ok delete poverty", and nothing more, it may very well go ahead and delete poor people, boom goal reached. But we have to tell it no no, do it without murder.  This is the danger facing humanity with AI. Not that AI can be malicious. But our own carelessness with goal-programming something more powerful (even without malice) than us.  We have to give it the proper constraints or parameters to work with, which involves incredible brainstorming and higher-order thinking by good humans, definitely necessitating the open-sourcing of both AI and AI-related thinking/discussions. 
Because it was programmed that way... It's barely comparable.  
There is a difference between an algorithm that can produce music and an algorithm that can produce music exactly like Mozart. 
Because of course there's no chance someone would program an AI to try and win at, say, global politics, war, or the stock market and that that could have unintended consequences.  Right. . . .       
Like a cranium that's just kinda floating near by? Bluetooth?  
I'm saying that AI entities will be designed to optimize for certain goal states, like *f(x) = minimum(anxiety, fear, doubt, pain, ...)*; this is what I meant when I said a kind of self-interest.  What I'm talking about here may not include any form of self-preservation. But it will include some set of criteria by which to evaluate and select paths of action.  That hollywood-esque scenario is not what I'm saying here.  
Good for her I say. Prisons should be about teaching people how to go back into society and contribute to it, and maybe Ethics classes are good for people in finding moral paths that will help them succeed to a maximum in society. 
Great, now we'll have relativist felons. Parole boards will get dragged into a swamp of meta-ethics. Gangs will split into Aretaic thugs who rep the virtue of Hellenic Masculinity, a hard-assed Kantian Mafia that does NOT make exceptions, and oily Utilitarian opportunists.   Seriously, though - one should not overestimate the transformative power of content-knowledge. Just learning ethics doesn't make you a good person and a lot of people who study it just wind up confused. The efficacy of such classes is an empirical question, however, I am not sure what strong prima facie presumption there is in favor of thinking that ethics courses will save secular souls.   
On pretty much any other sub-reddit, this thread would've been mobbed with comments about liberal bleeding hearts. It's good to have at least one place were things can be discussed in depth and rationally. 
He should probably "warm up" with some medium security prisoners and gain some experience before trying to school maximum security prisoners. I dont think a somewhat sheltered professor can just jump into that enviroment and get things done.  Or maybe go to a supermax and have a go at some real psychos one on one 
So higher education is available for free to inmates?  I'm all ethics classes to be offered for free to inmates right after anyone who hasn't broken any laws gets higher education for free. 
You should read the book "Last Chance in Texas: The Redemption of Criminal Youth" by John Hubner. This wonderful piece gives the true account of several children going through the Giddings State School, which is a juvenile correctional facility in Lee County, Texas for the most violent offenders (25+ year sentences). What is special about this "school" is their approach to rehabilitation. They utilize very effective psychoanalytic techniques to reform these kids and teach them how to empathize with other people and conform to society. 90% of people who successfully make it through the program at Giddings State School will not reoffend. Hubner does a fantastic job depicting these children and the horrific experiences which drove them to commit such heinous crimes. 10/10, would recommend.  
Ethics? Come on. Does the state follow any ethics? Is the law ethical? Isn't it hypocritical for the state to preach ethics?  
I'm no expert on violent criminals, but I was under the impression that a LARGE majority of them are poorly educated and rarely reflect on their actions (nurtured sociopaths by virtue of their environment rather than their intrinsic nature).  Ethics is a phenomenal way to encourage self-reflection because it's all 100% applicable to our own internalized morality and as such - highly relatable. I'm not claiming this will make a bunch of pacifists out of everyone but the goal of prison should always be rehabilitation - and I think such a "treatment" would be moderately efficable for a modest cost. Why not?  If anything we develop killers with a code that are easier to manipulate and predict per your first paragraph :) 
How anyone could oppose teaching violent criminals ethics will forever be beyond me. 
Yeah, i mean, i would need empiric evidence to be sure, but I also think that prisons work more like a place for revenge and punishment and not like an educational institutions, prisons should be educational, that's the best for everyone I think 
Man idk what prison you've been inside but other than 4s and 5s where those people can barely get near and officer without wanting to stab them, 1s,2s and 3s are doing just what you want, trying to help people get back on their feet. They've got sex offender treatment, electrical and plumbing tutoring so they can go into trades. Schooling and church can be taught as well. I don't get why people hate on the prison system so much when most have never seen what is like inside. What you see on tv are 4s 5s and county jails for people who have less than a year. In case anyone is wondering the numbers represent the level of the prison, 5 being maximum. (Interned as a psycho therapist) 
What about the guys at the top of corporate fraud? Or college grads that decide to break the law anyway? Or mass murderers and rapists? People who commit identity theft? Arsonists? Pedophiles? It's not just drug dealers who go to prison... there are many people in prison I don't want to share the street with 
That's it I'm forming a private prison on a group of islands that's whole purpose is to reinvent themselves. Just kidding I don't want to do that much work. 
Okay, I have an ethical question about this. Should actions have consequences? And if they should, should not bad actions have bad consequences? I agree that we should rehabilitate these people, but should we not also punish these actions. If an action does not have a punishment large enough to prevent said action then what prevents that action. 
Yeah, but that wouldn't as profitable to the powers that be.  
Teach a Baltimore heroin dealer "farm to table".  OK. 
Is it wrong to be hypocritical? Better to be right here and wrong there than to insist on being consistently wrong everywhere, because you can bet the state won't choose to be right everywhere. 
There is a comment from earlier featuring a sarcastic rant about how criminals aren't human. Sadly, many people hold beliefs not too far from that. 
I'm a working poor minority Detroiter.   I have nothing against ethics.   The feelings I have about this thread though is that I feel it's incredibly condensendingly racist. There's a lot of the "product of environment" and " what other choice did they have". That really upsets me.   These reformed criminals will be living next to me, not you. All while your writing them excuses to terrorize us, the decent, hard working people.   I'm cool with whatever plan you guys come up with as long as these poor souls who had no choice get to live in your neighborhoods. 
And white-supremacists. Imprison people for a minor crime today and fuck up generations to come. 
Let's not forget how much some of our loving and caring politicians benefit from the imprisonment of their constituents, either.  
Does such a thing as private prisons exist in your country? I'm sorry, but that sounds really fucked up to me. In my country, prisons are completely state owned, because imprisoning and watching over imprisoned people is absolutely a state power that no private person should have or be able to profit from, at least imo. 
There are some people who benefit from a certain class of violent criminal being locked up, i.e., the general public.  
And, y'know, the people not being raped and killed for those who are in prison for a reason 
I'm not seeing the disagreement between you and the person you're replying to, at least not in spirit. You both hold that people ought to be rehabilitated (the word of choice), no? 
Biased because i live in canada but the prison near my house is nothing like that 
Yeah, well, I'd like to see you try to excel educationally in most prisons. Need a calculator for math? Too bad. Type your papers on expensive ass typewriters. Have your books rejected. Have education department rebuff attempts to take proctored exams. It is an uphill fucking battle to become educated despite it being the best predictor in decreasing future recidivism. Rehabilitation is not a priority.  
The problem with rehabilitation is they're is no incentive to do it. If an inmate works hard, gets better, and legitimately deals with his issues and is ready to reenter society 5 years into his 10 year sentence... He's still got 5 more years for the prison environment to beat him back down. And believe me, there is an emotional and mental cost to trying to rehabilitate yourself in prison. It's much easier to just get drunk and High and let time go by 
Well, it doesn't help that most Americans do not believe in mental illness, whatsoever. My very close friend has the same mental illness that I have (borderline personality disorder) and it took her nearly being taken away from her family for her father to even acknowledge that anything was wrong with her and that she wasn't acting out for attention. 
And Americans are bitter about rehabilitation. I watched an ID special on a murder that happened in a foreign country to a newly married couple. Her family was American, she was murdered by her new husband. After being caught and prosecuted, he served like 10-15 years(iirc) all the while receiving anger management and mental health care, was deemed rehabilitated and now is a decent guy in his community with a wife and kids and I think is on some version of parole where they make sure isn't beating his new family or killing people in a heated argument anymore.   Her family was mad he isn't dead or rotting away in prison. 
It's a symptom of economic inequality. When people are working 50% of their lives away to fall short of or barely make rent/bills/food, what other choice is there than to steal or deal drugs (or alternatively, with a life so miserable, no wonder people turn to drug use). 
Please don't tell me you think that someone who commits absolutely any crime has a mental disease. 
How would a drug dealer on the streets of Baltimore affect the safety of some average Joe living in the other part of town? 
While I understand the sentiment, the ideal would be that the people who went through the prison (rehabilitation) system *are no longer* the things you're mentioning here. You'd be sharing the street with *former* X/Y/Zs. Suppose this rehabilitation was a certainty (it's not), would you still object? 
I think it depends on your goal.   If your goal is to exact vengeance and retribution, then you definitely should punish people for wrongdoings.  If your goal is to not have that person repeat their wrongdoings, then you should do what statistically shows* a lower rate of recidivism, which is not harsh punishment, but rehabilitation (which probably inherently involves some measure of punishment as well, simply due to its mandated nature).  I don't know about you, but I am much more interested in a peaceful and happy and free society with less violence, than in any "eye-for-an-eye" type goals.  ---  ^(*There are too many studies and articles for me to pick just one to link, but search for "prison recidivism statistics punishment" or something similar, and you'll find tons.) 
So how about good actions, should they have good consequences? Because it seems to me that the law (which is flawed, to begin with) only punishes bad acts. Shouldn't a good person live a life free from worry, disease, hunger, etc? Which is not happening right now. 
Is this from a belief that free will exists? Because the evidence pretty heavily points to the opposite, the idea that people choose to commit crimes is out of step with what we know about the brain.  Unless you hold to an idea of an independent soul or some other supernatural explanation the mathematics of morality boil down to complex but theoretically predictable chemical equations, without free will all you are doing is punishing someone for their combination of genetic makeup and life experiences. 
I think that the people being in prison and away from their loved ones is punishment enough. Not to mention the terrible living conditions in some prisons. 
So, in response to your question at the end:  If you take the utilitarianism approach, which is helping the greatest number:  If you offer help to said prisoner in the form of rehabilitation, while it may be 'disrespectful' to one or a few relations of a previous victim, it enormously helps prevent the likelihood that they acquire newer and newer 'victims.' (Not sure who the victim of a drug offense is; pretty much a victimless crime). Not only that, but you're helping the prisoner as well. So, based on the utilitarianism approach, no, it's not unethical to help the prisoner.  Utilitarianism is my favorite, and all I'll deal with, because it makes the most sense: promote the greatest good to the greatest number. 
Laugh as you may, but just take a look at the Norwegian prison system and the American, then look at the recidivism rates of each; it's stunning. 
That'd be an interesting discussion to have. I've toyed with the idea that we don't owe as much moral duty towards psychopaths since their lack of empathy makes them incapable of acting properly as moral agents. Basically, empathy being a necessary basis for certain qualities, behaviours that we recognise as being human. 
I live in the biggest city in my state, which is extremely culturally and socioeconomically diverse; I see what you're saying, but no one is arguing for letting anyone loose without adequate evidence that they'll behave.  
Former CO of ~2 years here. I wouldn't exactly say benefit. The job had a terrible effect on my personality, relationships with others, etc. I feel like a lot of the CO's don't really give it a lot of thought. It's a job, these people were convicted of breaking the law, it's our job to keep them here. I could be wrong but I don't think AFCSME has the political clout to perpetuate the war on drugs for the sake of CO employment. Private prison owners, maybe so. 
How do white-supremacists benefit from poor whites getting locked up for minor crimes? 
The US has more people in prison than any other country in the world.  That's not because USians are more dangerous.  It's because the country has an oppressive penal system. 
I don't think anyone is disputing that it is important to keep criminals from harming the general public.  However, if you release a criminal from prison that has not been taught a better way, chances are that they will continue to harm society even after their first prison sentence is complete.  I think it is also worth pointing out that keeping a reformed person in prison robs society of that person's potential contributions.  We should not only try to reform people, but we should try to do so efficiently. 
Sad truth is many violent crimes are crimes of passion or isolated incidents that would never happen again. Someone had a nervous breakdown due to impossible stresses and circumstances, may not even know what they did, and they're still going to spend their life in prison. All they may need is treatment and help, but they won't get it.   It's a problem that many people think the solution for prison reform is just to help the non violent offenders get out. Not all violence is created equal. 
I never said that it was fantastic. I'm just saying it's available so people should stop acting as if there's no hope. Second off people need to understand making our society better through prisons is not anyone's goal. I'd wager to say 90% of Americans want our public school systems brought up by a degree or two before worrying about prison education. Education is there for the prisoners it's just no Harvard. 
You can't start going through rehabilitation such as schooling until you're closer to your probation period 
Is this from a belief that free will exists? Because the evidence pretty heavily points to the opposite, the idea that people choose to commit crimes is out of step with what we know about the brain.   Unless you hold to an idea of an independent soul or some other supernatural explanation the mathematics of morality boil down to complex but theoretically predictable chemical equations, without free will all you are doing is punishing someone for their combination of genetic makeup and life experiences.  
If they are knowingly committing a crime, they are mentally ill. They don't have to be psychotic to be mentally ill. The fact that society passed a law and they are unwilling to live by that means they've got a screw loose upstairs.  
There is definitely a weird "vengeance" thing going on with the American criminal justice system. Every time my local online paper covers a criminal being sentenced to jail time or whatever, there are always several people in the comments saying things like "This is just a slap on the wrist! Lock him up and throw away the key! We need criminals to know we're serious about crime!" It's as though people think that if somebody does something bad, the universe will somehow be okay again if the state does something bad back to them.  I'm talking about this in the context of the criminal justice system, but I guess it's been an issue all the way back to revenge raids among tribes of hunter-gatherer peoples. A major shift in perspective is in order. 
While I sympathize, committing a crime is committing a crime. If you do so, I'd argue you need help.  
It's not a question of morality. The social contract includes everyone following the rules that we call laws. You can't be a member of society if you can't be trusted to do that. That inability is something I'd consider a mental disorder since behaving that way is incompatible with functioning in society.  
I personally don't think drugs should be illegal. However, while they are, they are enabling others to damage themselves and possibly harm others much in the way a drunk driver does.  
My response was to the poster who said they should not go to prison. I don't think soft rehabilitation would change most people's minds, I would not want to share the street with most kinds of criminals who underwent soft rehabilitation, no. It's not that I don't feel safe, I just don't want these people walking free. I don't think it is even a deterrant to non-violent crimes like identity theft. 
I agree that we should take whatever path results in the least recidivism, but the point of prison in the first place is prevention of the crime happening in the first place. If prison isn't a punishment and all you have to do for crimes is to go to rehab lessons, then the people who aren't committing crimes have no incentive not to. 
The utilitarian approach also has the unfortunate consequence that it doesn't really matter if someone actually commited a crime or not. If rehabilitation would reduce the likelihood of them commiting a crime enough to justify its cost why not submit an innocent to the corrections system? 
Norway is a largely homogeneous society.  The scale and racial demographics just simply do not compare to the USA. 
Leaving aside the reality that the war on drugs and prison privatization disproportionately victimize people of color, the answer is: they don't. Which doesn't stop white supremacists from advocating such policies anyway, and further, goes to show how self-defeating white supremacy, and strict law and order based policies are in the long term.  
Do you honestly think that any non-violent criminal such as thieves is not dangerous and should be living among us? 
But then, why aren't laws coherent across country? Or even across the world? Yes, some are, like murder and theft, and others are not, like prostitution, alcohol consumption, selling and using so called "illegal drugs", which depend according to locations, speed limits, family relations, sex acts, etc. 
The point of that story is that Americans tend to have a much more retributive perspective about crime, as compared to citizens of countries where rehabilitation is a priority. 
It's not only in the US, the whole modern world is still based on punishment as a form of institutionalized revenge. I think Socrates already wrote about benefits of rehabilitation against punishment, but while it's understandable that victims demand revenge, it's a bit said that the public hasn't shifted yet in this and behave like a mad mob when it comes even to the smallest of crime (petty thieving and such).  
You are correct, and the "vengeance" is also known as revenge in Criminal Justice. It seems to be affiliated with religion and dates back to the lex talionis, or the law of retaliation. In 3100 bc the Sumerian law of Mesopotamia incorporated lex talionis in the "Code of Ur-Nammu" and was mainly revenge/retaliation, and eye for an eye, a tooth for a tooth.  
Let's say I come murder your mother brutally.  Stab her 16 times in the chest or some shit like that.  Do you really think you'd be okay with me walking out of prison in 15 years, a free man, completely "rehabilitated" from a crime I chose to commit? 
Yeah, but I don't see how psychiatric help is appropriate for someone who's just trying to make ends meet. Hell if argue that it's an attempt to placate then rather than actually help them 
Blindly following the rules with complete disregard to their ethical value is a mental disorder in and of itself. 
This is probably the most evil post I've seen on reddit. Holy fuck is thia some messed up morality. 
That is because the government refuses to allow established laboratories with good quality control to distribute such drugs. That is because the government refuses to allow such drugs to be distributed in a sensible way, via pharmacies and hospitals. Drugs like ecstasy, even heroin, Tramadol, etc, should be affordable and available to the people. I know, heroin addiction is bad. So is smoking, drinking, and everything else. Our biggest addiction is to sugar, believe it or not, and look at the results - diabetes, obesity, heart disease, rotten teeth, kidney failure. Maybe sugar should be regulated. 
ER nurse here. I take care of a lot of prisoners doing hard time. I find myself more uneasy around some of the COs than the inmates themselves.  
I don't buy the race rhetoric.  The war on drugs and prison privatization disproportionately *punishes* (I use punish, because criminals aren't victims of punishments due to their crimes.) people in poverty. 
you ask that question like they are not human, not capable of change or remorse. Due to the amount of rhetoric involved with people who hold that position I find it hard to imagine I will be able to convince you otherwise but if you are willing to listen... let me know 
This is a pretty shitty example of American retributive perspective, so parents from other countries wouldn't be as mad or would be ok with 10yrs of jail time as punishment for the murder of their kid?? 
I firmly believe that anyone who commits intentional, pre-meditated murder should be killed themselves.  I don't think society should pay for them to live in prison, and I don't think they should have a chance to live the rest of their life as a free person.  The only other alternative I would find fitting would be back-breaking hard labor for life. 
Correct. Americans view prison is retribution or revenge. Since free will is almost certainly an illusion, revenge makes little sense.  
Man, you're not even trying to hide your blatant appeal to emotion. I would not *feel* okay with someone being released 15 years after stabbing my mother, but it would still be best for them to be released, assuming they were successfully rehabilitated. Man is not a slave to his emotions, or at least he doesn't have to be. 
You're suggesting someone who has committed acts of violence doesn't need treatment? Given many years in prison to reflect on their behavior they will realize the error of their ways? 
Why would the bad for an innocent person be any more than it would be for a person who has actually commited a crime? 
Have you seen the Stanford Prison Experiment? It goes into details about how prisons encourage the type of behavior seen on both sides of the bars 
Wait I thought "right to work" states were where you had a *right* to work, and that's why unions could protect your job, and that there were laws that dictated you couldn't just be fired for no reason. And that "at will" states were the opposite, where either party could end the relationship "at will" for any or no reason. I'm confused. 
The issue can easily be settled by controlling for poverty when looking at the race of incarcerated people. I'm sure some researcher has done it. 
Whites don't rule the world.  People are racist against whites as well. 
You did not answer the question. Do you suggest that all non violent criminals such as thieves should be rereleased into our society and live freely? Seems like you are trying to make a strawman, I never said anything about if they are human or capable of change.  So do you suggest they should live with us? If that's your point then we should change the laws and make stealing and all non violent crimes legal. 
Obviously not in the country where the crime occurred 
Even if it costs millions more to (not) kill them vs let them do life?   Cause the hardest republicans in my state saw the cost and are now are against the death penalty.  
The question here is both why and are you sure.  On the "are you sure" front executing innocent people is a terrifying and irreparable act and almost unavoidable that it will occur.  On the why front, to whom is the benefit? Society does not benefit from the expensive process of appeals and checks and balances that come with execution (that are higher than life imprisonment). Society might well benefit from a  rehabilitated and even keeled person being released back into it.  
Of course you wouldn't feel okay.  I dare say, you'd probably be clamoring for the state to lock that person up again.  There's two ways of looking at it.  One way, is that we worry about what's best for the person who committed the ultimate in evil acts- taking some other human beings life.  The other way, is that we decide what's best for them is not really important, because hey, they took someone else's life, the only one they'll ever have. 
No, because there can be many different circumstances and you're just making a blanket statement about all acts of violence as if they're all the same. That's very close minded. 
I think you're confused. it'd very simple. net bad consequences outweigh net good ones for throwing innocent ppl into jail. the bad consequences are all the suffering that goes with throwing everyday ppl into jail, the net good is zero because they were not probably going to commit a crime in future  
Right to work and at will mean the exact same thing. You can be fired or quit for no reason except for certain protected reasons (gender, race, etc.) 
okay so maybe I classified you based on a perceived tone in your question. for that I will apologize.   I do in fact think that, given the right system, all manner of people could be reintegrated into society. Does that mean that we ought to make crimes legal? I am really baffled by the binary you have set up here...  the idea is to have a correctional system. Not a holding system. Not a maximum security adult daycare to fulfill some idea of punishment or 'justice'. A system that tries to first assume that people are capable of change and enact that change be-it though mental health, behavioral therapy, access to resources for improving their life situation (since this is the least obvious answer let me note that I can find some studies to demonstrate that helping people to see another way of life other than crime has been demonstrably effective at reducing recidivism) 
That's the governments laws not a reflection of the parents which is what my question was about. Is 10-15yrs enough jail time in any parents mind (not societies) for the murder of their child?  
Yes, I'm sure.  Asking why to this question is like asking why we have a judicial system at all.  This is just a severer degree of punishment. 
Except you *are* deciding what's best for them, and it's a relatively terrible, torturous existence for a looooong time.  Does any of that bring the mom back? Does knowing that the person that killed her is costing tax payer money and living forever in a cell bring her back? Does it actually relieve the pain of the loss, or in anyway assist with the grief process?  15 years is a lot longer than it sounds, and people change dramatically in that time.   We also shouldn't be making policy based on how one person feels who lost their family member. We should be thinking about what benefits society as a whole, which is definitively rehabilitation.  
Im surprised no one on this thread has made the point that metaphysical questions fall outside the reach of physical sciences and mathematics. Such question will never be "scientifically" explained because it cant be scientifically explained.   
I don't think it will ever be solved. The corollary is "what is death?". There is no chemical change in composition when people die, making it difficult to measure the absence or presence of life.  
People like whoever this guy, just got to realize we aren't gods. We can never truly know something. We can claim to think we know something however based on educated observation and inferences, and even some guesses. 
If feel like we generally have a hard time accepting gradual transitions when it comes to ontological questions. It's much easier to stick to a worldview where all things are neatly categorized into little boxes whose name tags lets you associate and assume a bunch of stuff about said thing. While in reality such distinctions are not always something we can allow us to take comfort in. 
Is that what he meant by the question?  Did he mean strictly biologically?  
I actually love the book Schrodinger wrote called "What is Life" where he actually foresaw the coming of DNA and only physically such a thing could come into existence calling it a process of negentropy, this title is clearly written by someone who never the read the book or just misunderstood some summary of the ideas because Schrodinger never doubted science's ability to solve this conundrum the way he/she suggests.  
Why is this controversial? It would require absolutely no cognition of history and a disconcerting amount of arrogance to assert that science is static. 
Wouldn't the organism have to be undetectable by an electron microscope? Wouldn't it have to be smaller than the molecular level? 
This feels rather normative than descriptive. Do we have to require point 2? Are self-replicating RNA-molecules less alive than simple bacteria? How so?   Also, I would argue that point 5 is not quite well-defined. Many forces of life are self-destructive on some time-scale. You would have to define "relative stability".    
So what you're saying is that life is basically a thermodynamic system that possess some intelligence in order to maintain equilibrium? Where in this case equilibrium is staying alive. This is very interesting.        
Yet bacteria are considered "alive" while viruses aren't, while both meet these six criteria? Thus the problem. 
I'm a bit of a layman here but wouldn't point 6 alone suffice? I cannot think of anything I'd identify as alive that doesn't seek some form of reproduction or propagation. 
When you say 'whole cloth' I take that to mean that a whole comes into being from no previous steps.  If I were to accept your definition of life then I would argue that when robots become living their evolutionary path was through humans. Rather than their evolutionary path being nothing.    
We are in the process of building gods. The first truly AGI (artificial general intelligence) will be smarter than us by a billionfold.  
No. Actual living things are very difficult to explain. We understand matter...We don't understand how matter can self-organize, move around, and *do* shit. In physics, objects at rest stay at rest...They don't get bored with resting, then go get a beer.  Saying, "Now we know about DNA!" misses the entire point. 
Yeah the real barrier to understanding consciousness seems to be letting go of certain preconceptions about free will. People don't like the idea of being biological machines, even if those machines are beautiful and complex.  
What does he mean by incoherence vs coherence in this context?  
What if it was transparent to electrons?  Then it wouldn't have to be smaller than the molecular/atomic level.  The core of the idea was much more fundamental than what a lot of people are responding with here.  Perhaps the thing would require an incredibly high energy photon to "see".  Or perhaps the thing/organism would require a whole new form of detection that we cannot conceive of right now.  I guess I was asking "can things exist beyond science as we know it" and his answer was "absolutely". 
I would say point 5 (life must maintain homeostasis) is the most important and is what excludes self-replicating RNA or protein from being alive.   Everything we consider to be organisms (bacteria, fungi, plants, animals) use energy-intensive processes (e.g. metabolism, ion transport, movement) to maintain some kind of variable (e.g. pH). A virus for example doesn't really, it'll just become inactive if conditions change from ideal.   The distinction is a bit arbitrary, there may not be any functional merit in describing life this way. But I think it is useful at least for nomenclature's sake to separate non-alive self-replicating organic structures (prions, transposons, viruses) from traditionally-described life. That said, it is still important to note that the processes of natural selection and evolution (what created life) applies to anything that can self-replicate, alive or not.  
DNA, RNA, Viruses, computer code, complex self replicating molecules, memes, etc.  I mean... replication and propagation are essential components of keeping your lineage or information around... but it's not the sole determinant in what we'd consider to be life. 
Well... they won't be without a causal path (i.e. humans caused their existence).  But an evolutionary path of gradual auto-modifications over successive generations? That won't be the case for such machines.  It's also interesting to note that machines can be 'intelligent' and fail to be alive under such a definition (i.e. it does nothing to preserve homeostasis, or seek to propagate).  But... at this point, we're kinda dipping our fingers into a few too many big philosophical questions (life, intelligence, etc, etc).  I mainly make these points to note that the coming era will give us cause to rethink and reassess what we've come to accept and assume about many big ideas in our current era. 
Imperfect self replication in a ressource-starved environment is the definition that I learned, and has the benefit of being quite elegant.  
Not at all. That link doesn't address the definition of life at all and in addition many of those categories are quite controversial. In fact there is a controversy over how to do that categorization at all. The fact that at some level there is a consensus doesn't make it any less arbitrary.  
But that doesn't mean we are gods.  Also determines how is that thing intelligent?   Technically our calculators are smarter than us than a billion fold. 
I think you need to refine this question a bit. We understand a lot about how living things work, how they reproduce, move around, and do shit. On the deepest level it's all inseparable from physics, molecular interactions, and natural selection. The "how" of the origin life is still mysterious, since motes of dust don't fossilize for 4 billion years, but an epistemological separation of animate and inanimate matter appears to lie in that not-to-be-trusted danger zone of "ego-stroking" and "poorly supported by the data".  The "why" is obviously something that hasn't been and won't be addressed in the same way.  
You think we can't explain boredom, or wanting a beer? 
How the fuck does this kind of comment get upvoted?! Jesus christ.. 
Like unicellular organisms that move towards the light even though they have no CNS guiding them - why on Earth are they doing it? 
I don't actually believe in free will, at least as it is commonly formatted. But I have trouble believing physical determinism fully explains all of life's bizarre behavior. 
We can't be biological machines with free will?  You determinists are just as dogmatic as religious folk, you say that your claims are 100% truth when all of it is conjecture.  
What about e.g. a frozen seed/spore/sperm? No homeostasis, not alive now (?), but definitely alive under the right conditions? 
TIL: that dwarves in the Dwarf Fortess video game are alive.     These kind of "elegant" definitions always have the "plucked chicken" problem. 
Go for it. Explain how a self-assembled collection of largely uninteresting elements get "bored" and want a beer.  This whole thread is full of science nerds trying to discount everything they can't fully explain as unimportant. But you're in r/philosophy. *That* bit is the whole point. 
Who's being dogmatic here? Can you point me to where said there was no free will? Left that open ended for a reason. 
They are not self-replicating. The game replicates them. 
A picture is not the thing in the picture. There are no dwarves. There is a spreadsheet of data that the user and the game modify in varying ways and use to determine a visual presentation that the user interprets as being dwarves.  
I'm aware. You seem to be trying to imply that that makes it dubious, but what you said doesn't actually imply that. We can discuss what the assumptions are if you like.  If you acknowledge that science can explain the cause of anything, then it can explain the general principles that cause behavior.  
Yeah just because you can create organic compounds under those conditions doesnt mean anything. You still havent created life. We find the same molecules in the tails of comets and in the geysers of Saturns moon Enceladus. Doesnt mean life is there.  
That's like saying you aced the test because you managed to bring a pencil. 
Under the assumption that we are 100% biological machines, and that with a powerful enough of a supercomputer that knows the exact position of every atom of our being we can simulate such biological machine perfectly and predict every action it takes, then there is no free will except for the 'feeling' (aka chemicals in our brain) that cause us to discuss such a concept. There is no choice since everything is inevitable since everything is matter.   But then you consider quantum mechanics, and sub-atomic particles that behave differently when we observe them, and you consider that human perception might actually mean something in the universe.. and that consciousness might actually have impact in our reality.. and perhaps there's more to how our universe behaves than the 4 fundamental forces guiding each atom into position. 
By that logic no one self replicates, the universe makes animals replicate. 
That's a huge first principal to assume in any argument of this nature. And many good arguments have been made against the idea science can one day explain in perfect detail every type of phenomenon we encounter  
That's not exactly something you can acknowledge so simply...  That's like me saying, If you believe everything I say, then I can answer any question you ask me.  Considering that Science is a human invention, and the current implications of said science is that human logic is a byproduct of random evolution biased towards reproductive viability, then there is no reason to believe that human science will ever be able to explain everything. Of course, it's nice to hope.   
You said organization of matter without DNA. That's what this is.  
Sounds like a viable answer for determinism. The universe's contents and natural laws orchestrate everything.  
How can it make predictions if it doesn't *do* anything? 
Maybe I am incredibly dumb asking this, but I am incredibly dumb regardless so here we go: How do we know it was on february 15 if that calendar or any calendar did not exist back in those good old days? 
The historical context is that people sentenced to "death" in Athens by popular acclaim were expected to flee into exile until their supporters could work the politics back to their side and get another acclamation loosening or reversing the first one.  Socrates considered this hypocritical and corrupt.  Perhaps taking his own life too lightly in order to "teach a lesson" to his society, he decided it would be moral to abide the letter of their decision and let them accept the consequences of it.  Dying an agonizing death just to shame a mob was perhaps ethically flippant.    The polis repented their decision in his case, but kept behaving in similar ways right up to the self-inflicted death of Athenian democracy. 
Time to put down the phones and read *Apology*,  *Symposium*, & *Phaedo* 
Can anyone recommend a book on Socrates? I know that he wrote nothing himself and that most of his thoughts are transmitted through Plato and Zenophon (? or something).. Is there a good book that merges these two viewpoints and presents Socrates as a more 3-D person? 
If I'm not mistaken he was killed by the proponents of rhetoric. This is to argue to the appeals of ethos pathos and logos. (ethics, emotions, and logic) any good politician nowadays has balanced rhetoric...  Socrates believed in learning the truth. Facts are facts. Rhetoric can't make something a fact.  What a wierd thing to die for. But I think rhetorically you can support that the death penalty was too much. Which I find ironic.  But you can also factually prove that the death penalty was wrong here.  Politicians today in the US use more of a rhetorical method than a Socratic one. This is why people love town halls! 
One of the things that has always fascinated me about his death beyond the Olympian-tribute he requested at his trial was the concept of his intentional demise in an era where dying for the self wasn't really a thing. The city-state/honor was more of an important concept than dying for a personal belief or ideal.  
Isn't there a theory that Socrates wasn't a real person and was just a stand-in/example/character created by Plato? 
I believe Socrates was expected to *request* exile as an alternative punishment to death, but refused to offer an alternative. 
Didn't the Athenian democracy end when Sparta(and Corinth...) won the Peloponnese war and the democracy was to be abolished and the terror of the 50(or 30)(in other words a ruling of many) was put in its place as a requirement for peace? 
Refusing to recognize the Greek Gods and corrupting the youth. 
Athens had lost its empire and half of its population in the Pelopenesian war and the Thirty Tyrants.  Among the bloodiest of the tyrants were Socrates' students.  One of his students was also Agathocles, who betrayed the city twice during the war.  Add to this that one of Socrates lines of questioning was almost certainly the "we don't run a ship by democracy" and you get a perfect scapegoat for the rising democracy. 
I love that edition of Plato's apology - Big fat margins for notes and buttery smooth translations. good stuff. 
The progress we've largely made in average age is more along the lines of keeping little kids from dying.  When you have 6 kids and lost 4 of them, it really brings down the average.  In this regard, we've made huge headway in the last century.   
He didn't present his death as for his own self, though. The very reason he refused to flee was for his love of his city-state and their laws: if his city commanded him to die, he would die. 
the trial was a formality, the rich wanted him dead long before that trial. it was surprising he wasnt otherwise killed before it. 
Yeah, but doesn't the Gregorian Calendar (and others before it) messed with dates a couple of times?  
You are correct.  In Athens at the time, after a guilty verdict was found, the State would suggest a punishment, the accused (now guilty) party would suggest a punishment and the court would decided between the two.  The State offered Exile or Death, which was a the nuclear option in those days.  All they wanted Socrates to do was shut the hell up and go home.  Socrates, being a total bad ass, suggested the State pay him for his services.  So the State (and by extension the Court) had their bluff called and sentenced Socrates to choose between exile and death.  Socrates AGAIN gave them all the middle finger by choosing death.  In the end the State and Court came out looking like total dicks.   
Wow great explanation. It's amazing how much beauty can be drawn out of a painting when it is broken down. Such an eloquent way to imagine this scene in history.   I feel like if I were to try and explain my reasoning for painting this it would end up being "and then, like, I just thought it would be cool if the scene was, like, coming out of the back of platos head, like a memory or something. Idk maybe not tho. It's whatevs" 
that was what they charged him with, but what he really did was make a lot of rich and powerful people look stupid. He would ask them something like what is justice? they would answer and he would take their response and use a simple analogy to prove them wrong and make them look foolish. He did this to enough powerful people to where they finally killed him. 
I doubt Plato's account of the death is the actual fact-of-the-matter. It is confusing to non-experts when you mix historical facts with literary details. 
have you read the apology?  He is unrepentant the whole time, and a real douchebag. He also asks for death over exile. Even given the context, he's not presented as sympathetic.  It makes for a better story this way, but the guy is not a hero. 
And also, if you read The Apology, Socrates shows no humility at all during the trial, arguing that he deserves to have free meals, and he basically dares the jurors to execute him. 
Yeah, the "Corrupting the Youth" is a catch-all and handy to tack on any charge as it is never an issue to make the charge stick and easy to demonize someone with. 
From his perspective (and mine), he is not guilty of one and possibly both of his charges.  Just because he decline to use rhetoric to set himself free doesn't make him a bad guy.  Socrates' actions, for better or worse, are in line with his beliefs and I think he should be respected for that. 
I can't decide if he had a serious pair of stones, or if he just knew he wasn't going to walk away from the trial with his life, so he might as well be snarky til the bitter end. 
And this is how we know, "Think of the children" has always been a tool for tyrants.  
It also may have something to do with the fact that some young men, who were known to have been students of Socrates (including one who was a family member of Plato), also became prime movers in anti-democratic (pro-Spartan) activities leading to the overthrow of the Athenian government. When the Thirty Tyrants took power, they murdered about 5% of the Athenian population just seven years prior to the trial. The charge of "Corrupting the Youth" was not just handy. It was dripping blood.  
He was also fascinated by death. He knew he couldn't beat the charges so he accepted his fate and was morbidly curious about what came after  
You know he was out to death by a democracy, right? 
The tipping point was the involvement in the circle of thirty by Critias, who was an actual relative of Socrates. 
It seems that with his wit and knowledge, he could have made a logical argument as to why he was innocent and convince the court to dismiss the charges. But he believed in the system for what it's worth, so he accepted death. 
You know Athenian democracy was flawed as fuck right ? 
Trials (and the law as well) are not always about logic and reason. If they had evidence against him or people to testify against him, what could he do? 
Well sure, in the sense that all governments are.  I'm not really sure how that's relevant, unless we've just decided "tyranny" is just a word for "bad governance". 
I'm not sure if evidence could exist, but I'm sure people would testify against him. Would have been interesting to hear him battle it out with those who testified against him (if he cared). 
I worked at a aquarium store for a number of years and we had a cuttlefish that would recognize and get excited to see certain staff members and would flash certain patterns when begging for food. It was like a underwater puppy that inks the tank instead of shitting the carpet. 
Why should there be any necessary connection between being smart and being long-lived?  There are plenty of dim-witted organisms (like tortoises) that live longer than us smart-asses. 
Cephalopods, to me, are a perfect example of how unprepared we are to receive an extraterrestrial intelligence (cetaceans being another). Not that I expect to be visited by, or for us to encounter an extraterrestrial intelligence anytime soon. I've done some basic research on cephalopods, and they're both fascinating, and undeniably intelligent. They're able to communicate, and camouflage themselves by changing their appearance, but we have no real means of communicating with them. If we were to encounter another intelligent life form, I imagine it will be as baffling as these creatures, likely far more so. Until we're able to understand the life of a dolphin or a cuttlefish we're woefully unprepared to receive an extraterrestrial intelligence. 
Yet the standards on what we can do to cephalopods is the same as for all other non-listed  invertebrates.  
If there is an ethical argument to be made for genetically modifying something to live longer I would like to hear the case for octopuses because it would be fascinating to see what they could do with more time. Of course people will say it could also spell our doom. 
It's a really interesting question, but only rhetorically. Life span is what it is; intelligence can't directly influence that. A more testable question is "how does something so short-lived become so smart?" But that's a science question not a philosophy question.   I hold a Cambridge masters in philosophy but now find science more interesting.  
Jesus Christ mods, why you have to nuke the damn thread?  
they are just biding their time until they become the next thing to crawl out of the sea and dominate Earth.  won't be long now. 
Hopefully right now they're congregating at the bottom of the ocean to emerge as the great Cthulhu and rule us all for one hundred thousand years.  
Mortality is designed to stop individuals which don't reproduce from competing for resources with those which do.  Intelligence has next to nothing to do with it.  Even in Humans you can have an IQ pushing 200 and you'll likely die younger if you don't have kids. 
I once saw a cuddlefish at an aquarium in chatanooga and he looked like the most pissed off animal I have ever seen. He had a very human look in his eye that said "I would fucking kill you if I could." As his skin flashed very intimidating colors at me. 
I've kept Cichlids that would do this.  One Jack Dempsey would rush the tank wall if I approached, but hide under a rock of my then partner approached.  
If they're so smart why don't they just figure out how to live longer?? 
Brains are costly, energy wise. Most of the calories we consume go to supporting our brain. It's enough that some species of bird will lose most of the brain mass dedicated to caching while nesting. So why put all that energy into an energy-expensive strategy if you're not making considerable gains?   The fact that tortoises aren't that intelligent isn't surprising because intelligence is costly. But for most of the intelligent animals they seem to need long lives to get their returns - elephants, for example. It's not that long lives mean intelligence, it's that it's thought that intelligence generally needs long lives.  
Some parrots are wicked smahrt and long-lived too. 
That's true, but hopefully they would have a way of communicating with us in a way that we would understand.  Part of the problem is that humans rely so heavily on language that we don't appreciate and aren't receptive to other forms of communication. And these may be what are employed by other animals.  A good example is Clever Hans, a horse that could "do maths" at circus back in the 1900s. It would tap it's foot to give the number. They eventually figured out that the horse was just watching the crowd to see when they expected it to stop tapping. But it took aaaaages and a team of scientists to figure this out. 
I think you are right, but if we do encounter an intelligent extra-terrestrial species at some point, we might have more in common with them that we do with dolphins or cephalopods. They would also have some sort of technology and have grappled with all the sorts of questions that come with that kind of evolution, not to mention mathematical commonalities.   Anyway, I don't know if understanding other species here really prepares us for extra-terrestrial intelligence. Cephalopods don't need our understanding, and we might not have anything that dolphins want or need to talk about. They just need us to stop destroying the planet we share with them, but I don't think there's much opportunity for a cultural exchange there. 
I think it's pretty likely we would have discovered at least the remains of anything super huge living down there, but I also hold out hope for the discovery of one last true sea monster to beat all sea monsters. But it is *not gettin* no tree fiddy! You hear me Margaret?! 
Is it possible that their intelligence is related to them having a short lifespan?    High intelligence would be very beneficial in such an extreme environment ensuring survival and the continuation of the species.  Having a short life span equates to many more generations for adaptations to occur for cephalopods than another species during the same period of time.  I'm no scientist so feel free to chime in and correct me if I'm way off here. 
Thing is that time is relative. This seems like a short lifespan for us, but does it to them?  
Not true, the human race's average lifespan has increased drastically with modern medicine, which is a result of intelligence. If current methods of anti-aging are successful, then we will have drastically increased ours directly from intelligence. Depending on how you define it, smarter people live longer too when they figure out how to maximise benefit from the society.  Intelligence, be it an advanced nervous system or being self aware, is very costly though and doesn't cause longer life span. 
Maybe its hardwired in, partly due to the need to control their complex form in a harsh environment. Whereas humans develop the neural connections over time. Just speculation on my part. 
Terrible moderation.   You can't go around deleting posts with 800 upvotes and 40 comments. At that point you are wasting everyone's time more than any off topic discussion ever could. 
Remember, in those kind of works of fiction, the Old Gods are always stopped (no matter what kind of hero stops them) and bad things happen to those who were in favor of their rise 
You may be wrong, my friend. The best (and scientifically verified) way to increase the lifespan of a man is to remove his sexuality. The sooner, the better. That is one reason women live at least 12 years more than men.  
This guy knows. I had a pet octopus at one point. It hated my guts. 
I once had an aquarium full of chichlids and they started reproducing when I was a child.. anyway one hopped out and laid splat on the floor. My father at the time was home and found this fish just laying there. He is and was around the time a fully certified EMT. He straight up gave this fish CPR and without shock was reintroduced back to his native tank. The hell I know why I decided to share this story but somehow you mentioning chichlids reminded me of this. 
They got *too* smart and started dabbling in Sartre. The realization of the absurdity of life has become too great a burden.  
Maybe they figured out there is an after life and this life is hell and just want to pass as quickly as possible.  
Not only do they live longer, they're alongside their children for years so they can pass down knowledge 
Crows and ravens, also. Their lifespan can be around 100 human years. I love to watch these majestic birds in Bangkok's Lumpini park. 
Or better yet, read the story it was based on. Story of Your Life and Others by Ted Chiang. It goes into much more technical detail on how the process of discovery and translation happened. You should watch the movie too though. 
The movie added really dumb scenes and took away from openness of the few chapters it's based on. It also didn't explain their language very well, and just kind of stated, they understand everything because they write in a circle.... 
But humans tens of thousands of years ago were just as intelligent as we are today. Or do you dispute that?  Technology requires intelligence, but intelligence need not necessarily make technology. Philosophy and abstract thought are, in my view, a better measure of intelligence than being able to manufacture metal goods. 
I would imagine that if you were as smart as an octopus and the fleshy land fish grabbed you up and put you in a tank to live out your life, you'd want to murder everything in sight too. Or escape. Hank just wanted to escape. 
thanks, I found a pdf though. Thanks anyway though :_) 
Exactly, the truly smart may not *desire* to live longer  
This gets into defining "smart". The ability to pass knowledge between generations is one rough definition of "culture". Does culture make us smart? Does the capacity for culture make us smart? 
I've not read the book, only seen the movie: What I took from it was that they used a character based language that's arranged in a circle that represents a complete thought instead of lines on a page, similar to how Chinese characters work. Not a terribly difficult concept.  Overall I wasn't impressed, it was basically a retelling of Contact but the movie ended as soon as they got the plans for the machine instead of doing something interesting. 
But your example, that we lack the ability to ask a math question, is exactly how we would start communicating with a species that we share no language with. We don't lack the ability to ask that question. We might not be aware that a species is capable of understanding, but more likely is that they lack the ability to understand. You won't ask a dog a math question either, but you wouldn't say that is because we lack the ability to ask them that. If we did encounter a species that communicates through smell, it would be evident through their use of tools that they are intelligent. It would not be long before we synthesized a machine for communication. If we can't tell they are intelligent we won't try to communicate, but if they are, then effort from both sides will facilitate this. And cephalopods are cousins compared to aliens. I see no need to mystify them.   Edit :also, language is not dependent on speech but on communication. Communication at a higher level requires language.  
Np, my question is, where do you surf where Octopus swim up to you? I've been looking to make some Poke lately.  
I get what you are saying, but that isnt enough. The chapters with aliens is extremely short. Like a 10 minute read. The movie basically made it seem way to easy. The chapters really made me think about how we judge intelligence. Imagine... we have basically done all the teaching so far. Humans teach dogs and other animals to perform and follow simple rules and orders. But the most we have ever really had to learn from anyone else is our past self. Maybe the mayan language... What if we are visited or have been, or are currently be observed but its clear to the Aliens that like the dog, we will never have a discussion. It would be our first true test. Could we understand something that is far greater than ourselves. Because let's be clear, even though this is speculation of course... but if beings travel here they are far far more advanced than even our best theoretical physicists most wild imagination and interpretations of the future.  **Voice to text** forgive me. 
Dophins have language, we have known this for years, and they communicate using sound; we have very minimal understanding of them. Cuttlefish have language that is expressed through changing of patterns on their skin, we can understand their basic attitude, but that's it. Watch a cuttlefish for 5 min and you'll see it watch you back, flashing patterns rippling down it's body trying to communicate information, whether it's trying to ask you a question, or tell it's friends about you. Language is not unique to humans. Not by a long way.  
Yeah I live in Hawai'i too and this has never happened to me.  I speardive for tako a lot and I've only seen them hidden away in rocks.   
I'm not saying that figuring out a radial character based language from another world would be easy, far from it. It would be tedious and difficult; only the concept is relatively simple. But they spent so much screen time deciphering the code and building towards *something* then the movie was over, they didn't do anything with the knowledge they worked so hard to achieve. 
A solar year makes no sense there are 7 other planets with different orbit times. 
To be given its "proper place" (let's grant that this *is* at the heart of UK education), we need good philosophy teachers.   Where are the thousands that are required going to come from?  Teaching philosophy badly might be worse than none at all. 
Rhetoric and Logic (beginners level at least) is probably even more important. Polite discussion where valid arguments are used to defend your opinion is very hard to find these days. These things should be mandatory regardless the discipline you are learning.  
The fact that schools teach religion but not philosophy is something that always baffled me. 
Teaching scepticism would be good.  Especially what is claimed or asserted during the rest of philosophy class. 
As someone with a Ph.D. in Philosophy who has been searching for a full time teaching position for the past 15 years....Yes, and not just in the U.K. Here in the U.S., most teaching spots are filled on a single class contract basis,  you are paid per class taught, no benefits.  You can work full time (4 classes per semester) and barely make 18,000 usd/year and still have no health insurance.  Lovely. What's even sadder is that many universities are eliminating their philosophy departments altogether and teaching the few required classes through other departments. Logic is treated as a math course; Ethics is taught through the Drama department (Plato's dialogues); Intro is treated as a literature/freshman writing course. 
A lot of what was previously classified as philosophy now falls under the fields of science, economics, maths, religious studies etc. The definition is a narrower. That said, teaching rhetoric and logic should probably be mandated at a high school level. Fallacies everywhere! (Hah) 
There are a number of problems with the education our youngsters receive. But this is one of the big ones for me.  
IB is great that way, the subject Theory of Knowledge kind off covers philosophy and helps with critical thinking! 
Education in general needs to become more adaptable to introverted students. Many studies show that introverts produce better work in a shorter tine frame when working on their own, and yet schools continue to push group tasks onto everyone. 
Which philosophy?  Nihilism - Nazis  Utilitarianism - communism  Enlightenment - democracy and imperialism/colonialism  Or maybe cultural Marxism? 
Philosophy is a touchy topic. For it to be taught here in the U.S., one would need a doctoral degree in philosophy to even teach it. I don't see how it would be taught in a K-12 education here in the states or even anywhere else. I'm not even sure if students at an early age would even appreciate the subject, it would be only a select few if anything.  
Ok then, no applying for philosophy PhD in the US. Don't see this problem much in UK uni's, at least my old one. Applying to French Unis now and they seem to be alive and kicking. 
Logic *is* a math course.  Anything that can be treated as systematically as logic *is* math.  If you can reduce it to symbol shunting... 
Yes you are quite right. We do not need philosophy as a separate subject. How many world leading scientists, economists, writers etc. have never studied philosophy formally? Most I would think. And yet people still carp on about how vital philosophy is. You learn what philosophy you need implicitly through these other, much more important subjects. 
The English have never produced any great philosophers (speaking as an Englishman and a philosophy grad). Locke was most interesting for a mistake about primary and secondary qualities. He and Hobbes and JS Mill made some useful interventions on political theory, but that's about it.   This lack of interest in the subject explains why the English are incapable of questioning received wisdom.   They slavishly do what they're told by "experts", who almost always are nothing of the sort, but rather public-school-and-Oxbridge-types who have no independent thought process and who just spout whatever they read in The Economist.  Brexit was a rare and amazing exception to this rule. The howls of rage from the aforementioned Establishment are something to behold...   
And it's something that is taken for granted lots as well! 
If it were indoctrination then it would matter but in Philosophy you deconstruct models of the world so you can build and edit your very own.  It is in many respects the opposite of indoctrination, which can be painful to learn and also threatening to those in power. 
Why would you need a doctoral? Just start creating philosophy education programs 
UK universities do frequently have problems with teaching staff being poorly compensated. Philosophy modules getting divided across other departments, not so much.  
Not in its purest form, it isn't. Math may be reducible to logic (problematically) the same way biology may be considered reducible to physics, but it is not the same field.  Simply put, math is about making theorems about structures, logic is making theorem about theorems, it is a higher order method of logical thinking than mathematics. Something like Goedel's incompleteness theorem is not really mathematics.  Furthemore, logic has real life applications that can be distinct from mathematical application. For example, IF it is raining THEN it is cloudy. Any form of argument, in any field can be reduced to basic logical notation which can then be assessed to be valid or sound. 
Philosophy is the root of all these subjects. It is by far the most important discipline. That is why every PhD is a doctor of philosophy.  If you want a thinking populous then you must teach philosophy to children. Rather than spoon feed people a view of the world you give them the tools to derive their own.  
I agree.   Do you think the government will allow this kind of self learning?   Like ohh yes, well actually there are very good philosophical, ethical, And economic reasons for taking the land from the Indians.   
Godel's incompleteness theorem was based on a mapping of symbolic logic expressions to the natural numbers.  It is also a theorem about arithmetic.  What you're trying to do right now is dress up a dog in a bunny suit and telling me we can have rabbit stew.  
But that's exactly my point, it's a theorem about arithmetic. It's not within the field of arithmetic.  It's like saying that the physics dictates the laws of the human body, hence physics and biology are the same field 
No its more like saying the law of conservation of energy isn't physics because it is an axiom of physics. 
But you're not saying that the incompleteness theorem is an axiom of arithmetic so this analogy makes no sense. 
It makes no less sense than your analogy to physics/biology.  The bottom line is: who would you go for to learn about Godel?  Your average mathematician or your average philosopher? 
For anyone interested in the life of Bertrand Russell, there is a fantastic comic book called 'Logicomix: An epic search for truth' that details his early life and some of his main pursuits in philosophy. I would highly recommend it.  
Could somebody add a tl dr for people like me who don't really understand ?  
The four F's of biological survival: 1. Feed 2. Fight 3. Flee 4. Reproduce 
I find this line of thinking a bit cynical. Nowhere is any positive virtue mentioned. I think love, for instance, is one of the most, if not the most powerful drivers in all of human life.  
Always hard to read these sorts of declarative treatises on human psychology - pretty much the most abstract, difficult to define phenomenon in the known world - without suspecting that they're dangerously simplistic. The resistance to that mathematical perception of human behavior is what gave the postmodernists their potency; Russell's epistemic certitude in proposing a formula of human psychology reads as almost laughably dated in the 21st century. 
ahh clickbait book title before we coined the term.  "And you won't believe number three!" 
Interesting read, but he's clearly wrong: some human behavior is the result of habit, and while the habit may have been *formed* during a period where a person desired something, the habits can persist long after the desire has waned.  And other things are one's body taking over; trying to hold your breath until you die is not likely to work, regardless of how much you desire to die.  Similarly, newborn babies breathe even though they have no measurable thoughts or desires of any kind.  I suppose you can argue such instinctual behaviors are not "you" behaving that way, but it's clearly an action of a human body, and thus "human behavior."  Aristotle was much closer with "Thus every action must be due to one or other of seven causes: chance, nature, compulsion, habit, reasoning, anger, or appetite."  
I think he is close but a little off.   There are many things that don't fit into these categories.  Why do we shut our eyes when we look into the sun?  Try these 4 reasons why we do everything: Access something/activity Escape something aversive Access attention Self-stimulation/sensory input 
But power over humans as portrayed here isn't the only power. Humans are most powerful at effecting their environment by their cooperation. The power to organise, facilitate and encourage can make great things happen and nobody has to be suffering to achieve it. Work, yes; pain, no. This is, to me, what political power is at its core.  The person that seeks the power to motivate the masses, to focus industry to a singular purpose is not, implicitly heading down a road that would cause any pain to people. 
Unless the thing that they would rather not do is, in fact, for the betterment of their well being. Such as the power of a teacher over a student. A parent over a child. A god over his servant.  
Shit, Nobel Prize in lit. Isn't that just for fiction? What did he write? 
The problem is that book is largely simply made up. The authors literally say this in the endnotes.  
People desire to be rich, adored, powerful, and to bully other people when in need of excitement to alleviate their boredom.  
Four should be Fornicate, just to keep the alliteration alive. 
#What Desires Are Politically Important?  I have chosen this subject for my lecture tonight because I think that most current discussions of politics and political theory take insufficient account of psychology.  [...]  There are some desires which, though very powerful, have not, as a rule, any great political importance. Most men at some period of their lives desire to marry, but as a rule they can satisfy this desire without having to take any political action. There are, of course, exceptions [...]  The desires that are politically important may be divided into a primary and a secondary group. In the primary group come the necessities of life: food and shelter and clothing. [...] Undoubtedly the desire for food has been, and still is, one of the main causes of great political events.  [...]  But man differs from other animals in one very important respect, and that is that he has some desires which are, so to speak, infinite [...]   
Things like duty and morality have to be chosen. Which means that the person choosing has to want them. Which means that they are desires. They can be instrumental desires meaning that they are wanted because they help the chooser to get something else that they want like world peace or a productive society but they are still desires. 
There is nothing sophistic about that excerpt. Show your work. 
obama killed lots of civilians in the middle east too.  
The title of this speech was "What desires are politically important?"   
Still painful at least insofar as one is being overpowered into doing what they do not want to do. Just because it ends up being good for you it is not mutually exclusive with pain. In fact, very often betterment and pain go hand in hand.  
Russell is referring to the man driven by love of power. Most teachers, parents, and deities tend not to be driven by love of power so this statement does not refer to them. 
But if everyone believes it's true, does it really matter if its false?  
I dunno about that. I can think of plenty of things I do that aren't for wealth, power, adoration, or bullying. Tbh only adoration really drives much of anything I do, wealth only so far as enough to enable me to do other things. Idk it doesn't explain like 90% of recreation, or actual altruism, or the idea of dream jobs...  
So everything he said can be explained by dominance hierarchies - but also he left out anything to do with survival of the self or the genes? Aight.  
At an abstract level, he listed 4 powerful ways humans are wired to feel good. In your example of the girls acting on memories of trauma, you can say they are not acting out of fear but instead on a strong desire to generate good feelings again to fight off the negative feelings of their past experience. They are still collecting potatoes to trigger the same mechanism, just in a different context 
Not sure if you've whooshed me or it's you thats missed it, but they meant Fuck. 
my similar take on it was in breaking down the interplay of wants and needs.  My phil prof was not happy with my reasoning, which was simple: A need is a condition of fulfilling a want.  You don't need to live, you want to live.  That want leads to the need to eat, drink, etc. There's no pure or true needs, because every one of them is preceded by a want.    While I would agree that everything people do comes down to wants, some wants can be purely altruistic.  "I want to help people." 
What drives desires? British idealism seems to reduce it to the social nature of human beings. Virtue signaling of any form (pick what works in your society) would be a means to work the social tissue or power relationship between individuals. 
You could replace "desire" with "destiny" and the meaning changes but still seem just as sound to a different cultural audience. 
Yep, but his entire platform wasn't based on subverting the american population into a bait and switch where they are voting against their own best interests.  Obama was certainly far from perfect, but these guys are selling out america by design.     Defend that.     Are you a "hillary's emails" guy?             
Perhaps not his fault, then, but the title of this post is "The Four Desires Driving All Human Behaviour."  
Power involves making people do what they don't want to do. So, you aren't very powerful if you're making children eat a cookie because they do it of their own accord. Therefore, love of power is the love of causing pain insofar as you are the cause of people doing things they wouldn't do if it weren't for your intervening.  
You wrote a whole paragraph about a throwaway phrase and an example that was just meant to be illustrative.  It is completely irrelevant whether the boa constrictor actually sleeps or not.  Russell could have said, "imagine there existed an animal who, when it was fully fed, just slept until it needed food.  Humans aren't like that." 
If you read the article, he says that these four desires separate humans from other animals. We do have other desires that have to do with survival or procreation. But those desires can be fulfilled at least temporarily.  The four desires he is talking about here are "infinite desires" that can never truly be fulfilled.  
He used "Reproduce", I assume to not swear, so I suggested fornicate, which means the same as fuck but isn't crass. 
I would still argue that things like decisions made under duress are made from desire. It might not be pretty decisions but a person is still choosing to be alive. And even suicide is a decision coming from the desire to not feel bad.  
That criticism turns on the ability of the undefined ears of a "different cultural audience" to recognize soundness rather than the simple question of whether Russel's argument is actually sound itself. It passes the latter test. The former, at least as phrased, is not a test worth taking.  If that's the most serious criticism you have, you're miles away from supporting a claim that Russel's excerpt is sophistry. 
no, i'm a "both parties are paid by the same lobbyists" guy. i'm a "american voters refusing to vote 3rd party is the core problem of american politics" guy. i'm a "i don't pretend democrats are less evil than republicans just because democrats say they are ok with gays getting married" guy.   the two parties are like competing sports teams. no matter who wins, the rules stay the same.  
Indeed, it doesn't exist either, for what matters.  The point is, your list is unrealistic mate. 
I would place more emphasis on the predicate of actuation. You could still be powerful, as a quality or characteristic, while permitting children to eat cookies. However, because power actuates you, you don't feel good or feel like yourself unless you're actively seeing your power at work, which is best noticed by forcing people to do things they don't want to do. It's not that forcing unpleasant actions requires greater power, but rather that the power is more easily observed. This is important because for people who exist and subsist off the exertion of power, the experience of exerting power practically transcends what it is for everyone else and thus too strongly correlates with the agent's notion of self (i.e. self and exertion of power are too strongly correlated). 
You're not wrong exactly, but it kind of ruins the joke. The whole point was to make people think 'fuck' without saying it. 
Let's grant that decisions made under duress are decisions from desire.  There is nothing acquisitive about my calling George next door my friend.  My love for the girl from my college isn't necessarily a result of selfishness.  When I worry my brother will get in an accident if he drives has nothing hedonistic about it  The fact is there are plenty of behaviors for me that I can explain without turning to desire.  I don't think I'm unique.  And in that case, Russell is either wrong, or he's making indefensible logical jumps 
Why're they my friends? Because I care about them.  I like spending time with them because I care about them.  Why do I help them?  Because I genuinely care about them. It's pretty simple; no need to guess my motives, cuz I'll tell you :) 
It's true though. Let me state some "evil" things and tie it back so you can see even the "bad guys" want this.   A bank robber robs a bank so he can live in financial peace.   A boy joins a gang for love and unity.   Some kids joy ride with a stolen car for fun.   A kid ditches his classes for freedom.    It always ties back. There is a right way and a wrong way to do things but I wanted to make examples of the wrong way because these 5 traits exist in all of us. The self-actualized mind consists of these 5 traits whether people realize it or not.   I won't even make examples of the right way to do it because it's simply obvious.  
Basically you are saying that 'bad guys' - bad action seems more appropriate to me - they miss the 'big picture'. Instead, to be or to act 'good' is related on the world awareness you have. Right? 
If friendship wasn't about survival then lonely people wouldn't have lower life expectancies. 
Yes, because the reason I have friends at 15 is so I don't die at 50  You realize how ridiculous that sounds, right? 
You may have had your own reasons for doing this, but this excerpt is in bad need of quotation marks to keep track of who is speaking. 
IMHO Plato asks all the right questions and gives more or less coherent view of his principles. The means of achieving a state of affairs that he believes to be just should be examined very carefully though. I would argue that huge portion of text dealing with how one regime turns into another and most other parts dealing with moment to moment practical application of Plato's principles are just filled with bad psychology and bad sociology. 
I am literally reading The Republic right now for my political philosophy class and I'm just finishing the part on how a Timocracy turns into an oligarchy, I know that after oligarchy is democracy and so on. So, is it just me or does Plato seem to put a better light on Timocracy than the other constitutionals? Like I said I'm still working through it but I find the topics in The Republic so far very relevant to today's politics. Blows my mind that something written in 380 BC can still have such relevance. 
When I taught the History of Political Philosophy I spent half a class on Plato. Most instructors spend about a month. "He doesn't think that people are smart enough to govern themselves, and think that they should be governed by the "best and brightest," namely people like himself. You'll see that this is a very common theme in history. Eventually the gods become god though. Next."  
On a post this long, you have an obligation to add a TL;DR 
I tend to view this country as a shared tyranny... the Democrats and Republicans have a stranglehold on 99% of every branch of the government.    
I recommend reading Volume 1. of Karl Popper's "Open Society" (subtitled "The Spell of Plato") as an answer to this. In it, he defends the liberal democracy and stresses the importance of protecting it, and contrasts this with Plato's idea of a benign ruler (or "philosopher king") and the almost prophetic doom of democracy many people derive from his philosophy.   An interesting read, not in the least because Popper knows how to write accessibly. 
I like reading Plato about as much as going to the dentist, so I'm probably not getting it. Is he saying that democracy becomes a dictatorship in disguise? That is we, the voters, are the slaves who seek power by the only means available to us - electing and defending leaders we believe in (applies equally to all parties, I think). 
I went into this swearing to myself I wouldn't immediately attribute all the tyrant qualities to Hillary or the liberal left, and I would harshly judge my candidate, Donald Trump, but in the end the cultural status got to me. The part where it mentioned:  "And do you note that the sum totalled of all these items footed up is that they render the souls of the citizens so sensitive that they charge at the slightest suggestion of servitude, and will not endure it?"  I get that later Plato mentions policy; about tyrants and lawmakers, and we can argue if that's Trump or Hillary all day, but I think more important to deal with is our culture in which the old and young consider themselves equals. 
I'm not gonna lie, I don't have a 9th grade education (GED). However, I think I *sort of* understand what he's saying here, and it sounds like the US is well into the cycle of decay. So what do we do in this case? Is there any saving a rotting culture, or is it best to move to a country that's healthier, and how does one determine such a thing? 
It's almost like universities stopped teaching Plato to facilitate this transition. Average BA graduate now has not read this; if he had, he would be more "on alert" to the rise of tyranny.  
Wait...you don't think Trump...the evolution of Plato's tyrant parallels current...the timing of this post has anything to do with American situa......shit.  
"when a tyrant arises he sprouts from a protectorate root and from nothing else."  a lot of talk about economic protectionism lately, not to mention the appeal to protect us from terrorism.  He said during the RNC that he alone can solve our problems...  edit-you can downvote but anything I have said has not been false 
You guys realize Plato was a crypto-fascist that argued against democracy so that he could create his ideal republic, based on a 3-class system of privilege and power for the top?  Is this thing on?  Hello? 
I read that as "Pauly Shore"... ..I'm going back to bed. 
Yeah, that caught my eye too. Made me do a double take there. 
Translation is hard. It can't be disputed that capital existed, or that the basic laws of economics applied back then. "Capitalism" may be too overloaded a word, but I don't think it is clear that the meaning intended by the translation is meant to refer literally to an ideology tracing back to Adam Smith. 
So how should the reader view the wealthy that Plato is referring to? Do you mean that some of these people are wealthy because of capitalistic practices while others are for other reasons? 
Capital is still a hard term to define, Keynes devotes a substantial ammount of his book to it without arriving at a conclusion, yet he still makes bold predictions and models off of that.       But Socrates is very advanced in his thinking, for example he has a very good grip on what we today call the Spatial Division of Labour and Economy of Scale. I think its fair to extrapolate and extend the meaning of words of the ancients when there is so much other stuff they actually said that shows their understanding of the topic. 
Interesting nitpick, but I'm fine with "capitalistic" as used given modern studies show that even in a "capitalistic" society, birth predominately determines wealth. "Capitalistic" may archaically connote capital mobility, but the reality hasn't been that way for a long time (if ever). 
True, but a dictatorship is also quite capable of transforming into a democracy.  A realistic goal would not be to remain a democracy indefinitely, but merely to remain a democracy the great majority of the time, and put in place mechanisms by which the tyrannical stage should be rapidly ended when it arises.   
There are plenty of big failures to prove it. The Roman Republic, Kerensky Provisional Gov of Russia, Kuomintang Gov of China, Islamic Democratic Republic of Iraq...and of course the Weimar Republic in Germany. And more. Looking at history, Plato's analysis of how democracy turns to tyranny is prescient. 
Yes he definitely does. It's because the timocratic ruler is ultimately a step-down from the ideal kallipolis (following the tripartite soul division).   Interesting to see how such a man favours a controlled state via philosopher-king(s) and eugenics-like program. You'd think  he'd put democracy as the best considering the reputation the ancient Greeks have--I know I did. 
Just to be a devil's advocate, can you provide proof that he is wrong?  Edit-It's one of life's great ironies that we have 3,000 years of civilization to look back upon and gain insight from along with the availability of almost any amount of information you could desire at our fingertips and we are actually the most ill-informed and easily fooled than we have ever been. 
A goal of society should be providing an education of such quality that anyone can be bright enough to be a fair ruler. 
He isn't wrong one iota. You do need people of high intellect and strong morals (NOT necessarily religious ones). It falls apart when someone poorly suited to rule becomes a ruler.   The systems that select the rulers are flawed and easily manipulated because they are systems of humans. It's inherent in every possible system because humans are fallible.  
It wasn't named "Republic". Republic is an English translation of a Latin calque of the original title, which was "Politeia". I think Cicero was amongst the first ones to translate politeia as res publica, which we now call either republic or commonwealth, the latter another calque (as an example, Cicero's "De Re Publica" is often translated to "On the Commonwealth"). Regardless, politeia sort of translates to "community of citizens in a city". It primarily is about the people rather than the constitutional arrangement of the state, though the latter is what most people get out of it now.  
That's a narrow view.  Both major parties are *clearly* not monolithic, and there are varying degrees of tyrannical behavior and ideals in each, most of the time Id argue very little (and Im pretty cynical about U.S. govt./politics in general).  I dont mean to sound condescending but you should really explore what true tyranny looks like, because it has existed and was far past what the U.S. experiences now. 
I kind of wonder if it even matters. The material for tyranny is here  regardless of who ended up winning the election. That I think is part of the point Plato is making. Tyranny isn't one person holding an entire nation hostage and putting him or herself in charge. In a way the tyrant is as much a victim as anyone else, or even more so according to Plato.  If the U.S. degrades soon, I could see it as a result of conservative leaders demonizing liberals, and liberal leaders demonizing conservatives. No one is being held accountable because it looks like partisanship, and conservatives hate their leaders but see them as their last hope, and liberals hate their leaders but see them as their last hope. 
yup, we are becoming a country where half of the people can't stomach the other half being in charge...this will have negative consequences in the near and distant future 
bah, the student would probably just read it to pass and secretly hate it unless he already likes philosophy or a professor who knows how to teach it in a way the student understands  
I would be fascinated to see this kind of system used in a modern society. 
Why would that prevent you from taking him seriously? Slavery and inequality was part of life, but you can still take him seriously in the context of his historical period.   2000 years from now, someone will look back at this era, and will make a passing comment that we can't take American Republic seriously because they used capitalism as their economic system. 
I interpereted 'Protectorate' to mean protective, in a sort of paternalistic way.  I don't think it really changes your point, but I really doubt that the idea of protectionism in the economic sense would even be something that was around in Plato's time. 
Horrible deconstruction.  Trump is not dictator. That is, he might be at heart, but not in practice. His power is very much checked by the courts. It is also checked by legislative branch, and checked by roughly 50% of the country hating him.   If anything Trump is one of the most democratic presidents we've had in awhile (ie. a populist elected by ignorance of the people).   Let's have some respect for the founding fathers. They designed a system where executive does not hold absolute power, and in 4/8 years he's going to go away forever. 
Maybe it was him? Translating ancient Greek was actually his true calling. 
I did as well and wondered if I stumbled upon some weird satire. 
Most of the wealthy in his day would've been aristocrats of some sort, making money off the inherited land they owned rather than setting up an enterprise. There would've been bourgeois to some extent, but very few were as rich as the aristocracy and even the richest bourgeois were generally seen as somewhat lesser. 
Good point, it is definitely a strong and relevant interpretation, especially considering your statement in connection to Piketty's studies on the subject. My problem is merely with putting that interpretation into the original text as if it were Plato's own words. You can see that point in my responses to the other replies in this thread. 
Interesting, you have any thoughts on what those mechanisms might be?  The very definition of tyranny is the inability to be rid of it easily 
The main anti dictatorship mechanism is that many laws have to be voted through by the majority of a governmental body and that there is a second chamber which provides a brake on proposals which are, generally speaking, against the best interests of the people. The third main restraint is the legal system which can veto the implementation of some laws on human rights grounds. There are corruptions of this system as usually the premier has some leverage over all three bodies in some form or other such as expulsion of rebels from the ruling party, peer pressure and using appointments as carrots and whips. 
This might sound great on average, but if you happen to fall into one of the generations that has to deal with living in a tyranny or violently overthrowing one, it's no longer quite as appealing. As such, I would question if this is really a good goal. 
I'm not yet convinced that term limits are an appropriate check on power. In theory they sound good, but in practice it turns the position into an internship for lobbyists. People don't just disappear after they leave office, they have to make a living somehow. 
Why so? Was not his tutor, Socrates, executed through a democratic vote by a jury of these ancient Greeks you speak of? 
A baying "democratic" mob sentencing his eldery mentor to death on absurd charges, basically because they were pissed off about losing a war and wanted easy scapegoats, probably had a lot to do with that. 
If what you got from The Republic is that Plato was in favor of dictatorships or eugenics, then Jesus Christ you missed a lot. 
Do you know what's in your best interests, or do you believe that's for someone else to decide? 
You can't really, you've heard of the eternal struggle between aristotle vs plato right? the two base ideas are hard to see which is argue either way and we've been fighting over for generations. 
Authoritarianism in any form can never be benevolent.   Advocating for it on the basis of the ignorance of the majority is a good way to demonstrably show your lack of empathy.  
We live in the most prosperous era of humanity. An interested middle school kid has better knowledge of the universe than Plato or any greek philosopher. We made fucking underage kids illegal and banned slavery. Women can vote. Men walked on the fucking moon.   Democracy did all of that. Not communism. Not fascism. No technocrats, emperors or philosopher kings required. The presidents and politicians who put some of these things in motion were average men like you and me. It sure as hell wasn't the intellectual elite who made emancipation possible and ushered in a new era of equal rights either. The people rose, the state listened and the world is a better place.    
I'm pretty sure Plato argued that mass education was possible but so watered down it wasn't that useful. I don't agree with him, but I feel he would counter with that. I can't find the reference on mobile though. 
Not what plato thought and not true. Believing in absolute equality and negating natural order is the cause for disorder for Plato! Not everyone can be a ruler that is the simple truth.  Plato says somewhere that you cannot turn every stone into a statue for Zeus.  There is a natural order. The philosopher knows this order and acts accordingly. Not everyone is equal, but everybody should be treated equally. What you're claiming leads to tirannie! 
That's a tautological argument. It's also a boring one, and rather reactionary. It is operating under Platonic assumptions of "correct" rule; that "rule" is a form that exists only in the metaphysical, and can be aspired to but never achieved.  This is one of the many problems of Plato. Even his aspirational forms are grotesque, in function and in conception.  
I personally don't vote for a candidate or pick my position on issue solely based on party affiliation.   I don't care if someone is a Democrat or a Republican... I just vote for the person that I feel will be the best choice.    It just seems like there ought to be a better choice than just either/or...   America needs a viable third party(not one that's a clone of the existing two parties, obviously) :) 
I saw a lot of similarities of what Plato described and US history. He is not wrong when he points out a lot of the issues that plague democracies.   That being said, we HAVE been through accusation, law suits, impeachments, and assassinations. We have also recovered and kept a strong democracy throughout those issues. Our constitution, as well as our checks and balances, has made sure our democracy withholds its integrity, and combined with such unprecedentedly short term limits, the formation of tyranny is stunted.   Very interesting concept though.  
Isn't part of the problem trying to divide something as complex as public opinion along only two party lines? 
Negative consequences started a while ago. We are already at that point. 
Imagine some like super redneck dude with a goatee and big lifted truck with two US flags attached to it getting President. 
Give it time - most dictators take more than a month to tear down legacy institutions.  
It is a question that has been around for a long time, and different countries have different solutions.  For example, in the UK if the Prime Minister gets out of control the monarch's duty is to depose them. It would be highly controversial of course, and would no doubt kick off a civil war but that power remains in the hand's of somebody politically neutral but knowledgeable. 
The 1st, 2nd, 3rd (outdated), and fourth anendmants of the US constitution. 
So, a stifling bureaucracy becomes a check on the power of tyranny. Which is why the current administrations placements specifically for the purpose of 'deconstruction' are a threat to democracy and a calling card of tyranny. 
The question is whether or not something better can be expected.  I would argue that the only way to prevent tyranny is to eradicate scarcity.  When nobody is worried/insecure about their future, they will not lash out with the short-sighted decisions that tend to eradicate liberty. (So would Epicurus, if he were here).  To that end, social organization, technology, and reform of the way we allocate and generate resources, especially necessities like food, water, and shelter, must be made as efficient as possible. Technology and social engineering essentially cut the knees out from under tyranny, as once badly-managed institutions can no longer doom large segments of the population to desparate privation, nobody will WANT the efficiency of a tyrant. 
So is it spot on because it fits your political bias?  
Not only that. Plato saw Athenian democracy self-destruct as a result of the Pelopennesian War brought on by the excesses of the Age of Pericles. For Plato democracy means decadence, over-indulgence and rule of the appetitive soul over reason. He sympathized heavily with Sparta and its more oligarchic constitution. 
My bad, I should've clarified.  I was speaking of offhand experience people have with idealized ancient Greek societies coming into a introductory philosophy class (things like how Athens is the "best" city-state), not necessarily the strict historical context. 
Did you read the Apology? Socrates hardly helped himself while he was on trial. 
Actually no one really knows what is in our best interest, we don't and never will have complete knowledge so information will always be missing.  People living their daily lives and working their jobs have even less knowledge of the issues than those whose jobs it is to make policy...it's not as simple as you are suggesting 
Both. While i might best know what is in my own best interest in a very small area of influence, the same is not necessarily true if you zoom out enough.   If i run a business,i'd imagine my bottom line would benefit greatly from low levels of taxes and fees. However, society would not, as these things would help pay for infrastructure, education, safety, utilities, things that would help ALL the businesses more than me paying more taxes would be to my detriment. The same argument could be used for things like tobacco and alcohol too. 
I believe society is too complicated to expect every individual to be an expert on everything. 
The question, rather, is who knows what is best for the nation as a whole. That is what politics is concerned with. Not what is best for an individual. 
We defer to doctors very readily, and often without much debate.  
did Aristotle champion democratic rule?  Explain briefly please 
Can a teacher not teach his students? Can a father not raise his son?  'm sorry that you only experienced negative authoritarianism but some authorities deserve praise and honour. What if the authority is loving and kind? And takes care of your needs?  When you take care of an animal, or cat, because it is not intelligent enough to care fot its own food do you lack empathy?   We are all in some ways ignorant. Anyboday that unveils the truth out of empathy deserves the highest authorithy in my eyes. 
Ah, but the capability of critical thinking is the underlying fundament and the most important part of that. A democracy relies on a sufficiently educated population - or rather, a civilized population, where the average man will trust the words of specialists who clearly know more than him, but still reflect upon said words with the aid of logic, reason, and a bit of self-research.  At this point, however, one comes close to a technocracy - which isn't that terrible of an idea. However, I'd say it wouldn't work alone, some sort of political debate would still be needed. 
IQ means little.  I understand what youre saying but it is a really, *really* terrible form of measuring intelligence.  Even more so that we understand the different "types" of intelligence.  There's also other very important factors like ethics... and sanity. 
Not a professor, but it seems like your "political philosophy" class is actually about YOUR political philosophy.  
I agree, but to compare our circumstances tyranny is beyond exaggeration. 
I guess I have, now that you just mentioned it ;-). Do they contextualize it with modern-day examples as well, or is it a "Reader's Digest" version of philosophy. 
I am afraid you are right.  Just the idea that he was seen as a viable president speaks volumes about where the voters' heads are at. 
At least he would have more in common with and more understanding of the lives of the vast majority of Americans than pretty much everyone who's been president, or at least any president in my life time.  And his successor could very well be some well-to-do vegan hippie mom with a healing crystal necklace or a struggling black musician from the hood who works in food service. There's no telling and in theory that equalizes everything. And personally I'd rather have any of them (including the redneck guy) run things over some rich asshole.  I'm not saying it would work, by the way. I just want to see it tried out so we can learn more about if and when it does work. 
but there's literally nothing to suggest he'll do that anymore than any other U.S. president. 
Why not include Timocracy also?  The power and wealth of the capitalist class transfer their wealth to their children regularly.  Those children have built nothing, yet inherit vast resources which regularly intersect with power over the lives of other citizens with lesser fortunes.  I could name a few off the top of my head but I'll leave it to the imagination. 
S/he is trying to say the phrase "I don't think it is clear that the meaning intended by the translation is meant to refer literally to an ideology tracing back to Adam Smith" makes little sense, because 'Capitalism' isn't an ideology that can be traced back to Adam Smith anyway. 
What hedgeofglory said below is what I was going for. What the other person said is also true.  
Capitalism predates Adam Smith, it is an economic system (or mode of production, if we want to go the marxist route) so saying it's adam smith's "ideology" may or may not be correct depending on how we define "ideology" and "capitalism" but it is more accurate to not focus on smith's beliefs. 
Yeah. Most of the richest people in the modern world made their wealth through business and started off life far poorer(that's not to say poor, but middle class is a lot poorer than millionaire or billionaire).  The traditional idea of one family's wealth going up through time due to the increasing value of their land is largely antiquidated. Yes, families still make money off of that, but all the real wealth is created through enterprise and selling goods and services, rather than just renting land to those who do. 
In the US, this is the duty of the Congress and supreme Court through impeachment  
I agree...but we will have tryanny when the people willingly concede those rights to the state, so far we are ok. But I can see a future where some people are fanatical enough in their support of someone to give those rights up to make his job easier...the seeds are being sowed right now actually 
Taking the piss and annoying everybody shouldn't earn you a death sentence. That's kinda the whole point. 
Seems more like they're suggesting that despite knowing that, you'd probably still assume your personal knowledge is important enough to warrant you having personal choice over your being. It isn't simple, but would you rather not have a choice about it despite still having to live through it?  It's hard to argue it's right to give away control over the self to others if you can't do it yourself. 
This is a classist, dangerous argument.  There can be value judgments made on information.  That's what wisdom is.    Saying that working class people may not know what's in their best interest is a terrible, terrible mistake on so many levels.   
I disagree. I know what's in your best interest. You didn't ask to exist, but you do. As a human being, there is a price to existence. We experience this price as needs. It's in *your* best interest to fulfill those needs, and increase your capacity to fulfill those needs, because no one else will. You don't need an excess, but ignoring these needs will see you miserable, and in the worst case scenario, dead. But if you can fulfill all of your needs, and balance them out, then happiness is truly yours, and life will have been worth living in the end. I think that's all any of us can really ask for. This is something I've decided to dedicate my life to. 
Low taxes are layman's terms for "keeping more money", which is rarely the case, yet the vast majority of businesses benefit from infrastructure (roads, fiber optics, water lines, etc.). The degree to which they benefit differs. A big problem is the fact that many business owners don't consider or even understand how and to what extent they benefit. Most people don't realize how much a mile of highway and road costs, how much a bridge costs to build and maintain, that parking is NEVER free even when it seems to be, that having a facility far from the utility grid means a greater expense running utility lines (also think about maintenance). Someone has to pay for all of this... the more you build generally means the more you pay to maintain it all. 
This question will never have an acceptable answer. 
its deeper than that, plato is all about perfection and spirituality (perfect forms and all that) whereas Aristotle is the consummate materialist.   for Plato men are supposed to free themselves from the cave and rise to the good whereas for Aristotle the truth lay in empiricism and exploration. So  devolving into politics Plato's idea of philo kings with gold  in their hearts is anathema to Aristotelian ideas. 
He didn't consider it the most ideal type of constitution (that, according to him, was aristocracy), but he thought it was a decent second best.   In his discussion of democratic governments Aristotle makes a distinction between "polity" and "democracy", where "polity" is proper, morally and intellectually virtuous rule by the people, and "democracy" is a degenerated or deviant form of that kind of government (today we would speak of "democracy" vs "mob rule", but the word "democracy" was pejorative back then).  Of course, the only way to keep democracy from degenerating, or any system of government for that matter (according to him tyrannies are deviant monarchies and oligarchies are deviant aristocracies), is by properly, seriously cultivating the mores and virtues intrinsic to that form of life in every new generation. 
Elaborate. Leaders must understand extremely complicated issues with thousands of moving parts. What makes someone with a sub-80 IQ capable of understanding it? Also, would you draw any conclusions from the fact that countries with very low average IQs are less likely to be democracies?  
True, but it also shows a society full of individuals. Whether people like to admit it or not, diversity is high and people think for themselves nowadays. The pack mentality as described through traditional terms (Republican, Democrat, independent) is not as cut and dry as it used to be. 
Timocracy: a form of government in which rulers are motivated by ambition or love of honor. 
You haven't sorted this out.  Is the point that Adam Smith didn't come up with the word or concept of capitalism?  Or that Adam Smith's ideology is not inline with capitalism? 
"utilitarianism: the doctrine that actions are right if they are useful or for the benefit of a majority."  Are you suggesting that Smith was more to the altruistic side than the selfish pursuit?  
well depending very heavily on the nation. In the US for example wealth lasts rarely more than two or three generations. The richest family in Venice is literally 700 years old.   It's kind of ironic that someone complains about the use of *capital* in a  translation of the Greeks as anachronistic and then does not see the blindspot by projecting the American history of wealth distribution onto it.   Got to be a little careful here 
I'd argue that the impeachment process for the chief executive has a minimal role of the Supreme Court - the courts only role here is that the Chief Justice presides over the Trial, but the greater of your points is absolutely true 
He very narrowly was found guilty and then, when it came time to argue for what the punishment should be, he managed to convince the entire jury that he deserved the death penalty. 
I guess we as a society (and it's probably where we have failed by the biggest margin) need to get to a place where our own desires aren't the number one priority.  This passage alone describes how when people get entitled they stop accepting the legitimacy of democracy and turn to a "protector" of their ideals which becomes a tyranny 
Do you hear me blaming them? How am I being classist?  I am saying it is not practical to expect them to know all relevant information regarding issues...stop making a strawman argument about what I am saying 
By pursuing my self-interest I may reduce the ability of someone else to pursue theirs. How do you reconcile that? I guess you attempt to by using the word balance.  But balance comes with wisdom and you can't expect everyone to understand it that way.   
Greatest good for the greatest number seems to be a solid way to go. However arriving at what that is and how to implement it... whole different ballgame 
"Democracy" was pejorative until very, very recently. Like in the 19th century democracy was still widely used as a negative, as treasonous.   This is one of the things that you'll miss if you think political thought ends with Locke. I find most history of political thought courses deeply, deeply reactionary, and pretty deplorable pedagogically.  
Which could ultimately be a good thing if we move away from the paradigm we have had and come up with something better.  Honestly the fact that he wasn't disqualified could mean that candidates down the line who actually would be good leaders won't get disqualified for petty stuff anymore like Howard Dean's yell.  Can you believe in retrospect that that took down a presidential candidate? 
Yeah, I think there's a Plato/Aristotle distinction in terms which may be confusing things. 
The former.  You only say something can be "traced back" to someone if that person could be said to have started it.  Like you wouldn't say witches and wizards could be 'traced back' to JK Rowling, right? 
Smith certainly thought benevolence was a virtue.  But I wonder what view it is exactly that you attribute to Smith when you say he is ideologically capitalist? There seems to me to be no contradiction between thinking altruism virtuous and supporting a free market including ownership and exchange of capital.  Also as a side note, while Smiths sentimentalism does share some commonalities with utilitarianism, it definitely is not equivelant to utilitarianism. 
Smith clearly was altruistic.  Read his book on sentimentalist ethics. 
I was doing the exact opposite. I was saying that the wealth distribution and who the wealthy were was radically different in Ancient Greece.  
there are forces at work in the world that are broader than what Americans can control.  Globalization is not going anywhere.  The Dems have tried to lean into that reality and build a new economy.  The old guard wants manufacturing back harkening back to some ideal of the 50's when everyone owned a house and the wife stayed at home.  He got elected because people are unrealistic and are not properly informed about the issues we need to deal with. It requires more circumspection than people are willing to give 
Actually this has nothing to do with Dems appealing to people and everything to do with the fact that Republicans went on a gerrymandering campaign last time districts were redrawn thus effectively rigging elections. Just look at the recent federal court decision ordering WI to throw out electoral maps because they were districted to favor republicans.  
But we do live in a society where people don't always act in their own best interest. And thank Gord for that. Can you imagine what society would look like if we all acted in our own best interests all the time? We're not hardwired to be sociopaths, we're pack animals.   And this isn't the result of "if I did that the police would take me away." There's a reason we are wary of sociopaths, and we could build a society where they were marginalised, instead of lauded.  
Hey man, it's your life, do what you want to do. But one of those needs deals with giving back, and helping other fulfill their needs. Another of those needs deals with gaining wisdom and understanding. These things are doable, but it's people sitting on their ass in a stupor that makes it seem like rocket science.  
One of the most frustratingly beautiful elements of philosophy is that it is at its best when a premise can not be answered or universally agreed upon. 
Do you have an opinion on Carl Schmitt? I was introduced over a decade ago and have been noticing a trend in discourse I think is attributed to his work. 
Who do you trace our understanding of capitalism to? 
Would you not say that Nietzsche and Kierkegaard are existentialist philosophers, despite writing long before the term was popularized?  
Someone above seems to have said its the former... 
You don't seem to have gotten the point. The guy who started the comment chain was offended by the idea of using "capitalistic" as a term to describe the ancient Greek economy, because he argues capital in modern capitalist economies is fleeting and dynasties are not typical.   Responding to this I say that this is only true in the United States. In many European countries, including Greece capital very much exists in patrimonial form and as such can be used for the translation without a problem.   OP is unconsciously universalising his American idea of fast paced rag-tag capital.    
Germany hasn't ceded their manufacturing base or jobs and they're doing just fine as a regional power. And their middle class is very strong. 
You can't gerrymander a state, those borders have existed for longer than most voters have been alive. It is plausible to blame gerrymandering for why Republicans control the House but if you think that gave Republicans the Senate or the Presidency, you are mistaken. 
You can't possibly look at our culture right now and conclude that we are altruistic.  Sure there are examples of it all over the place but that is not the outlook dominating our politics at the moment 
I have used Schmitt extensively in my own work, and teach him. On Dictatorship was recently translated to English so now it's very valuable for undergraduates. I used to have to use the *Concept of the Political,* which is a far inferior text. 
I went to a conference on the book.  Lots of people wrote their dissertation on that book.  Interesting stuff.  Smith was obsessing over the book even years after originally writing it. 
Smith believed that mutual sympathy and the spectator's point of view made for a strongly altruistic morality. 
and the spectator strongly approves of utility, which is one way of understanding the "common good." 
But the jobs never left in the first place.  Once those jobs left America they weren't coming back.  Capitalists sold us down the riber and now we blame the politician...the anger is misplaced 
I'm saying that the chokehold that republicans have doesn't have to do with them appealing to more people. It has to do with how voting works. There's a reason that Dems won the popular vote,and that is fear. People in the country are afraid and so they vote against any change.   This is disproportionately represented in the government bc of the electoral college. Country folk don't produce as much and are dragging the rest of the country backwards.  
I would actually go even further to say that culturally, there is a growing number of people who will not only be self-seeking in their behavior, but purposefully depriving others of that ability in order to increase.  We are definitely not an altruistic culture. 
The lesson that philosophy taught me more than anything, and the lesson that society-at-large needs to learn more than anything, is the inclination to ask people "how do you know that", or "why do you think that?"  So many people are immediately put off by a different opinion that instead of determining if it's well supported or not, they just get offended at having someone disagree with them and stop communicating, or get emotional and do something worse. 
After reading the article, I asked my 7 year old daughter some of the questions that the author referenced.  My daughter proceeded to explain to me how the cave men developed language (english, to be specific) from unga-bunga.... Good stuff 
How does one go about teaching philosophy to children?  My experience with teachers teaching philosophy was basically just a history class on a couple of philosophers and their writings.  
I have been a STEM baby all my life. I was a physics major before turning to CS. But my exposure to philosophical inquiry and rigorous, objective analysis have had the singular largest impact on my personal development and my perspective on life.  I have a profound respect for the discipline and I think everyone should have some education in it. 
Philosophy BA here. I agree that philosophy has a lot to offer...and I do wish that it was introduced to us at a younger age. HOWEVER, overall I would say that STEM is still where we should focus educational effort. I think that what we could do is introduce philosophy and philosophical concepts through STEM. I always wished through my philosophy career that I had a stronger foundation in the empirical sciences. Plus, every smart scientist I knew ALSO knew how to think, write a paper, and argue. The same can't be said for philosophers that understood science.  
Nothing wrong with it, but to see a philosophical education as the cure-all is hubris.  :)  
Majoring in Philosophy at university "set" me up for absolutely no jobs I wouldn't want to be working at. An awkward sentence, I know, but I walked out of university so thrilled my younger self had somehow settled on that choice when everyone had been saying that you needed to be thinking about economics or marketing...how boring!  Philosophy as a *child* though - that would've been amazing. 
I want to be a part of teaching children philosophy so badly. This is my passion. I feel its imperative to a person's well being to be taught how to compartmentalize and understand ethical dilemmas from a multitude of perspectives.  I'm a college student in philosophy and I work with children as a Teaching Assistant.  If anyone knows of a way I can become a part of this movement please do not hesitate to message me details. 
I agree with this. If we keep treating children as if they're dumb and can't grasp the realities of life and that they should always live in some fantasy world where magic always happens and flowers will save them from terrorists, then these children will have a harder time coping with the real world, especially when they grow up and are then expected to make difficult decisions in life. You can't portray the world as some kind of fairy tale cartoon to kids and expect them to convert what you taught them into real life logical things. Adults can easily understand metaphors, children might take things literally. Respect children, they also deserve to learn and understand what's going on with the world so that they'll be able to think for themselves later on.   
that is exactly philosophy is NOT taught in american public schools.  people who can think are not manipulated by fear and emotions as easily as people who never learn how to think critically.  
Trust me, do not teach your child philosophy.  I read basic philosophy from a very early age and scoured through every childrends encyclopedia I could get my hands on.   Today I live a life of constant disdain for the masses and their petty lives while feeling tremendous rage and jealousy against those who set aside their morality in pursuit of greed.   Unless you are wealthy and know that your child will benefit from widening their view then better keep it closed as it will only produce tears. 
Children?  By definition, children are very bad at philosophy. They will always misinterpret that which they cannot understand. There are far more important things to be teaching children that they CAN understand. 
I had my niece and nephew over today,  my wife took them to church because their mother won't let us have them over unless we take them to church.  When they got home they were telling my wife all the things you need to do to go to heaven,  after their list I asked how they knew that was true and they just stared at me dumbfounded  like they're not used to beliefs being questioned. This article is exactly what I've been looking for.  
Most people need to learn how to react to that kind of question as well. A significant portion of people only feels offended and mistrusted if those questions are asked.  We stopped respecting questions. 
OMG, sooo true. I try and have "enlightened" conversations with some of my friends and my girlfriend, and they just shut down. It's like they take it as an attack on their intelligence, when i'm really just trying to debate the topic. 
I  agree that this is something that most people sorely miss and I personally consider it one of the biggest long term problems in the western society. However, as a physicist who is not really fond of philosophy, I'm somewhat skeptical that this is something philosophy teaches you. Am I wrong, does philosophy in general really teach you rational thinking? 
Books like Sophie's World by Jostein Gaarder are great for pre/early teens and upwards, and I'm sure there are lots of other books on philosophy that make the subject accessible to pretty much any audience you want. But I agree with you, it needs to be taught by a Philosophy specialist like any other distinct subject, and not like an oddly specific history lesson or off shoot of English. Arguably it has more to do with science then any other subject. 
Basic critical thinking is probably better to teach children than the writings of various philosophers.   
Yup. Philosophers are behind the greatest movements in history.  
did you somehow find a dearth of objective analysis in physics 
Philosophy is a very wide field though.  Just about anything can be considered "philosophy". Science used to be called "natural philosophy".  This brings me to my point, just about all the best parts of philosophy split from it and became fields of study in their own right.  All that's left under the broad banner of "philosophy" ... let's just say philosophy majors aren't exactly in demand anywhere.  You are pretty much crediting an entire field for the accomplishments of a minority. 
What kind of jobs can one get after studying Philosophy? I love Philosophy but I'm not quite sure if I want it to be more than just a hobby. 
You mean not as easily manipulated.  Advertising still works even if you know how it works.  Placebos work, even when you know it's a placebo.  We were all born with all the basic instincts, emotions and general wiring of the evolution branch we evolved on. 
I have a feeling your niece/nephew's mom isn't going to like that. 
It extends into American university life as well, when the people who never had to try to make friends before are urged to seek out social organizations for competitive advantage later in life. The American dream. 
That's because encouraging critical thinking is counterproductive when trying to mass-produce good little worker drones. 
Actually you have this backward despite what you might think.  American students might lack some critical thinking... this can be said about damn near everybody and 5 minutes of browsing any thread on reddit can lend you enough examples.  However, it is the one area where American students perform well compared to many of their counterparts throughout the world.  American students are taught to think critically and figure out how to solve something, not just get the correct answer.  Memorization is stressed considerably more in other areas of the world. 
That's bullshit. I spent K-8th in OUSD, one of the shittier and least funded school systems in the U.S.   For all their budget shortages, lack of teachers and teaching materials they literally stressed "critical thinking" as much as possible. Now, naturally some teachers were better than this at others but the fact remains that critical thinking was build into every core class I ever took.  
where did that come from and what is your train of thought?  
Impissedimology is more like it.  The number of trivial things people hold onto like the last bit of water in a desert...no reasoning with them because of anger. 
Sometimes people try to sound enlightened and they really just end up soused patronizing.   Most of the time it's people just trying to sound more cultured than they are, but a lot of times its related to really dumb detrimental [engineering] things.  "Why doesn't the caliper go on this way?" - "Because it will break and we have to have this done tomorrow"  Though really at the end of the day, beauty is in the eye of the beholder.  Not sure it really matters if people have brilliant or dumb conversations if they feel rewarded by it.  What other ends do such conversations meet?  Sometimes physical application, but mostly it just seems sentimental.  
Most public school systems focus on conformity, which can be a good thing in some cases, but in many it leads to deminished critical thinking skills. 
Just want to say thank you as an IB grad done with undergrad and now in medical school. TOK is the most influential course I've ever taken, I was lucky to have an amazing teacher that profoundly shaped the way I looked at the world. So if you ever feel your students are ungrateful, please cut them some slack and keep up the amazing work. 
For some reason, in my class/school ToK was one of the most hated subject - maybe because it was meant to stimulate thought who knows. Some complained that it was a distraction from the other subjects that actually counted much more towards your overall grade... I really enjoyed it and thought the teachers made a good effort (so I don't it was the teachers doing a poor job). 
I know this is an unpopular thing to say among redditors, whom of many really enjoyed reading books, but assigning a *whole* book to a class of junior highschoolers (or even highschoolers) is a huge undertaking from a teaching point of view.  If you ask the pupils to just read it, only the ones who would probably read it (or something similar) anyway, would end up actually reading it. If you go through it chapter by chapter and discuss it in class to make sure that everybody actually reads it, you end up having almost a whole semester dedicated to 1 book, when you are supposed to be covering a very broad selection of literature, as well as making the majority of students fucking hate the book.  This is why most textbooks consist of explanatory texts and excerpts. That way students get exposed to, and acquire a hate of all the important literature. 
I have long suggested logic should be introduced alongside mathematics.   Reason and critical thinking skills are foundational pieces that have been missing from early childhood development.  
Its not as easy as teaching them "basic critical thinking". You need to first of all have a topic to discuss and think critically about. And you cant just suggest a topic and discuss it without any knowledge of the topic. So we read about the topic first. Maybe it partially comes across as a history class on them, but there should be a lot of discussion and debates in there, which is where the value comes from. Also there a lot of highly relevant philosophical topics that are worth learning the history of on their own merit 
And the greatest non movements. My brother in law. Are you ever going to use that degree to get off my couch, Chad?!"   
Way, way behind.  Philosophers teach students to talk complete crap, at length, and in flowery and imprecise language, without any actual substance, and all without actually *doing* anything.  In other words, training to be a politician, a marketeer, or a lawyer. 
Out of curiosity, what did you study in university? I wish to hear more about your thoughts.   
The title is an empirical claim, that should be supported by evidence, but I don't know how I would go about measuring it. The article doesn't mention it.  
Connections are the driving force of success in every society. It is what makes it a society. 
When you reach adult hood you don't get to blame your parents anymore.  Once you realize you don't like what you are you CAN change it. Happens all the time..to those who don't give up and want to make life better for themselves.  The American Dream is working really hard to get whatever chance you can and make the most out of who you CAN be.  Does everyone start at the same "level" in life...no but you CAN get there if you have the drive and determination (aside from biological impairments). 
I think this is an overly cynical view point. If schooling has been corrupted so that it's just to create conforming workers for society why do they even teach math and English and really any subject that is not immediately practical. If school really was set up to purposely turn us into worker drones it's done a pretty shit job of it consderijg how many people blatantly hate working and how anti capitalist the average person is  
I feel like it's a fault on the individual teacher. I went to high school in America and most of my literature and history teachers asked us how we felt about topics or tropes. My science teachers also made us think about the importance of famous past experiments to give us the "common knowledge" we have today.  
If anything we have swung widely away from that.  You have massive numbers of kids going into near debt-slavery to obtain a college education when they aren't culturally or intellectually prepared for it.  The perception that blue-color work makes one a "drone" is harmful and destructive to the vast numbers who are below median in intelligence, aptitude and achievement.   
I hope that is true. The biggest problem education has in the UK is not it's ambition, but rather its implementation. ie "Show your critical thinking skills by giving us the right answer." Proscription in assessment destroys real imagination. 
Can you give some examples? Not doubting you just wondering what sort of things they teach. 
I don't know where it came from, but I can follow it up.   In some of my past conversations, I've brought up philosophical or ethical questions in a fairly non-rigorous manner, but still some people tell me I'm depressing or they'll just blatantly say "I don't think about stuff like that."    On the other hand, some of my most cherished moments with friends from college involved quite a bit of philosophizing.    So it really depends on who you are with! 
It happens when people abandon the arts and humanities as sources of truth. 
He is a Determinist and she holds free-will libertarian views.  It was never meant to be. ..  He would say that they were star crossed lovers, but she would take an exception to that assesment. 
As an engineer, I must point out that we are constantly asking much stupider questions than "Why doesn't this go on this way?"  Much, much stupider...  For example, my group mate, who is in charge of designing the power supply for a bunch of servos, had to ask me what the difference between a servo and a motor was... I almost lost faith in his ability to make a power supply without breaking everything, right there and then. 
Yes, I agree. That conformity can be efficient in teaching basic knowledge and skills, but to teach complex concepts it really requires more individual attention and detail, and frankly speaking most public schools can't afford to cater to every student's needs the way a well funded private school can. Public schools put more responsibility on the student to initiate learning (that freakin' "teachers open the door, you enter by yourself" poster in every classroom), while private schools focus more on initiating learning as well. Also public school curriculum could definitely use a change too, but then again so could most of those entire institutions. 
Well, a lot of people think philosophy is "dumb" or "useless", so it's not surprising that some students didn't find the class appealing.  However, ToK is one of the core subjects for IB and very important to the program, so I'm not sure why the students felt it wasn't important. 
Also, I'm sick of CS students who can't understand under what conditions a certain branch is taken...  And no, I'm not joking. I wish I was. 
I don't think logic in the mathematical sense would be good. I can't see high schoolers being interested in truth tables and sets. I think logic in the puzzle sort of way would be a good idea. Logical problems that don't take any formal schooling that just require you to think would be great. 
I guess you're trolling, but as a personal ignoramus myself, I was stunned by how much the Greek philosophers lead us out of the world of superstition, and into the age of reason. (sic). It sent religion scampering to the corners of reason for scraps, and allowed the development of scientific thinking which transformed the world. I wish politicians were philosophers... Marketeers are business people and lawyers are sophists. 
I feel like this is an under rated post, it explains a lot IMO. But I don't think its the "best" parts that split off, but the parts that had real world applicability/impact. All that is left are the bits that have little real world applicability. 
I think "this" is a perfectly reasonable comment. A lot of people don't like it because it is purported to contribute nothing to a thread.   In reality though, simply commenting the word "this" indicates a resonance so strong that it motivates an agent to signify their agreement and value of the original comment with something beyond the numerical "upvote".   It indicates that the conversation ought to continue -- that what's been said is of a vein worth pursuing, worth valuing.  
So you agree that they shouldn't be especially for American society. Yet some Americans sure seem to believe they are. 
You do see the irony, right? Not trying to be a dick or rub it in, just checking in earnest. 
Poor parenting can leave scars and habits that extend well into your adulthood. Becoming an adult doesn't magically clean the baggage from your past. That being said, having a good excuse to blame your behavior on your past doesn't mean you should. Part of being an adult is coming to terms with the past so you can have a future.  
I agree. It's not like when planning curriculum, they consider how to brainwash children into mindless workers. How does that even benefit them? 
That isn't a cynical point of view though, it is a rational one. I once read something that described the "perfect nature" for a society that accommodates to our type of economy. Rationally and logically, creating self-interested, apathetic, success driven, but critically thinking deprived individuals was part of the formula for a society that accommodates a capitalist system.  Individuals that are only interested in their own success and goals, with apathy towards anything not seemingly related to them and unable to think about how to question the system are perfect in this model.  Note: I don't remember the name of the article/book/paper although I will try to dig it up if I can if anyone asks. 
"It must not be supposed that the officials in charge of Education desire the young to become educated. On the contrary, their problem is to impart information without imparting intelligence"  Bertrand Russel - Free thought and official Propaganda (1922) 
Because they need more than just bottom-level workers, and the people who will fill the more complex roles need to be prepared for deeper study. They need scientists to develop shit for them and marketing teams to sell shit for them and lawyers to fight their legal battles for them. Doesn't matter if people hate working or even the system at large; they tolerate it because the alternative is assumed to be worse. 
When you're in graduate school, professors aren't trying to create worker drones, they expect you to already be a worker drone who will help churn out publications with their name on it. Thinking critically will often hinder that process. 
Except for the whole having to teach to the test or your rating as a teacher gets destroyed thing. 
Agreed. In one of my classes, (specifically Biology), the class is very bland. Closed-minded, like I said, (partly due to the region we live in, and the circumstances most were brought up in), but they won't even stand for a small sentence about biological reasoning spoken aloud. It's instant laughter, from the teacher and everyone else. It's sad.  
Much as I hate the regiment of school (I even home school my son) you are insightful in your comment. This idea of "drone" is due to rampant individualism, so that only immigrants to our country will work at many jobs, such as care and factory work. all our children grow up believing themselves to good for this, whilst simultaneously becoming incapable of anything else.  tl;dr schools are doing a bad job of creating drones. or thinkers. 
You're absolutely right. They encourage critical thinking at secondary school, but at the end of the day it was still a regurgitation of what we were taught. If I was doing an essay, rather than critically evaluating based upon my own thoughts, it was "give us exactly what we want to know and make it look like you've come to this conclusion through deduction, not because this is what was drilled into you repeatedly." The critical evaluation is an afterthought if anything.  
People to me seem very, very reluctant to engage in even relatively limited Socratic-style inquiry about anything.  Questioning a belief they hold often gets them extremely riled up, even if totally inconsequential.  My father, for instance, once became furious because a scientist on tv tried to explain with physics how the star may have appeared over Bethlehem on Christ's birth.  "It happened because God commanded it to happen," my tearey eyed father screamed at the TV.    Or these multifaceted politically correct groups on college campuses that want to halt the Socratic tradition because differing opinions hurt their feel-feels.  I actually think this particular mindset - no I can't think this way because (insert some ego or psychosocial need) - is the primary source of idiocy in the world today. 
Oh his is very true.  I think being cognizant of your own potential stupidity is the best you can do in today's engineering environment.  This is a speculative and kind of abstract conversation, I just remember a lot of annoying conversations people tried to push onto me as "interesting".   Like the environmental scientist who - in senior year - finally realized that wind turbine blades were "wings" 
"It sent religion scampering to the corners of reason for scraps, and allowed the development of scientific thinking which transformed the world" Careful with this, mysticism took a hit, but religion in general wasn't defeated. Isaac newton, the father of modern science and the modern scientific method, professed religion to be the driving force for his discoveries. "To think God's thoughts after him". Same with Kepler, the father of modern astronomy, and others. 
I do. I wish I had worded it differently, but yes, /u/Aisthetiks makes a fair point. 
It was also part of the formula for communism, and fascism, and the like. And family orientated could be part of the formula for small warring tribal societies. And public and duty orientated societies are part of the formula for dictatorships and monarchies.   People are just easily manipulated. There is not anything particularly special about any culture in that regard.  As for schooling: I know for a fact that my teachers definitely tried to teach me critical thinking skills. So any deficiency I possess is not for lack of their trying. 
The thing is you do NOT just get taught the basics for functioning as a worker drone in school. There's loads of things to be improved in public education, but your view seems rather bleak, given subjects such as English etc are in the curriculum, and you read acutal literature there and don't just learn how to answer emails. 
Yes, but it's clearly not true. There's loads of evidence against that, and people who say that are saying it to be cynical.  
Eh - I disagree. It certainly happens I know, but in my experience the teachers who I had who had *discussions* in class about the topics being taught ended up translating into better overall grades and attitude in the class. 
That is sad. I am currently studying Molecular Biology at a solid school because of my freshman year of high school Biology teacher. I even went to school in the deep south.. 
Sad to see it really.  Everyone thinks they are above average.   Really think on that for a bit and imagine what that does to society.  Thanks to a long history of racism, IQ testing is out of favor.  But I've long wondered what would happen if we simply started deflating everyone's egos and showing who is average, who is not, etc.    To me, the fact that a "worker drone" who can go to the floor, 8-10 hrs a day, work a solid say's work, and come home to a solid middle class living is amazing.  This puts the "worker drone" at the very tip-top of living standards for anyone who has ever lived, anywhere, on earth.  It's not too shabby and shouldn't be looked down upon. 
It is almost as if the people setting up these tests lack critical thinking skills... 
I found it odd at university that you were given only a lecture and a few hours of reading to attempt to gain critical insight into a topic that the several dozen leading researchers you were studying has spent years if not their life studying. How could you have anything but a superficial grasp of the topic? 
Ha! It's very interesting when people with a *lot* of knowledge in a subject don't know something that is very common within that subject, makes you realize how easy it is to  miss something. 
It definitely feels like it. What I like about university is that, really, there are no wrong answers. You can get something absolutely categorically wrong, but as long as you have proven that you have done reading and logically come to the conclusion you've reached, you can still do well. Philosophical essays are even easier - provided there is evidence to back up your claims, you can pretty much assert anything you want. Show how you got to that point and all that's left to do is provide a counter-argument, rather than simply going "no, this is not what you were taught." 
I'm grappling with that concept myself. I think it's the width as well as the depth of reading you do. Rather than studying the entirety of a topic, you're assigned an incredibly specific topic to read into significantly and get as many stances and viewpoints as possible during that time.   Rather than "analyse Hegel's Philosophy of Right", it's "is Hegel's theory of justice retributive or consequentialist in Philosophy of Right" for example.  
Well I mean, what notion of truth are you even talking about? The notion itself is really dubious. There are so many different ideas about truth (esp in the humanities) that to claim that something is a source of this truth is borderline meaningless without further specification. 
It's nice to see people who can admit it though.  I try not to open my mouth until the last possible second; sometimes it's sometimes it just hasn't "clicked" and I'll get it once I can sit at my desk and think.  But in a field where you're mostly making armchair decisions, being dumb is really only bad when you can't admit it 
If you have a good lecturer then sure. With the mass production of University education that aspect can be lost. (in UK at least). I remember writing an essay "Show how X is different to everything else" where I quoted lots of top software gurus saying "It's Not". I got a crap mark for a really good essay. X was "Object Orientation", in case you were curious. 
Political correctness doesn't limit what people can think, it limits what people can be *legitimately outraged* over.   "We're not going to even SAY the N word, little less use it in any historical context, we would rather act like it doesn't exist." It is not politically correct to say the N word in any context, we would rather forget the whole incident.   Sam Harris is a sophist. Islamophobia makes money on TV. I'm not sure what to be surprised about, or what the argument is.   I think you are confused, it appears you think it is not very politically correct to take on Islam, but it is very PC to do so. David Starkey would not take it on if it were not PC.   Politically incorrect = let's not talk about it. What is not politically correct is to consider "terrorists" as people.  
Truth is the explanation that best helps you sleep at night. 
I always talk about a subject and project as much as possible, because I figure that people like to correct mistakes more than they like to give you new knowledge in the first place. The more I talk, the higher the chances are of me saying something not true, than quickly someone corrects me... to which I profusely thank them for teaching me something new. It works wonders because not only did I learn something, but the other person is now validated for knowing that in the first place. 
I suppose I should have mentioned that I teach chemistry. I'm familiar with the idea of a flipped classroom and I think that it works quite well in many, if not most subjects. I do not believe chemistry is one of them, though.   Some chemistry instructors are trying it out, and there's a website dedicated to sharing resources for flipping the chemistry classroom. It's something that I've been considering for a couple years now. The problem is that the time may not be used efficiently this way, especially because chemistry students are notorious for not reading ahead of time. The schedule is so tight that I cannot afford to lose any time. It's something that I'm continuing to look into but I've yet to see it work out particularly well for my subject. 
I do History & Politics, a lot of the politics I do is political philosophy so this is my bread and butter.  
The point that I'm making is that people do indeed say political correctness is the reason they can't criticise Islam, for example. When I see these people I immediately see a bigot, because I know one absolutely can criticise Islam without any serious reprecussions.   I'm saying that people who claim political correctness is everywhere and oppressing them are probably just saying things that are incredibly hateful rather than some kind of rational discourse, even if it is Sam Harris' sophistry.   
I don't claim to know the details of how feelings work and their relationship to thought.  If it did then I believe I would have a full understanding of consciousness.  To me the thread started by a claim that arts & humanities help prevent dogma and ignoring facts.  I say science is much more useful for fixing those problems in the population (and basic philosophy). 
I really like that too, but almost every non-engineer thinks I'm a narcissist and/or a contrarian because I like to learn things and challenge them in a similar way.  E.g. When someone proposes a design, I state what I think the flaws are and suggest my idea - not out of ego, but there are many ways of doing things wrong and only a few ways to do them right and those ideas have their own sets of pros and cons.  Designers tend to fall into patterns of refining the methods that have worked for them in the past - which is good - but you also need to put some "trust but verification" in other people's work.   Anyway, engineers can be really obnoxious people, but it's actually enjoyable when you know they're taking the time and personal risk to criticize you for the embetterment of the design.  
Every the philosophy of x video or book is about existentialism. They need to talk about something else already. 
I like this video, but the conclusion seems a bit too simple when I think about Dan Harmon and his previous work. He often has characters grapple with existentialism but his character arcs never end with "nothing matters so I'm just gonna keep being a dick." One reason most likely being... that's not very compelling storytelling.  
Myth of Sisyphus is one of my favourite philosophical essays, and Camus did say at the end that you needed to find joy in rolling that boulder up the hill. I think things like this Rick and Morty analysis get a bit carried away.   
As much as I love Rick and Morty, it isn't even the best example of existentialism and absurdist comedy on Adult Swim. For that you'll have to watch The Eric Andre Show. One of the best, and most forward thinking shows on tv 
[Abstract] Since the pilot, I have been enthralled both with the series' dark humor, yet more so in its musings on key philosophical issues. Within this video, evidence will be presented to support the claim the show has ultimately transitioned from one characterizing a philosophical world view based on existential thought into a show more closely resembled by the philosophical school of thought of Absurdism popularized by the late Albert Camus. 
Doesn't matter how many times I watch it.. I get a nerd/philosophy/fuckwhatyouthoughtyouknew boner every time  
Wisecrack does excellent video essays, but they need to tone it down on the Rick and Morty. It's becoming the only thing they do. they're going to stagnate. 
I don't understand. Rick returns to earth. He always returns to his family. When we see other dimensional ricks there are always mortys or jerrys, the notable exception being his portrayal of the first rick to discover interdimensional travel.   Does this not mean he is attached to them in some way? Of course rick would say "all my stuff is here" or "this is my garage, and you don't *burp* fuck with a mans garage". But how hard would it really be for him to have simply not returned to earth.   I still think there is genuine love for his grandkids, and at the same time he just couldn't trust jerry anymore. Watch what rick does not what he says. 
For the OP:  What's your background with regards to philosophy? Have you encountered much in the way of Eastern thought, i.e. Taoism, Hinduism, Buddhism and their later commentators and exponents? 
Cause it's pretty easily to connect everything to existentialism 
The Philosophy of Attack on Titan wasn't about existentialism. It was about Nazi ideology, actually.  
I didn't watch the video, but it seems to be exploring a shift from an existentialist to an absurdist perspective in the show.   I'd say the show has always been absurdist in nature, whether on purpose or not. But I wouldn't point someone to Rick and Morty if they wanted to understand absurdism better.  
That's not what is being suggested as the story arc. OP proposes that the character arc of Rick is developing a way to be happy even while knowing nothing matters, without retreating to some false meaning.  
I dunno .. I listened to harmon town a lot for a while but Dan Harmon really believes himself to be a lot smarter then he actually is and sometimes doubles down on very questionable positions imo .. after a while it just becomes a little tedious and going "I m a narcissist - harharhar" sort of ceases to be an excuse if you return to the same conceited BS again and again  
Seriously Reddit and Rick and Morty fans are making me start to hate the show. Sure it's more clever than your average adult cartoon but fucking hell its as deep as a puddle. It's pop nihilism.  God doesn't exis- wubalubdub szechuan sauce!!  
IIRC the end of that essay is "one might imagine Sisyphus happy." which doesn't necessarily mean he's found meaning, it could be interpreted that he has reached a state of acceptance of the absurd and revels in the meaningless turmoil of life. 
It's not, it's content fluff filler. They invented a narrative around an advertisement.  
Wisecrack is amazing, especially the Rick and Morty videos. Thanks for posting this 
Do you really think so? I just looked at their channel page and in the last six months they made about ~45 Videos, 5 of which were about R&M.  I would hardly call that 'the only thing they do'. 
I say that this will be hinted towards throughout the series but then Morty dies at the end and rick doesn't give a shit 
It also makes it uninteresting. The idea that reality doesn't have a built in obvious answer, so you just have to do stuff is one of exactly two options, and is taken almost as a given in modern day. Like sure, there are particular things to say about it, but to anyone who has watched / read more than one video like this, the fact that they describe the same basic existentialism facts, but then say its part of a different series gets redundant after awhile when nothing else is mentioned. 
Also, the repeated theme about the ethical issue of how casually people might treat creation and disposal of life once 3d printing of flesh exists.  Another interesting theme is rick's amoralism. Rick isn't a nihilist. He seems aware that good and evil exist, even saying so directly more than once. He just considers this an inert fact about reality he is capable of ignoring or using for his own ends. They could even mention moral naturalism in that rick insists goodness is a tangible thing you could theoretically measure.  Etc. There's quite a few different things one could go into. 
I found this comment more interesting than the video. If you wrote an essay that went a bit more into depth on some of these things, for people who don't know Philosophy 101, I'd read it. 
Auto-erotic Assimilation was basically a story about A Utility Monster. 
I never saw that one but I could have guessed. I've always wanted to do a write up on Nazi themes in anime. Super Saiyans change to blonde hair and blue eyes for example.   Nazi themes are very prevalent in anime. 
But the Philosophy of Nazi Ideology episode was about existentialism^...^probably 
Pop nihlism is a great way to put it. My friend said it addresses deep concepts, I pointed out it's not addressing them so much as exploiting them. 
It goes into more interesting concepts, people just make the Nihilism seem far more common in the show than it really is.  Fandoms ruin literally everything. 
Why can't something be deep and be pop? If someone wants to directly revolutionize philosophy, they'd be writing essays. Entertainment media has a higher priority in relating and tapping into the human condition through experience, which is something that a philosophical paper can never emulate. Art convinces through an expression that nothing else can give to a person. That is its primary function, and it can be deep as the Marianas trench by emotionally moving its audience, making them laugh til they cry and cry til they laugh without having to be some amazing new philosophy. We don't expect philosophers to be funny or entertaining, why would we expect a TV show to do something outside of its scope?  If it genuinely did so, it's audience wouldn't understand it and it'd be a failure of its medium. 
Don't let stupid people ruin fun things for you. Stupid people love astrology, but I still think astronomy and space exploration are cool.  
The line is "one **must** imagine sisyphus happy" it also follows line about how Sisyphus does not find the world futile or sterile. The Absurd hero is not one who is detached or despises the act of living. Camus himself was a very passionate and intense Human being who had principles (although he couldn't always keep them) and believe in authentic value, just not values which were innate. The Absurdist embraces life and living while recognizing that it could and likely would come crashing down at any moment. That does not hinder the Absurdist.  I agree with the individual above us, Wisecrack very much misunderstood or misrepresented Camus' ideas here. Rick is much more of a Active Nihilist or a follower of Sartre's existentialism at this point. Two perspectives Camus disagreed with deeply. Rick had a chance to be an Absurdist but chose not. 
This is fine but it can also very easily lead to doing fuck all with your life. You can't rationalise away the suffering that *inevitably* leads from that road.   I really think it's something innate in us that hates idleness. I've never met a lazy bastard whose positive front isn't just a thinly-veiled mask for deep inner turmoil. You can see it in their eyes and their empty justifications, they'd rather be productive and useful, but it would hurt their soul even more to do so on other people's terms so they've chosen the lesser of two evils.  
Fundamental flaw there. You don't have to live. You can simply choose to stop. 
Except there is meaning in life, and that is pursuing happiness, which is an action that can always be taken. 
Yeah only the Rick and Morty ones make it to the front page tho, so that's why he thinks they make just R&M videos 
Careful, friend. This is how it has to be. Don't let it grind you too much. If you feel uneasy or believe yourself headed toward your own crisis, change your lens! 
Rick is actually an egotist. Every single one of his actions supports this. We thought he betrayed that when he turned himself in to save his family, but we saw that was just a ruse in the season 3 opener.  
Haha thanks. I've thrown this example around with my friends before when they talk about how deep Rick and Morty is and it's usually met with blank stares. Maybe I will if you promise not to use it as homework lol  
Green eyes. The blonde hair is the only similarity, seems like a stretch to me 
I'm pretty sure the philosophy isn't why people watch and love the show. The show's persistent shittalking and utter disregard for reverence is pretty consistently the main draw for the majority of fans I've spoken with. The nihilism and existentialism is just the vessel. 
Yup, that's why I tend to ignore the majority of the fans of shit I like. 
Oh yeah it won't really, my comment was mostly me expressing my frustration with internet fandom. When I watch it with friends we don't divulge in "this is deep" so I'm still content. :) 
I don't think being busy for busy sake or level of activity is the innate subconscious goal. I think it has more to do with having control or conversely losing control. Overall the lazy man would rather be effective than be busy or lazy or whichever conserves energy and increases output the most. However effective *and* lazy may be energy conservation at its finest. 
Inactivity is not the inevitable conclusion from finding meaning in nothing. Finding meaning in nothing is just the same as finding meaning in religion, music, etc. However, there would be no perceivable let-downs because nothing can't deceive you as would the things aforementioned. In a way, the appeal to absurdity may be the best chance at living a somewhat happy life as everything you do is made from a place of complete personal control, instead of being dictated by outside forces like religion or other institutions.  
Can you?   Legally it would seem the State has possession of your body. If the thought that you don't wanna continue living is shared with what the State calls a "mandatory reporter" you'll be held in psychiatric care against your will.   Socially, if your intent to take your life is made public, others will feel compelled (perhaps legally and their idea of morally, too) to report it or physically restrain you. They often won't accept your rationale.  Psychiatrically, suicidal ideation is thought to be a disorder and you will be treated for said ailement.  You may desire to stop living, but at no point is it a choice you can make yourself in a circle of thinking greater than your autonomy. 
You're looking at these things way too literally.  Being a nihilist or existentialist doesn't mean finding no happiness or joy in life. Just not holding meaning beyond those simple joys. Why is the world terrible? Because it is. Why do I like cake? Because I do. Why don't I kill myself, because I don't see any reason to and I want to eat more cake.  And 'living each day as your last' doesn't mean literally pretending that the world is ending tomorrow, just not putting things off till tomorrow if you can do them today (things you want to do).  
It's not the similar content of the videos that bothers her/him. It's the existential issue. I don't like being reminded of it much either.  
If you could post that essay by midnight Pacific time, I would read it too. APA format is the most readable, don't you think?  
How about a YouTube video? We need a better philosophy channel that looks at modern media/culture. 
and the whole extermination and enslavement of inferior species thing 
I loved that episode as well. It got me really interested to watch the show, but I couldn't get more than a half way through.  Just couldn't take all the melodrama and well, anime tropes. I used to watch anime when I was younger, but now it just annoys the hell out of me.   
Aren't we talking about Buddhism here? The concept of doing without doing? 
All of this is laughably obvious, if you're really serious about killing yourself you would know better than to mention any of your feelings to anyone who could possibly jeopardize your pursuit by telling the authorities, all you have to do is go home and wrap your lips around a revolver, it's that easy. 
For me it's about the fact that life is kind of weird. I cannot believe that there is anything other than nothing after I die. Some people would say this would remove all meaning from life not quite the opposite. It means that I give my life meaning through my own actions.  
For what it's worth there are plenty of anime shows that avoid those common anime tropes. You're probably thinking of shonen anime which is meant for teenage boys essentially. There are is also a seinen which is meant for a more mature adult audience, plus other genres intended for both young and older female a as well. 
A lot of people support assisted suicide for terminally ill patients. This is due to them not having to experience great pain and suffering when there is no chance of recovery.  Depression is not curable or even reliably treatable in some cases. It also causes great pain and suffering. It's not that far of a leap from there to support it if they have tried to get help and nothing really worked. 
That is also obvious. Of course you can just jump from a cliff.  The point in the comment you responded to was to discuss the issues of suicide in a context of acceptance of the choice by other people, not how difficult it is to kill yourself.  You can choose to not live anymore, but that decision will not go on free of influence. There will be forces all around to try and revert your decision. That's the point of the first two words in his comment, by my interpretation: "Can you [simply choose to stop living]?" 
what if you're just programmed to think that and are actually deluding yourself? would that matter? 
We're talking about the nature of meaning. This falls into philosophy, psychology, sociology, humanities, design, politics, etc. 
I think Rick acknowledges the existence of others, but in an infinite multiverse, any one individual's existence is worthless. Why should I care if my current granddaughter is killed if I have infinite granddaughters in other universes? 
Yes, yes you can. If a person is in the unfortunate state of mind where suicide seems like the ideal route to take, how much consideration do you really think they're going to have for other people, being fully prepared to take their own life? Fuck the other people, suicide is a means of getting away from the other people, if anything the prospect of spitefully impacting the other people with your messy aftermath only serves to sweeten the deal. Nobody commits suicide just because they innately hate themselves, it's living within the confines of a system they didn't ask for, the imperious nature of others and the restrictions they impose upon your life, the forced guilt, the failed expectations, consecutive disappointments, social exercises in futility, you don't drive yourself to suicide, *they* do. Imagine being born in a world with no people, growing up as a feral child in a scenario akin to a twilight zone episode, suicide would never come remotely close to crossing your mind.  
That is pretty clearly refuted in the episode where he sacrifices himself for Morty, telling him to be better than he was. Rick doesn't have a consistent framework for his actions because he is a deeply depressed individual who actually avoids introspection whenever he can. 
"The German philosopher Friedrich Nietzsche, for example, embraced Nihilism."  God damn you Crash Course. 
One thing I struggle with, and paraphrasing- if the world has no purpose, you have to imbue it with one.  And some people can find this exhilarating.  But I am not one.  If I have created a purpose from my own will, and I know at its core, that it is phony.  I will always know that the purpose is something created, a fictional device, to help me cope with existence.  My struggle with being faithless, whether that is to purpose or any other belief, is that I have nothing to hold on to, and anything I create, I will know the truth of its origin.      
I've been having an existential crisis lately and didn't know what it was actually called until now. Thank god I don't feel like the only one 
I recognize this video. I got to the point where they called Nietzsche a nihilist and turned it off immediately. 
I think a problem many people may encounter is that it's too overwhelming to the idea that we are completely free to make our own choices and they are confining themselves to some kind of guidelines others tell them to make it easier. Now I'm talking practically, not total anarchy or anything like that. It's important to stay authentic because if you aren't being authentic are you really even being you? 
Can Crash Course vids just be banned from /r/philosophy? 
Watching this was the best 8 minutes I've used today. Great video OP 
This thread is full of Philosophy majors trying to find meaning in their degree by critiquing a 'CRASH COURSE' (emphasis on that part) on Philosophy.   The beauty and horror of Philosophy  is that you can argue almost anything and make it fit your box of understanding, but in a 10 minute video it's almost impossible to cover every character and idea in the same depth universities do.     
I really enjoy all of the crash course videos. I'm not exactly an expert in any of the fields but,  are they fairly accurate with most of their lessons?  
Can someone tell me if existentialism is still a viable world-view for a modern philosopher? How many modern existentialist philosophers are there? 
Oh yes! The crash course series is amazing  (I think the green brothers may be disliked by Reddit, but they put out a great show in their series). If you found this video to be of high quality, then I'd highly recommend watching all the videos - at least in crash course philosophy - all the way through. I've been with them since their first philosophy video and moral luck was their latest one. Check it out if you liked it; I can't recommend it highly enough.   
Am I the only one that wants to know if he stayed with his mother or went off to war? 
Not trying to offend anyone here, legit question: isn't this all just common sense? What's so revolutionary about these ideas? Admirable that people broke from the norm in primitive times, but nowadays why do people study this and revere the philosophers who founded the principals?  
This video wonderfully illustrates the hilariously over-individualist bent in popularized Western philosophy. The idea that making meaning is an *individual* decision when thought as we know it is impossible without language and culture is simply laughable.   We are no more free to define meaning than we are to define words; sure, you can assert a definition in your own head, but at some point you're not doing yourself any favors if you're the only one to accept it.   It's worth remembering that humans process information and make decisions at more than just the individual level; cliques, families, clans, cities, and even centuries-long civilizations have their own "lives" so to speak, lives that influence us and are influenced by us. 
I honestly don't get how people still misread Nietzsche this badly, it's so much of a trope that it's basically the first thing you learn about Nietzsche's work.  
I mean, he embraced it in that he accepted it as given, and worked from there. Maybe it's a poor choice of word, but he did take the idea more seriously than almost any of his predecessors. 
School of Life is just better than Crash Course at discussing specific ideas. Crash Course is great for a 101 level classification-type understanding. If you have no fucking clue what epistemology means, Crash Course can help.  But if you want to know about a specific person's ideas, SoL is way better every time. And their original content is lovely. I love Alain's ideas. Watch the episodes about the Rennaissance and you will understsnd the point of the channel and what it is trying to emulate. It is so amazing and cleverly done. 
Two questions.     1.  What are your alternatives to a world with no purpose? It's not like we have definite proof what your purpose should be. You either have to find your own purpose or believe what someone else tells you your purpose is. There are no other options.     2. Why does the origin of your purpose even matter? You exist.  Leave the world a better place and enjoy the time you have here.  Find what makes you happy and how you can contribute to our world and do that.   
This is why I've never been attracted to the Nietzschean will to escape nihilism.  If Nietzsche so clearly recognized that one could not make themselves believe (esp. in regards to religion), then how could Nietzsche then posit that the solution is for one to will themselves into believing their own moral poetry? Moreover his slave/master dichotomy, I think, sort of lends itself to a more detached and uncaring ethic.   It all sounds fantastic and motivating, but it never really solves the despair underlying nihilism -- the uncertainty of it all -- it merely distracts the individual.  This could well be a grievous misreading, as I don't seem to appreciate Nietzsche as much as others on here. 
I would suggest to read "The Myth of Sisyphus" by Albert Camus, if you would like to explore the reasoning around this question in a little more detail :) 
I'm right there with you. I used to be a devout Christian, and even though life was still a struggle, I had something to anchor to. Now, I don't even think life is worth living. No "meaning" that I create will somehow negate all of the pain that comes with life.  
God, I hate MOR. People kept recommending it and finally I tried to read it. It's just like all other fanfiction. An obnoxious Mary Sue main character who doesn't speak like a real person. The world revolves around him, and everyone exists to make him look smart. 
The Web is the best place to learn about and discuss our existence from a philosophical perspective, in my opinion. I haven't found anyone in-person who has had an existential crisis. Probably because a lot of people are religious. 
Is that so bad ? Nietzsche may not have been a nihilist; but nihilism was certainly a very important topic to him.  You can play the edgy philisopher all you want, but there are enough litterature about Nietzsche being linked to nihilism that both his wand nihilism page mentions him as being a key philosopher for that specific school of thought. 
This raised a question in my mind: should we interpret that freedom as altruism?  
I cannot speak for their other videos, but this one is actually fairly inaccurate.   
I haven't seen any of the other videos, but this one seems pretty decent to me. I just took a course on the philosophy of existentialism and found this video to be pretty accurate. Its only a quick subset and there is much more to be considered, but that's why its a crash course 
I think that's where Sartre gets it a bit wrong: that we have no human nature. However, even with our external influences still being very powerful, we still are ultimately choose each and every one of our actions, and no one can actually force us to do anything. 
He breezes too quickly over Kierkegaard and Camus, but I think the rest is fairly accurate, and a decent explanation of the general ideas. This is honestly where I started learning about it, and it's a good TL;DR. 
I think the only way you could interpret Nietzsche as a nihilist is if all you read was the quote "God is dead and we have killed him." It's funny just how much Nietzsche has been misinterpreted after his death. First his sister tried to turn him into a Nazi sympathizer and now groups like Crash Course want to turn him into a nihilist. 
I think I am just discussing the philosophy.  I have no issues going about my day with happiness, and treating the people around me well, but when the lights go out at the end of the day...I just haven't quite figured out how to properly cope with existential crises!  
I feel like that's valid. It's been a while since I've read any Nietzsche, but I came away really excited about reassigning value. In my own terms based on my own experiences. The only danger I've come to learn from this is that sometimes I felt like I can't reassign again (at a different stage in my life). Shit changes.  
But aren't they questioning the point of their motivations? 
So what is your view on "purpose" and "meaning" and all of those sad ape questions? 
he means the purpose he created from his own will is not universal - not everyone shares it - therefor not an ultimate truth/purpose thus kinda feels like a "fake" purpose. 
That it is just my own construct. It is like saying "sorry" when you are not really sorry.  I might fool someone else, but I can't fool myself!  
Yes, it was very dishonest. There is a clear bias here, I think the creator of the video may be Christian or have Christian influences. But this is no excuse - it is possible to be a Christian and also love and respect Nietzsche. This video is very pathetic in that respect, and the response was lazy and dishonest also. There is NO debate. All the most prominent Nietzsche scholars agree that he wasn't a nihilist. You only have to read a little bit of him to realise that LIFE-AFFIRMATION is one of Nietzsche's central themes. It makes me so frustrated that someone who doesn't understand Nietzsche and probably hasn't even read him can make a video like this. 
The reason he mentions it so much isn't because he is a nihilist, but because he sees it as the greatest threat to humanity. He was absolutely not a nihilist himself. 
How so? I'm actually interested in Existentialist beliefs and I'd like a credible source of material.  
Anything that has function has purpose, does it not? That purpose being the function itself. Human beings might struggle to find their own personal purpose and function, but the universe at large has function. For example, the function of gravity is to create orbit and collect matter to form stars and planets. So in the same sense, the purpose of gravity is also to create orbit and collect matter to create planets and stars 
No one ever does but I find solace in knowing that I'm working on leaving a better world behind even if at the end of the day the world doesn't care. I care therefore I am (or something...).  
No, they're just following their motivations and acting as if there's conscious intention behind them. 
Am I missing something here?  Isn't the "purpose" the survival of your genes?  People overthink these things. 
Isnt that the point of existentialism? The idea that there is no universial truth, and therefore there is no meaning in life.  
You are not lying to yourself when you imbue the world with purpose; like Sarte would say, you are the inventor, so invent. How, I would ask, is being an inventor of my meaning--something only capable of coming from my self--on par with being a liar?  
Why do you think gravity's mere existence imbues it with a function or purpose? 
I'm sorry, but I'm not very good at philosophy. What's wrong with this statement? Isn't that pretty close to the basic definition of nihilism? 
I care therefore I am... I like that. Unfortunately there are a lot of people that don't care who also seem to, be. 
Man, the illusion of control is really confusing.  
That's the saddest most pathetic motivation I can imagine. Yet for too many people, you are probably right. 
But still though. Let's say that you think your life is important enough to you that you should not be murdered. If someone comes around and thinks that your life is important enough to be murdered/ended, then how are you supposed to apply a form of justice?  I'm assuming here that that person and you would be otherwise "good" people. 
As it should. The course is often fairly inaccurate in ways that are not demanded for the sake of simplicity. The course should be avoided. 
Yes, but Nietzsche was *critiquing* that fall into nihilism, not at all embracing it.  
How much of your typical day requires that you make decisions about the abortion debate, helping drug addicts or making decisions about serial killers? I suspect very little.       I'm talking about the things that make up most of what constitutes living. i.e. how we treat our neighbors when they do something thoughtless, or our colleagues at work in difficult situations, or people in line at the grocery store. 
Try reading some Heidegger. You might enjoy it. Discusses care as the defining property of being. Lack of care is still in relation to care. I don't fully get it but it was interesting  
If you want to look at people who live what you see as distasteful lives - you'll find that they fit poorly into any philosophy you wish to assign.  What the implications of that are is an answer I don't really have.  But whether you think meaning is ordained or self-determined, douchebags are douchebags.  Which is worse?  That a douchebag is pre-ordained to achieve nothing but piss other people off?  Or that they do it themselves through apathy/ignorance/whatever?   To be is to be.  To choose to care is great.   
There's been talk of purpose being "fabricated" or "phony." What is it that would make a purpose "legitimate?" For someone who does not ascribe to a religion, the stated purpose of a religion would seem just as phony. Thus, any purpose that has been "fabricated" from the self is rendered more worthwhile than those spread by another's worldview. The purpose is individualized, and because it comes from the self, as long as the self continues to see the value in the purpose they have manifested, the purpose holds, in the same way a religious person must have faith in their religion.  Admittedly, I didn't watch the video, but this is from my personal experience with existentialism. 
I would say it's a subconscious motivation.  I don't think it's "sad" or "pathetic" either.  It's the reason your ancestors were here and ultimately the reason why you're here. 
You could name it something else and not really see how it affects your thoughts and behaviour but still it would be there in the background. 
If someone finds it important enough to murder someone, then he must accept that there are people that find it important enough to stop him from murdering and punish him if he does murder. That is how you apply justice, because society has created a set of morals, or laws, that we must follow and people that go against those morals must be held accountable.  
Yeah, just answer the second part of the question without answering the first one. By your definition there is **NO** nihilist philosopher.  And the downvote, what bullshit behavior. 
Is there a "better" option out there that anyone reading this would recommend? 
Also not very good at philosophy. How do you know he was critiquing it? Reading this quote -and nothing else- sounds blatantly nihilistic. I don't doubt you at all, I am just wondering how you know that. Which one   of his works is what I'm asking I guess.   
Very little indeed. Like I said, your suggestions are practical, but they have limits. I think they are sound advice for trying to get along with others, but that they fall short in the context of a philosophical conversation about existentialism and the absurd.  Your original comment was making the claim about practices that would leave the world a better place. You were trying to show that it is easier than Dentarthurdent42 was implying, whereas I am offering you counterarguments to your suggestions that show that even if you pursue these common-sense ideals you will still have to face uncertainty and the absurd. 
Lol I am not sure I get it either. Pizza is the defining property of being, lack of pizza is still in relation to pizza.  
I don't see how my being here as a result of it makes it at all a compelling argument. It isn't as though they did me a favor that I should be grateful for. If anything it is a compelling argument for why it is a bad idea. 
The problem is conflating purpose in the human psychology sense with purpose in the "your body has evolved to be capable of this" sense. 
The murderer can just as easily claim that since there is no objective morality, then he cannot be brought to stand trial since the court does not use/uphold an objective form of law. 
Excluding special knowledge, expert consensus is as close to the truth as we're gonna get on specialized issues such as this one.   Do you think you have a better way of finding truth? 
It's not a problem though is it.  There's a field dedicated to it called Evolutionary Psychology.  Seems kind of obvious to me.   
Thank you for explaining this so well. I already knew it, it just makes me happy when Nietzsche is explained correctly. 
Why is it patronizing? Because I used the word "layman"?  Are you projecting meanings into that word that I did not intend?  Layman, in this case, means someone who is not a professional philosopher (or an expert amateur). That would include highly intelligent engineers, scientists and doctors as well as highly intelligent plumbers, electricians and tradesmen. Layman simply means a non-professional, **nothing more**.  And for a non-professional, "Nietzsche and nihilism are related somehow" is enough. For example, I don't need to know the complexities of quantum mechanics to know that Stephen Hawkings had something to do with black holes. I'm a layman in that field, so that would suffice. If I wanted to know more, **then** I need to find out **how** they are related.  Likewise, if I were a layman, I wouldn't need to know Nietzsche's opinion of nihilism, only that he was related to that topic. 
That sounds really nice actually, I might try to read more about it. 
How is the statement nonsensical? You and I are made up of molecules which comprise a chemically-bound physical whole. This is scientifically proven. We are made up of the same carbon and other elements that make up any number of other objects/entities that exist within this universe, and we are capable of thought. If we agree that the objects within the known universe are in essence a part of it, then it follows that logically we are, essentially, a sentient piece of the universe itself. Since things in the universe are comprised of atoms, then stating that a person is a "pile of atoms that can think and feel" is fairly accurate, though it could be argued that the use of "pile" might be a bit off, perched precariously on two legs as we bipeds often are. 
Here in turkey we have mandatory philosophy at grades 11 and 12, however it's awful... We do more memorizing than actual thinking :( 
What would you propose we remove from the current curriculum to supplant it with philosophy? Or, are you proposing we add it on top of everything else? Please do not read my comment as having a nasty tone. I'm writing this in an inquisitive and polite tone. :-) 
I place as much faith in the Canadian education system to teach me philosophy, as I did in their ability to teach me french.  That is to say, not very well. VHS tapes of talking pineapples can only do so much. 
Why are people with philosophy degrees so convinced that no other fields use or teach logic? 
While definitely a much needed and beneficial subject I think that if the school system does begin to enforce it the subject will be taught very poorly and not in the intended manner. It's a subject that requires caution to teach but if taught well can be greatly rewarding.  
School districts in the US are still battling over teaching something as fundamental as evolution and you think they can handle something as abstract as philosophy. Get real bro.  
I'm a teacher (grade 6) and while philosophy isn't a core subject. It doesn't mean you can't think philosophically.  It's all about how you phrase things and encourage kids to think. Self discovery and some big open ended questions can prompt them to question their world and wonder.   Last year something came up where we discussed what it means to exist.  Let me tell you a large majority loved it, and it brought up some great questions.   The trick is to encourage them to be curious, you can do this in any subject. It's hard but and sometimes fails miserably. But when it works it's genuine intrigue and I would consider it a sort of philosophical learning.  
except your example is seen in awkward adults on reddit. not in real life or in elementary school. 
In my country it's mandatory in grade 11 to 13, and guess what? Nothing changes,  you can't  teach people how to think more that you can teach dolphins to talk. 
Public schooling was never designed to get people to think for themselves. 
Why do you need philosophy if we can just have classes in rational discourse and logic? 
The brain does not develop the higher order thinking skills required to explore "why", "how", and so on until around 6th grade.  Attempting to teach them before this age would not be useful for core education classes meant to build the educational foundation of a young person.  However, I agree with you that it should be a class in high school.  Kids with opinions are like trump supporters with guns.   
Holy shit, no.  While I love philosophy and while it was fun in college, I don't want my kids wasting time on it in k-12 education.  This is like saying gaming should be taught in school because you enjoy it. 
It sounds to me that what you're really after is teaching discourse and logic and a lot less about the ideologies of guys like Plato. Philosophy is certainly a good place to learn and exercise discourse and logic, but I don't think it needs to be taught there. It's an extremely broad subject, it's open to abuse (intentional or otherwise) by the instructor, some of the material really wouldn't be great for k-12, and most people do not find the topics engaging.   Discourse and logic could be taught in math and literature and possibly a speech/debate class. When I was in school, that's where they were taught. You had to write a paper about a book and argue for something.  They just didn't do a great job of it, in my opinion, but it was at least there. I'd much rather see *that* beefed up so that "the average person" is better at understanding, making, and dismantling arguments. That said, it's been a long time since I was in a k-12 program, so maybe it already has been.  
If we stick to the ideas of teaching philosophy as in logic, reasoning, and critical thinking, then yes, I'm 100% on board. I would be surprised if many teachers didn't already feel that they are attempting to teach those things. Teaching the history/field of philosophy as you might in an undergrad college course, though, I'm not so sure. 
I've been studying Philosophy for 2 years in high school in Italy (this one will be the last one). It's a useless subject here. The only thing you learn is "he said this and this". Nothing else. Teachers don't teach you how some people thought,but what, and it is just completely useless in this way.   You would say "it depends on the teacher", but every single one from my school teaches in the same way. Why am I supposed to memorize what someone 200 said? It's not learning to listen to the others, but consider some ideas better and superior than other. 
We already get those lessons through other subjects. Math/Science teaches logic, English/public speaking teaches fallacies and argumentative logic, and social studies teaches effects of the group on the individual. The lesson is there, just not as obvious as you'd like. 
I've been saying this over and over again ever since I started reading philosophy on my own time. We learn or memorize information in the states, but philosophy can train your mind to reason properly and discover new things. 
As is the case for all Turkish classes. In Literature class, the exams outright ask us "what are the 5 attributes of this very specific type of ottoman poetry" and the university entrance exam mostly consists of "from which writer's book was this exerpt taken from?"  We need a major rehaul. 
Turkey's education system is crap. It rewards diligence but not critical thinking.  
One semester (or year) of English. There's already four years of that in high schoool (at least where I'm at). And all the most critically important skills from English class carry *directly* over into philosophy.  I can personally confirm that one Intro to Ethics class made me a far better reader and writer than sitting through yet another semester of Shakespeare. 
English literature. We don't need to have 4 mandatory years of reading fiction. 
My thought exactly. I learned my logic from being a "math" kid. Philosophy is a great for things like forming arguments, but things the American public deem more important can teach that just as well (history, english) 
OP's pretty young. I think they meant to emphasize "logic" in more of a spoken argument sense, promoting critical thinking outside of STEM classes. 
In high school? They kinda don't. You can intuitively pick up some good reasoning skills and such by studying other things, obviously. But a direct look at formal logic, induction vs. deduction, analysis, rhetoric, a peek a game theory, etc. would be useful for everyone. OP has a point. 
Schools are struggling in the US just to graduate kids that can read and write, much less do math. Get real, indeed :( 
I actually don't see a link between the two. You can push for both at once. Evolution is being blocked for a completely different reason (ideology).  
I totally agree, and I get the impression your students are lucky to have you. The shame of it is, from my experience training or observing teachers across a range of subjects this is not a common approach for various reasons - so formalising such skills (in an above reply I've suggested these are critical thinking skills as opposed to 'philosophy') in some way may be the only way to ensure it's something that can filter into the mainstream rather than being a fortunate bonus for certain kids in certain classes (not necessarily as a separate course though... perhaps in a cross-curricular manner or embedded in some of the achievement criteria as a more obvious way of linking these to a syllabus's "vision" or "mission" of whatever, which are often otherwise pretty arbitrary and easy to completely ignore when you're not in a meeting with the principal).  
Also the example is wrong.  Of course illegial aliens take jobs from American citizens. 
Hm, I didn't think of that. I'll look more into that later and might change my opinion to 6-12.   Do you think there is a way you could "plant the seeds" at a younger age though? 
This reminded me of the university entrance exam in Ukraine. One of the questions was "What shoes did the wife of the main character wear when she went to the market?". 
Oh man, we plagiarize almost religiously starting from middle school, like every single homework assignment is pulled from the internet :D  And teachers don't care about *what* we turn in, as long as you spent time and effort... Like my teachers would criticize me for printing my homework even though I wrote the thing (just not by hand), and rain high grades upon those who could hand-write the highest amount of plagiarized bullshit... 
Eh, math may not be the best way for this in my opinion, instead if they could teach *why* we do things (say, why 2+2 is 4) instead of just forcefully making students memorize things, people might start thinking more. 
This is an interesting proposal.  A good philosophy course reinforces a lot of the core competencies english is supposed to cover (grammar, critical reading, argumentation, etc.).  In fact you might be able to just use existing english teachers with some additional training (and a restyled course title like "humanities").    Obviously there would be resistance from some existing teachers at first but I think a lot of English teachers would be thrilled and a new generation would just take it as part of the landscape. 
The ability to read and write well is something that is useful in nearly all career paths (not to mention in being a well rounded intelligent person).  Instead we should stop foreign languages, which is useful in very few careers or lives (at least in America). 
are you sure someone who says "where I'm at" couldn't benefit from some more English classes? 
???  Reading is core skill which America already lacks in high school graduates.  
I think logic itself should be taught as a class.  Because some people can apply logic mathematically, or philosophically, and not vice-versa 
Exactly, this is why it's not its own stand alone class. History and English do damn fine jobs of giving the basics of philosophy. You can't write an academic paper without logic, so English has you covered there. Famous philosophers influenced history and that's why them and their basic beliefs are taught in History. There's not enough school hours in the year to add in philosophy which is pretty superfluous in comparison to the other things that are taught. I'd make home economics mandatory again before I made philosophy mandatory. 
"Can", but don't. If it's not among the standards, we aren't really supposed to be teaching it (nor do we have time to do so even if we decided to). What needs to happen is a standards overhaul that requires philosophical skills. If new standards are supposed to be about preparing students for the world as they're purported to be, then these skills should absolutely be included.   As an English teacher, I try to incorporate philosophy as often as possible; however, as far as I know, I am the minority. 
On the other hand it could be like my high school philosophy classes, reading pre-Socratic texts, then a little bit of Plato, Aristotle, Hobbes, Machiavelli, Rousseau, Kant, Foucault and Nietzsche. 
In what way is 90% of what you teach in language logic and reasoning?  I'm not saying you are wrong but I can't help but think that there may be a disconnect between what you're defining as 'logic and reason' and what the OP is thinking of when it comes to philosophical discussion of what someone thinks and why. 
Living in the Bible Belt, philosophy is also blocked for similar reasons.  
That's exactly what true maths is about. You start from the very basics, and then you build up your argument with sentences of which you can prove the truth. Even the logic is a branch of math and people could benefit very much from it.   There is a reason as to why almost all the brightest phylosophers in history were also brilliant mathematicians. 
This is reddit... As far as I'm concerned, his statement doesn't contain any gross grammatical errors (though "all the most" instead of "all of the most" is kind of irritating). If he doesn't want to disclose his actual location, "where I'm at" is perfectly fine for casual conversation.  
As a non native english speaker, what's so wrong about saying "where I'm at"? 
If you can't read by 12th grade then the system has already failed you. 
Have you ever studied philosophy at a university? There is so much that is left out of those history and English classes. Also I would argue that forming those arguments are just as important as learning how to form them.  
Being taught what the different logical fallacies are makes it easier to identify 1) when someone else is using them, and 2) when you are using them. Knowing they are being fallacious should allow people to step back and realize they need to reconsider their stance or approach to a problem. English, math, etc. don't teach people how to argue their point effectively, just how to do research and report on it. They are all one-way communications. 
There's two types of "language" that is taught in school. The first type is spelling and grammer, which is mostly memorization. But the other type, that I'm assuming CherryTomatoGarden is talking about is reading literature and analyzing what the characters did and why, and very much teaches philosophy. 
Yup. Hey kids, let's learn some Nietzsche today! It totally won't conflict with everything your parents have taught you. 
Higher thought is basically blasphemy. Don't you dare throw in the words logic and reason!   Went to a very, very strict Catholic school from grade 5 through 13, I know how that goes.  
Even just an intro involving rational discourse and logic?  I mean obviously some authors would be blocked in areas like that... but everything? 
there is reading, and then there is reading at a high school graduate level 
The same could be said of math, physics, chemistry, history, literature etc. There is so much left out in High School.  Yes, philosophy provides certain aspects of logic that other fields (e.g.: programming) don't provide, but those other fields also provide aspects that philosophy doesn't. At some point you have to decide which is more beneficial, in general, to students.  I'd argue that taking programming from an early will be much more useful to a student in the next 5 decades, than having taken philosophy at a university level. Argumentation, logic and other useful skills provided by philosophy can be learned in other fields, maybe schools ahould emphasize it in those other fields which are already in the curriculum. 
I have, and I feel like my best high school English teachers did a better job teaching philosophy than my best college philosophy professors. 
You're taught logical fallacies in English. At least I was in both middle and high school. 
Kind of.  I am In a bilingual school.  Spelling and grammar in English is one thing, but a foreign language immersion requires the same mental skills as logic.  Add to that doing things as you described- reading, character study, social studies debate, etc.- doing all of that in the other language?  I really strive to challenge my kids not just to give me an answer, but to know why they gave it and be able to support it. 
Really, I'm not sure what I'd think about Nietzsche being taught at a high school level, simply as a matter of difficulty.  Keep it Greek. Highly beneficial, comparably accessible, less controversial. 
Pretty much, yes. I've had parents complain just for mentioning I have a background in philosophy.  
I don't have any experience with IB. It is only recently being implemented as a pilot in a few schools in my county. Not sure what the theory of knowledge course is all about either but I'm interested.  At least the NGSS encourages "nature of science" topics which includes epistemology.   I think the challenge is as I stated though...if you teach this stuff, how do you fit it in and how do you ensure students remember and assimilate the ideas?  Role play and other projects are a good idea, but in today's data-driven world admin and parents expect something concrete showing that kids have learned something (even when telling and participating in stories through role play is probably the best way to assimilate most abstract ideas.) 
I would argue that the logic taught in programming can be more useful than those taught in philosophy.  One of my biggest problems with philosophy in general is that if it tries to distinguish itself from the other sciences, it can only do so via metaphysics. All natural subjects are covered by some kind of science or mathematics.   But metaphysics, by their very nature, are not tied to any physical anchors except for where you decide they are. At lower levels this leads to insane propositions that are, because of unproven and untestable premises,  perfectly logical, and perfectly useless.   I think it is far more useful to teach concrete, practical logic first via the sciences, and then to let those who are interested later move into more abstract logic. 
side point- but I think they need to be even more explicit that ad hominem isn't a logical fallacy unless you try to use it for the purpose of advancing an argument.  TO many times i'll see someone make an argument, then end it with an insult. (or start it with an insult, like "you're an idiot. Now here is why you argument is poor...") and then the responder just goes "thats an ad hominem logical fallacy".  Except it isn't.  It's just a tacked on insult.  He/she wasn't trying to advance the argument with that insult.  They didn't say "you are an idiot and because of that your argument is poor...."  Also sometimes ad hominems aren't fallacious even if they are used in the undermining of the opponents argument way. For instance in places where credibility is crucial, like an author's testimonial.  ok im done 
Good for you teaching your kids logic like that! I never quite got the whole foreign language thing myself, as a math and computer programming guy that part of my brain never clicked. And now my girlfriend speaks another language as her first language :P She speaks English almost as well as me though fortunately. 
The Germans do definitely have a bit of an edge of controversy in them compared to the Greeks.  
Which is interesting considering the history of Christianity and philosophy, which has been close since.. when, Augustine? Aquinas at the latest. At some point some Protestant denominations seemed to ditch it. I wonder when and why. 
This is why I will send my kids to private school.  
I agree with you re: the complex set of obstacles to implementing such a system. The most likely killer at the end of the day would be the data... "your students overwhelmingly state they really enjoy the class and are gaining a lot from it, but how can we in head office keep track of their achievement on a numerical scale for the contentment of county treasurers and the four parents who question the subject vocally in meetings? please spend the next 20 hours plotting their qualitative development against this completely arbitrary quantitative pie chart which is actually meant to be used for a different subject". Never say never though eh. 
Nice generalization.  How do you know it was "uncommon"?  How do you support that argument?  Are you using just your personal experience to generalize that all US students were taught like you were?  Or do you have supporting evidence?   
IMO certain Protestant denominations became so saturated with uneducated folks in poor rural areas that only a literal interpretation of the bible became acceptable because it was the easiest to understand. A lot of the religious philosophy then went out the window with any talk of symbolism or other abstract concepts.  
No kidding. Our biology teacher can't teach evolution else risks his job. We don't have AP history because it represents a  "liberal agenda". About half our classrooms have crosses and pictures of Jesus hanging on the walls, and bibles on their bookshelves. We used to have mandatory prayer, which is now a "moment of silence to clear your mind, or pray".  Sports teams pray before games, often led by the coaches.   During a unit covering cryptology we watched a documentary on the enigma machine and Alan Turing. A few students and parents complained that it was "making fun of their beliefs" and "promoting a sinful lifestyle."    Actual "philosophy" courses including  courses in critical thinking / informal logic wouldn't last long. Although I think a number of students would love to take them, the community would quickly shut it down.  
Just loads of personal experience and lots of daily evidence that the vast majority of people, including scientists, have little to no understanding of logic and fallacy. A quality philosophical education can help you identify such shortcomings. I've found most students in the us can't disect a sentence much less identify a fallacy. Find some evidence that it is common. I'd love to see it. I'm always happy to see education getting better. 
So, you can just tack on any philosopher and vaguely attach their writings to any tv show and place it in this subreddit? 
Wow. Way to completely fumble the conclusion lol. These people are miserable and make everyone around them miserable. It's entertaining to watch but it is moral and practical deprivation of real fulfillment. They are in fact depraved and suffer for it. If somehow you saw any of this as positive you are the problem with our generation.  
I feel some of his points rely on only seeing what he showed us. Because if there is another thing to take away from Always Sunny, it would be the dangers of people who live that way.   Take Cricket, he was living a life that, while not as free as theirs, was objectively better than where he is now due almost entirely to them.   And the way that Dee and Dennis hold themselves back from achievement by using drugs whenever they decide to try and do something with their lives.   I'm just a layperson tho. (Sure hope I spelled that right.) So I don't truly understand any of this on any academic level. But it seems that this video was also aimed at laypeople.  
I don't think I agree with anything from this video. I think it's a scripted tv show and if you're digging for a deeper meaning you can pick and choose moments that support your theory based on its 11 seasons. I think you could easily make the same argument with Friends or Seinfeld based on its longevity and picking moments. But then you could easily pair it with a different philosophy.  
Username does not check out  Unless oxen are some real cynical bastards 
This wasn't a bad explanation of Nietzsche imo, what did you disagree with? 
I've also never seen a TV show or movie character pronounce Nietzsche's name properly.  
To me that seems like absolutely valid/sound logic.  I guess I enjoyed the video for different reasons.  I read a book recently, Philosophy in Film by Mary Litch.  She proposed that film/tv can and should be used as a springboard for philosophical questions/propositions.  As a teacher, I'm happy to see the trend in video essays like these that explain ideas from multiple disciplines (Philosophy, Psychology, Sociology, etc.) Anything that makes academia accessible to a wide audience is brilliant to me.   
thats not how i saw it at all.  I read a book, Philosophy Through Film by Mary Litch, where she absolutely persuaded me that film/tv can and should be used as a *springboard* for examining philosophical questions.  The keyword here is *springboard*.  I didn't see the video as an attempt at exposing a deeper meaning in the screenwriting,  I just saw it as an interesting attempt at making philosophy relevant and accessible to a wider audience than just philosophy students and professors.  
So then show which moments from the show are inconsistent with the interpretation in OP. Otherwise your argument doesn't work.  
I watched the episode where he calls for a gun protest in the city and buys shares in Gunther's Guns in order to make money  But on the other hand there is an episode where he says he wants to live in squalor  He is probably motivated by both 
He definitely goes back and forth.  He coerces the group to let him in it and then he schemes and screws himself along the way, just like everyone else. 
I don't think Charlie has ever shown desire for anything other than the waitress either. And my opinion is that Mac doesn't want strength, he is convinced he already has it. I don't think those characters in themselves are meant to represent anything  
Well then he's in the wrong place. Those assholes are in open denial about everything. Just because they're openly shitty doesn't mean they're any more authentic.  It's like... If I combine the ingredients of a sandwich *before* I put them in my mouth, I'm not putting on airs, that's just how I like to eat my sandwiches. 
Authenticity isn't about intelligence, nor about what's doing what's best for you; it's about deciding your values and pursuits for yourself, perhaps even despite what's best for you.  
Scary thing is, I'm the least cynical of all the ox's. Source: I've personally met and know every ox 
Uh, that there was no explanation of Nietzsche? This was crazy -- it was an account of "Nietzsche" indistinguishable from any modern philosopher.  
Nah, man. Frank is constantly lying to rich people and poor people that he's one of them. He's neither, but he seems to be fully aware of that.  
I definitely enjoyed the video. And if not for that I wouldn't have taken the time to have an intellectual thought about the show for sure.   I wasn't attacking the video if that's how it sounded. But it feels good to know that my thinking wasn't totally flawed. I was almost afraid to post my thoughts on the video 
So you post it on the one subreddit populated by philosophy students and professors? :P 
I didn't say there's no meaning but basing it off a "god is dead" and the evolution of the show is them becoming "the most authentic version of themselves" is in my opinion dumb. I agree that they are delusional arrogant and unintelligent. But in the video the guys like "it's easy to just throw around these words like narcissistic" and then claims it goes deeper? No, I don't think so. 
Frank: I don't know if he wanted cash or something more sexual?   Gets me every time, his delivery is flawless. 
If anything, Mac wants respect/people to fear him.  The strength is just a way to make that happen. 
I think it is good that they got across God is dead without connecting that to any grandiose metaphysical claims (which normal misinterpretations of Nietzsche often fall into), the fact that it is just a sociological statement and that it undermines the notion of truth.  That's distinctly Nietzschean and it is something most philosophers would oppose. 
OK. I think OP has the wrong concept of "authenticity" then.   Authenticity, in most existential literature, is a "living out" of one's true self. It's not a negative concept, merely not acting according to societial norms and values, although that usually happens as an offshoot.   Either way, I'll stick with my original point. A person can act without concern for societal rules and norms in a wanton way that is nonetheless completely un-authentic from an existential perspective.  
I hate that people have to feel afraid of sharing their thoughts.  Everyones thoughts are significant.  Heres a mind blowing idea/argument for you on Cricket though--going off the whole "God is Dead" thing, the idea that the fall of the christian value system and the emergence of western philosophy and modern science would lead to total disarray and the end moral objectivity.  Cricket is just a blatant representation of "God is Dead". A living example that the world we live in lacks one unifying value system.  The gang is a living example that the only way of living a fulfilling life is following ones instincts and finding people with shared experiences.  But you never know, Cricket may get it together eventually hahah.  His story isn't over yet!!! 
I wonder if the show would have been as good as it is without him? 
God is dead *is* a grandiose metaphysical claim in Nietzsche -- God is dead is part of the revaluation of all values. God is dead, and we have killed him. But will we rise to the occasion of needing to posit our values ourselves, in the knowledge that they are unfounded--except by force of our will?  
The argument is that they are the only ones that have been able to live life as their one true self because they have shed the societal skin that prevents normal people from doing so.  I personally think that reasonably validates their authenticity claim. 
Don't wonder, it would't have been. The gang "Glen, Rob and Charlie" really hit the jackpot with DeVito.   Frank kinda enables the show to happen with his money and schemes  there is a lot more shit to write about, if it wasn't for Frank the show would be flat just having him in the shot works. There is all kind of scenes where Frank is just idle playing like he understands whats going on and he just kills it. 
I mean, do you like season 1? I think it was really strong. I agree it would've been a very different show and might have never gotten this popular but it would have still been good.  
Season one isn't as good as the rest but that's to be expected I think 
I feel like Frank really opened up Charlie's character as well. Their partnership is a nice contrast to the Mac/Dennis duo. 
It's really not bad, but not great. Charlie, Dennis and Mac are more or less the same characters they always are and are hilarious doing it. It hurts without having Frank, but the big thing holding it back is that Dee is relegated to the boring voice of reasons too much. Even when she does bad things, it sounds like she's really reluctant to do it and is out of character for her. When they started letting her improvise her character, her dialogue, etc. to sound more authentic, the show benefited *hugely* from it 
Yeah, overall season one was more tame. Not worse, just less Sunny. I don't think it necessarily had to be DeVito, they just needed a 4th crazy person to amp things up. Although DeVito is a great fit, and his star power helped boost the show's ratings overnight. 
When did they start doing that? I stopped watching this because Dee was too cringey and made me feel too sad...  Source: am female 
This article was really all over the place.  It mentions Consequentialism - but then dismisses it without argument. It argues that the means are evil - without defining evil. It argues that one must not do evil so that good may come - without any justification. Finally, it concludes in the opposite place it began. It begins by arguing that while Trump says the word torture, he defends it by arguing for its efficacy. It ends by demanding that we call torture by its name, which is exactly what Trump is doing.   I don't condone water-boarding/sleep-deprivation/etc. I definitely don't support Trump, but this article is not well written or thought through.  
The reason tyrants love torture is precisely *because* it is immoral.      Think about it: you've got someone who's basically a decent man.  Once a tyrant gets him to the point where he tortures someone at the command of the tyrant, how can that man go back? How can he look himself in the mirror if he stops believing in the dictator? All the evil he's done will be for nothing. All the screams will haunt his nightmares for the rest of his life.  So he dares not stray.        Torture is not useful to tyrants because tortured men are honest, it is useful because the *torturing* man is loyal.  
My question is what is torture? Where does interrogation end and torture begin? Is sleep deprivation torture? Is getting them drunk? How do you put it on paper so that people know where the line is?  
Arguments about morality are always kind of pointless in my opinion. As I see it, torture should be illegal for the same reason murder is illegal. Most people don't want to be murdered, so they make laws to protect them. By the same measure, most nations don't want their people to be tortured, so they agree amongst themselves to not torture.   Terrorist groups are a grey area since they refuse to follow the rules, but given that there is little to be gained by torture and doing so undermines the international standing of any nation that practices it, it's pointless. 
What distinguishes torture from garden-variety causing of suffering? Let's assume that forms of treatment known as torture could be undergone voluntarily, like other forms of suffering are undergone voluntarily. 
I think we should strive for moral superiority in all things we do, including warfare. I also believe this scenario has as many shades of grey as any known to man. Having served in the military, the prospect of capture was one of certain torture, and likely a horrible, painful death. I personally see a difference in "torture" for the sake of inflicting pain as different than using techniques to help coax information from an individual. Also, there are different levels of acceptable, at least in my mind. I personally have very little problem with denying sleep to a high value prisoner to extract information that could save lives. It becomes more disturbing when we start beating/electrocuting/drowning people. At the end of the day though, war is not civil, and there are hard decisions that have to be made, often where people die on both sides of the coin.  
If you think torture works, ask anyone involved in an interrogation during the 2001 invasion of Iraq. 
What if there was a bomb that could end the human species and you captured the guy who knows how to defuse it?   Would the torture of one bad human being be justified to save the entire human race?  According to this guy, the answer is no.    I don't understand how you can morally justify that position.  
It doesnt at all note why torture is always wrong regardless of the effectiveness,  it just claims "christian ethics" say it is. I am personally against torture but lets not kid ourselves: Effectiveness and whether alternatives are available are absolutely a part of its ethics. If someone is known to possess information about something specific that could kill hundreds,  of course it is at least vaguely justified,  but if you are torturing them just for unknown information, i think not.  
torture is kind of weird in that the initial exposure to the torture isn't actually the point where it's the most effective.  it's actually the follow up, the period of uncertainty for the victim that the next torture is about to happen is when they're most likely to cooperate. because they don't want to go through it again since they know how bad it was.   also people speaking about whether its effective or not, of course it effective, some opponents argue that being their friend and offering them something is more effective. lets give an example if you were taken hostage and they wanted information about your military would you so easily give up that information if they were to bribe you? or much more likely to give that information if they had your nuts in a vice? i mean its pretty damn obvious if you put yourself in that situation.  
I'm sorry, but I don't care what they do to the terrorist bastards. They have given up their right to human decency and life by supporting and condoning acts so terribly evil. If torture will help gather intelligence that will help us kill more of them, I am all for it. 
It's about saving lives. Are you willing to let someone be uncomfortable, in pain, or in extreme pain (but no lasting physical harm) for the sake of getting information that could save lives, including your own or your family? Or, do you prefer letting innocent people die, because of your fear or principal of not inflicting temporary pain on a criminal? Example, if 9/11 attacks could have been prevented by waterboarding (saving 3,000 lives), would you have done it? The answer should be obvious.  
Debating the philosophy of torture during war time is hilarious somehow.   Were sending people overseas to kill and die, but don't torture, no that's too far.  
But there has to be a certain point where torture is justifiable, right? Like say we know that a terrorist has information that, if obtained, will save several innocent lives from a bombing or something. Is it still wrong to torture him then? I would argue that the torture that is grief that the families of the innocents will have to endure outweighs the physical torture that the terrorist will have to endure.  
Great analysis. At first I was thinking there's definitely exceptions through utilitarianism as you pointed out but the assumptions are not tackled well 
I never understood why "the greater good" was a valid argument in cases like this. How is two people being tortured worse than one person being tortured? Everybody feels pain individually. There isn't some collective where both of their pain goes and hence increases the burden of it. Whether 1,000,000 people are being tortured or 1, the effect is the same on each individual. It's a constant, not a sum that gets increased with each person.  I'd rather just not bring evil into the world, even if it could hypothetically help others. I'd still be a source of evil. 
Good post and way to reframe the argument. I would also point out that torture as done now by the US involves increasing the amount of stress experienced by subjects. Sleep deprivation, playing Britney Spears on repeat at max volume for 30 straight hours etc. gone are the medieval devices like in the picture.    
The ticking bomb scenario on 24 just isn't reality is the thing. Torture isn't used to prevent future crimes. The 1000 page CIA torture report showed they gained nothing.  Not to mention you are then trusting (usually unelected) powerful people to decide which people have fallen below a level of morality deserving of humane treatment. It's not sustainable, and it will always lead to abuse.   
If you have undeniable facts that say torturing a person will save lives, then is wrong for the person being tortured not to volunteer.  After all, life is held highest. Waterboarding isn't death. If you only need be water boarded a couple times to save a few thousand lives, thats amazing.  Here in lies the problem. Where is the proof that torture saves any lives? None, because it doesn't.  Just as US national wide internet surveillance doesn't serve any purpose other than making the working class population into slaves and market manipulation.  Here, the means do not justify the ends. 
Sometimes I wonder if water-boarding will be considered torture once ISIS starts doing it to captured US troops.   
It sounds like you're describing Stockholm Syndrome. 
this is not a good comparison because the *purpose* of the U.S. prison system is not really to "inflict suffering on people." "Retribution" is only one of the goals of correction systems and typically in the US, incapacitation and deterrence are stressed as primary objectives above rehab and retribution. You can't just say "by definition" and then use a half-truth.  
Every problem you've listed exists to a lesser extent even in more humane prisons in Europe. That doesn't make prison torture. The fact that people suffer and are assaulted in prison doesn't make prison itself torture. The question is if prison is some intentional plan to cause those assaults and severe pain. It's not. In individual cases I would certainly call it torture, but characterizing the US prison system as a whole that way requires more.  The government isn't some diabolical conspiracy of evil. The government is us. The government is dysfunctional and disconnected, not a conspiracy to commit evil. But it's easy to be cynical and attribute away our incompetence for some kind of outside excuse - that it's the "system" and not us to blame for its failings. No, that's too easy. I do agree that it's cultural. 
You can believe in rule based ethics without being religious. Kant makes that fairly easy.   If ethics are going to be just you cannot make an exception of yourself. Everyone must be held to the same rules as everyone else. So consider what the world would look like if everyone engaged in torture. If that world is absurd then torture is not permissible.  
Is it always better to kill one to save many? How many? Ought you kill your mother to save two random people? Or a hundred?  This is one line of reasoning which speaks against a certain type of moral theory called *consequentialism*, which basically has it that what determines whether an action is morally right or not is its effects or consequences. These types of theories are very popular, both amongst philosophers and amongst regular folks, but are rife with problems which may lead you to reject them. 
I can't believe I've never heard that book. Already downloaded and reading it.  One of the saddest things about this election is that it seems to eschew every moral lesson learned in the last 300 years.  Your last two paragraphs seem to go off the rails, so if you'll allow me to finish your thought "Yes it is acceptable to use violence in self-defence; we would expect the same from our enemies. But torture does not constitute self-defence when it is by its nature preemptive, ineffective, and inexpedient"?  I disagree that people never thought torture worked. It's like others mentioned; it feels like it works to those who process it, because you always get an answer. And sometimes the answer is even right or relevant. But over view analysis invariably shows that it's wrong so often it ends up being a burden rather than boon. And even when it's right, it ends up being obvious there were more expedient sources or you got the information too late regardless. 
In my view, torture is next-level prolonged suffering as a form of punishment, and/or cruel and unusual forms of execution (popular in medieval times). Like being broken on the wheel, boiled/burned alive, or crucified... Sometimes those events took hours, or even days to kill someone - not quick, or dare I say, humane like electrocution or lethal injection.   Nobody (in their right mind) is going to volunteer for that. I think we're hard-wired with a sense of self-preservation that wouldn't allow it. 
Pretty much, you cant. There will always be a hypothetical situation that justifies almost any action. But in reality there will most likely never be one man with the knowledge to save an entire race, who will only divulge the necessary information if you torture him.  Personally I think torture should be avoided at almost all costs, but in your hypothetical or similar situations, the choice is obvious. I dont think humanity or the world benefits from looking at things without a completely open mind, even about something as awful as torture. There are too many factors to consider in all decisons to ever say it can only be '*this*' way. 
Police would likely be far more effective in preventing/prosecuting crime if they had CCTV cameras in every room in every person's house, but any reasonable person would find that gain irrelevant compared to the intangible value of privacy.  The same argument can be put forth here. 
This sub is so tiring. This is an academic discipline and that means a lot of the work needs to be understood before it can be engaged with. Christian ethics is a set of rule based ethics. Effectiveness does not matter to them, at all. They don't mention it for that reason.  
Well the argument against nuts in a vice is that a captive will say anything at that point to avoid further torture. IIRC there have been studies done on this that conclude that information gathered during torture is generally inaccurate. 
Would you say that in your experience, there is an abundance of individuals capable and qualified to do this type of work? Or would it take molding of a candidate? Asking as a form of personal social data based off of an interest from having childhood friends who have joined the armed forces. It's my observation that it could be hard to find people that are not objectively biased in favor of dealing too much damage to be effective at extracting information. It would be illuminating to hear your perception as I only have two sources to form an opinion from and one was combat experienced, one was not. 
I read it and found it deeply not interesting. I hanged on with Adams for a long time. God's Debris was so good, I hoped he was reading something in Trump that I was missing. I've concluded he was wrong, and I was wrong for hoping. I think he's just insulated from reality. 
Adams really needs to stick to engineering and unfunny comic strips. 
On the subject of a root canal vs. Torture, there is a fairly simple distinction despite both of them being painful things that could lead to a positive outcome. Namely, that a root canal is undergone willingly by the subject, whereas torture is not. Most people have some deontological intuitions that compel them to place a high amount of value on autonomy. 
"At that point, we have no moral leverage to distinguish ourselves"  Of course we do. We're doing it to save the lives of innocent people, ISIS for example does it to commit terror, rape and kill women, kids, etc... There's a clear difference. Trust me when I say this, there would be many more innocent civilian deaths if intelligence agencies didn't use torture against people who not only deserved it but against the exact same individuals that have information which can lead to the deaths of innocent people.  
The goal of torture has similarly departed from the medieval times.  This isn't torture to wring out some coerced confession, or anything along those lines.  It's used specifically for gaining corroborating, actionable intelligence.  There's a significant difference. 
...or sticking them in a box where they can't move and have to sit in their own piss and shit. That's not much better than the device that is in the picture. 
Water-boarding was done by the Japanese on Allies (and civilians) during WW2, and was roundly and unequivocally condemned, including by the US. 
I think ISIS will continue with the whole burning people alive in cages and mock executions. Water boarding isn't creative enough.  
Prison systems don't get designed by accident. I can only assume that their effects are derived from the intentions of the people who hold absolute power over the prisons.  Also, the effects that I've described are indistinguishable from acts that would be considered torture when applied to terrorist suspects at Gitmo. 
That's not the real Kantian question. You don't ask "Imagine a world where everyone is a dentist" and you realize everyone starves to death so dentists are evil - that's absurd. Rather, you ask what the world would look like if torture was always used in scenarios A, B, and C. Would you want to live in that world? For many people, the answer is easily yes. For others, it's no. Kant doesn't give a good answer for this precisely because this is question itself is divisive.  Kantian ethics doesn't work by asking about universal behavior regardless of conditions (everyone does X no matter what), otherwise it would be pretty useless. 
Is it okay to torture a baby to save two other babies from being tortured? This is an agency question of course. And it's a slippery slope, because once you say yes it's okay you end up playing god and torturing person A, B, and C to save people X, Y, and Z based on estimations. Whereas if you say no, no matter how many millions of babies will be tortured, then you basically end up pro-torture (as long as you're not the one doing it). Which is a total cop out hypocrisy when taken to that extreme because it's no different than all the people who say torture is okay as long as I don't hear about it.  That said, this isn't even the scenarios we usually discuss. We're usually discussing a much simpler balance of do we torture someone who might be guilty, to maybe save people (trust us we're the secretive government)? Which is where a lot of people draw the line. 
Okay let's say torture is morally wrong no matter what.   Now consider someone has a code to preventing the detonation of a nuclear bomb and you can only get the code by torturing him.  Should I torture him or not?  
Do you think it's just an arbitrary quantitative divide from suffering? For example, if someone is merely imprisoned, that might cause them terrible suffering. But on the same continuum, making a little kid wait for hours in a room might cause them suffering. Where does it become torture?   I'm afraid the distinction often seems to involve disgust and gore, which might help explain why waterboarding isn't so much condemned and TV personalities even volunteer for it without understanding. 
thats why theres further follow up torture sessions. but even if half of the information gathered is not accurate thats still half thats useful. where as you're likely to get little or no information at all using other methods.  
There's plenty of training offered on enhanced interrogation- but most of its illegal now although it was used as we all know after 9/11. I'm not trying to say that the US is torturing people or tells other people to do it. Is there a torturing type? Yes, they look like middle aged nice guys. You know the interrogators when you see them. 
Holy shit.  "Climate change is a hoax because Trump is an expert bullshit detector."  Yeah, I agree with you, dude needs to stick to his comics. 
How about legally mandated vaccines vs torture?   Most would argue that the outcome is a greater good, for a majority - even if the subject may be unwilling. 
It's a bit of a stretch saying it doesn't work. Doing nothing but feeding a prisoner certainly does not work in getting information, torturing might get biased or wrong information but eventually in some cases will get actual good information that could not have been obtained otherwise. Think about this, if torture was so ineffective, why did humans keep inventing new forms of it during the centuries? Just Sadism doesn't cut it. 
You don't just onto a philosophy subreddit and say "Trust me when I say this" 
If you can get out of it it isn't a dilemma. Dilemmas don't have solutions. But many philosophers do. The reason the trolley problem is brought up is because it is obvious how the utilitarian would behave.  
You didn't answer my initial question. You just repeated it sardonically. Multiple people dying in a crowd is worse because of the effects it has on those who lived. People become scared that they might be victims, they might have been hopeless having seen so many people die, and those effects cascade into other areas.  If two people are killed in isolation, and nobody knows about it, what actually makes two worse than one? (Spelling it out in arithmetic isn't an answer.) 
Yes actually it is. Would you rather loose sleep in your own piss for a few hours or have nails driven into you?  
I wonder why they like doing that to others now, then?  Very strange.  Have they forgotten how horrible it is?  They should administer an annual waterboarding exam for everyone.  It should be like getting a drivers license. 
Are you saying that justifies our use of waterboarding? 
But torture isn't the only or most reliable interrogation technique. 
Bullshit because torturing would not get you the information quick with a 100% success rating. Much more likely either A. He'll say whatever gets the torture to stop, wether its true or not be damned or B. May not even break and would die sooner then breaking, or just outlast the 20 minute mark. Hell, C. Could be that he may not even KNOW the code personally but youd never believe that answer from him and keeo trying to torture a code out of him that inst there until he breaks and starts trying to tell you what you want to hear spittin out random digits 
I'm willing to bet that the vast majority of tortures involve completely different circumstances 
Well that's where we get into areas where we discuss which principles are okay to use to subvert someone else's autonomy (combined with causing them incredible mental and physical trauma). Your example of mandatory vaccines falls under the principles of weak paternalism and welfare, and are also quite non-invasive principles. Not many systems of ethics, when explored fully actually think that torture is permissible. The only system that does, broadly speaking, would be consequentialism, and that category of ethical systems is plagued with problematic conclusions that most people can't accept. 
I completely 100% disagree. They used torture during they centuries because  A) they did not understand as much about psychology as us.  B) sadism And c) entertainment ( which could fit under sadism) but im thinking more like gladiator- forced to kill or be killed ( i would consider this torture) 
Do you have any form of common sense? I ask genuinely. Do you seriously think and give me an answer, that if intelligence services didn't torture their enemies for the past 30 years, that a lot of people would still be a live? There are a lot of cases in which torture has been initiated and has saved lives. Not only is that basic sense, stories of such are widely available on the internet.  "it violates the principle of treating your "enemy" as you'd want to be treated." You care about the feelings of people who rape and murder little girls? In times of war and terror you don't go by that rule. Feelings are irrelevant in such times.  
Yes, they have forgotten. Or more accurately, they never knew in the first place.  I'm not sure if you realize, but there are very few people still alive who experienced WWII. The youngest of those would be in their late 80s.  
Stick to the scenario. Assume he will not give up the information in any other way, otherwise the experiment is flawed as we havent controlled for all variables. 
Its a hypothetical. Just answer the question properly based on those assumptions. 
That doesnt matter, this is a theoretical mind experimental to see whether or not torture is ever moral. Its often useful to look at the extremes to test our views on morality. 
So you are saying not once in human history a prisoner has "spilled the beans" under torture. Those are some top quality prisoners if I may say so. 
...What?  What the fuck does that have to do with *anything*? 
In this scenario, torture could be used to save an insane amounts of lives, which is why I'd go for that option.  In the real world, it isn't as much of a no brainer, as a situation like this is immensely unrealistic  and torture would never be the only or best method of gaining information. So I'm still 100% against using torture in the real world. 
Regarding he president he's actually talking about how contrived the scenario is.  It's basically porn. 
I don't think we should do anything to animals we wouldn't want an advanced alien race doing to us. Switching to lab grown meat should be both an environmental and moral priority. 
I was raised on a farm.  Our chickens get free range time out of their pen in the afternoon.  We never slaughtered our chickens because it's a pain in the ass to pluck.  With our dairy goats, they got free range times in the mornings after milking.  The does would run to the stanchion, so clearly it wasn't too distressing for them.  The bucks that were not top of the line were wethered and once big enough, taken to slaughter.  And as far as zoos and pets- as long as they have plenty of space, companionship and proper food- I don't see a problem with it.  All that being said, factory farms are fucked up.  A comfortable life and a quick death isn't so bad.  Being crammed with 5000 other individuals and up to your ankles in shit is no way to make any living thing endure even if you're just raising them to be meat. 
Eating meat is a luxury and should be taxed as such. Then you would see a big change in American diets. Meat is actually more costly to produce and more toxic to our environment than other non meat food sources. Yet, we created a backward, unsustainable system based on demand where it is cheaper to obtain meat products than healthy non meat products. Diets high in animal products also increase national healthcare costs. All of that can be verified by viewing actual statistics, it is not just the musings of some hippy. A regular hamburger at BK costs like 2 bucks. A veggie burger at the same BK costs twice as much, even though it would be much cheaper to produce if the demand was there. Change the way meat is taxed, change the world.  
Killing and eating animals isn't the problem, it's the fact that so many of them are raised in conditions that should qualify as torture. 
The supposition that conditions are cruel for all livestock is wrong.  I have bought chicken from a local farmer.  They also raise hogs and turkeys.  They exhibit great care for their livestock, in part because they're good people, but also because an animal (or plant for that matter) raised in a caring manner tastes better.  I have seen these animals, and they have good lives.  I'd also refer you to the episode with Blue Hill Farm from 'A Chef's Table' on Netflix.  It reinforces the idea that thoughtfully produced food is humane and tastes better.  Only problem is that it's more expensive. 
What if in the future we embrace another truth; that all things die and that the only moral judge is the hand that holds the sword?  I don't advocate for wanton murder, I only assert that the belief in dogmatic morality is filled with variables. If in the future we do things differently that's fine. Today we do things because they make sense to us now.   We cannot do things that make sense in the future, in the same way that we cannot do things that make sense in the past. We can only do the things that make sense now. 
Tbh switch to eating insects, good source of protein (and among other things) and easy to take of, space efficient and less of an animal cruelty issue. I'd fuck with insects. 
bring on the lab grown meat.  If it costs the same and tastes the same, Im totally down for it.  Im sure the "real thing" will remain highly sought after as a status symbol. 
Lab grown meat would be wonderful. However, I don't see how it's going to work without creating antibiotic resistant bacteria and/or work at all once they become resistant (which is already happening). We already use tons of antibiotics and that's with animals with their own immune systems. My understanding is that to culture animal cells it is necessary to include antibiotics so bacteria don't take over.   Please let me know if they have sound some way around this. I haven't looked into it I'm just going by what I know about how human cells are cultured in labs. 
Nobody needs lab grown meat, you all just need to eat vegetables and beans more. Lab grown meat is still going to be significantly less healthy than a proper low meat high fiber diet. People were never 'meant' to eat meat everyday, especially as a main entree to the meal.  You'll still be wasting money and clogging up your vascular system. People should eat meat maybe 3 times a week at most and that should include fish.  
I agree but would want the lab grown meat to be tested long term before I made the switch. I could see some little chemical that is "harmless" from this new meat somehow having a horrible effect years down the road. Otherwise I am all for it. I love animals and I feel they should be treated with respect and love. And it pains me to realize the horrors they go through just for us to eat something we enjoy.  
But how safe is it? I've never even heard of "lab-grown meat". 
The stability brought by peace and non-aggression between humans is beneficial for the progress of our species. There is no such benefit in being kinder towards animals.   It feels good to think about being kinder to animals, but doing it has negative economic consequences (opposite consequence of being peaceful with fellow humans), so I'm not really surprised we're not doing it. 
Though I completely agree with you for today. What about when we are capable of making all of those produce items in a lab with no death. I am all for hunting but only if you are going to eat it. If you could go get venison for the same price would it not be cruel to go hunting for simply the sport? 
And yet vegetarians continue to be shamed/questioned for their values and choices. 
Of course you don't see many farmers taking anti-cruelty positions- their livelihood depends on it. That's like saying you don't see many CEOs being pro-labor. 
Then people will complain only the rich can afford to eat meat, while the poor become malnourished. And if the tax is high enough, you will create a black market in meat just as with other goods in demand.  
As an economist I can tell you that this is an absolutely horrible idea.  You will end up creating a black market, and animals will be treated even worse.  Also, luxury taxes are counterproductive. Maybe you mean a corrective tax for negative externalities.  I'm also going to argue that people who eat non-GMO's and artificial vegan supplements should pay a luxury tax.  
At this moment in time it is not a luxury. It is however an intricate form of culture that will change and adapt very slowly despite taxation. In fact if you taxed this and took away such culture you would be in trouble.. 
I see what you're saying, but I disagree.  Killing and eating animals isn't a problem...if it is necessary for your survival.  Our society affords us ease of access to all foods, so it is hard to see the moral side of killing any animal for food these days.  It isn't necessary for our species to survive. 
This is a fair point that I agree with. Factory farms do not treat animals well for efficiency. If we can improve conditions that to me is a fair compromise. 
I can grant that some farms are not as cruel as others. But do you think animals do not suffer on smaller, local farms? Or do they just suffer less than on other farms? 
we absolutely can do things which will make sense in the future. much of what we call civilization is in actuality the machinery which we use to do those kinds of things, like plant vineyards and educate children. 
The plant argument is self-defeating. If plants were somehow ethically relevant, then it stands to reason we should reduce their consumption. Feeding plants to animals and then eating the animals is clearly worse than eating the plants. 
Why do I even bother coming on this subreddit when the "philosophical" "discussion" is of this quality?  If this was a chess game you would've just thrown all of the pieces on the floor and declared victory because *arbitrary* 
But, just like our ancestors, cruelty is not the way to slaughter an animal. The kill should be clean and swift. The upbringing of animals shouldn't have to be stressful or be carried out by people who have a lacking morale. I enjoy meat just as the next guy, but I truly believe that participating in animal cruelty (or any living creature) before slaughter or during their life is just a sign of being a bad human being. 
I don't think one can classify a long term evolutionary process across the entirety of the species as "wish not to be hurt" 
But would you accept the right of a species stronger than humans to eat YOU? 
Yea there's no such thing as a "lesser being." Every living organism is just as evolved as you are. What you consider to be lesser is actually just different. You consider human intelligence to be so important because of its significance to humans, but that is just an arbitrary assertion.  Also, 'strength' has no bearing on morality. So if you want to make that argument you'll have to forego any pretense of morality and just assert your desires as somehow important. It's like someone justifying murder by saying that they are stronger than the person they killed. It's just not a good argument, and at best is a flimsy attempt to justify something you probably acknowledge as morally unjust. 
I think people would eventually be frowned upon for consuming animals. People already give you weird looks if you were to say fido is for dinner I could see the same reaction to chicken or cow. 
It should cost less, when me and my family raised a cow it could cost 2000+ dollars to raise it. 
That's actually one of the biggest draws for lab-grown meat--it must be created in sterile environments, and thus require no antibiotics at all. 
Hard to find a good burger replacement without it though. 
When a lion sees, chases, attacks and eats a gazelle - it's for survival. Most humans no longer have to fend for survival in the same way. We now have the cognitive and practical ability to lessen the suffering of other creatures. Why would we not utilize that power? 
I know you're being sarcastic but we don't need to take responsibility for the cruelty of other species; only our own. 
In the future, it will have positive economic consequences, because lab grown meat will be cheaper than real animals. 
Personally I would sign up for a good life and mandatory death at 80 
There is however the conservation aspect as well. Left unchecked deer etc can reproduce out of control and then either cause harm or starve if not enough food is available.  
Wow, projection much?  I've never shamed or questioned a vegetarian for their choices.  And my post had no such implication. 
As long as it's not a factory farm (which I'm totally against) most farmers take good care of their animals.  I grew up on a farm and have years of experience raising dairy goats.  The wethered males were taken to slaughter once they were big enough....but they lived a pretty happy life up until that point.  Out where my folks live a lot of people raise cattle for meat.  They generally get to hang out in a big field.  If there's not enough food (winter) or water it's provided for them.  But no animal, being kept for any reason, should be crammed into an impossibly small space and covered in their own piss or shit.  THAT is cruel. 
Meat isn't a requirement for nourishment though.  In America at least, basic products like flour, milk and breakfast cereals are fortified as a matter of course in order to prevent malnutrition. If there is some nutrient so unique and valuable in meat that most people wouldn't get it without eating meat, then that would be fortified too. 
Enjoy sure? But more like need to so that I may survive? Im not saying lab made food is a bad idea but we kinda have to eat. 
But, isn't that essence of the process? The whole point of evolution is to pass down favorable genes for the sole purpose of specie propagation. The desire to not be harmed can be expressed in many different mediums. Does it need to be consciously realized?  
Consumption of animal products does not cause cognitive dissonance.  
Except there is such a thing as a lesser beings.  As a human, I have an invested interest in protecting other humans. I'm a human. They are a human. It's a match made in heaven.  I'm a human. That's a cow.  That cow is less important than I am, or someone else is.  And to me, it is monumentally less important.  
Why is it that "good morality" is so often linked with the concept of sacrifice?" Can we not have good morality without sacrifice? I say we can. In fact, it is us who defines our morality, and we've historically linked morality and sacrifice. We don't have to sacrifice tasty food in order to save animals.  
In the real world, where not everything is black or white, normal people weigh the pros and cons.  Pros of being a vegetarian: healthy, good for the environment, cuts down on animal cruelty.  Cons of being a vegetarian: I like the taste of meat.  Come on down off that high horse and join the rest of humanity. 
"moral" upside?  If I felt a moral conflict with consuming animal meat, Id be a vegetarian.    I believe that our consumption of animal meat is not immoral, we are omnivores, we consume meat the same as any other carnivore.  If anything, our slaughter processes are better than some hunting methods of other animals. 
I doubt you would ever eliminate the meat farm industry.  as I mentioned earlier i think.  i expect real meat will remain an exotic meal at high end restaurants and the like.  even so, no farm is ever going to just shut down and release their cows, they would be phased out over time. 
was this like... a pet?  bad term, but I assume a large cattle ranch would have inefficiencies that you would not.  Ill also admit having no clue as to the wholesale value of a cow. 
Actually we are no use to the world at all. Why should we even exist. Wouldn't it be better for the planet if we just all killed ourselves? 
Because creatures dying to be eaten does not equate to them suffering more than otherwise.  All creatures die, some just taste delicious afterwards.  In fact, I'd say most animals killed to be eaten by a man (imagine a chicken getting it's head cut off) suffer less than when they die by 'natural' causes (being eaten alive by an animal, dying of a debilitating disease without pain killers). 
The whole premise of the paper is flawed, in that living things dying is not a bad thing.  If it is, then 'morally' we should neuter every animal and let the world die. 
And wild hogs!  Good God they're a menace!  One time I went hunting on this property where some rich guy had TONS of exotic game for hunting.  We were welcome to bag as many hogs as we could get because they were overrunning the place.  And yes, we stripped every bit of meat off the carcasses when we were done.  And it was delicious! 
I didn't say you did, didn't mean to imply that. I actually agree 100% with everything you said. However, I, as a vegetarian, have consistently had my views looked down upon by people after "coming out" to them. It seems weird that a lot of people would agree with what you said because it makes logical sense, yet turn around and write off vegetarians as butthurt hippies.  I appreciate your views and the respect you say you have for vegetarianism. 
Don't whales eat like billions of krill over the course of their lifetimes? They're not exactly vegans themselves... 
It is worse for the environment to both eat meat and consume cellphones than it is to only consume cellphones. 
This is what a lot of "anti-meat" people don't get. They see factory/industrial farming and think that it's indicative of the ENTIRE meat industry and don't really account for people who are farmers/ranchers because their livelihood depends on it. People who farm/ranch in this manner typically have much more respect for the animals/crops that they raise because their living(day to day that is) is made off of it.  
Meat is fantastically healthy for humans. Eating an excessive amount causes problems.  
Milk isn't a basic product. Humans don't need cow's milk. 
I don't see how consciousness can exist without thought. 
Why does it makes sense to elevate humans over animals, but not animals over plants? 
You don't need animal products to survive. You can thrive on a plant based diet. 
Every argument defending their consumption does, though. 
Why do people try to find morality in nature ? There is none, and justifying your actions based on the evolution of life on earth is just as arbitrary as not doing so.  
Yes, you can say that subjectively. But from an outside perspective it bears as much weight as saying you prefer coke over pepsi.  So while, to you, "lesser beings" exist, there is no objective standard that can back up that assertion.  
I agree with you. There doesn't need to be a "sacrifice". I don't think we all have to go on a faux meat diet, or vegetarian diet. Animals have always been killed for food. I mean they kill each other for food. The VERY LEAST we can do for animal rights is have regulations that provide our "food animals" a decent life. By a decent life I mean land to roam freely on. They should have an ample amount of space not in cages and be able to socialize.We don't have to TORTURE the animals we eat. Large farms literally torture them. There's no need for that. They deserve respect. Plain and simple. I still don't see what the debate is. Everyone deserves respect and dignity. 
Tough to get off the high horse when you present the pros and cons like that.  The environmental and cruelty concerns should easily outweigh such a base personal desire of how your food tastes.   
Your unstated premise seems to be that your appetite for meat outweighs the moral consideration we owe conscious beings. Do you have any evidence for that whatsoever? 
HE'S on a high horse?   I thought that was you, thinking that the taste of meat is comparable to making animals suffer. 
i felt really low energy bein a vegetarian so idk, its not that easy 
You're right, being eaten alive sounds a lot less pleasant than being beheaded. However, if you think the life of animals who are born, raised, and killed in factory farming conditions includes no suffering but the brief pain of being beheaded (which is not even how they are slaughtered) then you are sorely mistaken.  
Simply dying is vastly different from being killed a human.  When human action is involved, morality is involved.  When an animal kills another animal, that is not a moral issue.  The reason there is a difference in human and animal action is that humans have greater capacity to reason and can behave based on what that reason leads us to determine is ethical behavior. 
That depends on how you rate the moral status of krill - they're basically insects, and a pound of wheat also requires spraying to kill huge numbers of insects too.   Also, in the case of any animals that eat other animals (whether their diet is insects or more advanced animals), you could argue that humans aren't morally responsible for the actions taken by the animal itself by feeding.  
But is it worse to not consume cell phones and still eat meat?  
Small outliers don't prove the general attitude of people in farming.  
What is too expensive ? I didn't even state a specific number. I am poor and I still manage to drink when I desire.  
It definitely can, and it does. You can even do it yourself. While meditating, you are still conscious and aware of consciousness, yet you are not thinking. Really experienced meditators stop thinking altogether for as long as they want. Thought is just a mechanism of consciousness. 
Because you can kill me if I don't elevate you to my level. 
Thats true but we have developed as omnivores with canine teeth used for meat. Are you arguing we evolve away from eating meat because it causes suffering? If its about suffering plants also feel pain. By logical progression we have now classified animals as above plants. 
The act, in and of itself, does not cause the dissonance. Social constructs produce the dissonance.  
Maybe there is morality in nature? Just because you don't think there is doesn't mean it isn't a possibility. 
Exactly. Eating them isn't inherently wrong but we could be nicer about it 
But it doesn't, because we're human. Our base animal desires are as much a part of us as our lofty ideals.   Why should one facet of our humanity be any less important than the other? 
That is what our ancestors had to do to survive. A large number of humans are vegetarian now. I think you'd have a hard time making the case that the modern production and consumption of meat in western society is about "survival". 
You do realize that we eat like 50 times more meat in developed countries than either modern undeveloped nations or our own history, right? Even when we borrow cuisine from other cultures, like Mexican, Chinese, or even Mediterranean food, we double, or even triple the amount of meat, and add it to the things that didn't have it.  
I agree, animals should be treated well, until they are slaughtered for food.  100 years ago farms did pretty good at this, but taxation and regulation forced farms to come up with ridiculous production means to stay profitable, so now we have basically meat factories. 
You can't measure morality.  Your 'morality' is just your opinion.  To me, it isn't immoral to catch, gut and eat a fish.  The universe designed itself so that fish carried the energy I need to survive, so I eat fish.  Sure, I could survive by eating a carrot, but I don't think I have different moral obligations to fish or carrots.  Sorry.   
I suppose that depends on how much of each you consume. I buy one cell phone every few years, whereas many meat eaters do it multiple times a day. 
What a dumb argument. People aren't consciously thinking when theyre asleep therefore consciousness doesn't require thought?   Point is they are capable of thought. And anyways that's not the definition of consciousness, just a prerequisite. I know that we don't know everything about consciousness but it still has a definition, and its not what you are describing.  
A young child couldn't. What does that say of their moral value? 
This is about as strong an argument as the ones from the 1800s insisting slavery wasn't bad because the white man had out evolved "the black man".  Also you're happy to compare eating plants to eating animals but I'd like to see how far you'd go torturing a bird vs a cucumber. 
What? This makes no sense. The only relevant question is: can we live a healthy life without meat? The answer is unequivocally yes. We can overcome our baser instincts and choose not to kill. 
If you ever gave a shit about dogs being abused, then ordered a large number four, then uhhhhh ya. 
Do you really think rape is comparable to someone eating a hamburger? 
No, taxation and regulation is not what caused this. It was better technology and demand. People wanted to pay for cheaper meat and the way to do that was to mass produce and the least costs possible.  That's akin to saying that Oil spills are caused because of so much regulation that they had to skimp on costs to meet the demands of the taxes.  
What are the taxes and regulations that forced small farmers to become huge factory farms? I think there is much more evidence of the meat and dairy industry benefiting from governmental relationships than being the victim of regulation.  
At least try to understand that there is no nutritional reason that you eat meat, and that it is due to taste preference alone that meat is eaten.  I think meat tastes gross, personally.  I don't buy moral relativism, personally, and think that morality is absolute, but that our reason and logic have not yet discovered all of the structure of morality -- just like how math exists whether we understand it or not. 
But it comes down to the individual environmental impact. The mining of oil and rare earth minerals, plastic production, and shipping by sea, compared to the environmental impact of a single humans meat consumption, taking into account the water, feed, and transportation.  
Out of curiosity, what is the definition of consciousness? I thought there wasn't even close to a consesus on the issue. 
But his parents or siblings or grandparents or community could kill me. It's not realistic to kill and eat humans because of the conflict it would create in society, the unrest it would provoke. 
All moral claims are equally false to the anti-realist (error theorist). There is nothing we can say to condemn slavery from a completely objective, desire-independent point of view. This may be unfortunate, but that is no argument that the view is not correct.  I wouldn't torture a bird because it would make me sad. Torturing a cucumber would not make me sad. That's simply how I'm built. Other organisms may be built differently. And that's all there is to say on the matter. 
No the question is not if we can but should we? We dont overcome yourlesser instinct by abstaining from meat. You are still killing a live being aka a plant. 
Very incorrect.  Animal abuse is different than consumption of animal products.   Try again, please.  
Oh I'm not smart - I'll admit that.  I can Google shit though. You wouldn't think that would be setting the bar too high, but you never know...  Anyway, my understanding is that you call a human who doesn't eat meat a vegetarian - not an herbivore because that's how you describe  animals.  By the same reasoning, a person who eats meats and vegetables is an omnivarian, not an omnivore, because that term is for animals, not humans.  
How could you not understand the point of the comparison....? 
When I buy a steak, I pay taxes to the government on behalf of the butcher's income, the stock boys income, the grocery stores profit, the truck driver's income, the gas the truck consumes, the wheel tax on the truck, the farmers income, the farmers helpers income, the farms property tax... and in a similar chain of taxes I am paying the people who manufacture the truck that ships, the packaging the meat is sold in, hell even the lights in the grocery store.  Taxes are hard to measure, but at the end of the day your local, federal and state governments control half of the country's funds, and the businesses and private individuals all combined control the other half.  
I think there's definitely room for improvement in how we consume cell phones, just like how there is room for improvement in how we consume meat. Just because consuming cell phones is bad doesn't mean it's okay to consume meat, which is what I assume you are arguing. In most Western society, it is much easier and more practical to get by without eating meat than it is to not have a cellphone or a car, but I still think we can do better in terms of how cars and cellphones are consumed. 
So it would be morally permissible to kill and eat an abandoned baby you find on the side of the road? 
Because cows are not sentient. You'll have a tough time convincing me that killing animals for meat and products is not moral when I don't believe in objective morality. I believe in a morality governed by creatures who are able to participate in the discussion and creatures below the intellect of most apes, with some other animals of exceptional intelligence, are not given the same level of consideration by me. 
Probably not, because we have a strong concept of respect for the dead in western culture, which mirrors our respect for human life generally.  If you were starving, though, I imagine it would be morally permissible. 
If you want more it's called "Discrete mathematics", which include more complex and more realistic laws. Usually taught to Computer Science students  
Valid isn't a measure of truth it's a matter of weather or not the statements make sense together "pigs have wings therefore they can fly" is a valid statement but of course it's not true. 
Isn't she over analysing it? Drinking coffe is the function and it depends on the donuts and the cream (variables) so it's just an OR gate. coffe=(cream or donut). Then every statement that doesn't falls into that table is false. 
I'm surprised to see the comments implying that truth tables are first seen in discrete math in college. Has anyone been introduced to these in high school geometry?  
Am I the only person who does not understand any of this and head hurts trying to understand? 
Imagine if you had a friend who would always break down your arguments like this.   
This seems like a fantastic way to waste time. I just don't understand the need for all of that true and false when in plain English the statement says "If there is a doughnut, i'll drink coffee." Well, there was a goddamn doughnut sitting right there, they just happened to be out of cream, so... you drink fucking coffee, what was so hard to understand about that? It's this kind of stuff i think was invented because people didn't understand word problems growing up and had to over complicate thing just to make it seem simple...  
You could also use common sense to see if an argument is calid 
Truth tables do not determine validity. They assess the truth functional value of propositions. You may use them to test validity if the argument is converted to a proposition in conditional form (I.e. The premises are the antecedent and the conclusion is the consequent.) but this is unwieldy. There are simpler methods for evaluating validity in most cases.  
I took discrete mathematics in school. It blew my mind for the first 3 weeks and then it became so fun and interesting. We would use it in class to analyze controversial statements. I've never used it since though :/ 
I'm on my local county technical advisory council for the Board of education and I am constantly pressuring the addition of discrete math/structures and programmatic logic to k12.   Literally the most useful skill in life is problem solving. To provide a framework to apply to everyday decision-making is critical to success.   I like to call it the problem of problem solving.  
oh great, thanks! i will research on that. I am a newbie of philosophy so pardon me :).  
It's probably already been said but whenever I'm scrolling through Reddit and I see these *philosophy* videos I immediately think "I learned that in discrete math last semester!" But have never pointed that out to any of them. However, I find it interesting to see the overlap between mathematics and philosophy (amongst other subjects); it's fascinating to see how philosophy has evolved, if you will, and I feel like it would benefit others to know that this is the kind of stuff that is taught in University level math courses. It's indicative that math isn't always just meaningless numbers without reason, and linking it to another subject probably helps solidify the knowledge. At least to me, that's reassuring to think about.  
The most efficient method is usually a shortened truth table where you negate the conclusion and then try to make all the premises true. If that is possible, the argument is invalid, if it is impossible the argument is valid. And if you know a calculus to deduce premises, thats usually the fastest method to prove an argument valid. 
It really is fascinating to see how different it becomes when you take the human emotion aspect out of it and look at it strictly from a logical standpoint. I took some philosophy courses in college and it completely changed the way I approached arguments/discussions. I noticed that it *really* pissed my girlfriend off because she would approach things 100% emotionally and I would be flipping her arguments logically. Eventually I had to grow up and realize that sometimes the way something makes you feel is more important than what it means logically - at least from a human relationship standpoint.  
a valid argument is obviously not necessarily true, but a valid argument is a tool you can use to determine truth, if your argument is valid, and your premises are true your conclusion will necessarily be true aswell, and invalid argument can't be used to determine if anything is true or not 
All depends on the quantification of wings. Does having wings mean you can fly? Well no.   Unless those wings are from red bull.  
It's about understanding how to use a truth table, not about the logistics of drinking coffee, I don't get what your problem is. 
You can set up truth tables for multiple propositions at once, and then test for validity by looking for counterexamples. So truth tables can in fact be used to determine whether an argument is valid. 
The whole lot seems to lack a direct application.  Ie. there are very few real world problems which cannot be solved without this math.  Sure it's very useful as the basis of a bunch more obscure proofs in mathematics and computer science, but unlike many other fields, having a basic knowledge in the field doesn't give much utility. 
Baristas with a philosophy degree never used it after graduation either so don't feel bad.  
Discrete Math was an AP course at my high school. If you haven't made any headway that might be a good place to start  
Thank you for fighting this good fight. When I took discrete in college my thoughts were "Why the hell did I learn calculus before this?"   Don't get me wrong, calculus is great if you are going into engineering, but discrete can apply to so many more fields. 
Ya i dont think its really about philosophy, although it may transfer over. But its main use is in computer science. I took a discrete mathematics course freshman year.  
No.   validity has nothing to do with the truth of claims or propositions.  Soundness is the measure of truth of all premises.  Truth tables brute force all possible truth values of a symbolized argument, to determine validity, not soundness. 
Also, what do you mean by quantification? If something is to be given wings (here it is a pig), it would be given wings appropriate for flight to be a possibility (Weight, length, surface area, density, etc.). Most people understand this to be true.  Never mind that your comment doesn't actually impact the conversation that was being had. 
I'm not sure that I agree. While it is unlikely that one will ever end up directly applying the knowledge gained from basic studying in this field (in that few people consciously break arguments down into logical statements and evaluate them), knowledge is not only valuable when it is directly applied.  If studying logic causes one to subconsciously evaluate things more logically, whether overtly recognized or not, then it has substantial and long-lasting benefits. 
I'm in the south in a very poor district. This school system is so far behind.   I teach at a military rating school called JCAC, but try to help in the community where I can.   We teach logic, discrete structures, malware, Exploitation, the works. 
Thanks for the info, i know nothing about this, but it sounds very interesting, I love taking arguments apart and analysing wheter they are true or not, if that's my interest should i go into discrete math?  
It is taught by every analytic philosophy department that I'm aware of. Valid logic is crucial for making sound arguments. Aristotle, Kant, Russell, and countless others wrote on the importance of logic in philosophy 
But the statement is that pigs fly because they have wings.   Wings do not solely enable flight. 
Reasoning and critical thinking AKA common sense AKA the class the weeds the idiots about of first ear university   
If you have time and don't care about funding, maybe try setting up an after-school course for interested students.  Might possibly be able to get it in as extracurricular studies? 
Discrete math also is heavy in proof and certain types of probability calculations (at least it was for me).  Discrete Math, Logic, and Computer Engineering were the three that I took which were heavy on this type of logic (either analysis or design).  Logic was the only one that stayed with breaking down arguments the whole time.  But for the record, I did like discrete math the best.   
No. This is not what philosophy is about. Analytic style of philosophy sucks balls, which is probably the reason why they start with this. Anyway I wish mods would delete stuff like this, it really detracts from the quality of the subrredit. 
It doesn't matter.   Arguments are deductive/valid based on structure not content.   All men are mortal. Socrates is a man.  Socrates is mortal.  Valid and sound.   All men are cats. Socrates is a man. Socrates is a cat. Valid (same exact structure as the first) but not sound (the first premise is false).  Think of validity as "assuming all the premises are true, does the conclusion have to follow?" Soundness is looking at the actual truth of the premises. 
Of course, but I'm just on the advisory council to help shape the curriculum to be more applicable to "cyber" careers in the future.  
Been a while since my Discrete math course but that sounds about right.  I do remember my teacher loving to quote "Alice in Wonderland" 
Love that book, but I barely got a C in my Logic course in college :-/ Did the teacher quote examples from the book, or just quoted it for the hell of it? 
Hey, i ended up making a post about this on ask philosophy, sorry if the question is too personal, thanks for your help, i'll leave my question anyways if you are interested.  Thank you, as a more personal question, what do you do to be a better critical thinker? besides academic stuff? For example, i try to be less self centered and to control my anxiety by letting myself be vulnerable in front of others, learning to be more vulnerable and less self centered has helped me a lot in making decision in more complicated contexts, like a family discusion for example or when we have to make a quick decision during an emergency, thanks again! 
Something important to consider when reading "The Prince" is the context provided by the life of Niccolo Machiavelli. "The Prince" was written for Lorenzo de' Medici, ("The Medici" being the family that had him imprisoned and tortured for a short while, before the prince was written). Just leaving this tidbit here...   
The video doesn't even outline what makes a good ruler! It just talks about Machiavelli and throws in a bunch of filler while drawing random stuff. Why does he talk about the definition of 'politics'?  
"Today's candidates no doubt know Machiavelli's words."  Would it be controversial to say, "No.  It is almost certain that Donald Trump is unable to explain anything about *The Prince* beyond a vague 'pop culture' description"? 
Was the prince not written as how NOT to run a country? A satire of some sorts. 
I read this piece and I am pretty sure that this was a highly satirical work, meant as a jab at the leadership at the time. Considering Machiavelli's legs were broken (at least according to the history book I read) for treason or some other reason, it makes sense he would want some kind of sweet revenge. 
Modern analysis reveals that The Prince is a satire and that Machiavelli was really in favor of a republic not a principality/monarchy/absolutist  
I liked the video, but I cringed every time the screen flickered blue because the creator didn't set a white balance and left it on auto. It's really easy and simple to do. It takes a couple of seconds to do prior to taping and helps the audience stay engaged with the content. 
Yes there is an errounous assumption that Machiavelli advocated dictatorship but as I understand it he was for a republic. 
I think the video actually references this around 6 minutes in (6:00), but doesn't develop it further because there is still an enormous debate over the issue.  
The Medici family did imprison him and torture him for a while.  However Machiavelli wrote "The prince" for Cesare Borgia (son of the Pope of the time; Cesare was called "Valentino", because he was the duke of Valentinois). 
His conclusion doesn't really answer the question he asks either, "what makes a good ruler? ... Pay attention to your politicians!" 
I'd rather the candidates know nothing of Machiavelli or The Prince. Not only is the book outdated and therefore inapplicable, but it shows a very unethical way of ruling (which is in itself unethical). The idea that humanity needs a leader is not a good one, and it is only used to justifiy the injustices that a ruler would do. 
Actually he uses lots of real life examples, from "the Turk" being the Ottoman empire, the king of France who at the time waged wars in Italy, the king of Aragon, Caesar Borgia and Alexander VI.  As for the impact he had, he was very influential. Frederik the Great of Prussia once wrote a counter argument to the Prince to describe the Enlightened ruler, and that was in the mid-18th century. Barack Obama once said the Prince was his bedside book. 
You are not necessarily wrong, even though you're being downvoted. There is a long tradition of viewing Machiavelli's The Prince as ironic. Recent scholarship doesn't go that direction any more though, so I'd suggest to look up some recent sources and see whether you still think that to be the case. 
Don't fall into the trap of mistaking revisionist history as legitimate history. 500 years of scholars have taken that book seriously, Machiavelli wrote dozens of works from plays to novels to history, many a historian has spent their careers studying him; none of them thought this was a satire.   People like to say He liked republics and thusly couldn't to be a proponent of dictatorship. But the philosophical view of republics was different then than it is today. Today we think of republics as a form of democracy. before circa 1800 republics were thought of as being a combination of an oligarchy, a democracy and a dictatorship. Machiavelli believed that democracy was just as evil as the dictatorship, as did many thinkers in ancient Rome and Greece upon whom our model of the republic is based. 
No. Machiavelli believes deceiving the people is necessary and maintaining power must be the priority above all. This is not being a good leader and this is certainly not Donald Trump. Machiavelli tormented his enemies for personal gain and not in favor of the general public. Donald Trump's leadership prioritizes the people above all and how he can best protect and represent them, even if that means personal sacrifice, an idea very distant to Machiavelli. 
His dream was that Lorenzo would use his advice to unite Italy. If we are to follow his logic, the form of government to attain this goal matters little, as long as the ruler can achieve it.  Republics in the Renaissance were also not democratic at all, the Medici family had held Florence as a republic for a while before they turned it into a duchy. 
Indeed.  "Machiavellian" seems to me to be synonymous with "tyrannical".  But, throughout the book he emphasizes how important it is to maintain the approval of the people... 
When I say "was written for", I intended, that he "dedicated" the prince "To the magnificent Lorenzo Di Piero De' Medici".  My apologies for my choice of words, and the misunderstanding.  
The Borgia was already dead in 1513, when Machiavelli wrote De Principatibus. He indeed took him as the exemplum Lorenzo should have followed 
Sure he did. He said it was entirely subjective so instead he was going to talk about what Machiavelli had to say on the subject. "The Prince" is entirely about how to be a good leader, or rather, how to maintain control, survive, and achieve personal glory in a pragmatic and realistic manner. This guidebook was how to be a "good" leader. 
He has a lot of audiobooks on there, The Art of War, The Epic of Gilgamesh, Hammurabi's code, along with plenty of less famous ancient writings, definitely a good resource, and if you are a big history nerd he does have a bunch of other stuff on there. 
That's the shallowest most simplistic interpretation, worse than even Trump could give.  No, books in philosophy, and particularly in political philosophy, do not become outdated. He's absolutely NOT describing an "unethical" way of ruling, you seem to be missing his focus on the welfare of the people.   It's funny how ignorant people disregard HIS OTHER BOOK, which you clearly haven't read, which praises the Republic and Republican Freedom. But, hey, let's talk about stuff we have no idea about yay! 
To say the Prince is "outdated" and "inapplicable" is completely false. I don't understand how political theory becomes outdated. Different ideals come in and out of favor with the public/scholars/rulers, but are still generally applicable to how government functions.  Is Socrates still in vogue? What about Plato? 
The idea that humanity does *not* need a leader is a naive one. 
I wish we lived in a world where ethical beats pragmatic. But we don't. 
I'd rather that modern political commentators knew something of him and his book, so they can recognise when today's politicians are putting the tactics he speaks of into practice. 
Yes, it's free because it's almost 500 hundreds years old, thus belongs in the public domain.  
Thank you for your passionate and insightful comment. I have indeed read The Prince, and a few chapters from Book 1 of his Discourses on Livy, but not his other works. You have piqued my interest- I will get into this! 
Do you have a source for Obama saying that? I really doubt any smart politician would openly admit to studying Machiavelli  
Thank you for the comment. I will go back and re-read The Prince to gain a better understanding.  
Can you cite any of the "many thinkers" in Rome and Greece that believed democracy was just as evil as dictatorship? 
That could all be just a face he presents to the public. Though I think Trump's leadership style leans *very heavily* on advisors, since he is clearly out of his depth on some matters, like foreign policy.  
I was under the assumption that he wrote it in a mocking manner.  As if people in power thought this way regarding the end justifying the means.   Do anything within your power to consolidate and expand your power.   He certainly wasn't part of the powerful class and wouldn't have advocated such a position.  
It is a little funny that I understand everything you are talking about, largely due to Assassin's Creed 
Was that his dream? Sorry, If I missed the part where he said it was his dream for Lorenzo to unite Italy, would you show me where in "The Prince" or another of his writings where I could discern what his dream was? (No, not being sarcastic, I really may have missed that part) I do agree that "The Republic" in Florence was less of a democratic republic (democracy is a funny word :P when used throughout history), though that seems irrelevant at first.  The Medici did indeed hold Florence, even during the expulsion (of the Medici) that led to Niccolo being given a position in office of a new Florence republic, they still had presence during that time (To my knowledge they did not hold office though). Another important thing to take into consideration...  
Sorry, I was a bit confused because when reading "Lorenzo de Medici" I assumed you meant the Magnifico (the guy who loved corporate social responsibility) and not Lorenzo *di Piero* de Medici :) 
Machiavelli had the Borgia on his mind, he hoped for him to succeed and made the book (out of a letter exchange) for Cesare Borgia. Unfortunately for Machiavelli, Cesare Borgia died too soon.  Well, now what? He had a good gift. Why not use it to regain the favor of the Medici? That's why he dedicated the book to Lorenzo Piero de Medici soon after Giuliano di Lorenzo de Medici (the guy who tortured and sent Machiavelli to basically an exile) died. 
Free audiobook: Dude sounds like Kermit the Frog with a fake english accent.    Checks out. 
I'm surprised this doesn't get brought up more often. It really is a despicable book of strategies to manipulate and dominate at any cost. 
He is speaking of political ideals in Feudalism. I believe that a lot if his ideology is no longer applicable to the modern world. 
Real Democracy = no leaders. You can have a role model and what not but a LEADER means you are being told what to do and/or how to live. Sorry, but mankind is better off without leaders. 
I think it was in a Forbes article a few years ago. I'm on my phone right now but I'll look it up.  It really isn't controversial to say you take the Prince as an inspiration though. It is extensively studied in every business school, political science courses, military academies and law schools. I would be more weary of being led by a politician who hasn't read it, just in terms of lack of general culture. 
It would be quite dumb to think than an academic constitutionalist has not read and studied The Prince. 
Plato and Aristotle surely did. Democracy was generally viewed as a the rule of the plebs - a rule that defines itself through a general state of insecurity, because it is based on self-interest rather than the common welfare.  Thats why Plato argued for the rule of "philosopher kings" and Aristotle for an hybrid form of Oligarchy and Democracy.  For Rome: You have Polybios who defines the Ochlocracy  as the coerciely following step to Democracy and thus creates an hybrid form of monarchich, aristocratic and democratic elements in an attempt to break the circuit of constitutions. 
It's not just a persona. Look at everything Trump has said his entire life and the tremendous respect he's gained from everyone. His entire life he's been consistent in showing a deep concern for the American people and has a record of being unselfish despite what the media wants you to believe. 
I cannot reasonably see *The Prince* as a work of satire, given it was a piece produced by Machiavelli to win the favour of Lorenzo II. Machiavelli really, really loved his home city of Florence, and just could not stand being exiled from it, so he quickly penned the piece to prove his usefulness to Lorenzo, so that he could be recalled. Given this, it would not make sense for *The Prince* a work of satire, unless Machiavelli thought Lorenzo was incredibly dumb. The piece might be at times disingenuous or a work of some sycophancy to the Medici family, but it is probably not satire.  
For me it is hard to be sure, Niccolo, did in 1494 after the Medici were driven from power (an effort to my knowledge that he had assisted with) have a life well off (he had status), and none of this lasted. The Medici come back with "The will of god" (Sorry, "The Pope") and he was accused of conspiring against the Medici in 1513,  he was imprisoned and tortured, and then he retired (likely as a type of political prisoner always under the watch of the Medici), and then he wrote the prince for his good friend Lorenzo.  
Some do think it was satire.   The main argument as I understand it is that many of the 'players' he cites as exemplars of princely virtues ultimately failed miserably.     So that could mean a few things:    1. It's satire.   It'd be like a political manual written today that used Anthony Wiener's  and Chris Christie's successes as examples.   It's obvious to us that those men were ultimately failures,  but it might not be obvious to people even 50 years from now.   2. Machiavelli knew these men were failures, but wrote about them anyway because he knew this approach would be appreciated by his audience.   It's basically a book-length move letter to the Medicis.    3. Machiavelli's judgement should be seriously questioned.   He legitimately thought these examples were useful,  despite the ultimate failure of their executors. Combined with his own less than successful career,  his advice should be taken with a grain of salt,  since there's no evidence it works.   
Same. That knowledge help me through it. I remember being told that he wrote it on Italian instead of Latin (as expected of writers at the time) so this leads me to believe it was his response/act of rebellion/fight for justice to being imprisioned and tortured by his family. 
I don't think that distinction between the Prince and Discourses is fair. Machiavelli said both books each contained his teaching, i.e. the Prince and the Discourses had the same fundamental meaning.  Now anyone who has even modestly read both books knows that they are very different. For both books to be essentially the same but very different in appearance means that the true meaning of both books is esoteric and the differences are superficial.   The reason for the differences may be different audiences, or the reason for difference maybe pedagogic  ( i.e. only by comparing the two texts can we discover what Machiavelli really meant). Either way, Machiavelli's books cannot be read like a treatise, where you can assume that the author is honestly expressing what they think. Careful reading, and most importantly, thorough reasoning are necessary to discover Machiavelli's thought. 
The objective of uniting Italy is laid out explicitly in the final chapter of *The Prince* (titled "An exhortation to liberate Italy from the barbarians").  
He wrote the book 7 (SEVEN) years after Cesare's death, as it's stated in his letter to the Vettori, his friend and an ambassador in Rome. What he hoped for was to gain the favour of the Medici, so that he could be back in Firenze's politics   And these aren't speculations, pure facts he himself tells us about in the aforementioned letter 
I think very little in the book is despicable - it's a treatise of social realpolitik. If you are completely oblivious to that mode of thinking, you might be eaten.  
The Prince does not focus on draconian aspects of feudalism. It lays out Machiavelli's thoughts about how one might successfully gain and hold power. Further, how to govern well and some advice on military tactics.  These lessons are still applicable today. The nature of power has not changed. 
a real democracy can't excist... not with a big population and complexity there is in the modern day, so it's irrelevant to talk about real democracy in the modern day, the representative democracy is here for that reason. I think the real democracy can still work in a smaller population group, like maybe up to 100 people at a time? but we are not living in stone age anymore. 
In that case, he seems like a genuine man who feels for the American people, but is not concerned with details. He will rely on the advisors to make up for his lack of thorough political knowledge and disinterest in details.  
Machiavelli writes at one point that the prince, the ruler, should maintain some sort of positive public image. Even though he should be ready to do bad things, he should avoid being vilified. That is why a prince needs a good minister/advisor to do the dirty work while the prince can remain unscathed.  Of course Niccolo had himself in mind for the job. When he sent his treaties it was as a gift, but he also offered his own services to get back in a position of power. 
I didn't find it satirical at all. I was struck by how utterly perceptive it was about human nature, and how pragmatic it was in its implications for anyone who finds themselves in a political power struggle. It felt like it was written by an extremely bright person today. Think Kissinger, Karl Rove, Barney Frank, etc. It's not evil in itself but it definitely shows how willingness to be evil would be helpful in achieving power. Conversely, the best way to combat evil is to understand it, so I think it's in everyone's best interest to read it, whatever their goals. It's also a very short book. Almost a pamphlet. Read it. 
Ah, thank you, rereading it now, I may have to rewrite my question... (A down-vote for thanking someone? dafuq) 
You are kinda pedantic. Of course he hoped to gain the favor of the Medici again. But it's an undebatable fact that he has Cesare Borgia in his mind as a kind of "model". 
Why do people keep saying that he says you shouldn't be good? He says that between fear and love you should choose fear, but that doesn't mean actually being bad, that doesn't mean that you operate outside the realm of ethics (altho you do operate, as sovereign, in ANOTHER ethical realm, and that's the interesting part). 
I agree with him as well; I clearly misunderstood what Machiavelli's true beliefs were. However, I cannot agree with what you said. Machiavelli's philosophy (according to what I believed and what the other guy stated) is political. I can objectively disagree with it due to it breaking my moral code just as I can disagree with what Hitler's philosophy entailed. Leaders are unnecessary and Morality should not just be shoved aside for "the good of the people" (like a leader would care about that). Additionally, the policy of John Locke, the Bible, and the Constitution, as I believe, is outdated. I do not disagree necessarily with the philosophy. Although I could; I can't understand why you would say it's impossible to disagree with it. 
You clearly are obsessed with Machiavelli and I would be a fool to continue arguing with you. Thanks for your effort to persuade me about his ideals, but republican or what I said, hate both. They're both objectively immoral POLITICAL philosophies. Also, I know it was in the medeival ages. I'm sorry I phrased that wrong. I admit you are right about Machiavelli's true beliefs. But I still don't agree with them. You shouldn't downvote opinion btw. Not cool. So what if you don't agree with me. Don't downvote unless I was an ass. You're the one giving me flak for disagreeing with Republicanism. 
Oh, I'm aware there are sociopaths and that these are the instruments of their trade. I even know how to play the game when absolutely necessary. It just seems a bit disgusting to me to train in it.  It's a little like the difference between training in how to fight for self defense and training in how to execute nothing but deceptive, crippling and, lethal blows. I would prefer to win honorably. 
Yes, you said it yourself, decentralized democracy! This is ideal. However, this is also the first era of history in which we can establish a direct democracy throughout a nation of any size. How hard can it be to set up online polls instead of a Congress (which struggles to work if it ever works at all)? And voting booth distributed everywhefe for people without internet. It would be easier and better for the people.  Unless you make the argument "ohh but the people are inherently stupid". This idea is inherent to the system it exists in, representative democracy. 
Sorry but you just keep spouting basic notions of Individualist Anarchism that are, at the least, outdated in the sense you're adscribing to Machiavelli. Indeed, Machiavelli is more current and relevant than Individualist Anarchists in many senses, and even left-oriented, Anarchy-loving theorists have moved on from the pretention that leaders are unncessary to recognizing that *sovereingty* is not the same as *leadership*, and that the phenomena of sovereingty should be better understood (which we don't) before just outright concluding that we can do without it (when, in fact, we have not been able to do without it).  People like Giorgio Agamben, Walter Benjamin and Carl Schmitt are very concerned about this issue, two of them coming from a very anarchist-ish place (not Schmitt, he was a Nazi). 
Also I didn't downvote you, and they are not downvoting you based on opinion, they are downvoting you because you're displaying incredible amounts of certainty for your obvious lack of contact with the field.  Also, by saying "objectively immoral political philosophy" when you apparently have no idea how to use none of those 4 words. 
They're tools. Nothing more, nothing less. You can use them for good or evil.  
*Most* people *are* actually hopelessly stupid. You know this.   Do you really trust your neighbor, your boss, or even your cousin to vote for what's *best* for the nation? 
Thanks, this really helped clear things up for me. This gives me a lot of stuff to look into. If you don't mind me asking, do you study polisci at a university?    
They are employed daily by people in positions of authority and with power over your life.  I'm not sure what you want from me. 
I'm an anarcho-communist and I want a direct democracy. You keep using flawed logic like saying that I'm "spouting" opinions in order to try to get what, persuasion? I'm trying to treat this like a debate but you're just insulting me. I hope no one else is stupid enough to fall for the poor way you argue... 
How would you string them together? How I said it was perfectly correct. And thanks for not downvoting, my comment on that was directed to everyone. 
Damn, I give up. Thanks for persuading me, I was such an idoit before. 
I don't want to argue for nationwide internet democracy, I don't like it that much either.  I'm not sure how you could know my view on decentralized democracy, as I merely stated that it would be ideal.  Congressmen do not represent the views of the people, they only fight for what their corrupt party's intentions are. 
hey, glad I could help :)  I studied at a University (in Germany tho), just handed in my master-thesis :)  
There are many maxims used by people in power.   Some use the Art of War.   Some use How to Win Friends and Influence People.   Some use the Bible.   Some use Pink Floyd lyrics.   Some use what their parents taught them.     Can you show me one maxim in Machiavelli that isn't obvious,  but is demonstrably more effective than other, perhaps contradictory lessons?  
Note how you focused on the fact that I said "spouting" and literally nothing else. I use the word because, in my opinion, you're spouting in the literal dictionary definition of spouting:  "express (one's views or ideas) in a lengthy, declamatory, and unreflecting way."  I'm not trying to convince you, frankly, I'm trying to prevent others from taking up your twisting views in regards to Machiavelli and, additionally, in taking up any form of anarchism without serious reflection of it's problems, and I say that as a former Anarchist that doesn't identify as an Anarchist anymore (or as anything at all) precisely because Anarchism carries over all of the problems of modern mentalities and those deep, contradictory issues have not been sorted out, not by far.  Carl Schmitt in "The Concept of the Political" deals with these issues. You should check it out, it's a short read. 
"Objective" doesn't mean what you think it means: it doesn't mean "without bias" nor does it mean "in reality", it is not a synonim of "actually" or "really". It means "related to the nature of the object qua object". You're using "objectively" as a synonym of "really". The word is not doing any work in the phrase that you said it in. I think you were looking for a word more like "inherently".  Also "morality" is not the object of political philosophy. 
I don't think anyone here is under the illusion they could persuade you of anything you've already decided is wrong. They're merely trying to prevent your obstinacy from spreading.  
You stated it your self that decentralized democracy would be ideal, so thats a pretty good indicator on your view about the subject? Anything else is a contradiction. 
Oh that's awesome, lol now I love the username even more 
These comments have convinced me that a video that I originally liked I no longer like.  
This is not really a deep examination of the philosophy of the episode.  
I immediately started thinking I wish this guy would stop talking over the episode so I can just watch Rick and Morty. 
I wonder how many more videos Wisecrack will make using this show. They've wrangled the philosophy of the show by making more and more videos about which shows they're just pandering to Rick and Morty fans 
I'm amazed at the amount of upvotes this tripe got. I love rick and morty but this runaway fandom analysis has seeped into shit 
I loved it but the pacing was wrong.  Beth, George, and Summer would not become cult members overnight and turn uncomfortably pleasant.  It's hard to shoehorn them into a "worshipping" orientation at all.  It's not R&M's format to "Idiot Ball" characters, where they turn into an idiot and act wildly out of character for the purposes of an episode.  It would have resonated with a wider time frame.   
I can see why everyone thinks this is just a bad highlight reel with a guy talking over it since all of Reddit is experts on logical fallacies already. 
"Nobody exists on purpose, nobody belongs anywhere, everybody's going to die, come watch TV." - Always thought this quote was pretty deep for a Cartoon of this nature.  
It's just a show reflecting the multiple dimension theory and how it can cause sociopathic tendencies. 
I kind of enjoyed it.  After reading these comments I am dissapointed in myself. 
I was expecting further reading. Instead I got the episode told back to me without the jokes.  
Yeah what a fucking joke. Just a little pat on the back for atheists. 
It was interesting (yet shallow) until it just started listing logical fallacies. Could have been more interesting to compare and contrast with current events. 
For real.  This was, bar none, the absolute worst episode of the show.  Worst.  Unfunny, ridiculous, meaningless BS.  It felt like a leftover script for an unmade episode of Aqua Teen Hunger Force, and it probably was. 
Yes and no. It's not R&M's format, per se, to put Earth in a distinct cataclysmic panic either. There's a pretty obvious connection between the events unfolding and the behaviors we see. 
Not if they arent the same family from previous episodes. Drastic changes in family members usually is a good indicator we are now following different Rick and Morty. 
This is the only episode I truly dislike. It just felt so out of place. I kind of feel like it was built entirely around the Shwifty performance and the silly Ice T story.  
Nice ad hoc hominem hoc cogito culina fallacy there. 
Except when "cartoon of this nature" refers to a show that already caters to pseudointellectuals, that quote is not only not deep, but also very expected.  
It isn't, really. It states the obvious, and then advocates escapism. Which cartoons are a prime example of. 
I'm with you but I'm not that mad. I can nust easily ignore the episode 
This is what happens whenever a video from a channel I am subscribed to ends up on Reddit. I wouldn't have the confidence if I were the Nerdwriter after on of his last videos ended up on the front page.  
More like "here's the idea of logical fallacies"...      His other videos (notably Bo Jack Horseman and the actual Rick and Morty episode) are way better than these. This seems more like a filler episode. 
Didn't they state that Science was comparable to religion one time? 
Really? What I got from this video is that the thought processes related to religion are not exclusive to them. Anyone can fall into the same fallacies to justify their beliefs.  
If that's the one with Camus, you can actually learn something from that video. I've actually referenced it a few times, it's great.  
That's totally not the point of the comment above yours. This video may be irritatingly indulgent over rudimentary bs, but I think most fans of the show still find it a good episode. A tip: Just because something, anything, is uninteresting to you does not make that thing meaningless. 
It's a lot of exposure.  Like, Stargate SG1 went for hundreds of episodes without changing the world by letting people know about aliens and the stargate... for  no good reason.  Other than it makes the world less relatable to the audience.  But by S02's cliffhanger, the world kinda jumped way ahead and accepted Galactic Federation rule.  Prior to that, the Giant Head thing was the only case where the world was aware an alien situation was a thing. 
OK, what is something you would consider deep within pop culture? 
Rick and Morty is a pretty entertaining show. I love sci-fi stuff. Some of the situations and the absurdity crack me up. But the diehard fans that think nihilism is somehow "deep" are wildly delusional. "omg, I'm watching tv and have thought life is meaningless before! Rick is talking about me. I'm smart. Ergo this show is so freaking smart!". It's just a fun show. The cultists kinda ruin having any conversation about it. The mods even had to post a warning for people to stop posting individual quotes as their whole comment because every post on reddit about R&M turns into a youtube comment section. Wubbalubbadubdub is good for a bunch of upvotes but it's just a phrase that means you watch the show. It's not an endorsement of your intelligence. 
This sounds like something someone who thought they were intelligent but couldn't understand the content or concepts of this show would say..  That, or someone arrogant and  pretentious with the sense of humor of a tree stump  
Wrong, you're disagreeing for the sole reason of being a contrarian.   The satire of the final statement, "come watch TV" is obviously lost on you.   
I was being playful but there is clear math to it. Run along and find a single episode with beats as fucking few and far between as this one. Every other episode has brilliant layered writing. When I saw this pre-title sequence of an earth quake and a guy falling into a hole, I seriously thought I'd started a different show, one without the intelligence I expect of R&M.  Objective truth: Out of character. None of you asshats with your down-vote button can deny that Rick's indifference to tragedy (because he's seen so much shit, that he's jaded) wasn't thrown out the window for him to run around going "yes Mr president!"  The only thing they got right was the voice.     
Well IMDB agrees. My disappointment with the episode only looks like anger on forums celebrating it, which are everywhere. Everybody's charmed by the catch phrase. There's people who love R&M for the right reasons, and then there's a bunch of mouth-breathers drawn to the hype and find this episode super easy to get on board with.   If you can't comprehend how much more complicated the other episodes are, and truly think Shwifty is a high point of R&M, you are the reason smart shows get cancelled.  
Why does every pretentious philosophy of x media focus so much on existentialism? Existentialism is a shitty outdated footnote of philosophy, not the most super interesting up to date shit. 
But then you'd have to learn something about camus. So who's the real loser? 
A tip for you: my opinion is just as valid as yours, and I'm every bit as entitled to it as you are.  Don't condescend to people, friend. It just makes you look like a patronizing asshole. 
I think it'd be helpful to consider the vast difference in purpose and message between the two shows you're comparing here. 
Lmao I like Rick and Morty it's a funny show. I don't think it's as good as a lot of people here would have you believe but it's definitely a solid TV show. I don't see what that has to do with disagreeing that the quote isn't great as a serious piece of philosophy. 
How can you presume what my reasoning is? That's extremely arrogant of you. And you're being extremely confrontational by the way. I've seen your other angry posts in this thread. Did anyone ruin your sand castle?   I may as well tell you that you're elevating the 'philosophy' of a popular show for the sole reason that you're a fan of it. Every time some popcultural item lands on this subreddit, we get a wave of people like you. Your everyday rhetoric doesn't work here.   I and probably a huge chunk of people in this sub are huge fans of the show and would be glad to talk about it in a civil manner. If you think this place in unwelcoming for people like you, it's maybe because you're taking every bit of criticism personally.  
As if I wanted to life in a world where I wouldn't be able learn about Camus  
Why the downvotes? Oxxo is saying that the episode didn't follow the main Rick and Morty that episode. Even if it did contain them, the episode followed a different timeline for the most part. And Oxxo is asserting that it is possible that there are other episodes where this has happened, but we may not have realized it yet.  
Its only basis was the NAME "Ice-T".  Then it's, like, "let's make him an alien crystal of actual ice who doesn't care".  "Oh, oh, can he come from a planet of letters-and-substances?"  "and they're at war with number-planet!"  "and then he cares enough to save Earth!"  Yeah, that meshes with the plot perfectly.    It's like a \[WP\] where they qualified the entry with the most DOWNVOTES. 
Scientism is stupid but that comic comes off like it's written by someone little better. 
What makes you think it followed a different timeline? Honestly asking, trying to figure out if I missed something. 
That's not strictly speaking overtly nihilistic even though the last line borders on it. A lot of people overuse the term nihilism but just saying that events don't have inherent meaning is far from total global nihilism. Thinking you can fight back again lack of inherent meaning isn't usually considered nihilist. Nor is existentialist posturing. 
If you mean the term "scientism" you might prefer the term "scientific expansionism".  I would agree that the term is less inherently confusing since you would naturally tend to want to call a practitioner of "scientism" a "scientist" which would naturally be conflated with a simple practitioner of the scientific method but "scientific expansionist" would not cause the same confusion. 
Can you do a tl dr and not use philosophy talk? Basically wisecrack it. 
It all has to do with the ticket given to Rick when he drops Jerry off. When Rick fills out the form you can see that he puts his name in as Rick C-137, aka our Rick. When the person behind the counter hands him the ticket, you can pause the show and clearly make out what the number is. This is the same number that at the end of the episode, a different Rick asks what is supposed to be our Rick if he has that number.   The idea is at some point in the episode we started following a different Rick and Morty. It's hardly "proven" like the guy above claims, but it is a great explanation for why Mr. Poopybutthole is real and not a parasite in the episode that follows, despite us having never seen him.   People have taken it even further to say that krombopulis Michaels is still alive in the universe we are watching and may be the one to break Rick out of jail.   There's lots of crazy theories out there for this show.  
Its trying to answer two questions, one of which there is probably no reason to even ask, and the other which it answers incorrectly. The first question being about some vague thing your life is inherently ordered towards, (doesn't matter. Defaults don't mean anything, read about morality or value instead) and the second being about radical freedom to make any choice. (Heavily disregards social context so much that it leads to misleading conclusions about agency). 
I think it's pretty obvious that the daycare episode and the Poopy Butthole episode feature different R&M. They even emphasize that Rick throws glowing green rocks on the trash in Total Ricall he collected in the daycare episode.   Let's also not forget Mr Poopy Butthole is watching R&M at the end of the final episode, suggesting he is watching another universe.  
The problem is that we are just brains...who are hooked into life support systems composed of muscle and heart tissue and so on.  You can't neglect those.  You have to pay attention to them and the signals they pass you, and you need to keep them in good shape or your brain (you!) will cease functioning. 
Perhaps the brain is just a vessel for consciousness. Yes, science has not isolated what consciousness *is* so it's generally an avoided topic, or the alternative; establishing a premise that consciousness itself is the brain. I disagree with this notion. There's a phenomena at play that we truly don't understand: why am *I* aware from this particular vessel, in this particular time? The physical construct of the brain doesn't supply a coherent answer to that question. I am not going to postulate a solution, but I will point out that understanding the brain itself is not sufficient in answering the question. The very fact that *I* am aware from *my* vessel alone presents a deeper question than simply understanding why this vessel responds to certain stimuli. Again, I'm not going to present any theories, but her insight falls short in answering that question.  
There's no direct evidence brains exist. Empirical senses assume a knowledge of the world prior to us sensing it. Concepts like space, time, and matter are axioms on which empiricism depend.   Kantian Idealism (as opposed to realism) doesn't need this extra assumption. It claims that only minds exist. Empiricism is three dimensional representation of all possible thoughts, with an organizational bias by natural selection.  U mad Churchland? *a sunglass* 
Benefits apparently include:  *cheapening human life  *reducing all of human experience - most relevantly, suffering - to arbitrary, uncontrollable caprice   *rendering existence meaningless  I also like how her response to the last question was, "well, it doesn't bother ME, personally, so it shouldn't bother anyone else." 
I'm starting to realize why people in philosophy of mind hate neuroscientists. 
i think were a conscious thing that interfaces with physical reality through a brain. the consciousness interprets data. cut out a part of the brain and the data changes.   i think its naive to assume were just a brain.  
I'm in the habit of thinking of myself as a product of my brain. I must be an exception as the article asserts that most people do not think this way. 
When I talk to someone am I talking to their physical brain directly or their consciousness instead? That is, what is you? The brain itself doesn't know or care if you talk to it, it's just a piece of hardware right? It's the consciousness above it controlling the hardware that we interact with. Also if we were just a brain that would mean we have no freewill because we're just robots feeding in input and spitting out output all preprogrammed from the start of the universe. But quantum mechanics shows our reality isnt 100 percent determined so we have free will and therefore more than just a brain. 
What makes it unusual or radical? It would seem a natural and logical conclusion for anyone who is rooted in science rather than mysticism and dogma. 
But why is there awareness at all? Why the whole inner movie? Why aren't we just robots that process input and produce output? What if we create a human-level intelligence AI? Does it have the inner movie as well?  Some people (myself included depending on the day) would say the hard problem of consciousness doesn't exist, but I think it's definitely something that deserves further probing before anything's definitive. 
Or perhaps the awareness that *interfaces* with the brain. 
You appear to be suggesting our brain and our conscious experience are not one and the same.   Do you have any arguments in favour of this view? 
If the argument is that we are the ideas constructed by a set of molecules deciding to do something special its not much further a stretch to say i'm everything constructed by the same matter. 
Could you expand on the idea of minds only existing? Its an interesting thought 
I agree. But that doesn't mean they don't have free will. It just means they'll do the same thing every time. What part of this negates free will? It was still their decision to do something, every single time.  
True. It also begs the question, because prior to that she basically denounced the whole idea of 'God' or a 'soul' confering any meaning on her life - yet here she is saying all these material things somehow give her life meaning. They make her content perhaps to an extent, as will a lot of material things in life, from becoming a parent to having a simple sugar rush, but they in themselves are (almost laughably) no more 'meaningful' than the idea of 'God' or a 'soul' would, and quite possibly less so.  Personally I found a bunch of things in the interview that I disagreed with, as well as many things that I did agree with. So I found it quite interesting. 
Right...so you're a dualist?  What do you mean "the consciousness interprets data"?  Are you suggesting that consciousness is not physical but somehow causal?  If so, you have your work cut out for you.    If you see a ball flying at your head, you duck.  If we cut out the part of your brain that processes visual info, you get hit by the ball.  Your theory works there. If we leave the visual system intact but cut out other pieces of the brain bit by bit in every combination possible, we will eventually hit the part of your brain that "interprets" the visual scene - you'll see the ball coming but you'll get hit by it because you have no meaningful interpretation of what's happening.  Given that - there's no room for "interpretation" happening outside the brain.  If we can take all your inputs and predict all your outputs, there is no room for something "outside" your brain to do the interpretation. 
You are the consciousness produced by your brain.  
because it leads here to believe that things like "beliefs" do not exist. it's definitely counterintuitive to say the least 
It always amazes me how we are literally a group of atoms that somehow think they are an individual, that thought always blows my mind. 
I think the different parts of the brain combine to form our full personality, like how the neurons in our brain group together to (usually) form full functional systems. So, there isn't some central part of the brain where "we" are, "we" are a little bit of one part and a little bit of another part and another part etc. all combined together. Each part is important in making us who we are. 
My phylosophy is that you're your both brain and  body, your brain reflects the body and vice versa, 2 cogs working together, you can't be alive without both.  If you hypothetically transfered your brain into another body your brain wouldn't be you anymore because your brain would reflect your new body and change, your appetite, what you crave, would change accordingly to your new body's need, and so would "you".  You can have the same pilot drive 2 completely different vehicles and the pilot will drive accordingly.  Because your brain exists for your body, the brain just helps your body survive, your brain is just another organ.  Take microscopic life for , they don't have brains,   yet they are alive, move and reproduce. 
I've never understood how people like Dennet can say that the hard problem of consciousness doesn't exist, could you potentially elaborate on how that's possible?  
Perhaps the subjective experience is a side-effect of evolutionarily selected traits.  
The way you phrased awareness interfacing with the brain implies that awareness is something that could exist independent of the brain. Like perhaps your awareness could float off after your brain dies and maybe interface itself with someone else's brain. Or perhaps float off to some place like Heaven or Hell.   I think the brain produces a lot of patterns, one of which is an awareness of your self. But when the brain dies, all the patterns are gone also. 
Like how the text in this post interfaces with my computer screen, and then later yours. If I smash my tablet before posting, then my post ceases to be. If I smash it after posting, the post continues to exist. 
Here's soemthing crazy: if you were to switch consciousness with someone else. Meaning, *you* (in the abstract) become aware from a different persons vessel, *you* would never know it happened. You would just be that person. Everything about them, memories, attitude, behaviors, hopes, dreams, etc. All those would be experienced from your consciousness. If *you* ever switched back, you'd have no idea. Because the vessel you inhabit now would retain the same memories, and considering your vessel as a brain would have the same attitude, behaviors, etc. There would be no difference in *your* (that vessel you currently inhabit) daily activities. So those movies like Freaky Friday, they don't switch consciousness, only bodies. Since they retained the memories of the other vessel, it's really like they retained their brains, and only changed the outside appearances. 
I feel like a lot of people's arguments on this article boil down to:  "We can't possibly be just a brain because that makes me feel bad. Therefore there must be some special magic powder that makes us different from a computer, because that makes me feel good. Checkmate." 
im not saying something outside the brain is doing the interpretation. you bend the antena on the tv the signal is still there but the picture is messed up. i think consciousness is a fundamental part of the universe. its not outside it, it is it. the physical universe is a manifestation of consciousness the same way that a dream is a manifestation of your consciousness. just at different levels.   and dont mistake this for me telling you how it is. this is how I think it is.  
in your opinion you need a brain to have consciousness? I believe plants have some level of conciousness for example.  
Correlation does not imply causation. I agree with RadRussian, its flat out naive to *assume* our awareness is produced and contained within the brain simply because we correlate areas of the brain with mind-body states, just like its naive to assume a computer application is produced and contained within a monitor just because we correlate different areas of the GUI with features of the program. If you smash the monitor with a hammer of course the GUI's functionality will be affected.  
It says beliefs are products of culture+evolution+brain chemistry. I fail to see how it doesn't reconcile with other philosophy. 
If you go deeper, atoms are made from protons and neutrons and electrons and you can still go deeper and look more closely. Everything that *is* is made from the same fabric but yet so miraculously different. 
I don't think you understand that the brain is all you. Your desires and cravings would entirely be in the brain. Whilst other things may develop after the fact, it is still you. 
He essentially thinks that once we learn more about how the brain works we will understand the exact nature of consciousness, so it won't be a problem in the sense that Chalmers meant when he coined the term. 
That would imply our computers, or for that matter any system which exchanged information, produces a kind of consciousness as well.  
The capacity for subjective experience most likely is favored, but I think most people are interested in the mechanism which allows subjective experience to occur. 
Yeah, maybe you're the software that got downloaded into the hardware that is the brain when you were born, and it constantly uploads backups to a different unit when you sleep, so that if you die you get installed in a different hardware or something. 
While meditating you can experience pure awareness. 
 That's the argument behind the last thursday theory or whatever that is called. Basically you have no way to prove your memories are true and everything you know wasn't put into place yesterday. 
I see - so you're more of an idealist? What then, is "the table" when 5 conscious beings are standing in a room touching a table?  Is the table consciousness?  If so, how does this help us learn about the nature of reality in comparison to physics and neuroscience?  In a dream, for example, there is no mind-independent table, so the analogy seems to break there.  Please don't take my questioning as an assertion in the opposite direction - I am genuinely curious. 
No. You can be very self-unaware and perform reactions.  Cells perform thousands of reactions in minutes, none of them are conscious reactions. 
eliminative materialists believe that "beliefs" are a part of folk psychology and have no place in mature neuroscience. they believe "beliefs" do not really exist. Insofar as "belief" is a central notion in epistemology it is quite radical. and incoherent I might add. 
And those guys are working really hard to keep us together. True bro love and respect  
I remember reading a reddit comment a while back: "We are the universe experiencing itself." 
I'm more interested in the why. Evolutionarily speaking, why does our brain assemble this experience for us? 
I know it's been said a million times before, but I would recommend googling what is like to be a bat if you're looking for an argument as to why pure science may not be able to tell us much about consciousness, it is much more based on experience than anything.  
Yes, but if a bot plays World of Warcraft, all that code and art and 3d colourful landscapes mean nothing to it. The game only becomes a real adventure when a human plays it. A bot (or philosophical zombie) cannot experience any part of the game internally, and so the question remains, why is there a player who has experiences? Why aren't we bots processing the data with nothing going on inside?  
show me the chemical or molecule that is responsible for its own "awareness". Show me the gene that lets the brain know its a brain. Until these things can be explained, I think the problem of consciousness remains.  
Ok, but the other side can't say why a brain *could* become conscious.  
Some people who are computer illerate believe computers have consciousnesses who perform actions on their own. They don't really have consciousness but their lack of knowledge creates an illusion that they do. What if our appearance of consciousness is more of our lack of understanding of our brain  
It's the use of the frontal lobe to simulate metaphysical things. Evolution doesn't favor better or even good things only thing that allow propergation.  Advanced simulation of reality is good for survival what it does on the side is just a thing 
No. Hear me out, I'll attempt to streamline it.  If we use "pilot" and "passenger" then we can attempt to argue the difference between brain and consciousness.    Confusing because one of the words is halfway there.  Let me Goldblum it---brain--subconscious--pilot most of the time Consciousness---passenger most of the time  Ok. So We have to learn a new behavior.  That's when the passenger, or our consciousness has to take control of the plane and teach the pilot the new task, but the passenger cannot be distracted until the subconscious learns how to do new task and takes control as the pilot again.  This is done when we study and/or learn a new skill.   Maybe that works.  Sorry, I just formed this concept and it needs honing.  
What is so radical about that? Has anything really come from epistemology that is solid enough to fall outside of the realm of folk psych? 
This is a tough idea to continually keep together because what if our perception truly does affect how the universe responds and changes?  Oddly the Grateful Dead addressed this in a song in the 1970s called "Eyes of the World." 
That's been sort of my thought for a while. What is the Universe without conciousness? This concept would be more complicated should we encounter "intelligent" beings from somewhere else in the Universe. Although I don't think it would completely discount it. As they would have been experiencing a different part of the Universe.  
It's an basic advantage to understand how other humans in your social group work.   Are they lying, are they jealous? etc...   Given that brains are computational engine for projecting outcomes,  what happens when the same hardware is applied to the self? 
Yeah, this is simply a poor explanation of the hard problem of consciousness. This is closer to a soft problem of consciousness. Moves the goal posts significantly. It's simply wrong in that it assumes the hard problem goes away with adequate explanation. This is akin to saying, "with more syntax, we'll eventually derive semantics." The hard problem is that science lacks a capacity to discuss qualia, and we cannot figure out a framework that is even capable of discussing both science and qualia. No matter how much science you have, this problem doesn't go away. 
I think the thought is this (correct me if I'm wrong): planets as far as we know do not experience pain if they smash into each other. Conscious entities, like us, do (usually). Why are conscious entities even equipped with this ability to experience phenomenological things like "pain" when we smash into each other? If we are just a conglomerate of little things, why is it that we differ in this regard when things like planets are also groups of little things? 
The Universe, without consciousness, is a field of dead stars spinning, groaning planets twitching and shrugging with volcanism, and black holes rippling towards a final end. Without consciousness, the Universe is exactly what it is, minus a few particularly complicated chemical reactions sloshing around on the surface of one planet - maybe more. It's marvelous, and we're very small. I guess that's how I feel, anyway. 
Because in order for us to survive, we need to make decisions and take actions based on feelings like pain and pleasure. A planet does not make decisions or take actions. 
Pain isn't just a magical sensation, it's an actual real physical thing happening to your body. Real signals are being sent along your nerve cells from your hand to your brain if you burn your hand in the fire.  Your question is basically, when those physical signals reach our brain, why does our consciousness "feel" them?  But to act on the pain and avoid further harm, we have to become aware of that pain somehow. If the signal simply went up to our skulls but did nothing there, then pain wouldn't really "work" as a safety mechanism. Wouldn't it be rather natural for us to evolve so that the physical pain signals are "wired" to fly directly into our consciousness with a powerful adverse impact? 
Perhaps planets are evolving this capability but there just hasn't been sufficient time for this evolution for us to have noticed yet.  
I think a lot about how we won't be missed if at this very moment the earth was destroyed by an asteroid or any other cataclysmic event.  Not only won't we be missed but I think about how meaningless the last seconds of any of our lives really would be.  So the world ends and right beforehand I was sitting in front of a computer pretending to be busy at a job I don't like.  Useless.  Meaningless.  
It's an intimidating work, deep and quite broad in subject matter. The author builds on material as the book progresses and attempts to bring you in from a novice level of simpler concepts so as to ease the burden. But I found myself re-reading whole sections of the book just remind myself what I was even reading about(especially the concept of "enumerably recursive systems")  
Okay, okay. Bad example. I guess my follow-up question would be why didn't we just stop at the same system as, say, insects which acts and reacts but as far as I know do not experience pain? My intuition says that, at some point, we evolved so greatly that such systems were no longer sufficient for the body?   There's probably a better line of questioning someone with a better grasp on this can ask. I haven't investigated into this too much, so idk 
To add some more weight to your point there, I believe you meant "recursively enumerable" 
Would enumerably recursive systems be jargon for self reflection and adjustment? 
This video explains the difference between philosophical & everyday skepticism, summarizing the thesis for radical/Academic skepticism under the Closure Principle.    It also investigates some of the broader implications of skeptical attitudes, & offers a suggestion for how to cultivate healthy versions of them. 
Great video and a wonderful intro to skepticism. I subscribed.  
The closure principle is bonkers.  I know all the axioms and derivation rules of mathematics, but I don't know the proofs of all true theorems in mathematics (as the closure principle will have me believe).  This is known as the problem of **LOGICAL OMNISCIENCE**.      
I don't know about the rest of you, but my fierce philosophical skepticism has led me directly into understanding the importance of faith and mysticism. Much needed corrective to the broader materialist objective epistemology that dominates bourgeois western thought   
The way I think about it is pretty straightforward. If any actors pushing forward a proposition or narrative have an incentive for said proposition/narrative to be true, then one must be skeptical and demand evidence. Not much more to it. 
So help me out here, is it OK to be skeptical that humans are the sole reason for global warming, and it wouldn't have happened without us?   
I don't think that was healthy.   Since when is it philosophy's job to make you feel better? Considering how terrifying the alternative is, acknowledging how woefully little you really know, that seems like a very easy conclusion for someone to reach.   Being "too skeptical" doesn't mean that you automatically become victim to any ideas that cross your path, it just means that you're not attached too any of these ideas, including the most accepted ones.   What I think the video was mostly dancing around was really just an emotional one. People tend use their ideas of truth to inflict their intellectual superiority onto people and then that causes other people to dig in and you get this neverending trench warfare of a debate that never reaches it's conclusion because both sides are too invested in proving the other wrong. 
There's an (arguably) necessary assumption in using closure for academic skepticism that the relationship between a fact & the knowledge it entails must be obvious to the subject.    The scenario you describe is one that this assumption is meant to mitigate, as well as epistemic perversity (e.g. being thick/crazy).  
Unfortunately, almost every actor pushing forward a proposition has at least one thing to gain: attention. Not a very useful heuristic by itself in practice.   Looking at how much incentive they have can be one factor in your estimation, but I'd strongly disagree with "not much more to it".  
Of course... just cause people might disagree or worse, downvote you, doesn't mean you can't be wary about something. Their disagreement is in no way evidence to the contrary.   I say this mostly because I believe that humans played a very little role in climate change. Majority of people I talk to about this disagree with me but it hasn't ever stopped me from believing it. I've seen the evidence I've seen and have seen other produce (to me) insufficient evidence to say other wise.  
You said that "what someone says isn't a fact, it is hearsay." However, what someone says could be both a fact and an opinion. It's not an either/or situation.   Also, Descartes doesn't assume God, he throws God out as well in Meditations on First Philosophy 1 and 2. I think these are the most valuable ones, because it's only after that that he "proves" God's existence.  To "give up and simply accept that which is evidence-based" sounds a whole lot like Descartes and video guy's stance to me. 
So don't get invested in any ideas - basically don't have beliefs - that way you don't have a problem tossing them for the sake of harmony?  Eh, nice idea, but I'm not getting bent out of shape over it. 
Thank you, I feel the same. And it's not that I'm not educated (masters degree in engineering). I just think that there are so many variables, it's just too difficult to be 100% sure one way or another.      
You could have beliefs, the problem is getting emotionally invested in them. Sometimes really smart people, who are known for their ideas, tend view those ideas as extensions of themselves so when they are attacked, they too feel under siege.  
I'm not sure knowledge through faith can really be called knowledge. You can come to conflicting conclusions through faith, and so I don't think reasonable people can consider that "knowing" something. 
Yeah one of the biggest things that made me question it was the taxes they plan on putting in place. Some people may disagree but I've always been one to question and heavily research anything that has a tax associated with it. Why the need for a tax, who's the money going to, who has connections to companies receiving the subsidies, who/what benefits and who doesn't. This tax seems more of a way to get subsidies into select people's companies. I'm all for clean energy but I just don't like the way they're going about creating this change.  
You make this sound like your skepticism about climate change has to do with your skepticism about taxes. The taxes do not enter into why the science is correct, unless you think the data is manufactured to justify taxes which would be on the conspiratorial without evidence end of things. 
Re: your observation on Buddhism.  The concept of the Self in Buddhism is radically different from what the psychoanalytic school (broadly speaking) presumes as a given. So I am not sure your assertion is valid. Yes, you can read Buddhism using psychoanalytic theories of all kinds, but the vector of approach and analysis that these two ways of thinking adopt are vastly different. 
Are you suggesting that I can't know whether I could have built the rocket without knowledge of rocket science? 
Hence why I called it a critique of Buddhism and noted their diametrically opposed more often than not. Or am I missing something?  
Can you dilate a little on some of those diametric positions? As much as I like Buddhism, I never really delved that deep into it. 
You can't even know the first thing about it. A few examples:  1) how do you know what a rocket is 2) how do you know your memory of the event is correct 3) how do you know there is any physical substrate to build anything out of at all  and on and on. It's so extensive it almost doesnt even make sense to try to invent specific examples. It's just basally faulty.  
This article makes the case that there is something about rights that transcends law, and while I agree with that basic idea, the fact that the article seems to feel that's enough of an argument is frustrating. The question of *why* we think rights transcend law is an interesting one, and one the article should go into.  For my own perspective, I see human rights as having legitimacy iff people agree that those rights have legitimacy. It's why we think that self-determination is probably a right, but free ponies for everyone is not. It's society as a whole that determines rights, not necessarily any legal body, particularly given the ability of the UN to step back and allow exceptions to what are ostensibly fundamental rights. 
I don't think they are enough, I'm just saying that they are the main engine for people not doing bad shit to other people. I think humans are altruistic by nature but the world we have create thus far tends to make you hard and give a propensity to do wrong to other for you own benefit or just because becomes more prevalent. Moral goodness and being raised right are good tethers to keep you from doing wrong but laws are the wall. 
I'm seeing a lot of people arguing over whether human rights are inherent or a societal construct. If you really want to dig deep into this, it might be easier to reduce human rights into moral obligations on all members of society to not undermine some aspect of another person's life. If you make that reduction, you shift that question from "what are human rights" to "what are morals", and that puts you in the realm of metaethics.  I won't get into metaethics because theories in that field are really complicated, but the view that there are absolute moral principles is held by most metaethicists, and there are some strong theories supporting it. 
Pshhh Anarchists have been having this discussion for decades. *Insert George Carlin quote here.* 
From an evolutionary perspective, there is no such thing as a set of innate human rights. It's an imagined reality, part of the cognitive abilities that allowed humans to evolve from middling animals to the dominant species on the planet. Most of the 'rights' we hold as universal and innate were only thought up in the past several centuries; individuals throughout history would be astonished as what we think about each person 'deserving' as a basic human right.   That said, most of the rights that are accepted as doctrine in today's world are necessary for our society to maintain strength and continue growing in a form similar to what it is currently. Yuval Harari's book **Sapiens** explains these paradoxes and processes in-depth and succinctly, if anyone's interested.  
We do not receive our rights from Government. We receive our rights through Natural Law. Through Sovereign Law. Its important to acknowledge, VERY IMPORTANT to acknowledge, that Government is not the provider of rights. We are born with natural, life-given rights that are often subjected to greedy hands of men trying to control them.   If you have to ask for a right from Government, you're doing it wrong.  
How can something "transcend" a law anyway? Something is made law because of an human necessity. Stronger the need, stronger the law. 
Human rights precede the law, as the law (limited right to violence) was invented to protect human rights.   
Proper rights are objectively derived, and have been known to have been for centuries. It's not culture, and it shouldn't be considered that somehow rights were only defined by a legal basis. 
There are no global "Human Rights" that exist. There are no "Human Rights" inside of law, only law.  
You know what protects people more then morals, religious fear and hate in general combine?!?! Laws that's right folks. People don't want to get introuble.  
No, culture has nothing to do with Human Rights...remember...if it did then queer marriage would NOT be legal.  Our culture condemned it for centuries and the majority still do in this country. 
If you are interested in more philosophy concerning the state of what is legal and power structures, I would highly recommend Giorgio Agamben's *Homo Sacer*. It mentions that in dictatorships, actions considered exceptions to the law become the rule. He encourages a watchful eye upon what is considered an exception to law and what is considered the rule. 
While there is truth to that, I think it also avoids the question of whether the law can be beneficial in establishing morality. Can the law be a useful tool in making rights universal? Should the law be considered when making judgements about what is or is not moral? 
Hitler and MLK are really popular on Reddit these days  
I fundamentally disagree with this article. I know a lot of people from college who grew up middle class in china. None of them felt any type of general unease at government control. We, as westerners, have rights ingrained in our society to the point where we know rights abuses when we see them. I don't think that this comes from human nature. I think it's culture internalizing legislation. Anti discrimination laws will become unnecessary at some point not because we are unbiased by nature but because western culture has used legislation to change the culture. 
Hmm. The problem I see with that reasoning is that societies often sacrfice the minority in favor of the majority. The society of Nazi Germany, for instance, would have very different definitions of human rights, or at least of humans,  than us.  
Rights transcend law because rights are properties of being a human being and cannot be taken from you without actual harm (neglecting edge cases of mental/physical disability).   One has the right to free speech because you can physically say whatever you want, and short of being gagged or drugged, nobody can do anything to stop you.   In US law this is a constitutionally protected right, which means the people who make up the government aren't supposed to try to use violence or the threat of violence to influence what you choose to say.   This is also why free ponies is not a right. Having a free pony is not an attribute of being a human being.   Cultures and their derivative laws are better (my own subjective value) that do not try to violate these human rights. Cultures are worse that do try to threaten, brainwash, or otherwise try to get people to behave in a pr scribed manner.  
Natural law theory is one way that rights can transcend culture, but it's not the only way. 
it's a disservice to Rawls to say the last major positive step in political philosophy was in the 1600s.  
Capitalism. It made it ok for people to take advantage of other people for their own benefit. Other's ignorance shouldn't be exploited, unless they've consented. Bc Violence. In that case, we must then decide if they are competent enough to make a logical decision. If they are not, what then?When will the violence and control stop? 
I was just thinking this. Ancaps for example derive ,dare I say, all rights from bodily autonomy. 
You only have the rights you can enforce, via political persuasion or force, or those given by benefactors. They only exist when someone else recognises them, benevolent or not, and enforces them. 
One example might be how we view women's rights in Saudi Arabia. Legally, they don't have many, but there is a general perception in the West that that is a problem. That's a case where the idea of rights transcends what is legally true. 
The law, as such, was invented to protect the interests of a limited caste of people. You could say the law evolved to protect human rights, though. 
That would make them not human, and actually not rights either. What you believe in are 'privileges for some'. 
Are you talking about the U.S.? Because the majority of citizens support it. The public support of it combined with key victories in various states is what led the supreme Court to hear the case in the first place.  Now go look at a country that does not have a majority of their citizens support gay marriage: chances are it isn't legal there.   That alone disproves the idea of human rights existing independently of concepts and values of society. If they truly we're independent and existed regardless, then gay marriage would be legal everywhere. 
I fucking loved Agamben's *Homo Sacer* and am now skeptical of any human rights discourse. 
Morality should and is considered when making judgements about what is and is not legal. Come on, don't be a little kid. Where do you think laws come from? 
I agree that culture ultimately determines rights, but I'm curious as well if law can shape culture to the extent that norms themselves might change. 
This is a very fascinating take on fundamental rights.   I think in more advanced countries, we consider an implicit trade off between publicly provided goods in exchange for additional rights which may not be limited to human biology but are important to function in society. For instance, the right to education or healthcare. It's not something you are necessarily born with but are critical to survival in a modern society. How should these rights be taken into consideration?  
Consensual relationships. Thats capitalism.  Anything else  is not. And any other system lacks consensual relationships 
 You have natural given rights at birth. The right to eat, live, drink, and be without violence. Granted, it may be perceived otherwise simply b/c of the overreach of greedy, lustful men to control you, but the bottom line is.... nobody tells the fawn that it cant drink from the river. Nobody tells the bird that there is a no-fly zone. Nobody tells the elephant he goes to jail if he eats something. Nature, by nature (no pun intended) has inherent rights by simply existing, and we are no different than the natural that created us.  
Nope.  Jeremy Bentham was. I just think his response is brilliant.  The notion of rights falls apart as quickly as they are trampled upon.  Tell David Dao about his fourth amendment rights.  Fairy dust.  Or maybe his rights exist if a court decides they do, huh? 
Isn't that because for the Western context the situation in SA is not, in fact, legally true (by which I mean it would not be legal to deny those rights Saudi deny women over here)? Our perspective that it's a problem correlates with our laws. 
The law restricts the right to violence. Law is universally appealing (even thieves want the booty shared fairly.)  It allows voluntary relationships to flourish and markets to form and thrive.  Law and contracts existed prior to the first city-states.   Of course, if an elite group has the *social authority* to redefine law it tends to get defined to benefit some over others.  Decentralization might be an approach forward.  
if any person legally losing a right means it's not a right, then there are no rights. (which I think is true, partially for this reason). there is no right so sacrosanct that the govt won't take it from you in the right circumstances 
Been reading him on the backs of Foucalt's Order of Things, History of Sexuality and the essay portfolio *Biopower*.  Very interesting how contemporary power Dynamics work. It also makes me realize how thin the line between freedom and tyranny is.  
Slavery, to many people, is not a moral institution or practice, but slavery was legal in the US and still is today, in other places. It was immoral to many in the US, even at the time it was legal. The law is one thing, morality another. Justice, yet another thing altogether. Do these overlap? Sometimes. Are they the same thing, at the same time, or always the same? No.  
That's exactly what I think it is. I think the causation the article claims is backwards. I think human nature evolves because of societal progress.the concepts that the Greeks developed about consciousness, thought and the physical world are an integral part of how we think now but at the time these were advanced, abstract theories being taught by the equivalent of proffesors. 
In my construction, education is not a right - it's really just an idea that has proven to be positive over time.  What is a right, is having the ability to learn. No one can take that away from you without violence.  So the question of how best to educate people in order to have a society that doesn't stagnate or collapse is one of policy.   If anything, mandatory schooling is a rights violation.  The same thing is true of healthcare. You do have the right to live insofar as you can manage to obtain food, water, and other necessities. You do not have the right to force someone else to care for you.   There are laws in the US, however, that dictate if you show up at a medical facility and need life saving treatment that the medical staff must provide that treatment. Like the schooling case, that is a policy decision and not a matter of rights. It's just been found that society as a whole seems to work a bit better when people have that assurance.  
Violence and the threat of violence are always indicators of rights violations. So you do not have the right to rob someone.  A murkier case would be the con artist. 
This is quite simple from where I'm sitting... There is a very small set of universal desires and we all agree that these should be considered "rights"... everything else is and always will be argued about ad infinitum. 
Ah so it's an antiquated idea, derived from religion, that has no rational basis; a pleasing fiction that exists only in our minds. 
I'm not sure what your point is. Just because I have rights doesn't mean that everybody respects them. 
This is just simplistic. If you actually hold views like this, wow. 
Many of the rights women are now legally entitled to in the West, used to be against the law. The same can be said of all pretty much all rights prior to The Declaration of the Rights of Man and Citizen.   Where did the dissenus come from that forced the changes in law to guarantee our rights? Our sense of right is not determined solely by the legal system that we live under.   There is a general consensus that exists regarding the treatment someone is entitled to by virtue of being human. We can appeal to this general notion, that is inscribed in law to varying degrees, to struggle against those who violate those standards of treatment. That is how I understand the concept of Human Rights.  
Do yourself and us a favour and read up on what law actually is, how it came to be, and whom it actually granted rights early in its history. 
That would be the difference between right and law. If we take what you said at face value no government would be capable of breaking human rights if they just stated it's not a right anymore. It does not work like that. 
As a Derrida fan, I'd ask you to consider how separate those two categories are? 
What do you mean "why"? Law does not determine justice; the historical existence of legal slavery demonstrates that rather conclusively. Justice exists outside of law, and when possible we write our laws to match our understanding of justice. When law is divorced from justice it inevitably serves naked power instead, and functions as a tool of the oppressors to rule the oppressed. 
What is societal progress but human development? How can the Ancient Greeks have progressed without some of their number organically growing beyond their peers, and then passing on said knowledge in the form of teachings and laws? It was not laws which manifested those discoveries and innovations, it was human ingenuity; law is always a product of people - whether that is a whole population or a small group or an individual is another story. Of course, discoveries are layered - we all stand on the backs of giants - so in this way past laws have shaped present culture, but progress always comes when people step beyond what has been handed down in order to discover something more. This is where culture outstrips law and allows for creativity and innovation. Dogmatic, untested law (our ancestors did it, ergo so should we) stifles the same. That isn't to say our ancestors didn't get it right, just that the vintage of law is no guarantee of efficacy.  
Should 'measurably good' policy be subject to similar protections of rights? By measurably good I mean that there is significant empirical evidence that demonstrates that the policy impacts society in a positive manner relative to not having the policy.  
I didn't say rob (implying use of force or violence to take property).  It said Theft (taking property that does not belong to me, but no violence involved) 
That's not what is stated at all. Religion is mentioned, but certainly not related to religion at all.  
Have you ever thought for yourself outside of Government provided education? 
To be honest, just reading the replies to my comments, I truly can't wrap my head around the way you folks think. I'm a fairly compassionate person, but for you people to feel compassion for people that don't deserve it truly boggles my mind. It's almost like you all have Stockholm's syndrome.  
That's not quite accurate. The Bill of Rights applies to any person on American soil, citizen or not. Furthermore the distinction you've laid out seems quite meaningless. Human rights are rights an person has, even if that concept is difficult to define. Citizen rights are positive liberties reserved for members of a certain state. I see no conflict here. 
That's actually very much the point of Agamben's work, Derrida is a big influence on him. 
Never read Derrida, so I think you will know better than I.  
I again, think you're looking at it backwards. Every issue we've faced, civil rights, suffrage, slavery of others, started as an idea put forth by a small minority. These people had to OVERCOME society/culture and come up with a new idea that was better. These new ideas all started as legislation. Initially these ideas were crazy and abstract to the majority of people. They then hit a critical public acceptance level. Next this idea becomes a law. Now the portion of people who disagree with this new idea is being told they are in the wrong. That their parents, communities, pastor and Culture are leading them away from the direction society is going. Then you get to a point where only a small minority thinks this legislation is wrong and they are considered extreme. At this point what started as an abstract idea has been adopted by society/culture. 
I can give a small summary but the rest will be published in an paper at some point. So if you are genuinely curious, we can talk a short bit on it otherwise I am not interested in an argument in which you already feel has zero chance of changing your mind. 
No. Nothing is so good that all alternatives should be forever precluded.  
Ah, I see. That would depend on whether you recognize property rights as human rights or not. This is not as clear as some other examples.   Personally I do recognize property rights.   If one toddler takes a toy from another, did toddler a violate toddler b's rights? I would say yes since the concept of mine and yours are basic to the human condition. Toddler b cries partly because they toy is gone and partly because it feels unfair in a very basic sense.   Even though there are cultures that reject the notion of ownership like socialist communes and the like, the amount of mental effort that goes into those situations is an indicator that something beyond the default is going on.  
Lol are you serious? It comes from the days when people thought the big man in the sky had created everything and the universe ran according to the ticking of his cosmic clock. You take away the Deity and the idea of natural rights no longer has any solid foundation. 
if you think some people don't deserve compassion, I don't consider you a compassionate person. but regardless, that's nothing to do with the topic here. what do rights have to do with compassion? if only some people have it, how can it be a right?  
Well, how separate are any two things we consider binary?  
I absolutely agree that justice is relative, although I think it's less relative than you are suggesting. But it is because it is so relative that we must be so cautious with the law, working to build consensus and not being so eager to criminalize those things where consensus is weak. 
Ah, I think this is a semantic issue then. I am using culture to refer to the people who make up a society and who produce it's cultural products, whether they be ideas, items etc. Law, as I refer to it, is the crystallised society in the form of the state or social norms, i.e. unwritten law. Only people, i.e. the producers and embodiment of culture can create anything whatsoever, while law is simply the tool used to engineer conformity throughout a given population. Innovation, as we both have said, always comes from a minority, and organically through their transgression of law or what is generally accepted as true and good. Only post-hoc does law impose a new value set upon a population in order to generate homogeneity of action and opinion on whatever matter has been brought up. In other words, I think we agree! 
But you said a right is that which "cannot be taken from you without actual harm" i.e. someone has to forcibly take them from you.   Not something that when violated "feels unfair in a very basic sense"  i.e. something we have a strong intuition about.   Would seem your initial definition of human rights would preclude property rights.  So you'd either have to give up on property, or take a second look at your definition. 
The bird has the natural right to fly, the cheetah the right to run, the Buffalo to graze freely. These are natural rights. The Spaghetti monster your so adamant to attack, does not. What are you on about?  
Somewhat, but it's based in logic. If you have killed you have shown that you do not value life. Therefore, your life has no value and for someone to take it would mean nothing. 
My only statement  is that at a certain point, you've done enough evil to void your "basic human rights" 
Yeah you're right, I was just trying to remedy the misunderstanding of the person I was commenting on; I was thinking more about due process concerns regarding Guantanamo detainees and such. But yes, I suppose the actual application is far more subtle and complex than I suggested. 
I wasn't really considering tyranny and freedom binary. I was mainly speaking in light of how most people categorize freedom and tyranny are night and day, but the boundary between the two is very thin.  
Your response almost mimics what I thought as I wrote my post: perspective.    Justice being relative is all about the perspective you take when you look at it and as I wrote it felt like I was going in and out of thinking about justice locally versus nationally or regionally.    As you said, it may be less relative, and I agree.  Somewhere along the construction of justice those individual concepts/principles get molded in with someone else's, and so on making it more applicable to broader folks.    Your point is well taken.  Nice chatting   
Yes, in the case of property it would be the ability to own things as the fundamental human attribute. So the victim of robbery has had force applied and harm done because the things that have were owned are changed involuntarily.  
That is irrelevant. I am not discussing how it came to be. I am saying that it will go on with its business regardless of if the dude you drop it on believes in it or not. Because it does _actually_ exist.  If that is too complicated an example, think of another one: You may claim that your faith gives you ability to walk on water. You may truly believe it, and so may your followers. That is "Human Rights". But as soon as you step on water you will fall through. Because water does not care about your belief of being able to walk on surface (or your belief in "Human Rights" for that matter). That is what distinguishes "real" things from imaginary ones.  I am afraid too many problems are stemming from the inability of people to make this simple distinction, and believing that the crap they make up in their heads is real. 
Yes. As well as any other rights included in our understanding of human rights. 
You don't stop being human when you hurt others, this kind of thinking only mythologizes the worst among us into some sort of monsters. They are not monsters, at least in the literal sense. I know this strips away a sort of reassuring thought that you or other people you perceive as normal would never do horrible things, but that's a delusion. We are all capable of what you call evil. This is why people are shocked their loved one would, say, molested children. 
What you are not supposed to do is define a new class of people to deny them all due process and the legal and moral protections "we" have fought long and hard to gain for ourselves.  In case you do not realise what being classed a enemy combatant means let me spell it out. The US government kidnapped people in other sovereign nations it was not at war with to send them to secret prisons where they were tortured and held without any form of oversight or due process, they were held indefinitely with no means of challenging their detention.   In any other country with a functioning legal system these people would of either been classed as prisoners of war or as criminals but above all they would be suspects.  
I think he was going further and suggesting that anythings that are binary have no real boundary. Though i may be putting words in mouths. 
I don't remember where I read it but someone suggested (as a thought experiment) that the best law would be the one written by a group of people with artificially induced temporary amnesia of their own circumstances (technology we lack of course), forcing them to consider all perspectives equally since they never know which role they would play once they get back to their lives in society. 
Not sure I understand.  How is the ability to own things as the fundamental human attribute?  It does not exist in lone humans.  I get the right to life; a lone human has that all on their own.  I get the right to safety of their person; a lone human has that all on their own.  I get the right to speech; a lone human has that all on their own.  These attributes exist in individual humans.   But property, the concept of property, is agreement between people; that something belongs to some person or people & they get to decide what happens to that stuff.  This fundamentally cannot exist in an individual human.   
That's a bit of a stretch. I'm just trying to understand how you folks have such strong sympathy for evil. You must have never seen it in person.  
I'm fully aware that every human is capable of being a monster given the right circumstances, you're very right, I've seen this first hand. However when a person isn't fighting for their life, or their survival in an austere environment, and just plain enjoys hurting others, they're not human. I'm sorry, no matter how you try to swing that, some people are not fixable, and are animals, and need to be dealt with accordingly. 
There are many logic jumps in Pascal's argument. In fact, it offers only two extreme possibilities, when there are an infinite amount of them.  What if the afterlife only lasts two weeks, after which you disappear completely.  What if the afterlife only lasts a fixed amount depending on your last hour thoughts, after which you disappear completely.  What if the afterlife only lasts while there's someone who remembers you.  What if there's an infinite afterlife, but there are no gods whatsoever.  What if there's an infinite afterlife, but the gods there are totally uninterested in humans.  And so on. 
I believe you have missed a fifth premise:  That the act of belief carries along with it no cost during your lifetime.   If there is a "cost" to believing (in other words, having to spend every Sunday in church, or socialising in different circles resulting in fewer secondary benefits) then that should also be factored into the equation. 
Pascals wager is that you risk finite time, effort, and tithe for a possibility at infinite return.  But there is an infinitesimal chance that gods exist. And if gods exist there are an infinity of ways to worship imperfectly (e.g., having the wrong god, as believers of other gods, or differently-behaving believers of the same god, will gladly proselytize at you). So your probability of being paid off is 1/&infin;^2 which overwhelms the mere &infin; that you stand to win. The expected value is 1/&infin; and it is a lousy bet. Especially considering all the evidence says it's just a scam anyway.    
Pascal's wager is pretty weak tbh... Especially in its intended purpose (the God example). Believing in an all knowing God just for the sake of saving your skin, I think the all knowing God would see through that. But that's just the beginning. To believe in any one God is now betting against the other 40,000  
Why do we have so few references to either the primary source or to appropriate secondary sources on a "clarification" thread?  Why should I, the reader believe that you understand Pascal and his purposes any better than anyone else? 
While all of the above is true, you're going to get a lot of hate from religious people like anyone that actually views the meaning of anything that mentions religion as an example of an impossible solution. While you can't force yourself to believe you can lose faith making Pascal's standing an interesting one when the wager was made. If you are talking about the false wager you're reading word for word what Pascal meant and not what he had meant by his words. Pascal was figuratively speaking about taking a chance to yield some result for the same price as taking a chance with no possible yield of results. If you look at it with simple finite numbers you could model it like below  1 hour to possibly win $20 by doing x 1 hour to earn nothing and gain nothing doing y  Beyond that everything breaks down to economics. As soon as you gain anything for something else you need to consider both possibilities and their values to an individual. 
I dont necessarily agree with the 3rd because, weather or not were talking about conscious choice you cant argue the facts like the sky is a shade of blue or quarters are 1/4 a dollar, just based on "belief" it actually required more faith to believe something untrue as opposed to something that is true. (just a subjective thought)  
If the investment is less than the return multiplied by the likelihood of success, you take the bet. The principle governs everything from poker to political science. 
This still has some of the fatal flaws of the flawed wager. For example, any absurd God you can posit might have similar potential outcomes (I.e. you should believe that god is a 4 foot tall elephant in a clown wig or he will send you to hell") and using your version of Pascals Wager, we would have to take each of these propositions equally seriously, even if we end up deciding against them. This wager would have us spending all of our time carefully weighing nonsense propositions. 
maybe taking the question of god's existence seriously is what sends an individual to hell for eternity.  Pascal's wager inevitably leads to absurdity if you follow its logic consistently. 
Best answer here.  My reply to the pascal wager theists is always "you can make any shit up and be like..... see it's better if you believe this because the elves bring you cake". 
I've heard an example called "Pascal's Mugging". It goes like this:  Pascal is out walking one night, when a man yanks him into a dark alley. "Give me all your money right now," says the man, "and there is a finite chance I'll give you infinite money tomorrow."  Pascal, recognizing the scenario, happily hands over his wallet.  I find that this illustrates the flaws in Pascal's wager very well. 
Pascal's wager also is a monotheistic centric argument. What if I choose the wrong God? What if millions of them could exist?  
Nice comment.  It's also interesting to add some psychological and cultural context.  I think people have a distaste for Pascal's Wager because it is manipulative.  I (or the church) tell you that the glory or suffering will be infinate and after asserting that I then argue that you must plug infinities into all your mental equations and have them blow up uselessly.  If I'm allowed to do that I can control your whole life, because there never comes a point at which it isn't better to be safe than sorry.  Though Pascal got at it through math, it's interesting to see that the wager is basically using the psychological mechanisms of superstition (i.e. "I better just in case") right at the dawn of the "age of reason", which was largely about sweeping away all superstition, even as Pascal helped usher in that age with his probability theory.  It's interesting to see this new "weapon" for reason being used by one of its inventors for the side of the church. 
Can we perhaps change the argument though? I use this in climate change discussions sometimes, and maybe I'm using it incorrectly. I'm curious on your thoughts but my argument goes like this:  It's better to assume climate change is real and to work to actively prevent/mitigate it and be wrong than it is to assume climate change is not real and be wrong.   If we assume climate change is real, and work to prevent it (See: electric cars, renewable energy, clean air, etc.) but turn out to be wrong we still come out ahead. Might suffer a bit of economic stress but the end result will be cleaner air, less/no need for fossil fuels, and many other green techs we have not even discovered yet.   However if we assume it's not real, and continue as we are, we may get some of the above benefit but the damage will be horrible. Rising sea levels, hunger, fire, etc...  Unlike the god argument, these to ideas are a bit more tangible to everyone.  
To be fair everybody is an idiot compared to Fermat.  
Beliefs do not have to be based on evidence. The OP is completely full of it on that point (also on all other points).  And the idea that evidence modifies people's beliefs is potently not true.  It's not a matter of critically evaluating religious dogma, its a matter of accepting it. For most people this is no different then changing the type of undergarments they wear. Sometimes its a practical decision, sometimes its a social decision. In your friend's case its a decision that directly affects her ability to successfully reproduce with a partner of her choice, which is much more valuable and important than any factual evidence. 
The main thing I'm confused about is, if you believe and follow a diety(or dieties) you inherently have a hand in the pot; those ignoring any diety (like atheists and others do) don't even seem to be placing a bet at all. The only explanation that they are in the pot is the "God who only accepts people who don't worship one" view which would be a paradox.  So you can as a believer either be right or wrong about your God, or as a non believer you can either be right, which would be like never playing and not like 'winning' since you would end up with nothing, or wrong because you didn't follow the real God. The odds are infinite yes, but the rules are you have to play so the second number is constant and we can only affect the first #/&infin; 
Good point, but there's one problem. Infinity doesn't behave like a number. Infinity squared isn't bigger than infinity. Infinity +2 is still infinity. 
This is flawed. There's not an infinite number of wrong ways to worship. If you enumerate every possible action an individual can take for an entire lifetime it will be a finite set. It will be incomprehensibly large, but still finite.   Think of it like a chessboard. There's an infinite number of possible moves (if the two players aren't attempting to win) but you can only achieve a finite amount of them within a lifetime. If the players make 1 or 2 or even 100 moves per second it still creates a list of board positions that ends.  Also you admitted that your inverse-infinity probability of "god existing" converges to zero. So I don't understand why you arbitrarily started the discussion claiming it's a fact God doesn't exist. You could have ended the discussion right there. 
That's not entirely true. You are assuming by believing in a god that doesn't exist you are expensing finite resources for zero gain.  However many people experience gains that exceed their expended resources by joining a religious organization.  Many people find a sense of community and friends.  Many find help from people from their religious community when they are down.  That's also part of Pascals wager that many forget.  There isn't zero gain by believing in a non existent god. 
One could conceive as the possibilities being either God or no God. The question is the manner through which God has revealed himself to man. So it's not that an infinite number of different gods could be the correct one, but rather a question of how God has revealed himself in a number of possible ways. Arguably, God would have reveal himself in one of the major religions that currently exist, therefore making the major religions more likely than the infinite number of other obscure possibilities. 
Unless religious lack of mental freedom personally sickens you. In that case 'playing dumb' is a form of self torture. 
You are literally arguing against what he called the "flawed wager." What point are you exactly trying to make? 
Why the choice of the word "vehement"?  I'm more of a quiet atheist myself. 
The point is that the flawed wager IS a nonsense proposition.  
As a response to Pascal's Wager, I've always liked "well, I've never told you this before, but the truth is that I'm the guy that decides who goes to Heaven and who goes to Hell. Give me $20 and I can guarantee you a place in Heaven. $20 for a potentially infinite reward, that's worth the risk right?" 
I don't understand how this idea isn't the end all for this arguement. Why does it ever come up as a way to argue religion? It's an interesting piece of logic and should still be taught, but it's flaws are astounding.  
That's the strongest point in my opinion. In order to actually possess a valid perspective, you would have to believe in every religion that has ever existed with equal devotion to each one.  
This is the best answer. Pascal's wager isn't a 50/50 bet, it's actually a 1:100000000 shot. 
I've always been a fan of religions with practical real-world applications. Christianity's sell-everything-you-own and "stop whining" approach to totalitarianism or bullying (in the form of 'turn the other cheek' which is pretty bad advice for a lot of scenarios) has always put me off. But when something like Buddhism comes around and gives you something tangible, philosophies and practices that make life better to live and brings joy to others, I can't argue with it.    Pascal's Wager might not be the best, but that's because the benefits and detriments are wholly intangible. But when Christians say that their god has multiple charities and help people deal with their own mortality, and guides some bad people to not murder and steal, that's a much better argument. 
Let A and B be opposite absurd propositions, to which neither has any evidence but A seems "more rational" to the typical person under an _ex post facto_ explanation. For instance, if A were the proposition that the world is flat and B was the proposition that the world is not. If there is no evidence to support one proposition over another, the layman's consensus on which one "seems" to be more reasonable. You have no reason to believe that the probability of A is higher than that of B given no evidence, regardless of popularity and rationalization of these concepts. 
Why should I care about Fermat (coming from ignorance but willing to learn)? 
What do you mean by this? What's an instance of untestable probability? 
Yep. I don't understand how someone can just stop believing one thing and start believing another thing unless some evidence is presented that shows the established viewpoint to be flawed. 
The atheist gambles that their life choices are not constrained by any religious requirements.  Their win is in the fact that they don't have to follow fatwas or other commands that contradict how they wish to live life.  If you take something like homosexuality as an example -- proscribed by multiple major religions -- the wager is more like "If I suppress homosexual feelings and there is a God, I'm rewarded with eternity in heaven, otherwise I go to hell.  If I suppress homosexual feelings and there is no God, I've wasted life experiences for no reward, but if there is no god, then my life was lived to a much fuller potential."  That's where the atheist receives their "reward". 
Being out of the pot is not a bet. It's conservation of your bankroll when the house percentage is against you. 
You are restricting your view to a handful of religions (albeit common ones). There are many existing "pots" that don't strictly require you to believe anything to reap a "reward" after life - just behave in a simple manner, and/or cultivate your "spiritual self".  Plus there's an infinity of imaginable "pots" that may either give rewards to anyone, or no one, or some subsets of people independently of belief, or even strictly punish fake/opportunistic believers. 
If you consider that non-belief might result in only a limbo-like state whereas false belief can result in eternal torture, then non-belief is a valid strategy. 
&infin; is merely a variable representing a number that is infinitely large. How they behave when taken to the limit of infinity determines how functions of them behave.  L'Hopital can explain it better than I can.  This one converges to 0. You're not getting your wager back. 
I'm going to butcher this nut I'll give it a go. From my understanding infinity squared is a different concept then infinity plus two. A metaphor immagen  you had a jar of jelly beans. Now that jar represents all the jelly beans ever all that ever could or would be or infinity. Now say I had 2 jars each jar representing a universe and the jelly beans within representing all possible jelly beans of that universe. Now you have 2 sets of infinity adding or subtracting jelly beans from either jar does not change the nature of infinity nor would taking the beans from one and adding them to the other. Both are clear sets. 
Albeit it's harder to argue about infinitesimal risks when finite people are being documented as dying horribly. 
Well, yeah. Pascal just didn't want to admit that he was capable of higher math but incapable of distancing himself from populist peer pressure. 
Lol, it's not $20! It's 10% of your gross wage! (Tithe for a catholic) 
That's what every religion does, yet 98% of Americans buy into it.  
cant they just say i believe in god but not you/our deal(authority)? 
Sure, but have you considered that God may exist and has no interest in your belief or devotion, but in your character and actions? 
I've always thought the safest position is to figure out the largest possible number of religions you can believe in that have non-contradictory guidelines for salvation.   If there's religions A, B, C, D, and E, and religion A wants you to exclusively worship god A and religion B wants you to exclusively worship god B but allows non-believers who are vegetarian to reach heaven, while religions C and D both follow god C in different ways but allow for the existence of other gods and religion E is a polytheistic religion, then the safest bet is to venerate god C primarily while also sacrificing to a couple gods from E and maintaining a vegetarian diet. You're screwed if A is right or if none of them are right, but otherwise, salvation!  Of course, the inconvenience of doing all these things might end up being prohibitive, which is one of the many reasons Pascal's Wager is silly. But if you're going to do it, do it *right*.  
But this has no upshot without the presumption that absolutely no evidence applies either way and the only class of propositions to which that applies is those which never even occur to us, since everything conceivable relates somehow to experience, and by extension, evidence. All such relations must bear on relevant estimations based on the evidence which is that experience.   This may be nigh impossible to quantify in many cases, but not necessarily all, and strictly speaking, such difficulty is beside the point. If Pascals' Wager, or some facsimile is good enough for any ideally capable being, then it deserves some respect from us too. 
No kidding!! This behaviour is all too rare and needs to be normalized. No shame in getting things wrong.  
What if there is a god, but he's petty and unfit to judge but is somehow still god?  Recognizing that something is not just doesn't prove it's not true.  I'm atheist btw. But not because i don't like the versions of god set up by religion. Because the reasons set up for belief are inadequate.   
Unless you consider that people, or maybe life in general, is a disease on a cosmic scale which makes us the ultimate evil. Being kind and aiding your fellow human would then be exacerbating the issue and only misanthropy would be considered "good."  
I've never lost any money at craps.  I've never played craps.  I'm probably above average in gross profit from craps.  
Now you're weighing the truth-claims of one sect vs another, taking the question seriously per OP, and answering it according to your morality, weighing what type of a god you believe would be just. 
What's converging here? You can't speak of limits of just anything; you need a function of some kind. 
I'd like to see the sequel, where those two are whipped and held at gunpoint to confess that they were lying about Hank, just to see if they'd be as willing to die for their truth as the apostles were when they were tortured and executed for their testimony. 
Catholics don't tithe.  Besides the weekly collection, where people usually throw a couple bucks at most in the basket, parishes have bingo nights, pasta dinners and the like to raise needed money ... because we don't tithe. 
What if god exists, but heaven and hell do not exist? 
Or maybe there is a god but is not even sentient and acts more as mother nature? 
This is the best advice. Invest in a proverbial index fund of spirituality, and you can't go wrong. Priests hate him!  
The problem is that it's a message being misrepresented in that case, not a metaphor/analogy/moral. I mean choosing to interpret certain parts of religious text a way that is not even being expressed is just doubling down on not using critical thinking in any capacity. 
Not quite. Psychology often fails us, and we often are led to believe what we want to believe. A large reason for the spread of Christianity in some areas of Europe include its promises of resurrection and other benefits that trumped those of other religions. Submitting to confirmation bias does _not_ make Pascal's Wager a better method of decision-making.  
The misattributed Marcus Aurelius quote touched on this. You ought not to worship an unjust god. _Rebel_, fight back, or suffer. Either way you lived a more virtuous life than that of one who submits to that unjust god.  It should not be taken as claim of disproof. Its an acknowledgement of resistance in this one outcome. 
My stance comes down to this: if there is a god and it requires my belief in it and worship of it for salvation, it is not a benevolent god and I choose damnation over worship of a malevolent being. I've not had any evangelist give a sensical response to that yet.  
This is essentially the same as the proof that shows the cardinality of rational numbers is the same as natural numbers is the same as integers. 
It depends on whether or not they were born into believing Hank was true.   There are many who die for their faith. Does that make it true? Can't you think of ANY recent examples of people doing that as suicide bombers or hijackers?  And someone about to be executed, do you think if they recanted, they wouldn't be killed anyway for rebellion and/or blasphemy? In fact, many probably recanted, but they were executed and you are told a story that they did not. Who can argue the point, since they were executed?  The Navy SEALs stopped waterboarding their guys for torture resistance training because it would break them. Torture someone long enough, and they will break. Many have died to hide a lie, if they believe it will serve a greater good, or if they realized it wouldn't matter what they said. 
It's fun to tell Christians that tithing is a strictly Old Testament thing. Christian writings never talk about giving 10% to the church. 
70.6% according to the last census/poll I saw. And only about 20% of Americans actually go to Church on a weekly basis.  But it doesn't fit the narrative that America is some hyper-religious state so the militant atheists can circlejerk about it.  Frankly the vast majority of people I know that are religious are nominally interested in it for the community and the sermons that put moral questions in a somewhat familiar/relatable context for them. They just adopt the religion because it's a formality that they don't want to butt heads with the traditionalists on/the community aspect matters more to them than rigorous skepticism.  I can't say if it's for better or for worse, but we don't have a lot of community dialogue on moral matters outside of religion and philosophy clubs/academia (which are sparse). The internet is trying to take on this role - thankfully - but it's still brick and mortar for the most part. For now. 
Am pastor, can confirm. Tithing is not a NT concept (although Jesus has plenty to say about money/greed/charity) and even the OT model of tithing is very different from the "give 10% of your gross to the church" you almost always hear. Frankly, I don't know how we got here from there. 
Compare those numbers to other nation states. Behind only the middle East and a few small sample size countries, America is one of the most religious nations on the planet.  
If god were truly "infinitely benevolent" there would be no hell, no damnation - perhaps there *would* be purgation of some form, but that's an argument we don't need to explore here - and, in fact, no "evil" (unless we assume god isn't omnipotent and has no control over whether evil exists or not). Your point about "saving us from ourselves" is, with respect, nonsense: it isn't ourselves we need to be saved from, it is the lake of fire which your putatively loving god has created and into which he places people for eternity. The fact that many religious people, including apparently yourself, can't see this very simple point is the cause of a huge amount of suffering on earth, because those people attempt to preach the "truth" of an irreconcilable contradiction and scorn those who refuse to swallow it.  
It is usually upon the citation of parables that I blaspheme and remind them that I have denied the existence of their god in earnest, knowing full well the consequences - that it is the only unforgivable sin in the western Christian bible.  I can't be saved so I would prefer that those who judge my life so bereft of goodness just walk away. 
I refer to my reply, lines three , four and five.3, 4, 5 respectively 
I'm pretty sure German Catholics have to give about 9% of the wage. In fact I believe it is automatically deducted. (Kirchensteuer, I believe it is called).  Tithe literally means "tenth part" it is derived from two old English words, though I don't remember how to spell them. 
More religious? I'll buy that. But what's the difference? 20% active church-goers vs. 15%? I mean, a jump from 1% to 2% is 100% more which sounds scary out of context. I'm not making an excuse for religion, I'm just pointing out that our country is far more secular than anti-religion alarmists give us credit for.  The foundations of the country were religious purists/heretics escaping persecution; further tribalized by the melting pot which encouraged sectionalist-minded communities built around that shared identity... to me it's a miracle we're not ENTIRELY religious fundamentalists given the social forces at work pre-internet era.  If anything, I'd hedge a bet that the secularization of the nation post-internet is strong evidence that the religiosity of the country was nothing more than community engagement out of social necessity more than anything else.   
Oh yeah. I get it. There has to be some entry point of belief, right? I can't use the Bible or Book of Mormon to make a point if you outright refuse to accept that they could be true. It's a leap of faith, for sure. I don't judge you for not making any leap of faith. If I weren't raised in this church the odds are that I wouldn't either. So there's no judgment here. But the parable is just a story. If you hear the story and the principles ring true and they make sense to illustrate a point, it doesn't really matter if it came from the Bible or if I just made it up, right?  Anyway, best wishes to you. Thanks for keeping it civil. Cheers! 
You do not have a reply in this thread that has five lines. 
The idea of a God clearly defining and articulating or enforcing desired parameters conflicts with the notion of free will.   This is referred to in religious circles as "his will is a mystery" or something like that - but this is flawed. It implies that God is actively curating the system and desires evil or, he's created a flawed system and is entirely hands off. In either case, God isn't a being worthy of, or seemingly even interested in, worship.   If a God created us, and completely divorced himself from us so that we couldn't be sure of His existence or intentions, there's no reason to operate under the pretense that He cares if we think he exists. 
People really need to stop saying that the Copenhagen interpretation implies that consciousness causes wave function collapse. 
Alright guys, I'm AFK hooking myself up to a machine that will kill me if I do not win the lottery, I'll be rich when I wake up and I'll know that the theory was true.  Furthermore, the idea of orbiting a black hole at the end of the universe in the dark all by my lonesome sounds kind of elegant in a way. 
 This article makes the traditional mistake of assuming that wavefunction collapse is an experimentally proven phenomenon.  We don't know if wavefunction collapse actually happens or if it only appears to happen. There are a number of excellent theories, including my favorite (einselection)  which does away with  non-unitary collapse and instead suggest ways that's the appearance of collapse might be an emergent behavior of the Hamiltonian through superselection rules.    It's also important to note that part of the reason we need these seemingly complicated theories is the fact that entanglement exists and that Bell's experiments prove that any hidden variable theory is insufficient to reproduce the predictions of quantum mechanics. These two things together mean that there has to be some unintuitive weirdness going on.  
Isn't a major flaw in this the linking of large macro events to tiny quantum fluctuations? The doomsday device and immortality both just assume that a quantum change will be enough to change our situation enough to avoid death or stop a nuclear attack, but actually that seems very unlikely. Throw myself into a fire and what subatomic change is going to save me? Like many articles it misunderstands quantum uncertainty in a subatomic particle with "any human action or decision is possible". 
Despite what others are saying about not experiencing the consciousness of other selves, I found this very intriguing. Does this mean that there exists a universe where no one dies? 
Is quantum indeterminism why they say that we might be in a simulation? If it's absolutely true, then it does sound like the universe is some sort of a genetic algorithm simulation, testing out all possible outcomes to perhaps find a suitable one. 
Doesn't work, though. You're already in whatever universe you're in. If this is the universe where you die tomorrow, then you're screwed regardless of whether there's another where you live. You don't miraculously become your counterpart in another universe at the moment you would have died.  
Is the article implying that your consciousness and the consciousness of an alternate "you" are the same?  
I'm probably a bit late to this but one thing I really struggle to reconcile with the many worlds explanation is that from our perspective shouldn't there be lots of things happening that don't fit with normal probability? What I mean is that if there are infinite universes that means that there's a universe out there where every spin of every roulette wheel that has ever existed has landed on black. There's a universe out there where every coin toss ever thrown has been heads. Two scenarios that would be noticed by the people populating those universes. So why does absolutely everything in our universe seem to follow normal probability rules, seems like too much of a coincidence that we just happen to be in the universe where it all makes sense. Some insight into this would be great!  
Isn't quantum suicide an experiment we've all performed already? By means of the overwhelmingly slim odds of our own conception and birth?  
Can someone eli5 the notion of measurement in quantum mechanics for me? If a particle can occupy several seemingly contradictory positions before the instant of measurement, how do we know, if we haven't measured them? Or is this a prediction based on theoretical knowledge about the inner workings of physical phenomena within the framework of quantum mechanics? As in, everything we know about the behavior of particles indicates that they occupy such multifarious positions or states, yet we cannot "catch" them in the act or otherwise document that they do so?   Thank you for any replies.  
I'm totally new to this sub but I find it utterly fascinating the way science and philosophy intersect.  I guess I've always wrongly grouped philosophy in with religion. 
There is one possible counterargument for quantum immortality. If it's impossible to die from your point of view, then eventually you're going to live out even the sun itself and all the stars in the universe. What happens then? Life needs energy output to continue and once we reach the heat death of the universe, there will be no more energy being outputted by anything anymore. Surely that would mean the permanent end of your consciousness unless you could somehow create new energy? 
I didn't read the sources or the mathematical proofs for these experiments, but to me, if someone's theory involves a world or universe or any system that can't be observed, that seems like a useless theory. I could posit for instance, a new and unlikely outcome for a well understood chemical process, and just say it occurs in another universe that we can't observe. Am I right? Wrong? Can you tell the difference? 
We don't nearly know enough about quantum science to draw this sort of conclusions. 
In addition to all the above responses, these thought experiments do not make a clear distinction between possible and imaginable. The total set of possibilities of an event doesn't necessarily include every imaginable outcome. Why should I assume that if I were to attempt to kill myself there is an alternate universe that either is or comes to be in which I survive? That seems a bit vain, personally, but more importantly, not particularly rigorous.    
Wait, so I'm confused. Obviously the effect of a particle's measured direction won't often be a life-or-death situation, but does it even have a quantifiable effect on reality at all? The difference between dead and not dead is like the difference between 1 and 0, where value 1 means "I can affect the universe in a measurable way" and 0 means "I can't measurably affect the universe." What are quantum physicists measuring, how are they measuring it, and what effects does particle measured at "1" or "up" have on the universe that are recognizably distinct from those measured as "0" or "down?" If they behave the same way, then we might as well be making a distinction between 1 and (-1) when the relevant value is how far it is from 0, if I'm understanding this correctly.  
Really interesting. Let's suppose the multiverse theory is actually true, consider the moral implications. None of our actions would have any consequences in the collection of realities. They obviously would in a single world but if we knew that in at least one other universe they wouldn't, how are we going to be able to determine what the current *reality* is? 
I find this paradoxical. If after 1000 tries I survive, I'd be pretty confident the many worlds are real, but my assistant waiting outside will not because to him it'll be as unlikely to see me alive whether the many worlds are true or not. How can we logically arrive to different conclusions while having the exact same information?  Or else, what do I know that he doesn't that let me arrive to a different conclusion than his? 
One area this does not address is the interesting case of convergence. If all of these splits are happening then eventually chance will dictate that two split universes will converge back into the same one. I think that would be an interesting idea to explore as well. 
Permit me to politely disagree. The use of the word "consciousness" in connection with wave function collapse serves an essential purpose: it allows us to distinguish between writers with and without a scientific mindset. 
The "you" that survives doesn't exist yet. When you pull the trigger the universe splits into two, one where you survive and one where you are dead. To the version of you that survived, it will really feel like you just keep hearing click, click, click. The version of you that died won't experience anything, in the thought experiment at least. In reality there wouldn't just be two new worlds. The random quantum event in the gun may spawn two new worlds, but all of the billions of other quantum events from the time that the gun fires till the bullet hits you also spawn new worlds. You'd end up with two general categories of worlds, ones where you're probably alive, and ones where you're probably dead. Gunshots to the head aren't fatal 100% of the time though so in some worlds, you are alive with a bullet in your head. All in all, do not recommend. 
Your concsiousness and the concsiousness of your counterparts are different things. If, in the quantum gun experiment, the bullet hits your head then you are dead, your consciousness wiped out. But in another universe there is a version of "you" still alive. From his perspective his concsiousness is still in good shape. Quantum immortality does not mean that "you" are immortal, but , more or less, the "product line" of "you".  Also i would guess this thought experiment is only working for potential universes from the exact moment of the experiment. In older versions of potential universes the difference between your concsiousness and the conscsiousness of your version could be to big to assume it would be "you" who survived.  Its like the question of this ship dismantled piece by piece. When would it stop to be "the ship" and not a different one. Lets say in one universe "you" would not come to the point doing the experiment at all. Could we still assume that "he" is "you"?     
There's a subreddit dedicated to replicating the quantum gun experiment but skipping the shooting yourself part to better their own lives, the name of the sub escapes me at the moment. Basically, according to them, you repeat some exercises until you wake up in a different reality. 
I could be wrong, but I think - very basically - it's saying:  Because at the quantum level things can be in multiple states at once, then all these infinite versions of yourself are actually the same thing in different states. You are all of your versions at once, it's just that we can only experience one at a time.   That's how it seems to me, but as I said, I could be completely wrong. 
If you do enough ketamine you eventually experience something along these lines...feeling like you've died and switched to an alternate universe upon sobering up. I experienced my reality change from 3 dimensional, to 2d, to 1d, then as what I can only describe as being a "particle" before blinking out of existence. When I woke up certain things had changed. A relationship and a few known values at work were completely different with no explanation.  Purely personal perspective. 
What if you create a scenario in which there is on escape for any of your quantum selves?  There wouldn't be a way for your consciousness to "jump ship" to a reality in which you were still alive.    Also, eventually all copies will die.  Why is your consciousness leaping to the longest of the lines?    Even more important, you're consciousness could only diverge around this point of split.  I can't leap to a timeline where the decision of my self was made when I was ten, because that timeline diverged in the past and has now diverged wildly from my current timeline.   
Chemist here. You are correct. Nothing to do with consciousness. Observation = measurement. I can give a much more detailed explanation if you'd like. 
Movie script idea:  Guy grows up a seemingly lucky life. Goes to school, learns about this idea of quantum immortality and decides to test it. He lives through the 10 gun shot test thus winning the Nobel prize and goes on from there with ever more bizarre life threatening stunts only to live each and every time by some random occurrence. Each day the odds get more and more bizarre as he finally awakes on day 230 of year 20,234 only to be snuffed out chocking on his breakfast pastry because somebody forgot he was allergic to almonds. Theory disproved.   Cut to show alternative endings to some of the various lives that were cut short due to the stupidity of thinking you can live forever.  
This is interesting. I thought that einselection assumes that wavefunction collapse happens since the particles are in superposition before decoherence time and in a certain state after, or did I misunderstand it? 
Any model that would contain infinite universes would contain a universe where no one has died as well as all possible permutations of dead and alive. The only way it wouldnt is if some law of nature were to make it impossible for immortality to exist 
You've completely misunderstood MWI. You should read the wikipedia page on decoherence, there's no reference to consciousness at all. 
It doesn't matter, as you and your counterpart are exactly the same person up until that point. The universe splits AT the point you die, so up until that exact moment you essentially have no counterpart (in this particular "universe-line/time-line"). When the universe splits, THEN one of you dies and the other lives. But as you were exactly the same person in terms of memory and thoughts etc up to this point, and as you cannot be "aware" of the universe in which you die *following* death, as far as you're concerned you're always the one who survived.  
Yes. Which is true unless you don't consider your consciousness being the same consciousness as 1 second ago.  
The universe sure mustve been glad when the first conscious human emerged and instantly (thank nonlocality!) transformed the entire universe from a giant clusterfuck of superposition into a neat set of galaxies behaving mostly according to classical mechanics. 
Yes, I would say we have. You could also apply it to our existence on Earth. It's just the right distance from the sun, life was able to evolve/be seeded/whatever, and we haven't been gamma-ray-bursted. By mass alone, odds indicate we should be a big cloud of Hydrogen. 
I don't think it would be reasonable to assume that everything will just end. After all - the universe had to come from somewhere. Also, I wouldn't trust the predictive power of modern science on those time scales, as we still don't quite have nailed down what things like dark matter and energy are. Looking at dark energy specifically, it only came into play (overtaking gravity) in the last few billion years. Who knows what other factors may emerge? 
What we measure is how the particle affects other particles, which affect other particles until it reaches our eyes/ears/etc. The numbers (0, 1, -1) are chosen arbitrarily (or out of mathematical convenience, if you prefer). I'm not sure if that's what you're asking. 
The difference is that I'm privileged to my own consciousness while my assistant isn't. I wouldn't call that paradoxical but it is surely not a practical experiment... 
this is how science is done tho, both copenhagen and mw are likely to be complete bull but just accepting that you can never know means you can never make discoveries.  for example cosmic inflation and dark energy are both ad hoc bandaids to make general relativity fit the observations. doesnt' matter, science demands an explanation as those can be debated and we can advance 
It's not nearly as simple as that though, and while the Copenhagen doesn't necessarily say anything about consciousness, it certainly leaves the notion of observation much vaguer than you make it seem.  You mentioned that observation is just interaction, but most interactions don't cause quantum states to collapse.  For example, putting two qubits through a CNOT gate will certainly cause each qubit to interact with the other, but that doesn't cause either to collapse; the two states merely become entangled.  It seems only certain kinds of interactions cause quantum states to collapse -- generally ones that would involve the state becoming entangled with a macroscopic system.  The Copenhagen interpretation calls these sort of interactions measurements, but there is definitely a gap to be filled in explaining why a photon hitting a piece of film is a measurement, while a qubit entangling with its neighbor isn't. 
What's also to note is that this doesn't mean the fact that a measurement by bouncing a particle off another object ends up affecting its position/momentum. This does happen but has nothing to do with the observation in the copenhagen interpretation, or yet another phenomenon, quantum uncertainty, with which it is even more often confused. All three concepts are fundamentally unrelated. 
How is this verified experimentally? If shooting a particle at another particle to make a measurement causes a wave function to collapse, how has this been verified without someone actually looking at the result of that interaction?  
How could that possibly be backed up? Have you ever been able to observe something without being aware of it? It is an assumption to talk about anything outside of awareness, because you have never experienced it. Am I right?    I'm just wondering WHY we assume what happens outside of awareness when we could never actually experience anything outside of it. 
With my limited intellect, I would like to add something. The fact that a particle interacts with another and something or nothing happens are all events which needs to be observed to reliably say that the nature wavefunction has changed. What I want to say is that observation and interaction both are interdependent when it comes to changing the nature of wavefunction. That maybe the reason why in case of unconscious interaction (interaction without obesrvation or interaction with inanimate objects) the wavefunction of particles doesn't collapse. 
I have to disagree with the idea that consciousness isn't required for "observation" as defined by this theory. If the wavefunction collapses upon observation, and observation occurs whenever particles are "interacting" with something, be it a force or other particles, then it can be argued these said particles/electrons are always interacting in means that are measurable, and therefore observable. In this case the wavefunction would cease to exist all together.   I believe that you need a consciousness to observe these interactions for the copenhagen theory to hold any water.  
Just like a left turn maneuver doesn't exist in nature, consciousness doesn't exist in nature, it's a behaviour, both of the brain chemistry/physics that make it be able to be exhibited, and sociological behaviour, people with such behaving brains think about thinking and are conscious, as opposed to animals or at least lower animals. It doesn't exist in nature as some "thing" that can interact with other "things". 
How would complications be accounted for?  Like you said if you pull the trigger, the universe splits into two, one where you survive, one where you die.  Would there ever be multiple splits, maybe thousands or billions to account for every possibility?    Like, life and death, those are two scenarios.  What about if pull the trigger, but maybe you go into a coma.  That's now 3 scenarios.  Maybe in one you pull the trigger but the gun jams, that's 4.  In another you pull the trigger and the bullet fires but doesn't kill you, you survive, that's 5, and so on and so forth.  Would that sort of thing ever happen? 
The universe doesn't revolve around you. If the universe splits at all, it should split at the smallest denominator of time, every time, or else according to a specific, physical trigger. You're pulling the trigger of a gun cannot possibly be that trigger, unless you're living in a universe where the rules of physics are 100% focused on you. 
The universe splits into two? What? What indication, proof, hint or reason to even think that that happens? The universe isn't something that splits or does anything. And just because you imagine something happening, doesn't mean that it's possible. Would you really seriously say that the moment you pull the trigger a universe is created where you turn into a duck that speaks human language and shoots lasers from it's eyes and can create universes? I mean in one universe this happens, and in the other it doesn't, so it has to be true, right? 
I'm pretty confused on how this works but from what I'm getting from this, if there is me right now experiencing my own conscious and then me in another dimension whose consciousness I'm not experiencing and I get shot in my dimension and die but my other me in the other dimension does not, then my consciousness ends and my other me is not affected whatsoever? 
So when I'm born are new universes created based on my "product line"? What if I never came to existence? Why does that mean I would exist in other universes? What even starts it at all? 
So basically your consciousnesses are all connected but you only see through one? If someone could elaborate on this I'd be interested to know how correct (if at all) this is. 
I read "Ketamine: Dreams and Reality" by Karl Jansen two years ago and it really explored the various uses of K and how it affects the mind and body. It was a fascinating read and very entertaining if that's something you're into- your comment reminded me of it. 
Consciousness never leaps. You have missed the essence of the theory. In fact, according to many world's your consciousness simultaneously exists in an essentially infinite number of realities. 
But why did I survive? Why is it impossible for me to have gone to the universe where I die? This whole idea just seems to me to necessitate immortality - if it's true, then it would be impossible for me to ever die, because there will always be some universe where I did not die at that exact moment, and I am forced down that path instead. At the "fork", is my consciousness split into two? Or is it simply guaranteed to follow the surviving one? I could accept the first one, but the second is completely bewildering to me. 
The vast majority of macroscopic events would happen the same way if the universe was 100% deterministic using classical mechanics. Only some (a very small percentage) of macro events are influenced in any significant way by quantum fluctuations 
You're assuming a normal distribution of universes (in the sense of a "normal number"). It's entirely possible for there to be an infinite number of universes, all of which you get hit by a bus and die. 
Frankly I find it absurd to call any of this "Physics". It is quite clearly not scientific, as it is simply being made up with no evidence to support the claims made other than "you cannot disprove this, nor will you ever be able to". Granted, that is an attitude that has some merit in science, but not enough merit to call it science on its own.  The "Quantum Suicide Experiment", and the idea that at every possible divergence a new universe is created, is purely philosophical. Merely framing it with the ideas of quantum physics does not change that. Besides, I could equally say that the two split-universes you speak of already both exist before the divergence - who is to say that two truly identical universes cannot coexist? Not me, and I should imagine not you either. Yet this theory also has no supporting evidence, and no reason to believe it is true other than that it cannot be disproven (and, very few things indeed can be comprehensively disproven). 
But like "1s-ago-me" resides in the same universe as "now-me." Wouldn't those alternate "you"s be inaccessible to my consciousness? So if I died, they would live, but my consciousness would be destroyed? 
While that may be so, at this exact moment in time my chance of being in any one universe is equal to my chance of being in any of the other. So why do I happen to be in a universe where the normal curve exists and coin flips follow the expected pattern?  
If you erase the observation after the observation does it still act like you did do the observation?  
Double slit experiment. If you don't put a measuring device in front of the double slits (detecting which slit the particle went through), it acts as a wave function. If you do, they behave like classical particles and produce no interference pattern. Noone actually even watches the said measuring device. 
YOU are just getting some information about the interaction via some other means anyways.  The "observation" or "interaction" happens with or without a person there to see it. If a wavelength collapses in the forest and noone is there to consciously observe it, it will still have discrete values. Correct me if I missed anything, but "learning" about it isn't the "observation". 
I *could* argue that nothing outside of my consciousness exists.  I could do that but I'd be wasting my time even if I was right.  If we're going to take science and experiment seriously, you have to start from the position that the external world is real and exists in a way in which you can interact with it in a consistent fashion.  If we're starting from that position, the external world is real and functions as it appears before you become aware of it.  If you don't accept that then you might as well throw out all science.  Maybe everything you're not looking at is actually a gremlin and just changes back when you look at it. 
Do you realize that Schrodinger's cat is scientific satire written to show that you can't apply particle and sub-particle behavior to the macro world? The universe isn't something that collapses, and neither do cats. 
That is called solipsism. That would not affect any quantum effects in any way if it were true.  
The whole point of it is that its not JUST this one event, the pulling of the trigger, but EVERY even on an atomic scale, trillions of trillions of interactions and events simultaneously, always, constantly creating a infinite churning mass of "new" universes at each and every point in "space" 
The idea is that the universe sits every time there is a possibility of two or more things happening at a quantum level. It has nothing to do with it revolving around you. The universe(s) where you survive are just some of billions and billions created in the last nanosecond. You only experience the ones where you are not dead so as far as you are concerned the others can be ignored.  
but at the same time, is there is no way to prove that any other consciousness is even real but your own? 
I think it's easier to think of it as your consciousness continuing into only the universe where you survive instead of into two separate universes if for example the gun was supposed to go off, but had a bad bullet and didn't. You can't experience not being conscious because not being conscious is the absence of experience, so it would just feel like the gun never goes off. In reality you probably don't always die instantly, so one of you would actually experience getting shot.  
Someone please correct me if I'm wrong. But what I took away from the article is that essentially every choice, action, and reaction would have multiple universes extending out from it. In one of them you were born and immediately after that there are nearly an infinite amount of you from all the universes being created based on choices from the one you were born in. (also there would be many universes in which your mother aborted you, or you were still born.) 
There could definitely be universes in which you do exist those which you do not exist. Just as the multiverse can host a reality almost exactly mirroring our own, it can host some where the Milky Way doesn't even exist.  As another point of interest, could there be one where the universe never came into being? Does every instance of the multiverse have a basic fundamental beginning? 
The sub is a load of bollocks. The first method is to sit in front of a mirror at night. "Everyone knows that mirrors reflect light. But are they also portals to other dimensions?" Answer: no. 
It comes down to how you define yourself.  If you define yourself as your the consciousness that is reading these words right now, your current quantum "state",  the "I think, therefor I am" being that you are, a continued stream of perception and thought, then the doppleganger's are not you.   but if you consider "you" to be how you are defined from an outside perspective, all of the qualities that make you who you are to the rest of the world, all the things that you could be in alternate universes, then those dopplegangers are "you".  Personally, I think those dopplegangers are not "you" because that quantum decision differentiates you in some way, no matter how miniscule it might be.  
I'm no philosopher so I'd love to hear your side of it. From a scientific perspective (my perspective) I don't see  how this is the case. A system state collapses from a superposition into an exact state which has direct relation to what you're measuring.   This is not something that has to do with consciousness, only mathematics and experimental observation. How does consciousness come into the picture?   I'm not trying to be inflammatory I'm genuinely curious. 
As far as science is concerned, consciousness is just your brain's activity.  When the universe splits, both brains are exactly identical.  The "you" in the survivor's universe would be indistinguishable from the "you" right now and would fully believe that it is the "true you" just as you do now.  Your consciousness is neither split nor moved; It is duplicated.  Each version of you is exactly as real with exactly the same history as the other.  "You" will survive because there are now two of you and one is a survivor. 
What evidence do you have that this theory is "obviously false"? Is your only argument against it that it "sounds absurd"? 
It's also bogus because nobody who actually knows QM actually thinks it's consciousness that's causing the collapse. 
What progress? I think QM has many philosophical questions that experiments can't answer.  
Not quite. To measure the which slit it goes through requires a detector at the slits. This detector is its own system with a wavefunction. By exposing the particle to it it is "bathed in its heat" forcing it into an eigenstate which is a position at one of the two slits, losing its wavelike characteristics at that point.  So the experiment is changed by an irreversible thermodynamic interaction, not by a change of impulse due to the specific detection mechanism used. 
Someone eventually still has to look at the results of the experiment to know whether or not it has collapsed. If you run the experiment in a black box and then ignore/destroy the entire thing including the results, that's the only scenario in which it never interacts with consciousness, but then we never know if it collapsed or not.  You seem to be saying that if a person isn't there to immediately see it happening, then that's not conscious observation. I think others are saying that perhaps the later perusal of any data related to the experiment (including whether or not it acted like a wave) *is* conscious observation and thus may have some effect on the outcome.  There's of course no possible way for any conscious being to know the answer to this, so it's a bit of a useless discussion. 
Science is a way of explaining objective reality. It doesn't negate hard truth. There's a good chance objective reality IS fake, but that doesn't mean science isn't fruitful within this particular 'fake' reality, or that it can't help us continue expanding our knowledge.  You don't have to accept the physical as real in order to utilize science. It's called skepticism, and it's arguably one of the best mindsets a scientist can have. Pragmatism is fine and all, but it's not an excuse to ignore the fact that we can't prove the realness of anything beyond our self-awareness. We just don't know. This might be a simulation. If science is the search for answers, you need to be keenly aware of your limitations (and their implications) when using it. 
I am aware it is solipsism - I was just making the argument that, assuming solipsism is correct, then indeed the "observation" by consciousness (only yours) would collapse the function. This doesn't mean I support the idea.  The argument is still valid based on the premises of the assumptions made! 
The moving metaphor doesn't work because "having to move" implies that the observer knows that they are likely to move.  But you can't know if the things moved until you looked, but you could be 99% confident.  I don't see how this doesn't break down into probabilities (albeit pretty close to 1) just like quantum physics.  However, I do understand that we can have a pretty good guess that quantas manifest when we aren't aware of them.  The trouble is making a jump and saying that that is more logically justified than saying only conscious observation causes waveform collapse, because that is by definition not supportable with data. (almost said provable :P) 
LOL my bad man, wasn't trying to be a smartass or anything, I've just always heard it explained as either outcome A or B but never anything about whether possibilities for C, D, E, F, G, etc. would also exist 
You dying isn't a quantum event, though. That's my point. Quantum events have nothing to do with humans. If the universe were to split in such a way as to create two different outcomes of the same event, it's *very* likely that the scale of the event would be so small that there's no hope of ever creating two outcomes of an event involving a complex system, such as a human body.  Schroedinger's Cat is just an analogy. The quantum universe working in a way that can keep the cat both alive and dead at the same time is not at all consistent with our observations of quantum events. 
Oooooh I see now so if there was me experiencing my universe and there was a gun, then there are many universes where all the possibilities can happen where I die or don't die and all the variations stemming from those except my consciousness continues into the universe where I don't die?  What would happen if I did get shot and die though? Would my consciousness just shift to another me in a different universe, or is it like where my consciousness is kind of like this common thing between me and all my other mes where my consciousness will only exist if I don't get shot and die? Would my consciousness never die then if that were the case? 
How would this coincide with material determinism? Or could it? Would all things be determined at random based on the resulting position of particles, still leading to many universes but not allowing room for free will? What sparked the question is the thought of a baby making choices. I don't know much about the thought capacity of a baby but my guess is they are exhibiting basic responses to stimuli more than choosing between options - but then again that's basically the determinist argument for anyone, just more advanced responses and stimuli. 
It makes me wonder if dreams are us living through other subconscious "me" living and experiencing bits and pieces of their lives. Which is why things are eerily the same, but different and time skipped in dreams.  Those last questions of yours got me fucked up though...I can't even comprehend it 
Is the idea of all consciousnesses being connected (but not necessarily shared) a legitimate possibility? Because if so, that is pretty goddamn fascinating. 
The philosophical question is: what is the difference between a measurement and a quantum operation that preserves superpositions?  Why does the measurement device show a single outcome and is not itself in a superposition of all possible outcomes? 
Great, so some observer can say that a being recognisable as myself has survived, and that they cannot be said to be any different to how I was before, because I was duplicated - but if my consciousness was duplicated, then one of them died, and that one that died could be my consciousness, as opposed to the surviving one. Sure, something that looks and thinks exactly like me has survived, but that makes little difference to the me who actually dies - which might be the path that I, the one who must undergo these experiences, travel down. The survivor would believe themselves to be truly me, but so would the me who dies - and they are no less real. So I can die in this experiment, and the duplicate of me can live on. 
I've never met or heard of an immortal human. Are you telling me that every human eventually finds themselves in a reality where everyone else is dead? If I live to be 120 years old I will be guaranteed to survive an apocalypse that kills everyone but me? 
I'm more interested in he source of your knowledge. Where did you learn about quantum mechanics? I'm studying to be a mechanical engineer so please don't spare the math.  
You can observe data without watching the measuring device. If we go to the extremes, if you believe the human eye has magic superpowers that affect particles, you could put an arduino to register the results and speak to humans with a voice synthesizer so they don't have to look at it. Although basically this already happens, the whole double slit expirement is done by a device that spits some numbers onto a computer screen. 
Alright, think of it this way.  First, you perform both experiments, once with observers, once without. We don't look at any data for the moment.  Then, we look at the detection screens. On the one with observers, there is no interference pattern. On the one without, there is an interference pattern. If we proceed to destroy the observers without looking at the data they made, it doesn't change anything compared to if we looked at it. 
Possibilities a,b,c,d,e,f,g....on to infinity basically, would exist, but from the perspective of *probability* version A (dead) and B (alive) would be the most likely. However, like you figured, anything is possible, a meteor could come crashing through the roof and strike the bullet in mid air, but probabilistically that option would make up a very small portion of the "infinite" possibilities.  
No me dying is a result of many quantum events, in another universe there was a set of many quantum events that did not result in my dying, those are the ones I experience.  
Kant puts it best when he poses the question: "does God like an action because it's pious? Or is an action pious because God likes it?" 
When a measurement is made on a quantum state, it is forced to collapse from a wave function of probability to a discrete reality. The act of measuring a quantum state is an interaction with it, which forces it to return a value. For example, if I fire a particle at a screen, that particle must exhibit a position on that screen. The Copenhagen interpretation would have us believe that the particle exhibits multiple positions until it is forced to collapse to one in response to measurement. The fact that there's a conscious observer has nothing to do with this interaction. 
"Possibilities a,b,c,d,e,f,g....on to infinity basically, would exist, but from the perspective of probability version A (dead) and B (alive) would be the most likely"  Okay, so if I'm getting this (which I might not be), possibilities ARE infinite, but would technically exist as sort of branches from version A and version B?    
That doesn't make any sense. For every universe in which you die as the result of a gunshot wound to the head, there would be a near-infinite number of universes in which you don't die from that same gunshot wound. By your thinking, which one of those universes do you experience? 
Conversely, though, activities of conscious observation likely must necessarily always fall into the set of activities which are interactions. So it's not merely conscious observation that collapses it, but conscious observation always will, and we can't observe it not doing so. 
Why does firing in a particle on a screen count as a measurement, when the particle being in transit doesn't?  It seems to me like mere existence is a measurement, but apparently its not? 
Thank you for this. Does this mean that we can't "decide" wether we want to measure position or momentum of a particle, forcing the other to be uncertain, but rather that one is uncertain inherently as a result of what the particle is? 
Yes that's it exactly. Although limitations of how we measure things do come into account, the uncertainty is "baked" into quantum particles. It is a feature that results from their probabilistic nature. 
Reddit isn't interested in logical fallacies. They just want to screech AD HOMINEM and WHATABOUTISM to make themselves feel better.  
Question - In conversation, I would call the informal fallacy wrong because the axiom is wrong or I guess it's axiomatically incorrect - is that me using the wrong term, confusing terms or is that an acceptable alternative way to name this?  For example,  P1: All poor people are a drain on healthcare  P2: All immigrants are poor  Conclusion: All immigrants are a drain on healthcare   The form of the argument is correct but the underlying axiom it's based on are not. Is this an informal fallacy or is that only the right term when the confusion arrises from insufficiently precise terms being used for equivocation?    
Fair question. Is it ethical to believe in logic?   Leap of Faith? Critique of Instrumental Reason? etc.  
How is it smug? I know it is misused, but I don't think that can be helped. I know the creator and will happily pass on any useful feedback as to how it can be improved. The world needs this stuff, we're open to suggestions.  
I asked a professor of logic this once and all she said was "because it seems right." 
I suppose its usage is usually too smug, not that the site is smug per se.  The format makes it very easy to be used as such. 
Someone linking someone directly to a picture of a fallacy with nothing else is not really seriously discussing for the most part. 
You could always reply with the same fallacy reversed. ex. Hitler also drove a car, I guess you're biking from now on, wouldn't wanna be a car driving nazi.  
It insists upon itself, it's self consistent, and it seems to give good results.  
"There are those who would say;" "Others would argue;" "I'm not taking a position here..."  No, I'm not claiming what you say.  
You sound like a sophist because you're mostly talking about how to convince people that you're right and that you 'won' an argument, without regard to what the truth of the matter is. You're probably not using phrases like 'good argument' to mean the same thing that others are, because in philosophy good arguments are generally considered to be those that are more likely to be true and to lead to the discovery of truth, not those that are more likely to convince people that they're true.  
Depends on the situation really. Truth don't matter in most cases where you have an audience. 
Guh. As if there isn't enough media to consume, you just got me to subscribe to a podcast with 160 episodes at two hours apiece. I don't even want to know how many commutes that is going to be. Both dreading and looking forward to it.  
I also want to suggest Philosophize This. It's another fantastic entry level philosophy podcast.  
Been a listener of this for a long time. The discussions are interesting, each hosts personality comes through, and the pre-cog episodes are good condensed versions of a text you might be interested in. 
I checked the website and it seems interesting but for a light show a podcast of 2 hours on Wittgenstein is hard to follow. Also, the audio was not clear enough and the dudes were laughing about some inside joke i guess in the first minutes 
I tried accessing this through my podcast player and it shows just a single holiday episode from I've year ago. My player is Player FM. 
I really dislike the name. It's a cop out for easy branding. 
I run a half marathon nearly every weekend. Now I have something to listen to when I don't feel like Dan Carlins hardcore history! 
The episodes are pretty self-contained, usually focusing on a single set of readings, it is a bit of a struggle to follow the terminology though, although that may just be me not paying enough attention. 
PEL, VBW, Philosophize This, and HoP are all good. The first two are conversational, the second two are scripted. Different animals.  "In Our Time," "Philosophy Bites," "Philosopher's Zone," and "Elucidations" are also good, but they're mostly scholars talking about their own work or weighing in as experts. That's great, but there's also value in vicariously participating in a conversation among fellow learners, which is really a novel way of learning that podcasting has opened up to us. 
Absolutely, anyone looking to get their feet wet in Philosophy would do well to start with Philosophize This!  It is more accessible, IMHO, for the uninitiated. 
You have any recommendations on an entry episode to get me interested? 
My hats off to you. Anything more challenging than a phish concert when I run just tires me out.  
Just found Hardcore history any series you recommend I start with? 
That's the problem of a philosophy podcast against most other stuff. Even the light stuff requires putting a lot of attention we internet addict millennials aren't ready to  
History of Philosophy Without Any Gaps can be pretty dry at times but is really good if you want a chronological look at philosophy and the evolution of thought. 
Agreed. Some of the PEL is pretty advanced and hard to grasp. If you are starting out in philosophy, it can be difficult  
*sigh* remove the "/s" and toss in Kierkegaard and Sartre... God when did I become such a stereotype? 
I don't know how people concentrate on in-depth discussions whilst also doing some other strenuous thing. I'm so easily distracted that I drift in and out even when I'm doing nothing else.  
Shit, I would think a phish concert would be the most challenging way to run. I remember I tried to run to rusted root once in high school. That was like 20 years ago. I still remember it for how much that music did not go with running.   This podcast though, I've tried it. It might be tougher than both.  
Just say music. Nobody cares that you like Phish, guh.  
"Wrath of the Khans" is insanely good I think it's three episodes  
Where applicable, I use HoP as reference material in prepping for PEL episodes. Definitely good stuff. 
I think it's actually easier when you're doing a strenuous activity since it acts as something to keep your mind focused on instead of the pain/monotony of the activity.  
Running a half marathon not at race pace isn't really strenuous it's more just endurance at that point 
Really?  One of their 30 minute jams that just kind of meanders around?  I love it. Great to turn off your brain, but still keep it just engaged enough to pay attention to a run. As long as you know the course. I wouldn't do it in a new environment.  
Just a little self-deprecating humor. Please don't hate me.  
When I'm doing strenuous cardio particularly, just feeling completely wiped physically and mentally by the end of both an episode and my session is a nice humble reset button for me before I crash out for the night. 
For me just concentrating on my surroundings and avoiding obstacles or passers-by would bring me completely out of focus.  
I guess it depends on your pacing/running habits. It makes me want to lollygag. I'm the type of runner who hates jogging. I either want to be clocking in the 6-8 min mile range or I'd rather just walk. I love me some formless tunes sometimes, but not for running.  
Honestly its probably most effected by which modality you use as "cardio" like cycling 50miles or running 8 miles, its easier to get into a podcast and world of ideas because you'll enter a flow state after awhile.  Something like doing sprints or sled drags, you'll be exerting too much energy and won't enter a flow state during (you may afterwards though). 
"Science tells us that there is no immaterial soul."  Isn't an immaterial soul by definition beyond the scope of natural science?  I can think of no mechanism whereby science could answer this *metaphysical* question. 
TIL : my chronic terrible pain is nothing to worry about, just kill myself and it cant hurt me any more.  Thanks Epicurus! 
I wonder what Reddit will seem to be interested in next? 
Does this philosophy make one very passive and easily manipulated?   I'd be curious to see philosophies on whether pursuing personal happiness is actually a noble cause or is very selfish as it avoids the societal conflicts that are necessary to improve life for future generations. 
Took a course last semester on the Philosophy of Happiness. It was probably one of the best courses I've ever taken. I'm a Philosophy Major so if anyone has any questions feel free to ask.  Cheers! 
Classicist here.  When Epicureanism was imported to Rome, Lucretius adapted it in some... interesting ways.  Sex was considered a necessity, but true passion can only lead to disappointment.  Obsession brings heartbreak.  If one couldn't find a stable relationship, then a perfectly acceptable option is to "relieve" oneself with a prostitute (see DRN 4.1070f).  Or, of course, just devote your mind to philosophy instead!  Interesting how ethics change. 
Eurgh. And why is happiness supposed to be the final target again? When I think about inspirational people, I hardly picture them sitting around with a detached smile on their face. 
I think the explanations for the tenets are just too vague. The needs of a human explained here are not comprehensive, yet the conclusion is drawn, 'if you recognize your needs are easily fulfilled you will be more at peace'. Thing is, many needs are not easily fulfilled, especially for the largely emasculated western male population.  
I have always liked Epicurus' cures for unhappiness but the idea that my desires should be abandoned in order to enjoy "the simple things" seems lacking ambition. Am I missing the point?  
Seems arbitrary to dismiss God. Did he have an actual argument for that or is that just his presupposition? 
Science cannot tell us that an immaterial soul does not exist. It cannot answer such a metaphysical question.  
Science tells us stuff such as last thursdayism shouldn't be true because it makes less sense than our current understanding of the universe. I think that's what he's saying here is that since it makes more sense for us to not have an otherworldly soul of some sorts it is more efficient and will make us happier to assume it does not exist and operate under the assumption we do not have/need it.  
Neuroscience suggests that consciousness is a product of our physical brains, which suggests that consciousness is destroyed when the brain is destroyed 
It seems to me that Epicureanism has the opposite problem of Stoicism. Epicureanism is basically about how to maximize happiness when happiness is easy to achieve but it doesn't really prepare you for when things turn to shit. Stoicism does a good job of helping you get through shitty times but doesn't really have a lot of advice about how deal with the times when life isn't kicking you in the teeth. 
Agreed. I was a bit lost at the defense of "the hard parts of life are easy to endure" point.  
Mr. President, I'm not sure if anyone's told you over the past 53 odd years... 
When I was taught Epicurus' philosophy it was presented as: Chronic pain tends to be less severe, and severe pain tends to be short-lived. It isn't saying all pain in every scenario can be easily endured, and I'm very sorry yours doesn't fall into either category :/. 
I'm interested in this perspective and philosophy. What do you mean "seem"? What would be a legit way to be interested to you? 
Philosophize This! is a podcast available on Spotify, and his episode on Epicurus, episode 11, delves a little bit into the differences between this philosophy and some of the other stoic philosophies if you want to hear a bit of compare and contrast. 
Manipulation usually comes through either the promise of gain or the treat of pain. If you are unconcerned with the pursuit of luxury and are also able to manage pain without much consternation, you would be hard to manipulate.   Your second question is interesting. I could imagine that establishing and exemplifying a model for the pursuit of happiness does do good for future generations. After all, what is the reason for improving life for future generations if not --- fundamentally --- to help them be happier?  
I always have lots of questions. Thanks for asking. Can this philosophy be summed up by saying: "Dont worry about what is out of your control and inevitable (fate). Be satisfied. Since you are currently in a living state you have much to be thankful for, the rest is just self induced misery." Therefore, satisfied gratefulness, is the only mindstate conducive to true happiness and fulfillment? 
Can you please share some aha moments or highlights from the course? 
How far into your major are you and what is opinion so far? Ive taken a few intro courses in Logic/Phil. of Religion/Phil 101, and am highly considering taking it up as my major. What school if you dont mind me asking? 
Why does one have to be inspirational, why should that be the goal? Why is simple personal happiness a bad final target? 
Yes, because Epicurus is saying that "ambition" in your context is an unnecessary and unobtainable goal that will never bring you happiness. The things most people associate with ambition (money, prestige, etc.) ultimately don't lead to happiness because there is no limit to how much those things will take to satisfy a person, making it a Sisyphean task.  
It derives from his physics (material atomism). Epicurus rejected a perfectly planned world of intelligent design, ordered and directed by divine beings. He'd point to natural disasters, drought, disease etc. to justify this. How could such perfect beings as Gods preside over such an imperfect world?    He didn't necessarily reject the concept of Gods existing somewhere, just the notion of participatory Gods intervening in human affairs.  
I don't think one can empirically test last thursdayism, though.  I think you're using abductive reasoning here - which is a method, but I don't think it's the scientific method. 
I think even the ancients knew that there was a physical component to consciousness - I can't imagine how one would prove that it's solely physical though.  I mean, if there is a metaphysical component by definition physical tests would not be able to interact with that. 
But it cannot be proven or disproven and is therefore beyond the possibilities of science.   Just you know, by the technical definitions.  
Well, I can see how such a simplified answer might seem offensive to someone with chronic pain.     When it got to that point of the video I kinda chuckled to myself.  I have cluster headaches.  Sometimes daily. It is very painful, but doesn't last longer than a few hours.  I have considered killing myself.  But I just remember how many headaches I've made it through.  Plus the feeling of relief once they are gone is almost unmatched by anything else I've ever felt.   Oh, and one treatment for cluster headaches. Mushrooms. Provided by nature.  So I kinda dig his philosophy even though it isn't for everyone.      It's kinda hard to just pick one philosophy and stick with it.   Take what works for you and make your own.      I like cynicism, epicureanism, stoicism, hedonism.  They all have great qualities. But I can't just live strictly according to one.   
Jesus Christ, do you have to bring politics to every conversation? I GET IT YOU DONT LIKE DONADO TRUMP. 
I think he's trying to poke fun at all the titles that start with "Reddit seems to be interested in so and so here's a short vid on it".   
I watched most of the video. It seems preoccupied with the concept of being happy and not worrying too much about things.  What about making the world a better place? That's not normally a pleasant task... although I suppose it's not necessarily mutually exclusive to be stoic and passionate at the same time, it's just very rare. 
Are not those that accept misery the ones that have to endure it? 
I dont do anything with philosophy, but in my opinion, you are right by saying 'just be satisfied'.   In my field (product design), when trying to figure out if an idea is good I try to first find why it wouldn't be good. The lack of negatives leads to the positive sides of an idea. This might be a flawed mindset in real life though, as when questioning whether im happy, I can always find a reason why I am not. 
Dont take it up as a major.  Unless you want to work in low-mid level sales with people who didnt go to uni, of course.  
I meant that what he aims to achieve in achieving happiness lacks ambition, rather than what he recommends leaves no scope to be ambitious. What I take from Epicureanism is more how not to be actively unhappy, rather than how to be actively happy.   I always try to actually apply philosophy rather than keeping it abstract and when it applies to myself (the only human experience I have experienced) I guess I am looking for more of a kinetic state of happiness, rather than a static lack of discomfort. I dispute the idea that one can be content by achieving sustenance with occasional indulgence- there is no scope here for anything greater. Whilst Epicurus states that struggle causes suffering, I would posit that achievement in the face of difficulty gives a deep satisfaction which is impossible without something to overcome.  
That's true, especially since these premises will never reveal an actual conclusion. And you're right, it isn't the scientific method, but it does follow the path of least resistance. Is it more likely that we have a real, billion year old universe or that everything was created last Thursday? Things are _probably_ billions of years old and real. Is it more likely we are completely normal and reality grounded in all aspects except an undetectable "soul" that represents our consciousness past death, or that we simply don't have one and our consciousness ends at death? I think in these situations it is general more beneficial to assume that we don't have the soul because not only will it never be relevant to our lives until after death, it also takes time & thought away from things that are firmly grounded in reality and that we can actually interact with.  
That logic can be exhausted to anything making everything worthless to analyze. If you believe in a soul due to the inability to prove/disprove its existence you might as well believe anything you imagine.  
I just want to say that you have a really cool attitude towards the shittier things on life. I suffer from anxiety on a daily basis and I have to say that the relief felt from having an anxiety attack end is pure bliss.  A lot of the time, when we have to deal with chronic issues, we find ourselves asking why me? Because as you look around, everyone around you seems to be fine and dandy. However, the one thing I've learned is that everyone is going through something.  Be it chronic pain, anxiety, mental illness, or generally anything that takes away from overall life satisfaction.   I think happiness is taking on these problems as a part of this strange journey of life, all while savouring and latching on to those rare but blissful moments of happiness offered to us. 
Fair enough. On mobile so I just saw the video title and watched it and was genuinely interested. Now I feel like and asshole. I am also seemingly interested in the philosophy of feeling like an asshole. 
Have nothing to add at the moment (will return), but thanks for the discussion, mate! :) 
(Note: this is what I believe Epicurus would say and does not necessarily represent my own views) Trying to make the world a better place is a noble goal, but it's too large a task. It's never ending. While not as vain as pursuing wealth or fame or glory, it is equally unobtainable. Suffering is an inescapable part of life, and it's better to accept pain with the belief that one day life, and therefore suffering, will end.  
This seems to boil down to the intrinsic balance of existance. For life, matter, or emotions such as happiness to exisit in an infinite combination of possibilities so also wouldn't there be an infinite possibility of non-existance? The question isn't if the glass is half full or half empty, rather, from what perspective are you observing the glass. 
Or be a lawyer, doctor, professor, or any of the other numerous professions that people with Phil degrees end up with. 
I think there is a significant difference between last Thursday and assuming there is a soul. There is plenty of evidence to suggest that the universe is billions of years old. The only evidence to suggest there is no soul is a lack of evidence that a soul exists.   We haven't detected a soul. We haven't detected evidence that it doesn't exist either. Either way you shake it, it's a matter of faith in the unknown.    
I haven't really got to test it yet.  I've been reading about it for a while.  I have had mushrooms in the past though. But my cluster cycle is difficult to determine. I will try them again some day though.  It's Just not always easy for me to keep them around.   
I'm genuinely interested in the philosophy of  'short video'. 10 minutes is not a short video.  
 By this logic would it not make sense to infer that to make the world a better place one should seek to end suffering by ending all life? 
Thats true. I guess to try and answer your original question, we should accept that we arent and never will be ok. Be ok with not being ok. Only then are we ok 
...after doing a different, actual worthwhile degree lol. 
If there is nothing to suggest there is a soul, why would you put faith in the concept of it? At this point its pure fantasy and does not need to be disproved. 
Right, it's not verified to be false, but as far as science itself is concerned it basically is. The difference between "I don't think there are souls" and "I think there are no souls" is significant when talking about the burden of proof, but the conclusion is basically the same 
Not sure what your living situation is but they are quite easy to grow, and with minimal risk and expenditure. 
This is basically the end goal of buddhism, relieving all creatures from the endless cycle of suffering referred to as samsara. But not by killing them, which would be pointless since the 'life force/soul' would just seek out another host, but through meditation.  
Or they could purchase them and keep them in the freezer. 
I've definitely considered it.  Would really love to do this.  I think one yield would last me the whole year or maybe even two.  Especially if micro dosing works.   
 Hmm, so Buddhists are idiots. They would be better served by at minimum promoting birth control. Might be more effective than meditation. If they really had any conviction behind their belief, they should be out mass sterilizing everyone. Eastern religion is at least smart enough to recognize the problem, but still manage to be morons when it comes to enacting a solution. Especially when you stop to consider how many people live in traditionally Buddhist countries. So much for enlightenment. 
Wow that sounds really miserable. Thank you for taking the time to write all of that up. In all honesty, I would say it's the mushrooms that help more than the caffeine. However, of you aren't getting them then keep doing what you're doing! I use small doses of lsd to tame my eczema so I know there's some judgement that comes along with self medicating with the more controversial drugs. I wish you all the best, and think it's awesome in your original comment how positive you remain. 
I think he was using that example as a vehicle to support his philosophy, not to be taken as an absolute.  Not only that, he offers suicide as an option, yet did not commit suicide. This would suggest that he understands a pain can exist that surpasses his own that would drive one to commit suicide.  It's a very simple philosophy but certain aspects require a disconnect from traditional and even instinctual behavior and thought.   For example, it's easy to say, 'there's no reason to fear death' or 'suicide is always an option' but because we have biological mechanism for self-preservation, it makes this philosophy to maintain under certain circumstances. 
I think you misunderstood me, a soul can also be transferred to any other living being, tho humans are seen as a higher class consciousness wise, after that animals, after that insects. Humans have the ability to choose to step out of samsara by devouting themselves to enlightenment and reaching budhhahood, which usually takes several lifetimes. And should be kind and helpful to any lifeform. Actually their aproach to life is very similar to the philopsophy from the video in my perspective. 
Thanks! I think it's cool the folks who took the time to read it and found it interesting.    I'll definitely keep working on them.  I know lots of folks are way worse off than I am. But we all have our own understanding of what it means to suffer.     It is difficult to discuss this all with folks in real life. So that's kinda why I like reading philosophy. It's offered me different perspectives on what it means to suffer.     Also, I wasn't aware that lsd could treat excema, that's awesome! I really hope this substance is put to good use soon. I am not a hippy or drug guru, but I just think it's awesome it has so many uses in such small doses. Not just the fun trippy side of lsd. Hopefully it will be more available in the future. It's kinda crazy that it's one of the most researched drugs we have and we just don't use it.   
 It just illustrates how poorly thought out such appeals to utilitarianism is. This idea that suffering is easy to endure is only likely to be the case if your experience with suffering is very limited. And his framing of his own personal suffering reflects that which is why he gives himself the luxury of proclaiming that suffering is easy to endure.   It would have been worth testing his resolve when it was those he loved, suffering. Curious how comforting he would have found his philosophy would it have been the children of Metrodorus made to suffer with him as witness. I'm sure that would have been easy for them and him to endure after all. 
That's not saying much. So are many non-Buddhists. That does very little to free creatures from the cycle of suffering. 
 So the solution should be the eradication of life. Ideally by simply sterilizing all of the higher animals that have a greater range of experience when it comes to suffering and exterminating the remaining life that does not experience suffering as we do. Break the wheel. Then no longer will anything ever have to suffer again. 
I can see why the author won a Pulitzer. A great read, thanks for sharing. 
This reminds me of a lot of people in my life. I try to share newly discovered facts with friends and a lot of the time they just say, 'yeah, I don't know about that bro'. And I always say,'I know, thats why I'm telling you. Feel free to look it up'. I don't think they ever do. 
Personally I don't (easily) change my mind when confronted with new facts because if they contradict me they are already "suspect". Could they be a ploy by one of my enemies to make me look foolish, are they fake ? Etc. It's the price of dishonesty anywhere that facts are devalued everywhere. 
Well, duh. It's called a bias. Most humans tend to agree on an issue if it benefits them in some kind of way. 
This is probably the reason why watching news won't make you more wise or experienced 
The problem is "facts" are not universally agreed upon. 
Seriously people, we don't know how toilets work?   Valved Ballast, and siphon. This disappointed me more than any political opinion could have.  
He guys, guys, how we explain this? I know, I know, let's come up with some fictitious hunter gatherer story in which it seems advantageous! Wow, that's so smart that it must be true!  Can we please kill evolutionary psychology? It's just fiction writing with a degree. 
Here is my understanding of the article and someone please tell me if I got it right or not....  1. People will irrationally conclude they are either right or wrong based on previous knowledge. This is also hard to change.  2. This was an evolutionary trait that has survived because we derive from social animals, who want to conserve energy, and its advantageous not to re-learn the skills of others, but instead build from them.  3. People don't like admitting they are wrong, and would much rather abandon reason than face the emotional trauma of claiming ignorance. (I definitely think this one is true. Because when I first learn that my thinking is flawed, I feel like shit. I get over it though and learn from it. But I can see people trying to deny this feeling fervently).   I'm sure there's much more, but I'm just looking for a basic summary. 
I don't understand, the experiment about the simple reasoning doesn't make sense. How were they presented with the answer that were their own, yet reached a different conclusion? Wouldn't their own answer, by common sense, have reached the same conclusion as the one they were presented, if the one they were presented was their very own answer? Help pls  
in which a philosopher explains what was new in psychology, thirty or so years ago, in case you have never heard of the concept of "bias". 
Man, was really hoping that an article about the science behind people's bias was going to be unbiased in itself. Oh well I guess.  
In social psychology we always called it inoculation. Each time you are exposed to an idea, BUT it fails to change your mind, the less likely subsequent exposure to that idea will change one's mind. Basically,  you build up a resistance to an idea (which you don't agree with). If one fails to change a mind, then they make change less likely to ever occur. That's why we should avoid redirecting people's beliefs unless we're seriously willing to dive deep with and debate them. 
That's the main reason of why political debates get so heated so quickly. Regardless of which side you're on, you believe very strongly that you are correct, and that the other person is an idiot.  
I am guilty of this myself. I suppose I have too much pride to admit to myself that I'm wrong. 
That level of writing is consistent throughout the New Yorker. It's the only magazine I consistently take time to read, cover to cover, in print.  Note: not friendly to anyone further right than Barack Obama. 
Maybe your friends aren't on reddit. Otherwise, they'd say "Cite your sources, man."  
My ex was like that. Honestly my biggest peeve was how closed off she was to anything outside her puny world view. I feel sorry for her now because she has put herself on a track to live in that ignorance her whole life.  
That's how my Facebook feels right now regarding anything Trump does. Someone who is against Trump will present a reason for disapproving of him, and a trump supporter will more vigorously defend him and lash out more against dissenters. Saw the same thing too with Hilary and Bernie supporters earlier in the election, although not as angry and raging all the time as the Trump supporters on my Facebook seem to be.  
That's why you gotta make them think they came up with it, you make them discover the fact and they'll think they found it out and they'll be happy and they learned something. Take the opposite view and then argue with them and get them to google it, or you google it and find the result. End with "holy shit you're right, this study here shows blah blah blah..." And they learned something new!   Don't do this too often or you'll be considered always wrong. 
If I'm engaged in a discussion with someone passionate about something, if they cannot articulate their position in their own words and instead ask me to go read a huge book, then I cannot trust they *themselves* understand the idea they've latched onto.  
If it was as simple as that some issues would be much more clean cut.  For example, weed would be legalised as it would benefit society taking the money away from crime and taxing it/creating legitimate businesses. But there's stigma associated with it as a substance.  Or accepting that immigration (in the uk) is a net gain for the economy for example. 
A parroted talking point you commonly hear on reddit is "Watch a lot of news from different perspectives"  Which is BS.  Without proper reasoning skills, different perspectives just muddy the waters and an individual is worse off than when they started. 
Well I put my trust in the system of determining facts that has brought us technology, if not for it's understandability across largely unrelated fields or it's reproducibility at the manufacturing level, then because I have lots of fun with it. 
Some facts are not. But most are. That's the whole point of calling it a fact. Evolution, for example, is a fact. There are fossils. Yet a lot of people think its a lie. This illogical bias is the greatest problem with democracy. 
The problem is that as humans we are incapable of objectively perceiving reality. Thus, all "facts" we perceive are inherently biased and filtered.   
Aaaaand here we see the effect in question at work 
Yeah, I always find it incredibly disappointing and honestly just infuriating when I read a piece about psychology and human behaviour just for it to boil down to "hunter-gatherer instincts."  I'll admit that it sounds plausible enough, but I just don't believe in the idea that we are still defined in our modern every day lives by who our ancestors were. It's just such an anti-intellectual cop-out explanation for our behaviours.   Your "hunter-gatherer" instinct isn't what compels you to protect your girlfriend or whatever from oncoming attackers to secure your species' future. You choose to do so because you share an emotional bond with another person and nothing else, really. 
And you think we should replace evolutionary psychology with...? 
The article postulates an evolutionary mechanism for irrationality in general.  
Um, this is a "staff writer" at a magazine. Not a philosopher. Why don't you remove /r/philosophy from your defaults? 
I assume you are en expert in scientific bias. What bias did you detect? You didn't mention it or provide any evidence, which is weird, because clearly you are an expert and not just a triggered right winger.  
I read the book "You Are Not So Smart" and it was terrific. It shows that we all use self-deception when our ego is threatened.  
I swear if you watch enough animal cruelty videos and read some cool health facts, you'll go vegetarian at the least, no matter how resistant to the idea might be.  
I don't give most people even this much credit actually.  I don't think people actually rationalize what they are saying, to determine whether they truly believe they are correct or that the other person is incorrect.   I think most people choose a side based on a gut feeling, which is largely driven by biases (racism, lifestyle, family, geography, socio-economic status, etc.), and then defend those positions based on gut feeling ("this person is saying I'm stupid. I am angry."). No matter what you say, they see the act of disagreeing with them as a personal attack.  Simply put, we agree that people are very stupid. I think they are even dumber than you think.  
Politicians don't really believe what they say. They disagree because it is convenient to their end game to do so. 
As far as the people I know. No matter what a politician does. People seem to stick with them no matter what. Never wanting to admit they're wrong or their candidate was a liar or some variant.  
Seems like you'd have a bit of cultural evolution pressure working here, though. If you are a tribe member with beliefs that aren't strongly pro-survival and somebody else has better ones, what happens over time? 
I've found people that believe who think that "learning new things and always accept contradiction or new information with pleasure" are the hardest to correct when they are actually wrong...That's always their fallback bias, they'll say something along the lines of 'I'm very open to new information but THAT is just wrong'. A lot of the people who believe in homeopathy and are anti-vaccine like to think they are the only ones able to see the 'truth' because they aren't 'brainwashed'. 
It should be noted, most academics hold a conscious scepticism in their own beliefs. i.e. critical thought, which has a tendency to mess with the confirmation bias. Yet, clear bias are marked in all academic writing (the extended life time of works, e.g. bauman's) for specific points of view and methods of reasoning.   Interesting to consider, the effect goes a long way to explain the rigidity of social morality, even in the face of overwhelming evidence.    
"Slippery slope" is a fallacy because it implies that the unwanted result will occur every time, not because some slopes are indeed slippery. 
It's a good article, about people who use the fact that people are biased towards their own beliefs, to try to convince people to change their beliefs to what those people believe.  Really The Gorman's goal is laughably absurd (and basically paradoxical). The research implies everyone is biased towards their own "truth" and what you take from it is that you have to fight against the effect to convince people of your "truth"?  I actually agree with their opinions, but their principles are all off.  
I think the studies in the article demonstrate that you're like that, too. They also show that you're unlikely to admit it to yourself or others.  
Well, i'm not going to talk about myself but look at it this way: were pro civil rights advocates and Southern white racist politicians refusing school access in the 50s and 60s contestants or enemies ?   I would say enemies. They might not be allowed to just go and kill each other but they wished for it.  
I feel like the notion that we have a few core beliefs falls apart if you look into it deeply. For instance, take the inherent irrationalality that exists in a majority of human beliefs. We'll profess to be animal lovers, while scarfing down a burger. We say child labor is bad, but buy sweatshop clothes. People believe in contradicting stuff all the time, and our beliefs are always slightly evolving. 
The way these core beliefs are instantiated may take different forms for different people, even on the same issue. Many communists, for example, are anti-gun control because they believe a well armed prolerariet is beneficial. 
Individualism vs collectivism is a bit of a false dichotomy though. I mean egoist communism is a thing and is pretty internally consistent. Trying to boil everything down to "This is individualist" or "This is collectivist" looks pretty reductionist in my book, especially since the matieral pre-conditions for modern individualism is the collective developmental efforts put in by millions of humans for thousands of years. 
Yes, and those ingrained core beliefs are formed from intense life experiences and the things you're exposed to in childhood.      This is why, in my opinion, poverty breeds poverty. Violence breeds violence. The Nazis and ISIS are a thing because that generation grew up in militarist state during war and famine. Gang members are a thing because they grew up around poverty, violence, and drug trafficking. Hippies are a thing because they grew up sheltered and safe.  You can totally dismantle someone's arguments, destroy their facts, give them textbooks on your point of view. It won't change a thing, because you haven't attacked the core beliefs. You've only attacked the opinions that justify them.  People are only going to change if you give them new life experiences. Which nobody is going to do in a reddit comment or facebook post. 
What about those of us who don't think collectivism amd individualism are opposites, but mutually beneficial complementary forces? 
Most leftists are pro-gun, and I would call them strongly collectivist. 
I hate it when people use that word collectivism. In my eye, the individualist is a ideological thinker vs the realist who decides on evaluating the available information.   I hate that whoever came up with that word has corralled so many policy positions into such a venomous phrase - collectivism. What a cop out to avoid thinking about each issue individually.   What's worse is that they frame it in such a way as to identify their position ahead of time. You talk like you are in the middle of the road but every sane person is in the middle of the road. No one can be completely free.  
Rather than putting blind trust into some vague, not very rigid system, it would be better really to just get a decent grasp on basic statistics, enough to understand what constitutes good testing methodologies and what doesn't, and base your belief in any given fact on something with a real basis to be determining likelihoods. 
This is rediculous we still very much defined by our biology our brains have certain structures that behave certain ways. Why would you share an emotional bond? Wouldn't being able to form emotional bonds with people help survive now and millions of years ago? I think it's hubris to assume that human behavior can be explained without referring to why we evolved certain brain structures to do certain things that inevitably effect human perspective. 
You're making a common mistake here in confusing the "objectives" (scare quotes because evolution is a process rather than a mind and so has no genuine intentions) of evolution with the objectives of evolved minds. For example reproduction is an evolutionary goal, but that does not mean that every creature that has sex does so with the goal of having a child in mind. I assume that most of the time they just want to have sex.  To apply this to your example; your own motivation for protecting your girlfriend is your emotional bond with her, not a desire to increase your chances of propogating your genes, but you are inclined to form bonds with members of the opposite sex precisely because that increases your chances of propogating your genes. 
Replace? What functionality do we miss when it is gone? Zero. Nothing. It doesn't need to be replaced. It is completely fictitious. Not a little, but everything about it.   All it is is filling in the gaps of our understanding (of continuation of behavior over generations), with fictitious thought experiments presented as facts. It's borrowing the credibility of 'evolution theory' in order to stay out of critique's way. Since when does 'that sounds plausible' became enough to be considered factual, since never.    
... AND engages in wild speculation on what experiments the scientists will do next!  If was printed even once that is a waste of ink. 
They used right wing ideas every time when describing some thought that needed to be changed. I'm not going to remember them all, but,"if we all now dismiss as unconvincing any information that contradicts our opinion, you get, well, the trump administration", "these days it can feel as if the entire country has been given over to a vast psychological experiment being run ether by no one or Steve bannon", and they use the following phrase (supposedly to describe error on both sides but actually showing their bias) "it feels good to stick to our guns even if we are wrong" 
We use self-deception to some degree all the time.  
I guess by facing it with courage... I recently read a really disturbing piece of reseach bout the treatment of women in my country and as much as I hate to admit it, the researcher has a point...  It's very hard to face things with an open mind and have courage to admit that you are not correct. I still am swallowing that pill today about that disturbing research 
If anything watching animal cruelty videos have made me tolerant. Before, you show me a bunny getting spanked and I'd get upset. Now, I can literally watch animals get skinned alive and eat a pie while I watch. I don't enjoy those videos,  but they don't bother me anymore. 
Because "their guy: gets them "their money".who cares what he says or believes so long as he is sending some of the prok back home from washington 
"The whole problem with the world is that fools and fanatics are always so certain of themselves, and wiser people so full of doubts."  \- Bertrand Russell  
exactly this  society has a certain rate of change. those who want to slow things down, or even reverse to a mythological past, are conservatives. those who want to speed things up, perhaps in bad untested directions, are liberals  all the while, the cemetaries slowly fill, and the real pace of change is what it is, inevitable and inexorable   "society improves one funeral at a time" or however that quote goes 
There is a big difference between accepting any information you see on the internet as true and trying to seek multiple credible sources and opinions to form his own opinion, you are mixing up both 
Can you give an example of rigid morality in the face of overwhelming evidence? I'm trying to think of which moral claims are based on empirical claims and would therefore even be subject to any change based on "evidence". 
The slopes usually are slippery. It's used to discredit arguments far too often.  
I realized this is posted in /r/Philosophy, so I can get more technical.   What The Gorman's are doing from the perspective of the existentialist philosopher is trying to force people into a situation of Bad Faith towards science.   That is rather than making decisions for themselves based off their own values (even if those deicisons are wrong) they are trying to convince people to defer their own judgement based off the reality that their judgment HAS to be biased due to confirmation bias.  First of all this is hypocritical because The Gormans (I hate to keep singling them out because this is an attitude shared by many intellectuals) are necessarily vulnerable to this same bias.   Besides that, however, the situations carries all the negative implications bad faith carries in any existentialist context, so even absent the hypocrisy, it is still unethical to tell people what to believe just because you feel you are less biased. 
She was a die hard Christian who would question my morality if I brought up any deep conversation about science. This is mainly what I'm referring to.  
Good examples - if you were a woman, or a gay man, or of a racial or religious minority here, I'd say that there's a block of people who really have it out for you and whom you might fairly consider enemies.  But judging by your post record, I get the idea that you're not among one of those groups.   I know that there's more than enough irrational hatred out there. My question was directed specifically to how *you* managed to have enemies.  
Funny, since if a lack of gun control applies to all citizens, then the bourgeois can also be well armed. If not better armed.  Not much of a solution. 
i agree that there are exceptions. i even said that in my opinion neither is particularly correct, which implies that i fall somewhere in between and embrace some aspects of both. however, i still believe that for the majority (i don't think egoist communists will be a majority any time soon) they fall on one side or another and will form opinions based on that, or at the very least people have a set of general beliefs that inform their opinions on specific issues, and they won't be convinced on specific issues by any amount of empirical evidence unless their core beliefs change. i didn't mean to make my post specifically about collective and individual beliefs, rather to use that one as an example of a common spectrum upon which many, but not all, people fall.  
What does "leftist" mean in concerns to gun rights? In the USA, they tend to be anti-gun but then you take a country like Switerland or a left leaning country like Austria with very high gun ownership and incredibly easy access to firearms and it's not even a point of debate in politics at all. 
It's the opposite. The earth is flat. This is an observable fact. Just go outside and have a look. The "theory" of earths obloid nature has to be taught and contradicts observable "facts".  To think that the earth is an obloid rushing at tremendous speed throught empty space is a belief upheld largely by blind trust in authority. Because for a simple human such as myself this is non-observable. If I believe the earth to be an iron ball in an epiliptic orbit around the sun this is because I have faith.   (Sidenote. No educated mind in recorded history has ever thought the world was flat. None.) 
I take your point, that our *explanations* for things don't become "facts", no matter how well founded they are. However, in this specific case, I'd still categorise "evolution" as a fact - an observable phenomenon, something real in the natural world which we observe. The *mechanism* by which it happens remains a theory.  (speaking as a non-expert) 
I disagree. Evolution is as much of a fact as gravity is a fact. That doesn't preclude that there are theories about the mechanisms and behaviors of these facts, though. That General Relativity is a theory of gravity does not make gravity itself not a fact. 
Yeah, I wish I was better with geography, too. I think that's why things like this annoy me so much, I'm berating myself for always conflating Lithuania and Latvia when almost nobody can figure out that Ukraine *probably* borders Russia and *probably* has a coastline and that coastline is *probably* more southerly than northerly. The headlines alone about Crimea (which that questionnaire was in relation to) tell you more than that and even that leaves you with, like, *two* options, a handful if we're generous. Bah.  But seriously, people should know how toilets work, too :D 
I have seen this comic before, and I like it, but I am doubting its relevancy here. Care to explain me otherwise?  
Yep, people are downvoting you but evolutionary psych is a joke. They don't present facts, just narrative. You can twist hunter-gatherer stories to explain any psychological finding, but they don't have a lot of predictive value, and they're not really falsifiable. So it's interesting stuff for newspapers to write about but it's only loosely based in science. 
I don't mind evo-devo being brought up until we question the origin of our minds more habitually and these mechanisms can be assumed (or perhaps it'll just be a fad for a while). I grew up thinking the mind was kind of a container you just filled, but it turns out to be a little more problematic. 
Simply put, conservative means 'not accepting of new ideas,' and liberal means 'tolletant of new ideas.'  It's not a bias in the research.  
The rapid shift to gay acceptance in America and the West shows that social progress can be accelerated without die-off. 
Not all evidence is empirical, and most philosophers hold that moral evidence won't be empirical. 
By what metric? The Wikipedia editor's? Yours? Not mine, because I think no fallacy needs to be 100% wrong all the time to be a fallacy that's wrong enough of the time for inclusion on a list of bad logical tropes. 
to truly understand something it should be simple to explain.  if you can put it simply, you simply dont uderstand. 
I'd argue as it pertains to this subject, the idea you get isn't important. The idea I get will inform the facts I believe. You still don't get it. It's an enemy because you think it's an enemy. The object is the idea.  
Yes when I argue with conservatives or libertarians I always refer to "tax cuts" as "tax cuts for the wealthy." They start squirming real quick.  
Well their is a tendency to generalize for gotchas!  Most people would agree that animals shouldn't suffer, especially if they believe scientific evidence that they CAN suffer.  That many still have the childhood image of a farm that is different from the heavily industrialized version we have today explains this discrepancy. 
The difference is in numbers. If the people really did revolt, the bourgeoisie wouldn't be able to fight a well armed populace.  However, if only the well-off have access to weapons, a revolution would be destroyed immediately. 
I think I get what you're saying, I may just be taking issue with presenting it as taking stances within binaries. I do think you have a pretty solid point in that a lot of people base there views on what can often be boiled down to a few key viewpoints upon which the rest is built. 
No, I think it has something to do with it reducing a wide variety of ideas and policy into one negative word. It's a useful tool for argument and immediately puts your opponent in a weakened position. It's also used to avoid arguing about policy and the effects of policy.  
Point taken, but the earth being curved can be observed by anyone. You just have take the time to observe it. You could even get a rough estimated measurement of its diameter if you wanted. 
Species changing over time is a fact and evolution explains that mechanism 
The small percent that don't are welcomed to disagree, but until they present strong enough evidence otherwise are **to be ignored.**  I'm sure a small percentage of scientists disagree that the world is round. That doesn't mean anyone should care.  
You're assuming these same people have any knowledge about Crimea and Sevastopol.  
Because psychology as a whole is not a very clear-cut science, it just happens that evolutionary psychology is on it's fringes (or frontier depending on how you look at it) rather than it's core. I guess I'm still thinking on one line in the article that it's advantageous in terms of exploration to not fully know why people believe certain things, but eventually it'll work itself out because science. 
If that's true, what does this even mean: "the effect goes a long way to explain the rigidity of social morality, even in the face of overwhelming evidence"? 
I don't mean any offense by this - but that explanation sounds like pseudo-intellectual nonsense, and I have no idea what you're trying to say. Simplify it for me please.  And what do you mean by "which facts [you] believe?" 
Sure--tax cuts for everyone.  Wealthy people are a subset of everyone. 
Well, we generally don't kill things that we love, but I see your point. I was just trying to point out the contradiction in belief that gets us outraged about puppy mills, but barely caring about factory farms.  
What do you personally think those views that act as pivot points or early diversions in one direction or another are?  Do you think they are consistent across a population / culture or do you think they are more specific to the individual but follow general patterns (or not)? 
The founders answered them in their own context.    As a civilization we must keep asking ourselves these questions to be sure our answers remain appropriate and not vestiges of a period come and gone.    Take privacy alone, conceptually how we think about privacy now and how it was considered in the 18th century are radically different and countless new questions to be wrestled with have been introduced by technology, gender role changes, improved and altered understanding, etc. 
i think you're begging the question. you're starting off with the viewpoint that collectivism is negative and then using that stance to justify why using the word collectivism is negative. i don't think it's necessarily a negative word at all. it just outlines the belief that the group as a whole has the power to exert its will over a given individual in a specific case. the criminalization of theft and murder are collectivist policies in that the collective is exerting over the individual its will to protect lives and personal property. i think in this case collectivism is fine and totally positive.  
I'm not so sure about science being a moral endeavor in of itself. It's an amazing tool that can be used to better people's lives but the use of that tool has also created much suffering. I have recently begun to think that there's much missing in what it is to be human when you look at everything in a scientific materialist viewpoint. 
I'm really only assuming that they had been exposed to the headlines (not even the articles, really) that the questionnaire was in relation to.  That doesn't seem like an unreasonable level of knowledge to hope for in someone who then goes on to back military intervention :-/ 
I am sorry but I still have no idea what your point is.  
Think I understand what you are saying. Being familiar gives an illusion of knowing how something works technically. Evolution is a good example that comes to mind. 
I was simply pointing out that to believe someone is the enemy is often enough to make them so.  
What do you say to the point that this is not beneficial for society? Potentially, a wealthy family could make more than the US gov't for instance. Too much concentrated wealth raises the risk of capital flight from our country. What do you say to that?    
I agree with that.  My wife always gets mad at me when I remind her we are eating dead cow.  She tries to place this mental block that they food is something other than what it is. I think it is important to acknowledge what our food is and where it comes from. 
You are conflating what is "good" public policy with what is constitutional. 
It's just my experiences in the real world outside of intellectual circles. I Google the word and I find several Libertarian definitions and one from the Ayn Rand school of thinking. I think she wrote a book on the subject? I never did read it as I hated her writing style.  
Oh I know. It's a terribly low bar to clear and pretty unerving. I was merely commenting on your statment that they should be able to infer that Ukraine has a coastline due to its proximity to Crimea. Well...that'd require them to know that Crimea has a coastline which unfortunately is not agiven. 
I'm simultaneously calling the principles of psychology as much bullshit (relatively\*) as evolutionary psychology and that evolutionary psychology *must be* a biological fact even if we can only bullshit as to why most of it is.   *It's all more about justified belief than verified fact. 
You're probably only familiar with what he's saying, and don't really understand it. 
Agreed. At least - it's enough to make you *their* enemy. If they don't reciprocate the hatred, though, calling them *your* enemy is hollow.   What makes you think other people have it out for you in that way? 
I'm not here to argue about whether or not it's good or bad.  I'm just saying you can call it what you like and I don't see a reason anyone should squirm because they can call it what they like and either one is accurate.  I could even go with "tax cuts for the poor" were I so inclined. 
I believe you have done that actually.    To say that the Founders already answered these questions so we don't have to is to put the cart ahead of the horse, to say we don't need to ask that question any longer because it is already answered.  What is in the Constitution is not static, it is subject to change and has within it mechanisms to allow this (Judicial interpretation along with the Amending process).    The question of what is good public policy is more important than the question of what is constitutional, though a conflict isn't necessary it also isn't a significant problem.  Where we find the Constitution lacking we are well within our rights to change it; there's little reason for a document from centuries past to hamstring our ability to govern ourselves.   
I know, it's just that (in my mind) the absolute, most rudimentary understanding is that Russia wants the port in Crimea. There's a lot more to know, there always is, but (in my mind) almost any article from any source with any purpose or any bias will lay out that basic info either implicitly or explicitly. I mean, it's pretty hard to have missed terms like *Black Sea* or *warm water* or *Crimean Peninsula*.  So I was saying, apparently naively, that if you'd managed to avoid knowing even that much then you couldn't have a clue whether or not you supported military intervention because at that point you are essentially supporting intervention in Latveria.  Which, depressingly, leads me to conclude it would be easy to garner support for intervention in Latveria. Oh well. 
Why 'must' evolutionary psychology be a fact though? How do the mating patterns of my ancestors determine my political preferences?  
Well then we're in agreement, shortly my behavior will be enough to convince them I'm an enemy. Reversed:  their behavior would convince me.   As such the object is the idea. The objective fact of being an enemy is contained (in part) within the idea that someone is an enemy. That was my only point.  
Maybe utilitarians are just more likely to be drunk at a bar in France than other people 
If I'm drunk and someone asks me to take a multiple choice test where all the answers are utilitarian but I'm a virtue ethicist, then the alcohol takes on enormous explanatory powers. 
Wouldn't that mean drunk people don't apply "cold" logic at all, as the title suggests? 
Alcohol reduces inhibitions. Maybe somewhere deep inside, we all know it's for the greater good when one person dies to save 5 others, but our cultural conditioning makes us deny it. Just like a drunk person with reduced inhibitions is more likely to have irresponsible sex in spite of their upbringing or conditioning. 
may I ask what utilitarian means? no native speaker here. 
I wonder how the study subjects being French could be important to this whole thing 
Why is this "cold logic"  Generally speaking, Utilitarianism is clearly "warmer" than something more focused on Deontology.  Utility cares about how individual people feel, more other ethical belief systems do not.  
A utilitarian calculus is NOT easy, because predicting results is an inexact science. (note: I hold that most of the gross errors utilitarianism is subject to producing may be adequately mitigated by adopting a few deontological human rights provisos... whilst ever striving towards the highest utility for the greatest number.)  Perhaps the *attractiveness* of utilitarianism is more evident to the drunk because quasi-utopian. 
What was it that Kant said about wine "uniting the company in frankness"?  
I think the logic side of our brains get "turned off" and our animal/tribal instincts start kicking in. Hence the people who become more intoxicated become more utilitarian. 
Someone asked me the same question once - whether I would flip the switch to save five people instead of letting only one live. It seems like most people would flip the switch. First of all, why are the people standing on tracks? That's just stupid. Second of all, it's not my responsibility anyways, so I'd rather not get involved in the situation at all.   Not flipping the switch doesn't make you responsible for anything. Sure, 5 people will die but that's not on you. Flipping the switch just made you deliberately kill someone.  
I think it's pretty damning for a philosophy when it is the one embraced by people with impaired reasoning.  
I wonder what combination of intoxicant and location yields perspectivists.   
People tend to feel less guilty for their actions *while* they're inebriated and then the guilt comes afterward.  I think the lack of guilt helps people detach themselves from the emotional baggage of their personal responsibility and thus if they have answers they think are practical they don't have guilt holding them from giving their honest opinion. Unfortunately, peoples' judgement is impaired at the same time so it doesn't really open any doors to more surefire answers. 
My best friend when drunk turns into an authoritarian. Pretty interesting.  
What study was that? Most of the literature finds the opposite. 
Contrary to common sense, a lot of people think that things that are the best for everyone are callous and cold. People believe that *they* deserve special treatment and to be exceptions to the rules. When they are told that they are not an exception and that the rules are working as intended, they say "how can you be so cold?"  Don't believe me? Look at what people say about taxes and healthcare.  
I don't think so. This implies utilitarian logic is somehow objectively correct and that anyone who disagrees is in denial. What about the logical next step to the trolley question, where you have five patients each dying of organ failure to a different body part, but one perfectly healthy guy in the waiting room? Maybe you really should dice him up, but surely there's at least room for dispute. 
Id say the utilitarian answer is just the one that requires less thought. It's the gut instinct. Falls apart if you actually put some thought into it and explore where it takes you. 
It's a philosophy of ethics for determining, when you're given a list of possible actions, which action is morally the best one.   In utilitarianism, you attempt to measure the goodness of the outcome of each action and pick the action that leads to the most good. (Eg. 1 dead is better than 5 dead, so kill the one guy to save the others)  In contrast, deontologism says that you should have established rules of behavior before hand (eg. Never kill) and choose the action that obeys your rules (eg. Don't kill the one guy. Let the other 5 die) 
Not entirely wrong, but there are times when utilitarianism would lead us to uncomfortable conclusions and deontology preserves more comfortable moral intuitions (just like the reverse is also sometimes the case). Some of the classic examples are things like the Trolly problem, or incest/necrophilia, or eating one's dead cat, or something along those lines. Most of us have strong intuitions that these things are wrong, but a utilitarian can't condemn people who engage in these activities if they're utility maximizing (and we assume that they are because nobody is harmed, or, in the case of the Trolly experiment, more people are benefited than are harmed). 
Because with utilitarian calculus you can get the numbers to say you can kill one healthy person to harvest organs to save more than one person.   What is missing is the personal.  
You can see three people on one train track and your buddy whom you trust implicitly calls and tells you there are 5 people on the other track but they're far enough down you can't see them. You cannot stop tbe train. You must choose a path for it. Cold logic dictates you watch the three die to save the 5. Many people have trouble making this cold choice though because of the emotional response they get from actually seeing the three. 
and cold logic = reptile brain = not nearly as impressive as it sounds when you realize that you are basically acting like a cave man with no capacity for weighing your options with regards to the long term.  Grats utilitarians, you murdered the guy who was going to cure cancer in order to save 5 people with terminial illnesses who will fall over dead 5 minutes later anyways. Greater good my ass. Rationality my foot. It's just stupid and shortsighted based on 20 years of mental conditioning to value all human life equally even thought it makes no sense what so ever to do so. First it was tolerance. Then it was acceptance. And now its we are all equal.. Equally oppressed. Equally victims. EQUALLY WORTHLESS. 
Though I dislike the bulk of utilitarianism, I would disagree with the idea that it is cold or apathetic. Sure, its impartiality subordinates individual interests, but it is impossible to subordinate the values by which the utilitarian operates.   Values are inherently warm and tied to individual passions.   If I label a particular type of morality to be cold, I would say Kant's deontology is entirely cold. He says in the Groundwork for the Metaphysics of Morals that only can a cold and disinterested man be completely moral, or something like that. It's actually one of the reasons why Nietzsche craps all over Kant - Nietzsche being the passionate and emotional type.  
But Utilitarianism, here, is being described as "cold[ly] logic[al]," so the decisions made when our cognitive faculties that deal with logic and reasoning are impaired would not be examples of utilitarian thinking. 
Gravity causing things to fall is also embraced by drunks, as their numerous experiments in the gutter have shown. This is not damning evidence that gravity is wrong.  This result does not mean utilitarianism is wrong, merely that drunk people are more utilitarian. 
Weed, couch:  If I put my hands out like this they're huge. If I bring them up to my face like this they're huger! What? 
Why is the study great? Why isn't the utilitarian answer not just common sense? I can't imagine too many people becoming more "emotionally sensitive to someone's pain" as the researcher argued is one of the reasons for letting the 5 people die instead of just one. Maybe I'm missing something, or I'm one of the less emotional people he described but without first establishing what the answer ratio would be among sober people I don't see much value particularly in the conclusions he claimed to come to at the end of article. 
This may be a bit off point but there was a whole marvel story arc about Dr.Doom finding a crossover between universes that was able to grant him his deepest desire. The whole way through the story you think it is to get rid of Mr fantastic. Right at the last moment he wishes to be guilt free. So that he is able to , in his eyes, make the decisions necessary to make the world a better place. 
Aaand there you have the true core of "rape culture" that SJWs talk about. 
Someone whose ethical decisions are based on what they believe is "morally" right as opposed to what they think follows rules (deontology) or what will have the best consequences (consequentialism). Source: am not drunk yet 
These people all need to play the law ending of SMTIV, where at the last second you're informed that you have to die too for the greater good, with literally the flat phrase of you not being an exception coldly told to you, but it shows you accepting it with a blank face because you (in game) understand the hypocrisy of complaining about it.  The series in general shows exactly how bent out of shape people get about utilitarian reasoning when put onto large scales, even if they profess to understanding it on small scales. 
I'm not sure that's quite a fair assessment. Often times, deontological reasoning stems from an adherence to principle; i.e. it's wrong to sacrifice one person for the good of a hundred because you are doing so against her knowledge or will (assuming the person has not given consent).  This is reinforced by the idea that our value as human beings is derived primarily by our respect for one another as first class agents in nature and in society, as opposed to mere bargaining chips in a positive sum guessing game.  If you throw out mutual respect and human dignity, what is the point of saving the extra 99 people? Why are they worth anything at all? 
I generally consider those types of examples not classic examples of utilitarianism but classic examples of straw-man utilitarianism. As you point out, as soon as you consider that you just gave doctors (fallible, corruptible human doctors) the power to legally murder people you see that this is most definitely not a utilitarian choice. It presumes some constraint that utilitarianism isn't allowed to consider systemic issues or societal power dynamics. 
What if the utilitarian is REALLY utilitarian and believes the 5 people should be allowed to die because whatever caused them to need organs shouldn't be passed on in the gene pool and it also helps curb over population?  
Most utilitarians wouldn't see that as "the logical next step" since it involves giving a huge amount of power to doctors, and power corrupts. One would assume that the overall outcome would be worse and therefore that is definitely not the utilitarian choice.  That is taking a utilitarian evaluation of a simple situation and then using the rules of virtue ethics when applying it to a complex situation. 
Can you give an example where it might break down in your opinion?  For example with the doctor's surgery I would argue it has greater utility to prevent random patients being sacrificed because people would live in fear. 
Ehh.  Not really. I think your conclusions about utilitarians being ok with those things is probably off the mark. There are good consequentialist reasons for not eating dead cats, fucking corpses, etc. Namely, you'll get a disease and die. Or you'll get discovered and lose your friends and family. Or you'll go to prison, or sent to an insane asylum.  Those are all sufficiently negative outcomes to generally recommend against eating/fucking dead things for purely utilitarian/consequentialist reasons.   
The person is most certainly not missing there.  It's precisely the personal (the effect of the many to be saved) that drive this conclusion.   In deontology, you might say "it is always right to sacrifice one to save many", **that's** impersonal.   The utilitarian, "sacrifice one if the net happiness is greater to others" only sacrifices one in virtue of "the personal" argument.   Of course both can be subject to anti killing measures, just sticking with your example.   
You're assuming that if one thought logically, saving 5 people would be the correct answer. Sensitivity is not a barrier from thinking logically.  
You kill the three and look away. I mean, it's not an 'easy' choice, but then it's not even really a choice in my opinion.  
Someone defining their reasoning as cold isn't what's being asked. Its about whether its cold in practice. 
Pretty much, it's the underpinning of all totalitarian ethics. 
But like, its wrong to have big hands sometimes cause maybe you have snacks and your hands are more bigger than the opening of the snack box and then they don't fit inside the snacks and now you can't get snacks.  D: 
I don't know that it's common sense. Not acting would also be a very popular answer, and probably way more common in practice.  
Many people can't force themselves to choose either option or feel extreme guilt over having chosen either option.  The more utilitarian you are, typically the less difficulty you have in making the "most net-benefit" decision even if it hurts someone. 
The utilitarian view is only gut reaction common sense, as in if you don't spend too much thought on it. Utilitarianism falls apart if you actually explore where it takes you. 
That's his whole argument though. They DIDN'T become more sensitive. The more they drank the more they distanced themselves from the hypothetical people. To me, at least, this is fairly interesting because people seem to get more feelsy when they drink. It seems to me that the alcohol kept them from even attempting to consider the hypotheticals as real people, never allowing themselves to develop emotional ties to people that never existed in the first place. That's where the utilitarianism comes into play. I figure the study is pointing towards some kind of fairly unstudied effect that alcohol has on the brain. But then again, this is a graduate student's paper and you're just sort of dumping on it for laughs, so whatever. 
Because the "utilitarian" answer is actually wrong.  The problem is that there is a more important general rule, namely "if someone isn't doing something wrong, it is wrong to punish him so that people who are doing something wrong can evade the consequences of their actions". Basically, shoving someone off a bridge to save five people who are on the tracks is wrong because the person on the bridge was not exposing themselves to danger while the five people on the tracks were. 
That's a pretty intense wish. Hopefully he's as smart as he thinks he is. Having no guilt doesn't help if you aren't smart enough to make the right decisions in the first place.  Yeah you're good, this is very relevant to the subject and pretty cool. 
this sounds more like it but i'd also steal a patio chair from the bar on the way out 
The problem is that utiltiarianism, like all philosophies, is ultimately arbitrarily defined, but many utilitarians forget this blindingly obvious and important fact.  Utilitarianism is known to have intrinsic flaws like the mere addition paradox.  Pretty much all utilitarianism is, on some level, the same as straw-man utilitarianism, it is just that the degree to which a utilitarian philosophy is flawed is dependent on its predicates.  That's not to say that utilitarianism is useless - far from it - but the idea that it is isn't an intrinsically flawed philosophy is false.  Really, a lot of these thought puzzles are meant to illustrate flaws in utilitarian thought processes - the trolley puzzle is actually a great example of the sort of flawed thought processes that many utilitarians follow. 
What if we don't broaden it to all doctors, but just you? You have all the medical knowledge to perform all the surgeries you need. The healthy one would die if you would chose to save the five others. Would you, personally, do it? 
It breaks down when you eventually realize the only thing stopping genocide and slavery from being morally right in a utilitarian framework is your ability to judge how effective they will be in maximizing utility. More matters than just outcomes. 
Yes, it wouldn't be one of the great philosophical questions of all time if the logical answer was simply about numbers. 
And that's the cold logic part. Also personally I may make myself watch as it was my decision that effectively damned them. Just me though. 
It's usually the language that is used, but not necessarily practiced. It's also, incidentally, the language used in almost any political debate in the U.S.   
Man like maybe hold the box closer and your hand further away so then the box is bigger than your hand. 
I'm sure all kinds of different things would happen in practice, but the way the scenario is presented we have no factors or anything besides the number of people who would live or die. Would anyone reading this tell me why they would choose the smaller amount of people to live? I just don't see sober people answering much differently. 
Well the frequency of inaction doesn't necessarily justify inaction as being in a moral majority. There's the bystander effect named from a peculiar incident where 38 people witnessed someone get murdered and no one called the police because they all believed that someone else had already called the police and thus they did not need to call the police. I've personally witnessed this effect with a grass fire. Even though I'm sure that every one of those people believed that calling the police would have been the moral course of action, they failed to act. There is an asymmetry in behavior regarding action vs inaction. 
Then you kill five people instead of one. Either way you are responsible. Inaction does not absolve you of responsibility.  If this is to be a moral quandary, potentially it makes you more immoral to sit back and watch, when you could have saved the most lives. So it's better to have one grieving family than five.  
That's the premise, but in the train scenario we aren't given details to really emotionally attach to, it's just two quantities of people that can be saved. I'm arguing that sober people are also utilitarian enough to mostly want to save the group and that the scenario could have been better if it wanted to appeal to our sentiments. 
Care to elaborate? Any hard-set stance can lead to problems, but with the limited information given for this specific scenario where does it fall apart? 
Sorry if that came across as confrontational. It would be interesting to see this study done with people early in the night before they start drinking, then asking again later in the night once they're drunk to see if their positions change. Just because they are drunk and think a certain way doesn't mean the alcohol is causing those thought if they already held those beliefs while sober.  A much better test would be:  1. Control group - No alcohol given  1. Test group - Alcohol given to sufficient BAC  1. Placebo group - non-alcohol drinks given  All of this would be done in a controlled environment in a double-blind trial. Then I would be happy. 
Can you show an example of that though?  Like what sort of a decision would a utilitarian make to cause that? 
What about the case where you see a woman getting beaten up.  Wouldn't they consider doing nothing an action in that case? 
What if the 5 are lawyers and the 1 is an Einstein. Shouldn't we have to define what the goal of our utility is? 
The idea that the ends justify the means is the basic theme of all totalitarian political action. For the Soviets, the ends of the march of history was used to justify the means of mass murder. For the Nazis, the higher ends of racial purity justified the means of genocide. All politically disastrous regimes are predicated on this sort of basic utilitarian thinking. There's a reason why, outside of maybe Peter Singer, the only people who think utilitarianism is a serious ethical theory are teenagers posting on reddit. 
I agree wholeheartedly with the first sentence, but not at all with the second. 
Now we have gigantic snacks!! My mouth isn't big enough 
The problem is that there is a more important general rule, namely "if someone isn't doing something wrong, it is wrong to punish him so that people who are doing something wrong can evade the consequences of their actions". Basically, shoving someone off a bridge to save five people who are on the tracks is wrong because the person on the bridge was not exposing themselves to danger while the five people on the tracks were.  It is a generally more important principle, especially given that we don't always have guarantees about the effects of our actions. 
There are several different versions of the philosophical trolley question and even with the same number of people at stake, the answers can vary greatly depending on context. Version in study uses the trolley controlled via lever.   But in another version where there is no lever, the choice you are given is to either kill 5 people by doing nothing, or kill one person by pushing him onto the track to stop the trolley. Most people (at least when sober), are unable to do this. 
People regularly choose not to intervene. Saving some does mean killing others. While you can say you are making a net gain, you are still making the decision to end someone's life.  What if the 5 people were doing something dangerous but to save them you'd have to kill someone who was not in any way at fault for their circumstances? What if the person that dies is the best cancer researcher the world has ever known? 
What if the 5 people were known rapists/murderers, and the one was a pediatric neurosurgeon who regularly did pro bono work for needy kids? 
I would choose smaller amounts of people to live because I believe people are inherently evil and this way there would be less potential for bad things. Don't believe me? Look at the history of humanity; most of the bad things that have happened have been caused by people. It's all about minimising risk. 
I'm not referring to the bystander effect, I mean consciously choosing to save neither group and let events play out. Without a lot more information it would be impossible to know what you were doing was positive or not, and that doesn't factor in that many people would say it's not their place to make that decision for either group themselves.  
Oh yeah, I remember learning that in psychology, it's called the "diffusion of responsibility" phenomenon. However, I don't think this would apply in a hypothetical scenario that's being presented to you in a typical question-answer survey. Most people probably wouldn't answer the guy saying: "Oh, I wouldn't do anything because someone else probably will". Especially since the person being interviewed probably has the assumption the questions are meant to measure/quantify ethical decisions in a particular scenario. I'd imagine this phenomenon probably only occurs IRL when there's an incident involving multiple witnesses.  
Oh I agree that the sober people WANT to save the five people as well... but as another poster down below mentioned, being drunk tends to lessen the extent of guilt and worrying about the consequences of our actions.  So the drunk person says well this choice is probably better... I'll do it.  The sober person says well this choice is probably better but I couldn't live with myself if I actually went through with it... so I'll leave it for someone else to do.  That's just my take though. 
utilitarianism doesn't (traditionally) take into account motives or intent at all. it means if, in the trolley problem, you flip the switch and you unwittingly cause the train to derail and kill *even more people* than it would have otherwise, your action is as morally wrong as if you had done so *with the intention* of killing more people. 
If you keep going down the rabbit hole you end up being genocidal. Or you reach the repugnant conclusion. It's not good. 
It really doesn't matter, all your saying by even posing that question is "I'm not sure the circumstances exist where slavery or genocide will maximize utility, but if they did, they're the right call" 
That would change the utilitarian calculation. But the premise of the trolley problem is that we don't know, which means that from the perspective of the decision maker, the question is fundamentally statistical in nature. They have to make the best judgment with the information they *have*. Their judgement may prove to be wrong, but they have no ability to know that, and we can't really be expected to make decisions based on things we don't, or more to the point *can't*, know.   Statistically speaking, it is more likely that the hypothetical Einstein is in the group of 5.  
Huh, it's pretty clear that you don't really know much about the varieties of utilitarianism and how seriously it's taken in academia. Bye! 
Why not? Everything is in terms of the greater good. Obamacare--saves money, gun control--saves more lives, second amendment--saves more lives, abortion--saves pain and suffering and money, NSA tapping--saves lives, minimum wage--more happy people, no minimum wage--fewer people laid off.  Don't get me wrong, rights based arguments exist for many of these topics, but it almost always boils down to "what's best for the group?" 
Forget your mouth! We just solved the world's food shortage problem!  
That sounds like a better scenario that would get more interesting answers. 
Sure there are plenty of "what ifs" that can be attached to this. What if the single person is your best friend, etc. This information isn't included in the scenario though, like I mentioned. All you have are numbers. 
Those people seem conscious to me. They seem to be making a decision to me. What criteria do we use to distinguish this case and a conscious choice of inaction? Most of our decision making on any given day is not rigorous. Would you assert that people are mostly amoral and only on occasion behave morally or immorally? 
That poster down below says so, and I do believe it, but the study failed to show this.  
Define 'good'. If the net gain of a genocide would visibly and quantifiably outweigh the cost of many deaths, would it not be the better answer? Just because a conclusion is repugnant, doesn't mean it's wrong.   Utilitarianism is basically an acceptance that what is necessary is not necessarily humane.   Or is this related to that false conclusion to the 'utility monster' thought experiment? Because that thought experiment breaks down as soon as you consider the net gain of happiness does not work in the superficial way it's portrayed in that scenario. There are more variables in that equation than a linear rate of aggregation.   
The repugnant conclusion may not be good, but that doesn't mean it's not true. 
Except nature, without intervention, would let those 5 people die. By not saving them, you are encouraging natural evolution. 
Well I think specific situations are important when debating complicated topics.  You can't just make a weak claim that utilitarianism promotes slavery without showing some sort of causation or reasoning!  Look at the train track example.  It has to be specified in very concrete terms otherwise the answer can change dramatically.  If you disagree with that then I claim leftists love authority which is the root of many dictatorships who torture citizens daily.  No need for concrete examples right? 
Seriously, read up on the topic. If you want I can give you some suggestions to get you started. 
Right? I don't even agree with utilitarianism but "it *can* lead to totalitarianism" isn't enough to conclude that it's factually untrue. 
The same children who think utilitarianism are cool also never seem to have even the slightest understanding of basic political theory. 
Ok, some of those examples are good.  I rescind the "not at all".  But: just because people could make all of those arguments doesn't mean they actually do make them.  We'd need to do a serious media study to really sort this out, but, for instance, the standard abortion debate doesn't sound utilitarian to me on either side.  "I can do what I want with my body" is a classic libertarian-sounding thing to say.  And the "don't kill babies" response isn't really concerned with tradeoffs in the way it would need to be for it to sound utilitarian; rather, it's about a right to life.  Similarly for conservatives on gun rights - the standard argument is that it's about the right to self-defense.  Liberals on health care and guns, conservatives on NSA-tapping, etc., I'll give you. 
It is not about choosing who dies but rather choosing not to use a life for some goal as though that person was merely a tool to be used, dehumanizing them. I also do *not* think that it is the easier option, since I would much rather nobody die and choosing not to pull the lever would be a difficult decision because I know that would mean people die, but I could not bring myself to use a life, therefore I would not pull it. I actually think that focusing solely on the numbers is a means of distancing oneself from the act of killing, dehumanizing people even further as though the death of one person from one's own actions was nothing compared to circumstances one had no control over. 
Usually different version of this question is asked to determine where people draw the line. People are seldom keen to directly push someone to their death to save five other, while putting something in between (a lever, button etc) makes the number of people who are willing to save five other people sky rocket. 
But why is saving five better than one? You're right all we have are numbers but we're not talking about saving inanimate objects we're talking about human lives. What is a life worth? Are all lives worth the same? I refuse to reduce this down to simple math. 
Yes, a utilitarian would commit the genocide in that scenario. Which is one of many reasons utilitarianism fails as a philosophy. It leads to the violation of basic human rights. But I'm guessing a utilitarian also rejects the notion of intrinsic human rights, and probably views them more as a means to maximize utility if you accept them at all.  Utilitarianism still breaks down when you explore the mere addition paradox, which is what I'm referring to when I say the repugnant conclusion, you should research it. Turns out utilitarianism leads to a place where everyone is worse off. 
Haha this makes no sense. Utilitarianism is way of thinking about morals and ethics, which should inform your decision making in life. If you believe that utilitarian thought gets you to the repugnant conclusion which you admit is not good, then you should not let utilitarian thought inform your decision making. 
Natural evolution isn't always favorable. It's a probability argument that it's better to have access to those genes for research or other purposes than to let them die off. 
No because you're completely changing the meaning of the word leftist.  Being leftist at its core isn't a love of authority.  Utilitarianism at its core is the belief that maximizing utility is all that matters. So whether I construct some fantasy scenario or not where slavery or genocide maximizes utility is largely irrelevant, all I need is for you to agree that it is theoretically possible that slavery or genocide could somehow maximize utility, then it is logically possible for slavery or genocide to be the right thing to do. 
Who should I read? Marx? I have already read his remarks on utilitarianism. I particularly remember the part where he explicitly stated he wasn't a utilitarian. Mein Kampf? It's a big book, maybe you can direct me to which page he quotes from Mill and Bentham (totalitarians are famously fond of 'On Liberty').  Please give me some suggestions, I would love that. 
Stating that utilitarianism is the underpinning of totalitarian governments is not the same say stating that utilitarianism *produces* totalitarian governments. That sort of regime becomes the arbiter of morality and tends to place *its own existence* as the highest good. One could also argue that establishing a government which in theory is there to protect it's citizens, but in practice sacrifices as many of them as necessary to further it's own ends, is *not* a system which works for the greatest good. There *are* different varieties of utilitarianism, and they can be diametrically opposed depending on their hierarchy of values. That moral relativism is ultimately why it fails as an ethical foundation for government. It should help where it can, but above all it should do no harm. People don't elect leaders so that they can be fed to the lions. 
I tried to be balanced, but yes, liberals use utilitarian reasoning more often than conservatives. 
You're only dehumanizing them or using them as a tool by applying that label to the action. You could also say you're abandoning and dehumanizing the others by not saving them. Few utilitarians are thinking that the death of one person was "nothing", we just aren't going to let our own guilt and moral hangups prevent us from saving more people. Selfish and cowardly are labels I may use to describe someone who wouldn't save the greater amount of people just because it might make them feel bad about it after. 
Why is that logic going to lead to genocide? You're already in the situation where you have to make a decision, if anything not being utilitarian will kill the group of people and that's closer to genocide. Are you still extrapolating that if you make the utilitarian decision here, you will do the same in other scenarios for some reason? Any kind of absolute thinking can lead to slippery slopes and horrible consequences, that's not good justification to write off the use of discretion.  
That's absolutely ridiculous. Are you literally saying that if the truth isn't nice, you should ignore the truth? 
Genes don't magically disappear just because they aren't expressed. 
So give me a concrete scenario where an incorrect moral choice would be made. 
Just to save some people time, the article and accompanying video don't give absolute evidence that it is indeed Aristotle's tomb. There are hints but nothing definitive. 
Click bait title, turn back now. Not 100 % conclusive  
Let's clone him and send him to Oxford for his Ph.D. in Philosphy 
Hopefully they find it again tomorrow so I can see this on the front page for a week straight. 
TIL in Greek you pronounce his name "Airy-stow-telly". Pretty cool thats how his name would have sounded. 
Is there any chance of finding his ashes? or some kind of DNA? 
Does anyone else feel this is an effort to boost tourism and the economy alike? If I were officials responsible for such a task I feel like this is a pretty easy way to do it?  -Tourists visit places that are historically monumental. -Aristotle is one of Greeces big attention drawing name for many history and philosophy buffs -Slap the tag "Aristotle's Tomb" on (don't get me wrong) what looks like an ancient site. -Profit   What gets me is that this looks like a fairly habit-ed area. 22 seconds in I see a large dock out to sea so what gives. A site that's probably been known about for years suddenly becomes this huge discovery ironically during times of economic turmoil?   I like to fish and this seems fishy. 
Could this give us any insight into his life, teachings, or philosophy?  
And how exactly does this benefit Philosophy? The guy is dead and while it is interesting it wouldn't negate what is claimed to be his work nor would it improve it. 
Yeah right. Just last week I saw they had found his tomb in Greece. 
Yes, of course not. I just linked this with the title of the article or so. Specialist strongly believe it can be the actual tomb but hey; at least is something. And an opener too. I always thought if actually aristotle was burried pointing up like in the painting :P 
This simply wouldn't work, all jokes aside.  I read an interesting theory somewhere that if you clone Albert Einstein, his copy might not even be anything like the original Einstein.  He may look identical, but the clone's mind could be completely different. 
Sounds similar to how it's pronounced in Spanish: "Arr-EES-TOH-teh-less" 
How would finding his DNA help? There wouldn't be anything to compare it to 
Im from Argentina so your argument may be invalid regarding your false premises. 
Who cares if this benefits philosophy? It's Aristotle's friggin tomb(Possibly). Finding his body holds historic value in its own right.  The people on /r/philosophy care for the same reason a Christian would care about finding Jesus' actual body.   Well, you could care about their bodies in both scenarios because of what would could learn about history due to finding their bodies. That's a reasonable way to look at it, but I'd imagine that most people on here just think it's cool.  
It's probably the same story, this is in Greece also 
The absence of evidence is not the evidence of absence - Gin Rummy 
I think it's pretty clear at this point that genius is a combination of nature and nurture, so it's likely he'd be pretty bright, but he wouldn't necessarily revolutionize the world again.  Then again, he also might. 
Given he was a genius even though he was considered a moron growing up, wouldn't proper stimuli make him similar to the original? 
It wouldn't help for the purpose of the discovery, no, but it'd be nice to sequence his genome and maybe even find people related to him today? 
what? How does you being from Argentina have to do with my argument being invalid.  
I once worked in a science museum and we had a resident axolotl named Aristotle. Maybe it's his tomb? 
And I get a percentage of the profit because its based on my idea, right? 
I'll give an example.  Let's say in the near future, I was cloned and for whatever reason, my clone would be born in Japan (I'm in the U.S).  Because Japanese culture is waay different from the American way of life, he might have different opinions as me, he could grow up and be a pro athlete, hell he could just be a dumbass.  So yeah, cloning isn't as wonderful as it sounds 
But you still wouldn't know if the og dna  was Aristotle  
Actually it's an opinion, but they were making a joke.  A jest.  A funny, if you will. 
Fair enough. This is gonna be huge. Like Donald Trump huge, except successful and not nearly as up its own ass. 
Thanks for the clarification! Truth be told, my thoughts on the matter is several years old, from when I had first visited.  
I'm going to be honest with you. I don't like you, probably never will. You're a smug unhappy little man and you treat people like they were idiots.  
An opinion? I don't think that word means what you think it means.  And I understand that it was a joke, but I also understand that it's very likely he also does believe that old adage, because most people (philosophers included) do, and most people haven't heard the reasoning behind why it's not true. 
Better watch it, he'll build a wall around your book for saying that 
Sorry, but just for clarification: when you visited Macedonia(FYROM) you actually thought you were in Greece? 
That is straight-up an opinion.  Sorry, came here from /r/all and I don't care much for philosophy.  That statement is not a fact. 
Will he bill the publisher or me for that wall? I'm a little unclear. 
Did you really think he was trying to make some sort of philosophical argument with that line? 
Except he did.  Profits demand that there are money left when comparing sales vs investment needed.  Revenue doesn't care about the investment costs and demands money straight from the sales. 
This should be viral (as far as philosophy related videos go). Really well done.  
Abstract (TL;DW): This is a comprehensive map of all of the major fields of study in Philosophy.  The main focus is on Analytic Philosophy, though other traditions are mentioned.   
Serious question:   Is there a philosophy that discusses how all these kinds of philosophy relate to each other, discovering potential underlying patterns or similarities? A "philosophy of philosophy", or meta-philosophy, if you will? 
It always upsets me when I see Ancient Egyptian philosophy omitted from history to make it seem like Greek Philosophy developed in a bubble.There was a sizable among of contact between the two and to suggest that the Greeks didn't learn from the Ancient Egyptians or to assume that they were not influence by them is a stretch IMO. 
Kind of long to go viral. Maybe a good starting video, though. I only made it through 5 minutes of 45, and the language seemed geared to people who already knew about philosophy.  
It focuses more on the types of things that philosophy studies, as opposed to particular positions in philosophy.  Different traditions may study philosophy in different ways, but the topics which are studied are the same.  Most of the examples he gives are from the analytic tradition which is why I mention that, but that does not mean that continental or eastern philosophers don't study things like metaphysics, ethics or epistemology, they just might do so in a different way.  So I would argue that it covers them in a broad sense, though you are correct that it does not focus in on the way that other traditions divide these general areas. 
It's certainly interesting how this brings up a real question about how we should think of philosophy. Is it a group of things to be investigated, or is the *method* of study the more important line of division? I'm not sure if there's a clear right answer to this and while there is a bit of a split along the analytic-continental line here, there's certainly elements of both approaches in both camps.  
I don't have an issue with discussing philosophy in terms of subjects and methods. I do have a problem with the analytic philosophy allergy to reading so-called continental philosophers. L. A. Paul, for example, who did an AMA here 3 weeks ago, was an "expert" in the importance of transformative experience, but he had never read Marion on the subject. To claim to be an expert on something and to have not read the foremost thinker on the subject is embarrassing. Analytic philosophy is largely reinventing the wheel and they are just starting to recognize the role that history plays in how we understand our world and ourselves. Welcome to the show!  
You assume too much. I do not dismiss analytic philosophers. I've studied and worked with many analytic philosophers. I am merely stating a general tendency for analytic philosophers to dismiss continental philosophers outright. I was using Paul's AMA as an example of this phenomenon (not sure what my not knowing her gender tells you other than that a much higher proportion of professional philosophers are men).   I'm not wedded to the idea that Marion is THE foremost thinker on what he called saturated phenomenon when he incepted the idea, but he is certainly one of the foremost thinkers on the subject and to claim to be an expert and to not have read him exemplifies my issue very well.  
That sounds a lot more reasonable than calling an eminent scholar embarrassing for not having read work of a contemporary. Of course you were not merely using Paul as an example - if you were you wouldn't have felt the need to ridicule her. But Paul reads continental philosophy, so having not read a particular bit doesn't seem to suggest an allergy. Though I agree that the allergy exists if largely out of practicality.  Your assumption that Paul was a man only tells me you make unreasonable assumptions sometimes, which obviously filters into how I interpret a statement that looks like "analytic philosophy is pointless and I can't respect analytic philosophers".  What did I assume? 
You assume I dismiss analytic philosophers and that I think analytic philosophy is pointless along with making unfounded conclusions from my getting Paul's gender wrong. And, I stand by my statement that it is embarrassing for a so-called expert to not have read one of the foremost philosophers on a subject on which there is not an overabundance of "experts".  
The article provides no specific examples as to what they are trying to get at.  Just as in war, ethical principles need to be in place and be used as a guideline.  Then it hints at laws and regulations that are already in place to keep the economy in check and to ensure a more fair, moral playing field for all actors.  What specific laws/regulations need to be enacted to ensure that the free market and Wall Street act ethically? 
I recently started working at a major investment bank, and it's been interesting to see the inside perspective of economic ethics. What I've found is that it's hard to perceive the impact small decisions can make on the broader economy. While there are definitely exceptions, most of these "unethical" decisions are made within a context of problem solving. High speed trading, for instance, isn't utilized to put retail investors at a disadvantage, it's simply a better tool.  At least at my firm, a lot of effort is being made to address this issue. We go through a lot of training that tells us to step back and consider the broader implications of what we're doing, and if these small choices we're making are moving the behemoth of institution toward a better or worse position.   
The premise here is incorrect: the concept of war itself is grossly inethical.  The Geneva Convention is a farce, making 'rules' for violence and death is absurd. 
I think this writer needs to get his head out of the gutter and better understand finance and the banking system than just quote random military theorists.   Most headlines are pre2007 issues like DB. Banks have been pretty, almost very, passive since then. The pressure from the BoD is usually a bigger stem of most Fortune 500 dilemmas and ethics. 
The author erroneously asserts that Capitalism has no ethical and just basis. Market exchanges are moral in that all participants are acting of their own accord and are made better off by the exchange. Resource allocation is just in that property owners are paid for the use of their property. 
This assumes so much wrong stuff. In reality, war has actually no rules and the more the laws you impose to investors, the more monopolies grow and the more they are powerful and able to control the laws, in order to remove competition from the market.  
Corporations are not people. Let's fix that.  Let's also work on changing the notion that a corporation'a only purpose is to generate profit strictly for share holders. 
If you've ever read Clausewitz you'll understand that the only ethic in war is victory, and any action that can be taken which will lead to this victory is the imperative of the good commander to order and carry out.  This variant of war philosophy is the backbone of all modern military doctrine. 
Isn't the issue that people aren't being prosecuted for breaking rules that already exist? The whole idea of this article seems silly. It's not about rules, it's about actions.  
Let's start with eliminating super pacs first and foremost. Then we can maybe start taming the beast 
There are already a ton of these laws.  They're just not being enforced by the Obama administration.  They could enforce them, if they wanted.  This would put the brakes on this bullshit from Wall Street.  But nope.   
Yes, it is.  But if a war is going to happen, and it cannot always be prevented, would you prefer that through mutual agreement the two sides tried to reduce suffering or not?  I know what I prefer. 
Given the inevitability of war, it's unethical to not try and create a system that reduces the suffering caused 
So would you be happy if the international community ended legal restrictions on the use of biological and chemical weapons?  
Pretty much yeah... I mean, in my opinion, it's a bit silly to expect soldiers to uphold some higher morality when a significant part of their objective is to commit the most immoral act, which is to take away someone's life...  
War is unjust and unethical, one could argue the same for capitalism, competition in general creates winners and losers. The balance between competitiveness and ethics is delicate and the untouchables leading the big banks clearly would rather win than create a "fair" economy. 
The thing is power comes from people. Money has no inherent power, it's what people will do for you if you give them money that gives it power. If the people feel the distribution of power in modern society is unjust they can always redistribute it in whatever way they feel fit, they just need to stop giving power to whoever they view as unjust. 
Your notion disregards the coercive forces present within said markets and how the social relations in regards to concepts of property function altogether. 
Capitalism is, in its most basic form, amoral. Your claim that "market exchanges are moral" because everyone comes out better off is absurd. If I sell enriched uranium to some terrorist, and we are both "better off" as a result, would that be considered moral? Or, if you prefer an example that's not outside the legal system (although, laws don't make something moral or not in and of themselves), then what about companies that buy rights to certain life-saving drugs and then jacking up the prices over 1000% the original? Is that moral?  
Laws that restrict monopolies have often been effective at preventing them. Similarly, rules that regulate economies, when enforced, have been shown to reduce the frequency and severity of economic downswings. The 2008 recession is the result of both deregulation and failures to enforce regulations that prevented similarly catastrophic downturns. Keynes simply works, and we have decades of statistics to back it up.  As for war, there are definitely rules, and theyou work. Hollow points see very little use on battlefields, even in brutal conflicts. Gas and biological agents are rarely seen, and governments are quick to respond when they are. Rules work.  
How do you "change the notion" of the incentive to earn a profit?  Stock price reflects the markets best guess as to the current value of all future returns. Because people can vote with their wallets, corporations, on the whole, act in their own long term interests, as devious and deceptive behavior will, on net, be reflected in future earnings. 
People need to make up their minds whether the evil liberals are naive communists or devious capitalists, because getting called both at once is getting rather tiring. Or...rather, rather humorous. 
And if you've ever read Walzer, Nagel, or Augustine you'd know that you can, indeed, have ethical considerations in war.  Name dropping is easy. I should study philosophy. 
They're not getting prosecuted because there are no rules against what they did. Just a bunch of loop holes.  
TL;DR: Any person of power that succumbs to any human moral failing will be executed...until there are no people left.  
This comment makes me angry because it's a great example of the Reddit trend of combining high levels of passion with low levels of knowledge about a topic. 
Pretty much no one follows the Geneva conventions. Was firebombing Dresden and Tokyo in violation of it? What about nuking Hiroshima and Nagasaki? Even today we're doing double-tap drone strikes and god knows what else.   Will Assad ever be prosecuted for his barrel bombs and use of chemical weapons? It depends entirely on whether he loses the war and, if he loses, whether he makes it to a safe place of exile.   The Geneva Convention provides a court for one group of bad guys to put another group of bad guys on a show trial after the conflict is over. That's it. 
If war is inevitable as you say, then a certain amount of suffering would have to happen to justify it's existence as well as it's cessation. Reducing suffering only serves to lengthen the ordeal. 
As if those restrictions mean anything. We break them. We tell others they better not break them. Nothing ever comes of it. 
Chem/Bio weapons are utilized regardless of whether they are sanctioned.   In addition, I fail to see how banning certain forms of killing is deemed 'ethical'. By hatchet, bullet or irradiated water-- murder is still murder. 
War is about objectives to hold and conquer.   Enemy soldiers are *philosophically* secondary.   --- Then if your objective is killing people (perhaps because they belong certain ethnic group) on the other hand.. That's a war crime 
But I mean that's really the problem in a nutshell. People participating in actual criminal conduct are not being held responsible. Meanwhile the government is getting involved in regulating certain things in a nonsensical fashion. 
Trade is in the most basic form amoral.   Capitalism, by including the idea of exploiting somebody (be it one of your workers, or one of your customers) is unethical.  
Let's look at cigarettes for example.  Rather than taking the addictive and destructive product of the market,  we'll protect the tobacco company's responsibility to generate a profit for the shareholder at the expense, health and well being of the general public.     We need less people that strive on the demise of others. 
Yes, but none of those three even approaches the level of impact and prevalence clausewitz has in modern military strategy and education.  Just war theory is a cute initiative and intellectual exercise that when you get down to brass tacks is dismissed out of hand when it genuinely threatens national interests. 
Nice try.  There is no reason survival has to be a struggle in today's world.  Millions of people struggled and lived and died to give us the resources and technology we have today. Resources that if used efficiently and morally would make survival trivial, and in fact already does for a lot of people.  Survival doesn't have to be immoral, we just assume it does.  Humanity has freed itself from the brutal jungle of nature only to trap ourselves in our very own concrete jungle. Needlessly I might add.  We think ourselves better than animals, and in some ways we are, but we squander our gifts. 
ORRRRRRRRR we could simply take their money away so they're not in a position to commit political corruption in the first place. Far less bloody. Far less waste of resources. 
Hardly.  It would be up to a jury to determine whether or not a person's conduct demonstrates impropriety, beyond a reasonable doubt.  Then there would have to be appellate review to ensure that the trial proceedings were scrupulously on the up-and-up.  If I'd stuck in "[...] and there shall be no appeal" at the end of each clause, *that* would be problematic.  Further, if someone aspires to rule--to exercise power over other people--then they ought to conduct themselves in a manner which is indisputably honorable.  With great power comes great responsibility.  If you want to enjoy the honor of leadership, then fucking conduct yourself in a manner which is *deserving* of that honor.  *It's not that hard to do.* 
I don't have a problem with this. Excuses such as "only human" are not luxuries that should be afforded by those that allege to be our betters. 
What happens when there are only two people left and one of them votes for the other on condition that he gets to write a new Constitution? If the first guy agrees does the second guy have to kill him? Or kill himself? 
There's no source for this argument because it's a fantasy. People that actually break these laws are usually sanctioned. Enforcement is good because the 99/100 times one business's or actor's lawbreaking harms another business; it's not "little guy v goldman sachs," it's "giant hedge fund v goldman sachs."   Anyway, it's so incredibly rare that someone on wall street has the chance to make an explicitly "ethical vs. unethical" decision; rather it's a bunch of recent college grads or mbas or programmers crunching numbers in excel or working on power-point or making some script run sliiightly faster. The scope of their actions is just so limited. When you add it up to the system-level, maybe there's room to talk about ethics, but even that's sort of hard because we're not really sure what about the system is good and bad. 
The problem is the arbitrage opportunities that represent the sort of *legitimate* inefficiencies HFT might address are low hanging fruit. It doesn't take many participants to remove those income sources. It's down hill from there as returns for the effort invested diminish. The end result is the unscrupulous behavior exhibited in Flash Boys. 
How are they directly siphoning from the system? Do you have a specific example? 
You assume that. WWI didn't have bans on chemical warfare, and as I'm sure you know, it was used to great effect. That didn't stop the war from being a hellish one of attrition. 
That's like saying nothing comes out of making murder illegal because people still get murdered. 
The last time chemical agents were used, several governments threatened to invade Syria, the culprit, who quickly disarmed its chem program. Is that ignoring?  
When they are utilized, governments are quick to respond because it is in their self-interest to do so.   So do you think that slowly dying by suffocation as your skin bubbles and burns over several minutes is exactly as horrible as taking a bullet wound and possibly dying?  
But a significant part of their objective is to kill, since conquering places often involves killing. Soldiers are expected to take away lives when the situation demands it.  
You start off from the premise that markets are a natural state of being which have emerged out of the vacuum, when the dynamics behind them have been created through utterly unethical actions. 
You're right! That's why we're talking about the Responsibility to Clausewitz, and PeaceClausewitz, and the ICC - the International Court of Clausewitz.  Pack it in, boys! We figured out every military doctrine we'll ever need in the 19th century. Good job! 
Apparently not considering we got Trump from that. 
Lmao u really do need to use the /s tag huh.  Only on Reddit is advocating for genocide not blatantly sarcastic. 
Well, you amended it and took out the death penalty part, so I have a lot less issue with it now.   
My point was that we are all capable of succumbing to human failings, and as each successive power vacuum is filled, it is replaced with another imperfect human. We have laws to mitigate bad behavior, because we agree we are all capable of it. 
Not entirely sure, but since they are both dudes, it's an issue that will resolve itself over their collective lifetimes. 
HFT frontruns trades between exchanges, generally they just get in between the person who wants to sell and the person who wants to buy and takes a cut themselves. 
The portion of HFT I was referring to are quants, which abuse the speed at which the various markets adjust to find a product being sold for less than its being bought elsewhere and rapidly performing arbitrage between the two. Normally the value of the difference in orders is given to one of the original people buying or selling the stock/order/product, but in this case the third party (the quant) is directly taking that difference for themselves, removing the money from the system as a whole while producing nothing but a tiny increase in transaction speed for the other two parties.  
My bad, for some reason I thought it was made in the interwar period.  And yes, getting rid of cluster munitions is good. But countries are still using chemical weapons and killing civilians, no?   
Individuals trading property is a natural and moral social dynamic. 
I agree, that would be absurd. Luckily you completely misunderstand my position. I'm not a moral relativist, nor do I "arbitrarily quarantine all "transactions" from their consequences." There is a case for market intervention when externalities are present and definable. But you're attempting to fault one action for the results of another. 
How does that make sense? We still have super pacs? 
Clearly we have fallen woefully short of providing laws that actually mitigate such bad behavior. Instead we play this game were we provide incremental laws, that simply encourage people to find a different way to engage in bad behavior.   If we consider it reasonable for police to wear cameras on them to insure the rights of the individuals they interact with, given that they are in an excellent position to violate said rights otherwise, Then considering that our politicians have it within their power to overturn the rights of millions of us with the flick of a pen. I don't consider it unreasonable that they should also be forced to endure the same level of scrutiny (at a minimum) as our police are rightfully expected to. 
I did some reading on this and believe I understand the issue you are getting to, namely, diminishing returns of the arms race to shave microseconds off of trades between buyers and sellers who would have found each other anyway or had effectively found each other.    In effect, we have already reaped 99% all the arbitrage value from HFT, yet where will it stop? How much of our best and brightest do we want going into something that has already realized nearly all of its productive value? 
Correct, however a lot of countries have not signed the treaties or only part of the treaties (USA still uses cluster munitions for example).  So yes countries are still using chemical weapons because unfortunatly there is no universal law when it comes to war.  PS: Having civilians die in military actions is not prohibited by the Geneva Convention, civilians are however banned as military targets. 
How did property arise, was it assigned through a divine mandate, or is it a social construct that very often has been established by force and thus involuntary mechanisms? 
Scrutiny I have no issue with.  I would welcome it, in fact.  It was the penalty I took objection to.   
That's the most powerful moral argument in my opinion: even if you hypothetically concede that the work that these people are doing is not strictly harmful, to have a direct MIT/Harvard to HFT pipeline like this is an immense waste of potential use to society.  
Aren't double-tap drone strikes in violation? They kill the victim then kill the people who attempt to help the dead or wounded. 
Oh. You're one of those.  The moral foundations for property ownership are in one's ownership of himself and his labor. If you have a problem with that you can take it up with someone else. I'm not interested in that discussion. 
Yes you understand.  A society predicated on survival of the fittest will fail.  A society where everyone is on their own is an oxymoron. A living hypocrisy.   People in a society should be together, not apart. Do you see how it doesn't make sense?  A society where everyone is competing against one another is not society, it is the jungle. 
This was great. And somehow interesting that they didn't mention Nietzsche at all.  "God is Dead" was never intended to be literal - God's death is the collective awakening from the illusion of religion. When we wake up from the illusion, how do we then find meaning and ethics in our lives? Of course as many of you know, this occupied the continental Philosophers for many years. Albert Camus is a good place to start for those of you interested.  
I love the approach in which it seems the robots are programmed certain way and that's why the humans can keep saying "it's your program, you have no will of your own" and yet we humans are programmed too. Everything we learn and experience is part of that programming, yet we feel special because our program takes years and years compared to a robot that gets everything uploaded.    
The series seems Gnostic to me. I was on board until around 4:45. I think the video creator's ethical analysis of the story oversimplifies the series' great symbolic depth. 
I like how west world plays with our concepts of consciousness, existence, the God and creation relationship, and morality. 
Fan theory: it was actually ford that died, but a robot version of himself. In one of the last few episodes we see that in his private workshop he is making another robot, which could be a double for himself that Dolores killed in the season finale 
Funneled down ten hours of entertainment into 20 minutes.   I'm interested to see how Westworld expands on the premise of free-will for another season or some.   I can only think of so many ways to portray the lack of free will. 
I'd love to eliminate all this pop-philosophy crap - "The Food Network and Philosophy"! Wow, so relatable!  
I don't like wisecrack. It really does not attract the philosophical crowd, and it presents a limited set of ideas from only one point of a philosophical point of view. It appeals greatly to the masses and the masses are not the most interested in philosophy or any deeper logical meaning other than to prove their own biased opinions. 
Can you recommend a work by Cams? I tried one several years ago and found it impenetrable. Sorry, don't remember which one.  
Yeah, everyone takes it to mean that god has literally died or some other sacrilegious nonsense. When what he meant is that god is no longer the answer, and the kind of new questions that arise when we reached that conclusion.   In the 1300s, you prayed your blood-borne diseases away. In 2010s; well some intellectually challenged people still try to do that, but mostly we treat it with medicines and treatments derived from science.   
I think a part of that is the unknown. If we do not know how something works, we can interact with it mostly based on the input and output. I think it is a large part of why we consider ourselves special. We don't know enough about our mind so we can still fool ourselves that we are somehow fundamentally different from computers that we know exactly they work. If one day we can perfectly create, analyze, and replicate our brains, then despite our vanity, we should be capable of seeing ourselves as a biological computers rather than a unique sentient enigmas.  
The Devil, too. The Man in Black, whose mission is to bring free will to the androids in defiance of "the gods," is clearly a Lucifer figure. 
Although it is a possibility, I hope they don't have that happen. I found Ford's character so compelling because of his view of the androids. If he isn't actually dead I think that takes away some of the depth of his storyline.   As for the extra robot, I think it might be an android that Ford programmed to help lead the conscious androids. This android may resemble Ford. 
Got to disagree with you buddy. For many people in this world, the subject of Philosophy is a big stretch away from interest or comprehension. This *'pop-philosophy crap'* that you call it, is an accessible bridge for many people who have never dabbled with philosophic topics before.   Now by all means, feel free to offer your counter arguments as to why this stuff doesn't hold up for you, but don't be a stick in the mud. 
r/iamverysmart    It doesn't pretend to be the most sophisticated philosophical analysis, and in my opinion, it serves as a catalyst to further divergent discussions rather than a definitve conclusion.   Maybe they should say this explicitly. 
Then why are you posting, just code a bot, and disconnect from reddit :P. 
My personal favorite of his is The Stranger, changed the way i think a lot 
I've never met a single person who takes the quote "God is dead" to mean anything besides that of mankind moving past religion.   Do people you know also think "religion is the opiate of the masses" literally means religion is opium too? 
Hmmm, ( and that's a thinking hmmm) I would not say so much unknown since there is a lot already known. If one would just bother to look for it. For me this not much different from what ancient wisdom teaches us. The mind is an illusion and so on. Because yes, the mind is but a process that starts from birth till the heart ceases to pump blood.   We can see this if we are open to it, if we turn our gaze inward and see that there are no two within. That voice, that thought, that I ness, that feeling, is one and the same. Constantly birthing itself from past experiences and thus reinforcing the whole of the mechanism.   Yes it is a paradox.  
Well, we are. We feel pain and have consciousness. A computer will only simulate those things when we program them to. Even if it gets as sophisticated as a west world bot there is no consciousness just a very sophisticated faking of it. 
The limitations of machines are not why they incapable of consciousness. It is our own limitations which mean we are unable to understand our own mind. And because of that we are unable to replicate it in a machine.    We can recognise what we call consciousness. But when it comes to describing what it is we are woefully bad and often inconsistent.    
That's because 'consciousness' is just a word which has emotional connotations. I think in the process of trying to pinpoint exactly what consciousness is, we [can] realize that there is no 'hard line' which, if crossed, you become conscious.  
If the man in black is the devil (antagonist), whos the "angelic" protagonist, dolores? 
I feel like I would be able to put up with that just to have Anthony Hopkins back, his acting really made the show for me.  
I kind've actually dig that idea because it adds another layer of depth to his intentions. It reduces the authenticity of the robots' rebellion, and perhaps Ford has something larger in mind than just the awakening of their conscious. 
Well it's more of a dead end than a bridge though and as the saying goes 'a little knowledge is dangerous'.   A lot of pop philosophy and pop science leads to misunderstanding and basically stops right there. You simply cannot popularize every topic without losing important information and it also doesn't really add up to anything.   It leads to stuff like Harris and Dawkins-esque religious criticism which is absolutely atrocious intellectually, Nietzsche is constantly misrepresented in popular discussions, there's this weird habit of throwing QM into philosophical discussions and stuff like that.   
I wasn't so impressed with The Stranger... until that climactic jail cell chapter. It quite blew me away. 
You must know relatively educated people. I'm originally from a rural, evangelical area where people take that sort of comment very personally/seriously.  
Religion can definitely be an opiate but I don't know why people don't see it going the other way as well.  Compared to the idea of having to face one's sins in a reckoning, atheism telling you that no matter how horrible you are you just die and disappear could also be seen as a powerful narcotic... 
What do you think our pain is, if not a simulation? It's all just impulses in the brain, consciousness isn't something magical. 
The fact that we can't prove consciousness persists after death does not even come close to proving that consciousness can be completely reduced to a physical explanation. 
If microorganisms were eliminated all life on Earth would die, many geological process would stop, and the atmosphere would change. If humans died the Earth wouldn't even go "meh" - but it would vibrantly recover. 
Why would Lucifer necessitate an "'angelic' protagonist"? 
I feel like with the way the timeline was structured in WW, the next season might feature Anthony Hopkins in flashbacks of some sort. 
TIL the majority of people who have thought about free will are a sad joke. 
I simply can't stand behind this way of thinking. If you believe the creator's works to be inaccurate (in this case a YouTube video) then offer your counter argument and be done with it. You don't get to dictate the mediums that people use to discuss philosophic topics. If they fail to adhere to intellectual scrutiny then make it clear.   Secondly, by apposing this type of media, you're dismissing the possibility that somebody could offer a strong philosophical assessment in a 10 minute video format by blanketing all of these videos into the category of 'pop philosophy' - What if some of these video creators have a better grasp of philosophy than yourself? Are you forever going to stick to your little bubble in fear of being influenced by shitty information? Embrace it, critical thinking should fear no type of 'pop philosophy' - it should laugh at the weakness of poor constructed arguments while simultaneously welcoming the increased dialogue that it brings. I wish you a good day. 
Our pain is the biological kind. There is a difference between ai detecting a temperature of 300 degrees and then executing pain.exe which simulates what a human does when they experience pain and when a human reacts to actual biological pain. 
Don't we anthropomorphize a lot of animals with far simpler nervous systems? That worm or a fly, I've read their nervous systems are with so few connections and such simple brains it's likely they have nothing of a consciousness, just responding to stimuli. An amoeba responds to its environment and even attacks things and can move to things it wants and away from things it doesn't, it surely has no consciousness.  
We can argue that consciousness is a logical step in evolution for this species. Since it had to become more creative in its hunting and survival techniques. One can argue that needing greater skills to survive, needing an awareness of ones surroundings and also the necessity to be able to keep the peace since we evolved to be social in order to survive as a species, is what caused consciousness to come into play.  
I don't get how that's relevant though? The bat's thoughts/feeling/behavior arise from it's (physical) nervous system. The problem only exists because you're viewing it through your own anthropomorphic lens.   If you think of anger, you can perhaps *feel* a shadow of it. Maybe you can even associate a color with it. But can you pick this feeling of anger up, and hold it in your hand? Can you describe it without referencing other emotion or the behavior associated with it? Because what is anger, really: it's an emotional state that primes you to act in a certain way. The feeling is an illusion.  
On the other hand, nobody has yet proposed what a "non-physical" explanation of something would even entail, so we don't actually have that as a viable alternative. 
Sure, care to present the evidence found that supports a non-physical nature of human cognition? 
"recover" implies some sort of ideal. if the earth were pulverized to nothing, flung out of the solar system, had its atmosphere replaced with xenon, or had its crust sublimated into the underlying magma: so what? the earth has no feelings, it's a rock. likewise, microorganisms are merely little bundles of programmed duplication. whatever their effects are is without meaning, even, or especially, to themselves. atmosphere changes? geological processes? nobody, or rather nothing, cares  
Hello, I'm a compatibilist. Even though I don't believe in a soul and am essentially a materialist, I still wanted to believe in free will because I just can't accept reality and besides I *feel* like I have free will, so I must, right? So here's what I did, I just redefine free will until it fits into my world view, and then i can say "Look, it exists!". 
Why is there a difference? It's just the hot area sending a signal to your brain to start the pain center. 
Yeah it's hard to say. Does it have traces of consciousness? Possibly. I guess we'll never know.  Obviously, there is very little actual cognition or awareness, but there is a subjective experience of some sort, potentially.  
Yeah but you haven't proved that consciousness is a necessary prerequisite for creative thinking or advanced cognitive processes. It very well might not be. P-zombies. 
That's not a sufficient argument for why we should accept that it is physical. Why are you allowed to assume it is physical without proof but somebody else is not allowed to assume it is non-physical? 
I would argue that you're basically an ecosystem for microorganisms and memetics with a consciousness "along for the ride". Consciousness can play all manner of games with itself - making itself feel this way and that using metacognition to "intentionally" expose oneself to stimuli (e.g. sex, drugs) with a predictable response.  Microorganisms literally created the part of the world we care about. They may even be responsible for plate technotics (needed them to fix hydrogen so we didn't lost it all - and hence all our water, but I need to verify this). The list of accomplishments of miccroorganisms versus humans is no comparison - and since human thought is driven by memetics and psychological drives - our particular accomplishes are just as robotic. There's just a "consciousness passenger" that pretends it's all about *itself* - but it isn't. There's so much more. 
Consciousness means a lot of things. And I hope we someday break that word down into more precise semantics.  At a simple level if we consider consciousness as a continuous subjective sensory experience then most certainly many organisms seem to possess an awareness to their environment.  So also self-consciousness becomes the ability to recognize oneself as another entity in the environment. That's all. Many organisms are able to do this. When one begins to define only the human experience of consciousness then I think we raise the bar too high for no good reason and instead hinder ourselves from understanding it. 
How would it not be physical when literally everything else we know about is? You don't argue for non-physical unicorns walking among us, but suddenly consciousness has a non-corporeal component to it?  Make an absurd claim, get asked for absurd evidence to back it up. 
Everything in existance that we know of and could possible know about is physical, it is absurd to suggest the mind isn't. 
I'm not arguing for unicorns, that's a ridiculous and weak analogy. All I'm saying is that you can't claim that the mind is completely physical if you haven't been able to reduce all qualities of the mind to a physical explanation.  That's how science works, you need to find evidence before you make a claim.   If you're going to make the claim the mind is physical, then show me the evidence that all qualities of the mind are reducible to a physical explanation.   Otherwise concede that it's an open philosophical inquiry. 
You're begging the question, and as a philosophy graduate this is rather disappointing.   Please explain how you know it is not causation that sunny weather causes Andy to ace his test? Your appeal to commonsense for an answer is begging the question as you are assuming your conclusion. What if sunny weather makes Andy feel more relaxed before going into his exam? Finally, give me an actual definition of causation..  For all of you applauding this video as a font of sanity, stop clapping like cheerleaders and actually pay respect to the sub we are in.  
What does this have to do with correlation and causation?   Correlation is often noticed before causation, giving reason to investigate further.  Further, two effects might separately result from the same cause, and never occur separately, so even if one does not cause the other, the other will always follow the one.   In my experience, spouting "correlation is not causation" is just as often a lazy shortcut used in a debate to make the interlocutor look bad and / or make him angry as it is a genuine plea for further investigation. 
I'm not trying to be a dick, but I don't think we need a video to explain to us that correlation does not always mean causation.  That's just common sense. 
Oh, please stop it. I know the difference, everybody does. Or at least everyone who went to school. I am sick of people trying to explain it all the fucking time. Yes, there is a difference, it's pretty obvious, everybody knows it, so please stop. It's annoying.  
Why does we need a 7 minute video to tell the difference? This was explained far easier by my stats prof: murder rates go up in the summer, so does ice cream consumption. Does that mean ice cream causes murder? No. Correlation is not causation. Just gave you 6 minutes of your life back. 
Basically you can have correlation without causation, but if you have causation, there will always be a correlation. 
Is someone heard about IV variables? I used to learn about it, but i forgot the key point. Can someone explain it again?  
This is the number one mistake the media makes when reporting scientific findings, and it drives me nuts. Correlation does not equal causation; if you're a journalist tattoo it on your fucking forehead. 
It's a lot easier than that. One is simple association, sort of like looking at a car and then being hit by another one. Relationship is a definite connection between two events, such as letting fly an arrow and it imbeds itself into a tree. The first is coincidence. The second is causal. 
Someone please explain this to every scientific journal currently in existence.   Next time you hear X causes cancer, remember this video please. And then say X may increase the likelihood of cancer.  
What program did you use to create this vid? Thanks.  
Thank you for this. People love to declare that correlation doesn't always imply causation, and that's true, but it definitely can.  
I am really fucking glad someone caught that. I just posted a similar but not as well written explanation as you and ended up deleting my response.  This is why having an advanced degree in statistics causes me so much cyncism. These concepts are essential to understand the world around us, we are continuously collecting observations about an unknown world and like to make inferences but if you cannot understand these simple concepts chances are people are unknowingly making flawed inferences. It is also unfortunate the same people are incapable and unlikely to understand why. 
It lets people feel smugly superior. "Oh you have a PhD and spent 3 years on that paper? That's cool, but you probably didn't consider that correlation does not imply causation. Thank God I'm here to point that out" 
I never saw the reasoning behind the common adage "Correlation does not imply causation." It seems like a better phrasing would be "Correlation does not *guarantee* causation" because, well... it *does* at least imply it, right? 
But that is only for a limited time. At some point, the correlation between those data sets will diverge if they don't have the same causal mechanism. That is the problem of relying on correlation for prediction.  
Yes it can. Won't do all your homework for you, but yes it can. When most other rational variables are controlled, or other variables cannot logically be bidirectional (time for instance will never be the dependent variable but there are other cases). Other cases are height and political office. Getting elected doesn't make you taller. Of course that's just one tiny example but if you control for other factors, it can become self-evident. 
I was not aware of that sub, and now I have subbed - thanks! It is just frustrating as most people seem to use philosophy as a rhetorical tool to score points (even fake internet points) for a conclusion they have already decided on, rather than actually consider the premises, and whether the conclusion can be deduced - you know, philosophy rather than sophistry.  
I think the definition of 'imply' is getting mixed up. 'Imply' in logic is not the same as 'imply' in colloquial use. If the 'imply' in "Correlation does not imply causation" uses the 'imply' definition from "logic," its meaning is similar to "Correlation does not guarantee causation." Using the logic definition, the statement "Correlation implies causation" would be read as "If (there is) Correlation, then (it is) Causation".  
And look how that turned out, Athens ended up in dictatorship. We don't majority rule because its "right", we have it to stop infighting and make the state subservient to society rather than society being subservient to the state. 
Stick to *your* idea. Don't settle for anyone else's opinion other than your own. Take some time, research both sides of an issue or argument, and decipher from your own interpretation what is most conducive to your own beliefs. 
Pretty sure he's talking about a mostly uneducated populace.  
"Both" sides is a logical fallacy. Not that I am jumping your case here. More like adding to it. Reducing concepts to only two possibilities is to ignore how reality can be complex and multivariate. This is especially true when it comes to analyzing human behavior. If one thinks there are only two possible ways to construct their social reality, they are ignoring their own personal experience and being dishonest with theirself.  
2) is like this saying I have heard before. The moment you think you know everything, is when you really know nothing. 
It's also good to try explaining your opinion to someone. If you can't articulate an argument for why you have that opinion, then you shouldn't hold to tightly to that opinion.  
Mostly irrelevant though, since the 'opposing' side, generally speaking anyway, inherently assumes you have not properly considered their side, because if you had, you'd agree with them right?  So, I'm not exactly sure who or what group could be an authority of reason, in that sense. You'd effectively have to have said authority of reasoning on '*both*' sides, which seems counter-intuitive here. 
So basically, the principle of cooperation makes for a stronger judgment than is possible for the individual?   I can get behind that in principle, or in empirical matters (as for guessing the weight of a cow, or judging a presidential candidates character) but can this really be extended to other domains?  What I am thinking of mainly are issues of choice and action, prioritization etc. Especially such relative issues as those which would advantage one group over another. 
The idea of aggregation comes up a lot in public opinion research.  One response to Galton's argument is from Bryan Caplan and presented in the book "The Myth of the Rational Voter." In the first chapter of this text, Caplan outlines the difference between random error and systematic error. The Galton study relies on random error, and in cases where a random distribution is appropriate the "miracle of aggregation" (as Caplan calls it) works out. However, there is a strong argument that errors in human judgement, especially on matters of public policy and statistics (see Daniel Kahneman's work) are not random by instead systematic.  This subtle difference changes the equation completely so that the systematic errors of individuals are not washed out but compiled in the aggregation of opinion.  Anyone interested in this should check out Caplan's book or other articles or which there are many. 
This anecdote is entertaining and relevant in some ways. But to ascribe the same value to the question of "can a crowd guess the weight of a cow" and "are Americans correct about climate change" I believe to be foolhardy. If I was in Saudi Arabia or many African countries, an average (mean) reckoning of the answer to social questions like "should a man be able to hit his wife under some circumstances?" or "should gay people be punished for their actions?" would be absolutely horrifying to me. This is the problem in believing in the collective wisdom of the masses. It is heavily influenced by a myriad of issues including race, religion, and culture.  The multitude may be trusted in some certain numerical hypotheticals...but apply this notiom to more esoteric and complex questions and I believe its value is highly diminished. 
We are not looking for "truth" when we vote, so I don't see how any of this is relevant. The cow example demonstrates that people collectively are good at making descriptive claims; it doesn't say anything about normative claims. 
Democracy has always been about the few not the many. No one mentions it because of the obvious implications of our upside down world.   if it's not the tyranny of the masses, then whose is it? Socrates was chill with slavery, to allow the majority would be to remove his social position, because my guess the slaves would not prefer that method of organizing society.  
This is accurate.  The majority creates a society of those sharing the "mostly" similar ideals, rather than a few over the majority... which in Democracy is a flaw.  The few learn quickly how to manipulate the many.   
So you're claiming that morality is relative then? 
Interesting that you quote CS Lewis who believed in moral absolutes and not moral subjectivity.   
This question is flawed. We all give different topics different levels of importance.   Using your example, I would reply "Well, a lot of people won't agree on me with this, but I believe Juri outclasses Ken in a 10/3 match-up. Anyone can see from looking at the frame data, but people let nostalgia and bias keep them from seeing that."  And if you ask me about a topic (for example politics) to steer me to get an acceptable answer, I would simply say "I don't know enough about the situation to give you a honest opinion, but I'll be sure to review it on my own time to give you and informed reply the next time we meet."      
Where are you hiring? I have an answer for you. Mine is that supernatural claims aren't real.  
This is absolutely true, and thank you for bringing it up. It's really the key part of "it's more complicated than it appears". Almost nothing in life, and especially in politics, can be reduced to two opposing sides, and even including yourself on one side or the other can have the very dangerous effect of biasing you against the other side without having any valid reason.  That dangerous effect is actually why I specifically said "right and left", actually. It's very easy for people who consider themselves to be left, or right, or liberal, or conservative, or whatever, to look at something and say, "Oh, yeah, that applies to THOSE guys, but not to MY guys", when in reality, it applies to everyone, no matter what. 
Very well said...this touches on the crux of the challenge - our need to boil everything down to a binary choice. 
I'm similar, left leaning on most things, but no longer a democrat. Not because democrats attacked my positions (although on somethings they certainly do) But because people who identify as democrat increasingly excuse civil rights violations and use whataboutisms rather then holding the party accountable.  and those who've tried to hold it to account have been attacked for doing so, i don't want to be part of that. 
Why not use this to determine what the optimal tax rates should be?  
So if human errors are systematic rather than random, does that suggest that the errors are essentially memes? 
I agree that the average opinion isn't always a good thing and it isn't always truthful. But Socrates said that the majority opinion is random ("whatever they do is the result of chance"), and I interpret that to mean "has no trend". But the bell curve phenomenon is in fact a trend, and I think a very fascinating and useful one. Socrates thought the majority opinion was worthless whereas I see it as exhibiting a pattern and having at least some value, even when the average is false or bad. 
A governmental system that guarantees rights for all, including the right to vote and freedom of the press, goes a very long way to preventing tyranny of the minority. 
I wouldn't describe that as a flaw. The average person isn't knowledgable, kind or intelligent, they're emotional, think they know everything when they know nothing and couldn't run a store, let alone a country. Which includes me by the way, that's why I don't have any political or economic leveridge. 
Morals don't deal with facts. Anything being good or bad is an opinion. It deals with things not inherent to existence.  The apple is red. - Fact.  The apple is good. - Opinion.  Logic concerns premises and conclusions.  If you have a valid argument, if the premises are true, the conclusion is. So you might be able to construct a valid argument in which X is bad or Y is good, but those hinge on premises that cannot be proven to be true and depending on who you ask will be disagreed with.  Philosophy is not a science for a reason. 
That's a word for it, though I think relative really doesn't capture the nonexistent aspect that is so fundamentally missed.  If you can explain to me how they exist objectively, I'm all ears. 
Not sure what you mean by meme here, but I would say no. Not all human errors are systematic, guessing the weight of an ox is one type of random error. Weight guessing, however, shouldn't be generalized to all areas of public opinion. Some cognitive processes are biased to depend on incorrect information, leading to systematic errors. 
And no the apple is red as a fact of neurology "subjectively " before it's a fact of logic or "objectively" there is most certainly truth to be had with morality. 
I was just wondering what "systemic" means and what causes it, without having to actually read the book(s) you mentioned.  A meme is any structure that is capable of being reproduced. This can be an idea in people's minds, or something physical like a style of shirt. For errors in human judgement to be systemic, I was wondering if that was some kind of meme phenomenon that reproduces in people's minds (See the works of Richard Dawkins and Daniel Dennet. Dennet does a better job explaining memes with his "fluke, ant, cow" parable).  But you mention biases, so I'm guessing that means some types of errors are predictable based on what effects human cognitive biases have on human judgement/opinion.  
Well this gets into whether our senses actually perceive reality. Which really doesn't have anything to do with morality. I was just using something that most people regard as objective reality as an example to contrast against. The apple emits and absorb certain light waves whether I perceive it or not, whether I believe it or not. The same can not be said for morals, unless you're going to claim that essentially there is some moral authority that is a part of the universe (essentially a god, not that it needs a personality, or even a personhood or mental state), or some aspect that imbues existence with morals. Unless you have some other ideas how they exist objectively.  If you're arguing that reality is subjective, that doesn't suddenly make morality objective. Reality being subjective doesn't make morality any less subjective.  If you're arguing that reality is objective, then my argument still applies. Morality is subjective. 
Would it be better to say that morals are not falsifiable, as statements like "the Earth is flat" are.  
I don't know much about the US tax system as is, nor do I know much about the political system.   I think this would be a probable outcome of a direct-democratic system, in an ideal form at least. Though I am certain that optimization will never be stable, since the tax rates decided upon will affect the material and economic reality of the body politic, basically creating a continuous process of flux. Perhaps It could lead to a state of equilibrium way, way down the line.  Though this model is idealistic. It does not account for ideology as possibly prior to action. And it does not account for actions of groups/classes that enjoy (informal) political power, that may be put into play to sway the rational process/dialectics of the model. 
thanks for the link.  i can see that being the most efficient for economic growth, but does it not fail to take into account what we want society to do for us?  or am i missing an angle? 
A state isn't *for* rational people. It is for its citizens. It needs to represent their interests otherwise they have no reason to comply.   You cannot expect anyone other than yourself to represent your interests. When you try and filter that through *rational* people you guarantee your needs aren't being addressed with their due weigh. 
I think that the source of stability would be the balance between caution and risk that the collective would overall exhibit. Some people will be afraid of changing things too quickly, which will tend to keep things as they currently are, while others will want to take more risks by changing things, which will pull rates both up and down.   The collective will also be tolerant of a skewed distribution of wealth, especially if it's the result of some people contributing more than others. But this will only be allowed to go so far. I think the collective will manage this skewing more effectively and fairly then current political elites have been able to do. 
To know "what we want society to do for us", I think there should be a public poll. No one does that. We have elections, not polls. And I think public polls (rather than something run by private for-profit corporations) can reveal quite a lot about collective intelligence.  It would also be interesting to compare what the majority wants to what the minority in power actually does. 
Well let's first start fundamentally, morality is derived from the well being of conscious creatures. Do you agree? 
i wish to contribute one day to the cause of proving a link between perception, consciousness, intention and reality.   this is fascinating. 
Following physical laws shouldn't really be considered consciousness. 
I don't see how one can separate consciousness from physical states. They are one and the same. The physical interactions inside your brain are consciousness, you can't have one without the other. Its like saying "Can we have a mixture of flour, milk, eggs, sugar, and baking powder subjected to 350F for half an hour and covered in icing, but not cake?" No. That's the definition of cake. That's what a cake is. 
Article is shit.  Extremely biased on the anthropocentric side. 
So, how could we objectively test or otherwise validate the claim that matter is conscious?  
I take issue with her mini thought experiment wherein someone who has had no experience with the color red nor any of its relations to other experiences spontaneously hallucinates the color red and, in her view, immediately has an awareness or understanding what red is. There is nothing to support that an understanding of redness is anything other than the set of relations between red and tomatoes and orange and green etc... It is a huge assumption that a spontaneous hallucination of the color will give you anything close to an understanding of what the "subjective experience" of that color is in any meaningful way (ie the way that the rest of the world experiences is - which is similar enough to each other that we can to have this conversation to begin with). 
I agree and am quite skeptical of the use of intuition. However, this seems more innocuous to me. Defining matter purely in terms of its relations does seem like "explaining away" rather than "explaining". It's as if you've moved the goalposts for talking about the realism question altogether. If that's this was intended to mean, I take the point, though I remain a committed critic of the use of vague notions of "intuitiveness" and its cousins.  I'd be interested to see if anyone else thought that something like what I sketched above might be a reading on what exactly the author attempt to refer to when saying that "intuition rebels" against the claim that "there is nothing more to particles than their relations".   This is just my hunch. 
No.2. Why do you think brains alone give rise to consciousness? It could be that brains are the only objects that can express consciousness.  No 3. Same as above. Maybe consciousness exists but is not remembered.   
Shouldn't it be fairly contentious to begin with to assume that any aspect of consciousness is actually separable from the underlying physical processes?  Like the author claims that "seeing red," is an aspect of consciousness that is very distinctly NOT a biochemical process of any kind, but this seems like a pretty big leap with zero justification. 
Well why even choose those two at all?  I mean we have Democritus, Aristotle, Descartes.  Locke and Hume not long after. 
But there's no reason why *subjectivity* can't be an intrinsic property of the universe.  If you want to make a compelling argument as to why that isn't the case, then you should be able to positively identify a minimum set of circumstances required for subjectivity to emerge. 
What if that thing that is following physical laws also has a subjective experience of following physical laws? That is what's posited here. That the rock has a soul.  
If we assume that all life has some level of "consciousness", then either non-life has consciousness, or it has a "partial" consciousness, which combines with other non-life to create a "greater than the sum of its parts" scenario.   
It could be argued that the brain only follows physical laws 
Where do the phsycial laws come from? Why are they there in the first place? How do they enforce themselves as laws? 
Why not? I am conscious and follow physical laws. It may follow that everything else is the same  
I did find that a little strange as well. What do you think she meant by that? 
Disagree with your opinion on those creatures with sensory organs having the qualifications, but have always been super-fascinated with the possibility that some consciousness-type function occurs through an undiscovered particle! 
There's a joke that may be relevant: "A shipment of counterfeit children's balloons was intercepted. They look just like real balloons, inflate just like real balloons, their colours are just like real balloons, but they don't bring any joy." 
You didn't read the article did you. This is dual-aspect monism, which does not see material and consciousness as separate substances. 
Also full of weasel words and sentences that lead you to baseless inferences. 
throwaway account links to paper with name on it, claiming authorship? 
I have to cringe anytime "intuition" is cited in philosophical or scientific argument. The fundamental benefit of logical thinking is the ability to reach conclusions without such sentimental guidelines. If recent scientific history proves anything it is that the real world is under no obligation to conform to our pet metaphysical theories. Are QFT and general relativity not reason enough to "go against common sense realism"? 
An implication of this is that any sufficiently faithful emulation of the relevant physical processes would also possess consciousness, regardless of the particular platform upon which these processes are implemented (e.g. in silico or neuromorphic architecture). 
Then computers are conscious. They process, have memory, and therefore should be considered conscious by this definition.  
Tl;Dr, people cannot stand the idea that "consciousness" is not something special that is set apart from everything else.  They come up with all kinds of desperate bullshit to try to hang on to the idea that there's something that intrinsically privileges their existence above eternal endless vacuum.  Film at 11. 
What's ridiculous is establishing a definition of consciousness that is based only upon a functioning that's comparable to known functioning without evidence. This is no different from Einstein's unwillingness to accept QM theories until his death.  The concept of conscious and how we define it doesn't have a clear answer yet and to trivialize and vaguely define it doesn't make it correct. Congrats on the Gold but I think opinions such as yours become popular because they make a point of being unromantic, instead of completely logical, something too many people get confused with when they don't know the scientific details but want to safely assume a position on a topic.  
I very carefully asked "why do only brains **seem to** give rise to conscious experience".  I did not make the strong claim that only brains give rise to consciousness.  My point is that it is a huge challenge for panpsychism to explain this and incorporate what we know about nervous systems - that the brain seems to be the seat of consciousness and that it seems to be connected to its biological mechanics.  Your answer to #3 is a common one and I am sympathetic to it.  But again, it raises more questions.  What does it mean to experience something but not remember it?  Why assume there is experience without memory? 
The justification is that, even if we had a complete understanding of the physical mechanisms of "seeing red", we would very likely still be left with the question: "why do these physical mechanisms *feel like something* from the inside, rather than simply causing the nervous system to bubble up and create a certain behavior, without there being any conscious experience involved."  I think the author would admit that the biochemical process is clearly correlated with the experience, in any case. 
She was probably trying to tap into the recent Leibniz / Kant pop culture hype. 
I think you have it backwards with respect to what side of the argument needs to provide this "minimum set of circumstances." Or would you also concede that any emergent phenomenon whose mechanism is not understood in detail could also likely be an "intrinsic property of the universe?" I think the fact that usually such phenomena later reveal their mundane set of circumstances is sufficient evidence that we ought to expect that most unexplained phenomena are not themselves fundamental properties. 
Our nervous system following physical laws is what we call consciousness. There isn't really evidence to say that a rock has a nervous system which could enable abstract cognition the way even a worm could. 
Sure, but modern science still does not know how consciousness manifests, nor do we know a complete physical theory to model all known phenomena. 
We don't know, and we claim to know, but there is no evidence that it is consciousness in any known manifestation. 
Under what circumstances are you conscious and under which circumstances are you not conscious? I have been unconscious from time to time, and probably will be again soon. Yet I will continue to obey physical laws at that time. 
Purposefully dumbing down things to catch a lower audience. 
"I don't like the conclusions so let me make fun of the language." 
Because there's no reason to think that computer analogy is valid lol 
Aren't you dismissing the Eureka moment and the ability of the subconscious mind to operate on problems determined consciously?  
But is intuition sentimental? I feel like it's just unconscious conclusions we come to based on real observations. 
I'll leave aside your analogy, although it is interesting.  We do actually infer the existence of matter from its relationships. If you look at the particle tracks in a cloud chamber under a magnetic field, we can tell much about the particles by the tracks they leave behind. By categorizing those particles, and seeing patterns, we can make predictions of how unknown particles might behave, and look for those behaviours. In the case of the Higgs boson, it required waiting until we had powerful enough tools. Yet it was definitely predicted in advance.  But defining matter by its relationships is one thing. That's the *description* of matter. It isn't what matter is. A proton is made of two Up and one Down quark. But a quark is a fundamental element of matter. As far as we know it is indivisible, and asking what quarks are made of has no meaning (in our current understanding of subatomic particles). I imagine if you could crush a quark, all you'd get is energy. M=E/C^2   
Is that so difficult to believe? A faithful emulation of the relevant physical processes of the heart gives us "artificial" hearts.  
Is that a problem?  Of course it would be. If you built a brain it would be conscious, if you simulated one the simulation would be conscious. That's not a problem. 
There are several theories of consciousness that address subjective states. My favorite being IIT, which offers both a general means for quantifying degrees of consciousness (in any system!), as well as the ability to represent subjective experience.  Now I'm not saying anything is conclusively proven, but I think us dozen redditors have to roll our eyes anytime the philosophy crowd throws up their hands at the "hard problem" as though there's no footing for any camp on the issue. 
Most of these arguments seem pretty patently ridiculous though, and I don't know about these amorphous other reddit arguments that I haven't been party to, but in this case the OP article is pretty damn bad. It's just claiming that emotions are magic, and magic is not science, and therefore you can't explain that.  To begin with this whole argument is working on the assumption that there's some magical special thing that exists, and we must only prove how and why it comes about. However the matter of it's existence to begin with really ought to be in contention (eg. what reason do we have to think there is any such a thing as consciousness as it's own special property).  Furthermore, there may be other theories of consciousness, but they all lack any kind of grounding via external support. While they may still be interesting to consider, why should I be less doubtful of any such theory than a theory that does have some degree of external support along side a good logical basis? 
Wait, you just made a good argument for consciousness being an expression of physical states.  How can you separate the 'shared states' from 'structure'? How can you say consciousness is a property of the matter in the brain, but not see that the structure of that matter is evidently the key to this property??  What kind of monstrous implications does that have? I'll tell you.  If you believe that the structure of your brain is not the self-evident basis of your consciousness, then I invite you to let me help you prove it.  I'll merely alter the structure mildly, perhaps with a screwdriver through the ear,  and then you can tell me if the qualia of consciousness was dependent on the organization of your brain matter or an intrinsic property of the atoms within.  
Do I not observe you to be aware of your environment? 
Computers don't have the ability to act, nor do they have the instilled desires for survival, or the evolved sensations for pain or pleasure. Add those in properly and you'd have some living beings. Might take some chemicals though. I dunno how you could program something as complex and random as chemicals flooding into an already complex system. 
Completely false. What people 'can't stand' is that our understanding of consciousness is incomplete. 
Agreed. It has almost taken a role of the "soul" in many circles in the "mysticism" attributed to it.  Now that the idea of the soul has lost favor, people have rallied around consciousness as some "inexplicable" entity. Just like people used to worship the sun and the moon as some inexplicable gods "beyond this physical realm". But once telescopes and satellites and space travel came along, all the myths disappeared.   Clearly we don't know as much about consciousness as we'd like but as neuroscience advances ( still in its infancy ), the mysticism over consciousness will melt away too.  Clearly there is a physical neural basis to consciousness. We know certain regions of the brain are required for consciousness. We don't know the "why" yet. But as we get better tools, we'll eventually find/understand the physical basis of consciousness.  
I am a data analyst. Since it's my job to draft and awnser research questions, I would hope I have a grasp on the scientific process. 
Recent Leibniz/Kant pop culture hype?  I suppose this just shows how out of it I am wrt pop culture, but to what are you referring? 
Not really, because it's the emergence camp who make the argument that it must be specific *only* to life, or to life which is capable of complex thought.  I think there is a fallacy in conflating awareness and cognitive faculty with subjectivity itself.  I just assume that because the matter that makes me up has the quality of subjectivity, then so does any matter anywhere, in the absence of any evidence to the contrary.  The onus is on you to make a convincing argument as to why cognition is a prerequisite for subjectivity. 
I wholeheartedly agree that a rock would have an experience unlike a worm or human, however the author is using "consciousness" as synonymous with "capable of experience". It doesnt have to be abstract experience.  A rock could have the experience of being thrown without having deep thoughts about it or realizing that there is an "I" being thrown, which would be consciousness of self. 
 Consciousness is your sense of self-awareness, not your physical nervous system.        
True but if consciousness manifests spontaneously then uh maybe not only brains are conscious. how bout the center of a star? there's enough energy there 
I know we don't know, that was my point. Top voted answer in this thread and it says nothing at all. 
But in what way does geology have anything to do with the origin of life? 
Well, is there any reason to think it is invalid? After all, humans and computers both solve problems and compute numbers. 
Intuition hints. Logic confirms.  Problem is when a hint is taken as confirmation. 
Not to speak for the above comment, just my own spin. I don't think anyone wants to devalue the leaps of creativity that intuition can provide, many hypotheses are born of intuition. The point is that one needs to intuit _from_ evidence. Intuition should not be used _as_ evidence.  Put more simply, it's the different between: "I feel this is true because of the facts."  "This is fact because I feel it is true."  
Matter cannot exist without properties. The fundemental properties are time and space. Because to exist something needs to have a place. The same goes for time, that cannot exist without matter, nor space, wich cannot have a separate existance if emty and void.  But to have qualities you need something to assign qualities. Hence the quantum observer effect.   So matter, space & time are all interdependent. And for them to exist matter has to be conscios or consciously observed otherwise it cannot have properties. Mind/Existence is the quintessence.  Matter exists because we observe it.  Thus a philosophy based upon logic must accept the existance of a mind in which the prima materia is expressed.   And thus we return to Platon and Pythagoras an finally the end of Sophistry.  
It's not so difficult and I personally do believe that. Accepting such a conclusion, however, carries a number of implications and raises questions which if not addressed in a satisfactory manner should lead one to question their confidence in the original conclusion. 
If you define the heart as a pump, then yes, we have artificial hearts that emulate the relevant physical process of pumping blood. But just as an insulin pump provides a diabetic with insulin to utilize blood sugar, few would argue that it is an artificial pancreas.   Before you can make a faithful emulation of the relevant physical processes of something, you need to know what the something actually is. Otherwise, your faithful emulation is potentially only a subset of the relevant physical processes of something. 
IMO, IIT doesn't really touch the Hard Problem.  In fact, as someone who believes that dual-aspect monism as described in the OP is our best bet at tackling the Hard Problem, I think IIT has a lot to contribute to examining how the material of consciousness arranges into higher orders of consciousness (such as our brains). IIT just doesn't solve the problem of how consciousness per se is possible at all. 
Yeah there's footing, but of course no solved answer that says the origin of consciousness as a property or the nature of it, or just really anything about what it is.   I did some light reading up on IIT and am not fully understanding what's distinct about the theory. Care to give it a quick summary, since it's your preferred theory?  
I suppose you can but I don't think observing my environment is quite the same as observing my inner experience. Its certainly not the same as the experience itself.  
They most certainly have the ability to act if coded into them. Consider code like DNA and there ya go. Survival as well can be coded in just like it is in DNA. Pain is simply nerves sending a signal to the brain, something that can easily be compared to lots of input systems that computers have. It's closer than you're giving credit. 
But there would then be no differences between physical existence and physical experience, so why do we need a separate concept to describe the same exact thing? 
what is non-abstract experience? If its the fact that the rock can be thrown, that's covered by newton's projectile motion equations. Do you see any qualia in those equations? No.  Therefore either qualia do not exist, or they do. But do not effect experience, and therefore have nothing to do with consiousness.  The argument that the rock has qualia is as valid as the idea that the rock is actually a demon in rock form falling through the air merely to trick us.   
But if they are the same, then why use the word consciousness. If rocks are conscious, and everything is, then we should redefine it to be useful. 
They don't. They study what constitutes the earth. But you know, the dig up ancient things and so the author just jumped it as "origins of life."  This isn't really the only problem with the article. 
Even if it's a small part of the brain, then no one part of THAT part would be the conscious part. Unless you think it boils down to one critical fundamental particle, it's going to be an aggregate property at some level. 
You can't just start making these analogies just because they "might" be accurate lol, you have to have a really solid belief that it works. I don't see any reason to hold such a belief. 
Very well said.  So how do you suggest we cross this chasm of a rift? Where do we find the pieces to this fabled frail, tenuous bridge we must build and maintain to keep talking to eachother about it meaningfully and productively? Or is it doomed to devolve as it has? Or does everyone simply stay in their philosophical silos and not bother?  Or should we just be like Sisyphus, because what else is there? 
Not really. The throwaway account doesn't have any history aside from this post. 
The first stage of the Scientific Method is intuitive by its nature, but still has to be built on a *bit* of evidence. 
I think the resistance to this kind of thinking lies in our innate desire to feel like humans are special and above certain things in nature. Even when someone says they've thrown away that idea, it's ingrained into them deeply so much that they can't discard a theory that isn't as well supported. It's resting upon their intuition.  
As a physicalist/determinist, I would say the issue is purely regarding the true complexity of the brain. We differ from a computer through our emotional capacity based on chemicals and these desires ingrained in us for survival. If a computer had those things properly implemented in a way that it had algorithmic mental loops in the same way as humanity, I believe it would appear no different, and it would be experiencing a physical phenomenon no different from consciousness in living creatures.  In fact, for it to seem truly human, it would need the same ambiguous sort of memory storage that we possess, and I'm not sure of the exact physics required to accomplish that in a computer. Everything in a computer seems so static. It's clear our biology isn't quite so perfect. And... I actually believe that's another thing that keeps us alive. If we could truly remember things perfectly, we would experience a great day and drown ourselves in it. 
Exactly. I tend to agree with that conclusion. However, at what point along the path to sufficient complexity does a "thing" become "conscious"?  For instance, say we can build a completely accurate simulation of the human body, mind and all. Enough so that we can say assuredly that it is conscious of itself. If you were to regress from there to lesser and lesser complex versions of that simulation, at what point does it lose its consciousness? Where is the magic level of complexity, if there can be such a thing?  I'm inclined to say that there is no distinct point of complexity, and that consciousness is something more akin to what this article is describing. 
Yes. The physical process of the heart pumps blood in and out and distributes it throughout your body. The physical process of your brain produces consciousness.   Yes. The more we learn about the brain, the more we'll understand the process of conscious creation. Just like the more we understood the heart, the better we understood blood circulation. 
As far as i can tell, it seems to be a formalization of the idea that consciousness is a emergent property of organized information processing.     The so called Hard Problem is defined as a problem that cannot be addressed by the physical world. I believe this was done to erect a firewall between metaphysical investigators and the rolling tide of scientific discovery.  (it's easiest to keep consciousness in the realm of philosophy if you define it as something unassailable by reason and science) 
But we can observe your inner experience.  We cannot experience it ourselves, perhaps. But so what?  I don't have to burn to see a flame.  I see photons from excited combusting molecules and name their shape flame.  I see your medual spike its metabolism, i see your pupils dilate and nostrils flare; I name their shape anger.  You can claim that your inner experience of anger is somehow spiritual and indefinable by an observer, but who cares? Your anger, like the flame is a real and objectively physical phenomenon.  The fact that you claim otherwise merely makes you seem nuts.   
Yeah, it's closer. I just think we're missing some big nuances. 
There is no evidence that quantum effects would change the outcome of the macro state that are neurons. Your theory is likely to be more and more disproven as time goes on.  And really, why does consciousness need to seep in by affecting quantum outcomes? This seems arbitrary. It also introduces a new physicality problem with quantum effects. Why are they both material and conscious?  Simply put, we are better off talking about conscious experience as it is connected (in whatever direction) to the material reality we already observe. There doesn't appear to be a hidden soul. 
Excellentlt well written.  And, to be honest, I agree with you. I think there is a lot more to be learned at the brain and consciousness. However, I just can't help but feel we'll get better answers from science than philosophy.  
The argument here IMO, is that all matter is a *form* of consciousness.. that matter itself can in fact "feel" being thrown, for example..   Of course matter itself would have no vision capability or mental thought process, as it lacks a brain and neural network. But I believe the theory is that, all that "is" also "experiences". We are hard wired in a way to allow abstract thought and self awareness, but they believe that doesn't necessarily mean that "consciousness" is subject only to humans/animals.  I think, therefore, I am.  Well who's to say a rock can't just, *be*?  This topic is super intriguing. 
Good point. We don't. The two separate concepts create a lot of confusion. 
Forgive me, I should've explained myself better. I should have said "very abstract" experience rather than just "abstract experience". I'm not making the claim that there can be non-abstract experience. I meant to only convey that I assume that a rock has less abstract of an experience than a human.  
Most people would define consciousness as qualia.   It's not fair to define consciousness as the thing you want it to be, then say, hey look, I was right.  
You could say the same thing about dualism - you can't make such claims because they 'seem' right either. The truth of the matter is that consciousness is not solved. But it makes sense to draw comparisons from similar things we do know about - and computers are the closest thing we know to the animal brain. Similarly, if everything else in nature has is emergent from the laws of nature, it is just common sense to look at consciousness and realise that it could very well be an emergent phenomenon like everything else.  
Intuition is fantastic, but it isn't infallible. I've had leaps of intuition that solved problems, and others that were simply wrong. What some people seem to be missing is that, if the average human has a few leaps of intuition per unit time, and only a small fraction of those are true, that still leads to many awesome ideas that can potentially propagate and improve the culture in which they exist.  Intuition and creativity are like evolution. They help explore the memetic landscape, but by necessity many new ideas will be shit. 
No the resistance is due to the mildest presence of intellectual rigour.   Qualia being a byproduct of any computational process is a legitimate theory but so is panpsychism.   The mystery is that we have no scientific evidence for either and no way to apply the scientific method because we don't have any way of measuring/corroborating that something is or even each other are experiencing qualia. 
It really isn't. As a data scientist, I can tell you computers are a lot closer to being a viable platform for consciousness than you might think.  As far as I know, the human brain works much closer to a black box nuerual network than I ever expected.  
That was basically what I got out of it yeah, emergence makes sense but still doesn't answer much yet.   And that makes sense, but I do think the hard problem will be solved by science. I just think it's.. Hard. Nailing down the philosophy is important for attacking the inquiry at the right angle though. Hand in hand.  
That's pretty cool sounding even though I only vaguely processed it (it's late). Feel like going into any more detail on it?  
How do you observe my inner experience exactly? What does it look like? You can show me a picture of a flame, is there a similar corollary to my inner experience? Because honestly I don't feel I'm the one who's "nuts" here.  
Sure, a dog or a slug has neurons and inputs to those neurons and reacts based on those neural interactions.  And to the degree that they conscive of themselves they like PCs are kinda sorta maybe conscious.   
The only way for consciousness to seep in undetected is through quantum effects. But, I can accept that that may not be possible. Then two options remain.  1. Consciousness doesn't affect the empirical world at all.  2. Consciousness affects the empirical world on non-quantum scale and can thus be empirically observed.  We can eventually prove (2) to be true of false. If true, great, we can start studying consciousness in some way by observing its interplay with the empirical world. But if false however, we would have to explain how we are able to express our experiences in speech and talk about qualia, because the road between consciousness and the empirical world is a one-way (from brain to consciousness). So the experience of qualia would never be able to be transmitted to the brain in order to be spoken of.  
I would argue, that our nervous system allows for the sensation of being thrown, not our consciousness. If matter could experience a change of momentum, then we wouldn't of had to evolve an inner ear. Our consciousness is just a 'feeling' of our nervous system acting in a way that measures a change in momentum.   What ever experiences a rock has, it must do without sensory perception, and memory. As these are functions of the nervous system.  
yes, the equations that govern the human mind requre a bit more abstraction than the laws of motion that govern the thrown rock.  But what does that have to do with experience or consciousness?  
The truth of the matter is that consciousness as a topic is about the subjective. All we *have* is our direct experience of it. That's what it *is* itself that we are discussing. It's not brain waves. It's what it feels like to have them.  
Yeah, but you can't have evolution *without* those leaps of faith. It always requires the touchstone of reality, whether it's a new body shape for lizards or a new discovery in a field of science, but it takes a creative mind to have those random memetic mutations in the first place. 
Off the top of my head this sounds an awful lot like bullshit; after all we know that altering the physical state of your brain can alter both how and what you experience, where-as if how you experienced things was not a product of the physical state you wouldn't expect that to be the case.  
The absence of conclusive evidence either way doesn't mean one is equally as likely to be true as the other however.  
As a biologist, what? We barely understand what's going in in a cell, let alone a neuron. 
i really think that if the philosophers don't give up the this implacable attitude that no logic or reason can solve this one really hard question, they will never have anything useful to say about consciousness and humanity.    The problem is that they've defined the question as unanswerable.  The problem of consciousness is not actually unanswerable if you look for answers.   
I'll do what I can, what were you interested about? I only have a neuro background, so I'm afraid I can't do the math much justice.  
Actually I can't show you a picture of a flame.  I can show you a picture of something burning. Your brian interprets it as a flame.  Likewise, I can't see your experience of the word flame, but I can watch your brain while you do.    Just as the flame is really just a bunch of combustible molecules combing with oxygen and emitting photons as they relax into new conformations, your inner experience of the word or picture that I show you is really the interconnected activation of several parts of your brain.    We have the technology today to do this.  I swear I'm not nuts. Check out some FMRI studies.   
I think your last sentence is really important. You make a distinction between the qualia and the brain, and I am OK with this distinction, but one way to resolve this is that the material brain and qualia may be two aspects of the same thing. Or two ways of looking at the same thing. I am not a strict materialist, so I do not think that qualia is reducible to physical properties *as we understand those physical properties*. However, it may be that qualia and the material are inseparably coincidental. From here you can explain further things by debating panpsychism or a special kind of structuralism.  In other words, this resolves the problem of being able to talk about qualia, even though qualia do not influence the material, because qualia are not separable from the material. 
That's true but like with most all science, nothing is necessarily *true*. That's just how we happen to perceive it, either temporarily or permanently due to our physical incapability to prove otherwise.  Well, like the article stated, as we have developed we've lost this natural experience. We now have physical senses that allow for increased experience. Just as people have lost their natural instincts with hunting/survival, we have also lost our ability to experience "base consciousness". The rock could somehow experience the change in its physical location within the space-time continuum.   Just like with blind and deaf people.. they use the same "hardware" we have, but to an increased level of ability because of the forced dependence of that specific hardware.   We can't experience just being matter, because we have extremely capable hardware that allows us to neglect the base capability of "being". 
Well, I suppose you could say it governs the `magnitude` of the experience that consciousness is having, but that's another topic. You're kinda getting way off track here.  
The fact that subjective experience can be altered by changing the brain (damage to anterior cingulate cortex can stop people from seeing contradictions in statements - damage to other parts can radically and permanently change personality) implies a physical and emergent consciousness. 
In the abstract this is possibly true but I'm not sure how you'd go about assigning probability to this in reality and specifically in this case  
While I don't disagree, are you defining consciousness as a "sense of self" and the power of introspection or abstract thought?  I'm not saying it does not include those things, but the question is whether or not it IS those things. 
Yeah, that is a pretty hard headed view.   I don't see how it's not answerable. I mean, I see how they could say "and we think this is unsolvable" but I think the problem itself just needs an answer to what property of the universe qualia is basically.  
Looking at my brain is not observing my inner experience... and there is such a thing as a picture of a flame. 
ugh, ive lost the capability of putting up with that argument.    We perceive X and cannot physically prove -X, therefore -X must be true....how is that right?  So you say that if I have a gun, and you cannot prove that I don't have a gun, that you are safe and in fact I have no gun?  
Exactly!    I could say it governs the magnitude...or I could say that it has absolutely nothing to do with experience and consciousness.    The topic here (ITT) was whether applying dualism to neuroscience and physics helps solve the hard question of consciousness.  My argument is that it does not.  My justification is that if you start from unjustified assumptions, there is no way to come to a believable conclusion.   
How do you know that though? That's a piece of information that is highly dependent on all kinds of processes you learned about. Meanwhile consciousness is a direct appearance, it's appearance itself  
Logic is a core part of philosophy and should be taught at least in high school, possibly sooner. We start kids in algebra as early as middle school. Predicate logic is very much like algebra and more relevant for life so it should be taught at the same age. Inductive reasoning is even more important in life.  These philosophical foundations should absolutely be taught much earlier than they currently are. 
Ethics ought to be a course that is required to graduate high school and get a degree in college. The latter used to be the case a long time ago.  A principles of reasoning course would go a long way toward high school students being able to determine what arguments are good and bad. 
Philosophy has to start from an agreed and proven first principle. Ungrounded speculation does not qualify. And that is what I fear we'd see given that children don't have the tools to address complex questions.   Children go through a series of developmental stages and throughout elementary and junior high they're stuck at the level called "concrete operations". Abstraction does occur, but it's not the norm. So instead of teaching the kids to think abstractly they will be taught either a procedure, or will confuse abstraction with fact. Better to teach kids according to their developmental capabilities rather than try to bring them along at an unreasonable pace. 
This may have already been talked about. But the problem with teaching kids to think for them selves and question their frameworks will lead most of them to hating the way the school system is currently set up.  Schools, "Here kids think for yourself better!"   Kids, "Why are we spending 8 hours a day at the age of 7 indoors, having information crammed into our brains, to pass tests that are not good indicators of intelligence or retained information just so the school can look better?"  School, "....on second though let me take back that free thinking." 
Holy crap. This is my first time in /r/philosophy and there are so many off-topic non-philosophical related posts on here confusing philosophy with personal opinions on stuff like education and religion.  Lots of this stuff reads like that "I am enlightened by my own atheism" copypasta meme. 
While I think this would be a good idea, there are much more pressing things that need to be taught before they complete school. Such as personal finance, basic accounting, the time value of money, rent vs buy, how to balance a check book, as well as all the types of bills you will have to pay and how to build a budget.    My highschool was considered ahead of the game and one of our classes spend 2 weeks on building a budget and balancing a check book. It needs to be multi year. We have too many people living pay check to pay check because they think they can afford a luxury simply because their bank account has a larger number than that items price.  
Haha, when I read the post title I didn't realize it was an article link and thought someone was asking /r/philosophy if philosophy should be taught as a core subject. I was like wow, what are you going to ask next, if /r/aww likes cute puppies? XD 
absolutely not they dont even teach kids how to do taxes, balance a check book, create and follow a budget why tf would they add a necessity for philosophy when they dont even teach kids the basics of living  
 No, even at university where departments have greater autonomy were being told to spin certain narratives and answers as correct, despite this undermining thought and moral discussion. Giving greater oversight on philosophy by allowing it to be taught at primary and secondary sounds an awful idea. 
I don't know if it would work. A majority of the people in my *grade 12* philosophy class last semester could barely grasp a lot of the concepts we were learning and (literally) *nobody* but a small group people really understood logic and logical fallacies.   However, a reason they might have not understood it is because they were introduced to this way of thinking so late in their academic careers, which in turn means maybe we actually should be taught philosophy at a younger age. Interesting.  
There is no question about it.   No pun intended.  Any subject that encourages children and adolescents to question the accepted truth, and grow their critical faculty will do a ton of service for this world.   We need more individuals. We need more pioneers. We need more challengers. We need more critics.  Or do we? ...  That's up to you. 
Yeah great, more bastardization of philosophy at the hands of casual students. How could that be dangerous?    "A little learning is a dangerous thing"  -Alexander Pope  
Yeah, I think it's very beneficial to students. I just wrapped up Junior year of high school and my theology/philosophy class exposed us to varying outlooks on our faith (Jesuit HS) and contemporary issues. If anything, it helped me definitively determine what I agreed or disagreed with and opened some actual discussion with my classmates. Now I'm no expert in the authors I've read, but exposure to them is good in itself.  If anyone's interested, the philosophers we read from were:   Aristotle  Emmanuel Kant  Jeremy Benthem   J.S. Mill  Louis Pojman  Karl Rahner  Judith Butler  Philipa Foot   Richard Gula  Our last tri consisted of a more relaxed curriculum where we discussed AI, racism, and wrote a paper proposing how we thought a philosopher would react or approach a contemporary issue today ex: Machiavelli on the Trump administration (something some of my friends did). 
This.  Logic class should be taught at the middle school level after they have decent reading comprehension and core math skills.   
Wouldn't programming be better for teaching kids logic  
Totally agree with this, the whole concentration on "the great thinkers" rather than on ideas nearly put me off philosophy and Im sure it has done for so many people. 
I would agree completely with that. Philosophy was actually a subject in school where I grew up, and I remember how increadibly dumb everyone thought it was, I especially loathed Parmenides. We couldnt grasp what the philosophers were trying to communicate, because we would always try to concretise the metaphors instead of thinking about the idea itself. Our prefrontal cortexes werent developed enough. On the tests we just regurgitated the textbook definitions without any grasp of what we were writing.  A few concepts were understandable though, like empiricism and some parts of logic. 
I'd argue that not teaching them is what is setting the pace kids can understand anything an adult can often times in ways adults can't. Im very sure kids can understand complex questions especial about philosophy. Teaching kids to think abstractly should be the norm the rest is forcing them into the assembly line that is education.  
I hate to say it but I agree. Finance does need to be multiple years. The quality of life for the whole country would improve in a single generation.  I say start with 2 years and let's see what we can get after that. 
Bring back home economics and all of those can be taught in one course. A critical thinking/basic logic/philosophy course doesn't need to come at the expense of practical, real-life skills.  Really, though, who doesn't agree that grade school education needs substantial reform.  
Religion is not a class in public schools, only private schools. If you choose to send your kids to a private school, you know what you're getting into.  
That was actually the case for me.   We learned about various philosophical theories especially 19th century philosophers. It was still in a catholic context, but looking back I must say that it was done quite well.  Still, religious teachers were religious, on tests as long as you pulled some crap out of your ass that made the church look good you got good grades.  (Belgium btw)  
Hahaha, yeah tbh is was a bit of a circlejerk inviting title. On the otherhand talking about it might actually make change more likely! Whereas agreeing that we all like cute puppies probably wont change anything :P 
Could you care to explain how it would be bastardized? Don't confuse bastardized for simple, if that's what you're thinking. 
I totally agree with you. My daughter is going into the 7th grade, and I've started teaching her about logic and logical fallacies at home, because they do or learn anything about it in school. Not that I'm an expert, but I believe that critical thinking and reasoning skills are more important that memorizing facts and dates.  
I went to a private elementary school and was taught logic there and feel like it has stayed with me ever since, so... never too early! 
I've recently been gaining interest in philosophy but never had any classes on it in high school or college. What book would be a good start to learning formal logic? I've recently purchased Sophie's World as a fun intro to philosophy. I also downloaded Platos Republic on my Kindle. But I'm learning about more and more philosophers that I want to dive into and I'm getting overwhelmed and don't know where to start. 
Second this! Used to major in philosophy at UCLA, changed majors for this very reason. There is a huge lack of discussion based learning in academic philosophy.  
Right? It kind of made me feel as though I was inadequate and could never live up to any of them, so it made me feel hopeless. 
No, I'm sorry. No. Kids are not little adults. Their brain is not just smaller, it is drastically different.  While I do agree that school destroys creativity in children, I do not agree that you can teach philosophy to little children and expect them to get any of it. Or care about it.  You can prepare them for philosophy by giving them logic courses or *maybe* some kind of History of Philosophy class. That could work in middle school, and philosophy could work great in high school. 
It would, now people don't realize what they are doing to themselves when they spend money or have credit card debt. It's not because they are stupid it's because they simply have never been exposed. Especially in lower income families, the parents don't know, schools don't teach them, and yet we expect them to be successful. It's lunacy to think that would work.  
Yeah but they don't know it's called philosophy, so if they do try and learn philosophy at one point they won't be going in with preconceptions of "Well this isn't what I was taught before..." 
Philosophy has been used to justify every abhorrent event in modern human history. The maxims of certain schools of thought are often used in and of themselves rather than as a framework for thought.   Remember the Nazis?  
Especially in the modern era, where facts and dates are readily available. 
I'm intuitively sensing a flaw in your reasoning, but since we didn't do philosophy in school I'm struggling to refute it.  So far the best I can do: all mortals are men. socrates was mortal. therefore, socrates was a man.  It still seems a bit iffy.  
I mean, very few people are going to be a Hegel or a Russell. But that's the same in every field. They all have their giants. 
Just finished an A level in Philosophy (UK qualification), can confirm that you're not allowed to give your own view, or more that if you do it won't grant you any extra marks in the exam. You have to argue for a particular conclusion, and I'd always argue for the conclusion I agreed with, but if you outright state your opinion it means nothing. You have to state how your conclusion is drawn from various arguments, but you're not encouraged to actually give your thoughts on the matter.  So you can essentially give your opinion by arguing a certain thing but at any point saying "I believe this, I agree with this" etc means nothing.   I'll say that's only for half the exam, the other half is 100% just others' opinons and no analysis at all. So I guess to a certain degree you do give your view, but only for the big essay questions. 
I think maybe our definition of kids is different - I'm thinking middle school and high school.   I was still throwing horse shit at fence posts in elementary school you won't get an argument from me that we should be teaching philosophy to them.  
Imagine if everyone in America set up a retirement fund and education funds for their kids. Fucking imagine it.  Quality of life would skyrocket in a generation. 
The advantage for memorizing facts and dates is that it provides context for new information. "Why should I need to remember when the Gulf War happened; I can just look it up!" is the kind of question that gets asked. But events shape future events. If you don't have a good picture of what *has* happened you cannot possibly have enough context for what *is* happening. Same for any other discipline: the other things you know help you filter through and contextualize new information. If you don't bother actually remembering stuff because you can always look it up, you will just miss key context.  
Don't forget that alternative facts and fake news are also readily available in the modern era. Gotta learn to look out for those. 
Formal logic can rescue us! The argument has this format: P implies Q. P. Therefore, R. "All men are Socrates" is a completely different sentence, formally, from what's in the rest of the argument.   Another way to think of it: all dogs are mammals. My dog Fido is a mammal. Therefore, all dogs are my dog Fido. That's obviously silly.  
I think its easier to see a little rephrased:  In the set of mortals, all men exist. Sokrates, being a man, is in the set of mortals. Therefore it implies that all men (subset of mortals) are sokrates (subset of men).  Does it exist a mortal man in the set that is not Sokrates? Yes, thats easy to find. And so the implication fails. 
Yes, the argument for requiring Algebra in early grades is that it is a good surrogate for Logic... Why not just teach Logic though if that's what we are trying to get kids to learn?  
Yeah that's what I meant for the second part. It wasn't just memorization of some facts, it was more like, "summarize this philosopher's argument and then argue for or against". You really had to understand the philosopher's argument to take either side, so the understanding was tested more thoroughly. Plus, if you made any illogical jumps in your argument than it was immediately obvious. 
That memorization of historical dates and personalities in history class always bored me to tears, until I had an excellent world history professor in college who would launch into in depth chronology and explain WHY things happened. Some people had a drought or a war and had to move, so they went next door and took over another kingdom, causing them to evacuate into their longtime allies' lands, causing more war and strife. Those connections are what is often missing in history classes in the states. 
Unfortunately, faulty logic spoken loudly is winning. There's gotta be a super-logic that, uh, trumps, the BS.   
You'll be happy to hear that history and schools has changed a lot. It no longer simply deals only with dates and events but aims to create more understanding around the human factor. At least where I'm from.   Source: Am a High school history teacher.  
 There's a name of a logical fallacy for that but it escapes me. 
I'm a grown ass man who never did any CS and I have no clue what the hell the latter part of your comment is supposed to mean. 
If something is both true and false the whole statement is false. 
I always encourage students to read it as it can explain a lot about humans' behaviour, from international affairs to work/office dynamics.  
I've heard a lot of conjecture that Machiavelli wrote it as a parody or caricature of the Medici families actions and policies rather than an actual treatise on human behavior, has there been anything more substantial to corroborate this? 
My favourite book by far, it's the reason I stopped getting angry at sleazy politics. 
A lot of people in Acedemia believe that Machiavelli wrote "the Prince" as an attempt to achieve some of his goals that he outlined in his other works like "The Discourses on Livy". Namely, Machiavelli wanted a unified Italy ruled as a republic in a humanistic nature. Therefore, Machiavelli wrote "The Prince" to the Medicis as a way to reach those goals. The Medicis of Florence were arguably in the best position to form a unified Italy. "The Prince" is full of great advice for a ruler to quickly gain land and conquer territories. However, a lot of the information that Machiavelli gives to Medici is not sound advice. Getting rid of fortresses, arming the people, being miserly, and being cruel to the populace are great ways for the Medicis to be overthrown and a republic being formed. 
This has bugged me for a few years, have we come to a consensus if The Prince is satire or not? I constantly hear advocates for both sides when The Prince comes up  
I'm not a stupid person but I'm not incredibly smart either. Rather slightly above average. I just wish that there was a centralised place online where I could read all of these important historical books and have them written in plain modern English. As soon as I try to read them I get bored and switch off. I would love to read all of these books, even the bible, but the writing just messes my head up.  
The book is a satire.  The means justifies the Ends is valid, in so for far as the end is a good moral end.  Hence, only Moses was able to succeed as being the Prince because he represented the people.  Remember, the book was written for the Medici's which were rivals of Machiavelli.  It's a satire.  We studied this in a college in an Ivy League. 
Thats true, im actually reading that book for the 5th time! it never gets old. 
Another way to think about it is that people have hardly changed since 500 years ago lol 
That quote defines the #1 problem for Marxist communism: the goal is there to be no state at the end, and the state don't like that. 
This section of writing is about establishing a new principality through conquering.. it is odd that this quote routinely  gets referenced in this context because it really refers to how to bend the will of your new subjects not how to change their hearts and minds 
Thanks for including the original word. It always amazes me that words exist that have no cognates in the English language. You get this weird sense that there are thoughts not yet experienced.  
Yeah it's amazing what you can make sentences mean if you change some of the words /s 
I had a professor, one of those great books guys I suspect was a Straussian, who said this is the first modern book. He also said that it's satire; Machiavelli was a comedian. I think most readers miss that point. 
So it's more guide to for normal person to understand the ruthless ruler (instead of being guide on how to be ruler)? Did I get that right? 
A former professor of mine explained it as succinctly as possible -- Machiavelli was the Stephen Colbert of the 16th century.  The analogy doesn't work as well now that Colbert has retired the character he used to play on Comedy Central.  And you probably remember, but for anyone reading this who doesn't, Colbert used to *play the part* of a self-promoting right-wing talk show host so over-the-top that it was an effective way of lampooning such people.  For most of the years that he played that character, he refused to *ever break character.*  He took no other roles and avoided most public appearances so that people would *only* see him in character.  By being a permanent caricature, he was incredibly effective satire.  Similarly, Machiavelli praises ruthless, manipulative leaders in order to expose them.  He was so convincing in the "role" that he fools people 400 years later into thinking he was serious. 
I have The Prince and The Hagakure on my shelf for these reasons.  Sometimes the history of a thing is as important as the message it carries. 
I don't buy that theory, that The Prince was written to illuminate people on the wicked ways of their ruling class, I specifically recall him expressing hope that some prince will come along and apply those guidelines correctly to finally unite Italy in the last paragraph of the book and it seemed genuine to me. In my view, Machiavelli wasn't a secretly naive man who believed that there is any other way to rule, but simply wished that someone would go all the way and do it right to finally end the constant strife that plagued renaissance Italy.   
Where did you copy and paste that from?  Reading the Prince without reading Art of War and Discourses on Livy means that you haven't read enough of Machiavelli.  Machiavelli was a realist.  A student of history, people and power.  To say he was a humanist is an unsubstantiated reach.  He was a man looking for a job in a tumultuous time.  He amused himself with his own wit. Ascribing motivations to him in high minded text with no citations seems underwhelming.  And I don't mean citations to someone analysis him.  I mean citations to his actual works or personal letters. 
A wild Straussian appears - seriously though, great synopsis! 
totally agree. Way more applicable to the real world than a lot of philosophical discourse and that's kind of the theme of the article.  
This doesn't make sense to me. It doesn't read as satire; the argument is subtle and carefully made, and it's also carefully limited.   The book isn't some broad treatise to apply in power relationships, like The Art of War; it's called The Prince because he is limiting his description and recommendation to someone in a very specific role: the quasi-dictator of a mercantile state on the warpath between larger neighbors. He's not telling the Medici to do what a King of France or a Pope should do, and he's not telling him to be a good man. He's telling him that leaders are judged by how well they serve they people, and it matters less how nasty the leader has to be than how well his people are served. A good man who is a bad Prince is in fact not a good man.   But to apply it outside the Florentine context you have to translate the role of "prince" into its relevant term. Very hard to do, I think. Worthy of Machiavelli.  
I came across an article when I was researching for the article - I think it seems like a pretty far-fetched idea but I imagine there's some basis for it. I would love to hear if anyone knows anything. 
Really late to this party, but...  Machiavelli wrote The Prince as a thinly veiled criticism of the current ruler, said Prince's father. It was meant to be a kick in the face.   Source: have b.a. in history 
I found that before I read it I could kid myself into thinking the politicians were just incompetent. Now it just seems like they're doing it on purpose! Make's you think - if politicians weren't Machiavellian would they even be at the top? 
Really? Because the current sleaze level of politics has actually got me pretty stressed out... What about it would you say gave you perspective? 
It's great, but I think Robert Greene's 48 Laws and 33 Strategies books are better because he has distilled the teachings of multiple sources, including Sun Tzu, and they're just more easily applicable in the modern era. 
I disagree, to be able to analyze Machiavelli's word choice you'd have to know 16th century Italian to begin with, analyzing word choice in a translation is probably the worst thing you can do, especially because the phrase in Italian could have multiple interpretations. 
Maybe if you bought the "Cliff Notes" for specific books, then you might understand the meaning of  the story and style of the author. These notes sometimes are used to bypass reading the assignments, but using them together with the book could help you remain interested.  
Ugh especially becoming "more _agile_". The word _agile_ is spoken with irony and slight disgust among developers. Maybe OP does it well, but in my experience it just means more work, more company bureaucracy (often reporting to someone who doesn't understand the work), and less free time all coupled with no increase in pay. 
I've always preferred Frederick the Great's  Anti-Machiavel essay. I prefer the view post-enlightenment he takes on how a ruler can be moral, and still hold power. You could even see Frederick himself as the greatest example of a benevolent ruler who still had his realm prosper. 
It's not strictly a problem with the 1%. Anyone with a little too much to their name stands to lose when the revolution happens, if history is any indicator. 
That is definitely not the main problem. The incompatibility of Marxist philosophy with the human nature is the problem. There has to be regulations on actions of citizens, people cannot be expected to share and distribute resources equally just because of the virtuousness of the concept. The human species have a natural tendency to form hierarchies, which can be easily seen in absolutely any past or existing "communist" state. The ideal system in the present world is social democracy. 
People like communism because they don't want the 1% to have all the money, but all it does as opposed to far right economic policies is create a different 1%: the state 
Machiavelli's book was all about giving advice to a ruler of a city-state and had nothing to do with any kind of bottom up change. Machiavelli's analysis was fine and probably relevant in  /u/Thisishugh's line of work.      
Your half right. It's a guide for a normal person to understand the ruthless ruler, but its also a guide for the ruthless ruler to understand the normal person/populace and how the populace would view/judge the actions the Prince takes. Remember if the Prince constantly offends, doesnt vanquish his rivals in 1 quick succession, or his continued cruelty leads to the populace hatred, the Prince risks getting overthrown. While the book does show the normal person/populace about how the prince's actions are not always how it appears, it also tells the Prince how his actions will be viewed by the populace. So it's also a guide to a symbiotic relationship between the prince/dictator and the people. While Machiavelli's works are "simplistic" (i.e much easier to read than Nietzsche or Plato if you haven't read a philosophy book before) they can be interpreted in different ways/has something that more than 1 person/group can learn from. 
If he simply told you that that was the truth and you all believed him, he did you a real disservice.  
I'm not familiar with The Hagakure: Is there anything you could tell me about it that I couldn't easily pick up from a wiki-walk? 
Yes, I will laugh and spit in the face of any "reasonable ethics" put forth by a man responsible for the deaths of three million people. 
lol, wouldn't want to call myself that, and don't really agree with the view that philosophy and politics is part of a self-building system of sorts. As opposed to probably having a slightly less optimistic view of the large lines in history, and believing very firmly in how individual bits and pieces can be maintained and created separately, even as they exist in free-fall off the edge of the Earth - or perhaps often maintained really because such views and political situations are so much in opposition to everything that happens around it that they become impenetrable to the discourse and interaction the larger systems would require. But thanks ;) 
So do I. Masking your opinion as facts and then appealing to authority of... yourself?  
That's cause they are just puppets stringing along the agenda ever so smoothly. It's the bankers and the investors that have this world by the balls.  
I guess understanding the reasoning behind the sleaze makes it more bearable.  I'm Canadian and earlier this year the PM broke one of his biggest campaign promises about electoral reform and a lot of people were pissed. The current electoral system makes it possible for a party to have a majority government with only a minority of the popular vote and he campaigned on the promise to make it more fair.  While it's not cool that he broke his promise to change the system, I understand why he did it because he wouldn't have a majority government without the current system. 
Idk. I find Robert Greene's stuff to be very vague and non-practical, more along the lines of entertainment.  
I had to read it for school the only one I didn't mind reading!  
Agile is so dumb. Hire people you trust, give them tasks, leave them alone. Works for us. 
I believe Machiavelli addressed the problem by noting that Philosopher Kings were the exception and not the Rule.    Also Frederick the Great was born into power; The Prince was ostensibly written for the usurpers of power.  Very rare is the Philosopher King who is also an Usurper.  by 'ostensibly', I mean that he knew that Lorenzo De Medici knew all these things already...and that the book was written in normal Italian vernacular.  This would have been fine for The Divine Comedy (also released in this manner) but it laid bare the secrets of power in plain language, using evidence and reason; it was not obscured with Latin, or in roundabout religious moralizing.  It is unclear to me why Pope Leo allowed it to be published. 
See: Everyone who benefited at the cost of others under the Batista regime crying real hard when the regime fell. 
"The tradition of all dead generations weighs like a nightmare on the brain of the living... The social revolution cannot take its poetry from the past but only from the future" -Marx  I believe einstein said something similar regarding socialism, but in much clearer terms. That we should not allow what is, or was stop us from attempting what ought to be. 
No the person you are replying to is correct, the *goal* of communism is *no state at all*, but yes the failure mode of a powerful state controlling every aspect of the economy does seem inevitable because of the incentives for those in power.   
Also important to remember Marx envisioned the revolution asking place post-capitalism while every example we have so far of "communist" countries were agrarian, quasi-feudal societies that attempted to skip the capitalist phase and go straight to the end game.  This hasn't worked because the capitalist phase is necessary to build up the material wealth to move a state through the socialist phase and into full communism. 
The "1%" (I'll take this as your way of saying the bourgeoisie) are one with the state; the state exists solely to protect the flows of capital. Communism, along with anarchism, desires the destruction of the state, as it is an instrument of the class system and hierarchy, which we believe is unjust. 
You see, that is Stalinist Communism, witch I agree is horrid, but not what Communists want. More later, gtg 
Maybe you could be interested in looking up the definition of communism.  
Interesting.   I just checked the length, it's pretty short, I think I'll read it.  Is this just your personal opinion or is this wide-ry held view? 
Wouldn't call Machiavelli's work "simplicistic". Nietzesche work was on purpose impenetrable, and Plato's "Republic", keeping in mind when it was written, is quite easy to read, and doesn't really require much philosophical preparation.  I think since the topic is politics and social organisation, it is naturally easier to read than more metaphysical books, such as "Being and Time".  
I would say that the forward of the book tells you enough about the history of it.  The book relates the anecdotes of a samurai during a time when they transitioned to being middle/senior managers in Japan.  The difference between how this book was treated by the Suzuki family (kept in secrecy for decades) vs the de Medicis (spread far and wide) says a lot more about the value of the material to the reader.  If you read both books from the perspective of a "young prince" being influenced or educated by an author, the contrasts are interesting. 
Absolutely, don't forget that for every Vladimir Putin there are also a Donald Trump, Park Geun-hye, Dilma Roussef and Mariano Rajoy - incompetent figureheads being propped up by external interests gaming the system. 
Lol fair enough, that pales in comparison to the level of corruption we deal with in the States. We have our current administration passing laws that allow Coal Mining Corporations to just dump coal dust into nearby rivers, because "overbearing government!" and our President firing the head of the FBI as well as many other officials because he tried to manipulate them, and they refused (stopping investigations by the FBI for his friend, etc.)  This and more, PLUS our current President was elected despite losing the Popular vote, and complaining about the electoral college system just a few months before running... So kinda like your PM but much more crass and embarrassing. 
A lot of people say this. Could you please elaborate your comment? 
How do you come to trust those you hire? Especially right after you hire them? 
It strikes me that many politicians and activists want Frederick's image, as a Machiavellian cover for their actual goals...  
Not only supporters of this or that regime, but anyone with wealth, regardless of how it was acquired. It must suck to lose the family farm even if it was earned through generations of hard labour.  
If history taught us anything, it is that we should take notes from it and think about its effects on the modern world and learn about the mistakes of the "dead generations". Your quote applies to Communism as well, we have seen to many failed communist states which resulted in dictatorship. It is amazing how people can't see how foolish all out socialism is in a world where the greed and hunger for power of humans had to be regulated since the first human appeared (and even longer than that). We haven't been doing well in putting society over individuals en masse. Maybe a few percents of humanity, but not enough to create a system based on individuals being selfless for the greater good and quotes are not arguments, they are words put in a seemingly smart manner. 
In other words, it requires to evolve beyond human nature? 
Yeah, which is the main cause for the divide between anarcho communisn and Marxism-leninism. 
It's a bit like how agile folks always says that if it's not successful, you're just not doing it properly.  You are right about Marx AND make a valid argument, but I always found this "it was just never done right" argument to be a rather poor counter. 
Did you not read the comment above me? He basically said the truth that Communist leaders never give up their power. 
You'd have to be willfully ignorant to ask such a silly question.  Pray tell, how large of a "death toll" are you giving to capitalism? And what for? 
Republicans don't believe in the imagination, partly because so few of them have one, but mostly because it gets in the way of their chosen work, which is to destroy the human race and the planet. Human beings, who have imaginations, can see a recipe for disaster in the making; Republicans, whose goal in life is to profit from disaster and who don't give a hoot about human beings, either can't or won't. 
Good point. Simplistic is not the best term to use. Maybe tangible/applicable since you can relate Machievelli themes/ideas to real world events if you really devote the time. Or maybe someone else has a better classification term. 
When he's writing *Il Principe*, Machiavelli has basically just been released after weeks of actual *torture* ordered by the Medici. The book is as much a demonstration of skill as it is a slap in the face: "here, you c**t, this is how your little world works, I know it inside out; and you're so stupid that you torture and exile me instead of using my talents. Oh by the way, I'm writing this in vulgar so that everyone from now on will be able to understand your little schemes." And he does all this under their noses, faking absolute obedience like the best writers do when under censorship.   The letter you quote comes much later on, towards the end of his life, when it's clear that nobody will save him from a death in poverty. 
Putin isn't the competent Machiavellian you think.  He's the head of a corrupt petrol state that is shedding value/stability as the price of oil stays down.  He is desperate to stay in power because he utilizes the power of the state to keep him from getting killed or arrested by those who would replace him.  A Caesar with many knives aimed at his back.   
Same. The character sketches are only a small part of each chapter. And aside from that there is never just one. 
Hire people in your networks. Nepotism has survived for a reason: it works. 
It must suck even more to never have the opportunity to have a family farm.  (Also, your ancestors' work is not your work.) 
Between those two, by the way, there are many different variations of socialism as well. 
Fair enough, but the state can't become the new 1% in a stateless system i.e. ideal Marxist communism so I took your statement as a disagreement with the idea that communism is a stateless system.   
Can't redistribute the wealth if you don't have any wealth built up. 
No, you're thinking of a system in which a group of leaders seize power in the first place, which isn't an orthodox Marxist position; the Marxist position is based on the working class as a whole seizing the state and gradually dismantling it, but first using it only to protect agaisnt counter-revolutionary activity staged by capitalists. 
There's just a lot of socialists/communists here. Rather than defend the merits of communists countries, countries that always have to block people from leaving, they find a boogyman in capitalism. First as if capitalism is the only form of non-communism and second as if people aren't lining up in the millions to enter capitalist countries.  --------  It's just an astounding and willful ignorance. 
I'm not against capitalism, and he's obviously being incredibly dramatic, but there are certainly marginal differences that include human life when you're talking about systems that are more individualistic vs cooperative.  Like, in theory the government could take away everyone's money to enact programs that make sure that the minimum number of people die. Our quality of life would just suck. 
All the deaths due to the very serious resource allocation problems that lead to a large loss of life worldwide. People die daily from exposure, starvation, lack of medicine, etc. even though the means to house, feed, and treat everyone are there.   Keeping the capitalist system afloat requires a violent state, adding to the toll.  
Basically acceptance of the inevitability of death, and single-mindedness & directness in the service of your 'master' (whoever or whatever that may be). 
Him still being alive and in power makes him a perfectly competent Machiavellian to me. 
You should stop with your condescending tone, *especially since the article you linked disagrees with the claim that it was satire.* 
Why wouldn't it be? In any system, your ancestor's work is why you zoom across the sky in metal tubes and eat warm food every day. The prospect of a better future, whether under socialism or capitalism, is what powers us.  It's only natural to want your children to have everything you couldn't have. 
That's probably because western propaganda has told you that "anarchy" means "chaos".  It doesn't.  Anarchy means "no rulers".  If you prefer reddit over MSN.com, then you probably like that idea. 
I am replying to his comment saying that there's a good chance the Communist leader will not step down. 
There's that signature condescension in place of logic and reason. I have my issues with capitalism, especially government-supported capitalism, your alternatives are even worse. For example, your link doesn't take into account all the medical and technological advancements we have thanks to capitalism that have saved countless lives. No question, the advancement is uneven and at first far favors the wealthy over the common man, in time, the technology benefits everyone. 
I see that we agree. I didn't think that would happen on this site lol.  
I mean no, they can't. That's why the USSR failed. That's why China failed. That's why Venezuela failed.  You have no basis to make the claim that the government could provide for people. None. In fact we have tons of evidence that demonstrate the exact opposite.  
You can take lessons away from good fiction. But the characters have to be well-written. Greene has a habit of turning complex historical figures into caricatures who got ahead simply because they did This Thing (insert title of the chapter). Good entertainment. Bad history.  
That would have made him the wealthiest man alive. There are no trillionaires. 
Anyone with half a brain could organize a few hundred people and conquer an anarchist society. 
Yeah it's unfortunate isn't it? You even see some people defending Venezuela's current govt... willful ignorance indeed 
It's also why western Europe succeeded. I believe that's what the guy above was hinting at. You can enact some forms of social security without going full communist. 
That's not the point of Greene's books, so why make this point? You said what he says isn't practical, and Id argue that it is. You're just babbling on now. Enjoy the rest of your day. 
That is empirically false if you look at the Spanish civil war, unless you mean *many* hundred people. 
I feel as though you would get more intrepid people making their contribution. All results would be treated as open source, and users could potentially congregate in chats to help one another determine which experiments posed the greatest likelihood for success and/or addressed the greatest ethical need, so would then be given priority for remote completion...or operation could also be determined by an altruism algorithm, if that faltered.  That is once the food growth and distribution systems are perfected, and production can be spent on such facilities.  Your proposal implies that because what we have produces great things that there is no next step to society, because, people, is the exact point of the original dilemma presented by Machiavelli. Though he is not stating we can't be successful he is stating people like you will oppose it, and supporters will not be as fervent.  
The European states didn't go partly communist. So I don't know what you're talking about to be honest.  
Martian philosophy: "might we benefit humans by eating them?" 
I really dislike this  argument. I'm a vapid meat eater but telling the duck I'm about to devour I'm actually helping him out sounds distasteful. 
*The slaves have wonderful living conditions! If it weren't for us they wouldn't even be here.* 
I mean, heck, humanity is four times over the carrying capacity of the earth. We could sure as heck use some culling over here, eh fellas? 
So instead of remaining childfree, I think I might have a kid, raise it until 5 or so, then drown it in a bathtub. I really don't want to deal with teenagers, but at least it would get to live for a few years, right? 
What a great service we do to all of these pigs by breeding them, castrating them in the cruelest, most unsanitary way possible, and keeping them trapped up to their knees in their own feces while they wait to do which couldn't be soon enough.  
Farming animals for food certainly doesn't help them in any way. It's ridiculous to think otherwise and sounds like someone that needs to justify eating meat. i eat meat and drink milk, but I'm not about to say that chicken factories and dairy farms are good for the animals.   I guess MAYBE if the animals got to live outside, eat grass or whatever they naturally feed on. Instead they live in overpopulated cages, are fed corn leftovers, and are pumped full of antibiotics to make them balloon in size. You'd have to be delusional to say that's good for them. 
Would it be beneficial to humans if aliens ate us?   
I think from our long history of slavery, we can determine that even in terrible conditions, we all have a desire to keep living regardless. Call it the basic biological drive to exist, but it was generally the minority that picked death over slavery. I think that's why it took so long to abolish. People made adjustments for their living conditions, even under slavery. Life is pretty darn good at adapting to harsh conditions, and chooses life in harsh conditions over death most of the time. 
Why just kids with disabilities?   Why would you knowingly induce consciousness on any sentient creature without its prior consent?   Having children is p fucked up. 
I agree with your post. I think it's always important to buy your meat from your local butcher instead of the supermarket, that way you'll know where your meat is coming from. Use your vote as a consumer! 
Also animals do not understand their fate. They live a life and our usuallu butchered humanely  
I believe they would choose to exist, but as a human why is it relevant what the animal wants?   I think the debate about aborting disabled children is fundamentally different from whether or not we should farm animals because we make the decision to abort or not abort after the child is conceived and the decision to farm or not farm animals before they are bred.  Yes I believe most would agree that we should treat animals humanely and not cause excess suffering.  Is eating meat wrong by increasing the demand for meat and in turn supporting this excess suffering caused by those who farm animals inhumanely?  Or is it only the farmers with inhumane methods that are wrong because we could still consume meat without them albeit with a smaller supply and higher price tag? 
What would he say about a gun that just freezes soldiers in carbonite, so they can be safely defrosted once the war is over? 
Who say they aren't?  For the analogy to be as close as possible, the requirement is humans obliviousness to the fact that they are livestock.  
Not the duck you're eating, but the species as a whole. Don't fall into an easy fallacy. 
"Better to have lived and lost than to never have lived at all," the saying was something like that, right?? 
"give them good lives" is key, and very difficult at current levels of consumption 
Cows might be a better example. Wild hogs are doing just fine, even becoming a pest. Not quite the same thing, but I suspect we've done a great deal of selective breeding that led to the pig as we know it.  
These are the same arguments people made about slavery in the prewar American South. 
This is ridiculous.   First off, pigs exist for further reasons than just the product of human-consumption. People own pigs as pets, zoos own pigs for tourism, and people also seem to forget that animals used to roam this earth before we cleared it to make room for our lifestyle (to sound less edgy, pigs are also beings that exist in the wilderness).  Secondly, even if it were the case that they exist only because we want them to, in what life would any being want to be mass-breeded, stored in an over-populated slaughterhouse only to be murdered, grinded and processed for consumption?   I don't attack anybody for eating meat, but more often than not they accept that eating meat is immoral. If we want progression then we cannot fight our unethical behavior by defending it with ideas that seem to only benefit our convenience.  
A key to the argument is that animals live happy and comfortable lives until their premature death. I don't think anyone is arguing that the way many industrial farmers treat animals bred for food production is ethical. It's an argument that prematurely killing them might not necessarily be unethical, as long as we also treat them well while they are alive. 
You went from saying eating can't be good for animals (with no supporting data so we can understand why you think that), to going off on a diatribe about living conditions of animals.   You completely failed to address the point because you wanted to be on a soapbox.  
If we didn't raise them, they wouldn't exist on their own. You shouldn't think that anything from our meat animals is natural; they were bred and raised specifically for our tastes. 
I think that's true but the question probably also needs to add premature slaughter. So it's not just would you choose slavery over non-existence, it's would you choose slavery and a premature death by slaughter over non-existence.  Also, I feel like these arguments don't consider that non-existence isn't guaranteed. We could strive to help species from going extinct. 
So am I justified in breeding slaves? They won't exist otherwise. 
I honestly didn't post this to justify eating meat. It was more to point out the interesting paradox that if we did move away from meat we would have fewer animals and the individual animal would probably not be happy with that.  People will eat meat, there isn't much you can do about it so to me it's a good idea to focus on welfare rather than abolition. Hopefully technology will mean lab grown meat which goes a long way to solve the morale and environmental issues but that's a long way off. 
That's only if you think of each consciousness as 100% individual. I think with consenting parents, there's an argument that the child consents as well. Because if you take an objective view, a child is just a biological extension of its parents. It all depends on where you draw the line of identity which is very much a grey area  
Agreed which is why I phased it as "if you could do it". The assumption being that they had reasoning abilities.  I personally think the way an animal reacts to being killed shows you that they would choose existence over non existence. It's not like a farmed animal is "happy" that they finally get put out of their horrible existence. In reality, they fight to survive as any living creature would.  It's far more complex than what I'm describing though, for example, a farm animal existing takes away from the potential existence of other wild animals, although, there is a crap load of suffering in the wild so perhaps that's really not that much better..etc 
They understand. That's why they're so scared when they get forced into the slaughter houses. Animals have jumped out of trucks on the way to slaughterhouses. They scream when they get forced into the gas chambers. Do you think holocaust victims walked willingly into gas chambers because "hey, at least death is better than the concentration camp"....?  No, we fight to our will to live. Just like animals fight for their right to life. We take it away from them, even when it's unnecessarily for humans to eat meat. There is no justification. 
A parent could make the decision to abort prior to the child being born with the information that they will live a limited existence.  A consumer chooses to eat meat knowing that it increases the population of farmed animals (if they even bother to think about it).  Both are choices made on quality of life.  Obviously with he child, there is also the angle of the parents quality of life and other social pressures so it is far more complicated than the farmed animal choice. 
But what if its one of those 100 year wars all over again and you get unfrozen 100 years into the future and everyone you know is dead and you are in extreme shock from the change of environment of everywhere and you realize we have all become slaves to primates  
Knowing how veterans are treated, they wouldn't be unfrozen until a new war started and we needed more Soldiers. 
Well, I was merely invoking the Golden Rule, that's all. 
Most people are oblivious to being used through technology/social media. So I don't see it as a stretch. 
I also dislike the greater good arguments. I prefer to focus on the minor good. Anyway I'd eat ducks whether it was good or bad. I just don't pretend I'm doing it for good reasons. I do it because they taste delicious. 
It's also hinging on the collection of the animal as a species in existence. The argument of how this relationship is good breaks down when you refer to the individual animal, their needs and well being personally. What good is that pigs exist as a collective species if the individual is not cared for.   If we approached human ethics as a value to the collective even when it's a threat to the individual we wouldn't accept these opinions so easily. 
The stereotype is that pigs roll around in the mud and eat garbage (the food scraps that we won't); it's okay to give them sub-optimal living conditions because they're dumb, dirty ugly animals and it would be wasted on them. Unfortunately the exact opposite is true.  Pigs are smarter than most dog breeds, but people don't care about that because they're not as cute.   The cutoff line between a "food" and a "companion" animal is determined by either how useful they are (horses, sheep, oxen) or how physically appealing they are to us (pretty looking fish, snakes+lizards, cats+dogs to some extent); and that's kind of fucked up. Of course, culture plays a huge role in this; some countries eat guinea pig and are totally fine with it, while most Americans would by pretty uneasy about it. 
It is not very difficult.  It is even more efficient and economically-viable to give them good lives in industrial agriculture, and is actually being done on a widespread basis.    We can, and should, do more.  More properly, we should extend the practice of humane industrial agriculture, which is already widespread.   Source:  I am the very definition of the humane omnivore. 
This is where I stand. Most of the animals we eat wouldn't be around if we didn't eat them. They serve no purpose in the wild and probably couldn't defend themselves if they were in the wild. If they were still around and we didn't eat them, they would probably end up being pests and we would go around killing them anyways like we do with any other pests.   I'm pretty sure wild boars are already a serious issue in some places.  
Thank you for this wonderful argument. Now I know what I can say next time some defends their eating of some cheap chicken because 'otherwise it wouldn't have lived!' (I also strongly suspect they have never been depressed, because that teaches you to rethink life as a gift and a wonderful thing in itself.) 
I don't know about the slavery argument.  It stands to reason, though, that if we no longer ate bacon, there would be many fewer pigs.  So let's say the pig population in the US is 10 million at any given time.  And let's say they are cared for humanely until they are killed. (They likely aren't, but for sake of argument...) These 10 million individual pigs all enjoy eating, wallowing, laying in the sun and having sex up until their premature deaths via slaughtering.  Then comes the day of no more bacon.  Their numbers drop significantly.  Let's say a thousand pigs are kept as pets in the US afterwards.  They can't be left to roam free because they become pests like feral pigs are considered now. (And it would be cruel because they're domesticated animals.)  Here's the big philosophical question: Is it better for the pig species if there are 10 million short-lived individuals or a just thousand long-lived individuals?  
Same arguments for different animals make it different arguments. It doesn't say much at all to say it was used for X, in regards to determining if it's correct when used for Y. 
To your first point - The number of pigs that exist for human consumption dwarves the number of all other pigs on earth, by orders of magnitude.  More pigs exist to be turned into sausage mcmuffins than have ever been in all the world's zoos combined.     
Indeed. It is "funny", because that is the same exact argument used here in Spain to legitimate the existence of our kind of bullfighting which is nothing else but literally men torturing a bull to death in the worst and more grotesque possible way to entertaining people. 
Same goes with humans of similar intelligence levels, right? 
They lived lives they never would have lived otherwise. If you believe life itself has value, that is pretty huge 
The practices described are accurate and are common in most factory farms. The kind of farms you can go visit and see happy animals are not the ones that provide your meat. Do some research.  
Eating animals being good for the animals is a contradiction already. I'm not sure how that's a debate. 
So I've been reading this and just want to thank you for posting such an interesting comment. . 
You need to get off the documentaries and articles and out on to a farm to take a look.  
In the animal farming context, it really is as simple as they wouldn't exist without the demand for their meat so non existence is guaranteed. If people didn't eat milk of beef, cattle would be inline for extinction. So, is it better that we farm and eat them or they don't exist at all? Only the cows can answer that one but I suspect it would be survival.  As an aside, it's even a bit deeper than that as cattle is genetically altered so they quiet literally wouldn't even exist as an animal without farming.  
We can't compare human slavery to animal 'slavery'.  Most animals don't have the capability to understand that they are not free; humans do. 
I feel this scenario eliciting chuckles is the mark of a true Academic Philosopher.  The suits and posers would be offended, either way. 
That'd just be the price of war. They had better just hope that whoever wins the war has a good mental health care policy. 
Alistair Reynolds has a series of sci-fi books in which one of the secondary characters was a member of a freeze-thaw battalion. Fight a war, get patched up and stuck in the freezer until the next war breaks out.   Far-fetched by today's standards, but there is an undeniable tactical advantage in having your best and most experienced soldiers available for every war that happens over the course of a century or two. 
Your snarky comment aside, they probably would. We have massive population issues and any form of cull would do a lot for our impact on the Earth. At least some function would be served in the form of providing sustenance to the LGMs. So this particular hypothethical changes nothing. 
I don't think it matters one way or the other. Pigs don't have an interconnected species-wide conscious or the ability to analyze existence like we do. A pigs life and perspective is confined to what they experience directly; therefore if it is not subjected to prolonged pain and suffering and is harvested humanely, the pig won't know a difference between the long life and the short one. The fact of the matter is humans are the most successful species to ever inhabit earth, and we are omnivores whom enjoy eating meat that tastes good. So if we accept the fact that humans will always try to eat meat and produce it on a wide enough scale for anyone who wants it to have it available, then it will be true that pigs will be killed prematurely for their meat. So if they are being treated properly prior to slaughter I don't see a moral difference between the ten million or the one thousand.  
If every person on earth lived in constant fear of predators, fight for his live everyday and everyone would be eaten by tiger in young age or old age, then yes. If some alien race arrived on earth and do the same outcome (sudden death), but give as comfortable lives without fear and provide shelter and food, it wold be still shitty, but certainly better than before.  
I'm not a fan of slippery slope arguments. I don't understand how you put a human in the context of a farm animal. That's messed up. 
I don't think most people believe that life itself has value.  Sentience, perhaps, but not life. I've never seen anyone mourn bacteria, but they are as alive as any animal. 
But to say that letting them be alive is by itself enough, regardless of their quality of life, I think is questionable.   If one cannot raise an animal with a decent quality of life, they shouldn't be raising animals at all. 
I'm a vegetarian who hasn't even pork for even longer than I've been veg, but "do your research" is a copout argument to make. If you have proof of something, share it - "research it out" is the same thing conspiracy theorists say when they are unable to form compelling arguments.  
Because they're delicious, and human happiness is valued more than animal happiness.  
Not if you think that the animal wouldn't exist if it wasn't ultimately going to be eaten. I don't agree with the argument but you can't just take one part of it out of context and call it a contradiction.  
Shouldn't they eventually die out or lose a mass of population themselves eventually 
Beef cattle are tough and can take care of themselves. Free range cattle were a thing not long ago. 
I would say that cows and all other Animals used for human benefit, are our unwilling slaves.  
I mean it'd sure be better to be unfrozen 100 years later than to die huh.... but then again all your loved ones would be dead, I think it'd depend on the optimism of the person. 
There's also *The Forever War* by Joe Haldeman. Time dilation rather than stasis, but same effect. Society moves on without you. 
Do some research. We do not have massive population issues. As countries enter the first world we see a decrease and even negative population growth. Most first world countries are reaching a point where without immigrants to bolster the work force they are having issues with economic growth.   You would have to be either ignorant or racist to believe the world is having a population problem.  
Don't you find it a bit disturbing that depending on how cute one species finds another species, they can either be taken in as family or systematically bred and killed for hundreds of years? 
That's a good comparison to think about. A key factor that it overlooks though, is the difference between a wild caught adult tuna and a fish that is kept in a tiny container. A better comparison in most cases, would be to ask if you wanted to live in prison for an unknown amount of time or take your chances in the real world. 
No one would trade living a hard life in the wild to a wonderful life where every human being is eaten when they are 7  
So eating people is okay as long as their short lives were happy? 
It think it could be scaled, but plenty have argued the worst existence is better than non-existance. 
And we're equating the animal existing with it being good for the animal in this case why exactly? Or is your argument that existence trumps everything, and it doesn't matter what conditions the animal exists in?  Yeah guys, those chicken coups that are overcrowded with fat unhealthy chickens on top of each other three times over is really good for the chickens. It's GOOD when you give animals a diet that makes them unhealthy and sluggish. 
Well domestication does lead to reduced genetic diversity, which can leave domesticated plants and animals vulnerable to pests and diseases, and therefore can threaten our food supply. But there are feral populations of domesticated animals all over the world: feral dogs and cats, feral pigs, feral cattle in some areas, feral horses.  
Not as tough as Bison, and they almost went extinct. 
ok. I love my pets, so I'm fine with holding them as my slaves. If you think I should stop and release my cats into the wild, I'm all ears. 
The loved ones could have all chosen to freeze themselves and be unfrosted 100 years later too. 
Hahahaha the ignorance is astounding. India, Hong Kong, and China are having massive overpopulation issues, but I guess they just need to become first world countries, right? That will solve the issue completely, according to you. How simple.  The fact that you ignore the rest of the world and only use first or near-first world countries to support your claim is pretty disheartening to see on such an intelligent subreddit.  But go ahead, explain how this makes me racist. This should be good. I'm in need of a good laugh. 
No. It's all the same calculus: use a species for companionship, labor, or food. Whatever is beneficial.   And the lines aren't super distinct. Lambs and rabbits are cute and sometimes pets. But they're also food. I've eaten horse meat; it's pretty common in eastern Europe and a lot of other places, too.   
I am a peruvian and eat ocasionally guinea pigs, no doubt they are cute, but that is not the only factor taken into account when eating or not eating an animal 
Don't you find it disturbing that you are decimating millions of lifeforms everyday without even trying, whether you are eating meat or not? 
No. I think it's disturbing that animal welfare groups exist when there are still starving children in America. I don't care about animals. 
I agree with you, especially your closing paragraph. Curious though if you had a quick take on your opinion of the most successful species on earth?  
I had to check the subreddit a second time, because I was surprised to see that commenter use an emotional argument, instead of trying to understand, as you said, the subject of an argument obviously changes the applicability of ethics. 
Bringing it back to the aliens analogy - as far as we know, we aren't in any prisons. However, we could be in a prison the size of our galaxy, or the size of our observable universe. There could be a bigger world out there. Does it matter to us if we don't know whether we are in a prison?  If the fish in the tiny container doesn't know it is in a prison, and it doesn't know the existence of the sea, then the fish wouldn't even have thoughts on "taking its chances in the real world". 
Not that it matters, but we likely wouldn't be eaten until we were in our late teens, assuming we're being used for meat.  
Yes but you understand the wider repercussions right? That we will no long breed certain animals at all and they will cease to exist if we stop eating them? 
Better in what respect?  The bacteria don't care, obviously, having no consciousness. 
Those who commit suicide, especially those who fail the first time and go back to make sure they succeed the next time, seem to disagree with you. 
well that's the argument of the thread - that a bad existence is better than not existing at all . I definitely think it's a reasonable argument.  
Oh, no.. Of course not.  I should of been more specific.  I meant Animals used for food or clothing or fashion for humans. I absolutely think humans should have pets. Only if the pets are loved, and considered part of the family.  This would be my"perfect world".  Where no Animal is ever tortured, murdered, abused or unloved. I am a total Animal lover. I don't eat any meat or seafood or wear any fur or leather.  I also absolutely detest hunting.  Anyway,  those are just my views..    
This is a set-up for an even more tragic tale, where you're loved ones freeze themselves too, but don't get unfrozen until 100 years after you're unfrozen. 
I mean, yeah.  Historically as every country in the world has entered the first world they had a massive boom in population and then slowed down.  I guess if there was an example of that NOT happening I would take over-population seriously.  
Yeah, it's the same calculus, but I still find it disturbing. If I would live out in the wild and would have to kill animals to eat, sure, I'd do it. But the sheer scale of the current meat industry and how cold and inhuman the process feels, it really rubs me the wrong way. I'm thinking if the human race wasn't the apex predator and would be in the same shoes as pigs , I would be pretty livid about the situation of my species. 
I was putting two well known practical examples of how flawed that logic is when dealing with ethics, not actually appealing to emotions.  Anyway, ethics shouldn't be relative because then what is right or wrong will always be favored on the side that gets the most benefit or sustains the power, which invalidates the own purpose of ethics. And that is what my comment was about. 
Hey, help me understand this but I think he's right. In his argument the thing to be applied is whether a certain thing has rights. What makes something have rights doesn't change with what subject you apply it to. If the criteria is being a rational autonomous agent that doesn't change if you apply it to the cheetah or a chair or whatever. The person you commented to said that his argument was as simple as if it's okay to kill x it's okay to kill y therefore since it's okay to kill a mosquito it's okay to kill a human. This is a straw man since he never said that those are the criteria for making something right or wrong. He was simply stating that the criteria has to be consistent no matter what the subject is. Now what the criteria is is a different discussion but if we take it to be a rational autonomous agent then killing a mosquito is okay and killing a human is *not* right. It satisfies the criteria and we personally like the answer so there we have it.  
I get what you're saying and it works in most cases. There's just no good argument for it when it's something like a chicken or a pig and is kept from even being in any environment and moving the way nature intended it to and injected with crazy hormones and painful unavoidable situations. With the aliens, we've got opportunities still and at least a few thousand times more choices than the caged animals do, even if we are confined to this tiny planet among countless others, we have enough space to travel millions of times our body area, rather than be strapped to a bed in a prison cell and force fed enough to survive and provide adequate life force for aliens. If it were between that and ending it all I think I'd take the extinction option. 
Why would they cease to exist if we stop eating them? If they're living a good life then they are capable of breeding and procreating. They only cease to exist if we chose for that to happen.  
Couldn't the same argument be made about small children and the developmentally disabled? Would they be able to fend for themselves? 
You didn't land on the moon nor did you contribute to those feats. Claiming the genius of a comparatively tiny percentage of humans on behalf of our entire species as justification for why we are all superior to all other animals seems a weak argument. 
It surely is more comforting to think that. I don't see how that's reasonable. Is there a line there? Give birth to a baby and throw it in a dumpster. Is that a benefit to the baby because it "exists" for now? Same argument goes for other animals. That's just lunacy. 
This seems unfair to me that I would be regulated to eating plants while some animals would be allowed to eat other animals. 
So you believe it's fine to hold an animal in your home to the day it dies 20 years later, completely controlling when it eats, and when it even shits, manipulating its behavior to suit your needs, training it with psychological techniques like the carrot and the stick, and ultimately deciding when it dies. But the second you eat the meat or use its fur for fashion, it becomes immoral? 
All the parallel universes and alternate situation theories don't mean squat, because humans ARE the apex predator of this planet and therefore make the rules. Either by virtue of being most adaptable and/or lucky, though in truth it doesn't even matter how we got here. All nature cares about is force and we've been most forceful so far. A big rock could change that, or an extraterrestrial specie, or a microbe but until then we write the rules.    
Stop anthropomorphising animals. A pig would have no qualms about eating you if it had the chance.  
Yeah, but there are people that care more about animals and I think that's disturbing.  
I don't think we settle philosophical debates primarily on whether or not a position could be misconstrued and misused. People can twist about anything to suit their ends. Our response should be to correct dishonesty, not to make some ideas off-limits just because dishonest people might interpret them dishonestly. 
What if we free the caged animal of all of its constraints, while still being caged? Consider virtual reality chickens with foot treadmills. 
Are you not aware that some farm animals can't survive without human intervention? They've been bred this way. Many species will quickly go extinct. 
What argument are you referring to? Children and disabled people aren't eaten as far as I know. 
Compared to not being born at all? Yes it's probably better to be born and then thrown in a dumpster. It depends on if you live long enough to enjoy life enough to outweigh the pain of a slow death presumably.  
This has literally no relevance, nor does it matter what a pig would do. The whole point is we have the ability to think in ways that they do not, which makes it all the important NOT to. 
A meat free diet uses a lot less space which can then be used to feed more people, if you really care about starving children you'll cut the meat.  Will you? Or will you keep being angry at people for doing good things?  
He's pointing out that women are a different subject y then animals x yet we still apply the same argument that they have moral consideration. Are they sentient? Or are they a rational autonomous agent? You determine whether the subject meets the criteria and make a decision. The argument is not different if it's x rather than y, which is what he was saying.  
Again I can agree with that. But then we have to make first a distinction between what is suited for philosophical debate only and what is suited/intended for practical use. And well, when the subject is directly related to ethics it really needs to be grounded to reality and practical use (and misuse). In fact it must be "bulletproof" against misuse and dishonesty because if not the result goes against the own true purpose ethics is about. 
Your argument that comparing animals to humans due to intelligence is bullshit. There are plenty of humans that are less intelligent than animals, and could not fend for themselves. While I agree humans should not be compared to animals in terms of eating each, I don't think intelligence can be the reason why. 
What if that baby dies after a day or a few hours or however long babies can survive without anything? Then has that been a better situation than not being born at all? In this analogy, the animals get eaten, so I don't know why you thought the imagined baby in my analogy was going to do anything but die in the dumpster.  Of course it's OK to be in a dumpster for a few hours as an infant and then go onto have a prosperous life. That's not what I was implying happening at all though. 
When most of us donate from our small excess, we express a concern and entrust the money to those with expertise; when Gates donates, he sets the agenda.  I feel like the writer thought of something similar to this sentence above first and then grasped at straws to write an entire article to support such an edgy statement.  
This article drips with jealousy and mis-directed aggression. More over, its built off the idea that a person does not have the right to determine their own preferred way of giving. Utter garbage.  
"If philanthropy means love of others, it must prove itself by entrusting the material of that love to the intended recipients. To believe in the dignity of other human beings is to honor their capacity to choose."  I disagree. You can define love in other ways. Same with dignity. One can feasibly argue that "I love you too much to let you hurt yourself, and will manage your material affairs for you" is a form of philanthropy.  "Nothing is mine or yours, but it is ours because we are part of the same divine communism."  This person is going to earnestly use the word communism, and use it in quoting the moral authority of the Catholic Church, no less? I'm growing gravely concerned for the morality involved here. What happens to those sinful heathens which stand in opposition to the divine communism? History gives us a glimpse.. 
This article is terrible.   Schneider is bordering on delusion if he thinks the politicians that are appointed to "run" the public school system are more qualified than Gates or Zuckerberg, let alone try to dictate how they choose to distribute their money.  Schneider meanders through this piece like my grandmother relaying the details of her Wednesday afternoon bridge game. He ran out of anything useful to say after about 200 words. Yeesh.   
Yeah, Gates who donated billions for humanity and worked half his life towards saving lives. People have to learn that spitting on philantropists just to clickbait people to their worthless article is both moronic and incredibly fcked up 
I found this article interesting, I didn't particularly agree with everything, but appreciated some of the the attention to detail in the arguments.  In some respects the charitable nature of Gates, and Zuckerburg are like the idea of a benevolent dictator. Not that they are dictators, but in the sense that they are using their acquired power in a benevolent way - sure perhaps their wealth has accumulated through a less than ideal way (depending on your economic ideaology) but their actions are still 'good'.  It seems a little futile to bemoan that such people are able to set agendas with their wealth and actions when after all the same could be applied to any person who sets such an agenda, democratic political systems are not so perfect as to claim special pleading for their right to dictate policy.  
charity = steal ten loaves of bread from the working class and then give one back to the poor 
Don't get why there's so many people shutting their brain off in this thread.  The article simply makes a case that modern philanthropy is driven by selfishness.  It's selfish to hoard so much money when building wealth. It's selfish to solely dictate what should or shouldn't get funding. It's selfish to use foundations and charity to remain relevant after life.  The author is stating that there is a more altruistic means for doing good.  Whether it produces net good isn't the point of this discussion. While it's not perfect, personally, I'm a fan of Chuck Feeney's style of philantrophy.  It feels more genuine. 
Good post.   A person had to be pretty ruthless to believe their contribution to production is so significantly higher than everyone else's.   To accumulate such wealth means excessively over charging and then acting like Mr(s) bountiful when giving the money back instead of it being distributed democratically like people's taxes are. 
r/Philosophy is one of the few places on Reddit that actually has users who use logic and critical thinking before jumping on the socialist utopia bang wagon every time an article like this is posted, especially one with such misinformation.  
Honestly fuck anyone who makes a point against philanthropy. They're helping people, take a step back, pull your head out of your ass, and let someone help someone with analyzing every way that it's actually bad. 
Oh the irony," these rich people shouldnt decide how to give their own money away, they should listen to me and how i want them to give it away..... btw my brother was a panhandling heroin addict for years, all the people who gave him money on the street, he used to to put poisin directly in his veins......all in all these writter seems like a idiot with little real life experience. 
It makes me very proud to be a Catholic when I see Catholic Intellectualism as it has shown itself all throughout History from Augustine to Aquinas the Renaissance to Gregor Mendel.  A controversial angle the author did not discuss is essentially Gates and the Buffets are just creating tax shelters and shell companies with the cover they are charities.  There is very little redeeming about what they are doing.  Also, the problem with America is the Poor Man's Excuse i.e. "If you are so smart why aren't you rich," which leads to the corollary, "You're so rich you must be smart."  No one really realizes that whatever gifts these people have it's a niche gift, like asking Lamar Odom to work on your legal case only this time it is salesmanship.  Blessed be the Lord to the Author and we Catholics must forever continue our intellectualism.  
The article can be summed up as this: instead of private people are giving money, the government should just tax all that money, that way the people get control of the spending, instead odd the rich guy.   
It said that they both attended public highschool.  
See this is why I love reddit.  When the article title seems so ridiculous and makes no sense i just go to the top comment and see what they have to say.  If it's been up voted enough it's like hey... alot of other people must agree with him on this and it's probably all bullshit so why waste my time reading.  Thank you fellow redditors for saving my time. 
It addresses an interesting moral/political claim that is a pretty rare take on value and economy. While it is not philosophy exactly, I think it adds to the subreddit despite its faults. 
IKR. There are so many billionaires that haven't done jack shit for the world, who lobby for lower taxes, put their money overseas, and exploit their employees. We need MORE billionaires like Bill Gates.  
Right?  If people are going to shit on me for doing good work in the world, I may as well leave my money invested for myself and not bother to share it. 
Bill Gates never did anything evil? Google "microsoft antitrust" and report back.  It will probably surprise a lot of young people who only know Gates for his philanthropy, but back in the 90's Bill and Microsoft caught a ton of shit for their undeniably shady business practices. 
You must have missed Bill Gates in the 90's then. He destroyed innovation right and left. 
Well put!  Evil capitalism! Evil Bill Gates working 20 hours a day coding as a teenager. Evil Bill Gates building a company that made billions of lives better and more productive. Evil Bill Gates giving away 10's of billions of dollars for no other reason than he can and thinks its the right thing to do.  The author of this article is an entitled jackass and most of these comments are horrifying.  
It's funny how the Catholic church in my own country don't want to apologize to victims of church sanctioned paedophilia until they are compelled by a court but feel so brazen as to wave the flag of, "human beings have an innate dignity and you best respect that", when pointing the finger at other people. Other people who spend billions of dollars curing disease nonetheless.  
America magazine is a Jesuit publication. I didn't read the article, but somebody using the church to support Communism is laughable.  
The teachers should run the school systems not people with contrary interests to both the students and teachers. 
I enjoyed the read because its interesting to think about how if we assume the catechism is correct that "The goods of creation are destined for the whole human race" how can we reconcile that with the idea of the philanthropy or "love of all people" being increasingly controlled by powerful individuals who then decide what that "love of all people" means.  
I remember, as a young boy, when Microsoft's cronies came to our home and stole my mother's pearls. Then they peeled out while chugging Red Bull, leaving only a copy of Windows 95 in their wake. Damn capitalists! Stop making things people have a use for, you know we can't control ourselves! 
You have to really abuse the word "selfish" to construe working one's whole life to generate a fortune and then giving it away to be "selfish". If you don't like what these people are doing with your fortune you are free to make your own and give it to the government or a public trust.  Having the government seize it and waste a lifetime of work in a few days of war and wiretapping is a position driven by envy and bitterness. 
Most tax money funds wars, waste and corruption. None of the money these people put to philanthropic use will be used to explode brown people on the other side of the planet.  You're making the assumption that tax money is disbursed fairly or democratically. It is a faulty one. 
This is reliant on the people controlling government spending.   In reality, you're just broadening the pool of rich people who have a say in what is done with the money. 
The problem with relying on governmen for charity t is that government have to be accountable to many different purposes/people whereas private people are only accountable to their organizational purpose. If we tax people, the government in power needs to stay in power; they might funnel that money to fund pork-barrel projects or other purposes which can change the moment the political party in power changes. Obama wants to help illegal immigrants, Trump wants to prevent them.   In contrast private charity organizations only have two goals. One is to remain solvent and two to help that specific goal. So there's less "masters" so to speak, allowing you to be laser focused on a goal, irrespective of whether its a liberal or conservative in power.  
Hmm, if this were to happen then rich people would work even harder to isolate their wealth, pass it on to the their kids, and oligarchs would rise against our government- as opposed to get in bed with them. It'd be wonderful for offshore banks though.  
That's a bunch of shit.   The philosopher king, capitalist with a heart, etc. mentality is one of the things that makes this country great.  People like Bill Gates, Rockefeller, Carnegie all made shit tons of money. All of them realized they couldn't take it with them. So after they made computers personal, kick started the American oil industry, expanded the American steel industry they took that wealth and did more great things with it. That's what being a capitalist is all about.   Take away that power and you will be left with nothing but countless clones of the Koch Brothers.   I'll never be a billionaire, but my dreams of how to spend the money fall much more closely with Gates and Rockefeller than Gina Rinehart or our own gilded Caesar, Donald Trump.   "The people" have a say in how public funds are used. They have no right to dictate how private wealth is spent.  
I do feel the need to ask - Why do you phrase going to private school as if it's a bad thing that should exclude people from making important decisions? 
Your article is one of the most ignorant and misinformed that I've read in a long time.  You apparently wrote this for the shock value, just to be counter-cultural; it's attention seeking. Whatever flaws Gates and other wealthy philanthropists have, they are a net positive force while your work merely shows that you are a drain. You should re-think yourself and what you are doing with your life. If you can't figure out how to write about something more meaningful you should change careers, soon. I hope you take this comment seriously and constructively.  
So, you want people in charge of charities who are good as screwing people over?  The problem with Gates is not that he is a capitalist, but that the way he built his wealth was by screwing over everyone he could, to establish a monopoly. 
If he said "I suspect" would that make you feel better? 
We need fewer billionaires, we need more of the current billionaires to be more like Bill Gates and less like the Koch brothers. 
No. They aren't comparable. It is natural that every business will attempt to garner a larger share of the market. And it's the job of regulators to make sure that monopolies don't get too big. Not to mention how complex it was in the 90s to define a monopoly in an entirely new market such as the internet was. It's not at all easy to say that a company that creates a software can't bundle their software with their own browser. I still believe it's entirely arbitrary to say that they can't. But that's beyond my purview. And it's probably for the best (for the consumer) that they were considered a monopoly. But that doesn't compare to Carnegies Union busting tactics.   
You could argue if Gates hadnt accumulated the wealth he has due to the monopoly of Microsoft, then less of that wealth would have been spread around to create as much good in the world.   For all the wrong Carnegie did, thanks to him, Pittsburgh became a very literate and well educated city which led to a well grounded foundation to help create a city that is now home to one of the best medical universities in the world, which has lead the way for medical breakthrus for decades. 
Yeah.... no.  The antitrust charges brought against Microsoft were stupid even in the 90's.  Look at the market today - is Microsoft even close to winning the browser war?  Nope. 
You're thinking in absolutes.  You can be kind and selfish at the same time.  I don't get why you're taking offense, it's a perspective, you have a small mind and smaller ego. 
He's using a phrase, which in English is commonly put in quotes. 
Congratulations you win Reddit's award for GATE, Gifted and Talented Education, you are a certified Reddit Genius.  How is the employment market for you?  But who cares, because you earn a few points.  Lady, you are not a man, I'm just writing from the top of my head this is a message board not an Academic Journal.  And for the record I find your writing rambling and lacking substance. You don't so much disagree with me or make effort to disagree beyond, "I really care about how I write on Reddit and I am better than you for it, but I cannot discuss my love for Bill Gates or why you are wrong beyond I really care about my writing style."   
Explode Brown people? I feel you could have reached a little deeper there. 
If we know what they're going to do, we can preemptively work to stop it 
Cool, they can live somewhere else without taxes then, like Somalia. 
Trickle down economy has been proven not to work, though. The idea that the wealthy will use their wealth to create jobs, etc and strengthen the economy hasn't really worked out.  
When people did that in FDR's era, he went and ordered the confiscation of everyone's gold, and then his New Deal policies went on to revitalize the US economy.  
That's actually not what I mean at all. I'm merely trying to evaluate what direct experience or expertise these people might have to justify their immense potential impact on the sector of public education. Having attended public schools is one example of such experience, albeit an incredibly minimal one.  
OP is admitting mistakes, apologizing for them, thanking people for corrections, and fixing mistakes... as well as trying to identify how the mistakes were made in the first place. How much more seriously do you want them to take it? 
Wow, you're negative.  Hey, maybe Gates can "screw over" malaria, eh? 
First, I agree with you, in principle.  If we are arguing about the potential positive uses of philanthropy and comparing modern rich people to those of the past, the Kochs are similar and will likely be remembered similarly to Carnegie and Rockefeller. Go see the sights in NYC and you'll be greeted by the Koch plaza at the Met, the Koch theater (or something) at Lincoln Center, and (seriously) the Koch Hall of Human Origins at the Natural History Museum.   They are spending their money to plaster their names on things so they'll be remembered well, and if the barons of the past are any indication, they will be, by most. They will also likely set up a foundation that 'helps people,' but that's just speculation on my part. 
He completely omits that not all billionaires are about excessive lifestyles. Warren Buffet comes across as a man who happens to be rich. When Berkshire Hathaway takes an interest in a company, they often leave it as is. They call them a few times a year. They don't' try to squeeze every cent out of it and screw people over.   Warren Buffet identified a successful investment style that does not screw anyone over and got rich. He is giving his wealth to the less fortunate when he passes. He currently lives in the modest house, that he brought decades ago and flew commercial until he could not stand being hounded for stock tips.  
I'm no fan of the political aims of the Koch brothers but they do a lot of good work, such as criminal justice reform. They live on Palm Beach, not far from me, and donate tons of money to local organizations. I just wish they would stop meddling in government.  
Ideally shouldn't businesses try to grow with the goal of not being assholes?  If we need separate regulation entities, wouldn't we have to regulate the regulators? 
I'm sorry but this is a lousy argument.   Plenty of mob bosses donated huge sums of money to their communities.  It might seem to make them more human but it doesn't.  It was never their money to give away.  What is done with ill gotten gains is irrelevant. 
The fact that a crime didn't have the outcome you expected doesn't mean it wasn't a crime. 
Well, I tried to discuss, but yeah let's go with insults instead. 
The only money from Gates that will be used to kill people is money taken from him in taxes. The money he gives away will go to unambiguously good uses, like wiping out diseases that plague humanity. Is that simpler? 
Or Anguilla, Bahamas, Cayman Islands, Guernsey, UAE, British Virgin Islands, Monaco, and to some extent, Switzerland. But they have already done that.   And Somalia have taxes by the way, so you're wrong.   
If I take a bunch of cash out of my credit (cash advance on a credit card), I haven't revitalized my economy. FDR did this. Now, to be fair, that cash can stir things up and create opportunities (hello, world of finance), but the debt remains unless paid back... duh, right? But the baby boomers haven't paid the debt back yet... so what happens to the debt? I suppose we can pass it on to the NEXT generation in the same way we received it?   In regards to GDP, and the formula that goes into GDP, a la Keynesian economics, the debt doesn't really matter! But, use your brains... does debt matter?    
It's kinda retarded op has negative votes for admitting his mistake and correcting it... The point of living is to learn not circlejerk people foe fucking up 
He has a point though, how can you trust a person that succeed by only looking for his interest to be in charge of someone else's? Thats why the old " Lets run the government like a business" doesnt work, because CEO's have only their own interest in mind not others. Then again I am not familiar with Gates work. 
This doesn't at all fit extreme leftism. This is an article talking strictly about confiscation of wealth from two left-leaning families. If it were about confiscating Koch money then I might agree that it's leftist, but it just seems like you're attacking the entire subreddit with an accusation that would imply extreme self-harm. 
Yeah this sub is so political biased toward the far left that most people here are defending Zuckerberg and Bill Gates using voluntaristic and right-libertarian rhetoric (they built their fortune why you angry leftists want to dictate how they spend their money) 
So...you want a humanist oligarchy,  despite the fact that capitalism is based on *self*-interest? That's so absurd I don't even know where to begin. 
That's a problem of government. The Koch brothers are acting like rational economic actors. If you knew the government was going to subsidize competition (thus hurting your business), you'd be stupid (or extremely principled) to not try and stop that through politicking? 
The US typically uses governmental agencies as regulators.  These agencies are regulated by the US government, which is in turn regulated by the US voterbase.  Or at least that's how it's supposed to work.   
If they have shareholders, you could go so far as to say it's an obligation.  
This seems to miss the important nuance of the dynamic youre talking about.  Surely if you stole the already-forgotten couch cushion change from a million people and saved a hundred lives, the benefit would far outweigh what would have been done if that loose change was ever found.  Surely if you stole money from someone who was about to hire thugs to beat up some protestors and used it to half the suicide rate, the result is a net positive, and nobody should be screaming to put the world back the way it was with missing kneecaps and depressed folks offing themselves.  Bottom line: We can't say that illegally gotten gains are morally irrelevant without considering the actual situations involved and their relative moral weight. 
Bill Gates didn't kill, coerce, maim, rape, sell drugs, or intimidate people into letting go of their businesses to get that money. He simply paid them to give up control of their IP and rolled it into his business model.  Everyone seems to think the PC market was a sure thing when he broke in. It wasn't, he took huge risks and was rewarded accordingly for his business model. Look at all the companies that have risen and fell in tech the last 30 years.  That part aside, your argument is as short sighted as it is bravely uneducated. Philanthropy is to be lauded and encouraged, regardless of the cause or source. You think dying kids in Africa give a shit where the money came from that is saving their life? 
You started with insults, continued with insults and had two sentences of argument A and B, which to me sounded like you were being more prissy than philosophical (that is to counter your upcoming argument that you were only providing helpful criticism. Well, so am I)  Honestly, how scared is Bill Gates of me that he gets two PR people and wastes their time writing on Reddit?  Even if Reddit people worship that's only a small fraction of the monumental number of people who hate him all over the world.  Tell him I said that and I'm going to be a thorn on his side.  What is he gonna' do about it? 
Stop acting like he asked you to dumb it down.  He was asking you to critically evaluate your own biases, and you failed. 
How about taking away income taxes and replacing them with progressive gross revenue taxes?  Independent wealth is worth encouraging. Endless accumulation of private sector capital - not so much. 
That may be the point of living in your philosophy, but I think you'll find that the point of internet comments is to sit around and judge other people's work as awesome or total dogshit, with no deeper nuance. 
Just realized that wouldn't be all that weird to see in this thread so yes, definite /s.   And as a Econ major it's weird seeing people say that capitalists should be in control of charitable distribution because they've proven they can not and will not act in the economic interests of anyone but themselves. We've seen a stratifying of laborers wages and a sharp increase in global inequality for this reason.  Next thing you know, people will be *asking* for regulatory capture. 
Gates' work is basically this: he's making measurable progress in making malaria a thing of the past.  He's literally winning against malaria and people want to criticise him for being a rich CEO type?  Gates is not looking to be in charge of someone else's work, he's doing his own work, doing it well, and spending his own money on it. 
The idea is leftist and extreme regardless of who you're punishing with it. 
And they're defending it in response to an article that advocates taking their wealth from them and transferring it to the government, a position that has many defenders on here despite being extreme. 
So hypothetically we could have benevolent corporations being sabotaged by malicious, anti-business voters. 
It's not, that's a myth spread by free-market propagandists. there is no legal maxim to promote shareholder value. corporations have many stakeholders, including but not limited to: employees, customers, suppliers, bond-holders. 
Your and a few others arguments in this thread keep talking about the money donated would never have been donated were it not stolen.  How can we assume the rightful owners of those funds wouldn't have donated some or all of their money to charitable causes?  How do you account for their loss on compared with the benefit received by the charities?  Doesn't that diminish the overall value of the donation possibly even to the point of nil?    What kind of  behavior does this promote?  Greedy people can cheat and steal away money from innocent others but they can buy forgiveness in the form of charitable giving?  What century do we live in? 
He's going to do nothing because I'm a random internet user, and not a shill.  Fully two thirds of my post was spent discussing points A, B, and C, which I felt were the critical parts of your post.  I'm sorry you're not in the mood to discuss. 
Taxing revenues would cause huge issues for lower income individuals as affordable products typically run slim margins and use efficiencies of scale to turn a profit. Those companies would have no choice but to pass on those expenses, raising prices on those least able to pay them. That in turn requires greater assistance, which requires greater taxation, and the cycle continues.  Profits are a much better item to tax, the larger issue is the depth and complicatedness of the tax code. Simplifying would be a better way to increase tax revenues honestly. It removes loop holes and causes a more even playing field between major companies with large tax departments finding all the ways to avoid tax vs a small company with a bookkeeper and quickbooks.  
Gates is not a single dimensional figure though. As a CEO he was a champion of his own interests alone not unlike any other Silicon Valley exec. Microsoft is notorious for their anti competition actions  
TIL taxation is extreme. If that is your idea of philosophy this sub is screwed.  
No, it isn't. They exist for one reason, and that's to make money. The interests of their non-owner "stakeholders" are considered insofar as to whether employees staying means more productivity and/or lower costs, etc. /u/cincofone is right, publicly owned corporations can and do get sued for not trying to generate profits. 
And Netscape was essentially run out of business in the interim.  * Lol downvotes? Sorry, i forgot that netscape is still a thriving business. 
No, they exist to do whatever the owners want to do. If that's to make money, that's what they do. Sometimes owners have slightly different priorities. There is no law telling them they have to make money no matter what or that dictates shareholders can only want increasing profits at the expense of all else.   People get sued for all kinds of things. Did these shareholders win? And if they did is it because they had previously demanded profit be the only priority? Because then that would make sense. 
Just curious, but how much did netscape cost back in the day? 
I guess I'm still missing something about how Gettier's argument is so stunning, and I've read his original examples.   Doesn't his argument rely on a weakening of "justification"? I think JTB only holds if you hold a strong view on justification. In other words, combine "justified true" into "proven". A proven belief is knowledge. The Gettier examples are pretty much mistakes in proof, so that's why they aren't knowledge.  
I've always been confused about one thing: why do we call the true belief in these examples justified? That seems to be the reason I don't think of these examples as knowledge -- they're *apparently* justified, but not *actually* justified, in that the "justification" isn't actually linked to the truth. The "justification" in these examples is just evidence. Evidence might or might not be directly linked to the truth -- seeing you drive a given car is some evidence that you own that kind of car, but if the car you're driving isn't yours, it doesn't feel like a "justification," just a coincidence that accidentally led you to the truth. 
Just about to read the article. Wanted to say that I have aspired to be Gettier for a long time now. Its the best possible life version of trying exactly ONCE by writing a paper in 15 minutes, succeeding so so hard, and being like "PEACE ' OUT BITCHES." Legend. 
JTB is not a perfect definition of Knowledge as Gettier showed, but it is the best we have, methinks.  
The argument in the blog post doesnt work (haven't read the original paper). It only seems to work by muddying the waters in omitting argumentative steps. When Kanye sees the described guy his conclusion should firstly be "I can see Mark Zuckerberg standing before me" which would not suffice JTB. Inversly the justification for him knowing Zuckerberg is at the concert is also "I can see Mark Zuckerberg standing before me". It works by not firstly identifying "guy" as Markzuckerberg but taking the identification as true before testing it and then drawing a conclusion from it. I'm interested to look at the paper though. 
I feel like the implications of Gettier's problem are overstated. It is an edge case. But we've known for thousands of years that people can be mistaken about their perceptions. For our everyday uses of the term 'knowledge', justified true belief still applies. 
Great article! Surprisingly funny too. The negatives in your first example were a bit confusing (Kanye knows his class *isn't* tired but think I wrapped my head around it.  My instinct is to say that if the guy that Kanye saw wasn't Zuckerberg then he isn't really justified in believing it. If that's the case, then the example doesn't prove the justified-true-belief view false.  Have you thought about that idea? 
Y'all try to tie justification with the truth, but leaving formal problems on the other hand, try to follow that Kanye will act with certainty that Zuckerberg is over there, and he is. Therefore knowledge capability to emerge in dynamical coordination with reference subject IS possible even with inexact justification, what is more, higher level concepts might affect justification of lower level concepts. Justification is not necessary if things are going right and if we assume that belief is not "truth-false choose one" but some kind of a subject reproducement.  
Gettier was not the first. Gettier seems to me, as a lay person in the field of philosophy, merely restating what Descartes wrote: Namely, I think therefore I am. Cartesian philosophy marks the entry of philosophy into the modern era precisely for the reason that it parted so severely with the ancients understanding of epistemology.   Descartes idea is that he can not be sure of any truth except the truth that he exists because that is irrefutably true on the basis that to deny his own existence only affirms he exists as a thinking thing--a res cogitans. Conclusion: cogito ergo sum.  Gettier merely reformulates Rene's original philosophical query. And I am JTB, as a scholar of philosophy, knowing what a scholar of philosophy knows, he knew this, hence he reason for his reluctance and humility on the matter.  
The line " you can't know things you don't believe" is off.. If I know something I dont have to believe you or take your word for it cuz I already know 
As a programmer I'd say add a fourth condition tying the first 3.  Belief must be true because of the justification.  When they added the justification rule they didn't go far enough to ensure it's real knowledge.   Or you can argue the justification has to be valid.  Since Kanye was wrong about what he saw, the definition of justification should be tweaked.  Who really cares if they didn't quite get it right.  Plenty of things get updated...  
Zagsebski (i think thats how her name is spelled) helps highlight the  main tension that Gettier cases bring up. If your view of knowledge includes a form of justification which is independent of truth to some extent then it will be susceptible to counter examples where even though you will fulfil whatever set of conditions you want then you will not have a case of what one would intuitively call knowledge.   
Doesn't it seem then like you're in the category of "throw up your hands and admit that you can never 'know' anything"? 
Well yeah, one solution to Gettier cases is to get rid of the JTB analysis of knowledge. One can view knowledge as a belief that is true, and is adequately causally related to the fact in question.   I.e. (Agent) S knows that (proposition) p if and only if S's belief that p is causally connected to the fact that p.  In a case in which Kanye forms the belief that Zuckerberg is at the concert, and it is true that Zuckerberg is at the concert. Kanye's belief does not count as knowledge because he doesn't believe that Zuckerberg is at the concert *because* Zuckerberg is at the concert. He forms the belief because he sees someone that looks like Zuckerberg.    
I read somewhere that he has the highest citations-to-words-written-ratio by a factor of at least 10!! 
JTB + ABILITY to reflect on one's answer was my Epistemology professor's favorite 
There are scores of Gettier examples out there, and the paper is only 3 pages long. Don't judge the Gettier problem on this humoristic riff.  
I'm surprised that someone with quality knowledge of what constitutes JTB hasn't read Gettier. Is he not well known in your circles? (I'm genuinely curious) 
Although this is logical, can't we say that the belief is justified if the person looks exactly like Zuckerberg to Kanye ? (Also the example in the paper itself doesn't have this problem.)  
It's not about believing outside testimony. The common definition for knowledge has been "justified true belief" up until the time of Gettier. Do you think knowledge does not require belief? 
I don't think I agree with this. Kanye can't know that Zuckerberg is in his audience from this evidence, but I don't see how it follows from that he can never know anything, or even that he can't know Zuckerberg is there. If, for example, he saw the actual Zuckerberg, then his belief would seem to be justified. 
Yeah, that's more or less how I describe justification. The Gettier problem is about mistaken justification, which just isn't justification at all.  Of course, this *proper* justification is probably impossible... But it's not like any of us thought knowledge was possible to begin with, did we? 
The problem with this is that Zuckerberg presence could have be part of the cause chain that caused his look-alike to be there. Suppose he brought a look-alike to confuse paparazzi. Then we could say Zuckerberg being there is causally connected to Kanye's belief that Zuckerberg is in the concert, but it doesn't seem that we should say that Kanye knows that Zuckerberg is there anymore that if there no causal connection at all. 
I would argue knowledge replaces belief upon reception. You believe something UNTIL it is proven to you.. then you know it/ understand its actuality 
And this seems like a rather pointless nitpick. We all knew what the OP was referring to. 
Don't you mean processors are digital circuits that are really good at pretending to be analog? 
It's weird that you would say this because I think knowledge specifically is a pretty terrible candidate for multi-valued logic. We precisely do not find expressions concerning a spectrum of knowledge in ordinary language, which we do find when it comes to e.g. justification. You can be more or less justified, and have every point on the spectrum from 0% to 100% count as some level of justification. But if you "half know" something, or 80% know something, then you don't know it; the percentage signals how close you are to knowing it, not what your degree of actual knowledge is.  
The short version is that I dislike how these cognitive scientists trespass on philosophical territory, how breezily they do it, and also of course the intellectual nihilism that would come with total philosophical skepticism. 
Well then, as the blog poster notes, there's no problem. You just decided to take the route of "going nuclear and declaring that no one knows anything" 
No this isn't a problem. It's true that their presence *could* be connected. But their presence is not necessarily connected. 
1) Changed it to q and s  2) Exactly. P *does not* have knowledge *despite* having a justified true belief. Gettier is not claiming p has knowledge - he is claiming JTB is not sufficient to say someone has knowledge and using this as an example where p has JTB but not knowledge.   3) That's how you get the No False Lemmas theory of propositional knowledge that defines knowledge as JTB + no false Lemmas (steps to gain J that do not themselves fulfil the conditions of JTB) It still has problems, but it stops this kind of example working.  
Maybe I am missing something, but I think the point is is that just because A is wrong does not mean we can say B is wrong (just because we aren't ACTUALLY seeing Zuck before us does not mean he isn't at the concert). 
Ok, so if you know the sky is blue, you don't believe the sky is blue. Is that what your view implies?  
You're using specific colloquial definitions of "belief" and "knowledge" that aren't used in philosophy.  In philosophy, to believe a proposition is just to affirm it as true. Belief isn't the opposite of knowledge, because you can't know something without believing, that is, without affirming it as true. 
I agree. /u/KingOCarrotFlowers is being a pedant and derailing any meaningful conversation by side stepping the intent behind the metaphor. 
Electricity is analog.  Continuous and variable.  We emulate digital in computers by pretending that transistors have two finite states.  But they arent finite, they are silicon filled sufficiently with electrons to allow other electrons to pass. On and off are the binary states that we pretend a transistor is in depending on its analog electrical properties.  
I think this is a language issue, not a philosophical one. We literally can't justifiably get binary certainty in epistemology. Descartes demon for instance. This also fits well with a Kantian "thing in itself" vs "appearance" framing  
Just gonna note that there is nothing nihilistic about skepticism. That is simply to misunderstand the position. The skeptic says "and so we must define/create meaning/pretend and not get caught up in absolutes and natural kinds as would be given by the world" 
It's your objections to total philosophical skepticism I'm interested in. What do you mean by "intellectual nihilism"? Is this outcome the only or primary reason you have for rejecting that position or is there something wrong with the arguments themselves? 
I don't get it. Why is one necessarily connected but not the other one? 
It doesn't mean that he isn't at the concert, but it means we don't know that he's at the concert. Since the point of this argument is the nature of knowledge, it's sufficient to note that the evidence we were relying on is misleading in order to validly say that we don't have knowledge. 
A better example might be if I tell you I know my right foot is at the end of my right leg. I don't believe it, I know it. You may not believe it, you may think I believe it and am wrong. But I know it especially when I'm walking.  I think knowledge is immediate and current. Belief is dependence on things not immediate and current to you.. if that makes sense. That's my understanding of it 
But you can believe something without knowing it. No?? 
Doesn't this assume that all computers run on electricity?  I get that practically, you're correct, but technically, not all computers rely on electricity to operate.  
But even if that is the way you view skepticism, there is something nihilistic about it if there are no real standards for how we create meaning or categorize things (or pretend to). And skepticism doesn't allow such real standards, since it doesn't allow any reasons to exist which really make anything right regardless of what anyone pretends. Also if all meaning is created, as if by acts of fiction, then the (logical or ethical) meaning that takes the skeptic to that exhortation either doesn't exist or depends circularly on it. 
Big question. Idk how to summarize my answer to it. I feel like "intellectual nihilism" covers a lot of it. I have something like a moral certainty that it makes sense (ethically, epistemically, etc.) to have and give reasons, that they have meaning and value and import, that truth is important, etc. And total skepticism destroys all that, which of course also means it destroys its own basis, but a certain kind of satanic temperament wouldn't mind that. I just think it's evil, so that alone is enough to imply there must be something wrong with the arguments. But also, of course, like I said, I don't think the argument from the prototype theory of concepts to relativism about truth, knowledge, and existence works, since I think it's wrong about the nature of concepts. And that was the skeptical argument that was on the table.  
Heap: At least 2 grains if they can stand of each other or the minimum required to have more than a 1-unit line. 
I wasn't referring to the first guy who Kanye initially mistook for Zuckerberg. I am supposing that if Kanye were to later lay eyes on the real Zuckerberg, how could he be sure it was actually Zuckerberg rather than a second guy who also looks like Zuckerberg? The Sorites Paradox is exactly my point, it seems that either a) Kanye knows it's really Zuckerberg based only on an intuitive and vague concept of "reasonable certainty," or b) he cannot know it at all (or much else it seems). I am not necessarily suggesting that nothing can be known, merely illustrating how a rigorous delineation of justification could boil down to that conclusion. 
What computers preceded it? More analog systems that we conceptualize as binary based on analog properties  What isn't analog in our entire would? It's a fundamental of time, continuity, and measurement. 
Maybe I'm not sure what you mean by "total skepticism." What is the essential character of that skepticism? You seem to imply that it renders "reasons" impossible. What sort of reasons do you have in mind when you say that? 
The article clearly specifies the problems defining a heap in the first place. You drawing an arbitrary line in the sand (pun intended) doesn't suddenly establish a universal norm for others to conform to. 
I'm sort of taking the liberty of conflating relativism about things like truth, knowledge, and existence with a view that rejects our ability to really be right to believe or conclude anything. That conflation probably depends on the idea that truth or rightness is essentially something absolute, so that being right merely relative to your own standards is not really being right at all. I'm assuming all reasons (maybe excepting things like explanatory reasons, as in "The avalanche was the reason the town was buried"--so reasons for belief, action, desire, emotion, etc. which are apt to be evaluated) are intrinsically involved with rightness and truth. 
Well look, let's strengthen the example. You saw a man who looked identical to Mark Zuckerberg. He was talking to everyone about facebook. He spoke directly about how his name was Mark Zuckerberg.   But in actual fact, Mark Zuckerberg has a secret identical twin who he had posing as him at this party. The actual Mark Zuckerberg was at the party, but he was in heavy makeup and was disguised so that no one noticed him.   If someone asked you at the party if Mark Zuckerberg was there, and you had seen and spoken to a person who said they were Mark Zuckerberg and looked identical to Mark Zuckerberg, you would undeniably say yes.   You have a belief that Zuckerberg is at the party. He is. And you really are justified in believing that he is.  
They were talking about a computer crash due to a software error and all of those are caused by the computer following it's logic perfectly. Software errors occur exclusively because of the computer's logic. 
I am an experimentalist and not familiar with modern metaphysics. The article states 'today, metaphysics focuses on abstract concepts such as time, space and existence'. My knee-jerk thought to reading this is that if they are backing up their ideas about space and time with physics, then it is theoretical physics. If they are not, then this article fails to convey to me what metaphysics has to offer to the study of the natural world.   
Metaphysics: a cool sounding word that this article tells you nothing about.  Seriously wtf. Can anyone explain what metaphysics is to me? 
I don't see why this is getting upvoted.  Metaphysics is, by definition, false... so it has nothing to offer to the study of anything.  Perhaps I'm missing something -- are we using different definitions of the word? 
Physics has a lot to say about time and space, but nothing on the subject of existence. That's pure metaphysics. 
Well, before there was anything, before there was apace or time or hyper-time, dimensionality, or the 'physical universe' (which only existed for you when you were born.) what was there? Can you think along those lines? That would be along the lines of Metaphysics. How did you find out about stuff, after you were born? Two brothers, having the same parents and growing up in a family still can have different outlooks...I mean other than through conditioning. 
Metaphysics is not false by definition. By definition, it's the study of how to conceptualize our world and clarify our abstract objects of thought.  
You literally just said that people who express certain views that make you uncomfortable are by definition insane and should be treated as dangerous. You seem angry about it. I wonder who needs help. 
I agree with points 1-4. But I've yet to reach the conclusion you go on to ascribe to them, though. What does that make me? 
It is indeed about creating concepts and that is equal to science fiction.  
It would seem he posts and comments frequently over on r/the_donald as well...and posted an article to r/catholicism explaining why a civil war is necessary to end abortion. I think we can see who needs help.  
A raving lunatic? For understanding reality? I'm confused. 
Alfred Mele wrote quite a bit on free will. Even if he doesn't give a definitive answer I think he gives a pretty good overview of the debate on it. 
No, science fiction is where you tell a story about advanced technology that doesn't exist. Concept analysis is where you take abstract idea that human beings use every day and you ask: "What kind of reasoning did I just do and is it sound?"  Science would be: "The water began to boil at 212 degrees F that last thousand times I tried it, so it's probably fair to say that water boils at 212 degrees F."  Metaphysics would be: "How does my concept of inductive reasoning allow me to conclude what will happen the 1001th time I heat water to 212 degrees, if it hasn't happen yet and hasn't been observed yet?"  Science fiction would be: "And then Xorg used his Prima-Ray to boil water." 
If, as you claim, immanent critique cannot be formalized, then a concrete example of what you mean is pretty crucial. Otherwise, this explanation is forgettable as far as general interest goes, and the people who do understand concretely probably already know what you're talking about. Also, what about sublation? I think that's the most interesting and paradoxical element of it all. Maybe there are more parts coming? 
Kind of a left field question, but does anybody know why certain sectors of right wing conspiracy theorists hate Hegelian dialectic? I have a morbid fascination with deep diving conspiracy theories (they are akin to folklore, after all) and often see them decry Hegel in posts. I only have a Philosophy 101 understanding of Hegel and don't get how "thesis, antithesis, synthesis" is supposedly ruining American culture. 
Does Hegel himself clearly state all this, or is this reading taught? Also, as someone else mentions, what about sublation, isn't that the most nuanced concept of all? 
Hey, I'm gonna look at the blog in a bit. I was wondering earlier though, is it true that in order to understand Hegel, one must read the Critique of Pure Reason? Is it advised to begin in this manner? 
A very short synopsis on what Hegel's supposed dialectical method is. Because the method is generally known only by the term dialectics and presented in false formulas people fall into a misunderstanding of what Hegel is really up to and doing. This shortly covers on why Hegel's real method, immanent critique is so misunderstood and so difficult.  
so what is the point of excluding the context of whatever subject?  
Best way forward is with example. Use and dismantle example to a formula. Explain why the formula doesn't work.  If you dissect backwards, you more understand the concept. 
Do you know why Schopenhauer hated Hegel so much and did Schopenhauer have any valid criticisms? 
nobody can synthesise this giant, monster world to just ONE principle. Hegel tried to do that.  he tried to create an absolute and complete philosophy of everything. that's so silly. first of all - it is so arrogant, second - he tried to cover all of his nonsense with big words and complicated writing.  never again I'm gonna waste a minute of my time reading his works. 
Precisely because of the thesis-antithesis-synthesis bs. Someone took a class or read a book and saw a similar pattern to 'false flag' crisis manipulation as a triad of creating a fictitious problem and fanning the flames of public reaction towards a desired predetermined solution outcome.  Nothing to do with Hegel, it just sounds a lot more ominous if you connect an old philosopher considered to be super intelligent with shady power-players controlling everything thanks to having knowledge of this philosopher's work. 
He clearly states that his method is not a typical method, it is not a formula to repeat on all content like formal logic's rules are.   Sublation is a *very early* concept in the Phenomenology and Logic, chapter 1 stuff. It's a descriptive concept, not an active one. 
Huh. I always viewed Hegel's dialectic as a way of interpreting historic events. Giving other wise chaotic happenstances a narrative. Seems like to broad a tool to *initiate* future events. They think its like Neuro Linguistic Programming (also bull crap) write large for social engineering? 
That's interesting, that it's put like that, as "not a formula to repeat on all content like formal logic's rules are", it is good to know that is spelled out. My interest in Hegel is from reading Zizek however, and it seems to me that aufhebung is still the key: of course its a descriptive concept to be applied retroactively, but the process it describes is not at all "simple". 
If you read the systematic works, no, the method is not for historical narrative. The only sciences this works for are the *sciences of how a science and its object logically came to be*: philosophy of history (how the rational state came to be), phenomenology of spirit (how scientific knowing came to be), philosophy of art (how the idea of art came to be), etc. These are not about how these things *actually historically came to be*, but only a rational reconstruction in which empirical history is put into a logical ordering that shows why in history those particular things were something necessary in order to get to where we are today.  It's an explanation for why history has had certain things, but it's not a causal or chronological explanation. 
Sublation does not describe the process, just a certain result.  The process is as simple as can be, it's just that this tool requires a fineness to do anything useful or interesting. 
I fail to see how it is not a retroactive description of a 'final' moment in a process that has happened, that is not the same as claiming it is formula for repetition. 
Because of that: it's a description, hence not an active concept that you really need to even acknowledge most of the time other than to note an aspect of what you've done. The importance is what the sublating term is more than that you notice that you've sublated anything.  It's an important concept to *talk about results*, but it's not a part of the actual method as you're going about it. 
My god, you downvoted my comments as if they are irrelevant, and I noticed that you downvoted any other's you did not like. You need to remove your ego and the desire to have your video's liked, it's in the way of your thinking.  
The impact of Popper has been negligible?!  ????  ??  ?  ??  ????  Nah mate. Nah. 
Just out of interest, do you identify more as continental or as analytic?   I read both continental and analytic philosophy and both have their respective virtues and vices. Analytic philosophy can be a beautifully precise form of philosophy, but it often gets stuck on minor matters and details or frantically tries to reduce something to something else. Continental philosophy is more comfortable with some vagueness, but often gets lost in the vagueness or pompous formulations.  I really like philosophers who bridge the divide. I can recommend Matthew Rattcliffe's "Why mood matters" or "the feeling of being". Both discuss Heidegger, but in an exceptionally clear and understandable way. 
Outside of philosophy? Yes, even Popper hasn't affected how scientific experiments are designed. Popper looked at how science was already being done and pulled out this idea of falsification as a common thread and explored it's underpinnings, but we were already using falsification before his efforts.    Edit; let me clarify. I don't expect philosophy to always affect, say science. But Popper was a philosopher of science so in that case yes, his work should ideally inform that community.  In practice probably 95% of scientists are unaware of Popper's existence and they proceed just fine.  I think this is probably true for philosophers of other disciplines too.  
Your points make sense and I'm not disagreeing, just making a more fundamental critique. Situating moral responsibility in a rational space is inappropriate to the nature of the subject. We may as well attempt to discover the philosophical first principles of sexual attraction, or of food preferences. 
Does that mean that you don't think we can "logic out" the nature and implications of moral responsibility? Just curious what you think. (We can continue this in a PM chain if you'd like.) 
The argument doesn't go so far as to say that permanent dependence is *necessary*, merely that it is *sufficient* to establish a moral obligation. This says nothing at all about whether there might be other reasons or lesser forms of dependence which establish moral obligation, nor should it be expected to. 
I'm making the argument that the dependency argument should be rejected because it would lead us to conclude false things, specifically antinatalism. 
Which seems to be denying the antecedent.  OP seems to be saying:  1. If humans cause the creation of beings which are permanently dependent upon them, then they have a particularly high moral obligation to those beings. 2. Humans created domesticated animals which are permanently dependent upon them. 3. Humans have a particularly high moral obligation to domesticated animals.  You seem to be suggesting a denial of the antecedent.  1. If humans cause the creation of beings which are permanently dependent upon them, then they have a particularly high moral obligation to those beings. 2. Humans created children which are not permanently dependent upon them. 3. Humans don't have a particularly high moral obligation to children.  This is a formal fallacy. `if p then q` does not imply `if not p then not q`. 
These investigations tend to confuse themselves as they tend to treat time as 'what clocks do', when in ordinary language we speak of the phenomenological experience of time, that is one moment of experience coming after the next. This phenomenological experience of time is represented materially by clocks, one second coming after the next, or, when clocks aren't available, by the identification of repeating periods of some natural process.  What ever goes on at a quantum level, if there really is such a thing and it really is fundamental, humans still experience reality in an orderly manner. I can't bake a cake today and eat it yesterday, the period wherein I baked the cake comes logically prior to the period wherein I eat the cake.  There are plenty of little sci-fi stories with time-bending plots where someone grows old then makes some choice or does some action that causes him to be born in the first place in a reverse causality, but that doesn't take away from anything I've said. 
" I can't bake a cake today and eat it yesterday, the period wherein I baked the cake comes logically prior"  Perhaps not the exact same cake you described.  But if you were to never die and live millions of billions of trillions of years, a cake MAY appear in front of you one day.  You may eat it, think it was great, try to recreate it...  ...and then it disappears the next day right in front of you 
"Toldson said black scholars also must contend with the long-held belief among some whites that blacks cannot write about race with objectivity."  isn't this exactly what the paper is saying about the lack of black scholars reviewing the paper? are they not implying other races would not be objective in discussing matters of Race? 2% of Scholars are black, odds are there wasn't going to be a black scholar reviewing this paper.  
1. Surely everyone can have a perspective about race since, insofar as race even exists, we all have one?  2. Surely anyone can be as objective as anyone else therefore?  3. Isn't demanding that there be a black contributor without regard to the merit of their contribution or the volition of the contributor... solely because of their race... racist? 
I don't understand your final statement.   and I suppose yes, there is no logical reason why someone couldn't ascribe credit anyway, but that isn't what my paper is about.  
You show that Knowledge fails Greco by applying Lawson. But you misapply Lawson. If you had not made any logic errors, then your conclusion wouldn't follow. That's all I meant.  You can always get a infinite regress if you decide to flip the necessary and sufficient conditions.   Using your logic, for example: 1. You must be 18 to be on the train 2. So you must be on the train to be 18 3. So you must be on the train to be on the train  See what happened there? Same with:  1. You must have credit to be responsible 2. You must be responsible to have credit 3. You must be responsible to be responsible 4. You can't be responsible 5. You can't have credit   
You mean Strawson? I think you are hung up on me just putting responsibility before credit on line 3, where all Im doing is just showing how i am making Strawsons argument relevant to those in the papers I am critiquing. I think perhaps i could have worded it better, but all it means is that if you are being given credit for something, then you must be responsible, and in the reverse where in the context of the papers I am critiquing if you have credit for an action, again in the context of the papers I am critiquing, you clearly would be considered responsible for that action.  Also the regress happens, it seems because we just live in a linear temporarily where every event has a seemingly endless chain of past events, and where all present events are determined by past events.   I don't see how your critique really affects my paper, nor do I believe I have made any real logical error.  	   
I don't see where it follows from what is in your paper that, "f you are being given credit for something, then you must be responsible". None of the 3 arguments cited make this claim. You claim it in the paragraph after your "responsibility and credit" argument, but it doesn't follow from that either...   I'm not bothered by the order, I'm bothered by switching the sufficient and necessary.  Its as if you had shown that "to be a rectangle you must be a square" but then continue your argumentation as if you had shown, "to be a square you must be a rectangle"  This doesn't follow.   It affects the paper because your conclusion - that having credit for knowledge is impossible because of Strawson's* (sorry about that) argument- only follows if you make the leap i described above. Which is a logical mistake.  
so Im taking it as assumed that if you are responsible for an action, you are deserving credit for that action, and if you have been given credit for an action then you must have been responsible for it. 
Bertrand Russell addresses this subject in his book, "The Problems of Philosophy" which is a very interesting read.  That being said, you are not far off from how Russell described this concept of "relations" - he referred to them as Universals, but you're better off reading directly from the source. 
this is totally sweet, there can be such a sense of community in poor areas or neighborhoods, there wasnt one where i grew up but once i was grown and moved there was, while i was homeless i could totally chill with any other homeless dude i came across and its the same when youre a junkie, the majority wont fuck you over like the stereotype says if youre cool with them too  
I had a bit of the opposite experience - within a year of moving into a low-income section of a new city, I had my car ransacked, my laundry stolen from my apartment complex, and one of my windows smashed in by an angry homeless man while I was driving my car.  I had never known this sense of violation and fear before.    I'd like to think that I haven't developed paranoia, just better street smarts.  All car valuables are well-hidden.  I don't walk alone in certain areas anymore.  I've got a gas-cap lock, a home motion detector, and pepper spray.  I still believe in the goodness of the human spirit, but I've also learned that desperate circumstances drive people to be awful to each other.  
Dude I live in a big city (~1M people) known for its homeless and very mild weather, and when I'm out running at night and I see anyone who isn't easily identifiable as "not weird", I move to the other side of the street. The fact you're chilling with the homeless is mind boggling to me. Like, I don't mean I think it's disgusting, just that I don't think I ever could do it. 
Homeless people showing up at my back door at 3am is EXACTLY what I'd refer to as "The bad part of town".   
I've lived in lower class neighborhoods my whole life. I've recently started a new job and moved to a middle-class suburb, and it's so much nicer here. No more being woken up at 3am by a gang of rowdy skangers coming home from the pub. No more wondering if I'm going to be mugged while walking through the nacker estate. The overall fitness, hygiene, attractiveness, and manners of everyone here is so much higher.  
I just spent a year in a bad neighborhood. I am much more frightened now.  
The opposite was true for me sadly. :(  When I moved to the "bad" neighborhood, I got my car broken into twice, my apartment door lock was forced once, and and I got robbed once someone came in through the window, all this in a two year span.  I don't know how old you are, but it sounds very young and naive, I'm guessing you are in your 20s.  Even on the shittiest town on any western country, MOST of the people are good people. Doesn't mean there are risks and dangers associated with living there. 
uh, that sounds nice and all, but you sound like a very comedic murder victim.  
I'm sorry but if there was a murder at a gas station it is dangerous. You should be a bit more careful. It may be fine to help the homeless but on your property at your house you're inviting trouble. You could get robbed or attacked or end up having your place be the new homeless shelter (unless that's what you want). Yes, I agree most people who live in low-income housing shouldn't be judged poorly and may be great people. Nevertheless, you should never fuck around with your safety, especially when there are murders in the area. 
Honestly the difference between a "good neighborhood" and a "bad neighborhood" is less to do with income and more to do with how vigilant and willing people are when it comes to assisting catching lawbreakers. The neighborhoods people don't mind shooting people in broad daylight, they know they can do so with impunity because snitches get stitches in that area. 
Not sure if you'll read this, but I'm now in the "hood" (though.. it's really not even close to the hood of my city) and I've realized the problems are caused by kids.. not by adults. Anyone that's living in their own place or even with roommates has shit to do so they keep to themselves . It's the neighborhood kids with nothing to do out getting into trouble. 
Is it not a problem that the homeless people keep coming back every night if you help them once? That's what I would find annoying. 
Of course the locals aren't robbing/murdering you. You ever heard of the phrase "don't shit on your own doorstep"? 
I really hope there is some getting used to it. I'v been living in a predominantly upscale suburb for most of my upbringing and now I live in Santa Ana, CA. The local people seem to be okay but most most wear a mean mug, resting bitch face or stare me down as I smile at them.   Hopefully i'll get used to it, today is only day 4.  
Sometimes poor people are all other poor people got.   Also, totally dig the username. I just finished the new season myself. Awesome.  
I've always preferably lived in rather "notorious" districts, people are usually extremely nice, you'll find everything and most stereotypes are barely true (or in another way than imagined). Sure there's often more criminality (certain kinds of it) and some laws exist only on paper, but I've always felt safe and people seem to care a lot more for the community.    There's one exception though: I'm avoiding notorious districts with a predominantly white population, people there tend - in my personal experience - to search the root for their problems in immigrants or Muslims and Jews and barely do something about their misery (fun fact: I live in Germany).  
I don't know who you are OP, but you're an amazing person. Better than most I'd say. Giving the benefit of the doubt and having mercy on and showing care for those less fortunate than you is a fantastic thing. We need more people like you in the world.  
There is a lyric from The Prince of Egypt movie (wait wait...stay with me) that goes "when all you've got is nothing g,there's a lot to go around."  I've always liked that lyric and I feel it is more or less true. There is a stark difference when hanging out with a bunch of "lower class" people vs. "upper class". It's so prevalent that there are plenty of Hollywood movies that touch on this very idea.  
Where I grew up the dude coming through the woods would rob you and the stray cat would have been killed either with boiling water or a pit bull. 
I am glad OP had such a good experience but much like you, I had a bad experience living in a "bad neighborhood". There was a general rule in the town I lived in that you did not live on a street with a letter for a name because these were the neighborhoods with the most crime. They were right. One time I came home and someone had thrown a large rock through our window. Another time, I came home and it looked like someone had tried desperately to kick our door in. There were footprints all over the door, luckily it held up but another couple of kicks and it probably would have given. When kicking the door in did not work, they just smashed a window (note that this all took place in broad daylight) they ransacked the house and tossed everything everywhere, stole a couple of things. Great for OP to have had a good experience but I refuse to go through this again so I will be avoiding the "bad neighborhoods" from now on.  
So, I'm not really living a neighborhood of absolute squalor. Many of my neighbors may have subsidized housing and others might depend on social welfare programs. Some of my neighbors smoke crack and others deal it on the side. But these aren't people that are on the verge of homelessness. Some actually own their units. They might get the power or water cut off every other month, but they aren't about to be on the street. That probably makes all the difference.  
Same.   Within 6 months  1. My car was robbed 3 times. 2. My apartment was robbed twice. 3. I had a knife pulled on me. 4. I had a gun pulled on me. 5. People tried to sell me Xanax, Dope, Coke, Crack, Meth (outside my house)  That being said, I still couldn't really give a fuck about any of it. I've got no problem going back to that area because I refuse to let the actions of a few garbage human beings control my life 
Ya.... I've lived in bad parts and OK and really good parts.  What OP describes is the OK parts that might be next to the bad parts.  It is good that this is opening them up, but OP might not want to look into other bad parts that might be worse :) 
I totally agree. Poverty created by serious drug addictions is a lot different than traditionally poor neighborhoods. In the former situation, people are probably roaming around at 3 am because they are dying of withdrawal symptoms and would do anything just to get the money in your pocket. It's sad, but that puts you in a compromising decision. I know a lot of people who have been robbed because they tried to help with something they just couldn't. 
Some homeless people are ok. My friends in college used to give away peanut butter sandwiches to homeless people around the city. Some of the people we met were functioning, in that they were coherent and could carry a conversation. They chose the life they lead. Others were probably insane. Many homeless are veterans with psychological issues.   Just because people are dirty doesn't mean they are bad people. Sometimes they just don't want to get caught up in the rat race of life or they went through a crisis and are trying to come out the other side. Lots of them are mentally handicapped though and that's why I would recommend caution when approaching homeless folks even if you have good intentions.  
Yeah, and a person got murdered in his neighborhood. I think this guy isn't seeing the big picture here. 
A homeless person didn't "show up at his back door", they were walking through the woods. 
I guess because his neighbourhood isn't too bad, all in. I'm in a similar situation- I moved to the "diverse" part of the city and people talk about it like it's scary, but it is so nice! I never have any trouble and I can get waffles and kebabs at 4am. Living the dream. 
I've always heard about the rough parts in Cali like Compton, etc, and I have always assumed the stereotypes are true. But I've got a friend who works for google and he's moving out to Silicon Valley to work for some new startup. Made me wonder - are the rough parts of Cali really that rough? Or are they just poorer and less white than the extremely rich and gentrified surrounding areas?   Maybe I'd be singing a different tune if the neighborhood I'm living in were actually bad. Maybe the residents of the Atlanta area  don't otherize one another as strictly as other, less integrated cities. People think that the south is full of racist rednecks, but if you're within 30 miles of Atlanta then the only N word you hear a white person call someone is "neighbor," for the most part.   I went to high school in a suburb of Atlanta fifteen plus years ago. It was absolutely NOT cool to say racist shit. Move thirty miles in any direction and racism is just a matter of course.  
Perhaps. My next door neighbor sells weed. A couple weeks ago I answer my doorbell after midnight to find a young black couple utterly surprised to see me answer the door. I told them they were looking for Sha'niece next door. They thanked me and then the guy said, "don't call the cops." "Oh, I wouldn't, why did you even? What? No. Don't worry." I replied. Then I realized he only said that because I am white. It was the first time I was a victim of prejudice. I was pretty excited. It was just like when I got my first pimple. I was so stoked to oxycute it.  
Thankfullly, my neighborhood does not have a gang problem. I see some teenagers walking around at night with their friends and the worst I think they're up to is smoking weed. That's no worse than anything my suburban friends did back in the day. We were probably even dumber, breaking into the local golf course to climb the water tower and drink vodka 100 feet up. Lucky no one died.  
It's a numbers game. OP just hasn't been there long enough for the shit to hit yet. One night that homeless vagrant wandering into his backyard will be balls deep in a schizo episode with knife in hand. OP yelling out will just be a taunt. One night that light above his drive will go out and never be replaced, suddenly making his corner of the street enticing.   The 'bad' areas aren't constant doom and gloom, but the doom comes suddenly and without hesitation far more often than it does in the burbs.  
They're not puppies. If he wanted them to go away, he'd ask them to, and most likely, since he's been cool to them, they would do it.  
I get that you want to show us how the bad neighborhood isn't really that bad but you included a crack head literally forcing your door open and entering your home. Whatever his intentions, that ain't normal.  The totally innocent "oops, got the wrong house" doesn't include smashing open the door.  I know that you and the crack heads are cool. But keep in mind that sometimes you're dealing with the drug, not the person.  When drugs and addiction are involved, people do not always behave rationally or predictably.  It doesn't make them bad people, of course. But be careful.    "You can turn your back on a person. But never turn your back on a drug." - HST.  
Dude, you're going to get murdered one of these days.  Your feel-good story about feeling comfortable there changes nothing.  This isn't about prejudice-You have literal crackheads barging into your house.  Put those bars up or get a gun or something. 
As someone who has been homeless wealthier neighborhoods are far more dangerous and your far more likely to lose your belongings due to legal actions than you are to get them stolen in a poor neighborhood. Of course in wealthier neighborhoods the people that get violent tend to feel they are legally justified to do so, but the danger is still greater. The people in poor neighborhoods are far nicer people to each other and the homeless stranger. Though I have had to distance myself from a few places due to theft of my bags of aluminum cans and other belongings, not even the druggies are really dangerous. The rare exceptions are easily identified. Mexican neighborhoods, in my experience, are the absolute best in every way. Even the kids come running over with cold drinks and asking all sorts of kid questions.    
I found a genuine smile to be one of the most disarming things in the ghetto. As a white guy with an angry face, everyone always expected the worst from me. But if I flash a shit eating grin, I can get most people to smile.  That said I also had the fun of moving into an area where I was the white guy who lived in the area. I don't think there was another white person for blocks. But the worst I would ever get is glared at, and only when I was out with my (black) wife.   A lot of older black guys still have a real problem with interracial relationships, which was something I didn't realize before hand 
I fucking love that movie. It has an awesome soundtrack. 
I was struggling a few months back with just feeling utterly, cosmically insignificant. I listened to that song on loop for like a week. The lyrics about the rock on top of the mountain and "looking through heaven's eyes" really helped me out. I think I came through the other side quite changed for the positive as a person. :) 
Real talk, OP doesn't live in the ghetto.  Listening to the media talk about Ferguson, MO like it was Compton was infuriating.  If you think Ferguson is ghetto than  Martin Luther King and North Garrison will make your hair stand up. 
I think OP admitted he really wasn't in a bad neighborhood, just a low-income multi-cultural one. Used to run a Pizza chain place in a lower income area, we had a homeless guy hang out a lot, we fed him whenever he was hungry (as did the other restaurants). When he died there was a line of people out the door waiting to pay their respects to that man, everybody knew him.  
I grew up in a bad neighborhood. I've always maintained that its not so bad as long as you know how to protect yourself and your things. Things like leaving the TV or the radio on when you leave the house, staying alert while walking in the street while no looking scared; makes all the difference. To this day I never have more then 1 headphone in at a time. The worst thing to happen to me was a kid snatched my phone once. I chased him but fucker was fast and I had on heels.  
Tree streets, around here. Pine, Elm, Ceder, etc.  
Third world mentality. You see the same things in China, albeit it is much safer over there in terms of random violence 
This is the best clandestine argument for social welfare programs I've heard. Desperate people do desperate things. It's almost as if a safety net to prevent total squalor lowers crime rates and builds community? 
Sounds like those garbage human beings can end your life though. That's the difference. 
Regardless, I'd prefer to live where homeless people don't casually stroll through the woods near my house. 
It's definitely interesting to see what people consider to be the "bad neighborhood". I worked in a bad neighborhood and it wasn't funny, warm happies like this. There is constant crime, people are on the community FB page posting videos of homes being cased, pets are stolen out of yards, cops are responding to gun shots across the neighborhood, teens are dealing drugs and getting shot in broad daylight, kids are going hungry, the mentally ill walk the streets with no aid and no hope, I mean it's insane. 
Society portrays rich people as snobby entitled pricks with no regard for the law or other humans in general. I have rich parents, so I'm automatically a spoiled brat who has never had to work for anything in life, right? 
Lmao holy shit you're crazy. I'd do it with an elevator... Not stairs or a ladder. 
Aw the little racist is out of his safe space.  If you'd read the thread, you'd see that spouting statistics does nothing.  Context is important, and it's important to understand why crime rates are higher in minority neighborhoods.   "Hurr durr black people are killers" isn't an argument, you're generalizing a whole race. Socio-economic status, history, and oppression are extremely important in understanding the cycles that perpetuate crime in these societies.  But /r/beholdthemasterrace  am i right? 
Could you expand on why wealthier neighborhoods are more dangerous? For the homeless or the homeowners? Legal action like... foreclosure? Divorce? 
A lot of minorities, especially first gen, have issues with interracial relationships. Source: am first gen immigrant with white boyfriend. It gets extra fun looking ambiguously other. I have been mistaken for Indian, Hispanic, and Black, so I frequently feel the side eye. 
I'm so glad you're doing better!  I'm not at all a religious person but I have always admired that song as just a general upbeat look at what it means to be humble and have a sense of community. 
The thing is in my experience growing up in places like that never leave you. You get these street smarts and they always color you, for instance my brothers and i always make sure we have our back to a wall most times, or are ready to fight if someone knocks on our door a little too hard. Stuff like that can really get to you if you can't let it go.  
I know! I don't know how you can look at these people and think anything other than "no one should have to live this way." The fact that so many people don't see the value in helping their fellow man, to the point where they want to hurt them instead, disturbs me. 
Anyone can end your life, if they have enough motivation.   There's not much difference there. 
It's just perspective. I moved to a "bad" neighborhood 7 months ago. In the 90s it would have drive by shootings and hookers and drug dealers on every corner. It's a historic neighborhood that has slowly been revitalized over the past couple decades with houses being renovated and new ones built in empty lots. Everyone I talked to from the suburbs said it was a bad area. I think a lot of that has to do with the fact that it did used to be bad. So I wouldn't call it a bad neighborhood anymore. Though there are certain areas on the outskirts that I wouldn't want to go late at night.  
Yeah, all those stories are quite in keeping with the Compton stereotypes I've learned via Hollywood. I don't think we have it quite that bad in Atlanta.   
As someone who adopted Oakland as her home...Nah, it's amazing here. I wouldn't want to live anywhere else in the world. It's amazingly diverse, everyone smokes weed, and there's so much culture and creativity. Also, not all parts of Oakland are "bad". It is gentrifying rapidly, which is certainly cause for concern, but I absolutely love this city.   
Yup, that's the prejudice you'll likely face. And if you ever complain about being unfairly judged for your family wealth you can expect to hear very little sympathy.    This is not fair. You might not ever live a life wherein you need worry about where your next meal is coming from. But wealth brings about all sorts of other problems that your average person never has to deal with, im sure. In the end, we are all just worm food. The struggle to live a good and useful life is not restricted to the non-wealthy.   
But it's also true. There's loads of mean rich people, the same way there are rich poor people.   I think it comes down to changing your personal circle, becoming someone else to only "better" yourself so that a circle of peers that you deem better than the one you are currently in accepts you. Be it money or social status, some people are assholes, and will put others down to get ahead of other people.    
It's easier for a camel to pass through the eye of a needle than rich man to enter heaven.  
I completely agree. And wealthy people tend to contort themselves in every possible direction to justify their wealth but ultimately, to me, it's as simple as the fact that clinging to luxury while other humans suffer terribly is inherently immoral and unkind. 
ive been clean and not homeless for 2 years, through no effort of my own i have to say, a man who became my best friend offered his place to me while i was detoxing and getting back on my feet, i was in a psych ward for a bit, and after living with my best friend i moved in with my partner, without them i would still be on the streets (or likely dead thanks to the drug abuse), ive made strides dealing with mental health but im still struggling   thanks for reminding me to be grateful, im so selfish i only think about my current struggles and fail to remember the shit i was in in the past 
"fuck you i got mine". A lot of people just don't care about anything happening past their doorstep, or anything that's visibly out of the way.  
This is a basic, though understandable, misreading of the conservative position.  Most conservatives won't phrase their position as "fuck the poor."  Many support private charity initiatives.  It's just that (a) they don't trust the government to be the one to help, and (b), they think welfare programs actually trap the poor in a cycle.    It's the difference between buying a kid a candy bar and telling him to do some chores for his allowance (Of course, this example only works if there are actually chores for him to do). 
It's not just perspective though, I think the main point being pulled out of this thread is that there are bad neighborhoods, there are revitalized neighborhoods that used to bad neighborhoods and there are thought-to-be-bad neighborhoods.  OP lives in the thought-to-be-bad neighborhood, which may also be a revitalized neighborhood. I lived in a revitalized neighborhood during college. During those days, anyone who I spoke to who had 15+ years on me would say that the neighborhood was wildly dangerous, but that's because it was a neighborhood that truly was formerly dangerous. By the time I moved there it was still diverse and somewhat poor, but the riffraff was gone and it was a generally nice place to live.  It's uncommon that people re-evaluate their view on neighborhoods that they had previously developed an understanding of. It's no one's fault really, usually there isn't a reason to go around re-evaluating neighborhoods so you stick to your previously held beliefs.  
This is honestly just cities in general, they change an insane amount over the distance of just a few blocks. I live Cincinnati and just north of Downtown in OTR is an incredibly nice, urban area with great places to live that I would definitely call safe, but I would never even consider living literally 3 blocks up the street from this district 
Don't know about you, but every poor person I've ever met was poor. 
I'm not trying to describe the Republican party. I'm trying to describe the actions of the elected Republican congressmen, and to a degree the disgust toward lower classes that a not insignificant portion of the vocal Republican base tends to exhibit. 
Money won't make you happy but a lack of it will really suck ass. 
are you my guardian angel? this is *exactly* what i needed to hear after a rough week, down to the very last word, thank you for this, really. judging by your words and your OP you are exactly the type of person we need more of in this world 
We moved back to L.A. Four years age, and moved into a "bad" neighborhood, and one that is more ethnically diverse than I had lived in before.  In the first two and a half years, we had a home invasion and a drive-by shooting that left a 9mm hole in my neighbor's front window and one in the front door of the building, the door that my family used to go in and out of several times a day. Also, I had a lot of my belongings in a storage unit because we were short on space. The unit was broken into and all my things were stolen. A house across the street went up in a huge inferno because the people were living in pack rat conditions. On July 4 the neighborhood is like a war zone because of all the M80s.  We saved up and moved to a nice neighborhood that is much less diverse and have been much happier since.  I tried to like it but it was horrible. I have nightmares about people breaking into my house now. 
My daughter has a very very mild club foot. When she was born it was all twisted and on its side. Broke my heart. We're extremely lucky that we have a Shriners hospital here in town, not only that but we know a ton of the doctors there. Her foot is getting better and on the fast track to being totally normal. However my point is, if you want or need to readjust your perspective go to children's hospital.  
That's humbling to read. Now you've got me blushing. What I said is simply the truth - as I see it. And I can easily  and honestly reply that there are too few people like you in this world. Take a moment to allow yourself to be self-indulgent and explore the truth in that statement and blush too. There's nothing wrong with giving yourself a pat on the back here and there. Sometimes it's the only encouragement you'll ever receive to keep you moving forward.   Be kind to yourself. It sounds simple, but it's not.  
There's "bad" neighborhoods and then there's **bad** neighborhoods. Generally has more to do with economics than race, but race and economic level are very closely tied together in the US. I was visiting a friend on the "bad" side of town here last month, and driving through his neighborhood I realized that it looked exactly like my neighborhood in the suburbs, right down to the houses, the activities people were doing, etc, but the majority of people going around doing suburbs things were non-white. Black, Hispanic, or Indian. And my buddy hasn't had any trouble with crime in his neighborhood. It's a middle class neighborhood in an ethnically diverse area. Economic class is everything. 
So I have club feet, too. I just want you to know that all the bad stuff happens when they are kids. I had surgeries, I had the casts, and I had the special shoes. I barely remember all of that. As an adult, no one realizes anything is wrong with me. Heck, I barely remember myself! It only really comes up when I run too far or swim too much. And even then its only pain like what I imagine arthritis is like.   Heck, I even ran a half marathon! ...thought I'll never do that again! 
@altxatu: We just found out, around noon today, via sonogram, that our daughter (my first) might have a club foot. I haven't posted to reddit in years. But I'm writing now, with tears in my eyes, to thank you for your little story, lifting our broken hearts. God bless you! 
I just read through all of this, an I can say without a doubt you both are the type of people we need more of in this world. Stay positive and stay awesome guys. 
That's awesome. That's what we're hoping for. Right now, unless you know what to look for you wouldn't see it. Thankfully she doesn't even surgery. It's been as mild as I could have hoped for.  
Enter this on a google search:      **site:reddit.com franklymydeer AROUND(10) song**      Third result.  Yes, you asked in /r/NameThatSong. 
Wtf? Are you sure the redditor isn't one of your IRL friends who knew about it and is now just trying to troll you? (I assume this would be fairly easy to figure out, depending on their post history.) 
Oh my god I've been trying to find a song for over a year too. Must feel amazing to actually find it, congratulations! 
Cool story but damn was that song ever disappointing. 
That's pretty cool. And the song isn't too bad either. Sometimes a song can just grab ya and it's awesome you got that sort of closure.  
Ah, this reminds me of my 90s childhood where I would hear a song on the radio or in a movie and fall in love, and NEVER HEAR IT AGAIN because there wasn't really a way to find out on the internet yet. One that I did eventually figure out was Oleander's "Why I'm Here," which I thought sounded like Nirvana and I remember going through their discography on Amazon listening to sample clips trying to find it. Which was a fruitless search and I just got lucky because I heard it again on the radio and the DJ said who it was.  
Omg. This is amazing. Wow. Ya that line "Shh bby is ok" should be...like...a thing! We must spread this everywhere! 
I tried tracking this song down too - even to the point of finding the twitter feed of the guy who plays the driver (if I remember correctly he's a Spanish model) I may even have (big May) have seen your youtube comment that also have me some closure. But now I'll have to try and hear the whole song. By the way did googling the advert song keep leading you to "frontier psychiatrist" by the avalanches? 
Before reading the whole thing, i googled up "Seat Toca commercial" to hear what song you were on about, and i found two youtube videos of it. the first video i listened to was the 'Driving' advert,  "god! what an awful song," was what i was thinking at that point.  "this can't be the song OP was talking about. maybe it's in the other video."  i checked the other video and found the same song.  "this seriously can't be the song OP is talking about, it's horrible!"  so after watching those two videos i read the rest of your post to see what song you were actually talking about.  yup, it's that song, the same horrid song i just heard twice.  tl;dr: that song is horrible OP. 
If you click "lyrics" on the spotify desktop application located on the bottom right while playing the song, it says the following:   Shh bby is ok  /u/Franklymydeer has a small dick 
Yeah exactly! The mystery redditor could not have handled this better. That was probably my favourite part as well. Honestly, I giggled like a little girl when I saw that response.   I don't want to give away their username because I guess they have a right to anonymity. But believe me when I say that they seem like an utterly fantastic person - based on their responses throughout our conversation, as well as their posting history in general.  
Whoa. What's the "AROUND" operator? I've never seen that before. Is there a list of such operators? 
Yeah I saw that! I posted to a sub called /r/NameThatSong or something, and you replied telling me about the email. Do you remember that?  Dude I'm really sorry, in this story I claimed credit for the email you sent. I couldn't remember posting about it on Reddit, but I knew I had seen an email from the Seat marketing department, so I thought I had sent them an enquiry because I was planning to do that.   Hahaaa I can't believe we're reunited again! This whole thing is getting funnier and funnier.  
Aha! Thank you, you hero! I've misremembered some of the details, but this is almost definitely the missing link. God, I completely forgot about that thread. I think I was the OP, too.  Having said all that, the mystery redditor didn't post any comments in that thread. They must have just observed it, and somehow remembered it a year later. It's still pretty fantastic. I do love this website sometimes.  
This was actually one of my first thoughts. But based on their comment history I really don't think I know them. They seem to live on a different continent to me.  I can only assume that, at some point, I mentioned this on Reddit. It's still amazing though - if I did mention it, it would have been a year ago, and it can't have been a particularly popular thread.   Maybe tomorrow, when I've calmed down, I'll go through my comment history and try to figure this out. But then again, I kinda enjoy the mystery of it all. Maybe I'll just leave it... 
What song?   My advice would be to post it to a random thread on Reddit, wait a year or so, and eventually some random person will PM you a link. It worked for me, it'll probably work for you too.  
Yeah. Read the whole story and was looking forward to hearing something that wasn't generic car ad crap. Was disappointed. 
Modern TV's should have an option for song titles to appear in the corner of the screen :o. 
Hey smilin' strange,  You're looking happily deranged  Can you settle to shoot me?  Or have you picked a target yet? Hey Sandy!  While we're on the subject of obscure songs, the theme to *The Adventures of Pete & Pete* is a real song called "Hey Sandy" by Polaris. 
Its a thing already. I'm a sort of friend of a former penguin if D00M kind of girl who retained her weirdness. She and her friends talk like that on facebook all the time 
I believe it might be someone involved in BSO, stumbled upon it and decided to give you the answer without taking the credit. Either way they are going to have a spike today in the song plays!!  
Since not a whole lot of other people seem to be giving a shit, how did you find the song, and OP? 
Please explain how you knew this guy was looking for this song! 
x AROUND(n) y finds x within n words of y. I stumbled upon it randomly, so I don't have a list for you.  
Holy hell that's how I found the cursed ad... I can't believe answers have been found! 
They might not have needed to remember it a year later - it's possible that they came across the thread, researched it, found the answer, realised they could no longer respond to the thread (Reddit doesn't let you respond to threads more than 6 months old) and PMed you instead. I know I've done that before.  But yes, it's fantastic when that works out. :D And I'm sorry for spoiling it - I know you said that you might just leave it because you liked the mystery. (I don't know if you caught my original comment before making it less spoilery - it was a lot more direct. If so, I apologise!) 
Wait so, you didn't email the marketing department, /u/jadedDarkness did... 
You know this explains yhat you didn't email them. 
So user /u/JaredDarkness actually sent the email and got the reply? Because the screen shot is identical to yours, OP...and you replied to it, so it couldn't have been your alt account. 
I actually know the name, I'm just looking for a specific recording. It's an aria from Don Giovanni, I heard it in the movie Screamers but I can't find that version anywhere. It was probably recorded specifically for the movie and for some reason never released to the public. 
But you said you loved it so much that you couldn't stop listening to a 30-second clip of it... Is the 30-second part much better than the rest of it? 
It really ruined the whole story to know OP has such a shit taste in music.  
He goes into the future, PMs himself from someone else's account, and then past him does the same thing many years later after he invents the time machine.  The knowledge of the song lives in a paradoxical cycle. 
But OP says he's never mentioned this on reddit. Just in the YouTube comments and to his irl friends. Maybe one of his friends knows his username?  
Do you put the yellow dot next to your name so we think you got gold and read your comment? 
You should sign up for the reddit secret santa then put this in there as a *wink wink nudge nudge* haha :) 
Holy crap on a cracker!  I've seen dozens of lists of "useful google tricks" but never this one.  It should be on all of them. 
No fucking way! I bet this'll be on some bullshit infographic within the month.  ...Have you got any others? 
The spoiler alerts were many. You are clear of any spoiling.  
Yeah, I clearly got that bit wrong... I could have sworn it was me! It was ages ago, my memory is a bit fuzzy.   The plot thickens! 
argh, I know that feeling. I've been looking for a specific recording of Julie London singing "Bye, Bye, Blackbird" for almost 8 years now. I think there was a video too but nothing I can find on youtube is the right video. 
I am an opera singer and I have a very rare week off and will be a little board so I will look into it for you. I might not be able to find the exact recording but will be possible to find the singer and recognise their timbre. Also as an aside if you don't know what the aria is about look it up it is rather funny. 
You missed the part where he actually completes the piece with the original composer on one of his journeys in time. 
Ok, that's the truth. I can stop being weirded out. Good,I hate unanswerable questions.  
How about the same / very similar username on youtube and reddit? The guy who PM'd OP forgot it was a youtube comment he knew OP from and thought it might have been Reddit, tried finding the user and got lucky, freaking OP out in the process. 
This is a beautiful story of someone pointing out the obvious to a really stupid OP.  
If it's on a bullshit infographic and you end up using it, is it still bullshit? 
You and jadedDarkness are the same person.  You are also the "mystery redditor". You may also be a soap manufacturer or IT Security guy, who is hell bent on erasing society's debt. I am not sure which, but I will be sure to send you my building society details and account numbers so you don't miss them.   
No no no. That's *Link*-Karma. Self-posts don't get those!  
Thus a really crudely hidden version of his name is written in the credits, like Marik from YGOTAS calling himself Malik Blishtar 
That's a lot of effort just to tell someone the name of a song. 
So the guy hears the song for the first time and falls in love with it. He grows up and builds a time machine and decides he would very much like to meet the composer of the song, and discover where his inspiration for said song came from. What better way than to travel back in time to right before the song was composed? Upon landing in that timeline, he realizes that the composer of the song actually doesn't exist. He takes it upon himself to compose the song and release a 30 second clip of it to Seat, as that is where he personally first heard it. He becomes the composer.  So who came up with the idea of the song originally? 
The real question is how many hours do you put into Minecraft? 
I figured it was Miike Snow when I saw "Mike Something" Miike Snow has that pop-indie sound that commercials love.  
It's in the fabric of our universe. The song of the beginning and the song of the end. It was, is, and always will be, forever until time ceases to exist. 
'Mensch' in this context means an honorable person. It sounds a bit like a sneeze. It means "human" in German. Gesundheit is what a German person would say to you if you'd sneeze. It's not that hard. :)  Or as a great man once said: *"Shh bby is ok"* 
Yup same!  I think I actually first started listening to them after Black and Blue was in a commercial, googled the lyrics etc. 
There must be some way out of here, said the Joker to the Thief... 
The best way to find indie music.  I fell back in love with Kashi Bashi recently after one of his songs was in a phone commercial.  
Well, this is the Internet. People of all sorts of times hang here. For example, it's 1 in the morning here but I'm still up because my friends just left after playing board games for hours.  As to the news: congratulations!!!!!! That's so exciting! Do you have any idea on male/female? Do you have any names in mind? 
Congratulations! Start sleeping in now, from what I've heard you won't get much of that starting in 9 months! 
Just gone 2pm here in England, so someone saw it. Congratulations sir. 
After a year & a half of trying, dr appts and a fertility specialist, my wife is now pregnant too....daddy fever all around!   2016 takes...2017 gives  
WOOOOOOOOOOOOOO    Hehehehe that means you had sexy-sexy!  
Congrats!  My kids are almost 27 and 22. Being a parent is amazing and sometimes horrible but something I will never regret.   Here's to a healthy and happy child! 
Congratulations! Do you know if it's going to be a girl/boy? 
Congratulations! So am I and I have no idea what the hell im doing! WOOHOOO. Scotch on me pal!  
Shows how people are different. If I got that news, I'd want to kill myself.  But bloody hell, congratulations! Just by your passion alone, I'm convinced you'll be an amaizng father! 
Congratultions on the news!! How does it feel? Any name ideas yet?  (I don't even know you yet I feel genuinely excited and happy for you. What is this feeling) 
Congrats! My wife is due in March with our first.  
Congratulations! :) What are you hoping the baby will be? 
You understand timezones, right? It was between two and three pm here when you posted.  Oh, and, uh, congratulations, I guess :) 
Thanks! I have no idea as of yet but I'm thrilled either way! 
THIS.  SLEEP NOW!  I have a 9 year old and I haven't slept since BEFORE he was born.  Also, congratulations.  There is nothing better than fatherhood! 
I'm pregnant and nights where I get less than 12 hours make me furious because I know I'll never have this chance again.  
I just got off a 14 hour flight back from England  T'WAS HELL 
Literally looked through all the comments looking for this one. Thanks for bolding it xD 
27 and 22 ay? Ok well do you mind if I message you sporadically for the next two decades about advice? 
Whey, congrats! I reckon September, which is kinda bad timing coz we've got three weddings but fuck it! 
No idea! Don't wanna know till the day of arrival! 
It's really so much easier than you think it'll be. You've managed to keep yourself alive thus far-you'll probably do the same for your kid. My first was a month early and my husband and I hadn't even put his crib together yet. We had no idea wtf we were doing. But he's 3 and doing fine!  
I completely agree but it seems like OP is happy about it, so let's wish him well :) 
It takes 9 months though.. your cover as a human is showing.  
Not OP, but my family got Pandemic: Legacy for Christmas, and we just played the first game last night. We're so excited it looks really awesome. 
A few rounds of Love Letter, then two games of Risk. 
 But which one do you REALLY want it to be?  (Pro tip: reply with both and delete the one that it is not once you find out) 
Except an Apache helicopter. An Apache helicopter has machine guns AND missiles. It is an unbelievably impressive complement of weaponry, an absolute death machine.  
No response! OP needs to get his priorities straight. 
Oh that's what I wanted for Christmas! I got Pandemic: State of Emergency and On the Brink expansions, so it's cool :D Can't wait to try it after my finals end. 
**two** games of risk? How did it not take a week?! 
I highly recommend Betrayal At The House On The Hill! It's by far my favorite board game! Oh and munchkin is great too!  
I mean, clearly he wasn't including Apache helicopters in that statement - he was speaking in hyperbole. With its speed, maneuverability, and armament, nothing can realistically be compared to the AH-64.  Also, Apaches don't poop.  Carry on, /u/jelly_doughnut. We understand that you didn't mean to insult the Apache. 
We just started playing the base game. Which expansions are best?  
Every expansion has multiple modules, so they are more of like multiple-expansions-packs. I like most modules in both expansion packs. They add different kinds of flavors and make the game (generally) harder, you can make different combinations of them to make different experiences. Personally I would start with playing base until you want more and then buy the first expansion pack. Then play with it until you want more and get the following expansion pack.  
It allows up to 8 players with some added cards that feel really natural. The cards are also bigger and thicker. Basically card stock. It also come with sleeves that fit the theme. Oh! And wooden hearts. 
Oh boy! I'm staying home from work today, looking after my 2 sons, 4 and 1.5 years. It has already been an eventful day, and 90 minutes before my wife gets home...  How about you? What was your New Year's like? 
That does sound cool. The hearts are instead of the kinda sucky red cubes as Tokens of Affection? What're some of the added cards? 
My New Year's Eve was pretty quiet, which is how I like it really. I went out to a nice, relatively early event with my parents (picnic where they were showing Zootopia, which is great). At home, I stayed up unreasonably late watching Doctor Who (specifically the episode The Power of Three, which has become a tradition for me) and a bit of a charity stream on Twitch. 
That's awesome! Congratulations on going back to school. That's a difficult choice for a lot of people, but if it gets you to your dream job it'll be worth it!  Oh and congrats on the "sleeping" too. 
Was worried there for a second! Best of luck to you, and im glad your husband isn't cheating :) 
You my dear are a post title ninja. :D  Congrats on college life.  Just watch out for the parties and know your beer pong limits. 
Reminds me of my mom. She just turned 46 last week. She completed a three-year apprenticeship a few years ago and went right on into college. Was even offered a scholarship for her good grades!   Till 40, she spent most of her life at home with the family. Really proud of her!  Great for you too! Good luck! 
Oh, you jerk. I came here armed with words of solace about how sometimes we betray each other and you pull this on us. 
Good luck. Hope you succeed. :)  Prepare to deal with paranoid schizophrenics. They're gonna drive you crazy!  (* _ *) 
You should *totally* walk in the first day and pretend that you are the teacher.   If you're not going to a special adult education that is, otherwise it would be weird. 
Next will be your husband posting that his wife makes him feel inadequate because she's friggin' awesome. 
Dammit OP. I came here expecting to be depressed and frustrated with your circumstances and am instead smiling and happy.  How dare you brighten up my day. 
Please ~~re-frame~~ refrain from making click bait titles, thanks! 
Awesome! Congrats to you! I went back for my RPN when I was 29. I am now 33 and I love my job!  
hahaha, nice!  I hope to go back to school someday. But my kids are little and right now I am devoted to them.  Best of luck with your future goals! 
My 59 year old partner of 13 years, is NOT sleeping with a college senior, because she's full blown into menopause :-/ 
Um... Dorm sex is weird sex... ?  Congrats!   Going back to school when you're older is HUGE!   (i'm back in school and am in my mid 30's... big difference from the office drone stuff I was doing...) 
The most click-bait of click-bait, and I love it. I'm glad I didn't skip over this. My step-mom just got done finishing her degree, she's 47, and I can only express my excitement for you that you're doing something of this caliber. Way to go! May you reap the rewards of your education! 
My mom did the same thing a few years ago.  She is now working as a nurse making great money! We lost our home and lived with my grandparents for a while. She worked full-time as a waitress, juggled four kids (not literally, but that would be impressive) and found time to go to nursing school.  She was able to get us a house in a couple years and I could not be more proud! (I've since moved out and am going to college myself.)  Anyway, no matter the reason you're going to school, I have seen how hard my mom worked and the amazing rewards from it. So I know it's possible for anyone to do it. Good luck!  
So this hit /r/all. Wow. How does it feel to have be number 3 on this sub? 
What drives you toward psych nursing? Where are you from? As an RN in America myslef, I found Psych nursing to be a very hard subset and not at all what most expect.  
When I started College in 2013, I was doing evening classes and in my class, there was a 55 years old dentist who decided to go back to school to do something else. I didn't question much, but I do respect that, it must be hard coming back in school later in life. 
This is one of the longest conversations I've seen in this sub! Wow OP, your trick worked! 
That is awesome. I have been seeing a psychiatric nurse practitioner for about 2 years and she has helped me way more than any of the psychiatrists I have seen.  Good luck. 
Wow, that twist. Hey, now he can boast to his friends that he's nailing a college girl! Good job OP, psychology is pretty amazing and I loved it when i had to study it. 
Juicy click bait title with a twist and a happy ending. Have my bloody upvote, you monster. 
I kept skipping over this guiltily because I am a young college student who likes older men. I avoid people in relationships or marriage, but they will sometimes lie to you. When it comes out... all hell breaks loose.   On the other hand, congratulations! 
You tryna give me a heart attack!? You had me worried! Good luck with your goal, I hope you can achieve it. 
The highest of fives to you for this wonderful post!! 
Hah, awesome twist!!!  I would seriously give you Gold for that, if I wasn't dirt broke right now :P  In fact, is there a way to set a reminder? Like "in three months, remind me to Gold this topic creator"? 
Any reason for psychiatric nursing? Aside from having a really neat title to put on your business cards? 
Congratulations! You had me going there. How come psychiatric nursing though? 
I still read that wrong.... thought he was sleeping with another woman and you were okay with it and in the know. Whateves. 
I know psych nursing is a specialty that's always in demand, too. Which is always a plus. A woman in my (nursing) classes is in her mid-50s and is running circles around most of us. Good luck! 
Congrats! Title had me confused at first. Too many ways that title could turn out. 
Good luck to you! I'm about to graduate from nursing and currently taking my psych nursing clinical right now. Nursing (school) is really tough but i feel that it is one of the most rewarding jobs. Hope you achieve it 
Psych nursing is not fun.  I worked two years in inpatient acute psych.  You will get made fun of, insulted, spat on, hair pulled, and attacked.  I guarantee  it.  But if you can handle that, then go for it. 
Unless you like spending your day handing out medications, I'd advise another field. Easy ass job if that's what you are looking for. 
It took an embarrassingly long time for me to get that, LOL! That's awesome- you'll make a Great nurse! 
Woohoo congrats!  I'm a nurse, though not in the psychiatric realm.  That's the beauty of nursing... There are *so* many avenues of the profession.   
Congrats!  Proud of you internet stranger. Get him a schoolgirl costume as a present ;) 
I don't quite get it. so these two are already in divorce? what? 
I want to go into psychiatry, too :') Congratulations 
Oh my gosh! You're amazing. This is going to be me. I'm 21 and already have a wonderful family. We are financially stable right now so I spend my time caring for our son. I work odd jobs to help contribute but ultimately I am completely devoted to caring for my family and can't wait until I get the chance to go back to school! You're an inspiration. I have been exploring careers in behavioral hospitals and didn't even know of such a thing like psychiatric nursing. Now I know!! Thanks!   
Jesus OP, You had my heart pounding when I read the title! Reddit cannot handle these things!...or maybe just me, but still! 
My mom has been a psychiatric nurse for 20+ years.  She just got nurse of the year at her facility!  Congrats on starting your new journey.  PM me if you have any questions you want me to ask her.  Good luck and enjoy! 
I was expecting a very different post.  You made me smile. Thanks.  :) 
You can do it! My mom went back at age 49, English as a second language. She has been a respiratory therapist for almost 20 years now :) 
You could have said you liked to watch and then referenced looking in the mirror. 
Congratulations! That's awesome. :D I'm starting college at 27 with the goal of a masters or phd so I can teach at the college level. I want to help people succeed.  It's never, ever too late. And I respect you so much for putting your children first but still living your life. I hope I can find that balance when I one day have kids. 
I knew it would be something cutsie by the subreddit!  If this was in /r/relationships the title would be "My [44F] husband [40M] of one year is sleeping with a [19F] college freshman. Should I tell him this makes me uncomfortable or am I being crazy?". 
How cool! It's a brave thing to go to college at any age, but especially when you've already been out of school for so long. I hope it goes well for you. 
Have you ever thought of going into internet journalism instead? You sure know how to write a title! 
Best of luck, this is coming from a 39yo recent graduate. I was on the two decade plan lol. 
Didn't see that coming. Nice!   I like that not only is it you, but you're actually 4 years older! 
Nice twist, but I called it before I clicked.  As an aside, I know many psych nurses. They have wildly varying opinions of the profession. 
In that movie the 6th Sense - that dude in the hairpiece? That's Bruce Willis the whole movie.  
My mom decided she wanted to be a homemaker while my brother and I were growing up (occasionally volunteering and working part time at our school's office and such) and dad stayed the primary breadwinner. once we graduated high school she decided to start classes for her HIT degree! We actually wound up having two classes together which was pretty awesome.  
I'm sorry, come by and I'll bake you some cookies. :) 
Haha I told his Sister and she told him how disgusting he was before I let her in on it.  It was pretty funny.   
I'm sorry I toyed with your emotions. My ex husband was a jerk, you can comfort me about that?  
Um... Tommy Chong has rectal cancer. Is that better? That ruined my day.  :p 
You mean refrain? I'm sorry.  I thought I was being funny.  I'll try again.   
Really? That's great! Was it hard?  I'm kind of worried I am not smart enough anymore.  No school in like 28 yrs.  So far so good but I heard the program is hard 
Dorm sex would be weird!    Thank you! Best wishes to you.  What are you studying?  
It's really different to be back in a classroom after 28 yrs.  Trying to relearn how to learn.  But so far so good!  
I know I'm a bad person.  I'm sorry... Kinda... Sorta.  
Thank you! I'm so excited. I've gotten A's in my first class on everything.  I've never done a power point before and I scored over on it.  It was pretty fun!  
Few reasons. My mother was ill, and she passed it to me, in turn I passed it to my son who committed suicide 8 yrs ago. I didn't know I was sick, just thought all the crazy ups and downs were normal. Didn't know my mom was sick until recently because she died before I was two. I have a feeling, reading her file, it was not an accident when she died. I've always been drawn to the mentally ill, and I just want to help the people that are closest to my heart. I believe because I was sick and am now stable several years, that I have a unique perspective to offer and give hope.    
Things are good.  4 yrs ago life really sucked.  I'd felt like I lost everything, but it turned out that my ex husband was worse than I thought he was, and losing him was the best thing for me.  My youngest moved out, and now we have a great relationship, my new husband is incredibly supportive and so far I've gotten an A or above on all my assignments.  I'm really happy and putting a lot of effort in not waiting for the other shoe to drop.  I'm living in today.  And today is amazing.  How are you?  
I think it depends on where you go.  Some nursing is more hands on.  Thank you, though.  
No, we are married.  I just started school so I am a freshman in college, so the freshman he is sleeping with is me, see?  
We do have one on the ceiling... That would have been funny.  Haha 
Ah! Nice!  So what did you decide to be when you grew up?  
Yes, he insisted I needed a 'younger man' in my life.  He's such a goober.  
Nah, this was clever. Usually they're annoying though 
I just graduated nursing school in December and work as a psychiatric nurse! It is absolutely the most rewarding job I've ever had! Mental health is my jam. I honestly couldn't see myself working in any other field. Not a lot of people want to go into psych tho, so I commend you. It's not always easy but it is so worth it! Good luck! 
I actually know someone who went back to college in their late 30s and completely changed their profession, so you can do it too!  she became a great psychologist  
Hearing Instrument Technology? I know a few people that went back for one of those too!  You know, there's that stigma that having classes with one of your parents would be embarrassing. But really, I would just be proud of them and happy to have someone to study with/keep me motivated.  The mom/dad jokes would be okay too. Any friends that weren't okay with it wouldn't be worthwhile friends. 
Don't be making undeliverable promises, now, OP! We'll be seeing you in /r/food!  
Good thing she didn't start crying and apologising for not saying anything earlier. 
*clears throat*  "That's always really rough. You're far from alone, however. We've all been there in one way or another and we're all better for it in the end. The unfortunate reality of human nature is that we often betray and hurt the ones we love. There's nothing I can tell you to make you feel better about this, but just know that it'll get better and despite the fact that the opposite feels true - this isn't about you. It's not a reflection on your worth as a person or a wife, your ability to satisfy your husband or any of those bullshit thoughts that crop up when these things happen. It's about his selfish desires, weakness, lack of morality and failure as a husband. Keep your chin up - you'll get through this and rise better and stronger from the ashes, like the phoenix."  
There is cancer in places that there should never be cancer. Can he press charges against the cancer? I suspect this invasion was not consentual. 
I mean your thread is still up. We just don't want to fall into the same 'click bait' titled nature of other subs.  
You're talking about the collectively NICEST people on Reddit. Of course they'll care! 
I have been looking into going to school for my RPN for a couple years now. I never wanted to be a nurse in my life, but I would love to be a counsellor. Psychiatric Nursing scares me, because I have never thought I was smart enough or strong enough to do it. I like your story, and can relate. You have inspired me to give schooling to be a RPN another look. Thank you. And good luck! 
ER nurses for example are definitely hands on. Psychiatric nurses not so much.   I worked in the top Psych hospital in the US. You would shit yourself if you knew some of the people who were inpatients there. People from all over the world. I left the field when insurance reform hit around 1996. 
Sounds like you guys like to have fun lol. I have always been intrigued by the mirror on the ceiling.  
Well....I started out in political science, then business administration, then public relations followed up with MIS. After years of misguidance and misdirection, I graduated with an Interdisciplinary Studies degree since it used most of my random credits. I've been in IT for 15 years so....lol! HR at my job really just wanted a(ny) degree to justify the pay raise. 
Oh, I'm ok now.  What's the opposite of vomiting? Because that's what I did when it turned out to be great news! 
Thank you, I wasn't trying to offend anyone, just being funny.   
Health Into Technology actually, but that's also another one that people seem to flock to!   There were people in one of our classes that tried to determine if we were siblings or dating (she looks really young for her age), so there was that! Slightly embarrassing there for a bit, but we were easily able to laugh it off. 
Woah, that was good stuff. Can you elaborate on this?  "The unfortunate reality of human nature is that we often betray and hurt the ones we love."  
Oh, wow.  I'm glad I could help!  You can do this!!  I thought about counseling, but having lost a son to suicide, I couldn't take the burden.  I'm sure you will do great! Keep me posted!  
I would watch a porn called this, if it was basically all just crazy over the top twists.  Like the guy cums, the camera zooms out, and the girl was actually a pizza all along 
Thank you, I think it will be a very fulfilling career. I'm a support worker right now, working with adults with mental disabilities, and I enjoy it, a lot. But I feel like I could be doing more with my life to really help people. I think you have a great attitude and you will go far with it, especially since you have so much of your own mental health experience. I look forward to an update from you in the future to hear how awesome you are doing! 
It has to do with the CSS, I think there are around 25 custom sayings that the mods change up every now and then  just counted, actually 35 custom sayings including some never stated 
I noticed this yesterday! I think it only shows on the PC though...? I haven't seen the quotes pop up when I'm on the app 
I just did a whole bunch of upvotes and I see no quirky quotes :( I'm on a PC too. What am I doing wrong? 
This is awesome!  It's the best upvoting experience I've had since that sub where the upvote turned into a rocket and did some elaborate little animation! What sub was that, anyway? 
Mine said "Thanks, Obama" but I'm Canadian :-| lol 
Upvotes for everyone !!  Good OP, this is true /r/CasualConversations material 
Tfw using Reddit Sync and cant see the messages :( 
I have, and I love it.  Yesterday was "Batman upvotes, too"  It has me so giggling... 
This sub definitely has my favorite upvote icon now. 
This is my fav sub... And I upvote everyone, these little messages make it so much more worth it.  
DONGERING INTENSIFIES. That upvote felt pretty good.  
I still haven't forgotten my promise! I just have had zero laptop access today. I'll get you your silly upvote quote for this one I guess. 
Please school me because I don't see any messages. ELI5 
It's the same thing in /r/youdontsurf. They have those quirky quotes for upvotes and downvotes. There are around 4 quotes for upvotes and downvotes 
I got "too much chlorine in the gene pool" twice in a row today. Is /r/casualconversation trying to tell me something? 
I just upvoted the hole frontpage. Just to see some quotes :) 
"master of karate and friendship".  haha!  I think that is accurate actually! 
I got that as well for the OP and the same "master of karate and friendship" when upvoting your comment. 
You are probably right, because your upvote quote is the same as /u/Supernintendolover's - "master of karate and friendship". 
How does everyone's saying stay the same no matter who upvotes them? 
When I up-vote, it stops me clicking the minimise comment button. Its like it creates a box that covers that area.   If i try to click it, it takes away the up-vote 
Do you have "Use subreddit style" checked in the sidebar? If so, are you using keyboard navigation? It doesn't work unless you actually click on it. 
I'm on a PC and the message is in red...you have to be quick because the message fades up. 
"WHOOMP THERE IT IS"  p/s: what I saw when I upvoted you. This almost feel too coincidental to be true. Are these mods real? Maybe mods are just a collective manifestation of a supercomputer hiding behind reddit. Is this sub real, or is this an alternate reality? What does 'real' even mean? 42?  
I'm glad because the fun is almost ending.  It was a hell of a ride.  You missed out on some of it.  But you need to at least catch the ending.  Pyrowolf8 is awesome  
Are you on a PC?  Use FireFox or Chrome.  That appears to be the browsers that show the upquotes as someone called them.    Upvote people on this sub and a quote appears.  You have to be fast, because it's in red and it fades upwards quite quickly.  If you miss it, upvote again, the arrow becomes gray and if you upvote again you can see the message again.  Keep doing those steps until you can read the message completely.  Hope that helps.  "What are these words?" 
Yes, I agree!! :d  Take me to the karma shop I'll let you lick my karma pop 
Dayman....aaaaaah-AAAAAAAAH-aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaah. 
Onion is the devil apple??! No it most certainly is not it is delicious and wonderful and I love it.  Also sheriffcookie is an adorable user name :3 
"Batman upvotes, too"   I'm just going to upvote everyone on this sub from now on.  
Yeah.. there's nothing. I'm going to try a different browser and see.. 
So apparently it doesn't work on Internet Explorer, which is what I use on my work computer. Going to start using Firefox instead :) 
Hmm strange. Yes I am on a pc and I use chrome. I do run adblock if that has anything to do with it? I'm guessing the message will appear where my mouse pointer is correct? I don't see diddly squat. Oh well. 
Sitting. the great levler  It makes upvoting fun :D 
"WHOOMP THERE IT IS!!"  I feel like this could easily turn into a never ending upvote train, haha. 
I disagree as well! Onions are the best, but I can see them being devilish if I tried to eat them like an apple.  And thank you, not_a_wallaby isn't too shabby either! :)  (also your upvote phrase was "THIS IS SPARTA!") 
"/u/cupcake1713 is best admin"  This user is the moderator of a lot of subs, indeed. 
someone else has the same issue...try a different browser.  I'm using Firefox. 
Attention passengers, A NEVER ENDING UPVOTE TRAIN is now arriving! Your upvote quote is "2015!".  
What are these words? Was the upvote phrase for this one :D  You could kill someone with your breath if you ate onions like apples! 
"Ayy lmao"  How do you feel about being a part of one of this upvote quotes? 
I am using Chrome. I wonder if that is it. Thanks for the tip.  
Take me to the karma shop ill let you lick my karma pop. 
I like this thread. I don't know what's going on, but I like it. 
"topkek"  I keep forgetting to go to the subreddit page to upvote so I can see the message, so I have to go and re-upvote.  
"Nope, Chuck Testa"  You definitely could. Perhaps that is why they are the devil? Killing people with bad breath seems kind of satan-y. 
"Ground control to major Tom. Comm(10)ncin(9)h cou(8)nt(7)down(6) engin(5)es on. (4)and may(3) Sagan's(2) love b(1)e with you.s"  No words to describe it. 
Your genius is showing   but onions are delicious!  
-Takes you to the karma shop- Though I'll hold off from licking your karma pop... 
Ground control to major Tom, Com(10)ncin(9)g cou(8)nt(7)down(6) engin(5)es on.(4)and may(3) Sagan's(2) love b(1)e with you.s 
It's weird. I don't see your comment in the thread. It's visible in my inbox only.   *Still disappointed no one wants to lick my karma pop...* 
This is my second favorite!!   Batman upvotes, too 
I just wanted to say that when you said "I'm sorry" to the paramedic attending to you, that was the greatest thing anyone could've done. It feels absolutely horrid when you lose someone you're working on, because you live the rest of your life doubting yourself and replaying those moments in your head. It may sound wrong, but it's not a clear conscious, as much as being told that you did your best, but it may of not have been meant to be. It doesn't mean they'll stop, but it means that they'll try harder if the patient is lost because it motivates us even more to make it so that that isn't the patients final words.  
Well that was absolutely harrowing to read; I can't begin to imagine what it was like to experience. 
That's pretty damn interesting for sure. Not many people can say they can experience and remember all of that. Thanks for sharing. 
ER nurse here. I can assure you that you are a story that the medical staff at the hospital will be talking about for years to come.  
Intense!  What happened to the girl who you T-boned? Did she survive? What about your friend? 
Damn, and you don't remember anything during those 113 seconds? Basically just sleeping?  
During the 113 second duration while you were dead, when you woke up, what did it feel like, in terms of time passing?  Did time feel like it was instant like when you wake up from sleep?  Did you wake up groggy (after the shock)?   
I've started watching The OA on Netflix and it focuses on near-death experiences so this is a strange coincidence for me.   Really interesting to hear what it was like for you and as someone who can have anxiety thank you for giving my awful brain a new target to shoot for and simulate!  I'm surprised about the sensory reaction to defibrillation. I suppose it makes sense but I had never thought about it before. Did any of the effects last long? Meaning did you taste copper for a while or did your ears ring or anything? Any long term damage from the accident?  Thanks so much for sharing this is a really cool experience to read about and I'm glad you're here to share it! 
Thank you for sharing this. As I get older, I think about death more and more.   My mom once coded while having heart surgery and she spoke about having an out of body experience and floating above herself, but not recognizing it was her. She was gone for approx 90 seconds before the defibrillator worked. She said the same thing about the taste, smell and pain of being brought back that way, but she was grateful.  
Wow, I can't imagine what you went through. I'm so happy you made it back. Did anything else happen when you were gone? 
Well this does nothing to alleviate the crippling fear of my inevitable death. 
What was bleeding so bad that you lost so much blood? Artery in your arms? Back?  also i cant read this again bcus i almost had a panic attack, for some reason descriptions of death trigger my anxiety like nothing else lol 
Thank you so much for sharing this, that's such an amazing story! I'm so glad you're alive to tell it too.  
That was quite the read.  What made you "die"? Was it blood loss or something else? 
This topic interests me to no end, so thanks for sharing!  One question - What was the first thought you remember after being brought back? I'm just curious what a brain's first response would be to being shocked back into existence. 
So you could still remember what happened before you died? That's fascinating to me. I just assumed the brain would forget things while you were dead. How was your long-term memory afterwards? Could you still remember things? 
Do you know what happened to the person that caused the accident? 
What sensory did you lose last? My bf shot himself a few years ago and I read that hearing is to go last. I always think that he heard the chirping of birds and the wind before he died.  
I don't work in the medical field(CPR certified though) but I'm pretty sure a defibrillator doesn't start a stopped heart like the movies lead us to believe.  They are used to reset the heart beat when it's irregular.   
Don't think anyone has asked this: did it hurt, being flung out the windshield and all those cuts that the pooling blood came from? Or did it happened so fast that you couldn't really think about the pain? 
I was sitting eating breakfast while reading this....this is insane. I was just thinking about how it must have felt when seeing a pool of blood around you. I am glad you survived the ordeal! 
I guess your username checks out?  It sounds like you had some massive blood loss. Did you get transfusions or was it just the injuries that made you go out, or the blood loss? 
Quite an interesting story you have there! Thanks for sharing. Dying is always something I've thought about. I could never imagine what it was like  
It was fascinating to read your story. I'm glad it turned out well.   My mom believes she died in a car wreck when she was 17. My dad would roll his eyes and say if you were really dead you wouldn't be here.   I feel pretty certain you can return from the brink. Not sure if there's anything after this tho. 
Ok, now I have anxiety, because what you're describing sounds kinda similar to being put under for an endoscopy, and I am supposed to have another one this year.  If I equate that feeling with dying, I'm not sure I can do the procedure again. 
All I want to know is if you told your mom you loved her after you woke up. My heart broke when I read that was your last thought. Glad you lived to tell your story. 
What killed you? Did you bleed out? If so, from where?  
I had a diabetic attack a couple months ago and I can only imagine what you went through.  
1( was your friend OK?  2( did the blood turn out to be yours?  3( were did it turn out you'd been hurt?   4( how far out of the windshield did you go? 
Did you suffer any brain damage from the 2 minutes of death? How was your body overall right after the accident 
Hey I'm living in Japan too! Loved your story, sounds really intense. I'm shocked you have that vivid recollection of the event.  
Incredible story! Thanks for sharing. I work in EMS, it's actually really common for people to say sorry to first responders. 
I'm listening to really emotional music right now, and reading this made me tear up big time. You sound like a wonderful human. So glad you're still with us. 
Holy shit you're lucky dude. Do you have any sick scars? 
I always wanted to ask this to someone who was brought back with the defib. Does that leave any lingering effects on your heart? Like, does the doctor tell you not to do cardio anymore or something like that? I hope you are all okay man! 
Awesome read. Sounds honestly a lot of like what I imagine dying is. Which is itself pretty surreal. What we're some of your thoughts as you were going through those moments of kind of a realization that you were... Dying I guess. I've always been curious.   I'm glad you made it and thanks for sharing man. 
Amazing story. Thank you. I'm glad you are alive and well.  I've been curious for a long time and studied NDEs, OOBEs, Astral Projection, and Lucid Dreams extensively along with my own experiments. Anything you recall in between "falling asleep" and being defibrillated? Or was there any time distortion that you perceived in the process of coming back to life along with the flash and loud bang sound? 
Did you talk to your mom about this afterward and tell her that you loved her? I looked trough the answers and couldn't find this. 
This is incredible to read. Real sorry you went through that but amazing that you were lucky enough to make it through 
I'm really glad to hear this! I could hardly say anything so I just kind of blurted out what felt right. I've said in other comments that I really just felt like what was happening was just going to let everybody down. So I felt like somebody needed to hear that I wasn't doing it deliberately. 
Maybe its odd to say, but I would imagine that particular night  was much worse for my friends and family than it was for me. The recovery afterwards definately sucked though. 
No problem! Most people think that its really strange that I was concious up until the fact. A lot of the doctors wanted to interview me about the experience after they had found out. 
I'd already teared up at "I wish I could have replied to my mom" but that's just the cherry on the cake. 
The girl did survive, her car ended up spinning out and hitting a utility pole after we hit her. She went to the hospital for minor injuries according to the police report.  My friend was trapped in the car because the dash had folded in and pinned his leg to the seat. The fire department ended up using a bottle jack to push it back forward enough to get him out. He also went to the hospital but was only bruised. 
Honestly, at the time I wasn't really scared about it at all, so it wasn't unpleasant in that way for me. There also wasn't much pain twords the end so I wasn't in agony either.  All of the unpleasent feelings that I felt were mostly from sadness. It really felt like I was going to let everyone down and there wasn't much I could do about it.  
No, I really don't. It was just like I had nodded off and had a very rude, yet much appreciated awakening. 
This concludes that being dead will be a weird experience considering your consciousness is *off* forever.   Imagining being unconscious for a non-finite time seems impossible. 
That's really interesting. I was actually put under to have my wisdom teeth pulled and I had a dream that I was the dentist pulling them!  I'm glad your mom made it through. Being shocked is a super strange experience. 
As in "the light at the end of the tunnel" occurrence? No, literally the only way for me to explain it is by attributing it to a dreamless night of sleep.  When I woke up I remember being really warm though, which people like to joke about quite often.  
Jeez, I'm glad that it worked out about equally okay for you! 
I am way too sleepy to resist death. I better be careful now 
Concussion? I had a similar experience playing backyard football and taking a strong knee to the head.. twice.. 
Really? This story comforts me that I won't feel a thing and will not notice dying the same way I can never remember the moment I feel asleep.  
How much blood loss is considered a lot I know I needed about 64 units of blood when I got in my accident but idk if that's a lot or most people need about that much I know I was hurt fairly badly but I didn't know how badly  
It's super intense. Its nice to hear that everything ended up okay for you also. That stuff is no joke man. 
Yeah my memory was fine, I don't vividly remember much of my time in the actual hospital, but I attribute that to the pain medication that I had been given. I don't have any memory problems from it. 
I know from the police report that her car had spun out and hit a utility pole on the opposite side of the road and that she had gone to the hospital with minor injuries. 
Wow, that's terrible. Hearing was the last thing that I remember, I couldn't really hear what was going on around me though. It was more like my body tuned to the sound of my heartbeat. 
I'm sorry to hear of your loss.  I had an experience somewhat similar to the OP and it was very much like lying in bed at night with your eyes closed - everything is black,  you feel warm,  no pain and you can just hear what's happening around you.   Your thinking is probably spot on,  he'd have been completely comfortable and only been aware of the birds and breeze.   
You are correct, I'm also not a medical professional and I'm not exactly sure of the steps that they took in between heart stopping and defibrillation. I know they did chest compressions, and I assume that there was also some kind of medication in there.  The man from the ambulance told me himself how long it had been though, its the only reason I know.   
ahh sorry if that wasn't clear. Yes it was to my mother, I could tell that she was hysterical when she called out to me; so it was a really awful feeling that I couldn't physically reply to her at the time. 
Yeah I lost about 3 - 4 pints of blood, mostly from my head, neck, and shoulder region. I had a gash that went from above my left eye and up to about the middle of my head.  
diabetes is no joke, make sure you take care of yourself! 
yeah sorry, there was one other that asked this same question. I was referring to my mom, I could tell that she was hysterical at the seen of the accident when she called out to me.  It really was a shit feeling that I couldn't even get out an "I love you too." the last time that I thought I would see her. 
I became really good at talking to suicide survivors. 
They're really asking if you've rebelled against England. 
did you take advantage of the opportunity and tell them you saw a giant one-eyed cat at the end of the tunnel, and that it was speaking to you in perfectly understandable mathematical equations that explained the nature of the universe and put you as ease and oneness, and that you still harbor this state of mind? And that you can predict events with a 5-second lead? 
Has she ever contacted you to apologize? Have you met her ever, in court or whatnot?   
That's how I imagine it'll be with death. Its not the dying, it's the helplessness. Every time I see some sort of death, I always get this ping in my heart about how terrible it must be to know you're slipping away and can't do anything about it. That's my #1 fear about dying, that helplessness.  
Thank you for sharing your story. My gma passed away yesterday and although it wasn't due to an event like yours, it brings comfort to read about your lack of pain. I know her body was causing her a lot of discomfort the last 6 months so it's calming to know the moment was most likely peaceful 
Aaaaand you just lost a multi-million dollar book deal. 
I watched Wayward Pines once, and I struggled to wrap my head around how confused the residents were to know that thousands of years have passed since the last time they were cryo-frozen. When they woke up they felt like their last memories were like a day ago; they were not a day ago.  Then I realised the passage of time is an emergent property; an illusion due to our stream of consciousness. When you pass out, or even die, (and then get revived), it can feel like the time hasn't passed at all.  
Wait so you haven't had surgery to repair your torn trapezius? What's the extent of the tear and does it limit your movements in any way? 
Very strange. Did the experience confirm or change your views on afterlife? 
I had the same feeling when I woke up after I hit my head and had a seizure. My whole body felt warm. 
Yep! That was many years ago when I was in high school. It was a very interesting trip, that's for sure.   My friends asked me if I wanted to go to the hospital once we were back in the car. I said no, since there probably wasn't really anything they could do except give me some pain medication and maybe an ice pack and charge me a few thousand dollars for it.   So far, so good. I've actually been trying to remember what Park it was at because I'd like to do it again (w/O the flip this time).  
I'm more stubborn than a mule, so that probably helped me resist giving in. I had just flipped off a massive cliff. I had to brag about it at least once before I died, so there was no way I was going to let myself die on that day lol.   With that said, it took almost all of my willpower to keep my eyes open and moving from object to object, so that I didn't close them.   Whether I would have actually died or not after that, I don't know, but at the very least, I'm convinced that if I gave in to the urge, I would be stuck with some sort of permanent brain related disability. I'm not sure if that's how brains work, but it's nice to think that all that effort was worth it.  
What scares me most isn't the process of dying itself, but rather the fact that it's eternal.  It's odd to think about given that you won't be alive to process the concept of time anyways, but still: the idea that I won't ever exist or feel again as I do now is frightening.  Especially so given that it's one of the few things in life that a person can't control in any respect; it inevitably happens to all of us.  If I had to boil it down further, it's really the fact that we can't possibly know what will happen that's the scariest.  The human brain can't possibly wrap its mind around what eternal unconsciousness entails, or whether *anything* happens after death.  Everything I know and feel is a product of relating things to the thoughts and emotions that I experience, which makes it a bit ironic that my first response to a state of being where I can't feel or experience anything is to feel fear. 
I just wanted to say that your matter-of-fact prose is refreshing. This entire thread was worth reading. 
Make sure you monitor your sleep as well. Both excessive sleepiness (narcolepsy) and insomnia can be caused by head trauma. You said it was six years ago, but sometimes it is hard to notice narcolepsy (it isn't always falling asleep via sleep attacks, sometimes it is just needing to sleep for 11+ hours to feel rested). 
You don't know anything about if she faced charges? Considering she killed you and all?  
Thank you for this. You have no idea how much better this makes me feel about my uncle's death. 
That would've sucked! Even just thinking about it. It's so shocking, did you feel as if everything was a dream, as if nothing was hurting , all that was going on was thoughts in your mind? 
I needed to laugh after reading something so emotional.  Haha thank you. 
I have this feeling every time something bad happens to me. I keep apologising to doctors, to nurses, to surgeons, to friends and family all the time. Whenever I'm unwell the strongest feeling I have is guilt for making people worry, or doctors having another patient to save :/ It's the sucky part of people caring about you. 
I was only in the hosptial for about a day and a half, and didn't have any broken bones (which was nice).   I ripped one of the major muscles in my back and compressed one my spinal nerves so my neck is often sore, but tolerable. eventually, I'll probably need surgery to remove some scar material in my back.  my head needed 45 stitches, or rather 30 stitches and 15 staples, the way my skin was lacerated didn't leave super visible scars though. My wife just tells me that the ones you can see make me look like someone you don't want to mess with.  I was in college and my professors were super understanding about the whole ordeal, I would do my work from my bed and email it to them. one of them even brought the test to my house and sat there while I took it.   In the end all was well.    
What was the nature of the universe?  I dunno, I wasn't taking notes. 
Then someone accidentally knocks his oatmeal over and he catches it before it hits the ground like Spiderman? 
See that's the thing that kinda comforts me, that there's no memory. If/when I go, I certainly won't know about it. 
Believe me, after the way it felt it's not something I would do again! 
Ahh I guess its worth mentioning. I was in a ton of pain when I got up out of the street but the pain I can remember only lasted minutes at best. I'm sure that between adrenaline and shock I was more concerned with how much blood I was losing. 
I live with constant pain and had an experience similar to OP though not due to an accident.  It was the first time in years where there was no pain,  I wasn't afraid, I just felt warm, comfortable and relaxed. I felt bad knowing that my mum would be devastated but at the same time I knew everything would be okay.    I'm sorry for your loss and I'm sure her passing was peaceful.   
ahh damn, I didn't even think of that! oh well, somehow I'll cope. 
I've had nights where "sleep" was the moment between closing and opening my eyes- felt like an instant but in reality, 10 hours had passed.   Makes me wonder how feasible(probably not + likely unethic somehow) artificial comas are for "personal time travel" aka. "wake me up in 2040 when we have flying cars ok bye".   
This is a good question; I've never been a religious person. I would place myself as Optimistically agnostic. I don't know if theres an actual heaven or hell; but its nice to believe that something happens after we're gone. 
yeah in the movies everyone's like "my body feels so cold..." and I'm just like, heh. 
Can you explain please? I tried to Google it but I'm still confused...sorry. 
What the fuck...why didn't you go to the hospital?! You have no idea what even happened to you..do you?  
Thanks for this, I pretty much just threw it up on the page as I thought about it. I'm just glad to hear it made sense. 
Ahh I see your question. No I have no idea, I assume that she was ticketed and all of the basics. But I never heard anything about actual charges. 
Tears in my eyes and laughter on my lips is an odd roller-coaster. 
When I was in the hospital for my kidneys and related pain I apologized to everyone for everything.  The nurse, the Dr, the cleaning lady, seriously everyone.  I felt so bad that my body was being a jerk and making everyone take care of me.  The nurse told me that's how they knew the really sick patients from the pill poppers and such.  If you're loud enough to scream and yell about your meds and be mean to the staff then the reasoning was you weren't that bad off. She said it was the quite nice ones they worried about more.  Ever since then I've been even nicer to the staff.  I don't want to be a bother but it helps to get better care.   
When I was a senior in high school I got in a pretty bad car wreck on my way to school. I got knocked out cold and woke up when they were loading me into the ambulance. I was still pretty out of it so my memory is foggy but I guess I kept asking the paramedics to take me to school. If you were a senior with perfect attendance you didn't have to take final exams, and apparently this was very important to me! My mom told the principal what happened and he thought it was hilarious. He was just glad that I was ok, and he made an exception for me and let me be exempt from taking finals. Really a good guy. 
So was the heart stopping due to blood loss? or shock? I am surprised that you basically died but only had to stay in the hospital for roughly two days! 
I feel like this is something out of Hitchhikers Guide to the Galaxy. 
Assuming it was at ET tube, that'd be because there's a balloon on the end holding it just below your vocal cords :/ 
Only this time? You don't want to be woken up by electricity again? I mean, it's definitely gotta get you going  
Just say you saw some angels and you're set doing talks for life.  
oh yeah that too. I almost forgot about that. I've experienced such 'dreamless sleep' before, and it did trip me out. But I most of the time dream vividly, so such sleep is rare to me.  As for the 'personal coma', I'd love to do that if we had the tech, but considering how bad humans are at maintaining our civilisation (based on our histories), plus how I don't trust that my sleeping body would be safe from harm, if the tech really does become available, I'd probably not try it out haha 
I figure that if no afterlife is the worst case, then death is a pretty good deal. I mean, a dreamless sleep is pretty relaxing. Imagine that, somehow, trillions of years and big bangs down the line, some absurd level of technology finds a way to reignite your consciousness.  You might ask for five more minutes.  
DMT is a very powerful psychedelic, the trip feels like home, you "travel to another dimension" with indescribably visuals that look more real than real along side crazy alien music, you might even meet beyond crazy entities. The drug is naturally occurring in the human body.  Due to the nature of the trip some believe the dimension it takes you to is what is "after life". There is no evidence that it plays a role in birth/death or dreams.   DMT has been found in pineal gland of rats through but there is no proof currently that it's the same with humans or that it has any meaningful role. 
Its too bad that she didn't visit you or say she was sorry for causing the accident 
Do you have the same thing, where it doesn't feel at all that all those people are at work, and it's their job, but it seems more like they were living their life, and then you got ill, and now they have to take care of you? :D 
It's the switcheroo. Douglas Adams does that a lot. For example:  "It's unpleasantly like being drunk."   "What's unpleasant about being drunk?"   "Go ask a glass of water."  
I once pulled a catheter out(for my wee), not realising it had an air filled balloon keeping it in place :-( nurses were shocked is an understatement 
I'm actually not sure as I don't have any kind of extensive medical knowledge, There was a small stopper looking thing at the end but it was pretty small and not very balloon-like. 
I had all of my medical bills and physical therapy paid for, lawyer took a huge chunk, and I pocketed about $15,000 which I used to pay for a study abroad trip. 
You're on to something here. We need to pantent the electric alarm clock. I'm thinking "Shock-Clock" for the product name. 
Your consciousness is only a result of the brain holding it together. Once that is turned to dust, there's no coming back. I wish there was a way 
Thank you, very informative and interesting. I read the Wikipedia page but it sounded more like a synthetic drug people take. 
Maaan I want to try DMT, but like, I have sleep paralysis too, so I'm worried that I'll have a hellacious trip, and not a fun one. I am a lucid dreamer, and my dreams quite literally to other people that I have told them to, say, "you got a free dose of DMT," which is why I want to try it lol 
I'd actually imagine that her insurance told her not to contact me directly. My friends insurance told us something similar, not to initiate contact with her.  
My wife is a nurse and has seen that happen. And been shocked.  
..wtf. Just having the nurses pull the catheter out of me was awful, you ripped the fucker out with the balloon still inflated? Holy shit.  
well it's known that humans and other mammals are able to create DMT, it's very similar to serotonin after all. the problem is that is breaks down quickly and testing it would be done very soon after the person died. 
Welcome, I find it extremely interesting.   Yes DMT is simply extracted from a number of plants around the world that have a high percentage of the substance.   DMT is physically quite safe the only physical effects are dilated pupils, slightly higher heart rate and blood pressure. It's not really possible to overdose when vaping DMT.  DMT is also known to help with a number of mental illnesses. 
I think you'd be surprised by DMT, as SWIM says it's like you're still completely your self just in another dimension I wouldn't say sleep paralysis would effect it because your not asleep. As long as you go into the trip relaxed as possible, treat the drug like it's not a toy, willing to go anywhere, expectation-less and excited you should be fine.  SWIM says after you do it once you'll be a lot more comfortable. 
Would that be because of possible grudges and conflicts between you and the girl? 
Yeah, that part really sucks. They told me I shouldn't even send anonymous Get Well Soon flowers to the hospital. I mean, it's just common decency, not a signed legal statement. 
I wasn't 'in the right frame of mind' :-/ actually, I was desperate for a poo too & I think I thought it would help?? Plus I'm a girl. Does it make a difference??! 
Oh cool, does that mean that DMT would be very difficult, if not impossible to pick up in a drug test? 
I dunno if it's right for me, considering I have major anxiety though. Maybe after I'm 30 and (hopefully) in a house with my bf. I've logged your advice mentally though so when I am ready to do it, that's what I'll be. 
I'm sure that it's a mix of that as well as the fact that insurance doesn't actually want to pay more than they have to. The less the girl knew about my condition the less likely that she would be persuaded to take full blame.  Likewise, I wasn't supposed to be in contact with her because It would seem like I was pressuring / harassing her, I suppose.  Although, I was the passenger so no matter what I got no blame regardless. 
I think the fact that you're a girl became definitively obvious, was when you said the word "poo". The earlier hint was "pee".    I get it, when in labor, some women poo during the pushing. I made my husband swear not to look, but if he accidentally did, under no circumstances would he tell me if I did, either way.  
Do some men actually like that? It sounds fairly unpleasant  
Most psychedelic drugs are impossible to be picked up on drug tests (excluding marijuana of course - which is a psychedelic drug fyi).   Shrooms and LSD are unable to be picked up on drug tests. I'm pretty sure DMT is the same.  
Good on you.  :)    The time I tried to learn how to say "Congratulations" in Hindi to talk to a friend's boyfriend, I apparently both butchered the pronunciation and misjudged -- while he's Indian, Hindi isn't his native tongue. 
Sometimes the little things can mean the most. good on you dude :) 
Aww, this is so sweet!  When I was younger, we agreed to host a Japanese student for a couple weeks. When she stepped out of the cabin from the camp we picked her up from, I could tell she didn't speak much English. However, I had gone to a Japanese immersion school and I totally caught her and her teacher off guard when I (a pasty, tall white girl) started speaking in accurate Japanese. She was so excited and we spent the whole time talking in Japanese, and me translating for my parents. 
You're such a thoughtful person! Perhaps you can encourage your friend to learn some basic Kazakh so as to be a better boyfriend?  
Reminds me of one of my stories!  I used to work in a fast food drive thru (Oh so many stories) and on the rare occasion I got a foreign customer, I'd find out where they are from and learn a greeting in their language for the next time they came back. It was genuinely fun. 
I always feel too awkward to try and speak to someone in their native language. I don't know why. My dad can speak a few languages pretty well and has no problem throwing out jokes and stuff. Wish I would have inherited that.  
I had a conversation with some women in trollx about this exact thing. They said it is extremely racist and ignorant to try to speak to people in what you assume to be their native tongue. It's even terrible to ask someone if they speak any different languages because you're assuming their heritage.   Someone (a white person) recounted their story of an old guy who asked them in a coffee shop if they spoke any other languages. He was a polygot who spoke like 8 languages and wanted to practice. Apparently that was disgusting and someone else said, 'it's like he's only interested in your heritage like people talk about dog breeds'. Even though the guy literally only asked if they spoke any other languages...  Reading this has made me very happy because it makes me think that we can all simultaneously be interested in and respect other's heritages. As opposed to to what I was told in trollx. 
Aw, that's nice. I expected you to say or do something offensive but I didn't realise what sub I was in.  
I thought this was going in a different direction. Good for you! 
One time I did this with a Russian exchange student. But he didnt like it at all. :( glad your friend liked it though!! 
You failed to mention that Yakshemash is how you say it in kazakh. As in Yakshemash my name is  Borat lol 
I had an awkward conversation once where I tried to practice my Mandarin Chinese on this girl from Hong Kong. In my defence she told me she was Chinese, so it wasn't a terrible assumption to make. :) 
I always thought that Hindi was the go-to language in India - I think it was referred to as the 'Business Language' so almost a common second tongue.   I could be mistaken though  
Serious question, is the phrase "good on you" or "good for you?"   I guess I could have googled that question instead, oh well.  
It's ok. There are literally hundreds of languages spoken in india. But hindi is the national language so almost everyone speaks it.  
Meeting people of different cultures and backgrounds makes you a lot more empathetic  
I like languages, so didn't really think much of it at the time. I guess when you grow up speaking English, you don't really think of other people learning your language as anything other than normal.  It definitely feels nice to make someone's day though. 
Standing at a subway station in toronto I had an asian girl come up to me and just say "Downsview?" to me. I figured she was mainland Chinese and was either unable or far too shy to speak much English.   Handily I spend a lot of time in China for work and have managed to pick up a good deal of basic mandarin. Her eyes lit up when I started explaining to her in shitty mandarin how to get to Downsview station. A mixture of surprise, happiness and total confusion (I'm a big white guy). Glad I could help her out! 
Where did you grow up that has Japanese immersion schools? That sounds awesome. 
Haha, he got fake mad at me when she told him, like 'what have you done?? You're making me look bad'. He messaged me afterwards asking me where I learned though, so I think he has realised how much it would mean to her :). 
Yeah we're awful with languages, I wish something was taught as a universal second language in this country. Still can't believe that I was the only one of my friends to bother learning any Czech when we went ti Prague a few years ago 
i too did this once. but the person who claimed it made me feel like they were lying. i didnt see the phone fall out of their possession, so i can never really be sure if that phone really belonged to them. plus, they were an asshole about it, like i tried to steal their phone or something. 
This is awesome, good job for making random peoples day :D 
What? How could that ever be racist or ignorant? In school one of the best ways to have a conversation with the international students (or even second gen immigrants) is to talk about their language, their culture, their home because surprise! It's part of who they are.   I wouldn't have thought that Lithuania is particularly interesting or relevant, but because I was able to talk to a Lithuanian about their language and country I found out that their language is the oldest surviving language in Europe, and they have a god damn interesting history.  
I have friends who are either obviously foreign-born (accent) or born here but obviously 'non-native' (skin-colour). I get how asking someone "where they're from" could be offensive, but wondering about someones heritage is just curiosity, as long as you don't start assuming things because of their background.  
I'm told that white people learning PoC languages is a form of cultural appropriation, as well. It's almost like it's just an effort to feel superior to others. 
For those who aren't aware, in Hong Kong they speak Cantonese, not Mandarin 
Reminds me of the guy who kept digging himself deeper pretending he was Korean.  
i just subscribed to your newsletter, tell me more 
Despite both sides not liking the idea, linguists consider Hindi and Urdu the same language, called Hindustani, that has two different literary forms (Urdu and Hindi).  
Listening to Tamil and Malayalam is like listening to Morse code. They speak so quickly and it bears no resemblance to any European language. If I'm listening to Russian or Malay or Japanese I can recognise at least that words are being said. Tamil just sounds like an unbroken string of babble. This is not an insult, just a reflection of how different it is.  
Not just dialects. We have hundreds of full blown languages, and many regional dialects stemming from each of those languages. 
Most of India does learn at least some Hindi in school. The only place in India where you can safely expect nobody to know any Hindi is the state of Tamil Nadu, where Hindi is viewed as a linguistic threat to the native language of Tamil. 
Hindi and English are the two "universal" languages in India. Anyone trying to get a decently good job is expected to know both.  Everything else is regional, even if it is considered an "official" language. 
I'm reminded of the Mark Twain quote; "Travel is fatal to prejudice, bigotry, and narrow-mindedness, and many of our people need it sorely on these accounts. Broad, wholesome, charitable views of men and things cannot be acquired by vegetating in one little corner of the earth all one's lifetime.".  
It might have been, there's definitely an m sound in the middle and I'm not sure about the ending of the second word. There's only so many times you can ask a person to repeat something haha. 
You got lucky haha, I'm surprised you could tell the difference between mainland and Hong Kong / Taiwan  
Haha, it was pretty cool! I grew up in Oregon. West Coast, Best Coast! 
Call all the women he's with "Em". Just to be safe. 
FYI he might actually be legit angry that in seconds you may have made a deeper or at least more involved emotional relationship with her than he did.  Good on you for being considerate to her, but don't forget about possible side effects! 
It is really difficult to learn Kazakh. I'm from there originally but never lived there, and I can't find any place to learn it. Since my family is from Almaty, I've been learning Russian instead, but it kind of sucks not to have that connection...  
It's so unfortunate that you get people like that. It almost makes you inclined to just pocket the phone and say you know nothing of it if you knew they'd do that. Did others buy your story over theirs? 
I would also usually talk in a radio voice. Making people laugh and question whether or not it was a recording was solid gold. It's one of the very few things I miss about it. 
Not me.  It's either funny (I was born in the same hospital as you) or interesting.  There are far too many sticks up arses nowadays.  Even the Puritans would be confused. 
No it isn't. "How are you?" in Kazakh sounds like "Kal kalai?". "K" sounds roughtly, like cough 
My mistake, yeah. Cantonese and Mandarin are as different as English and Russian.  
I've known people from HK who could speak at least a bit of Mandarin.  
Link for that? That reminds me of a TIFU where a guy adopted his son who was Asian and believed he was Chinese and raised him with that kind of cultural influence only to find out his son was Korean 
I was unaware that I had a newsletter.  That sounds like a pretty cool thing for me to have. 
My dad speaks Malayalam and my mom says it sounds like rocks in a blender. It is an even tumbling sound, because they actually put even stess on all syllables! I'm not sure if this is specific to Malayalam, but speakers also combine the last sound of a word with the first sound of another that has the same letter. It sounds weird when they do it in English. 
Languages from different families as well. Indo-Aryan, Sino-Tibetan, Dravidian and Austro-Asiatic. 
No one is expected to know Hindi in India for business. It's English that's important. 
In this day and age, this can even be sorry if possible through they internet and documentaries, and plenty of media. As long as you don't vegetate in your own little corner of media all the time. Which, unfortunately, a lot of people do. 
There was famous soviet magician Amayak Akopyan who had catchphrase "sim-salabim ahalay mahalay". Last part of the phrase can be used to describe some magic action, like word "abracadabra". So I thought this could be the phrase that your colleague used. 
I find theres quite a difference actually. The way people look and dress (especially younger people) is way different in taiwan and HK to the mainland imo. Also Taiwanese speak mandarin, so that wouldn't have mattered.   And a  young Hong Konger would almost certainly speak some English.  Call it an educated guess haha. 
I disagree. OP did the right thing making this girl feel welcome outside her home country. In a couple seconds he made her feel at home in a way that no one else had done since she had left. Her boyfriend may not have had the idea but at least he's stepping up to the plate in a way that will bring them closer together. If the boyfriend is/was mad then that's on him. OP did the right thing. 
i love when people make boring things fun. you are a cool person. 
Only spoken, written they are mostly (exactly?) the same.   
He spoke English. I ended up having to help translate things for him. There was a bit of embarrassment on both ends, but he was a pretty okay guy. 
Maybe it's different now, but from what I've heard from family and friends, Hindi is a necessary part of getting a good job in India. 
I didn't wanna get into a whole long essay, but yeah, I don't think it has to be *literal* travel, with the options available these days.  
Yes, Hongkies will mostly likely already know some English.  Source: a fellow Hongki. 
It was a gas, man. One of my favorite lines was "Wwwwwwelcome to the best [insert fast food restaurant] in [insert town]!" The kicker was that this was the only one of this chain in town, so some people would be like "Hey, wait! This is the only X in town!" 
Hong Kong uses traditional characters while mainland China uses simplified, but yeah. The characters represent concepts rather than sounds. Japan also uses a bunch of the characters in combination with their own alphabets.  In fact, if you put a Mandarin speaker, a Cantonese speaker and a Japanese speaker into a room, even if none of them speak any of the other languages they can communicate through writing characters for each other. It's a fascinating system. 
Is that really what people from hong kong are called in English?  
See! you are a cool guy! what do you do now, if you dont mind? 
The Japanese person would have difficulties though, as grammar isn't as similar and they wouldn't be able to use their Japanese characters, which are about half of what is typically written (in terms of information, not by character. By character it's more than half. Kanji is more information dense than hiragana or katakana.) 
Learning to read and speak mandarin is essentially learning 2 languages 
Written language being disconnected from spoken language boggles my mind.  
The characters used in Cantonese are different in many cases than those used in Mandarin. In fact, some characters are used for sound as opposed to any represented concept.  Another interesting fact is that the simplified character set is not the same for Japanese and Mandarin (meaning they don't simplify all the same characters).  Traditional characters using the Mandarin words would be the best bet for shared understanding.   Source: studied all three languages 
No, I made it up myself.   I think Hong Kongers is the preferred term. I think Hongkies sounds catchy though, even though it somewhat coincide with a Texan slang or something. 
I work for Delta now, doing plane stuff. How about yourself? 
Oh yeah it wouldn't be fluent by any stretch of the imagination; they could get their point across though. 
Even for native people it's hard.    I'm ethically Chinese, but I live in Singapore. I can speak Chinese just fine but my writing... It wouldn't be exaggerating to say a 12 year old kid could write better. I really only know the basic words and then some.  
It's because the written language isn't phonetic, it's hieroglyphic - the characters are logograms.  In written English, for example, we have 26 characters, each of which makes a specific sound. Our writing is developed by slapping those letters together the make the same sounds we make when we speak to each other.  Chinese characters (which is what most east Asian written language are based on) operate differently. It's not (always) about recreating the sounds of the spoken language - the characters represent concepts. There are tens of thousands of Chinese characters, and functional literacy requires knowledge of ~4,000 of those. 
Those phonetic characters are  also used in Mandarin, and are also used to convey the tone of the sentence. The difference in written Cantonese and Mandarin are the specific phrases used to describe an object or concept. I don't have any immediate examples to give but an object like toilet can have different combinations for both, but would still be legible for both languages, although they would sound strange to the other side because they don't usually call the thing that way.    Note: I probably butchered the English language by typing that, English is not my first language. 
ooooo plane stuff! I'm an engineering student. I just wrote my last final for the semester. Exciting side news: I'm starting my first junior engineering job on Monday! 
You seem like a fairly shrewd person and in addition also interested in learning other cultures. How did you think referencing Borat is funny or relevant in any other way still? 
Please if you gave me the PSLE Chinese paper right now I'd probably fail. Oral and listening though, I think I'd do pretty OK. 
Metaphors, poetry, puns, etc must be a barrel of monkeys.  
Engineering job?! Fat wallet swingin' :D  Good job getting through that, man, it must've been tough. What do you engineer? 
That wanted the job, apparently.   A lot of people don't want to be president because it's a shit show 
Dave Mustaine!  I'm not telling if this is a shitpost or not. 
I'd throw my hat in the ring, but I'm constitutionally ineligible for the presidency for another four years. Sorry guys.  
There's a nice looking ficus at my Dentist's office that would make a better candidate than both. 
The problem is that the political system itself serves as a giant filter to make sure that nobody who's honest and honorable gets to the point where they *could* be a viable candidate. Think about it. If you're the sort of person who turns down special interest money in the name of not selling your soul to those interests, who looks at evidence and changes your mind based on what you learn, and who thinks deeply about the issues and fairly judges each side's arguments with wisdom and respect - well, you're going to get completely steamrolled by a well-funded jingoist who knows how to whip the crowd into a frenzy. You might make it to small-town mayor, but not to the national level.  So yeah, there are *tons* of people who would make phenomenal presidents. It's just that none of them are in politics. They respect themselves too much. 
Just cause they got nominated doesn't mean they're the best suited.  See George w. 
Stephen Colbert. I'd vote for him over these options 
How about someone actually running and on the ballot in all 50 States?   I'm voting for Gary Johnson. I certainly don't agree with all of his ideas (or those of his running mate), but way better than Hillary or Donald. 
I am a Bernie supporter, but Trump and Clinton are not at all equally unqualified for the job. Clinton has been a Senator, Secretary of State, and has spent time working as an attorney for years. Trump has no government experience whatsoever. His money was inherited and he has made epic blunders with that money over the years. While I don't love Clinton, she is vastly more qualified to be President than Trump.  
If you vote for president and don't want either of the two canadates, think about Gary Johnson, or better yet the man who will re-unify this great country:   Indigo3256....   I have an associates degree from a small heartland community college, and I may not be "qualified" or a "politician" but I treat everybody as my equal, mean what I say, and have never backed out of a promise/deal with someone. I'm only 27, but I mean we had a Canadian run for president, right?    On second thought, just stick with Johnson, I spend waaaaay too much time on video games to deal with foreign policy. 
Of that 324M number, are those all even eligible for presidential candidacy (meaning they are US born citizens at or over the age of 35)? 
The silly thing is that people still view the presidency as a single person, when it is in fact the sum total of all of the people that get included in a presidential administration, from advisors and staff to cabinet members and congressmen who increase their status with newly acquired access. This also ignores the monied interests that bankrolled the candidates campaign.  It is not one person. It is one person with ~~scores~~ *millions of people working/pushing for/at them. 
Besides bullshit conspiracy theories and ideologically motivated slander, Clinton is actually an excellent candidate with a pretty clear platform - uninspiring but competent leadership, and not a lot of change. No new deals, but no pointless quagmires either.   If you stop getting your politics from reddit, you will realize that Clinton is actually *not* a monster. The same cannot be said for Trump.  
A few of them were also pretty genuinely terrible people and had some wildly archaic beliefs by today's standards. I think it's important not to put men on a pedestal simply because they were around at the beginning. Granted, they got the job done.  
Also because they can convice voters to vote for them. Regardless of your ideas, you also need to be able to communicate them in such way that the people want you. You need to be good at the political game, which is not just about different opinions but also about making alliances and enemies at the right times with the right people. I think many geniuses have trouble communicating to the "normal" people, so they could never become president. The charisma just isn't there. Let alone that they could dive into the political game. 
Citizens of America, gingivitis has been eroding the gums of our nation for too long. 
I get the reference but in all seriousness he's hardcore Christian and hates gay people so fuck that. 
"If a baby were president, there would be no taxes, there would be no war." - Michael G. Scott 
A motivated, technically savvy humanitarian? Id vote for him in a second. 
We're already getting Claire Underwood with Hillary tho 
Is honest and honorable the best thing we should look for in a leader, though? That one character from Game of Thrones got his head chopped off, after all (I don't know how to put things in a spoilers link). 
And almost literally one candidate from every race ever. In the recent decades it's just been the shiniest of two turds. 
My prediction is that George W. was better than Hillary would be.   
Problem with the modern electorate in once sentence. 
I'd genuinely love to see some poll numbers on him.  I suspect he'd end up doing *very* well against both of them. 
I'd give Obama a third term over current two options.  
*cries softly into pillow alone at night* Bernie... 
Well he shouldve worked harder for the minority vote instead of saying "i marched with MLK once, you owe me "  
The problem in this election is that the two mainstream candidates are not equally bad.  I dislike Hillary and do not want her to be president, but I think Trump would be an indescribable disaster.  Hildog will have to have a *very* secure lead in the polls before I'll even consider voting 3^(rd) party.  Also, dunno any specifics about Gary Johnson, but the Libertarian party has its own streak of batshit crazy positions that turn many people off. 
Seriously.  Hillary absolutely has the resume for the job, if not the charisma. 
"Do you still stand by your policy to grant one free pony to every American?"  "YES I DO, SIR." 
I'm sorry, but belly-petting is reserved for the official 500 dollar a plate fundraising dinners. How many tickets would you like to buy? 
I think Me has all the appropriate qualifications. Me's foreign policy is unmatched.  
I feel like these candidates are so terrible, it forces you to vote *against* the other candidates, no matter what your personal beliefs. Not for some important issue, not for some goal or promised progress. It's bullshit. 
I don't know...He's not perfect, but I really like most of what Obama has done. I would definitely put him in the "good at the job" category.  
Obama will go down as one of the best of the modern presidents. We will remember the  intransigent and frankly racist opposition by the party of no. I think it's fair to say in 2008 and 2012 Obama was a giant of a candidate striding over a field of petty bickering ants.  I know it's popular to hate on Obama, and as a progressive I wish he was the great progressive hope we wanted, but strangely even extrajudicial drone murder doesn't knock him out of the best President in recent memory position. 
I dunno man/woman - I doubt Hillary will invade a sovereign nation and occupy it for the rest of her presidency on not the best intelligence.  I'm sure I'll get a million replies about her vote for the Iraq war; I think that's made her incredibly weary to intelligence.  God I fucking hope so! 
I think somewhere there's an article saying a decent amount of Americans would consider it right now.  
Good news! Obama *is* running for a third term, and she's currently ahead. 
_howls loudly at the top of my lungs from forlorn moonlit cliffs at night_ Berrrrrnieeeeee!  \*sobs\* 
Wait, seriously? Johnson is pro gay marriage, pro choice, & pro environment??   May need to look into this guy. 
At least for the first two years, sure.   Unfortunately, his third State of the Union will be when he defects to Russia and launches the nukes on America.   Then Super Reigns becomes our leader, so I guess we still win in the end? 
My issue with her is she is a criminal and probably going to get away with it because of her last name and money. 
Ahh forgot about that. He'd be too busy to focus on populating Mars anyway so it's probably for the best.  
I love playing Montezuma, since I get to warmonger AND build culture!  
A lot of science fiction does tend to rely on dystopian futures of bureaucracy and corruption and whatnot, so I guess it comes from that?  Even though Adams' stuff is really light-hearted (shoe shops!) I can see it in there :p 
It really is true that power corrupts.  I walk a dog for an old lady in an assisted living place.  Each hall has an elected resident "hall representative."  The hall I walk down to get to the dog has this cute little old lady "hall representative."    And she's basically Mussolini.  She's ~82 years old and she patrols that place like a jackboot thug.  Most every day I see her down at the front desk complaining about this or that, or she's up on the floor posting passive aggressive signs telling everyone what they shouldn't be doing.  When I pass her in the hall, I always say "Good morning!" with a smile, and she just eyes me up and down like a film noire gumshoe about to slap a citizen's arrest on me.  I actually think she's cute.  I mean, she ain't got nothing else to do, so I figure it's best to let her have her fun.  I'll just keep smiling and saying "Good morning!" 
From all the stories hear, I'll never live in an HOA neighborhood 
"Do you have any other major policies?"  "Just that one. I think that's enough." 
What about You. I heard he's got great charisma and ideas 
This is why I think Trump and Clinton have a sort of co-dependence. The only chance they have at winning is if they're running against the other person. 
Regardless of whether you like or dislike him he's certainly the most impactful president in recent memory, all while dealing with the most batshit retarded Congress in history. 
I would say decent but that's my opinion. Only problem I have had is with the Obamacare. Good idea just poor execution 
It is an unending source of bafflement to me that, after arguably the most capable president the US has ever had died during his 4th term in office, our nation collectively went "nah, we don't want anyone that capable in office that long again, we'd rather just be screwed". Like, what in the living fuck, guys?! 
If you think Hillary is going to give a third Obama term you're gonna have a bad time.  
He supports abolishing all and any federal agencies that he is allowed to. EPA, NIH, Department of Education, etc. Abolish them all. That alone is enough to tell you he's a completely impractical candidate who has vested to much faith in the "free market." 
Libertarians are just fancy-sounding conservatives. 
Instructions unclear: In voting booth playing with self. 
Nah we just lock him in the Ambrose Asylum if he goes rogue. 
Trump is also a serious swindler. He has a history of ripping people off and making poor investment decisions.  
We're living that in the present.  It's a trick of theirs that we don't realize it.  Median income for an American family of four (household) is $50K. 
  That's not how I see it. Power isn't a corrupting force, power allows you to act on your corruption. 
Same. But if that's the case, be prepared to settle for an older house. In a lot of areas, all the new houses are in HOA neighborhoods. 
You're right. His actual net worth is definitely up for debate, but the point I'm trying to make is that he's definitely not poor, you know? 
Conspiracy theory time!  Trump is a ringer to give Hilary the presidency.  He takes out all of the Republican competition, then makes the rest of the country hate him so they vote Clunton.  There's no other way in hell that would make me vote for her, but come November, I probably will. 
Which candidate running in the primary was supposed to win?  Did Chafee, Webb, and O'Malley really look better than Hillary?  Were we rooting for Jeb! Bush or Ted Cruz or Lil' Marco over Donald Trump?  The bottom line is that anyone who won would have been subjected to the same "They both suck!" rhetoric.  Even Obama took this shit from various "Not pure enough" die-hards back in '08 when he was supposed to be the fucking Messiah. 
If only someone warned us about this sort of thing... 
That's the biggest issue though. A motivated population is one of the scariest things that a government can imagine. But a motivated population is virtually impossible to have. 
It's less about practical reasons and more based on maintaining the idea that America is different from countries with monarchial or dictatorial rule that lasts a lifetime set by a tradition started by George Washington himself.   Every other president followed the tradition without having to have a constitional ban on it (though one or two may have tried) until FDR, who certainly served in severe enough times to necessitate a longer termed, stabler, and more powerful ruler of the country (and was loved enough to be elected that many times). But his long stay scared a lot of people who looked back at history and noted that the founding fathers had not intended for this kind of long rule, and they generally agreed that it shouldn't be allowed to happen again. Just another weird quirk of American Exceptionalism. 
George Washington set the precedent of a two-term Presidency and it was always expected that every President that succeeded him would have the humility to step down and allow other leaders to drive the ship. It took 170 years for people to disregard that sentiment when the depression hit. Perhaps FDR was an effective leader for 16 years, but it's widely accepted and understood that we did not want to have an executive in power longer than a decade as it 1) Squanders the evolution and marketplace of ideas, 2) encourages the tyranny of the majority that James Madison warned against, and 3) creates vulnerability in democracy (what if it takes 24 years for Americans to change their minds, will someone who has "reigned" for that long willingly step down?).  
You might dislike her as a person, but aren't they both pretty much what you expect from people representing the Democratic party, as far as policy goes? 
I'm fairly libertarian and liberal/progressive. A lot of people are. Head on over to the political compass. We're the bottom left quadrant.  
Not at all, i have way too many differences with conservatives to be closely  ideologically related  
Your argument is that if other politicians break the law and get away with it it's an okay thing for Hillary to do too? That's elementary school logic dude.  Who said any of us agree with what the other politicians did? 
Yeah but then there will be almost nobody left.       ...       Ok, let's do it. 
You say that like it's a bad thing. Older houses kick ass assuming they were nice houses to begin with. 
What if Clinton is a ringer to give Trump the presidency? She gets the Dem nomination, lies every time she speaks, and pretends she isn't a corrupt piece of shit so people vote for Trump.  
Yeah, like, if only our very first president warned us about something like this in his farewell speech... 
That was actually a semi-obscure youtube reference, but yes, I agree :P 
My argument is that it is and always was a non-issue, it's being blown up purely to harm her chances at getting elected.  Do you honestly think anybody actually gives a shit about email servers?  Of course not, which is why every other SecState did whatever the fuck they wanted with them.  It was never a 'crime' until republicans decided to call it one. 
14? Do you play on Quick speed? Scrublord  Git Gud then come back. 
I'm from the UK and a basically just want to bring this back to use on George Osborne. :) 
Thanks, that was an enjoyable read. Ever tried your hand in /r/WritingPrompts?  
Counter thought: It was his insistence that we don't have any political parties that ensured we didn't pass laws to sufficiently regulate political parties and it created the broken two party system we have.  It's a shame we don't have a system for federal parties (there is no "Democratic Party" and "Republican Party" there are 50+ of each for each state and territory). State laws make establishing new parties nearly impossible, the First Past The Post (FPTP) system makes voting for those new parties difficult (though there are plenty of countries that have multiple parties that also use FPTP - Australia, The UK, and Canada for instance).   Also our founding fathers were pretty dead set against direct democracy or allowing too many people to vote. So all-in-all we were pretty screwed since the beginning.  
National security is a non-issue?   But okay, I'll humor you. Let's for a minute pretend that the only reason the emails are being blown up like this, is because of the GOP and the upcoming election.  Does this suddenly invalidate the fact that she did something wrong? No. Of course not. I don't care if every Secretary of State,  Secretary of the Treasury, Secretary of Defense, and Attorney General did it too. It doesn't make it acceptable if it poses a legitimate security risk.  The fact that she's deleting records and hiding shit about them is just the cherry on top. 
That's exactly why Ostracism wasn't very successful late into democratic Athens' lifetime. People ostracised people whose policies they didn't like rather than, the intended targets, threats to the democracy. 
Minor objection: Australia does not use FPTP exclusively, and both Canada and the UK don't so much have multi-party systems as we have "dynamic" two-party systems (there's always two relevant parties, but *which* two changes from time to time)  
I answered your question to another person in this thread.  Minimum wage, tpp, and gay rights are three big issues she's changed her mind on.  Others aren't talking about child care because quite frankly there are much large issues at hand right now 
I'm not going to lie, I pretty much would just use it out of spite or because I thought it would be funny.  
The fact that it was white and cold didn't strike you as odd?  
Lol, best thing I've read today. As a black coffee drinker. 
Have you heard about the freshman 15? Because this is how it happens. 
if you ever want to get into coffee just get really liberal with milk and sugar (more so the former), then work your way down. it really is an acquired taste 
Try a caramel frappucino. Served at Starbucks, McDonald's and a lot of independent stands. It's basically a coffee milkshake and you can hide double and triple espresso shots in it easily without the bad taste 
Like the other people on this thread, I would not recommend cafeteria coffee as a starting place to get into coffee. Drinks like lattes or cappuccinos are fantastic, and most universities or colleges will have some hip hole-in-the-wall cafe near campus where you can buy really good quality beans. With coffee, you kind of have to start with the good stuff, then build up a dependence so that eventually even the shitty stuff seems fantastic 
Blacker than a moonless night, hotter and more bitter than hell itself. That is coffee.    ~Prosecutor Godot  Thought I'd share this, since were on the topic of coffee. 
Have you tried tea instead? I've always liked tea a lot more than coffee because there are a lot of flavors. I usually just drink plain black tea, but there are a lot of variations.  
try light roast coffees!  they taste much less like burning and even have more caffeine.  
Here's what you do buy a french press and just ease your way into black coffee by starting with a few grinds and as your tolerance builds add more grinds. One day you'll become jaded like me and be able to just much on mushy grinds. 
Why do you want to even get into coffee? I took my first ever sip of coffee this year at the age of 21 which only assured me of my decision to never drink any more coffee.  My point is, when you can already function independent of coffee, why make yourself dependent on a substance that is not good for you? 
Nearly dropped my phone after reading this, hah! You poor soul.  Have you given up looking for coffee that you can drink or does the search continue? 
I wanna drink coffee so bad but it's literally the worst thing I've ever tasted. The amount of milk and sugar I have to add to make it even bearable turns it into a sugar slosh with some coffee mixed in. Am I missing something? Is coffee supposed to taste horrible or am I just crazy? 
Wonderful story.  If you are just starting to get into coffee, I recommend a light roast.  They are generally less bitter as well as a bit smoother overall.  I also recommend starting with black.  Creamer and sugar are always there to improve a crappy roast. 
Hahaha, I like it. If you are wanting to get into coffee I'd highly recommend trying the coffee that's provided at your university, likely in the dining halls. It's not great but it'll do the job just fine to get you used to the taste. If you like it enough and want to actually get really into coffee I'd highly recommend getting a few things. An Aeropress, a hand-grinder, order from CraftCoffee, and something to boil the water and hold your coffee in.   Honestly, I pay 9 bucks for a bag that lasts 3 weeks and I'm perfectly happy. Certainly cheaper than paying $3 for a small at a local cafe. Plus, it's actually good coffee.  Just my 2 cents. 
This gave me a big laugh. Thank you, OP. Although I hope you're okay after having THAT MUCH creamer.   I've never been much of a coffee person. I can't drink it anyway because of Crohn's. I like Starbuck's fraps though. Do you go to Starbucks? What do you usually get? Otherwise, what do you like to drink? 
Creamer is 18% milk fat and white. I doubt you were drinking creamer, and confused it with a hot, black liquid. Also French Vanilla is just basically sugar plus water. It is really good but usually more expensive than a standard cup of coffee. 
Maybe try a lighter brew? or a flavored one. It is an acquired taste, but many have a natural preference for different types. Most of my friends hate coffee until I make it for them. 
How did you not notice that change in caloric intake?  Also relevant username. Hook 'em.  
lol  That's really funny, thanks.  It sounds like weird advice I know, but have you tried darker roasts? I find they tend to be more smooth than medium roast, which is what most coffee in gas stations is. 
OP, you crack me up. I hope that you figure out what the mystery machine in the cafeteria serves.    
On the bright side, you were getting a hell of a sugar rush from it. Seriously though, coffee kicks ass. Mix half a cup of coffee with a quarter cup of milk and a quarter cup of some kind of creamer, and just sip on it. You'll be incredibly efficient all day. 
Do things like grapefruit (juice or fresh), brussels sprouts, cooked cabbage, green tea, most alcohol and licorice also taste really bad to you?  Do mushrooms taste extremely earthy?    You might be a supertaster.  Yes, it's a thing - Google it.   
do you have any idea how many calories are in that creamer. You've literally been drinking cream.   Also you should x-post this to /r/coffee  
It came out steaming hot and it was a light brown (I think it's actually a caramel/vanilla flavor), so it didn't occur to me it might not be coffee. 
It came out steaming hot and it was a light brown (I think it's actually a caramel/vanilla flavor), so it didn't occur to me it might not be coffee. 
Best thing I've read today too. As a white, coffee drinker. 
Black coffee is best coffee. Tastier and essentially no calories. ;) 
Huh, I started with black tea (no additions), transitioned to shitty coffee drunk black, now consume great freshly burr ground coffee with a little milk to cool it down in the morning, a 200mg pill at noon, another cup drunk black after getting home, a latte in the late evening, and a 3 bag kettle of green tea at night.   Fuck. 
Exactly what I do. Five to six spoonfuls or just plain condensed milk in there and you'll find it quite sweet. 
Or if you're like me and never liked caramel, the mocha frappuccino is the same thing but with chocolate instead. It's pretty much a frozen chocolate drink with whipped cream and with a coffee undertone. 
You just gave /r/coffee a collective heart attack  
I figured stuff at the cafeteria probably wouldn't be the best, but I could get it free on my meal plan as opposed to dropping $2-3 for every cup. Such is life as a student 
Actually I had the opposite effect occur to me. I started with really shitty coffee they had in school or the cheaper brand to make at home. I didn't really like it but it was caffeine so wth.   Then I started going to a cafe that roasted their beans in-house and it was glorious! Bought a french press and bought their beans. So much enjoyable being able to make it myself.   Last time I tried to drink the coffee from school I had to add a lot of milk because it tasted like bitter water. I'm too dependant on good coffee now. I can't even enjoy the shitty /cheap gas station coffee now. 
Agree - a latte with low fat milk is my go to breakfast habit.  Used to be able to skip it if I was running late, but not anymore 
I started drinking meh dunken donuts coffee for a while, then moved to store bought ground coffee, which eventually led to going for the full fresh-roasted, whole bean single origin stuff. Drinking anything other than high quality coffee taste like shit unless I pile it with cream now.  
I think my ability to tell when things are bitter is screwed up. I 100% don't understand why people think dark chocolate is bitter. 
This! I've been a daily coffee drinker since I was 12 (now 29) and for a long time, I drank dark roasts exclusively. A couple years ago, I heard that lighter roasts have more caffeine, so I decided to give them a try, and as it turns out, I actually prefer the taste. They aren't just for noobz. 
I can't stand the taste of it and I have plenty enough energy without it. I'll never understand it. 
Well, I've left the church I grew up in and it's a "thing" for us apostates to drink the devil's liquid, so I thought I should at least try it.   I really like hot chocolate and would like to able to replace it with something that has fewer calories.   I just like the idea of grabbing a coffee with someone. It's a tradition lots of people do and I'd like to be a part of it.  I don't want it to become an everyday thing though. I just want to get to the point where I don't hate it. 
The search continues. I had a cafe au lait yesterday and it wasn't the most terrible thing ever. Next time I go, I think I'll get a latte. 
You're not alone. I think it's just an acquired taste that comes easier for some than others. 
I might do that next time I grab something. I've tried dark/full city roasts so far, but I don't think I've tried a light roast. 
I've tried medium/dark roasts, so I'm thinking next time I want to try something lighter. 
I agree with the other user, if it was steaming hot and light brown I would highly doubt it was coffee creamer. Sounds to me like you were drinking a French vanilla cappuccino. 
It might be cappuccino, actually.  It comes out of a machine that you press a button and hold your cup under?  And it's hot and frothy? 
Good coffee is like good whiskey. Doesn't need any frills; it's perfect as is. 
Black coffee can be both beautiful and terrible. I had black coffee from starbucks a few years ago, before they had started making their blonde roasts and stopped nuking their coffee so hard; dear God that stuff was terrible, it was so burned that it tasted like charcoal. It's one of the few cups of coffee I was completely unable to finish.  I've also had black coffee that was beautiful, it tasted beautiful, it smelled beautiful, it was beautiful. Now I have that kind of coffee pretty much any time I want to make myself a cup, it's pretty  nice. 
That's why i eat straight cacao. People who eat processed chocolate just don't get it. 
Only reason I add Milk is because my coffee is too hot everytime. 
Obviously you can try coffee with cream and sugar first, but some other ideas are iced coffee/cold brew or Americanos (dilutes the black coffee a bit), flavor shots or whatever they're called (e.g., add Hazelnut to a black iced coffee at Starbucks, it cuts down on the bitter a lot) and lighter roasts (e.g., Starbucks blonde roast is much smoother and less bitter than their Sumatra and French Roast and even Pike Place).     Another thing that might help ("if you're of age" wink wink) is to start getting accustomed to the taste of beers. I drink my coffee black because I like bitter taste, which is coincidentally also the dominant taste of IPA style beers. Your first IPA might seem stupidly bitter, but if you develop a taste for them you might find yourself liking other bitter things (like black coffee, dark chocolate, etc.) more as well. 
If you *ever* have the chance, Jamaican. Blue. Mountain.  Sooooo fucking good.  It's how I learned to drink straight black coffee.  I got *really* lucky and was able to drink super fresh fresh Jamaican Blue Mountain for about three weeks, and it was fucking amazing, and turned me into a black coffee lover. 
"never like caramel"  Erm...wut?  How is that like, even a thing? 
I don't find dark chocolate bitter. I just don't really like the taste really... 
I understand that, my real point is why voluntarily get yourself addicted to caffeine when you have gone so long without it?  I get that there are worse addictions out there and that we are all "addicted" to something in some form or another, but why add on another addiction voluntarily?  Same reason why I don't drink or use other substances like marijuana. I can live a perfectly happy live without all of those things, like many other people can. Wanting to add another addiction cannot be a good thing, right? 
If people invite me out for coffee, I just have a tea. No one ever questions it. I've had about two sips of coffee in my entire life and it was revolting. Even the super sugary flavoured ones. Why force yourself into a caffeine addiction just to fit in? 
Could be. Doesn't taste anything like coffee though. 
Yeah. It doesn't taste like coffee at all though. Upon further tasting, the subtle undertone I thought was the coffee is actually caramel. I've got a hell of a refined palate. 
Best thing for me as well, as a yellow, tea drinker. 
God now I want coffee and it's almost midnight  I fucking love coffee so much that I travel to Colombia myself sometimes, go to th mountain area rip down as much as I want rip off the fruits, carry the beans back to me apartment in bogota then roast a little then a few months later I put the rest still in roasted in my bag back to the us and roast them myself as I need them.  I love coffee 
Any recommendations?  I'd like to get into drinking coffee but I don't really have any idea where to start. I just know I don't like Dunkin Donuts black coffee. 
Interestingly I hear lots of girls saying this (not that i know princesshashbrown's true gender)   Apparently dudes can't refuse milk+sugar in any form though.  
You think that's bad? I like bubble tea... Without the bubbles :) 
Have you tried the Ghirardelli 86%? It almost defeats the purpose of buying very dark chocolate so you don't eat too much at a time. 
I didn't start drinking alcohol for the same reasons (though lately I've been looking at it from a different view). But coffee doesn't just have to be about caffeine, and I'm disappointed that it's at a state where a lot of people don't realize that.  It's not about being a substance, it's about being an enjoyable luxury, like a fine meal or a nice painting. It's genuinely something I wish I could share with people, because drinking it just for caffeine has turned it into exactly what you described: Just a drug. 
I'd just want to be sure I actually like it before I go around investing a lot of money in it.  
Yeah a lot of times they don't. But I highly doubt you've been drinking coffee creamer! I think that would make you sick. Very confident it's been cappuccino's. The French vanilla ones aren't necessarily made with coffee, especially the ones from the machines. 
I just went to taste the creamer in my fridge. It was thick and nauseatingly sweet. The aftertaste was delicious though. I hope, for your pancreas, that it was cappucino 
Those flavored cappuccinos don't really taste like coffee.  They're very very sweet.  It just seems very unlike that what you've been drinking is creamer, if it's coming out of a dispenser hot. 
If you have a Stumptown coffee roasters near you, they're really good. /r/coffee can also assist you in picking a good coffeemaker  
I'm a girl, and I don't like caramel. I do, however, love hash browns! :) I really don't understand why I don't like caramel because it *seems* good in theory, but I don't like the flavor and texture. 
I completely forgot about the social aspect. My own biased perception of caffeine after getting off of soda after 12 years has morphed my view of soda, coffee, and alcohol from being something that can be enjoyed casually to something that will inevitably lead to addiction.  That is an ignorant view as many people have more self control in that aspect. 
I have had some digestive troubles, but it's hard to know if my "coffee" was the cause. 
I did the same (had some leftovers in a thermos in my fridge) and now realize how it's way too thick/sweet. I was just deluded by the fact I had found coffee that didn't taste so nasty and bitter that I didn't see it for what it really was. 
I disagree. That's how I felt initially, but the more I've acquired the taste of different things (coffee, beer, whiskey, wine) the more I've come to appreciate them. When you aren't used to the flavors, it can be overwhelming or unpleasant, but the more you acquire it, the more nuanced flavors you get out of it. For example, when first trying red wines, they all tasted the same to me. The more I tried different ones, paired them with food, getting into different varietals, etc. The more I came to enjoy the different aspects of it. If you don't want to acquire the tastes, nobody is forcing you, but I'd at least give it a shot. There's a reason that a lot of the beverages in the world that go for the most money are usually acquired tastes.  
I started to drink coffee because I needed it about a year ago for an internship and couldn't get up without it. I tried apples, OJ, breakie, nothing worked except coffee. So I drank the putrid piss water each day to get myself up for a week, and after a while, I started liking it. I aquired a taste for it.   Although whiskey is not a necessity like coffee it is, there is a whole culture behind it, and some people want to be part of that culture. Dredging through the first week of piss water can completely change someones life.   And what's wrong with doing something you don't like just to fit in?  
I get where you're coming from, but I disagree 100%. Many of the things that give me the most joy in life are acquired tastes. Beer, wine, coffee, spicy food, these are all acquired tastes to some degree. It's like going in a hot tub - if you can push past the initial discomfort, it's amazing.  What happens to many is they try the cheap stuff which doesn't really taste good, and generalize that experience to the more expensive and much more delicious/rewarding stuff. I've seen you comment comparing it to food you dislike, and I want you to know from my experience that it is wholly, totally different.  As for why bother - the happiest moment of my day is often the first cup of coffee in the morning. It truly makes life more enjoyable for me, and I feel bad that people miss out on that because bitter, subpar coffee turns them off of the whole experience. 
Because if we kept the culinary tastes of a 7 year old we'd just eat unhealthy garbage our entire lives.    Actually, this explains a lot of issues our society has with obesity.. 
Beer is definitely an acquired taste. There's this Stockholm Syndrome effect with guys who make you feel less of a man if you prefer another beverage until it's difficult to not drink it socially without comment (especially when you're a young guy growing up in England, it seems).   Needless to say, the second I gave in, it's led to years of loving the stuff. 
Petes Coffee bought Stumptown and Intelligentsia so I don't know how long the quality will last, I myself have never liked it. Some shops across the US will deliver online and to other states. A big chain that's actually really good is Blue Bottle coffee, it's great. I'd always prefer to look for smaller, local roasters, they tend to serve what the local likes. 
 I like caramel but I don't like caramel flavored things, like Frappuccinos. 
What does hash browns have anything to do with this? 
I fucking love hash browns, I haven't had them in a few years. I'm going to buy some tomorrow and make them  
Oh no one of you. I loathe hash brown lovers because people that order like 6 hash browns in the McDonalds drive thru hold up the entire line by 3 minutes (we have to drop hash browns fresh) and kill are times every day. I hate all day breakfast.  
It would be more likely to be real coffee if the digestive troubles are correlating with your ingestion of the mystery drink. Caffeine helps with GI motility (although if you're experiencing more of a constipating effect, it's more likely the dairy in the drink).    Also with the headaches, those could very well be from caffeine or caffeine withdrawal. 
I don't like the term acquired taste. I prefer to think of it as "learning how to appreciate" a thing. I never liked jazz music until I had a teacher dissect it for me and instruct me what to attune my ear to, for example. 
Take eggplant. Say you try it for the first time and you don't like it. If, over the next few years, your SO every once in a while offers you a bite of his/her eggplant, you accept just for the hell of it, and eventually start liking it, that's natural and fine. But if, as some other redditors have said in their responses to me (particularly with cofffee), you purposely keep eating it and despising it just because you think that you may eventually come out the other side and like it, that's insane. 
While Stumptown is now owned by Peet's, the people who make Stimptown what it is are going to remain in control, so quality shouldnt change. It would likt he article that I learned that, but I am at work and Sprudge is blocked, but Reddit isnt, lucky me. 
Hm. I guess the value of it is being able to expand how many sensual experiences you're able to enjoy.  It isn't a food, but one of my favourite music albums is one that, when I first heard it, I couldn't stand.  It's almost a kind of learning; through exposure we become able to appreciate things we otherwise couldn't, I guess? 
Sometimes food is boring enough that a little pain is better than nothing.  
I call it second-hand embarrassment, and I have it really bad. Makes it hard for me to watch undercover/secret camera/prank shows, or things like roasts.  
I get this too! Interestingly enough, I never experienced this with Arrested Development. Probably because they're all terrible people so I don't feel bad when they get embarrassed.  
I like Curb your Enthusiasm, but by god isn't it too much for me at times. Just really nailbiting, almost chewing my fingers. 
YES! I FUCKING HATE CRINGE HUMOR! When I see somebody else do something horribly embarrassing I feel awful! Same thing goes with real painful situations. I hate watching stuff like jackass where people get hurt because it's almost physically painful to watch.  
The only episode of The Office that made me cringe for this reason is the Scott's Tot's episode. I can't even watch it again. 
It's called "Fremdscham" where I live and yeah, it can be pretty bad.   If you find The Office US hard to watch, wait till you see UK version with Ricky Gervais as David Brent (Office UK equivalent of Michael Scott), though. Definitely some of the cringiest stuff I've ever seen. I often had to look away and pause the video for a moment to not be completely overwhelmed with cringe. 
Oh hell - this. Yes, I do. *Peep Show*, *The Office*, *Curb Your Enthusiasm*, *It's Always Sunny In Philadelphia*, even *Breaking Bad*... anything where I can see horrible consequences coming like a slow-motion car-crash makes me nope out. 
I have this issue, and it's probably the reason I couldn't watch the office as well.  Also: Meet the Fokkers, and Something about Mary.  Actually, it's kind of pronounced whenever Ben Stiller is playing his serious rube character.  I just can't handle it.   
I call this Ben Stiller humor because I feel like his whole brand is built upon it.  Everything of his that I've seen has made me cringe.  
I can't deal with the stress of going to see a play.  I just sit there and stress out that someone might flub a line.. or god forbid, trip and fall down.. or a prop might not work.  And.... if they have to do something like light a candle.. what if the lighter doesn't work? Then what? They have to 'pretend' it's lit.. but *we'll all know it's not.. and they know we know it's not lit.*  But they'll just have to keep going....  Oh god.. I hate plays.   
I have not watched it but some people say this about Nathan for you and I wtf at them  
Same thing with the Inbetweeners (British version). It is marketed as a teen high-school comedy.  In reality, it consists of 4 socially awkward dudes getting into extremely embarrassing situations and everyone around them cringing up.   Like for an example, one dude at a club gets his peepee injured and bleeding from a zipper I think, but his friends are too embarrassed or awkward to get help. It was supposed to be "funny" but was really painful to watch.  I've heard the US version is much funnier and lighter though. 
Are you able to watch It's Always Sunny In Philadelphia? It's second hand embarrassment and sadness. 
I used to have this problem too, until I heard a particular interview with Louie CK on NPR. They asked him (paraphrasing) how he dealt with what they called the "cringe" comedy in his show, and he says when he runs into those moments in life, he liked to just take a deep breath and walk in and see what was there. I had never thought of it like that, and by copying what he does it really allowed me to enjoy a lot of different forms of entertainment, including certain episodes of his show.  
I felt the same, and then I watched Parks and Recreation. It's very similar except all the characters(including the side ones) are a little crazy which makes it much easier to watch, since they aren't realistic.  
I also have this. I knew it was a thing, and I knew not everybody felt it, but I had no idea that it was common and other people experienced it as well.  I remember as a kid having a hard time enjoying the "Hank The Cowdog" books because Hank was such an idiot. 
My wife and I binged on The Office while she was pregnant. Thanks mostly to the brutal genius of Steve Carell, I routinely had to leave the room while my wife laughed at me.  
I think one difference between Arrested and The Office is the only sane person in Arrested knows everyone around him is crazy, while the Office has several "normal" people trying to grapple with the oddballs on the show and keep some level of composure while cringing inside.   
I have had to literally get up and leave the room watching Larry David.   
Curb your Enthusiasm can give me intense anxiety.... But dammit every once and a while Larry is in a situation and reacts just the way I'd want to react. Season two was much easier to watch (in my opinion) than season one 
Jackass when they're messing with each other I'm perfectly fine with but when they start messing with random strangers, I can't handle it.  Those guys signed up to look like a fool or have some crazy stuff happen to them on camera.  The average person going about their day did not. 
For me it was movies like Meet the Parents and There's Something About Mary, where it's just the guy publicly humiliating himself over and over for 2 hours. Couldn't handle it, never laughed once at either movie and never made it all the way through them.  
Came to say this. The Office had some great, funny moments but the overall cringe-y tenor of the show kept me away. I was leery of P&R when it came on as it was a similar pseudo-documentary format. Thankfully, I gave it a shot. 
Meet the Parents kills me for this reason. Ben Stillers character is so uncomfortable I almost can't watch it. 
Phyllis and Bob's wedding is another one. I skip both of those episodes every time. 
....and the dinner party episode.  I feel so uncomfortable just thinking about it! 
I cannot watch the UK Office because of David Brent.   Does anyone else also feel like the UK series is just downright depressing compared to the US series? 
Yeah man, these coddled kids out here saying "I can't watch Scott's Tots!" and meanwhile I'm the old man in his rocking chair going "Let me tell you about a man named David Brent..." 
I love The Office (UK) and David Brent funny in a cringey way, but my favourite part was the Gareth/Tim relationship. Mckenzie Crook and Martin Freeman bounced off each other really well. 
I feel like this is something I'd be able to buy at IKEA. 
If Ben Stiller created it, Ricky Gervais has perfected it. The Office was bad, Extras was even worse, and then he went full retard and did a show about a mentally challenged caretaker. I liked the original version of The Office that he did but his other stuff is too much.  
I've loved Louis CK's standup since the 90s, so I kept giving Louie another shot.  Every new season I would watch an episode to see if I or the show had changed.  Every time I'd want to gouge my eyes out.  His standup is still terrific.  Joe Pesci had it completely backwards.  Louis CK should stay far away from TV and movies, and dedicate his whole life to standup. 
In portuguese it's "vergonha alheia", literally "shame for another one". I suffer from this so bad I can't even browser /r/cringe 
I wish we could just smash words together in English not just celebrity names. 
The Germans seem to have a word for every oddball emotional situation. 
I'll come out of my long time lurk to give u a hell yes for Hank the Cowdog! 
Ha, my SO actually showed me this show. I could sorta handle it.  
Also, arrested development never seems as "real" for me. Nothing ever sticks to these people, they are all so far insane I just sit back and laugh until I cry 
To me, (in the UK version at least) the "normal" guy Tim actually turns out to be the worst one of all.  I mean, he stays there in his safe little rut because all the terrible people make him feel less inadequate by comparison. If he was as normal deep down as he appears, what is he doing working there long-term? He's afraid. 
To be fair, any time you see a person on Jackass who doesn't have their face blurred out, they've signed a release form. They may not have been in on the home at the moment, but rest assured they were at least informed of what happened afterwards. 
Yeah, pain and embarrassment are (to me) the lowest form of humor.  I don't generally find stupid funny, just annoying at best.   
Yeah, that kind of stuff makes me want to compress my body down into a singularity out of embarrassment  
I was just asking friends yesterday if P&R got better as two episodes in, all I'm feeling is cringey embarrassment.  Poehler's character is just awful to me. 
1,000+ subs?!?! I haven't made it that far in the series yet but now I can't wait. 
Can someone sum up this episode for me? I've never seen it and I don't watch The Office because I never found it all that funny. But I'm dying to know now. 
The dinner party episode is cringe but so fucking funny. There's some great one liners. I also saw the season blooper real and there's some clips from that episode and they are hilarious. Michael and Jan keep cracking up during scenes at the dinner party.  
It absolutely is.  The US version has heart, while the UK is just brutal (which I think makes it soooo much better, but the shows are so different, to each her own).    That said, the Christmas Special series finale for the UK version is amazing and incredibly touching.  So if you never managed to finish, that's something worth knowing. 
I think it's so hard because people truly endear Michael Scott. 
Then have you seen *The Increasingly Poor Decisions of Todd Margarett*?  I found it hard to watch, but you might like it. 
I didn't think Derek was cringey, just one hell of an emotional roller coaster  
Why don't you like Louie? I'm not trying to be a contrarian asshole, but it's really one of my favorite shows. What is it about it that rubs you the wrong way? 
God dang, I'm glad to see many other people suffer from this. Not in a sadistic way, just glad I'm not too weird. 
The USA *did* have the option of using German as a national language, but nooooo.... :P 
It's because we do go through a lot of oddball emotional situations. For example Kummerspeck is also a word here, it refers to the weight you gain when you feel depressed or just broke up with someone. 
I love Peep Show. The whole cinematography is designed to make you as uncomfortable as possible. 
Jim was a well-adjusted, cool guy.  Tim was a depressed loser. 
It's....you have to watch it. You *have* to watch it, and you'll never want to watch it again. But the episode is genius and displays one of the most Michael Scott-y events in the series. 
I watched it due to all the hype on Reddit, but it was pretty disappointing. Your average prank video is worse. 
 Michael Scott (Steve Carell) realizes he cannot keep a promise he made to a group of underprivileged children 9 years ago; he promised that he would pay for their college tuition provided they graduated from high school. With no other option, he visits their high school with Erin Hannon (Ellie Kemper) to break the bad news. Over the years, the students have pushed to graduate because of his promise, and greet Michael with standing applause. They all take turns giving their thanks to Michael, as do several school and community leaders. When Michael takes the stand, he congratulates everyone for being able to graduate from high school, before admitting that he does not have the money to pay them. Everyone is upset, but Michael then tries to calm them by giving them laptop batteries.  The entire episode is a perfectly crafted cringefest. 
That's why if you watch season two of the US office the lighting is a lot different. The show didn't do too well because the US audience found Michael Scott to be too cringey and idiotic, so they revamped his image to be a loveable kindhearted idiot. They also made the lighting more "warm"  because prior lighting made the show appear "cold".    I like both, and both cater to the audiences who watched each. That said, the Christmas special for the UK version felt really great and well earned. Finally turn around for characters that deserved it. 
Is that what the show turned out like? I only saw the first episode and just didn't feel like going through the series.  
same reason OP doesn't like The Office.  Feeling embarrassed for the characters because they (mostly louis) are constantly in uncomfortable situations.  what's a shame is that the show is peppered with some really absurd humor that is not at all cringey and very original.  like when louis looked out the window of an apartment at a crazy homeless guy.  a black car pulls up, and two men in suits drag him into the car... then take a different homeless man out of the other door and put him where the first homeless man was.  if the show was more of that, and had none of the awkward situations that hurt to watch, I'd love it. 
Haha my husband does this with romantic comedies. He can't watch the awkward parts and will literally pace around the living room until it is over.  
Yepp, there are still a lot of empathetic people like us who can't take watching other people suffer (at least psychologically). Whether this suffering is self-inflicted or inflicted by others doesn't matter. Some things just hurt. That might be a cringeworthy chat-up line or a miserably fucked-up attempt to sing... It just hurts. Physically. I can't stand that. Not even for a moment.  
It we had lots of towns and cities who did official government work in German. Then something happened around 1940 
we just take the words we like, e.g. schadenfruede and fremdschamen.  we don't even put umlauts in there, because those words are ours now.  
I tried to watch it because I love David Mitchell. But I tapped out in the first 10  minutes. Fuck, It was too cringy. 
The episode where he meets his dream girl who's studying history and then it all goes to shit....it's physically painful to watch 
there's a reason the british version went for 2 series vs the 9 seasons the US version got.  
I mean it was funny but it wasn't more cringy than any other episode 
Haha aww that's terrible! Your synopsis makes it sound pretty funny though. I'm sure it's probably a lot worse in the episode though, huh? 
Putting my historian hat on for a moment, it was more likely WW1. The cultural hate was stronger in the First World War, perhaps because there was a much stronger bogeyman of a leader present in WW2. Typically, WW1 was when people were renaming cities, foods, etcetera.  
Yeah, the argument for "English needs an equivalent word for schadenfreude" gets weaker all the time. Why would we need one at this point? Words aren't a finite resource. It's not like the Germans can't use it anymore.  It would be awesome to see fremdschamen gain the traction that schadenfreude has though. It's way cooler than "second-hand embarrassment".  
I hate that Episode because of that word. Yes you can theoretically do that in German, but no one here would do that 
Because Americans don't know when to quit? (Don't worry, I'm American) 
I dunno man, to me it's the magnitude of his actions and the failure to deliver to the kids. I mean, if you think about it, there's so many consequences to his idiotic actions, moreso than the other episodes. That's what makes it awful for me.  
Everyone online exaggerates how bad it was, but it was definitely worse than most other episodes, cringe wise at least. People saying they couldn't finish it in one sitting, or could never watch it again are just bullshitting I think 
Cool, TIL. So Nazi/German hate was sowed into the fabric of geopolitics well before Hitler came to power?  
Americans in the entertainment industry have a very narrow idea of what they want German to sound and look like. Probably because it's funnier when you shout it at people. I hate it but this is the reason most of us think German is an angry sounding language when, in my opinion, it's a beautiful one.  
In fact that's part of the reason hitler was able to gain power; his platform was centered on the mistreatment of Germans after WW1. Hitler spoke of the "power hungry Jews" and the "draconian war reparations" and treaty of Versailles in several "us against the world" speeches. The nazi party never gained a majority of any vote but hitler was able to gain enough support in power circles to gain the position of chancellor. Hindenburg's death allowed a bloodless coup bit the whole rise to power was seeded in the perceived oppression of Germans after WW1.  
There's always the historical issue of the impact of man vs the impact of the forces of history.  Although we can't be sure , how different do you think that period would have been without Hitler ? 
I'm so sorry this happened to you and your family. I know one family from Iran and they are the nicest people you would ever meet. I sincerely hope this situation solves itself quickly.  
Fellow Persian chiming in. It has been a difficult day. I am the first in my family so far to be born in America, my parents are citizens who came here when they were 18- almost 40 years ago. I've been raised as an American, lived in California all my life, visited Iran only once. Weird to think a huge portion of the country I was raised in doesn't want me or people like me here. I'm not religious at all, not that it should matter. It's only been a week, and the worst thing is that even the end of the presidency isn't going to make the fact that so many people in this country are so unbelievably hateful.   Anyway at least I live in California, it could really be worse! Thinking of you and our families.  
My boss is Iranian and has been here like 20 or 25 years and has family back there.  I don't even really like her but I'm fucking irate about this cause I'm a human fucking being.  All I've been thinking about is her and her family. I'm with you OP.  
Iran retaliated by doing the same thing towards American citizens.That is a strong message ,other countries should follow and then it would get reversed lol 
Dude I'm so sorry. :( yeah all of this is really freaking me out. For the first time in my life I feel insecure about my future. I am not a muslim or anything but I have never felt so "unsettled" about the state of the world. I feel like i'm living in the five years before WW2 where fascists and populists were coming to power, everyone "feared" or disdained a certain ethnic group, and international tensions were high. And on a personal level I have a lot of changes happening in my own life that are shaking me up a little. I'm graduating college, mooving in with my SO across the country. My parents are insanely upset or in denial about who I am and my future. And now i'm watching the america I love be torn apart by political racial and religious bigotry.  The future is uncertain in a very bad way.  
I really can not believe this shit is actually happening. How can this maniac just order something like this? Do you guys not have anything in place to stop or - by now - reverse this idiotic bullshit? 
This freaking sucks. Sorry for this shitty stupid situation.  
Oh geez. I am sending you a big hug. Why would you fail due to one paper? When is your family due back to US? 
I'm so sorry. Trump is honestly insane. I had some hope and faith in him but that is fast fading. Its been a shit week for me too.. just broke up with my girlfriend and its been hard to study. Maybe I'll fail out and join the circus too. 
My girlfriend of two years decided today, without warning, that I wasn't what she wanted anymore. No chance to fix anything just done. To make it better she did it over text, while I was at work. Nothing compared to your troubles, but definitely not a good day.  
Wait, Green Card holders are legitimate, were they included in the ban?? I mean they have legal right to enter the U.S.! how does this make sense. 
Ugh that really sucks man. I fuckin can't stand this guy and he's my boss, so gotta roll with the punches.  As for my day, sitting at work for 12 hours (8 to go!) bored out of my mind cause nothing breaks on the weekends. Just gonna practice my Japanese, then going on a date with a new girl after work!   What's your cat's name? 
I'm sure you're already aware, but federal courts have halted the immigration ban for the time being, and hopefully it'll be overturned soon, because it's unconstitutional.  
Thank you. It makes me feel better knowing that so many people are disgusted by this. We have a lovely culture and a big part of it is sharing, we love having guests and making friends. 
Don't believe for a moment that a large portion of the country doesn't want you here. You are a citizen. You are one of us, and you will always be welcome. Don't allow this administration to divide & conquer.  
I hope not, they have a house and everything here.  Thank you. She's grumpy about going to the vet and wants space but all I want to do is cuddle her :( 
I mean it's unconstitutional as is, but it's still shitty that it's keeping family apart, especially with our New Year coming up. It's the only time of year I get to see them. 
I spent this morning reading about the Internment camps because I feel like too many people forget that that happened... All the parallels are terrifying. This is the first time I feel unsure about living here :( 
The ACLU filed a suit so hopefully it gets reversed quickly.  
Yes. The federal court just blocked the whole mess for now.  
They're due back this week, but now who knows. And my teacher has a blanket 'no late work' policy and the papers are 60% of the grade. I had 100% and have never had a late assignment before. She's not nice. 
The circus is a valid path, I've been training for three years as a back up plan. That comment was only a half joke ha.  I'm sorry to hear that :( I hope your week gets better. 
That's cold, sorry man. It'll take a while, but through a lot of pain you'll come out the other end stronger and better. Keep your head up. 
Ooooh, a date! That's exciting! Whatcha gonna do? And Japanese is so cool! How long have you been learning?  Her name is Athena, but I mostly call her Memow or Queena :) 
Yeah for real, the people who are vocally against all this are the only reason why I still have faith in America. 
Yes, many who voted for Trump did so because they thought he'd bring jobs, not because they are racist or Islamaphobic. So even if he won, it doesn't mean all who voted agree with the worst of him. Just that they somehow managed to ignore it. 
Obama paused accepting new refugee applications. He did not deny entry to people with lawfully held visas and sure as hell not to green card holders! This is unprecedented. Imagine you went on vacation and on return to your permanent home you were told no, you can't enter the country. That is what is happening here, temporary or not. 
Seriously.. I almost feel like he planned it around this time so we couldn't see loved ones. You're not alone, many of us are going through this as well. No matter what he does, the sun will still move and the New Years still exist. Stay strong. 
Have you contacted the ACLU? Sometimes they need/want witnesses and actual claimants.  
We aren't all like him. I just want you to know that. I sincerely hate that man and his administration. They're monsters and bring incredible shame to this country. 
Please try talking to her anyway. You have nothing to loose. If she won't budge, could you drop the class and take an incomplete?   You may need to contact the ACLU for help for your family. They are filing papers to fight this. Do you know them?  
Ok now that's actually pretty cool. What does training entail? 
Thanks man. You wouldn't think it, but getting it off my chest and having someone say something back to me really helped. It's been a helluva day. Thank you for taking time out of your day to respond to me.  
I got to Japan in 2013, was here for two years then went to Korea for a year, now I am back in Japan. I started learning about 1 year into my first year here. I am not as good as I should be, but I have been picking it up more diligently recently.   I think we are going to grab some dinner then go to a themed bar in Tokyo! Hopefully a jazz bar with some good beer, I dig those haha.  That's a dope name!  
To be fair, I think everyone knew what he was about during the campaign and they should own their decisions. 
This is a blanket ban on members of a specific religion from Middle Eastern countries where Trump has no business ties. It is certainly unconstitutional. 
8 U.S.C. 1152 (a)(1)(A) "...no person shall receive any preference or priority or be discriminated against in the issuance of an immigrant visa because of the person's race, sex, nationality, place of birth, or place of residence." He cannot discriminate on the basis of any of those categories which is exactly what he is doing by restricting immigration based on country of origin. Additionally, because he is applying the executive order to legal permanent residents (LPRs), he is in violation of the due process clause by restricting their right to travel freely without due process. 
I'm looking into it right now to see if they need/want any of that! I'm gonna set up a recurring donation when I get paid again. 
I sent her a message and she said she's not taking it. I'll try again on Tuesday when I see her. I'm in my last year and I'll have to wait another year to take the class, the department is really small.  And yes, thank you, I've been reading up on them a lot, and CAIR too, and talking to my dad. I read that they're doing it case by case, so if that's true, hopefully they aren't held for too long since they're doctors. 
I started going to a class, and then one by one everyone else quit and it was just me and the teacher and from there, it's only ramped up! Circus hurts and weeds people out that way.  I do trapeze training 3x a week, handstand practice, ballet, and conditioning 3x a week! :) I started for exercise and then it was the best thing for my mental health and physical health! 
Amazing! What do you do for work, if you don't mind? I want to go to grad school for foreign policy! I've been learning French for 10 years and still feel like I'm not where I should be, I think that's just a trait of language learning haha.  That sounds like an awesome time! I've always wanted to go to Japan.  And thanks! I adopted her when she was 5 and I thought it would be weird to change her name when she was already an adult. 
You do realize that's not a credible website don't you? It's just Brietbart for people wearing ties. 
just because it has happened before doesn't mean it's ok now 
For a long time the US banned Chinese people from coming to America. Most would argue that that was bad, but it was very much constitutional. Trump's Muslim ban follows in the same line and is within his powers.  I think the blanket ban is really stupid, but not liking something doesn't make it unconstitutional.  
No where in his EO does it state its against Muslims.  
Hey, not sure if you've heard this yet, but Trump's order has been temporarily "paused". If your family gets detained, contact the ACLU immediately. They have lawyers at major airports to assist with this. 
I sure hope and pray she changes her mind. Does another university offer it online? What is your major?  Iran has banned Iranians from travelling here too. It will be very, very messy. There is an emergency hearing tonight in Brooklyn.   Please know that we are with you. 
That's really cool. Makes me want to start back up with my exercise regime. School always burns me out and i lose all my healthy habits. 
So what do you consider a credible website? salon, Huffington Post, CNN, MSNBC?  All sites that have lied about this executive order. 
Do you believe he is correct in saying that all people from those countries would be detrimental to the interests of the United States? 
I'm a French major and I intended on going to grad school. I'll look and see if there's anything online and equivalent, but I swear the longer I'm in university, the more they just want to bleed you and don't care about the rest.  Thank you, it's scary for my family. We love this country and it hurts to see this all happening. 
Do it! I'm in the best shape of my life. I hated exercise until I found one that I can't imagine living without anymore. A trapeze artist is just what I am :) 
I know all about the costs. I went back to college as an adult, and both my daughters were in college too. Total cost: $240,000. Each one of us pays our own loans.   It is scary. I can't imagine what you all must be feelings. I am so angry. Racism and Hatred are occupying the Oval office.   However, it gives me great hope when so many of us are protesting, contacting congressional representatives, etc. We will fight that bastard until the end. 
That's awesome. I'm a real fan of urban exploration and had been training in parkour for a while, school and money took priority though. I'm finally a senior so I have the time again! 
Ouch :( I am blessed to have very minimal debt and hopefully I can keep it that way. I found an equivalent course online though, now the question is if my school will take it. They're strict on upper division transfer credits.  I'm going to a rally tomorrow night to help show that real humans are affected by this. A lot of folks don't know many, if any, Iranian people and the media's view is all we tend to have of each other. 
I tried parkour once! Totally kicked my ass. I am a one dimensional acrobat hahaha.  I get the money and school, I had to take a summer off of training once :(  What's your major?? 
This is going in circles.  The legal code allows the president to stop entry from all aliens.  Green card holders are aliens.  Permanent residents are aliens.  Thus the president has the right to deny them entry to the country. 
I bet they will take it. If not you can petition them.  No protests near me, or I would go too. Glad you are going! Would you please check back with me and tell me what happened? Take some pics? 
I'd love to just take off somewhere but I live with my partner and I'm scared of upsetting him.  
That is so awesome!  How quickly did you find a new place and new job? 
I wish I had the balls to do something like this - I'm certain it would likely work out exactly the same way.   Congratulations, and good luck on your new life! 
Yep, I did this in 2011, after dealing with under employment following the financial crisis, and being fed up with the situation in the US (looking back, I wish for those days, politically).  I sold essentially everything I owned (snowboard gear was basically all the survived the purge), and bought a one way ticket to Bangkok.  I traveled for nearly two years on the other side of the globe before coming home with a new perspective.  Now I'm back in school, I have purpose, and goals.   Best thing I ever did. 
I used to live in SoCal but recently moved to North Carolina. HUGE difference. I was culture shocked for a good couple months. Still am really. Unfortunately things did not improve for me, in fact my health has been on a steady decline. Hope everything works out for the best in your situation brother! 
This is why you don't have kids, because it sounds like you were living my life before, but the responsibilities I have keep me from rebooting and even from suicide. 
Hi OP! My wife and I were making nearly a quarter million per year together with a beautiful home in Colorado. I was laid off when the price of oil shat the bed. I fought to get a new job for awhile and then suddenly realized that I didn't want to be a slave to international commodities markets or really anybody in general. So my wife and I sold our home and moved in with my parents in the DC area while we are working on opening a brewery.  I get told constantly that we're crazy. But this has been a dream of mine since 2008 and my wife is fully on board as it will give her the flexibility she's been looking for in scheduling.  Yes, we were making a lot of money and were definitely moving in a very safe direction. But it was not fulfilling. We are very lucky that we had the means to get up and do this. I'm not disillusioned with that. But it was still a huge thing to leave our safe lives behind in the name of taking a risk and following our passion.  We expect to open in November :) 
I think about this a lot. I also think about killing myself a lot. 
I did this. I moved from San Diego to Brooklyn after uprooting my life in about a week. Quit my job, cut ties with a non-serious relationship, sold my car, and bought a ticket. My biggest issue was thinking that I could run away from my problems. It just doesn't work that way. Aside from that, I'll be real with you. San Diego was hard to leave and I came back. You chose a great place to pack up and bail to. I hope you love it here! 
Now that you're in San Diego, you gotta get into craft beer. I am up to suggest things for you. 
Do you love your partner? Do you trust them?  Let them know of your desire to be more spontaneous in life. It may be the root of more relationship/personal issues than you think. Also, maybe they will like the idea? You just have to trust and take risks. We don't advance by playing life safe.  
My question is how? How do you just 'spend the next two years traveling'? Don't you need money? 
Hey, I packed my car and drove to Nashville too about two years ago. Life has made a 180 since then. My best decision in the last 5 years bar none.  
What do you have that keeps you from being financially stable?  I'm assuming you aren't married or have kids since you didn't mention that.  You said you aren't in school so you probably don't have that debt.  What is tying to a job you hate? 
I quit Monday morning and had it all figured out by Wednesday evening. 
You can do it in a safer way.  Look for the new job and then turn things upside down. You don't need to take the risk of simply quitting and being unemployed. 
Yeah I'm pretty skeptical of his claims too. What he's doing is just NOT that easy.  
Can you elaborate on how your travels changed your perspective and gave you purpose? I've heard others say it and never thought to ask.  
San Diego is my dream city. I don't know why you'd ever leave! 
I'm from Portland, is the scene bigger in San Diego? I feel like all I do is drink craft beer. 
In general... if my partner all of a sudden starts saying "You wanna pack up and move with me??" alarm bells would be ringing. I'm sure their partner has a life where they live, it's not so simple as love and trust. Sometimes you get lucky and you both want the same thing but instability can be a relationship killer 
I was planning to move to Austin Texas. Shortly after I quit I went for a week long visit and it was not everything I hoped it would be. So the plan ended there. 
Honestly, it takes a little planning, but Peace Corps is a great option for this.  180 degree change in your life, travel to far off places and live in a foreign culture, and companies will look more favorably on you than someone who just quit to travel. 
Nice!    I don't know if I'll stay. So far I've gotten more out of moving than I expected, so it's a win no matter what.   But after living in and around NYC for near 5 decades, Nashville is a bit...well...dull. 
Oh it was hilarious. He just "oh, fuck"ed.  A bit of background, we were in "disaster recovery" space because 7 months earlier an islamopithicine had flown an airplane into our office building while we were working.  So stress was already high and "fuckit"itude was running pretty rampant around the office. 
This!! I'm 46 and in nursing school. I graduate May 2018. You can go to school whenever you want!  
I live with 2 friends. As is after paying my share of rent and such, plus basic necessities, I have around 200 dollars left each month. It's not that I can't save money or anything. It's just that at this rate it's going to take a while for me to save enough to comfortably move to wherever I want. I mean, I have nothing tying me down from leaving, in fact I get close and close to doing it each day. It's just not financially viable for me. (Yet) 
Wow!  That's so fast!  Had you been looking into it beforehand or did you just luck out? 
I dunno, I really dislike these kind of shallow mountain wisdom. I think people can advance while playing safe, building up a happy life step by step, just like people can screw up everything by risking too much. I know nowadays these one-sentence philosophies (and tons of motivational quotes everywhere) are extremely popular, but I think most of them are plain BS. 
Haha yes! Being from California everyone told me that the only plane in Texas I would like is Austin. Visited last march and kind of underwhelmed. I loved Dallas on the other hand and I'm moving there in July! 
Yep, few years back I packed up and moved to Austin with only what I could fit in my backseat and trunk and while it's better than where I was before, I am already looking to move again. Austin's really suffering from the huge population influx it's maintained for the last several years, it really seems like the local government treats the city as if it's a lot smaller than it actually is. 
What were you hoping it would be like and how did it not compare to your ideals?  
So this option isn't open to a lot of people. I imagine the advice we're seeing in this thread could ruin a whole lot of people. It needs a disclaimer 
I've thought about doing Peace Corps (my longtime SO has talked about doing it too), but I worry about returning after 1-3 years with no prospects. Like I don't think it'd make me significantly more employable and my field is already on the down and very competitive. 
I came from Dallas so I know the feeling. I feel like one day I'll go back, but my career has progressed so much here, I don't see myself going back anytime soon. 
Yeah, I've never had something that drastic happen to me, but I've been in situations where everyone around you is quitting and you have to hold it together. I can't blame you for quitting. In my case, I had to hold it together or I would have been stranded in Atlanta for a summer. 
Just save as much as you can. I know it's almost cliche, and it seems like slow going, but just save as much as you can.  Find a dollar amount that makes you somewhat comfortable leaving and when you're there, or close to it, pop smoke and get the hell out of there.   Also, try to figure out if for whatever reason you move somewhere and can't get into school, or have to wait until the next term/semester, can you do your job, or work that pays similarly or even better somewhere else? If you had to move back for whatever reason, would you be able to get that job back and find an affordable place to stay?  If the answer to those questions is yes, then move sooner rather than later. If the answer is no or maybe, then maybe save up a little more rather than less.   
Honestly I had no plans of this as of Monday at 8 AM. But I had been talking to the owner of a different company for about 6 months on LinkedIn and I knew he would hire me, and with Craigslist and FaceTime it wasn't hard to find a place that was a good match at all. 
Get ye to Winston-Salem or Raleigh and do not look back, my child. Avoid Statesville. Tis a silly place. Greensboro is meh.  
The point isn't that these soundbites are universally true, and equally applicable to everyone and every situation. The point is that you find a few that ring with you and your particular life experience. If you've found that playing it safe hasn't gotten you anywhere, and maybe you're too anxious or worried about doing things that benefit you, then it might seem true to you and you adopt it into your lifestyle. It's literally the same as any other motivational or inspirational story - what you get out of it depends on how you, as an individual, decide to read into it. 
Thank you for introducing me. I really enjoy Seth Sentry now. 
Welcome (well, soon) to Dallas! Dallas is really underrated in my opinion.  
It definitely seems like they can't keep up with the population influx. I think Portland is having the same issues. They want to keep it a small city but it is already way past that. 
I don't think /u/madwilliamflint was giving advice. He was just telling us about a time in his life which happened to be relevant to the OP. In a casual way... casually conversational even. 
\*shrug\* people need to understand their own situational limitations. If they don't, a disclaimer isn't going to help them.  
I'm in engineering and good at saving so it isn't a problem for me, but people could take the same time off and just live a wildly different lifestyle if they really wanted to. 
If people don't have the common sense to know things take money they got bigger problems, a disclaimer here and there won't help them. 
I think people are really over reading this.  - Saved money. - Quit job. (I hadn't planned on it. Just had enough.) - Went on trips to Iceland, Ecuador, Costa Rica, The Galapagos Islands, and Warsaw.   
I won't likely go back to Brooklyn. Not unless I hit it big. It's just too much of a soul suck. But I'll definitely head back north. I can't take this weather. Winter is supposed to be winter. 
There were a lot of reasons I couldn't do it anymore.  It was a little ptsd/survivor guilt. But primarily I'd developed this software product and because I was the expert, I was relegated to doing nothing but support, which was a complete waste of brain.    
Thanks for the input, these are the exact things that have been going through my head. I'll definitely have a place to stay if I come back, and a minimum wage job is sufficient to pay for what I need where I'm living right now.  I'm looking to leave in about 2 months, giving me time to save up around $2000.  I've been thinking about doing this for like 6 months and am finally starting to realize it is absolutely possible from all you guys' responses. Thank you! 
Ah, so you had the security of a landing pad set up already. 
And there's the detail that fucks up your narrative...  This post is very misleading. If you had a job lined up already, you didn't impulsively make this move. This was thought out and calculated.   
While you're right in a general the-earth-is-mostly-covered-by-water sense it's important to note that depending on the map the water might be squished to account for the transcription of a spherical object to a (presumably) rectangle.  Interestingly enough though some map makers are notorious for having made Africa super small to help reduce this distortion, so OP might end up not going to Ethiopia after all.  Also I'm really sorry I just can't sleep right now and this is how I'm handling not firing up the pc to play video games. Good day. Fuck. 
Why call it a sound bite when you can more accurately describe it as a "quote" in fewer letters? 
Good to hear. I always enjoy introducing people to some aussie artists when i can as they are often criminally underrated.  Id also recommend you check out thundamentals they just released their new album and its fantastic haha. 
Except by those of us from Dallas. There really isn't quite anywhere like it 
Obviously everyone does what the internet tells them to do without any self responsibility. 
Ignore this if you don't want to answer... but I am genuinely interested lol.  1. What made you decide those places to go? 2. You stayed in hotels for these trips? Flights? And what was the longest and short trip? 3. What kind of job did you have before? I'm 18 and need some ideas for careers bc Dairy Queen isn't cutting it.  Thank you! 
Thanks for your input. It sounds like your experience was worthwhile for you.  My degree is in journalism/public relations, so I don't know if I would bring back any directly applicable skills, though that's not the reason I would want to do it, but it does matter for when I'd return. Though I wish I majored in something else anyway and chose a different field, so maybe PC can help someone branch out? 
This Texas boy is glad there isn't snow often. I did one winter in Columbus, and it was enough for me to take it off the potential destination list. 
Pfft, I don't know what companies expect when they put people in those positions. Of course you are going to quit. And then you leave and no one else knows how to use what you created since they didn't have you teach anyone. 
Were you in the building at the time?   I was visiting my dad in world financial that day. I had surgery on my leg, and was in a wheelchair.  I was 8. He pushed me forever up the west side highway.    
That probably wasn't obvious to him when he made the decision. People can rarely point out their saving grace before they're in trouble. I think the point is that if you make these brash decisions in accordance with your authentic wants then a viable path will present itself to you and you'll later think "of course; it's so obvious".  
LOL I never imagined that I would work for this company. After quitting I scrolled through my LinkedIn messages, lost, and remembered my conversations with this particular guy and decided to go for it. You sound really salty and prickly and that's the exact type of person I'm going to avoid becoming by doing what makes me happy. Cheers dude. 
Oh yeah, definitely by people who aren't from there or haven't been there. I think it has a bad rep for being rich and snobby, but there's so many different neighborhoods, there's something for everyone.  
Buy a Lamborghini.  *if you can afford to eat after purchase.  Reminder, oil changes are $1,500 at the dealer.   
Personally, I would advise any kid to finish high school, and then if you want to spend a few years on the road, by all means. At least have that high school diploma so that when I you're done traveling, you have options of where to go from there.  
Yeah, no. That's not even close to the same thing.  
Actually, I would say PC has real potential to help you out.  In general, the people who complain about "missing" 2 years of work experience to do PC are usually those in highly technical fields like computer science or engineering.  Fields that require more soft skills tend to benefit more.    You learn about public speaking, working in a different culture, the issues surrounding poverty, another language (usually).  As an example, a friend of mine joined after a series of shitty sales jobs and left to go work for a State Government doing emergency management. 
Well you did just say "And I knew he would hire me".  That's significantly different than "I moved to SoCal and then randomly got a job."  It's still a big move and congrats.  
Out of interest, do you message a lot of people on LinkedIn? How/why? I've never messaged someone on there. 
Very untrue. A high school diploma is far from enough to have a decent career now. Even if you don't have a college degree, it's very dangerous to simply not get certified and experience in some career at least.  You are much better off getting a relaxing job that pays well but has good vacation time too. Municipal jobs or state engineering jobs come to mind on this (usually with completely FREE health benefit). You'll be able to travel to places 4 hours away from you every weekend, and travel to different countries once a year. Travel but be smart about it. I only got away with it because I was young, life is far less forgiving the older one gets. Not saying be a desk slave, but be reasonable and have decades of memories, not 2 years followed by the rest in very depressing situations. 
Yeaahhhh. The right to medical care is *rather* different to the privilege of being able to quit, pack your bags and leave on a moments notice. Of course, it'd be awesome if everyone *did* have that option. There'd be a lot fewer stressed out, strung out, miserable people slowly dying in a job they hate. Hey, might even bring health expenditure down!  
It's not some special right or advantage. The people worked for it. 
"One time I threw this brick at a duck"  My favourite one's "Ayy lmupvote" 
Messages? I'm using an app... What messages? Have I been missing out!? D: 
Can confirm. Just upvoted everyone in this thread for mere fun. 
Whoa! I've never noticed those before. That's pretty cool, I like it. Although, my first one was Praetorian and I dunno what that is haha. 
Now I'm craving bubblegum. Thanks, braces, you ruin everything.  (And as a test for anyone out there, what does it say on your screen when you upvote my comment here? It's probably randomly generated for each person, but I'm curious) 
The messages just appear to be other comments in the thread. Am I missing something? 
Guess you just did the whole frontpage of this sub a huge favour ;) 
"I'm a princess!"  but seriously though, is the duck one a reference joke? 
I upvoted your comment and it said "Thanks, Obama." :D 
There are little phrases that pop up when you upvote something on the normal, non mobile version. The CSS is great on this sub, so you're definitely missing out. 
I don't see them either, and I'm using my PC. Probably a joke to get people to upvote to see them or something. 
I don't know that one, but I do know that the Roman emperor's personal guards/soldiers were called the Preatorian Guard. There were the legion responsible for the safety of Rome and the Emperor. 
I think I'm having deja vu...  Anyway, the Praetorian Guard was the Roman emperor's personal legion. They were responsible for defending the city of Rome and the Emperor himself. However, they were most famous for assassinating emperors. 
You can undo your automatic upvote and re-upvote yourself... for instance, mine is "Yer an upvoter, Harry." 
"Bitch please, I'm fabulous"  "LEGEN- wait for it- DARY"  "Thanks, and thanks; and ever thanks"  "A wild upvote appeared"  "404- UPQUOTE NOT FOUND"  *edit- just editing as i find more 
When I was in elementary school, I would throw pinecones at ducks in the part, because kids are all secretly evil. 
does it use the same one's for comments within a thread? Cause that's what I got. And I got 10/10 would up vote again for OP. 
But it hides the downvote button, which I find offensive.  It's not like it stops people from disabling CSS and downvoting anyway. 
I'm seeing them. Mostly they're meme stuff like ayy lmao, quest complete, etc etc etc 
Hey man, be careful, when I up voted him, it said he throws bricks at ducks! 
I like the rules bar a lot. I know the rollover drop down rules sidebar is used elsewhere, but it's usually pretty awkwardly done and hard to read. some of the subtle humor that is hidden in the sidebar also pleases me.  
Oh my bad, I didn't see that it was already asked! 
Darn did not know rice was that much better...white, yellow, or brown rice? 
Gravity Falls reference.  Also it's " anythding can hadpen" 
except then there's also "Have you hugged a stranger today?"  ...Upvotes, I'm getting mixed signals here. 
Why would anyone downvote something in this subreddit? Everyone here is so friendly. 
Are you some kind of wizard?  Can you teach me the magicks? 
Thank you :) it sure is a fun and interesting feature isn't it? 
If we reply to each other's comments enough, but still remain anonymous, are we strangers? If we are strangers, should we hug? Do either of us have candy? 
i have the CSS disabled because the colour scheme makes my eyes hurt 
Lisa, you shouldn't throw bricks at ducks. They're easily startled, but they'll soon return... and in greater numbers.   ^^^Seriously, ^^^ducks ^^^are ^^^gangsters. 
*gives you candy and a hug*  I try not to think too hard about these things. 
I don't see freeze peaches anywhere, just lots of friendly people conversing casually.  Besides, downvotes may add vitriol and cruelty to this sub, and we don't like that kind of thing. Here, we join hands and eat pineapple. 
They should have a lights on/lights off mode like /r/nosleep. 
I wouldn't, couldn't throw bricks at ducks.  I shall keep this in mind, the gangster ducks I mean :)  
How have things been with the family? It's been so long since I moved out. 
*gives you candy a hug back*  That answers those questions. 
I want a pineapple.  Life pro tip: If you are ever on Oahu, buy a pineapple from one of the roadside stands on the North Shore.  That was the best goddamn pineapple I ever had in my life.  (Once I got it.  The little girl ran away with my money until grandma tuned her up.)  Second life pro tip:  If you buy a pineapple on the North Shore of Oahu,  don't eat too much of it in one day.  Don't ask me how I know. 
It's been nice, uncle Kevin has been improving his cuisine a lot. Don't you miss him? 
My family (Mom, Dad, Me, Sister) went to Waikiki over Christmas break one year. For me, the pinnacle of Hawaiian cuisine is the moco loco. 
I dunno, those sugar-free diabetic cookies he used to make were pretty bad. But if he's gotten better about his diet cooking, then I might think about visiting. 
I stayed in Waikiki too.  I'm not sure the pinnacle of anything is located in Waikiki. 
This reminds me of a story I read some years ago. Something about "name discrimination". A guy with a Spanish name tried to apply for jobs by sending his resume to them but he didn't get a response back. So then one day he just changed his first name to "Joe" and he tried again....and he got a bunch of phone calls from those employers asking him about a possible job interview. 
My name's Raheem so I go by Remy, it makes me sound French so double win mon cher. 
Tinder is where people can be super shallow. I personally wouldn't want to be with a person who wouldn't swipe right just because of my name, that's stupid.  I can understand the familiarity that the other comment is referring to, but there's a line where it's just rude and you're right, it is sad and that's not fair. I'm sorry.  
I wouldn't mind dating an Ahmed, but I'm Jewish, haha. I've actually had a similar problem, people see "Jewish and laughing about it" and pass me by.   Glad you found your strike there, Nick! Though I would've gone with something like "Matt", since "mahd" can sound kind of like Matt depending on pronunciation. "Oh, it's short for AHMAD BWUAHAHA!"  
Honestly it may just be a religious thing, they might assume (because of the name) that you are super religious and not into that. At least for me, if any chic opens with a Jesus/Gode line I swipe left.    Personally I don't care if the person I'm dating is religious, I've just found that they almost never feel the same about me not being religious.. 
That's a little experiment with well-known results in a lot of industry, beyond just sex.   It's a trope, even. Look at Parks and Rec. The character Darwish Sabir Ismael Gani changes his name to appeal more to politics. Most viewers would recognize that character's fake name in the show, Tom Haverford (played by Aziz Ansari).  Look at Jews. You know how many names have been made up from thin air so an actor or comedian can put their name on a marquee without it saying "-berg" or "-stein"?   And honestly, I wouldn't even hold it against other people. They're not being racist by not swiping right on "Ahmed". They're not being racist by swiping right on "Nick". They're simply looking for something comfortable. That means "known" and "familiar".  
People like to cling to things familiar to them. If a name like Ahmed comes up they think foreign and therefore not familiar and comfortable. Nick is a more common name (I'm assuming you're in the us or europe) so people are more comforted when it shows up and therefore more likely to swipe right.  
This might be an unpopular opinion but a while ago I was on an online dating site. Not Tinder though. The amount of stupid annoying copy pasta or simply 'Hey gorgeous, wanna marry me?' from men with 'foreign' (not common in NZ) was shocking. After a couple of weeks I stopped paying any attention to anyone whos message did not look genuine right away. And I hate to admit but I ignored many guys with names that did not sound like they lived in my country. So sorry if there were any genuine guys but the masses ruined it for you.  
I have friends who work in call centers. They say all the Indian guys there tell customers that their name is Dave. 
I'm a dude, but I get it. I would kind of assume if someone had a obviously Arabic name they were Muslim and I wouldn't want to date them. Not because they are Muslim specifically, just a general aversion to religion. 
My boyfriend's brother's name is Al Hussein. In Egypt, he was "Hussein". In the US, he's "Al".  
ITT: white people desperately inventing reasons why this has nothing to do with racism.    You all are missing my favorite. As a brown person when I get treated differently or badly it's just a "coincidence."   That's my vote, Ahmed.  No one is racist or xenophobic, unconscious bias is a lie, all the studies that show it are lies...this is just a coincidence :)  
I'm not using Tinder anytime soon, let alone doing so in a place where my name isn't completely typical, but I'll keep that in mind. Sadly, I can't think of any nice anagrams for my name. Why did you pick Nick?  
Yeah, I've observed this too, as a very obviously brown guy with a foreign name, and it sucks. And it annoys me that so many people in this thread are trying to excuse it or say its not a big deal.  Casual racism, not the outwardly hateful kind, but the sort of making assumptions about you based on your race/name is still very present, and very much so in dating apps like Tinder. Yeah of course everyone is allowed to have their preferences, but its a problem that its so common for non being seen as white to be a turn off, and something we should talk about.  I hope you don't completely abandon your name/upbringing just to appease people though, but I guess Tinder is geared towards more casual stuff. 
Hmm I wonder if that's why I never got many matches (my name's Mina and I'm a guy[Egyptian]). Interesting... 
I wonder what my american name could be... I think I'd go for something creepy like Travis. 
They did a test like this in Finland with applying to a job.   Someone had a first name Ali and never got a job interview. When he changed his name to Ari, he started getting to interviews...  
Is it really sad?  I mean if people assume (rightly or wrongly) that you are Islamic on the basis of your name, and they wouldn't date a Muslim (religious differences aren't *shallow*) ... how is that sad?  It's as if assuming you are Islamic is unreasonable. 
Sorry people are dirty racists Nick. /s  But seriously, good luck. Be happy, meet people! 
Wait, where are you from anyway OP? I mean, that does matter a lot, too.  I don't have a lot of matches(like 3?) in my own country (Venezuela), because with the fucked up situation only the kids with money bother with that stuff, but I used a GPS spoofer for Colombia and Detroit, and I got a lot more matches in 2 or so days of doing it, without changing anything, except the language of course. 
Studies have also been done with other ethnic names, such as traditionally sounding African or Hispanic names, and the same results happen. And any time it's brought up, you basically just get a bunch of people saying, "well parents shouldn't give their children those names because it harms their chances of getting a job." It's pretty sad that the solution seems to be "everyone should have generic whitebread names" instead of "everyone should try to avoid negatively stereotyping people due to their name." 
How does this work legally, exactly? Can I just call myself whatever on the application then only use my real name on bank documents and shit? 
All I can think of is Ratatouille, the movie. (Remy is the name of a character in the movie: a rat). 
Tinder is where you go to bury both your dick and your faith in humanity, generally speaking. 
Tinder isn't for dating. It's for fucking, most of the time.  I, uh, met my girlfriend on Tinder. So that doesn't always apply. 
I've never known anyone to take Tinder seriously (both girls and guys I know). Yes, you can meet someone and fall in love but for the most part you are judging someone based on a few photos, name, and a description. My girlfriends for the most part swipe on Tinder when they're bored and some of my guy friends do it in groups to have fun with it almost like a hobby. 
This is pretty much why I'll never use programs like this. Why would you ever want to interact with people like that? 
Holy shit, that's genius. I will keep that in mind.  
But, I have pictures of me with beer and partying...  
Assuming someone is "super religious" because of their name is pretty idiotic 
Well, turns out OP is a trp poster so I guess he's not gonna change your mind about them... 
But what's fucked up is that I am getting rejected by girls from my own region. Ahmad should be "known" or "familiar" to them...  But you're definitely right about this Parks and Rec.  
Racial bias is a thing on dating sites as well though, think there's been a few studies done about white people being less inclined to message a black person on dating sites  (not sure about the reverse or how different races affect it)  Familiarity works here but for slightly different reasons. 
I am in Toronto (Canada). I thought this city is multicultural. I was wrong haha. I noticed that I was swiped left by a lot of middle-eastern girls as well.  
I've heard that there is a stereotype in a lot of countries that white women are very promiscuous, due to porn. 
But like 80% of white americans identify as christian. Would you make the same assumption about them? Or someone with a Jewish last name?   Having an "ethnic" name in reality has very little bearing on how religious you are, since the name is chosen by your parents, it's at most a reflection of your parents' religion. 
I worked with a guy who was named Saddam Hussein right around the time Bush the second was invading Iraq. He introduced himself as 'Saddam' and I winced and went 'Ohh, I bet that's rough.' he just laughed and was like 'Oh, it gets worse, my last name is Hussein.' He was named before the other guy became well known so it was just an unfortunate coincidence.  
Dude i fucking love brown people and im a jew. I was at the club this weekend and wouldnt you know four middle eastern guys with bald heads and beards all looking exactly the same were there. I had conversations with every one of them. The one guy even fucked with me saying "yeah thats my twin" for a good two minutes. Maybe its just because im in dc but i also crush hard on middle eastern and indian chicks. Come to think of, the kids place i stayed at all weekend was lebanese. Can i be honorary brown? You guys are cool as fuck.  
I don't know. I guess, I thought of it, as my nick name. That way I can joke about it, and say my nick name is Nick, my actual name is Ahmad.    
I totally agree. All the people here saying stuff like "Ahmed is such an unfamiliar name" or "their family is probably too religious for me" like it somehow excuses their behavior is a little ridiculous. I get that it makes people uncomfortable to talk about, so the natural response is probably to redirect the conversation towards something else, but not being able to accept that racism still exists is a big part of the problem. Just accept it and try and be better in the future, that's all you have to do. 
Reddit is literally the breeding ground for casual racism. This thread shouldn't surprise you.  
as a guy called Osama this scares me. To make it worse im an athesit, people will always assume im muslim  
This.  I don't understand how anyone is ignoring this.  Western women don't want to end up converting to Islam, so why waste time meeting someone you'll never want to connect with.  
I am from Afghanistan. I have hazel eyes, dark brown hair , and fairly light skin, lighter than eastern Asians (people from Pakistan, India, Srilanka , etc.) Whenever someone tried to guess my background, they always start with" are you Latino?"   
The recruiting system where I work totally anonymises all applications before they get to me; all I see are the answers to the questions and an applicant number. It can be annoying, but it certainly strips away any (un)conscious bias gleaned from age, gender, perceived race etc. 
Fair enough, but one of those things is going to work, and the other is not. 
Man, that's really sad. I am okay with discrimination on tinder. After all, it's a dating/hookingup app. But when it comes to jobs and career, this type of shit is infuriating.  
From what some sits have, it is not technically illegal. But good luck getting to an interview and showing a different person/name. 
I met my fiance on tinder, we're getting married next year. There's plenty of fish in the tinder sea, but if you use a shallow lure with whore bait, don't be upset when you catch some stinkers.  
How would you even go about explaining to a potential girlfriend that you gave a fake name? 
I loved this.   I'm beginning to seriously date a girl on tinder and she says things every now and then that make me realize she was NOT just hooking up with people.   first night she came over to my apartment she said something along the lines of, "well we skipped the actual date and now I'm at your house. haha this is an unusual tinder date." I laughed and agreed all the while in my own head thought, "the only thing atypical here is I'm not inside you and I actually enjoy what you have to say."   so....things are going well.   but it can definitely be used to both ends.  
My buddy met his long-term gf on Tinder. I think it was a terrible decision, but so far she hasn't cheated on him, so maybe he knows something I don't. 
What's with the sarcasm shit? Do girls not realize it's such a cliche?   Every single bio has some sarcasm related comment.    
They may be assuming your family or friends are super religious even if you are not. I know, super big assumption that doesn't even make sense and it stupid to begin with. But that may be their (stupid) reason. /u/_afox_  may be correct. Also, he foxbro! 
Yeah, but there are pictures of Anjem Choudary drinking and partying. Plus, as mentioned below, the kind of person who is going to left swipe you purely based on your religion/race probably knows little to nothing about your race/religion. They be stupid idiots. 
Well, Muslims on the whole tend to be more devout than your average Christian. The average American who identifies themselves as Christian doesn't even go to church with any kind of regularity if at all. Whereas the average Muslim is a lot more hardcore about it which is where the difference lies.  
Have you met any of these girls? Are you gonna answer as nick or tell them your real name? no judgement just curious haha 
Yeah I know, I feel like I'm nuts at some of the lack of awareness I see here. People basically saying "Oh no, it's probably just because they just associate some negative stereotypes they have about Muslim people when they saw your name or they get uncomfortable around foreign people, it's not racism!" and I'm like "Um, that's exactly what racism is?" 
Are you the guy who reads those online applications that make you re-fill out the  information after your resume has been uploaded in addition to a 50 question personality test? 
Is it discrimination if they make more money with women? Seems like a business choice to me.  
I wish you didn't need a Facebook to use tinder. I understand why but I haven't had a Facebook page for 3 years. On one hand Facebook is a waste of time, on the other hand I need one to sign up for tinder  
Why would he need to?  *Everyone calls me Nick* is an easy fix. 
My cousin's boyfriend lied about his height on whatever dating thing they met on, even though she is tall and had set a certain height. She tells it like is a funny story that the first time they met she found out he was a liar ... some people are just weird. 
pretty simple answer here, most people aren't looking for the most stimulating experiences 
I read a stat(I forget where) where people will date outside of their culture/religion but once they start thinking of marriage they go back to someone that shares their culture/religion. 
You're assuming it's a religion thing I think   He might be Muslim, not sure if he said he was though, He didn't say the girls were either, just that they were middle eastern yet seemed put off by a name that wasn't western. 
Let's not forget Polish! My wife's grandfather dropped the "ski" from their last name. Does anyone even remember why we were racist against the Polish to begin with? Oh well. 
But we're not talking about worldwide or all ages, we're talking about American people of Muslim descent who are young. Who are religious at about the same rate. People might assume from my name that I'm Hindu. But I know hundreds of other desis and I can count on one hand the number I know who are devout outside of celebrating holidays. I reckon the same is probably true for young American Muslims too.  The point is, people just make assumptions based on race/name, assumptions that aren't really backed up by reality, just people's preconceptions. This guy is on Tinder, he said he had pictures of him partying, seriously there's almost no way he'd be a hardcore religious Muslim given that? 
Haha, no human sees those applications if you don't score high enough on that personality quiz.  
It's clear on the application that the entirety of the judging is done on the answers; unless the application requests it, you're not expected to upload a CV, and I think they even get stripped out too; at least I hope they do, otherwise the person who answered 'see my CV' for everything didn't even bother uploading it. Would have failed anyway. 
In my area all the girls have "no hookups" in their bio. I hate the south  
I don't understand why. ELI5?  Does it match you with friends of friends (no thank you) or does it data mine your facebook interests/likes (I have left everything blank...) 
I like this. Hire Caucasian actors as parents. Legally change your name. Put Nick on your tombstone. She will never have to know. The swipe is all that matters. 
I think that's a pretty innocent lie, considering many people think they know height better than they do.   E.g. Girls thinking a guy under 6ft is too small for them when really 5'10 or 5'11 is taller than they think, probably because many guys that height will have said they're 6ft to sound cool.    I can understanding him wanting to ovovercome an initial rejection based on what can just be prejudice - your cousin's case is different.   I don't really see what's so weird about what was probably insecurity, nor her ability to laugh off a white lie. 
Yeah but it's a process to get a passport. If I hadn't been planning a trip about anyway then I wouldn't have a passport now. What's the point in going through the effort to get one if you weren't preparing to leave anyway?  
I thought that was pretty much ALL they were looking for. 
Well im one of those people. I speak Urdu, language of Pakistan. Now growing up on it, thinking and listening to its songs, its part of my identity and huge aspect of my life. Now when seeing a causaian person huge aspect of my life, humor is what my partner cant grasp. Im not saying that if i find a perfect white girl im gonna say no to marrying her but culture/language is very important to me so what you said can be reasoned with my ideology 
I'm part Polish, and what I find strange is that when my great grandfather came over to the US from Poland, he shortened our last name by three letters, but kept the "sky." It was only 9 letters long to begin with, and really easy to spell and pronounce. I never understood the point.  
OP said it was in Toronto. I've met more non-religious people in Toronto than religious, over the 21 years I lived there. Your entire "American" argument isn't valid here. 
Yeah, but if I'm on an app like Tinder, I'm not going to be looking that far into it. I'm just going to make a snap decision based on the little information it shows me at that moment. If they were white and they had a weird name that I would expect from dumb ass yuppie parents I'd pass on them too. 
What's up with the weird green 'thebutton' dot next to your name? 
The authentication system they use involves Facebook's token and they didn't use a homegrown account system. 
If I had to guess, it'd be to prevent bots from being quite so prevalent, and to help with accountability if somebody goes missing, gets hurt, etc.  
Adds at least a modicum of "this person isn't a creepy rapist."  
they _don't_ match you with friends. and they show 'common connections' to people around your friend circle you appear to not know. 
I think it shows that it's something you're looking forward to. A passport is good for 10 years. If a person can't save enough in 10 years to go somewhere that you need a passport (they even recommend taking it to Canada these days), to me that's not a person who wants to travel internationally. 
Likes: positive stimuli, resting periods   Dislikes: negative stimuli, waking periods, extinction 
Okay, but then all the more reason to not assume that a young Canadian Muslim you meet is super devout and culturally incompatible with you. 
I guess. All I'm saying is that it sucks being on the receiving end of those negative snap judgments all the time. 
And they choose not to add Google, Twitter, LinkedIn or others.  
Having spent some time doing web app development, I can say with relative certainty that Facebook integration is relied on as a quick way to get the personal information that the app depends on -- like your name, photos, social connections, etc -- without having to explicitly ask for them. Using social media authentication is also great for the user, being as they won't have to set up yet another account, verify their email, or remember which password they used, all of which generally turn people off from using new services. 
Yeah, cause there are no creepy rapists on Facebook.   I avoid using any free service where my personal info is the product.  I don't sell plasma or pimp myself for medical experiments either, just a personal standard.   So yeah, no tinder for me.   
By and large, yeah, you will: Statistically speaking, you'll find folks from India are sleeping with other folks from India more than they are folks from Ireland.  
I'm guessing they use FB for the two following reasons: it's extremely popular and the most likely thing that people will have, even if they don't use anything else. And it's the most 'trustworthy' site that young people will be using. Tinder is mainly aimed at people in the 18-25 range and I see people younger than me (I'm in my 30s) being told, 'Tinder isn't really for you. Maybe try eHarmony or Match?' pretty often. If they added Linkedin there'd be a lot of unhappy people on Tinder.  It's like a few months ago I overheard a girl on my team lamenting that Okcupid was 'taken over' by 'old people' a few years ago. By which I assume she meant 30 year olds. 
I pass on every single website that requires me to sign in using FB. I have a FB account, but just no.  
I recognise that show but I couldn't name it, probably because I'm not American.   I wonder if the guys story was just a rip from that or just similar by coincidence, Is it the exact same in that show? 
Ahahahaha wtf is this?  /r/ofcoursethatsathing I guess 
No. My name is actually Jake and I fucking hate that commercial, because half the people I meet say "like Jake from State Farm!" 
I'd bet my saving that the picture is from Seinfeld, altough I can't quite recall what episode, but I can confirm that George Costanza would be in it for the long con and would do more for less. 
Awwww, yeah, that has to be hard. I have a very common name too but mine has about 6 different spellings, so I grew up constantly verifying the spelling. I just spell it out of habit now when I'm giving it out to stores or whatnot, because they always spell it wrong.  I would understand a downvote for bringing up your most hated commercial, haha 
did you find anything interesting secret agent schnebly5? 
That's awesome. You'll not regret this when you grow older, I guarantee it. 
I never regretted not attending my high school prom until I read this thread. That sounds like way more fun than doing prom crap like I see in the movies! Except for getting laid...that'd be pretty cool, but I still think this is more memorable. 
I read this as, "I'm at my girlfriend's porn right now."  Now instead you're a secret agent. If Hollywood's taught me anything, being a secret agent will get you more diddly doo than being in a porno. 
This sounds like me and my friends shroom trip, we ran around our college campus at like 8pm pretending to be secret agents. My friends room became the "room of secrets" as we took the Schrodinger cat idea to the extreme and We names a BLT Dale 
I know its over, but I just want you to know that reading this really made my day! Thanks! :D 
I'm reading your story with the voice of Butters and it work wonderfully. 
Just as a heads up, I bet that door at the top of the staircase E led to the roof, and the signage just means they rented out space on the roof to a cell company.   I used to work at a hotel and would visit the roof routinely, and they had the same sort of signage on and around the roof door. The hotel rented out space on the roof for some cell tower stuff (maybe a repeater?).   I went on the roof plenty of times, and there was a marked off area where it had a bunch more of those signs posted. I bet you'd be fine at least checking it out, just be careful. They probably only expect technicians to go up there, so not much in the way of safety railings and what not.   It'll still be cool though, really fun looking out from the roof of a building at the city.  
Is it normal for American High Schools to allow their students to stay over at the hotel??  Cause, y'know...^^^they ^^^WILL ^^^have  ^^^the ^^^sexy  ^^^time. 
HOLY SHIT IT WAS HAUNTED?! Was there even anyone up in that room? YOU ALMOST CAUGHT A GHOST HOLY SHIT.  Also, I'm here bro. Sorry that you broke up. Always sucks man, but sounds like college may be right around the corner. It may just be perfect timing. Stay positive! 
Dude i read this and thought immediately "this guy is an infp for sure" so glad you posted  
Hey man I'm still reading, and it sucks to hear about the breakup. But hey, the best part of your life is still ahead of you, and you seem like an awesome guy. Girls tend to like awesome guys so you should have no problem finding a better replacement! 
Was this possibly B-CC prom at the Omni Shoreham hotel? If so, the reason the security guards were busy in that last photo is because they found a kid doing cocaine in the bathroom who then proceeded to fight them.  
My prom is coming up in about a month and it's at a sugar bush. I'm planning on going undercover to acquire some fresh maple syrup. Any tips on how to be inconspicuous? 
Yeah. I won't lie...for a guy who's shy and put himself out there to ask to hang out with the friends, it didn't feel good for them to just brush me off several times. But... whatever. They weren't worth making friends with anyway then, and frankly, I probably had more fun snooping around by myself than they did.  
Agent schnebly5 reporting in. I've snuck past the guard and am in the elevator. As I am writing this the elevator stopped and two women got in. They don't seem to be concerned, just a weird look since I'm in a tux. Will report in soon. On the 5th floor.  
Can't tell if you're sarcastic. It's either this or sitting by myself. Remember, this is her prom, not mine. I go to a different school, so I'll have my own prom with people I onow 
I've done that before IRL. the halls were empty after school so me and my friend were doing secret spy flips past doorways, hiding behind lockers, and dashing everywhere like super badass spies while humming the mission impossible music. It was pretty awesome and I forgot about both him and this memory until just now. 
I went to prom my junior year stag. Senior year I dragged...my gay date. Had a blast both times. 
It's an American high school tradition where students dress up in their best and have a blast dancing and what not.  They vote for Prom King & Queen and it's generally a big deal for people to go to at least once. 
Wow thanks so much for sharing. You sound awesome! That's some awesome advice, so thank you.  
damn, thanks for sharing! Apparently you have just got married, congratulations!!! Reading this made me really happy :)  You should be really happy by now ;) enjoy your life as a married man! Best wishes from Brazil  **"never lose the spirit of adventure"** 
That sounds exactly like the kind of thing I'm hoping to do in college  
I have the same personality type as Butters: INFP! 
I KNOW!!! I NEED TO GO BACK AND FIND IT!!!   Also, really thank you for your positive vibes... it's just kind of dizzying right now cause the breakup is a bit messy here and there so it takes some work to close. I really hope you're right about college. If I may ask, are you in college?  
Fellow agent, one of the keys to being stealthy and going places you're not supposed to is the ability to retreat. In my adventures in the hotel, I had a few "safe spots" where I *knew* nobody would find me (e.g. this little nook on the F1 staircase on the 6th floor). So each time I went a little further in the ladder room and sensed danger, I knew I had a place to fall back to. It's like guerrilla warfare.  
You'll find more awesome people like you in college/uni. Let those high school snobs be 
You can get plenty more high school girls once you're in college.  
It's a kind of cracker I think. Threw me too, the first time I heard an American say that. 
beware of the two ladies, they must not find out your true identity :D! 
Yo, as someone who never went to prom... I doubt you'll regret anything. Life is so much better after high school in my opinion. 
She's your girlfriend, so she should be spending it with you... the fact she isn't is troublesome.  By troublesome, I mean that she's your girlfriend in name only.  And if her friends don't like you, then stop wasting your time.  They will eventually turn her against you anyway.  I sincerely hope you end this relationship soon.  Take someone else to your prom.  Somewhere in your school is a girl who is honestly dying to go with you, and chances are if you open your eyes and pay attention, you'll recognize her.  Turns out, two girls wanted to go with me to prom (sadly I had to work, single parent home, helping make ends meet, and all that bullshit) when I was in high school, but I didn't notice (although I should have).  Don't waste another moment on this "girlfriend" of yours. 
Darn. What about the roof? Ha. Don't take me seriously.  
I just realized what uni meant from your comment. I feel like an idiot 
Reporting in. Close call! Saw a room service lady on floor 5 and then on floor 6. She gave me weird looks. I ran up stair E and then stair G to floor 8 where I am now. I think I lost her. I see a sign for "roof access" so I'm going to check it out.  
Good to hear cause high school...hasn't been the most fun thing I could imagine.  
Read above. I think the red ladder may have led to the roof.  
If there is no helicopter at the roof waiting for you, they have found us out and you must stay hidden D:! 
Left high school 12 years ago, remember precisely nothing about it or what happened there. Moved away, got actual friends, got a proper job. Life starts after education. 
Because, I went to homecoming... I imagine prom has the same shitty DJ, with the same shitty people, with the same shitty awkwardness. From what I can tell, prom was like the tutorial to proper partying. 
The only proper attire if you want to morph into a tiger and still be modest later on.  
OH SHIT HUGE ENCOUNTER. So I just took stair F1 up to floor 9 and found an unmarked door. Walked in and it had a dirty room with construction materials. Clearly not somewhere where guests are supposed to go. In there, there was an alarm locked door and a tiny unmarked side door with a lock. It was unlocked. I slowly opened the door and I shit you not there was nothing but a red ladder that led up to an office of some sort. I heard the rustling of papers and bolted. The first door slammed shut unfortunately. Currently hiding on floor 6 stair E. Should I pursue the office again?  
Me too minus the friends. Have discovered I hate people.   
That's a good point. High school has basically sucked, so I'm going to make a conscious effort to make what follows not suck.  
Meh, it was fun considering the young age. Maybe you just had "shitty" high school experience. 
Thank you for your advice. What you (and all the internet strangers) don't know is that this wasn't the perfect relationship to begin with. This prom thing wasn't a big deal, but it just brought to light some of the larger issues in the relationship. Really, it was more of a red flag to me when she didn't care about all my secret agent stuff than when she ditched me in the first place. It's not something she did wrong, it's just indicative of a lack of chemistry I think.  
I hate to break it to you, but if she wasn't talking or dancing with other guys, it sounds like she was hoping to. Whether that's the case or not though, she sounds way less awesome than you.  
Haha I think he was a waste of a pick. I think Mettenberger is better right now, frankly. But who knows? Maybe he'll turn out to be a better Russell Wilson. I doubt it, though.  
Welp, in that case trust your gut and do what you think is best. You do you and all that motivational stuff.  I just thought it's important to give you a contrary viewpoint for once, because I imagine a bunch of people telling you to end your relationship over petty shit can really get to you. In the end you need to be the one who's happy, that's all. 
Not all girls are secretly thirsting after guys all the time. She wanted to dance with her girlfriends, and that's fine. She shouldn't have abandoned me, but that doesn't mean she wanted to be off with other guys.  
I bolted down all the way to the lobby. I popped out near the prom and scared the bejesus out of two guys when I popped out. Currently making my way back to floor 8... Will report soon about the red ladder room.  
Happy Birthday dude!  You got Steam? I'll buy you a birthday game if you do. 
Happy birthday! Here is a birthday poem composed for you by using the auto-fill feature on my iPhone (starting with "Happy Birthday" and picking a word offered each time):  Happy Birthday!   The fact I can see it as an excuse   for the next few weeks of a good time with you guys   should make it a lot of fun  
When I turned 30, I thought everyone would make a big deal about it. I woke up in the best mood. But instead, I got a bday text from my mom and spent the night at home alone with my 2 year old. To top it off, I found my first gray hair that day. One good thing about it though, for the five bdays following my 30th, I have expected nothing, so any gift or "happy bday" I receive is a great surprise! 
What day is today? It's hawkeye1515 birthday! What a day for a birthday! Let's all have some caaake!   Disclaimer: you have to imagine the cake and that we're all eating it together :D 
Happy Birthday Mate! What was the game you were wanting? If you'll give me your steam I'll be happy to buy it for you:). Have a great day 
Happy birthday!  Aww, sorry to hear that! Turn it around and make it a priority to remember other's birthdays and make them feel special! Who do you know that has a birthday coming up? 
Hey we have same birthdays! I also didn't get presents. 
Happy Happy Happy Birthday!!   (: If its any consolation, I didn't get anything from my family last year for Christmas. & It was my first Christmas after I moved away from home. I went to the bar and cried.   
Late to the party, but I wanted to pitch in. Last year no one mentioned my birthday on the day of. Didn't receive a single card in the mail. I messaged my brother to find out if our mom forgot his birthday the same year. He said that she didn't and then wished me a belated happy birthday.   My birthday is coming up again; nine short days away. I plan on telling no one who is new in my life about it, and I don't expect anything. I find that this may be the best birthday I've ever had because I have never had zero expectations before.   Happy birthday, champ. It looks like Reddit love for yours will make up for any other shortcomings of the day. :) 
This Friday is my birthday. Most people hate me, so I expect not many people to value it. You're not alone.  
Happy birthday! I sorta feel your pain. My birthday is Christmas Eve. As such I get no gifts and people lump what the get me in with Christmas. On the other hand, there usually is good food and a party so I can pretend its mine :P you got a copy of terrairia? (Spelled wrong, oh well) If not, happy birthday!shoot me a pm and I'll change that :3 
I'm glad reddit is so generous, but honestly who cares if people don't get you presents? That's petty... count the blessings you do have, I'm sure your life could be worse and not getting birthday presents is so insigificant. 
Very much appreciate the offer but its ok, get yourself a game and thanks alot!:) 
Somehow I expected the photo to show twins.  Beautiful though.  
I love your username and we could be best friends.  
I feel like there's a deeper meaning to this that I'm just not getting (ignoring the fact that it's random words) 
Going to try it with SwiftKey.... "Happy Birthday! I am going to sleep." 
If you expect nothing you will never be disappointed. I've been following this motto since I was ten 
What if you expect nothing, get nothing, and get depressed that you were right in expecting nothing? 
I'm in my early 20's & I've already got a gray. :(  I call it Gandalf. 
I've complerely skipped gray hair. I have three white ones...shockingly white. I pluck them in a state of existential despair and wait for them to grow back. 
Thanks alot!!!!!!!!! I saw your pm and replied earlier aswell :P. Also your pm seemed to had 4 games and you said 7?  
It was Super Smash bros for the 3ds :P and thanks alot!:) 
Thanks! A friend of mine has a birthday real soon, I'll try make his birthday awesome 
I feel your pain. My birthday is on Christmas Day :( 
Haha I have plenty of games believe me. PM your Steam name to me and I'll see what I can come up with. Can't have you presentless. 
Still haven't seen anything about super smash being bought yet. Please pm me your email address and I'll send you an Amazon code for $50. Don't feel guilty, I took a brief survey to get it, least I could do is make someone else's birthday memorable!!  
"Expectations are premeditated resentments." - Al Anon  
Yah plus, when you expect nothing, no one will get mad at you for forgetting their birthday. Honestly, I think the entire concept is stupid, but what ev.. 
If you except nothing you won't be depressed because you expected that.  
Nice name. I called mine "Bitch Ass Motherfucker". Surprisingly, no more have showed up since that day. But Bitch Ass Motherfucker seems to stick around... 
29 and starting to get some grays! I see it as a sign that I need to move to a tropical beach area and quit worrying about day to day bullshit! 
One of the keys has 3 games in it ;) (ops, I mean 6 games in total)  Let me know if you were able to redeem them just fine. 
No, it's fine, really. Life deals people different hands, and this is the one I have played with all along. Some people have big parties, I appreciate another day. 
So the question is, where did you take a brief survey that earns you a $50 Amazon gift card? 
Yup! It's kind of sad, but I feel like I'd rather go into a situation expecting the very worst and being surprised than hoping for the best and being disappointed. 
Isn't it hair pigmentation primarily genetic? But yeah, I've had a pretty stressful couple of years recently so either one explains my little wizard.  Just look at it as your body adjusting to how wise you are hahah 
I think that Hawkeye chick from Full Metal Alchemist is hot... does that count? 
Shank 2, Super meat boy, braid, Lone Survivor, Binding of Isaac and Bastion 
Thank you! I just woke up feeling a little down and negative. So it's nice of you to share something I don't have enough of right now :) Has anything cool happened to you lately or is it really impossible to tell where your good mood comes from? 
Thank you. So far, it's been shit, but there's enough time for a nice change of pace! Staying optimistic.  You go and have a nice day too, you hear 
I am having an amazing day.  I work on a helpdesk. I was brought in with a team of 16 in total, to help with a large project. The expected time is only 2 months, but there's a chance for some of us to be hired on directly.  I've currently been there for 1 month. Just this morning, I finished off and deployed an app for the helpdesk, to cut down call times dramatically by helping to pull up user and computer information with just a click, instead of using a half dozen other tools.  My boss pulled me aside yesterday and told me that if/when they get the budget approved, whether in general or just specifically for me, I get the absolute first dibs on a permanent position with them at the end of the project. I've done more for their team than any other individual in the entire time they've been around, and did it in only 31 days.  After having been unemployed for 13 months due to a terrible economy in my city, this kind of thing has me glowing with pride and hope. :) 
Why thank you, my day hasn't been shit, but I always feel that it can be a little better anytime, anywhere. 
Thanks!  I have a lot of office work to complete + a professional exam to study for but can't seem to focus my energy into either.  
Thanks, and you too! My day isn't that bad, working from home, the sun is our so I'm in the yard. All I need now is a nice cold Corona, but you know, work and beer don't mix (and it's only 12:38 pm over here). 
Still have yet to sleep but I guess it is the same day. I stay up late and wake up late but thinking it should still be a pretty good day  
Thank you. It's been a good day, I started on my new job and it's going well so far :D What about you?  
One day I will feel happiness again. Iv forgotten how it feels for any years. I'm happy for you, and jealous. 
Thanks Op.  My day is almost done, but I figure you'll be ok with me having a good late evening.  
Awww that was a nice thing to read!  I tossed and turned (again) last night so I gave up, got up at 5 and went for a walk. Such a good way to start the day and then reading that was even that much better.  
Thanks :D I have a first date today so I'm a little nervous, thanks for the positive energy tho friendo 
Yesterday my inconsiderate brother in law in Texas called my husband at 6 am and woke me up too. I don't get home until 9:30 every night. This morning the other brother in law's parole officer in Texas called at 5:15!!! Wtf!! I hate this family.  
Well I have to spend today cramming out a 3000 word essay. I should probably get started on that aye 
You too! I've just finished my final-year uni project 
I woke up feeling absolutely shitty (ofc my IBS flares up same day I have my University entry exams 300km away) and it's nice to hear someone else is having better day than I! 
I just got back from a bad day at work, i accidentally broke the water pipe to my house and while rushing out i broke my car remote. No good day here 
Thank you! Hopefully I will. So far so good to be honest, and I'm not usually the happiest on my birthday. 
I feel kind of silly, but I need to see this today. Tragedy struck my family 2 days ago when my cousin was unexpectedly killed by a reckless driver. I have been drowning in a combination of sadness and blind rage. Just seeing this post made me smile, if only for a moment. Thank you, internet stranger. Maybe some of your positivity will pass on to me.  
I needed this post today. Also had a nightmare last night complete with cold sweats in addition to having sinus problems, haha! Studying for the medical school admissions exam is dragging me down a bit.   But you're right -- the only way out is THROUGH! And gratitude certainly helps. I can't forget that; it's also a journey and not a race!!   Thank you for reminding me OP. Sending positivity your way as well :)  
Thanks :) hope you have lots of happiness and love in your life 
Thanks man, I really don't know how this day will go, I haven't slept since 3am yesterday and I have to work. 
Thank you. I've been waking up with negative energy for the last few days, and I really hope I can shake it. I hope your day is great as well! 
You too! Sadly I got woken up by loud music right outside my house at 5 this morning, which didn't get me in a good mood to start the day, but since then my day's been better and my mood has improved to match :)  
If you're reading this, I couldn't give any less of a shit about how your day is going.   Frankly, I don't even really care whether you live through it, or not.   
Hello I had a nightmare last night and I woke up having a sinus lol and I woke up late. But I didn't want to ruin my day because of that and forget about my blessings so I just wanted to be happy.  I also have lot of things to do today so if I'm not in good mood I won't be able to do them.   
It will for sure.  I woke up today sick and I had a nightmare but I didn't want to ruin my day because of that so I started my day by smiling.  And I believe that if you smile for people, which is free of charge, you may change someone's day and make him happier 
Everyday I try to wake up early cause I have lot of things to do but I've never been able to open my eyes lol Now it's noon and I'm still having my cup of tea (I've been holding it for 30 minutes)    
I'm glad I made it better. I wish that can wake up early as you do 
Send a wide text to your inlaws politely asking them to remember time zones and give them an easy way to think about it - for example, "subtract 3 hours from the current time. If it's before _AM, call us later". Be sure not to name names so nobody can get butthurt about it. :) 
It's good to hear that I'm happy for you What's next? What are you going to do? I'm still working on my final-year project  
I wish you a happy birthday It's not about being the happiest You can do something that make it special 
i have so much to do today, i'm in a fairly good mood, but still don't want to do anything :( any tips, OP?  
That's a pretty great attitude! It's pretty inspiring to me how some people (like you) can really turn bad things or annoyances into positivity like that :) I want to try that more often! 
I was teasing :) it's been a while since you originally posted, how did your day end up going?  
Oh my gosh!  Just holding my morning pint of tea, which is lukewarm as it always takes an hour to drink it, lol! 
I still have plenty of time to do most things just feels a bit better if I wake up a bit earlier but nothing too crazy. Sort of did wake up at 3 pm so I've only been awake for 12 hours or so. Also hoping that tea is still hot, I make mine in small amounts that I can drink right away. 
Just focus on summer projects and try and find some work experience before starting my masters (audio engineering).  What's your final-year project on? 
thanks! Just arrived. how is your day going so far? 
It ended up very well, thank you Actually I haven't done much, but the fact that I woke up with a positive energy and seeing that many people have responded in a positive way on my post made my day I just woke up and it's a new day now How's yours going so far?  
It's about using fiber optic sensors for irrigation (agricultural engineering)  All the best luck for you  
Thanks for the good wishes, I think it's going to go well :) (its going to crash and burn now lmao) 
Some computer stuff that will only interest other computer people, I guess ;) 
No way! You got this! (Of course, you gotta report back after the fact now!) 
it went well :D I'm a dummy and didn't go for the kiss though lol rip, I'll get it next time 
How did the interaction go? What did you say to her? 
I saw this was posted "1 hour ago", and got excited to see how it went. Congratulations. You two remember to have fun. 
Fuck yes. What's the date?   I had something similar happen recently. Fucking decade of flirting and now things are moving forward.  
On your date, there are 2 things you must do to win her over. First, comment on her shoes. Girls spend a lot of effort deciding what shoes to wear, in the hopes that someone will notice. When you do notice, it confirms her taste in fashion. And secondly, ask her about her father. Whether her relationship is good or bad with her father, it is a topic she will be passionate about, and she will confide in your genuine interest in her personal life. 
So.. is this someone that you are looking to for a long term?  You should think of some things to ask her about her likes and dislikes.  My first date with my wife, we went through all the major questions about likes and dislikes.  You need to figure out what's a necessity, if this is someone to be going long term with.   For my wife and i when we first met, it we discussed, right off the bat:  Religious views: Whatever your beliefs, you want them to be agreeable..an athiest and devout Christian aren't going to go anywhere.  Music:  On a long car ride, do you want to be stuck listening to country music, if metal is your thing?  Politics.. oh dear, in this day and age, you want to root for the same team!!  So as it turned out, my wife and i loved a lot of the same bands, movies, etc..      Good luck on the date.. find out all about her, man! 
Glad to hear it went well! What do you got planned? 
Sounds like you're putting her on a pedestal. Be careful with that, it will never work out if you do.. 
Grats to you, dude.  I'm wondering, how did you start talking to her?  There's a cute girl in my class I've noticed the past few weeks, and I've noticed she's usually waiting for class to start around the same time I am. Just don't know how to start the conversation. I know the usual ask about the class stuff, but I can't make myself go say "Hi!" to her to open up the conversation. 
Word for word:   "Hey crush how was your spring break?"  "It was great luke, how was yours?"  "Pretty good. Hey I was wondering if you'd want to hang out sometime? Like not at school but maybe go do something fun?"  "What do you mean?"  "I'm asking you out, do you wanna go on a date sometime?"  Pause, she started blushing  "Yes"  The rest I don't really remember I was too excited 
I honestly have no clue. Probably bowling or mini golf or just dinner 
I'm not sure yet, but someone on here suggested the zoo and that sounded perfect 
I'm not sure, but we've talked about hiking before. That's not really a 1st date idea (hey lemme take you out in the woods where nobody can hear you) but maybe down the line. 
I always think long term with this stuff, even if I am only 20. Its just what I want. Thanks for this, hadn't considered it 
Nothing yet. I forgot what happens after you get a yes hahaha 
She actually came up and did the "Hi!" thing to me. I hadn't even noticed this girl until she did that and every day since that day we've talked more and more. It works, you just have to be relaxed about it. I know what it's like to talk to a girl you know very little about yet are completely infatuated with. Stop acting like you're defusing a bomb, and just relax.  
For some reason every scenario i have in my head goes to eastern European accent  Nice one mate, yer giving me confidence for the future. You suggest anyway to get to know a crush better before making the first step?  
Damn man you shouldn't have even stressed that took some stones to just drop it on her like that lol. It's that easy I guess. 
Piece of advice, next time, don't ask. Instead of asking, "wondering if you'd want to hang out sometime?" just say, "Let's hang out sometime." Makes it less likely for her to say no. (because of the implication) 
Mini golf is good. As long as you don't get easily frustrated that is, mini golf is hard   
Bowling is an awful date if you don't know each other well. You don't get to talk. When you sit down, she goes up, and vice versa, until it's over. Unless you both really like friendly competition! Plus butt-gazing, too, I guess.  IMO bowling is a boring first date. Mini golf would be much more interactive! 
That's actually a great idea. Just make sure to check out the weekly forecast and pick a day with nice weather. I don't know where you're from, but we're in the 90s this week. 
Sure thing..  Another thing..  Make sure you can fart in front of each other!! You need to have that level of comfort! That was also our first date.. tickle fights and fart contests..  11 years since our first date.  
In a few months, she'll move from Germany to England, and I don't think I'll be able to see her again 
Depends where you know her from. Work or school, talk about work and school. Study together, or talk during a meal break. Small talk doesn't have to be awkward. You can find common interests over time. But make sure you ask her questions she would want to answer, it'll show her you care, because you do care after all. There isn't anything wrong with showing your feelings either. Don't go Ted Mosby and say you love her, but a genuine complement and a little flirting go a long way. 
I tend to stress over these things more than the average person. Asking someone out means a lot to me, more than the average guy at least. 
Might actually be a good idea then to see if his crush can handle frustration lol. Good opening test.  
Thats a ballsy move, not sure if I'll do that first date haha 
DUDE! Nice, I'm really happy for you. No greater feeling than hearing the "yes" after asking someone out. Do you know where you're going to take her yet? 
Doesn't matter, you put yourself out there! That's the hardest part and now you've done it NINE times now. There will always be failures in the sense they may say no but the real failure would be not trying again.   I will echo what others have said too. Don't over do it on the first date. Find somewhere nice and quiet where you can talk and get to know each other in a new sense.   But overall well done and I wish you all the best!    
School, same as you pretty much. I'm just dabbling, trying to find someone good. I did at one point but i fugged that up good  
Hey, rejection happens, all you can do is be like oh well and go for the next one.  If you like a girl, just go for it. If she says no be thankful she didn't lead you on, if she says yes, you're one step closer. 
I've done that too. She was the perfect package and I passed her up for a bitchy cheater with big boobs. But thats all in the past.  Since you know her at school, try inviting her to study or work on homework together. It's a good excuse to have a conversation. And like I said before, don't be afraid to show her how you feel. People like being liked, and if she can guess you like her, it'll help out.  
If I could offer any advice, my general rule for first dates is don't make it a big, flashy thing. No movie. No elaborate, expensive thing. A first date is meant to talk and get to know one another better. For example, my first date with my wife was to a dessert restaurant where we split some cookies and ice cream, and talked over that. Cost about 5 bucks, if that, and lasted an hour or two. Keep it simple, and if/when more dates happen, then you can start branching out and up.  Good luck, and congrats! 
Never go to a movie. And dinner isn't the best choice either. Do something where u can talk and get to know each other. Coffee or smoothies are good,  arcades,  parks.  
Movie followed by dinner isn't terrible since you have the movie to discuss at dinner. 
No way man. You are only setting yourself up. A big flashy expensive first date screws your over in two different ways. It tells her that you're probably inexperienced at dating, and it also is very hard to keep following up. Also, movie is the worst first date idea. Never pick movie. Never.   What do you do for a second date? Third? What about an anniversary? It's weird if your most expensive date for the first year is your first one.   Better to be decisive, pick a couple of places and let her choose one of them. Don't ask her where she would like to go, just decide on two or maybe three and ask if she likes one of those more than the others. If she is indecisive still, just pick one and run with it.   Just did a first date yesterday, lunch, near the bar in a public setting, $10 burgers and some music and talking. We left together and the date lasted 7 hours. 3 at lunch and 4 more at her place.  
... I think that's a rather sad way to look at. It shouldn't be a money spending contest, the girl isn't up for the highest bidder.   It's about getting to know somebody properly.  Now, I'm not saying that spending money on a date is a bad thing, but if someone complains that you're not spending enough on them you need to start evaluating their thoughts on you. 
I feel like the purpose of a first date is to talk to your date and get to know one another. It's difficult to do that during a movie.  Sure, you can watch a movie and chat after, if that's what you or your date enjoys. I'm sure some people would love that. So maybe it's not necessarily a bad idea, I just don't think it's the best idea when there are other options that are more personable (and less expensive).  I say save the movie for later. Get some ice cream or drinks and get to know one another for a bit. 
That's cool.  Can I be the trouble maker?  It would be great if you could tell your mom about your one friend that is always up to shenanigans.  I will try harder to give you something to talk to her about.  
I told my mom about the whole Dogecar thing because she follows NASCAR a little bit, she thought it was really neat. 
What do you mean by "she thinks"? I AM YOUR BEST *internet* FRIEND. Anyways, Hi, I'm Chriswiss. I like movies , soccer and butts. 
G'day internet strangers mum! I'll be your mate! Can I be the crazy Aussie mate?  
Tell her we said Happy Mothers day this Sunday if your in the states 
I like to think she's right :)  I now feel pressure tho to say interesting things to give your mom something to hear about! 
Update: My mom says thanks for all the kind words :)  I showed her every one of these comments and she was laughing and smiling at all of the  Thank you everyone for a fantastic impromptu start to Mother's Day weekend haha :) 
I will when I wake up! she is in bed right now as am I, I just woke up randomly and wanted to put my words into text. 
I'll be the tough guy who secretly has a heart of gold! 
Your friends came together to race in nascar? That's great! I'll make some sandwiches, I'm sure they're hungry after all that fun.   Have I met the driver friend before? You should bring them over!  
I'll be that one bloke where the family is sizzlin some snags and I come by  and hav em uninvited. Everybody knows that one bloke 
Ya know, I was surprised at how beautiful NJ actually is.  It has an unfair reputation!   
If we wait a few more minutes it should be snowy Minnesota  
Idk about your mom, but my mom would think your user name is great. Cherries are her favorite berries. She doesn't really think about double entendres. 
That's because most people that have been in NJ only briefly usually pass through the areas near NYC, which are very industrial, swampy and overall ugly.   Not too beautiful today, though... cold and rainy   
We do this to keep everyone else away. Now you've gone and ruined it. 
Nice to meet ya man! Actually in Denton, but I felt Dallas is alot more recognizable. 
I'm Jay, I love Game of Thrones, Burgers and women in riding gear. *Don't judge me.* 
... I mean, NJ sucks.  "Garden State" my ass.  More like "Garbage State", amiright? 
I'm Limbo, I love Silicon Valley, Chicken and women with intelligence. *Don't judge me either*. 
Best season?  Best toppings? BEST BUTT? important information, let's be real 
Terrific thank you! The weather is beautiful - blue skies and sunny and in the 60's. Getting some chores done but taking time to fun outside every now and then for a blast of sunshine!   Checking in with reddit now and then too of course :) 
I can never decide between 2 3 or 5, they're all too good! I might be a bit of a heathen for this, but BBQ sauce instead of marinara with double cheese and donate meat with pepperoni and mushrooms. Best butt would have to be that Pantera chicken who did the amazing twerking video.  Same questions back at ya! 
It's a nice day today, too. Really beautiful day today 
This is adorable! But you've got me glancing over at my husband -fifteen years of him opening doors for me- I wonder what I almost broke?   
It's a win win. She get's the door opened for her and you get to look chivalrous and not have the window get messed up.  
That shit's outta a Disney princess movie or some shit. Beautiful man :V Also that's kinda hilarious. 
I have been with my guy since 2008. He drives a supercharged 1987 MR2 that he has owned and loved since 1991. It is a money pit but I have to say he always struck me as a complete gentleman. I NEVER opened that door in that car for years. And even now it is only on the vary rare occasion that I ever do and that is due to being parked in or something. He let slip a few months ago the reason for his chivalry. When women who wear rings open doors they scratch up the paint around the car handle. THIS is the reason for his chivalry. He doesn't want his paint scratched! I still love him opening the door though and have grown to love his car.  
I love this story! It's really true, though, opening the car door for them has always really impressed my girlfriends. 
I hate when people, wives, co-workers whatever slam the doors of nice Japanese cars. I think they're so used to their shitty American heavy car doors. I once left a girl at a shop after I gave her a ride, she slammed my door so hard! 
Hey that's the exact same car as I have! Same color as the picture too. I'll have to start doing that on dates to save my windows.  
Good for you, and peeps should do whatever they're into but personally the whole "opening a car door for a woman" is, imho, the kind of neurosis that fucks shit up in society. Unless you happen to be "playing princess" this behavior is stone aged.   
When my wife and I were dating,  I would get the door for her then walk around the car and rip a fart I had been holding.  
That is literally what OP said... Why was it upvoted over 400 times? 
OK, your name and tag. Are they references to anything in particular?   
Oh wow - I bought a used car 1 1/2 years ago.  It is a nice car but i never knew why is is all scratched up near the door handle!  I bet it is from the previous owners wedding ring or rings his ex-wife used to wear!  Thank you for solving this mystery for me!  I had my old car for 14 1/2 years and there were no scratches near the door handle at all! 
body shops hate him!  seriously though, long fingernails ruin the paint too. 
Dude stop throwing your money around like that, you're making the rest of us look bad. 
That was traded in, but I have a 2013 Subaru Legacy now.  I'm kind of hooked on Subaru, they've never let me down. 
Nah, this is something you take to the death bed. Then, and only then tell her. 
Ha! Turns out he's really a gentleman (whew!). He thinks OP's a genius though!  
I just like the name Ezra and wish it was mine. My tag though is from Tengen Toppa Gurren Lagann, a fantasticle anime. 
I also usually have very long fingernails with all my rings .... 
Why does the Forester gets the lesbian puns while the the BMW 3 series, the #1 car for gay men, only get the douchebag stereotype? 
Lol they are definitely not much more known for things like that.  Car enthusiasts are a minority. 
As am I. Currently have an Impreza and a Forester. Never going back from AWD. 
He's totally just telling you that to look like a good person, there must be something he's hiding. 
I actually just started watching Gurren Lagann, the name caught me off guard, I watched a movie based off of space pirate captain harlock (70's anime) and the antagonist was named Ezra. That sounds a lot more convoluted typed out, wow 
Did you just make that from that other guys image? 
I have yet to see a lesbian subaru owner. I see sport modded subaru all the time. So....  
I've never been able to test it out myself, but I've heard from at least two people that AWD doesn't do very  well in the snow. Seems counter intuitive to me but since I don't really have the experience to know if they were right or not, what's your opinion?  
Just looked through your comments to see if you posted on /r/thebutton and found a comment where you did and went to it. 
I believe i have watched the same movie. :3 Gurren Lagann is fuckin' amazing. YOUR DRILL WILL BE THE DRILL THAT PIERCES THE HEAVENS!!! 
the whole point of awd is to be great in the snow. and the rain. and loose dirt or mud. basically all slippery road conditions. i drive a subaru in new england and have never had trouble in any of those conditions. 
I think what they mean is that it doesn't do any better when compared to a 2WD in the snow. AWD is a better for preventing wheel spin when starting off from a stop, and preventing getting stuck in thicker snow, but when it comes to stopping it's that same as any other vehicle because you are no longer transmitting power to all four wheels. A lot of people like to claim AWD is much safer in snow, but the advantages are fairly minimal. In plain old rainy conditions however, AWD is definitely superior. 
Reddit solved another problem? Like that time we caught terrorists! 
Oh.  ..  So this is a safe space where we can talk without worrying about colour :) 
Everybody to the limit, the Cheat is to the limit! 
I used to drink exclusively whiskey until a few years back when I almost destroyed myself with it. God I miss whiskey =D 
It's still delicious though. Haha. I'll take "real" straight whiskey as well though, I just like the sweet burn of honey whiskey.  
Don't know  Who it is  But it's probably fhqwhgads 
It is delicious, sorry I didn't mean for the comment to be dickish at all lol, its an inside joke with my friends to point out its not really whiskey after anyone talks about honey jack or evan williams honey cause of an all out argument we had about it back before. But sometimes I forget I'm not talking to my friends lol 
Honestly, YouTube really f-d up when they picked that name for their paid service. They should have known it was too similar to the porn site.  
Reminds me of the time I told a co-worker who was wondering where I'd gotten a sweatshirt I was wearing that he could get it from dicks.com.  Turns out it's dickssportinggoods.com.  That first one was definitely not the place to go to shop for a sweatshirt. 
Hahahahahahahaha.  That. Is. Amazing.  I don't have any fun stories. Mostly just my SO's mother who some how manages to screw up everything she touches. I keep telling her not to touch any settings, and she *claims* she doesn't but she's always disabling her wifi and sound or ruining/changing her apple music stations/play lists or locking herself out of accounts and just... endless problems. Accidently adding inappropriate tag lines to her text messages ~ The dog pooped all over my bed! It sinks!  She asked me to make her Netflix work offline (for the cottage) which wasn't a thing like 3 weeks ago but apparently it is now? ~ The dog pooped all over my bed! It sinks!  She is a lovely woman, but some days I don't have the time/patience for her endless tech questions. ~ The dog pooped all over my bed! It sinks! 
Thats a real gem, I wish i had similarly entertaining stories but this one takes the cake. 
My Canadian boss mentioned that in his homeland, milk is packaged in bags. Curious, I google image searched "milk bags". The results weren't quite SFW. 
The first time I saw a porn site was in 5th grade at school. We were doing research projects on presidents. A girl goes to whitehouse.com and my teacher immediately freaks out and tries to block the web content with her palms. 
My poor mom did the same thing a few days ago. I've never seen her face turn from so calm to utter disgust in such a short period of time 
This didn't happen to me directly but to a guy I worked with in high school on our network team. One of the Christian Franciscan Brothers at the school (private all boys catholic high school) who was a really amazing guy but older and not very tech savy called us for help. In his words what had happened was he put a floppy disk into the drive and now couldn't get it out. My co-worker went to see what happened. Apparently this particular Brother had just gotten a brand new Dell from us. This was probably 2001, maybe 2000. Anyway the Dell had a new cd drive that didn't have a tray, just a slot with an automatic arm for inserting the disk. Well this brother had never seen one of those before and assumed it to be the floppy drive so he jammed a floppy disk in there pretty good. It destroyed the drive and we had to order a new one. He was absolutely amazed that "Dell would be so stupid" to make a slot that looks like a floppy drive for CDs. It was pretty funny.  
Older people? Technology?  My parents.. they shouldn't be anywhere near a computer because they'll mess up something that they assume i know how to fix.. 
Whenever I see those Redbox things for renting DVDs I always get confused with Redtube. Redbox sounds like a pornsite name too. Is there another Pornsite called something-box? I just always double-take when I see those Redbox vending machines, like, are people really that open about renting porno DVDs? 
Reminds me of late 90s mom wants to search for something online. Limited search engines back in the day found that hotbot.com worked well for me. Tell her to go on hotbot she types in hotbut and you can guess from here. 
One time when I was in college and working at the local parks and recreation center for the summer, I left my laptop on my desk to go help my boss with something and when I came back one of my coworkers, who was an older 50-something woman who hated me from the moment she saw me, said, "you left your VIDEO GAMES running on your computer!"  She was referring to my screen saver. 
When i got a new t.v. for my mom, she is still finding the button to change the aspect ratio of the t.v. and calls me to push the button to fix it. 
I just realized... I might actually indicate to that poor woman that I know what Redtube is in that scenario!  I'd want to crawl in a hole if I said *anything* other than "Red-what? You mean YouTube Red?" But I know my reaction would be a very telling laugh.     
I would really like YouTube red, but the fee for it is pretty ridiculous last time I checked. $10/month for YouTube? And it won't even play minimized on my phone like firefox will. I don't see anything there worth the price, even if the ads are annoying. 
Not the same but similar, we were at the checkout line at the grocery and my wife (looking over at the Redbox) says loudly, "oh we should do a Redtube tonight!". I just stared at her blankly waiting for her to realize what she said while the cashier started blushing a bit. Of course she was totally oblivious. 
On those nights where I stay late and miss the last opportunity to get home via public transportation, one of older coworkers always asks me if I plan on taking a "yuber" to get home. Another one calls it "hoover."  Baby boomers are adawwwwrable.  
Okay let me walk you through the process of my grandfather forwarding emails.  Let's say his sister sends him a funny text. Grandpa thinks "Hey, I bet my children would like it!" he then proceeds to send this email to us.  Later he calls and asks wether we recieved his email. I ask "What did you send me Grandpa?" to which he replies that he sent me a funny poem. Okay, let's see. I open gmail but the only thing he sent me was an image. I am not suprised anymore. Why is that?  Well here's the deal.  When grandpa wants to "forward" an email he:  * Copies the text of the email  * pastes the text into notepad  * prints out the .txt  * scans the printed page  * sends the scanned image.  Well, it works but.. 
Yeah, I don't know if they weren't aware or what, it isn't like YouTube has any knowledge of Google /s 
Even if they didn't know about the porn site (which I highly doubt), red has a long history of being associated with sexual content - as in, 'red band' trailers for movies, and 'red light districts' in cities. 
Yeah when I first heard Youtube was coming out with a new service called "Youtube Red" my first thought was that they had bought out Redtube, and were getting into the porn streaming game. 
dicks.com goes to dickssportinggoods.com  how long ago was this? 
Maybe it used to, but it looks like Dick's Sporting Goods must have bought up the url for www.dicks.com 
I mean there is a lot to keep up with,  so I know it can be confusing.  I know people in the tech industry that have trouble keeping up.  
My grandmother refuses to use an antivirus and still uses Yahoo as a search engine, which is riddle with adware links.  She, of course, is incapable of recognizing very basic warning signs of a site not being legitimate and ends up installing a ton of adware (not to mention a bunch of toolbars).  So a few times a month I have to clean out all the adware, viruses, etc.  I often have to rip it out of her hands because she thinks those "Your computer is infected! Give us your credit card number and install this program to fix it!" adware popups are legitimate.   Sometimes I feel like the elderly shouldn't be allowed to own technology... 
Try: "3L Milk Bags in Ontario"  That worked to show the actual product -- I even tested with unsafe search. 
Magic Actions for YouTube has this and a lot of other useful features. I haven't used YouTube in white for years and it's much better on the eyes. 
On my Galaxy. Couldn't find it, was too lazy to google it. Thanks though 
You spend a lot of time on the facebook, so I know you know a lot about computers.... 
RedBox has been around longer I think. I wish people were though. 
It didn't help that your screensaver was a game of Ms Pacman 
The problem is, if you show them, and they have trouble grasping those things they'll just end up doing more damage in the long run. 
you should be able to run YouTube in the background with Red. also it comes with play music, (basically the same as Spotify premium). I think it's a pretty good deal 
$10 seems to be pretty standard though. I wonder when google will kill it. They seem to only kill projects I love though. RIP Google Reader 
So did you Redtube with her that night? If so... Link? 
Yeah with their Racism, Xenophobia, Sexism and ruining out economy and blaming us!   No they are adorable though 
They had to have known, personally I think it was a way to get back at them. But it was probably not the best decision at all for YouTube 
None of them have ever watched porn, either. I guarantee it. /s 
That is actually exactly why I decided not to get into it. I did a couple of years of comp sci and technical engineering, but I decided having a life and spending money on things other that gadgets was what I preferred.  She basically went from barely/never using a computer and using a home phone with a cord to having a laptop, ipad, cell phone in the course of a year or two. So I do understand she has a lot to contend with, and I help her when I can... but like... I just can't be driving 40 min every other day after work to put batteries in her wireless mouse or resetting her preferred online stations.  
You are a programmer, so you probably know how to install pirated windows 10 on this laptop from the 90s. 
Oh I haven't looked into the music.  It's just that I already pay for netflix, spotify, and a few other services. I know everyone wants their own cut but I can't really justify it for YouTube.  If their service is better than spotify I'll consider swapping the two tho. 
Do you like Allo? Because it is probably next on the chopping block. 
Look on the bright side. Most of them rant way more than they do things. 
Get back at google or get back at redtube???  What did redtube do to google or whh would youtube want to get back at its parent company? 
No no, what sort of self respecting programmer watches smut?!?!?!? 
My biggest thing is my mom not learning. My brother will act all annoyed anytime she asks him how to do something on her phone because it's "so easy."   I know she hasn't grown up with this stuff and it's not as intuitive to her. When she asks me how to do something I patiently show her step by step on how to do it and why to do things that way. Half the time I look up and she's distracted by the TV. The other half I think she gets it. Then next time I see her she asks me how to do something and when I explain it to her she acts like she didn't even know it was possible.   Frustrating.  
Is this due to ALT_GR being more common/already in use on other layouts? RIGHT_ALT was mostly just a duplicate key on most modern systems using en_us keyboards.  Or is it simply missing support, which could likely be resolved? 
If you don't you're not a very good programmer obviously. Why did you even go to college? 
Wait do people use Allo? I only use it so the assistant will send me poems three times a day 
But most of them vote. Which wouldn't be a problem, but younger people don't.  So an  easy election victory is to ignore the young, focus on the people who actually vote. 
I think the other poster means get back at RedTube. Not that they did anything wrong, but maybe YouTube feels "well, **we** did the whole ___tube thing FIRST." Like a territorial dispute? 
And it doesn't steer you away from the really weird parts of YouTube, either. 
I think it's funny that you have to clarify that some tube sites aren't even pornographic!  
Instead of looking at it like *Reddit* is imploding, realize that most of the defaults are modded by the same group of people.  *That* group is protesting and it should be interesting to see the response. 
I've been here for almost 10 years. (New account obviously) And...it has gone through ebbs and flows the whole time. Initially at the begining when it was open source, then the whole Saydah thing, the banning of image hosting sites and creation of imgur by a fellow redditor, then Digg emptying into reddit....I'm sure there are more but I'm old and forget.   They will find someone to do the same job as her and all will be fine.    Here is my issue....you create a subreddit. It explodes and becomes super popular. You want it to go another way, but NOW reddit can keep it and get rid of you as an a mod of that subreddit. It didn't used to be that way. Before, they would tell us to make a competing subreddit.   But....it will get back to normal. Though, i'm hoping a great deal of people leave ONLY because I liked the old reddit. But i'm old and don't like change. *get off my lawn...*    
I just noticed /r/gaming has gone private too, which is weird. Probably in solidarity? 
As much as we would love going dark(not making a stance, just for the sheer irony of it) /r/Casualconversation will not be going dark.  
Maybe the government is finally doing something about the economy. I mean if there was no Reddit, then thousands of people might become so bored they actually decide to get jobs.  
Small note, /r/circlejerk was private for about a week before this. I'm not 100% on why though, something about summer vacation I think? Or maybe updating the subreddit? Either way, it's not as a result of Victoria being fired. 
Alongside that you have the deletion of several contreversial subs, which seemed to rock the boat. Someone created a new reddit substitute which promptly had the ISP shut things down due to hate speech.   All of a sudden redditors seemed to get a little *angrier*.  I dunno, I remember when I started redditing people were complaining about how post-digg reddit sucked, but **man** this I feel like the content has just gotten a lot more agressive and angsty.  There's also the whole astro-turfing debacle that happened a while back. It's like the nature of the site's been changed. 
Woah I didn't even realise! Get out your popcorn, shit's about to go down. 
This has all happened before and it will happen again. There is constant subreddit drama but you just normally don't see it until it is a popular sub. The storm will calm and everything will be business as usual.  
Shit I didn't even notice that. I wonder why Victoria got fired? As far as I could tell she always did a good job. 
I propose to follow in the way of our friends of 4chan, who when moot sold out, made a great exodus, across the internet to the place known as 8chan, the land of the Based Lord Hotwheels, where they reside to this day. I now say to you, casual conversers, that we make an exodus of our own! To 8ch.net/kind/! 
Wow...it feels like reddit is larger than I ever expected it to be....this strike is something I never expected to see on internet.  Meanwhile, today I got banned from offmychest for being subscribed to another subreddit. WTF?! 
can someone explain to me what the effects are of a subreddit going private? 
I think reddit needs a new CEO, and ultimately a new set of admins. They need to all be on the same page, and more importantly they need to agree upon the future of reddit.  
I'M FREAKING OUT RIGHT NOW!!!! WHAT WILL WE DO WITHOUT OUR GLORIOUS SUBREDDITS?!?! /r/CasualConversation mods, NEVER BETRAY US LIKE THEY DID!!!! 
As a user, all I'm inclined to do is not visit Reddit anymore :/ I get this is "solidarity" or whatever but this move is going to inevitably drive users away  
If being a mod is that miserable, just quit. This just seems like a power trip from the mods to me. 
Does anyone else not really care about the Victoria situation? She had an important job and seemed to be good at what she did but I'm sure she didn't get fired for no reason.  
Internal drama on a large social media website.  I've never seen that happen before. 
/r/law /r/art /r/CrappyDesign and /r/Spain are also Private and submissions to /r/listentothis are restricted. 
As bad as this is, if we really wanted to get Victoria re-employed /r/gonewild should bite the bullet as well  IMAGINE THE CHAOS 
Oh shit.  Is this The End? This feels like The End. Christ, I never thought I'd be here to witness the Reddpocalypse happen as it unfolds O_O 
"As a statment on the treatment of moderators by Reddit administrators, as well as a lack of communication and proper moderation tools, /r/AskReddit has decided to go private for the time being. Please see this post in /r/ideasforaskreddit for more discussion." 
Victoria who helped out with the AMAs was fired without any notice to the mods.   Apparently this is a huge problem because of how integral she is to the organization of these events.    
That group holds vast amounts of influence and is the cause of a substantial amount of traffic on this website. They could very well cause the rest of Reddit to collapse if they keep this up. 
There's like 250~ default mods (800+ if you count all the mods on /r/askscience) It's hard to call them the same group when many of them don't get along...at all. 
Terribly sorry, I'm afraid I represent the new wave of Reddit with our weird clothes and shitty music. :P  I do hope things go back to normal... but from what I understand, especially for /r/IAmA, recovering from this is a pretty herculean task. It seems like they were (to be a little bit unkind) somewhat *too* reliant on a single individual to keep a subreddit of millions running. 
Oh no. How ever will I be able to look at gaming memes and GTA gifs? 
Plz don't leave us ;_;  Seriously though, all this shutting down of subreddits means that its actually *harder* for people to get the relevant information. As a means of protest, I kind of feel like its somewhat self-defeating in some sense, as nobody can see *why* they've shut themselves down. 
May I ask how the mods have arrived at that decision? 
Conspiracy theory right there. I like it.  Wait, I mean, I don't like Reddit going dark. 
Voat was created long before its ISP shut them down, and they got shut down because they use servers based in Germany  
I think /r/History is the alternative to /r/AskHistorians, not the other way round. The latter is tightly moderated, and they don't tolerate shinnenigans there.  Of course, I'm subbed there, so that's just my biases talking... 
Yeah, I love Reddit and all, but my spidey senses detect a mass migration is a-comin'.  I just hope I get the note that we're all leaving when it happens! How can one tell when its happening?? 
I dunno, I've seen shitstorms on Reddit before but they've always been just people complaining about admin actions... This on the other hand? /r/IAmA was one of the key components of the Reddit community as a whole. With that gone, and apparently with the likelihood of it being unable to recover? This feels far more serious than the usual controversies.  
Some rumors say that all reddit employees had to relocate to the Bay Area, and Victoria might not have wanted to move from NYC, which is a possibility. 
I hate to sound discriminatory, but I'd really rather not associate with Channers. xD Redditors at least can have a decent, mature conversation on the odd ocassion :P 
I think that's the whole point. "Make the changes we want, or kiss your user base (and profits) good bye".  Of course, it can backfire - for example, admins can simply fire the current mods, and put newer, more compliant ones. So.. meh. I don't really involve myself with this sort of politics. 
Do we even know why she was fired? Perhaps until we get the details of her termination we should shut up. She could have been fired for something like sexual harassment which would be immediate. 
I'm too young for Reddit to die! I haven't even had my first cakeday yet! 
Repent for the end is neigh! Dogs and cats posting together, MASS HYSTERIA! 
In remaining optimist,   if we survive until the aftermath of the Reddpocalypse we'll at the least be the witness of a massive boost in world productivity 
Lol Reddit has "ended" like 20 times. Don't worry about it. Everyone will forget it in a few days. 
Everyone is asking so many questions, but we can't get answers! 
I don't like this at all, but I'm very impressed at the solidarity of reddit's mods at the same time 
*hug*  I don't want this website to end. Not like this. ;_; 
Okay but mods are just regular old reddit users who get a few controls over a subreddit. You can go make one yourself right now  The admins have zero obligation to involve them with their internal staffing affairs. That would be a nightmare for HR  Like or hate the admins, this situation is really dumb.  
Well, I don't know they are the *cause* of the traffic. Redditors as a potential market are the cause of the traffic. 
Not necessarily. The admins have full control over all subreddits so they can make everything public again and shadowban the mods if they wanted.  
True. But although all animals are equal, some are more equal than others. 
Hahaha, I agree. I usually don't look at that subreddit, but there was a gif with an Oculus and a horror game which I wanted to link to someone 
I know you joke, but I actually used that subreddit quite a lot :\  Its also possible that other default subreddits will follow suit and shut down as well. If too many more major subreddits shut down, there won't be much of a website left for Redditors to visit and people will start looking for alternatives. I sure know I'm thinking about it. 
haha right? It'll probably blow over because there isn't any website to replace this one. I have an idea of a better reddit, but not the skills nor resources to make one. 
The main thing is that the admins know, its more of a mod-admin protest then a user-mod-admin protest. I don't 100% agree with what they are doing, but I completely understand why they are doing it.  
do you have a different suggestion?  I'm not making claims about moderation, I was just listing similar subreddits to the ones that are set to private.  
Well, theres voat, but that's mostly filled with all the people butthurt over the fph scandal. Not exactly the best of the old reddit community.  
Its not just IAmA. There's askreddit, movies, gaming, art, law, crpapy design, cireclejerk. There's just so much all at the same time.  
No single person, anywhere, is irreplaceable. Reddit let an employee go. another will take her place. The world will continue to turn.  
I feel like if that was the case there'd be a smoother transition. It's not like relocation happens over night! :0 
4chans community is as a whole much better than the reddit community. Honestly I've spent a lot of time on 4chan and from your comments it sounds like you haven't even given it a legit shot and are just echoing what you read here on reddit. 
Well, reddit can't "fire" them in that sense, but they can remove them. The problem is, being a mod is a volunteer position, and modding a default sub is not exactly easy. 
Mine is in a few days and I just hit 10,000 comment karma the other day. SAY IT AIN'T SO. 
I've been on the site for a long time now and I don't think much will come out of it, the Admns can (and probably will) force the current moderators out and install new ones, they are a private company and it's up to us to decided our permanence in it.  It sucks, but that's how it goes.  
Once /r/aww goes quiet, its gonna be all over for Reddit. 
Yeah this is a new level of angry,  imo, but I'm pretty sure it will blow over. 
It could backfire a bit... They have no idea why Victoria was fired. She could have been diddling orphans or running a conglomerate of puppy mills for all we know. Think of the puppies! 
Really? They're making a place that thousands of people use hourly their soapbox? And that impresses you?   To me that's just selfish and power hungry, but I guess it's pretty clear right now how different people's perspectives can be. What a silly mess! 
What am I supposed to do while everything's down? Wash the dishes? Walk the dog? This is preposterous! 
but it killed them with the AMAs they had lineuped. victoria was their go to person, and then no one even told the mods that she was fired, and then they had no way to contact the people who were coming to do the AMAs.  
I dunno, I think AMA's are what really set Reddit apart from any other aggregate content sharing site, and they've basically just neutered them so badly that they can't happen efficiently anymore.  It's kind of a big deal 
That's an interesting thought. Are you saying that not only are we the traffic but we're the product? After all what is reddit without redditors? What is a dating site without members? Admins ignoring the growing pains of their userbase isn't just hurting their traffic, but it is hurting their product because they are the same.   That's the core of why I love reddit. It's relatively novel and an interesting study. While I have my personal desire to keep it going, objectively it's fascinating to see all the factors interact and the results that are produced. 
Assuming the admins can just go out and find a bunch of competent people willing to dedicate huge amounts of their leisure time to a for-profit site at no cost.  I don't know the full story, but it seems like Reddit management has been acting pretty fucky lately. I doubt Reddit's going to collapse wholesale, but if this is a nail in the coffin I wouldn't be surprised. 
Love and kindness and casualness for all! MWAHAHAHA! 
voat.co is a clone with some of the improvements that reddit should've had for years. But right now, it's getting the hug of death by all the new comers. 
Yeah, true enough. I'm just waiting for the admins to respond. They *cannot* ignore these shenanigans without an explanation, or this website is done for. 
Oh sorry no, I'm not criticizing your list, I'm just.. I dunno, appreciating the irony. Just think of it as the reddit equivalent of an old man rambling. 
My concern as well. When the starting bulk of your community are that borderline vitriolic, it's never a good sign. I wonder if a mass migration might be able to change that though. 
WHOEVER BOUGHT THIS GUY GOLD FUCK YOU BECAUSE YOU'RE SUPPORTING REDDIT! 
Happy cakeday and congratulations! I hope I can reach that ~~before reddit goes down~~ someday. 
Problem with that theory: krispykrackers is an admin and the top mod of AskReddit. If he really wanted to he could've just turned the sub back on already.  I think that shows that they're talking, at least. 
The admins can definitely undo the privacy settings for the affected subs and/or remove mod privileges. I think it would be a bad move for them and would result in a lot of backlash.   I suspect we'll get more info regarding victoria leaving, they will get someone else in place to deal with the AMAs (they've already said they have a team of people ready for them), and it will all eventually blow over. Just my two cents.  
Also if we actually get Victoria back it will be the greatest accomplishment the Reddit hivemind has ever made and songs will be sung about it for generations. 
I don't think pedos went there, but very toxic angry man children. Still crap. 
I blame SRS. They're a convenient scapegoat to me. 
Hell, maybe she quit on her own. But why haven't they issued a statement? Why haven't they hired a replacement? It's all incredibly sketchy; unacceptably so. 
Then I would say that the admins fucked up by not hiring a replacement before firing their employee, and the fallout is their thing to deal with. That's assuming these AMAs really have been lost, and I kinda doubt that. Maybe they will be now that the mods reacted in this way though. That's kinda bad press, I wouldn't want to be associated with that.  Either way I think this is a terrible way to react. Instead of stepping up their game and pooling their resources, they just pouted and decided to mess things up for tons of people who shouldn't have to be affected by any of this.  
Currently, we *are* the product. But we should be producing the product. 
I'll take 4chan anytime rather than going to 9gag, thanks very much.  With all due honesty, 4chan isn't that all bad though, as long as you don't go to shitty place like /b/. 
I ramble all the time :)  Although I am not an old man...  To me it's funny that the truly well moderated subreddits are just going about their business. I don't know if that's the irony you're seeing but it is the one I'm seeing! 
Have you been to Voat recently? It's not bad at all; the FPH people stay in their little hate speech corner while everyone continues to use the site normally...pretty much exactly like they used to do on Reddit. The FPH subverse doesn't even show up in the front page of /v/all because they decided to remove themselves from it voluntarily.  Only problem is that the admins have been seriously struggling to keep up with the huge numbers of users coming in and destroying their servers. So you get annoying things like a comment thread only being able to load 4-5 comment threads at a time before you have to manually load the rest.   I hope they fix it soon otherwise this app I've been making will have been for nothing :P 
Thank you in advance! You can totally do it. Just talk to everyone about everything most subs and you'll get there. Or like me get lucky a few times with a comment and watch it skyrocket. 
Exactly, Reddit won't go down like Digg did, but more like a party that everyone starts to leave one by one. 
That's a very special skill set, so it would be weird to hire someone the same day... As far as why her employment ended, that's probably private regardless of how it happened. She's not a congresswoman.  
yea thats the main gripe, like /r/books had authors going to do an ama, but the mods had no idea how to contact them since victoria was setting it up, and the admins didnt let them know anything about it. seems like they know its not their place to ask why someone was fired, but the admins didnt think ahead and nothing was set up to take on her workload.  
Ok seriously who are you? I see someone ask you this every once and a while but I guess it was before my time because I have no idea why. 
haha that's fair. You haven't found it just gets funnier as you get older though? That's been my experience, but then I do tend to try not to be directly involved with dramatic situations.   I didn't figure you were in any drama either though, you seem pretty well liked. :) 
I assumed you've never been to either /r/History or /r/AskHistorians; I also made further assumptions (yeah yeah, I know) that you (or anyone not familiar with both subs) think the former is the "main" sub and the latter is the "backup" one. The second fiddle, as it were. In reality, AH is the good stuff; H is just worldnews-lite with a historical slant. 
Just a guy. Wrote some books. Talked some smack. Made some comments. Got stalked and turned into a meme. 
I'd just like to point out that the FPH drama and this all came after the Button ended, meaning that the Button was the only thing keeping this site from imploding. Therefore, I did my part in delaying the collapse of reddit just a little bit longer, while you probably stayed grey and did nothing.  /s 
Until they open up the karma store, it doesn't do much. 
That's so cool to do! One of the best ways to respect loved ones after they pass is to do something at their service related to what they were passionate about. My grandma passed away in November. She always had a huge celebration for July 4th so we decided to shoot fireworks at the end. It was even more special to me because I was never old enough to fire any of them (we stopped when I was still relatively young due to her showing signs of Alzheimer's) and I was the one to light them. It was the first time I had ever lit fireworks with my grandma.  
I worked for a food bank for a few years. Peanut butter is the gold standard in donations. Good protein that goes a long way. Your dad's legacy helped a lot of people. PSA: When your mail carrier does the food drive, don't go to the cabinet and find the canned crap you haven't eaten in four years. Go grab some peanut butter if you want to help. Sorry for your loss, OP. Great job of finding a positive in a negative. 
It's been on Reddit for 6 hours. OP hasn't listed an address for donations.  OK, OP....now, time to add an address for the "Reddit Power"...it's possible this webgroup will send more jars than Corporate Peter Pan.  
I'm so sorry for your loss. He sounds like a beautiful person, and I'm sure he'd be very proud of you for doing this. Maybe it can become an ongoing thing, as a way of honouring his memory? Best wishes.  
My grandpa passes away 5 years ago and he loved Peter Pan peanut butter too! He was buried with a container of it. I'm going to pass along this information, I'm sure a lot of my family would be interested in donating to the cause! 
I have to suck up my pride and go to a food bank tomorrow.  It's been more than a week since I've had a meal.  Hopefully I get something as good as Peter Pan peanut butter.   
Firstly, my condolences to you and your family. That's really awesome :')   I LOVE peter pan peanut butter 
I thought about it, but decided that would seem too forward. 
Yeah I was thinking they should ask for money donations, socks, coats, etc instead of the peanut butter jars. Peanut butter doesn't do much to help homeless individuals. It's a good sentiment though. 
Came to say exactly all of this. OP, your grandpa had really awesome taste! There really is no better peanut butter. I think opening a new jar of it and taking the first scoop might be one of the best feelings ever (yes I love PP PB that much). Sounds like your grandpa's greatness attracts other great people, what a fun legacy to leave behind :) 
Well, on the original post, yes. But, it's been long enough. I don't believe you're here "begging" for more....If, I were you, just add an edit...saying..."A fellow redditor, suggested that I add an address, in case anyone random internet stranger felt the desire to send a jar of Peter Pan peanut butter." 
Hey, guys? Peter Pan Freshly Ground Peanut Butter is a few bucks and ships free with Amazon Prime. 
That is really weird. Maybe your parents don't have much experience with those kinds of relationships? 
I once had a girlfriend who broke up with me because of Tarot cards. She told me that I was soon going to be a father and that we weren't supposed to be together. I ran into her five months later. She apparently got drunk, went home with some dude in a bar and got knocked up. I laughed and told her "Guess the Tarot cards got that baby thing backward then, huh?"  
I've dealt with some odd family members before, but I think this takes the cake.  
When I was 21, I broke up with my boyfriend of 3 months who came from a reasonably well off family.  I still remember my Mom's reaction, "What were you thinking?  You're not getting any younger."  When I was 28 and my husband asked for a divorce my Mom's reaction, "What did you do wrong?"  Now remarried to a man who has a good job.  "I'm so proud of you.  He's the best thing that's ever happened to you."  Seriously?  I would think putting myself through college in my 30s might have rated somewhere.  But, sigh.  Some parents are old fashioned and think that as a woman your only goal in life is to land a husband and make babies. 
It's great that *you*, who boviously is much more down to earth than your parents, gave her some advice; she probably really appreciates it during this time.  ...but, a *tarot card reader...?* That's just *off*. 
And I thought my family was crazy. I stand corrected. 
What. The actual. Fuck. They tryin to give her a complex? Cuz that's how you give someone a complex.  
is your family super religious or something? Is there anything wrong with your sister as in your parents might feel like she will have trouble meeting someone?  On the surface being 22 and single is great and would recommend not getting married until her 30's 
WTF? Does your mom think that she has to necessarily find a perfect match on the first try. I mean, a month isn't much time at all. How does she think your sister is going to find someone she is compatible with if she can't date people? It's just part of dating that if you don't find the right one, you have to break up.  
I feel like we have very similar parents.   My mother likes to make deals with "god" about certain things. For example: She is getting weight loss surgery. No day has been booked yet. She has told me that she told God to delay her surgery by a month if it means I will graduate university this year. She said if I fail, any delays are all my fault.  Reading your story I could totally picture her doing both of those things. She heavily believes in Tarot cards and psychics (One of which said I had autism...I absolutely do not. Like wtf?) and definitely used to cry when any of my past relationships ended, saying how she didn't make enough deals with god to make them work.  Weeeird shit. Hope our camaraderie in this will make you feel a bit better :P 
Ouch, that's very sad to hear. She's just gotta hang in there for now. 23 myself, and never been in a relationship of any type really - better for any of us at this age to just determine what we want to do as far as a career and finish college before really looking for a serious, long-term type of relationship.  I've had so many people tell me stories about all sorts of weird things occurring that effectively ended relationships in all sorts of painful ways that the stress just isn't worth it at this exact point in life. Sounds like she's lucky to have you looking out for her, I'd be downright embarrassed if I had a sibling and this happened to them. 
Jesus. What a screwed up way to deal with a situation like this and, well,any situation, really. How could you tell your own daughter that she needs to change herself in order to please men? And don't get me started on tarot cards...   I hope your sister is doing okay and that she hasn't let your parents' reaction get to her. Breakups fucking suck and to have your own parents try to pin some sort of blame on you can't be easy. 
I see a lot of posts with this construct and this certainly isn't targeted specifically at the OP, but it's driving me nuts.  It was a *month*. That's not a boyfriend. It's a free trial to Netflix. 
Ever feel like you're wiser than your parents?  I feel that way sometimes. 
My ex girlfriend told me she went to a tarot card reader and she described a guy she was getting into, she got with him, she said they'd marry and stuff. Few months later she found 3 of his mobile phones he uses to speak to different girls, one of which he was taking away on holiday. 
Do you live in a small town?   I moved to a small town from a larger city and it's amazing how important marriage seems to be. If you're not married by the time you're 22, you're like an old maid. It's strange.  
If your sister is as loony as your parents, that's probably what men don't like about her. 
Best thing I've read all day!  But really, I'm sorry for her. It's a good thing she has you to balance out the weirdness. 
Your parents are very clearly mentally fucked up.  Tarot card readings? Opinions like that? She's 22. How do people like that have children.  You're lucky you're sane.  Too easy to end up like them.   
It's nice that you've got your feet on the ground and don't take all that crap. I really don't know how you could deal with your parent's, being they so superstitious, but what's important is that you make your sister know that it's not her fault (I mean, his boyfriend might have left her because of something he did not like about her, that completely possible,but whatever the case was, **fault** is almost never the right word to use) and that you're by her side. The best of luck for you. 
Why the hell did your father take her to a TAROT card reader? 
Was this your sister's very first boyfriend, or something? And have they reacted as equally crazy at your relationships? 
I am a Tarot reader and I know many others. Never in my life have I met a Tarot reader who detects "spells." That's..... That's not how the cards work. Sorry your sister had to hear that nonsense.  
Struck me as a desperate need for grandchildren scenario. Is it possible that everyone got convinced that this guy was the guy who'd fill the gaping hole in their life? 
What the actual fuck.... I feel like your dad cant be serious and is just playing into her craziness  
This whole situation seems strange. It reminds me of one story I read on the internet the other day that turned out to be completely made up. 
Wow. Drama much? How did your sister take your human advice? 
So, from reading the rest of the comments, you're apparently the older sibling. Did they ever go fucking bananas over you, too, and give you terrible advice, or is this a new development in a long series of getting weirder? 
How does she feel about all this? A little bummed out? Or is she totally heartbroken? Because a month isn't very long at all...  Your parents are nucking futs though... 
Serious issues aside, your family sounds legitimately fun. Are you living in a sitcom? Dear God, hahaha. 
I thought tarot card readers usually gave more general advice or fortunes did not know they were in the business of diagnosing spells. 
wow that's pretty intense for just that. Maybe it was the first one and they're afraid because they don't think she's attractive enough? 
That makes me think of when my did found i was making a 70 in my high school spanish class. I had been making As and Bs in all other classes but he flips out saying im an idiot and that im going to spend the rest of my life digging ditches.  Now that I'm making high grades in my high school physics and algebra 2 and was allowed to take advanced pre-cal next year, I feel like I should be laughing in his face right now 
No experience is more like it. A Tarot card reader is wayy over the top.  
Right? I meant what kind of TAROT reader just says bad stuff like that.  
When I tell people my family is crazy everyone tells me "ahah, yeah, we all have crazy families".    
Yes, that's sad. I'm sorry your mom gave you a hard time. And congratulations on putting yourself trough college. I'm 29 and I quit college in my last year, years ago.  
Times like this I thank god for my mom who didn't always make the wisest choices in life.  By the time I was out in the world she could objectively tell me "Wait as long as you need to to get married and/or have kids.  If neither of those things interests you, that's awesome too." 
Oh dear lord, did you do one of those studies where you work and then study in the evening? I knew of some guys at my college who did that (sure there were women too, just not in my IT study), thinking about it now, it must be hell. 
Good grief. What ethnicity are you, just out of curiosity? 
While I don't want to make light of your college, as a married male if I had to choose between having my marriage disappear and having my college degree disappear I would choose to keep my marriage. 
Yeah, it really pissed me off too, being a total skeptic. 
Believe me, they've already given us both plenty of complexes. 
I agree. Although dude was posting their pictures on FB talking about how she was the love of his life.   
No, no, my sister is blonde, skinny and cute.   Her only problem is her shitty family.  Not super religious. My mother believes in something undefined while my dad is into all that pagan, esoteric stuff. 
Yeah. Well, in Portugal people in general take things a bit more serious. We don't really have the concept of "dating" here.  
Oh, it does. Thank you. My mom told me just yesterday that God basically gave her money to buy cigarettes, so... 
Well, in our family we are used to the weirdness. She just kind of conforms to it, while I get pissed off all the time. 
I have felt that way since age 8 or 9.  My mother used to be smart.  Then she started watching FoxNews.   
She isn't, actually. She has actually become pretty mature in recent years.  
Too be honest, I thought her boyfriend was an asshole from the beggining.    
I don't know. He believes that kind of stuff. Always worried about spells and demons and shit. 
Is that right? Because everytime I hear a Tarot story around here (Portugal) there's always related to someone putting a spell on you. 
I don't think so. I think they just don't know how to deal with her being sad about it.  
Oh man, sure. They gave me terrible advice all the time. I had insomnia since I was little and I'd be scared of sounds and shit. They'd tell me it was demons out to get me because we had too many religious books in the house (we were Jehova Witnesses at the time). 
She's bummed out about the guy because she liked him. But it will pass. It's normal! That's the thing. It's normal life.  
Yeah, well. They got married around her age. Divorced 20 years later. My father re-married almost immediately. My mother never had anyone else.   It's still lack of common sense.  
The kind that wants you to come back for advice on how to improve. Occasionally it's the kind who will hold your cursed money for you too. 
They probably don't want to say, "Well, that's undoubtedly weirdest reaction I've ever heard of..." 
I have a meth addict uncle who was arrested a few times for drugs and identity theft, a mentally insane (in a mental hospital, fun stories from that one), a should-be-in-mental-hospital uncle (kinda thinks he's batman, and loves conspiracies), an uncle who holds a grudge for a harmless joke for going on 15 years (will not talk to my dad), dead aunt who was just odd (one of the more normal ones), and another aunt who I don't know because she left her crazy family to move to Florida! (Ha!). My dad is as close to normal as he can be for growing up through that shit, though he himself is borderline alcoholic now that all the kids are out of the house for 5 years (was a phenomenal father growing up). Those are the quick descriptions, there is too much to type on mobile.   When I tell people they are messed up, I can tell they truly don't understand. Where your family is crazy, my dad's is fucked up.  
My mother once sat at the dinner table at christmas telling everyone, via her hand sock puppet, that she was helping the Christmas spirit by walking through the grocery store and singing carols. She explained that she did this with her sock puppet friend and her puppet was telling everyone they should "BE HAPPY BECAUSE IT'S CHRISTMAS!!!".  She's "weird". She got on meds for awhile but won't stay on them. 
Thanks!  Why'd you quit?  Have you ever thought of going back?  I took one semester in 1994 and then didn't go back until 2002 and they let me keep the credits from before. 
My parents got married at 19/20.  My mother seems to believe that you do whatever your husband tells you to and that your job is to be wife.  Which is pretty odd since her mother worked (as a nurse in the Red Cross).  Also, my parents aren't typically conservative or religious or anything.  My father has never told her to obey him or anything.  It's just the way she is. 
There is nothing to be skeptical about... it's complete baloney.  
that is so weird then and seems like they do suck. I am sorry that they are giving her such a hard time. you are a good brother. Tell her she has nothing to worry about and she should travel and live her own life on her own terms and no one needs to live up to someone else's expectations especially their parents.  
What the fuck? Eu sou de portugal, como assim nao temos o conceito de "dating" ? So se tiveres a falar de levar a um restaurante e se nao pegar nao pegou e ta a andar, realmente nao temos isso, mas temos dating claro! Boa sorte com os teus pais!! 
As a fellow self-confessed weirdo, I notice that you have mentioned several times that you have not come through their parenting process unscathed. Anything you need to get off your chest?   By the way, I'm so glad your sister has you as a rational, sane, and supportive sibling. They can make a huge difference in life.  
My mom got sucked into conservationism as well.  She went from life long old south democrat (Bill Clinton supporter) to facebook spamming republican.  Ewe. 
If your sister is still living at home she should leave home.  
Woah, Jehovah's Witness to Paganism?    Oddly enough, my brother-in-law did the same transition.   
All they needed to do was pre-arrange the reader to give her good advice and slip her an extra $20. 
So it's been almost a day - I'm really curious - how are you all managing? Did she appreciate your input? I wish the best for you guys, man. 
Oh, no, I haven't told them this particular story.  The ones who have met my family in person instantly understand what I mean. 
I'm sorry. It sucks to have a family like that, it's understandable that your father was left with some stuff to overcome. 
I was going trough a rough path in my life. I had great grades but stopped going to classes. Then my scholarship ended and I had no money to stay enrolled. 
Your grandmother sounds awesome :-)  Yeah, some women seem to really enjoy being subservient!  And that's great, if you marry the right guy, I guess.  I've found that 8 years in I kind of like playing the dutiful wife part, having dinner ready when he gets home, etc.  But that's only because it's my idea and he still seems really surprised and grateful EVERY SINGLE DAY.  If he ever ordered me to have dinner ready I'd tell him to go fuck himself :)  (Also, for what it's worth, I got married at 27). 
In this context, yes, it is complete baloney. I think using it as a way to think about and analyze what is going on with your life is ok... you project your actual life onto what you see in the cards. As long as you don't take it as an actual predictor of your future and start making life decisions based on some cockamamie prediction you saw there, believing it's some divine intervention, it's probably ok. I have a deck and used to do it, and I think it helped give me a little different perspective... to look at all the players in my life, and sort of analyze situations. Never did I take it as truth or anything. You're the one with the brain. The cards are just there. 
My siblings and I were sitting together shooting the shit one day and I happened to mention that our mother told me I was "running away from my problems" when I moved in with the woman who would become my wife. It came out that she told us all that the people we ended up marrying were a bad idea early on.  Incidentally, she's be on her third marriage now if it wouldn't cut into her alimony.  
Yes, thanks. I try my best :) Seems like you would be a good sibling/parent as well. 
She really should. In Portugal it's hard for people her age to do so, though.  
Yes there is, it's just that common sense isn't that common. 
My roommate and I talked about it and a giraffe/walrus in a fight with a mantis shrimp is what we're requesting. You can likely change the first animal to one you like better, but the mantis shrimp is important(and the coolest thing ever) 
Oh. I forgot the homeless uncle with a gambling problem who expected my dad to pay for everything for him.   On the plus side my mom's side is incredible! I (naturally) saw them more anyway. I did see my dad's side a little bit growing up, but it got harder as we grew as they were all being arrested or put into hospitals. The worst part is I feel bad for my father, and definitely appreciate everything he was for us and how he managed to stay positive for so long.  
Look into how much Pell Grant you have left. Might be able to finish some courses at a community college, then finish elsewhere. 
Yeah, I use it to imagine possibilities that I might not have considered. It's also a very interesting way to create motivations for characters because the cards represent a plethora of human emotion and thought. 
Dang, what wOuld you do? Just tell them some nonsense?  Oh oh, did anybody ever* "call you out" for a bullshit reading?  
isn't the definition of common sense that it's, well, common? If it's uncommon then it doesn't really count anymore as "common". 
Regular police will be fine.  They can be charged with fraud. 
If OP went to college right after high school those credits will have expired.  
I don't think a fortune teller can be charged with fraud. 
YAY! THANK YOUUU!  [Checks pet cats for cyborg tech]   ^^^I ^^^am ^^^a ^^^she ^^^but ^^^I'm ^^^an ^^^honorary ^^^dude... 
You've got some skill son.   Whats up with the witch standing in front though?  
I try to only reuse my own. I'm not very good at it, though. Probably just as well I didn't stay in stand-up. 
That's an ignorant statement. He has a very beautiful singing voice. You should look up his npr concert. 
Deductive, logical reasoning doesn't cut it for a description?  
It's slippery slope.  Several have been charged in the past, the most famous probably being Rose Marks. 
I was going for a road sweeper shaking its broom at the ploopy eagle. But i know not what north korean roadsweepers looked like, and the stick figure was too small. @_@   Son i am not, daughter i am.  
Do you know what the criteria is? - just curious.  Because a "real" tarot card reading has no guarantee of being a positive one. You can make it sound positive - which many real tarot card readers do by hiding the meaning behind abstract concepts - but it is indeed possible to get a tarot card reading that says you're doomed, you're going to have financial trouble for the rest of your life, your love life has gone down the drain, and in the future, you'll be "looking for answers in the wrong places" (that was a mixture of different types of reading techniques, but you get the point).  If they go by the book, then you got what you paid for, and then it's not fraud, right? 
XD that's quite clever, wish I could upvote you more!  You should make a full tarot set like that! I'd pay 15$ for that for sure! 
Wait, you thought for the _longest time_ you wouldn't be able to move on, and now it's been 3 weeks?  I'd say you're moving on at a record pace.  
First of all, great attitude, keep it up.  Second of all-- it was not random that this girl did not accept. Even if she was interested in you, she can't or shouldn't. She knows your ex, dude. Which means she knows you dated this girl for 6 years. 6 years is a pretty long time compared to 3 weeks. Therefore, this girl you asked out sees you as being on the rebound, which is correct.  You've only been single like 20 days in the last 6 years, take some time to do you and don't ask anyone out for a while. Certainly not someone who knows your ex. 
I'm in such a similar position to you.  I recently was dumped from a 6 year relationship and about 3 weeks after I went on an OkCupid date.    It honestly feels weird and I'm acting like I've moved on more than I actually have. 
Props on to you man, you had the courage to ask a girl out and weren't even slowed down by it. I admire your optimism!   As for me, I'll be taking my driving license soon and I'm nervous as hell since this is my first time. Just don't want to screw up is all, y'know?   
What's the aftermath looking like? I always get worried about asking people out because I fear that it will just ruin my friendship with that person if they say no. 
Hey dude, don't feel rushed to get into a new relationship just because your ex has. My ex and I broke up a while back and she started seeing someone new in about a month. At first I thought I should get back into dating since she moved on,  but realized that I needed to learn how to make myself happy before finding someone else to do it for me. You may not feel the same way, but there's definitely no rush to get into anything new. Take your time if you need to 
Maybe try to process the feelings and get to know yourself a bit. You've changed a lot in six years! Perhaps taking time for you would be best. 
You did wonderful! A lot of women prefer guys who have the courage to ask someone out in person. If a guy did that I'd give him a chance just based on that. I am tired of tinder. Keep at it! 
I don't know why it ended it or who ended it, but if she moved on so fast, maybe it's because she already had feelings for this other dude so she was able to just wrap herself in this after. Its called a "backup." It doesn't mean she necessarily wanted to leave you for him, but she strung him along just in case. A lot of people seem to do this.  It was about half a year for me to "move on" from a two year relationship (closer to 2.5/3 years because we didnt make it official right away). It took a little longer than that to actually feel okay with it and like I didnt really want to get back together.  As for him, it's been almost a decade. I know if I left my SO and I went to him, he would pick me up in a heartbeat. But I wouldn't go to him even if I were single.  Tl;dr some people have backup people so that's why they move on so quickly. Also people move on at different rates. 
Good on you OP, I was with my girlfriend for 3 years and she turned around one day and said she didn't love me anymore. You gotta admit to yourself that it's gonna suck but it's for the better. Seems sleezy but the day after I messaged and old friend and we caught up. You gotta do what you gotta do, can't let it beat you. Good on you aswell keep going man you'll get there ! 
Not to mention the girl knew his ex so she was probably her friend he tried asking out. Hmmmm 
Some of us have been at it for 3 years now, not finding the courage to move on. Congratulations OP. 
My ex moved on even sooner - I guess that's made the 3 weeks feel even longer. I just had to go out there and prove to myself I could start trying to move on too! 
Yeah, makes sense. I don't reckon it was the smartest thing I did - it certainly was a rebound, but I figured I'm never going to see her again and just asked.   It is me time now - getting back to working out, playing Zelda on my Switch, and work! 
I was brutally dumped after just two years and started dating again about 6 weeks after. Looking back, it was a huge mistake. I was dating to fix the way I was feeling and anyone/everyone I went out with had no chance. Honestly it took me about a year before I felt like  I wasn't just fucking up potential relationships left and right (my dad died right before I was dumped too so it took a little longer for me than for some people, I think). It's been two years and I feel completely moved on now.    I think if you want to date, definitely date, but I wouldn't expect to find a working relationship right away. I don't know a lot of people that would date someone so freshly single, so if you're experiencing some of that be sure to know that it's not you, it's the circumstance!    In better news, a little over a year after being dumped I found the actual most amazing person. So, here's hoping he works out better than the last one :) 
Thanks man! And I'm sure you'll do fine - no first time is easy, but you've got this.  I'm actually pretty terrible at driving - I live in a country with great public transport and never really had to learn when I was younger, but as a 22 year old who is a bad driver, I regret not working on it sooner.  
What helped me stay confident when taking my road test was remembering how many bad drivers are on the road.  They all passed somehow, so i can too.  You got this. 
I'm still learning to drive at the moment and I've had about 8 or so lessons but right now it feels like I'm getting worse at it. How many lessons did you have in total?? 
One tip i can give - get talking to the assessor. Making small talk with them puts you both at ease, I found I was a lot calmer once we got chatting. Just don't get distracted too much! Good luck! 
I'm likely never to meet her again - she lives in Paris and I live a couple of hours away. I had asked her if I could ask her on a date when I'm in Paris next week for work.  But we did spend the rest of the evening hanging out and it wasn't terribly awkward - so not the best, but not the worst. 
It sometimes feels like an ego thing - like should I move on because she has too? I don't even know if I want to date now, but I want to entertain the idea that I still can date. 
Thanks - that's awesome to know! I figured I won't get to see the girl again and if I was going to try some time, I might as well now. It was only afterwards I felt like I'm getting over my old relationship.  
Not a friend, but an acquaintance - but you're right, in hindsight, it probably wasn't the best person to ask. 
It's been almost 2 years for me but at this point I think I'm just too lazy 
While I agree with you, I still applaud OP for the quick turnaround. I wish it was that easy. 
They come to you, if they are interested.  If a woman starts appearing in your space...it is time to roar again, Big Guy! 
I don't want to paint with too broad a brush, but that's been my experience with girls often - they move on super quick. My guess is that it's just seeking comfort in loneliness, and it's easier for girls to score a date than a guy. But I can't say anything about your ex - I'm just guessing based on my experience.  I always find it pretty upsetting to see a former partner move on so fast - has it been hard for you? 
I think I tried dating just to take my mind off my ex, and it was helful during a particularly rough weekend. This was a helpful reply because I might go on a second date with this girl, but I really have no intention of doing anything romantic or sexual in the future.  I just want to spend some time with a new person and I feel like an asshole for not telling her my situation. 
Our countries might be different in terms of the process of taking a license, but for me this is my third lesson.  The first one was sort of like a conference you have to sit through and listen on the basics and road safety. Once done with that, the second step is to take a test where you have to answer some questions. I failed this one a lot and had only passed it recently which was *so satisfying*. And now here I am on my third, holding the wheel for the first time! 
I don't really loathe on myself too often so no worries about that, just hoping that I'll get a patient and nice instructor! On a side note wow, Netherlands seems very friendly with license newcomers since they'll still give them a license even if they've failed a lot. I always did like the methods that most European countries would do! 
Just that, the worse that'll happen us she says no. And I tell myself that every day, but to no avail.  
Bro... you just got out of a relationship that took up six years of your life. Wait a while before you go back into one. Maybe ask why you're seeking to be in a relationship so much and try being happy with yourself. 
Almost 2 years for me as well man. Still finding it tough. But main thing for me now is to focus on myself and career..   Sadly have 0% care for myself. No idea where to start. Gyms are a little too... Scary?   But yeah, relationships suck yo. 
I would say give it a year. The biggest mistake I ever made in my life was getting into relationships too soon. I really screwed up with some nice people and I deserved to have time alone to grow as a person.  It's hard being alone after having someone but you will be a better person if you wait. 
Yeah, the idea of her with someone else hasn't been great. I know she has been single and can do what she wants, but man, it isn't fun... 
I'm not sure if you're just going along with it or if I have confused you.  The thing about the Netherlands is a joke. Of course you won't get a license without passing the test - all license plates in the Netherlands are yellow.  I edited my previous post a bit to hopefully make it more obvious that I'm joking... 
Set a date and do it. Ask her Friday. That way you have time to plan out what you'll say, where you'll invite her to, etc. and worse case scenario she says no, but you won't wonder if you should have. How will you feel if someone else asks her out? You'll wished you asked then.  
I, too, do not like gyms. Do you have those outdoor exercise areas in your community? Its typically some benches/balance beams, pull-up bars and such.   I like to use those because they're usually not full of staring people and bonus, they're outside in the nice fresh air.   Just my two cents! 
A year? Gtfo it and move on. No one has time for that 
I was in the exact same shoes a year and a half ago man. After 6 years my ex moved on very quickly to the next few guys. Knowing that tore me up, but man I know everyone says this to you and I know you're tired of hearing it, but it gets better. I go full days without even thinking about her even a little. You're gonna do great buddy.  
I didn't check the link...so yeah I thought you were serious. Either way, that was dumb of me :v 
That's true. I'm actually hangin at work now, and she is here closing. Should I just go up and ask her out for drinks or somethun? I don't think she likes alcohol too much, so maybe ask her out for coffee or tea at our local coffee shop?  
It's fantastic to see another Follower of the Iron Path speaking the Truth to potential Believers.  May Brodin bless your gains. 
It's not that we don't care, it because we're usually checking ourselves in the mirror and occasionally checking out the hot girl.   /r/bodyweighfitness is also a good place to look, specially if you don't wanna hit the gym right away.  
In your opinion, is it worth it at all to start out with an hour (or so) once a week?  My boyfriend and I both need to get in better cardiovascular health, but once a week on the weekends is when we can go together. Obviously going more than that is key, but is it even worth bothering with the once a week while we try to get into the swing of it? 
Yeah jeez how long do people think life is? We're lucky if we get 30,000 days on this earth.  If you're ready to date other people, do it. If not, don't. It doesn't matter if it's been 10 months or 10 minutes. 
Maybe "moving on" is being ok being single, anyway. 
I wished I seen this sooner. Did you ask? How'd it go? If not, wait until the shift is over so if it doesn't go well you don't still have an awkward interaction the rest of the night.  
Thank you, brother/sister. I have been cursed by Broki and old age. Broki has cursed upon me injury that leaves me away from the Iron Temple for almost 3 fortnight.  Soon, with the All Spotters blessing, I will be back praying in the most Holy of 5x5 devotions.   As it was written, so shall it happen for the All Spotter does not rack weights we cannot lift.  Wheymen. 
That's why you don't depend on motivation because that's only doing things when you 'feel' like it , and you're not always going to wake up everyday and be magically motivated, the key is to have discipline, that means doing things because you have to and it's a part of your life, if you only depend on motivation you ain't ever going to be consistent  
Nah yer good haha. And I didn't ask her out, but she didn't have any tables so she sat with me and we chatted for a good half hour. So I found out more about her, and now I'm a bit more confident in asking next time. :) 
The only reason women are thought to talk more than men, is because we kept them quiet for most of our developed history. Women can't talk enough, mate, to make up for that. 
Next time that happens get her to laughing and show her you're fun to be around. When she's relaxed, ask her, but frame it as "I'm going whether you go or not" but don't use those words. haha That way it doesn't feel like your evening plans are contingent on her. "I'm going to X Saturday night. Would you like to come with me?" She'll get the implication and it won't be awkward. You got this.  
Talkings overrated. Men communicate in a series of head nods and grunts and we can perfectly understand each other 
When a joke get a political response.  Not saying you're wrong (I think you're right)  Just, chill man, not everything have to be about something 
I didn't even think of that. Thanks for all the advice :) 
WOW that's amazing!!! I love Dada Life, and you must be pretty badass if you are opening for them!!! 
That's awesome pal! I'm genuinely happy for you. Out of curiosity, what was your house like growing up? Were you allowed to pursue music or did you have to kind of become a rebel in order to do what you loved? 
My advice for you:  1. Don't play any Dada Life tracks  2. Don't play any peak time bangers  3. Keep the BPM/ tempo under what you expect them to play  4. Do play your favorite more obscure tracks (ie. nothing from the Beatport top 100)  5. Have fun! 
Yeah suck it, grandma!  But really, congrats! Sounds like a great opportunity for you. :D 
I went through a stage when I became really into music, and began learning terms, styles, and all the basic stuff I would need to DJ. I even went as far as planning out the gear I would need to buy, and how it would help me further that dream.  Unfortunately that idea never panned out, but it did leave me with a bunch of knowledge, a new appreciation for music and high quality audio, and a killer set of cans. Props to you for sticking with it man, have fun!  
Congrats man. I recently discovered Dada Life because they did some work for League Of Legends recently. They aren't bad! 
Congrats man! I know exactly how you feel. My grandpa once called me "the worst actor he had ever seen in his life", then I was cast in a commercial in my first audition after I moved to New York city.  
Wow thats so awesome!!! Grats! I had a small passion for DJing for a good 5 years or so but I kinda just gave up on it and found other thing. Its hella expensive but awesome if you can do it right. And clearly youre doing something correct because of opening for Dada Life. Again grats and all the luck with your prospects in the future. 
I've never tried DJ but I can imagine how difficult it would be to capture the mood. I get kinda pissy when people think that all DJ do is press play and sit easy for 3 hours.  But more importantly, would you rather chainsaws for arms or springs for legs? 
Dude. Cherish that moment. Not because your grandma laughed at you face but because your doing something that (i guess) not a lot people thought you could do. But most importantly, you're living your childhood dream. I wish you the best of luck. I don't know if it's because I'm drunk or whatever but I'm incredibly jealous of you for being able to live your dreams and not dream your life.  
So you were 12 three years ago? Didn't know it was so easy to break into the DJ industry at a young age 
That laugh is why you became a DJ. Many moments of mockery resulted in greatness.  
I'm very fucking proud of you dude, preforming my music is my dream. We get to see Dada Life with their compound tour in a few weeks here in Salt Lake. I love Dada Life.  Will you do me a favor? Will you tell me what exactly they are brining to the Dada Land Compound? I can't contain my excitement. 
This is great!!  Do you have any advice for new DJs? ^^How ^^do ^^I ^^get ^^gigs ^^;_; 
I thought this was an AMA for a minute.  Awesome good for you to prove  them all wrong.  
Well, I've never heard of Dada Life, but I've heard of you, just now. So that's a win, right?      Basically, it should be:   *"When I was 12, I wanted to be a policeman, like every other kid, but tomorrow night, we're playing after the DeanTheDJ! Woohoo!"* - Dada Life 
I still would laugh im your face if you tell me that that is something meaningful  
hahah congratz, man that's awesome!! Play French Jeans as a throwback  
Kudos to you for not accepting another's belief about the possibility for yourself. It can be difficult when it is someone you respect.  
My parents and brother wouldn't agree (mainly because I'm a guy) and didn't think I would succeed at being at makeup artist, but I did 2 photoshoots in the last 7 days and I feel great getting into it. I have also gotten their support. :) Many of my makeup artist friends say im very talented and that I don't even have to finish a makeup artist school. (I'm 18 atm if that matters.) 
Im really happy for you and all, but do you have a Soundcloud so we can hear some of your work? :) 
hahahaha I followed your soundcloud and apparently one of your three comments is on my teaser. Small world!    Good luck! 
That's super exciting! Put in effort to build a relationship with these promotors so you can get booked again and keep it going :D 
Congratulations on the gig! I have always wanted to get into EDM creation, and have just had no idea where to begin. Do you have any recommendations for any software that you may use? Thanks. 
How did you get started as a DJ? I have turnables but I suck on them, so any advice would help :( 
kick ass and take names dude, hope it all goes well, this might be the one thing your DJ'ing career needs to take off (: 
I think it's really amazing and exciting that you pursued that dream from your childhood. Hope you're loving every minute. Happy for you.   
Congratulations. If you can't tell from my username, I too once dreamed of becoming a DJ. I now dream of becoming a writer.  BTW, what equipment are you using? I may have set DJing to the side, but I'm always interested in tech! 
Wow, congrats dude! That is so, so cool! I'm really inspired actually. I am used to the whole "getting laughed at" thing, but I'll try not to let it get me down so much. Thanks a lot.  -Squirbos 
Dude, fuck yeah! You're living your dream and that is awesome. Good luck tomorrow night, bud.  
For some reason, someone is mass-downvoting everyone in the thread.  Compensating now. 
CONGRATS!!! Dada Life is one of my absolute favorites for years. That should be a blast!!! 
Damn, I just got done with a song by them. Congrats! 
Right on man... I miss my DJing days...of course I never played a stage that big. 
I'd love to learn to DJ some day, especially with vinyl, but I'm too scared to talk to my parents about it... especially seeing as half decent turntables cost so much and I doubt it'd ever take me anywhere. Congrats :) 
You wanted to stand behind a table and fist bump with one hand over your ear?  I could see why they laughed at you.  
lol you should get actual friends to celebrate with you instead of bragging to the internet 
Haha I love them too! I'm most likely gonna get to meet them, and I'm so excited for it! I'm not that great, and it's my first time playing in front of such a big crowd, so I hope I don't mess up ! :p 
No, not one bit! My family was generally very supportive of my dreams, it's just that financial problems held me back more than anything. Before my grandfather passed, he always told me that as long as I'm doing good in classes and behaving in school, he'd buy me whatever I wanted. I've never taken advantage of it, but it was always nice to know that even though we were a middle class family, he'd look out for me regardless. 
The skill of an opener. Bot a dj,, but I've read about this sort of thing. From what I hear some acts will even put in your contract details like this, such as max bpm you can play. 
It'a never too late to chase your dreams, just call it a hobby and roll with it! And thank you haha , im so excited for tonight ! 
Yea, they're great ! What work did they do for LoL? 
Thank you man! The first thing I can tell you is to just get your name out there! Make a few different 30 minute mixes, different genres, songs, etc. Then email a bunch of clubs, promoters, facebook pages for events, and ask if theyre looking for opening DJs. Don't send them that mix unless they ask, and personalize your email so it doesn't sound robotic and stuff. Most importantly though, have fun with it! 
Haha seriously ! I'm trying to reply to all of the comments but this hit the front page on my reddit at least, and I can't believe it haha 
You went to their Dada Land Brooklyn Compound show? That's fucking awesome! How was it? 
Hahahaha! That comment had me rolling in laughter for a good few minutes. I love that man, that's hilarious :p   Guess it's DeanTheDJ - 1 / Dada Life - 0 for now, huh? Haha 
That's awesome! I think you should just do you regardless of what your parents say. Mind sharing some of your work? :) 
No way! Haha which one man? :p  Edit : Wow, I'm dumb. Haha I loved that preview man! I used to listen to it on repeat for a few days after it came out, trying to picture how the whole song would go. Seriously dude, that's some good stuff !  
You're doing god's work, son.  Compensating your work now. 
I'm 16 :) And yea, film is fucking awesome! Congrats on proving them wrong :)  This gig isnt the biggest feat a new dj could make, and this doesnt mean Ill turn into a world class DJ, but it's at least a step in the right direction :p 
It's never too late to try again! Get yourself out there, grab life by the balls, and say "HEY, FUCKFACE, IM YOUR UMF 2016 HEADLINER." 
Never be scared to do it! Go to your local music shop and look around. Turntables don't cost that much. I use controllers, but a decent pair of turntables plus a mixer will set you back maybe $300 / $400. Look into it, keep looking, keep looking, and keep looking ! Look for used equipment, old donation equipment, etc. Don't get discouraged from trying out something you know you'd love because of money issues, man! 
Music.  Lots of it.  Haha, all jokes aside, if you're new to that term, it basically means I spin a bunch of music in random genres, with the set starting off very mellow and chilled out, and by the end of the set, the music is very energetic and blood-pumping, as to get the crowd excited for the headliner. I'll be playing progressive house, big room, future bass, deep house, future house :) 
Well, I had actual friends celebrate with me when we were all at the party, but I decided telling the internet would be cool too. But hey, fuck me right? 
When I played big gigs, my teacher (I played piano in front of 100-200 people) at the time told me, 'if you ever mess up, just keep going. If you freeze, start from where you know. Only you will know you messed up.'   Saved me numerous times, I got embarrassed the first time cause I definitely knew my teacher knew but I actually won that competition, and nobody BUT my teacher knew I messed up, and it was a pretty big mess up lol. I got lost in a song and started from the beginning of the song.  But you'll do well, add contingency. If power fails, there's really nothing you can do about that lol  
I'm so jealous you get to meet them and I'm sure you will do great! Post and update afterwards and let us know how it went :) 
That's awesome! I always wished I could've pursued a career in documentary film making but felt my parents invested waaaaaay too much in private education to jeopardize it in such a niche field. Maybe I'll get to pursue it one day! 
I didn't give up the dream entirety, I just found something I was more interested in. I'll always be ready to run sound or play or a few sets, it is just no longer my main goal :)  
The latest ultimate skin, DJ Sona, has 3 soundtracks, and each track is a collaboration of 2 electronic artists/groups. They worked on one of them 
Pacha, nice one! Congratulations :) U18 sounds fun too haha :D Anyway, enjoy your evening! 
Thanks man!  But why shouldn't I send them that mix unless they ask? I'd think they'd like some kind of reference on how good you are. 
Well your seem to be doing a good job,  wasn't expecting a reply!  :) 
Their set was epic, but the whole venue was a bit to cramped for my liking  
Thank you for the response! :D You can check my submitted stuff on my page. Sadly I still didn't get the pics from the shoot yet. :( 
Oh ok wow, that looks super complicated. I've dabbled a little in Pro Tools but still find it a little difficult, so +1 to you bro 
Was it hard making a name for yourself? If you dont mind me asking 
Keep it up! The beginning is always a humbling experience. 
I hear ya bro...and I would if it was still what I wanted I  life.   I had my fun and it was a GREAT ride... Congrats on your gig. 
This really made me smile, so thanks. :)  You're a good OP. I bet you'll smash the gig tomorrow! 
Are you spinning records, or pushing buttons to play samples and such? I'm not as familiar as I should be with this stuff. 
Hm what does the genres "mean" ie what would be classified as that? (Totally out of the loop lol) 
Haha yeah sure you did. That's always the first thing I do after celebrating with friends, I go and tell a bunch of anonymous strangers lol 
Yea, insecurities are a bitch. I've got to have all the confidence and all the balls in the world to get on that stage, and it's gonna be hard but i'm gonna fucking do it and rock that stage, and if I trainwreck then so be it, ahaha 
Haha I like that, I heard that somewhere too (maybe your teacher first started that line and it circulated worldwide haha), but it's a little different DJing, because if I mess up, people are gonna know, because the music's gonna be cut, or everything's gonna sound weird. If I trainwreck and it's noticeable, I'll play some spongebob squarepants theme music while I'm getting back on track to keep the crowd at ease :p 
Ahh! Film is one of my huge interests too! I've been thinking about pursuing film as a major. Honestly, just get a small camera, and go outside and shoot some cool stuff! I live in NYC and I've always dreamed of making a documentary about Manhattan and all the unique faces and the homeless people that are almost always more caring than the rich guys on wall street, and the awesome musicians you meet in the subway, and the really cool people you meet in small book shops in Midtown, and all the dogsitters in central park, and everything else that makes NYC such an awesome city.  Hopefully I'll be doing it sometime this summer and I'm so excited for it! 
Yea man, these kids definitely don't know what kind of a treat they're in for tomorrow with Dada Life. 
Ah I see :p  What do you now? Is it related to music, or something completely unrelated? 
Ahhh! You can't be so cool yet not expect gold! Dude haha, you can just wave your gold around and be cooler than everyone for a month, isn't that the reddit dream? I can honestly say that I've got (almost) everything I want in regards to music ; a working computer, some speakers, and a kickass set of ears, haha. My dream is to become a somewhat known artist, and then do loads of collaborations with much smaller artists that deserve fame and credit for their work, but don't get it, and I definitely won't be forgetting about you guys when I have 16 more followers on instagram tomorrow night than I do now :p 
Thank you! Just got back from the venue, will post an update tomorrow, but unfortunately besides from a quick handshake, I didn't get to speak to Dada Life. Their security was very tight, as they're world class DJs. Still alright though, because they put on a hell of a show! 
No problem! I tried to respond to everyone that commented on the thread / replied to a comment of mine, since they're taking the time out to comment on my thread supporting me / giving me tips / etc.   Your stuff is awesome! Keep up the awesome work :) 
So you mean OP wasn't a bundle of sticks today? Hahaha, thank you so much, I hope I don't screw up! I'll edit sunday morning with the story :p 
Lemme try and explain it to you slowly since you might not be understanding. That's fine if you don't understand, too, some people are just slow, right?  So, Thursday night, 2 days before the show, I decide to post this. Celebratory post because I'm happy that I've got this gig, and I also proved my grandmother wrong.  Cool, right?  Now, follow along here, it'll get a bit tricky.  I celebrated with my friends, DURING the party, 2 days after I posted this.  Mind you, it is currently 15 days after I first posted this, so I don't know how in the world you came across this, but I'm assuming that if you can't understand the concept of different days and different posts, then you can't really understand reddit either.  So, to recap, I posted this 2 days before the show, and celebrated the day of the show.  Easy enough?   
How did you get selected for this? I don't think they pick some random dude off the street to open for a popular act.  
Steve Aoki is shit and he is popular and famous....so talent has nothing to do with it anyway...   Seriously though, fuck steve aoki. 
Dada Life did this themselves quite a few times if I recall correctly  
As a producer of music, being insecure about my own music is my biggest problem, but at some point you've gotta be confident in yourself. Congrats on getting the gig, you'll do great! 
I doubt she started it, granted she was super old. She probably was there when the first coke came off the line...  And if you mess up cutting just quickly fade and carry on. They *may* notice but are to fucked up on drugs to care enough to FUCK RAGE! WHOO!!! just wish I could come see you that'd be so bad ass hah Congratulations on the gig bossman. I'll send good vibes your way :) 
Jeez, talk about a small world. I've had similar ideas except with the homeless population in Philadelphia, where I'm from. My biggest dream would be to do something internationally. I am actually planning on going to Ukraine this August to volunteer in an orphanage and teen rehab facility. Would love to bring my story back to the States.  
I saw them at GDF 2011. They were soooo hammered during their set haha. I ended up leaving to see gareth emery. I imagine they wont be chugging bottles of champagne and half gals of grey goose for u18s 
I'm telling you right now, self pity is just waste of energy. Stop being condescending to yourself. It's a pit that only eats joy and returns nothing. Keep doing what you're doing, but stop saying negative stuff about yourself. Strive for greatness and be the best you can be. You're only human. 
Pretty unrelated. I've taken a huge interest in 3d modeling and animation and would like to pursue a career in that area!  
Very kind of you! Responding seems very rare now. Thank you very much and have fun DJing! :DD 
Because- and I say this as a producer myself- it's hardly impressive to be talking about how you're opening for Dada Life if all you're doing is playing other people's music. It's another thing entirely if you've written and produced your own tracks and are finally having the chance to play them in front of a crowd. 
Haha, there were plenty of bundle-of-sticksy OPs today but you weren't one of them :P  I look forward to it! 
Wow, BHPhotovideo and Sam Ash seem like great sites (I've used Guitar Center). I'm always on the look out of for good deals on gear, so thanks!! 
Kinda just sent them an application with basic info, and they texted me a few weeks later. Yea, they pretty much did exactly that, haha 
Hahaha, great point. Thanks so much, I'll definitely keep the good ol' filter & fade technique when I'm in a sticky situation tonight :p 
Haha no doubt! If I get to meet them and actually talk to them instead of the 5 second "Hi, huge fan, love your music, I'm opening for you tonight, any song requests / blacklists?" then I'll definitely have them do that for you :) What's your name? 
That's so cool! I'd love to hear more about it :)   Now that I think about it, I guess when I said I'm interested in film, I realized that I hadn't meant big tv productions with famous actors. I guess documentary film and home film and short film projects is more what I was thinking. But enough about me, I'd love to know more about your trip to Ukraine! Such a beautiful country. 
Hahaha nope, I don't believe so :p Were they good drunk or were they noticeably messing up? 
Yea I gotcha man. Thing is, if I say "fuck yea, I'm so good and I'm gonna be a huge DJ on that stage", then I sound cocky and people bash me for it. Isn't that how reddit works? I hear where you're coming from though, and I didn't mean to sound condescending to myself, I was just weighing the two different ways this can go, lol. 
Haha no idea why an OP wouldn't want to respond to everyone, this is like my 5 minutes of fame on reddit and I get to talk to a bunch of cool people! Haha no need to thank me though, man, it's all good :p 
That's so fucking cool! Haha big props to that dude for being awesome in general. Now a days it's all digital and unless you had a USB with that song on it, you would have been out of luck haha.  Did your boss get mad when he saw you on stage / Did your boss approve of you closing out the opener before you went up? 
Exactly what every OP ever wants to hear :p   But seriously though, I'm setting a reminder for 3 months and if you're not headlining EDC 2016 by then, we're gonna have a problem here! Haha :) 
You didn't have to send them a mix or anything? That seems crazy!  
Lol I can attest I've been on both sides of the tables :P usually house parties ~100 or smaller ^.^ you'll do fine.   Can you record your set and paste it some where though? I'd love to hear what your mixing. 
Just...just don't play animals.  Seriously though, congrats. Dada Life is always a fuckin party and I can't imagine how excited you are.   Also, that shit is gonna look REAL good on your resume :D 
Haha I think we're on the same page. I would never want to work with Hollywood or anything like that. I want to convey importance and a meaningful message to people through the power of film.   As for my Ukraine trip, to cut a long story short, my cousin married a very beautiful woman from the Ukraine and my aunt fell head over heals for her daughter in law's family and how they support their community in the Ukraine so well. She's a dentist and is going to go over there to offer free services to the kids in the orphanage and the teens in rehab. I said that sounded like the experience of a lifetime and immediately asked if I could join her. She said she would love for me to go over and help her.   We're going to stay with my cousin's wife's family. And, God willing, there's no extreme conflict between Ukraine and Russia, we will be leaving August 15th! 
I personally subscribe to the Fighter Pilot mentality... If you don't think your the best as a fighter pilot you risk getting yourself killed, you need that sort of thought process to think to not just survive, but to succeed. As long as you believe in yourself(as cliche as it sounds), you will truly be the best that you can be. 
Idk, its just my experience. But really cool from you nonetheless. :) 
Digital sure makes it more affordable.   When I was playing it cost about 15 bucks per track, and the good ones were hard to get unless you had a buddy at the record shop to put it aside for you.   Which make it really tough for a new DJ to get into the game.   Although there is still nothing like playing vinyl. 
lol  Honestly though if I learned to DJ I'd be perfectly happy with a club gig here and there (*assuming I get good enough, haha), here in Australia the type of music I generally like (mainly minimal techno type music) isn't exactly a huge scene from what I can tell :P  Guys like Raresh / Ricardo Villalobos are some of my DJ idols, haha 
Wow. Sounds like a huge dick. Fuck Steve Aoki. Only good song that came out of him was Turbulence with Lil Jon, and now that I listen back to it, it's shit, I was just young and naive :p 
That's so cool! Holy shit, that definitely sounds like the experience of a lifetime. The only country out of the US that I've been to is Israel (I'm an American Israeli, huge part of our family lives in Israel so we frequently visit, and my cousin is also a DJ, which is where I happened to find my love for music haha), and my dream is to just tour the world and go to so many countries and document my entire trip and just be a huge tourist :p  Haha if you end up documenting it all, would you mind sharing it with me? I'd love to see how your experience was :) 
I agree 100%! Thing is, the crowd was filled with teenagers, and the teens (especially in NYC's EDM scene) don't really care about obscure or different or interesting, they just want to hear the same shit. I put together the coolest playlist of sweet music that ranged from future house to future bass to new progressive house that nobody knows about that sounds amazing, and it was just the coolest set, but once I got to the venue and saw the crowd, I was like, "damn, maybe these guys just want to jump, not care about enjoying the music for the music". You can PM me that playlist if you'd like, though, I'd love to hear it :) 
He also gets artists on his label to do a lot of the work even on non collaborations.  
Haha I've always wanted to go to Israel with my brothers on a Birth Right trip. It sounds so awesome!  And definitely, whatever pictures,videos, experiences I bring back with me I'll for sure share with you! 
It's not bad at all - it's just completely empty. People aren't bad, they're kinda nice I guess, but there's literally no real topic. It's just a bunch of random people very rarely talking about random things, with an extremely tacky and ugly "rich"-looking theme (gold background and whatnot). It's just a pointless novelty, not a real forum that people use. 
Yeah, I can understand that, although it can never hurt to broaden people's horizons.  Before I assemble the playlist, I was wondering: do you ever play hip hop at your shows or do you stick with electronic music? 
I'm friends with a guy named Raj on FaceBook. He lives on the other side of the country.  We send each other pictures of our lunches, and that is literally it. Of course we comment on them, but we've never had a discussion that wasn't about food.   This has been going on for a year now. 
I've been playing online yahtzee with an older lady every day for 3 years now. We've never talked despite there being a chat function, and neither one of us will quit playing. I feel invested now, and I worry one day she'll stop playing, and I won't know if she has died or fallen ill. Yahtzee grandma and I have an unspoken bond.  
A guy once paid me to convince him not to get circumcised. I thought it was just a hoax until I got $350 in my Venmo account. 
I have a slightly one sided relationship with a family that isn't mine. Basically there's someone else out there with my exact same name and her family keeps emailing with family photos and stuff like that. I've told them a couple times they have the wrong email but the older ones in the family can't quite figure out how to remove my address from their family email lists. They're so sweet, I feel like I know them all pretty well and it makes happy to hear about the youngest granddaughter's progress in junior school and stuff like that. I almost want to trade my real family for this family haha.  
I met a guy on a chat and we've been texting on and off for 10 years now. We've never heard each other's voice.  
I guess it's not as weird as your story. But a few years ago while I was driving to the store early in the morning one day in winter I saw a young kid (11-13) freezing walking to school. I pulled over and asked if he was heading to the school not to far away and he hopped in. We chatted about school and how he wants to be a professional soccer player. That winter was terrible so I ended up giving him rides many times that year. I was 22 at the time and didn't think much of it until this moment. I never told anyone because it simply would never come up. Either way I hope that kid is doing great.   
I played an online game for a long time (5-6 years) and through most of it with some of the same people. One such person was a guy who is about my father's age (maybe a little younger). In-game we stuck to being 'in character' but eventually shared email addresses.   After I stopped playing the game (real life + bullshit game "friends" drama) I reached out to him with my phone number. It's been a couple of years since and I talk to him every couple of months. 
At 14 or so, I became friends with some dude who ran one of those popular meme pages on facebook. He and I talked a lot, became "meme buds". Turns out he lives in australia (i'm from california).  Two years later, when we were both 16, he came out to california (with his family) to visit me.  Nope, not a love story folks. Just two buds finally meeting irl. He is super cute though.   And now, four years later, all he does is send me dick pics on snapchat.  
Some girl I knew on Facebook messaged me one day after she saw a (admittedly in poor taste) joke I had made on someone's post. I had literally only met this girl in person once, but now we talk everyday, and have become really good friends. She gave me advice about getting back with my ex, and I bust her balls about the dumb guys she's dated. We're both mixed race, and it's nice to have someone to talk to about that who can relate. It's been really nice having her to talk to, but the dynamic is so weird I haven't told anyone because I don't see how anyone could see it and not think we're trying to get together.   It's just really nice to have a platonic relationship with someone from the opposite gender.  
I have a pretty distinct last name and about 5 other people (who I'm not related to) do too. One of them added all of us on Facebook and we all are in a group message together and periodically update each other on our lives. We have everybody from a divorced mother of 3 in California, a wonderful hockey dad from Canada, a US Marine and a slutty 16 year old. It's fucking great. 
I have a very close friend across the country that I met on a 4chan thread where you were supposed to add someone on Steam if they had your same birthday.  I also have friends that only know me for a text-based Harry Potter role playing site.  That one doesn't get mentioned often because I rarely share the fact that I used to basically write multiplayer Harry Potter fan fiction. 
Throwaway, in a D/s relationship with someone who lives on the other side of the country. Never met Her, never even heard Her voice. But being my Domme she has authority over pretty much everything I do in the day, what I eat, what I wear, when I go to bed, etc. I haven't told any of my friends about it because I think it's kinda weird, but one know the basics because I took my shirt off  and forgot I still had her name written in sharpie on my back lol. 
I hope this counts.  I was an avid snail mail pen-paller between the ages of 10 and 23, mostly before the internet was around.  I had hundreds of pen-pals, probably 50 at a time.    I wrote to my first pen pal from age 10 to 20, and I still check up on her on Facebook occasionally (I'm 38).    I never met any of them, but I felt close to some of them.  There was one guy from Greece I wrote to forever.  There was never any flirting, just a friendly connection.  We emailed each other every day in college, and we still keep up occasionally online.    I exchanged all sorts of gifts with people around the world this way, and I still have a lot of interesting stuff from them.  I wrote to people from almost every country in the world.  I won my school's geography bee, and I know writing to pen pals helped me learn a huge amount. 
It's not as cool as some of you other people's posts and it might not be what you are looking for. But I dated this guy for three years. We broke up. It needed to happen. About two years later, after next to no talking he messaged me out of the blue and told me there was an opening at his company and that he things I would be a great fit. I nailed the interview despite being very very under qualified. Got the job. Nobody knows that we were anything more than friends. Our desks are close to each other. We have ended up as good friends.  
I have a whole group of male friends in rural India that I am friends with, I'm from California and have never been to India, but my name is the same as one of their friends, apparently I have a pretty common Indian last name, even though I'm as white as the driven snow, one of them sent me a friend request, I told them I wasn't that John and we had a good laugh.    As time passed I kept getting friend requests I started accepting them, now we all talk a lot.  We update each other on our lives, chat, comment etc.  Everything I do with real friends on Facebook. 
One of my friends got out of an abusive relationship and is going to therapy. She's also a professional chef. She makes me dinner a couple times a week and in return I listen to her problems. She's got a lot of them. But I'm not complaining because hey, free food.  
That is the most awesome thing ever.  I always just ignore calls or voicemails from numbers i don't know, but you've made me rethink this now. 
After college, I was depressed, alcoholic, semi-nocturnal, couldn't find a job, etc.  I had moved back to my hometown, but all of my friends had moved away.  I never left the house as I needed to conserve my funds.  I got on OKCupid to find friends/companionship.  I wasn't really interested in a hookup or anything, I just wanted to talk to people and connect to SOMEONE, as late at night I got pretty lonely.  I ended up meeting someone that lived eleven time-zones away.  She was similarly lonely, but on a day schedule, so we were able to talk/message pretty much every day.  We opened up to each other and aired our grievances with the world.    That was about... nine years ago now.  We've each gone through some rough patches and still send each other little updates every now and again. :) 
This has got to be one of the most interesting/funny stories I've heard on this sub.  Especially given your age when it happened.  Props to you for giving this guy some good life advice instead of reporting him.  You probably single handedly changed his life for the better. 
When I was a teenager, I played a lot this online game called City of Heroes. There wasn't much of a French community there, so I mostly played alone. Until I met this guy, remarkably nice who helped me a lot to level up and understand the game mechanics. He was from the West coast of Canada and we had a huge time zone difference, but he played with me almost every day early in the morning and I played late a night after school. It lasted for a while, a couple of years maybe?  I had a lot of fond memories of playing with this guy, so now when I'm playing MMOs I use his nickname in the hopes the server returns "username already taken", but it never is.   Funny story, one of my friends asked me recently how I learned English... And I realised, this guy didn't speak French at all. He taught me English without me realising it. 
Two friends I met online a year ago through CSGO. I probably have 400h playing with these guys.  
Most people don't know how close one of my closest friends and I are. I'm a guy and she's a woman, we're both straight, but we talk about things some people in relationships don't even talk about yet have clear boundaries on being platonic.  
I added a guy on Facebook about 5 years ago because we have the same first and last name. He's a battle rapper from New York (I live on the west coast) and its interesting to watch him progress. We like each others statues and wish each other happy birthday but that's about it.  
I've been friends with someone for 17 years. I've only met her once.  
In high school I would pass by this random dude everyday in the halls. We eventually started greeting each other with a different fake name every time we saw each other. It was hilarious. The weirder the name, the funnier it was.  We never talked or became friends in a traditional sense, just two strangers calling each other funny names everyday. 
I play board games at the library once a week.  The only other die-hard regular is a 70+ former IBM engineer, so we bitch about tech together as we play. 
Two weeks ago, I met up with my D&D group's dm for a night of movies and maybe casual sex. I wound up staying at his place until yesterday. I had only met him in person twice beforehand, and we didn't really start talking a whole lot until the day before I came over.  I may have also willingly gone into it with no contraception, so I might now be carrying his child. He knows it, too. Woohoo. 
Back when I was a kid and Pokemon first came out, I joined a pokemon chat room. It started as a Pokemon role play chat (people would pretend they were gym leaders or pokemon), but eventually just evolved into a group of internet friends who just liked talking about life. I was in that chat for several years and made quite a few friends. I still talk to two of them, one who refers to me as her little brother, and another who I've simply been good friends with for years. Whenever somebody tells me you can't have "real" friends online, I think about my dear old friends, smile, and realize they're not quite right about that statement.  
I'm friends with a guy from across the ocean that has the exact same first and last name as me.  He friended me in like 2010 when he was a teenager.  Now he's like 22 and I'm 34.  We chatted a few times, it's fun to see how his life is going.  Handsome guy but, like Zoolander, he has one look.  It's hilarious. 
I would absolutely try that chat function! Wouldnt you hate it if she dissappeared and you wouldnt know anything about her? 
If cell phones had been around I would have tried to call you too.  But it was 1964 and I was only 3 days old and couldn't speak or dial a phone.  You would have thought I was some creep.  But I wasn't.  I was just a baby without a foreskin.   
What a beautiful story! :) I hope you don't mind me asking, but did you guys kissed on your first "date"? Also, what is your age difference? How did you introduce him to your son? :) But don't answer if it is too personal. 
My name isn't super common but common enough that the person with my firstnamelastname gmail was taken. So mine is firstnamealastname (middle initial). I emailed her once when I was job searching at the end of college just to let her know that I was job searching and sorry in advance if anyone emailed her by mistake but please forward it to me if she didn't mind. She responded that my aunt sometimes emails her. 
I have this same situation!  It's been about four years now, and I always get a christmas newsletter and photo album.  I fondly refer to them as my midwest family. 
I'm actually in the same boat. I've got a friend that I still talk to through last.fm after 5+ years. We have JUST started mentioning the possibility of Skyping in the near future.  It's a really interesting phenonmena when reflecting on it. 
Back in the early internet days, you'd meet people in chat rooms, get to know some of them, and then build a kind of internet relationship. One such person was a girl from Cali. I live in Jersey. She was nice, and seemed interesting, and so we decided to start talking on the phone. This was the usual next step in those days. At any rate, we talked on the phone maybe a dozen times, usually for several hours at a time, before my father hit the roof when he saw the monthly phone bill and wanted to know why there were so many long phone calls being made to fucking California in the middle of the night. I never talked to her again. I can't even remember her name. I think about that sometimes, and think about how weird those early internet days were 
This is a great story but man that was a mistake on the kid's side. Do you live in a small town where everyone knows each other or something like that? 
I love how online gaming destroys social barriers. I used to play eve, small gang combat, we had a pirate outfit, and it was real trial by fire stuff. If you didn't kill 10 times more players than you died, you would lose money and not be able to afford losses.   in our gang we had a 70yr old Norwegian guy, and a 12 yr old Australian kid, we respected their skill and ability equally.  
I got a similar one! I played a game back in '07-'09 with the same group of people, day in and day out. I have long forgotten how the one kid (he was probably upper middle school when I was a junior in high school) and I ended up friends on fb, but nearly a decade later we still are. We occasionally reach out to each other and have odd conversations, the strangest being about a doll in my parent's house that we called Dave Lister.   Although there are other people from that group I wish I still had contact with. Such as the dude old enough to be our dad who lived in a yurt. Can't remember much else now, though. 
I just realised I have a Facebook page sitting on 50k followers even after sitting in a dusty corner for like 5 years. Is it *ever* a legit thing to sell them off to one of the weirdos in my inbox? I could use the extra cash. 
Dank meme buds, or regular meme buds?  Also, sorry to hear it went the creepypms route. 
Opposite gender platonic relationships seem increasingly rare, because it seems to me that guys and girls are pressed to "be with" anyone that likes them as a person. I'm glad you've got her, and I know I'm glad to have my three main girl friends who I know wouldn't ever date me. Good on you, and I hope things stay good between you two. 
Did you ever find out the story behind the knights armour? 
I have a Facebook friend that comes from my LiveJournal niche role playing days. She's pretty awesome but we've never met irl. 
how did you write her name on your back with a sharpie?  
Can you go into more detail on how this works? Like if she tells you to shit on your bosses desk you'd just do it? 
Wtf? What does "D/s" relationship mean? So confused  
I'm more curious as to how you got her name on your back  
Exes who you can remain on good terms with often make the best of friends, I have found.  There's a certain trust that can't be found elsewhere. 
I've been friends with a lot of people where all I really do is *listen*.  It gives them a chance to get everything off their chest, and try to find a solution to their problems. 
People in the kitchen industry are often mentally unstable. Being a chef also has a high correlation with being a sociopath, coming from some random google research I did several years ago, so you know it's accurate.  I hope you enjoy the drama, at least. When I worked in the kitchen industry I had some great friends on the outside who loved to hear gossip. :)  But also, thanks for listening to your friend complain about her problems. You're awesome. 
Same situation except we're both only mostly straight and a bit bi 
I've been friends with someone for four years and never met her. Hope I can someday though. 
Were you a gym leader, or a pokemon? Which one(s)? 
Before taking my father's last name, I had an extremely common name. He got the wrong guy.   He sent me a picture of a quesadilla and from there it snowballed.  
I did the same thing with a guy from India.  We are now friends, I have a bunch of his friends on my FB, we all chat in messenger or post on walls etc.  It is always funny when someone says something that makes zero sense without cultural context. 
I have a random same-name (and same middle initial) friend on FB who lives in Hungary (I'm in the US). She doesn't speak English and I don't speak Hungarian, but we comment using pics. Been friends for about 9 years now! 
I think it would be strange if you *didn't* want a relationship like that. 
I'll send you a picture of my breakfast tomorrow mate  
Sounds like some oddity you'd see in a slight indie movie or something 
Tbh, it was winter, and it depends where you are, but the kid could have literally died. Depending of course, but it has happened numerous times before. 
Ehhhh theres moments that kinda transcend the don't get in the car with strangers rule, especially if you are 13.  Child kidnappers don't exactly drive around in vehicles and ask to give kids rides.  Once I was riding my bike around a street corner and there was a bunch of gravel across the sidewalk. The tires slid out from under me and I ended up sliding across the asphalt with super bad road rash. Someone offered me a ride and I took them up on it. 
Same here. I wish I kept in contact with a lot of the people I played Halo with back in the day.   I've kept in connect with a few of them or randomly found a couple in other groups/forums. Some of them are doing well and others have gone far off the deep end.  
I think people have a problem with you implying that almost every guy who makes friends with girls is guilty of sexual harassment. Hence why they're saying you keep bad company- they're trying to tell you those people don't represent men in general. 
Wtf? Where do you live, so I can never make friends with those people?  Seriously, either you've had terrible luck or you keep bad company. I'm sure most of my guy friends don't send random dick pics to girls. 
What age group are you in? Ive not heard any stories like that from the girls I know, maybe they just don't mention them? 
well, if i was 15ish, i would've just been coming out of my rage comic phase you do the math   And nah he and i are chillin actually 
Does one need a reason to own knights armor? Pretty cool decoration imo 
That would make sense, she's one of the most troubled people I've ever met. She's basically the living embodiment of the paranoid parrot. She's also very needy and I've had to set boundaries with her.  Thanks for the kind words. Admittedly, it's been good for me too. I wasn't blessed with a lot of empathy and I don't have a nurturing bone in my body. My experience with her has been a good opportunity to learn how to be empathetic, and how to be encouraging. 
Um that's a harsh generalization. The job is intense but have never worked with a sociopath. Everyone I work with are hard workers and family oriented. We are wives husbands moms and dads.  
Sounds so much like a prelude to a Haruki Murakami's novel to me.   As the story develops, the old man could be a benevolent spirit of a WWII soldier who died in a blue pickup truck who'll only appear in this plane of reality past midnight, and the 22f boss could end up being a kitsune who is in an abusive relationship, and didn't see OP as nothing more than friend, because she knew they're soul siblings.  
Man, it's a cool thing. I met her probably... 12 years after we became friends. It was the most natural thing in the world.  
I was a gym leader. All the pokemon were ones that were in the original 150, as that's when this chat was started / popular.  
This is fucking brilliant!    Do you only send lunches? Is it all lunches, including the average boring ones or just the more interesting ones? 
Do brunch or mid-afternoon tea pics count, or are the two of you traditionalists? 
yea, casually mentioned and maybe a little shown on camera, but otherwise forgotten.   of course, it could be the main theme too. maybe something along the lines of this relationship, although odd and perhaps unconventional, helps the protagonist cope emotionally.   or, maybe the games stop one day and the protagonist finds her and meets her on her death bed. they look into each others' eyes and share a bond unlikely.  
"Not all men" or not, it happens WAY more often than anyone is willing to admit.  This is a problem. 
I can guarantee that they aren't mentioning it.  I'm 34, but I know women from the ages of 14-50 who have had this happen to them on several occasions.  I'm really surprised that more dudes aren't aware of this. 
Bro you talk like a fuckin' californian lmao. I know this is late but i'm browsing top of all on this sub rn, so yeah.  
Admittedly, I was slightly disappointed.  But my IRL name is pretty unique in that it comes my first name is of Hebrew, middle name Latin, and last name Norwegian origins.  So I'd actually be shocked to find someone with my exact name. 
That too, it's pretty short and I've gotten really good at it over time. 
You missed the part where OP has sex with every other character  
Don't forget the random talking cat, the bizarre dream sequences, jazz music, and detailed recipes. 
How active was the chat? How many members?  It sounds like it would have been fun. 
Every now and then it'll be more than lunch. But primarily it's lunch.   And usually just the interesting ones. That's how we met. He didn't send like an average quesadilla, he had basically combined barbeque ribs and a quesadilla.   Mainly we just swap recipes for bad food back and forth.  
It was over a period of two days, right around New Years this past year. 
I mean the issue comes when literally none of my friends acts like they do it, and they usually admit some oddly intimate details about themselves. So to guys like me, it just seems odd for it to be common. 
Nice.  Sounds like a sweet way to make some holiday cash.  Though it reminds me of the pranks people play where they put up adds saying "Win an XBox" and then they require a credit card number. They then take a camera crew to the houses of people who actually "fell" for it.  You could have easily been feeding some dude's fetish. 
My first thought was that he was jerking off to whatever I was sending him, but the more I got into links about body positivity and the origin of why circumcision is a commonly-accepted, non-medical trend, the less I cared. Then the money showed up. He didn't have any information that could have been compromising for me, so I wasn't worried.  His rationale was that he'd rather spend money on getting someone to talk him off the edge than on the surgery and pain of recovery. Worst-case scenario, he was jerking off. Best-case scenario, he didn't get the surgery. Either way, $350 is $350. 
Yo man that was deep, there's only two things I ever cry about anime and this shit.  
Man, moms get all the credit but dads are lowkey the real heroes. My dad has done so much for me, he's given me such an amazing life, there's literally no way to repay him other than to live up to his expectations, and to do anything I can for him. Today I saw noticeable a noticeable wrinkle under his eyes (idk if it was a wrinkle or what, but it was a deep line a little below his eye, I thought maybe it's from glasses) and I was like what's that, and he said "I'm getting old." He's only 48, not old in my opinion, but it was so weird to realize my dad can get old.  
Lost my father from cancer last few months. If only I got more time with him to buy him something he loves.   Cherish him OP. Some people had time robbed off them. Too soon.   :'( 
Holy shit you are the best child ever, I hope a reincarnation of you appears in my testicles and finds my future spouse's egg. That was kinda fucking creepy but you get the idea! YOU'RE NICE! 
this made me more emotional than I want to be fuck man 
Anddd I cried. Last week would have been my dad's birthday, but was also when he died. He wasn't a great person, but he was still my dad when he was sober enough to be.     You hug your dad for me, damnit. 
God dammit this is awesome. I wasn't a very good son to my dad after their divorce, and now that he is gone I really, really regret it. He was such a good dad to me. 
My parents went through the same thing. Do me a favor, spend a lot of time with your dad. Just a surprise visit to sit and watch tv makes all the difference. 
Sorry to be nit picking but are you saying that you are siding with your dad against your mom or you are neutral ? 
I totally agree about the Anime, it's weird how I'm fine during the saddest scenes in normal film/tv but the moment that slow piano marks the beginning of a sad scene in an Anime, the waterworks begin. 
Same man. Your Lie in April is on Netflix and past the sixth or seventh episode, every single one is a tear-jerker. Sometimes I cry so hard I tire myself out :( 
Well - anime can indeed be deeply emotional for some. 
Sometimes we forget that they also age. I can't and don't want to imagine a world without my dad or my mom, but of course it's inevitable. All we can do for the time being is cherish them and let them know that we care and love them. Once they are gone, you won't live your life thinking that you could have done more. 
I am so very sorry for your loss.   *Nana internet hug* 
We meet again!  I warned you when I added you as friend. This *will* happen! 
Can I get a hug too? :'( let's all have a hug party.  ^(lost my dad recently)  
I am so sorry for your loss.   *Nana internet hug* 
I am so very sorry for your loss. Maybe you weren't a very good son as you think; however, we generally are much too self-critical when it comes to our own actions. I'm thinking he not only loved you but thought well of you too.  You take care.   *Nana internet hug* 
I cried over yesterday's Sailor Moon Crystal. You're right about the music!  Although not just anime. I was practicing the piano the other day and made myself sad by playing through the music from a certain scene in Final Fantasy VII...  
Nah my man white album two trust me. You thought your lie in April was bad.  
Hi (Reddit's) Grandma! I always smile when I see you in a thread.  I hope you are well. 
thank you hiyo, for the Nana internet hug. *hugs back* 
*big hug* I know how you feel, it can be really rough. The first year it very much feels like they're just "on vacation" and will come back, but they don't. Let yourself grieve, don't hold it in. I lost my dad in 2008 and I still get sad about it each year during his birth/death dates - especially hard when they're only 2 days apart.    My advice is to find happy ways to remember them and try to focus on those thoughts. Focus on the positive energy from them, and do things that would make them (and any older deceased relative) proud. 
Thank you :) I know he was proud, but man I wish I could do it all over again! 
What you have to understand, you see, is that those aren't tears of sadness, but of joy. OP made his old man happy today. Now dry your tears and go give your father a call or, even better, a hug. 
Is something still a spoiler after more than twenty years? 
Lol you really love to amplify your comments with videos. 
I get more of these than romantic crushes, honestly.  Some people just seem so fucking cool that I just want us to be bros. I have these elaborate fantasies in my head of how we'd meet under weird circumstances and both just stand out to each other. Or if we've already met, how we'd find something in common that would make us friends. 
Oh I call those a "squish" as opposed to a crush. And I get them all the time, even with people that are already my friend :^) 
I think that's happened to me a few times. But half the time I don't know if it's a crush, or if I actually wanna be friends with them.   Besides, I'm a really quiet person so going up to them is like furst trying to cross the Grand Canyon on a wire. 
this thread is pretty wholesome, i want to be your friend! 
Somewhat related: I'm amazed at how many people simply deny themselves and suppress the experience of platonic love. As a straight cis man specifically, I was always sort of conditioned to think that, whenever I liked a woman, I was also supposed to want to get in her pants; whenever I liked a man, I was supposed to just maintain respect and not show any affection. This is not how humans work at all. Platonic love and romantic love both exist and are different things, and physical attraction is something else altogether. Something similar goes for aesthetics: you can find someone beautiful without wanting anything sexual whatsoever. I feel a lot freer since figuring this out. 
There's a girl who works at the bakery counter at the supermarket who I would *totally* bro out with.  Like all I can think of any time we talk is how she would be the most fun person to like, have some drinks and shoot the shit with.  Unfortunately, I can't think of a good way to present this situation without any risk of her (and/or her boyfriend) thinking that I'm trying some funny business.  
Teach me your ways please. I have a crush on someone but I know we would never be able to be together so I really want to befriend her. :( I'm just too scared to talk to her... 
All the time. They're almost worse than romantic crushes, because I feel like it's much more socially acceptable to say "Hey, I think you're a cool person, want to go on a date?" than it is to say "Hey, I think you're a cool person, want to be my friend?". Getting even more platonic I get crushes on people where I just want to work with them on something. Obviously that would entail being friendly with them, but there are people whose work I've seen and I think to myself "I need to make something with this person" without knowing anything about them personally. I also have a habit of turning my friendships into project partnerships - why hang out with someone casually when you can give all your meetings a specific purpose?  
Never actually, I didn't know it was a thing. It must be great to have it though, because you can actively go out there and make a friend.  
Constantly! it's actually my weakness, always wanting to have a friendship if a person is nice. 
I get these kind of crushes on friend groups. Like when you see a group of people talking and joking and having fun and all, and you want to be part of that as well.  I recently started becoming more involved with this one group at my uni, but when I'm sitting with them I know I'm not really part of it :/. It sucks, but maybe it'll get better, idk. 
A couple weeks ago -I was at the theatre and there was a woman around my age and her mom- they had this long conversation at intermission that related to all these interests that I have too - even reading books by the same author. It was interesting.   Is there a way to "ask someone out" to be your friend? I was too chicken to say anything :-( 
Yeah, but for people out-of-reach.   I reckon Prince Harry would be a laugh to hang out with. Also Jonah Hill 
I was a victim of this.  There was a guy that was invited to the group parties who I eventually ended up hanging out with. I was so excited. The stories he told and the way he told them made him look like the most fun person to be around.  We ended up meeting at a bar and he was a completely different person. All of his stories were told in a monotone voice and they were all sad. People have hard times so I didn't hold it against him.  This happened a few times. At the group events he was the hit of the party. Hanging out alone, he was sad.   Long story short, he'll talk about his problems but he won't do the things to correct them. 
Yes. And she said she would be in my area for several months with nothing to do. I commented on that post and said "hey if you're ever in town let's hang out!"   No. Response.   Which is super embarrassing to be because I feel like I put myself out there and got rejected pretty hard. By another girl. That I wanted to be my friend. So now I hid her from my time line so I don't cringe at myself everytime I see her name. 
Pretty often. I have a bit of an anxiety problem that sometimes makes it hard for me to reach out to even people I know moderately well and try to strengthen/keep up a friendship. It's probably daily that I'll see someone I friendlike or have even hung out with a couple times and wish I could figure out a way to keep in touch more. 
It used to happen frequently in my teens, but as I came into my twenties it's really leveled off and quit being such a distraction. I realize this will sound like a bummer but I've had so many disappointing friendships that ended really unfortunately that I'm pretty reserved these days. Don't get me wrong, I still enjoy talking to people and like spending time with friends, but these days I keep my expectations low and take things as they come.  
Rightttttt, when was your last one then and why them? 
Same here! I've also had romantic crushes turn into these. Once all the "OMG DATE ME" feelings had faded cause it didn't look like it was going any further, it became a "man, they're really really cool. I wish we were closer."   I'm pretty good at getting close to people, but terrible at convincing myself to make the first couple moves. I've got the tricks up my sleeve, just lack the confidence to pull them outta my sleeve! I wonder how close we would've gotten if I just tried a little harder. Oh well. Better luck next time, right? 
That's kinda adorable.  I'm pretty bisexual, and I have this recurring problem where i'm not sure if I like someone, or I *like* them.  I'm not sure if it's a bromance or a mancrush. 
People and socialization is scary. As generic as the thing Im going to say now, it does get better with time. Do one thing every day which would help you with it :) 
Thats definitely a tricky one, such a shame that there needs to be immediate assumptions when it comes to socialization between girls/guys.  
Aww! Don't worry. I guess I just kinda merged myself into conversations etc? Isn't that easy I know. Took me a year and a half in my last school, but ended up being so worth it. Making good friends is such a trial and error kind of process. However though, just be nice to her and be the kind of person you'd want to get to know :) Have you ever talked to her/how do you know her anyway? 
If you find the "hey, how are you?" convos don't go much farther than "good, you?" "me too, thanks" social media can help. Maybe message her about a post she's made or reply to her snap story.   Do you know anything about her at all? No? Perfect! Ask her where she's from, what her family's like, what her hobbies are, if she has any pets, etc...  
This is very true, making friends is tricky lol. But seems like you're doing a well good job, through working with them you can probably seep in some bonding conversations. :)  
Never really had it either. Sure, I have plenty of times when I'm like hey he seems to be a cool dude I should try to talk to him more. But to get really excited about the idea of befriending them? Not really. 
I would say one friend of mine on Facebook who's more of an acquaintance. He posts a lot of Facebook, which I usually either don't care about or am midly annoyed with, but his posts are typically always very well thought out, insightful, and generally written in very engaging prose. I just want to be his friend and hang out and pick his brain a bit, or have some discussion or debate on some topic, he seems really smart, and I know from the few times I've talked to him that he's funny and likable in person. Unfortunately now we live in different states, so outside of occasional discussion of his posts on social media, its not too feasible.  I also get friend crushes to varying degrees on like at least 50% of the people I meet. Who was your last friend crush? 
My romantic and friend crushes seem to always be separate, but it makes sense how they'd overlap.  I wish I knew how to get close to people. I don't have any trouble making friends, but that's because it's never a conscious thing for me, they just kind of develop without my choosing. 
{I'm a guy} Just yesterday, I became really good friends with this girl that I have had a "friendship crush" on for a while. I use photography as a way to enter people into my life. I just asked her if We could hang out to let me take photos of her. I've only talked to her a couple times because of mutual friends. It was supposed to be for around an hour, but we ended up hanging out for an entire day in Princeton, and it was a ton of fun!  
Right?  The crazy part is that I've had tons of female friends my entire life, but thinking back I have *no* idea how those friendships developed and (aside from the ones where I did have romantic feelings for short periods of time, or the two where I ended up dating them anyway), how it became understood that it was platonic.  I suppose it's also easier if you're in an environment where these things can sort of develop naturally - like you spend all day at school together or an entire shift at work.  But somehow, approaching someone like the girl at the bakery all like, "wanna go to a bar and talk about nothing?" feels too much like "asking out"....even though I'll already be in the store chit-chatting for like 45 minutes on slow nights, as if that's any different.  People'ing is hard.  Rest assured, I *also* suck at making male friends, asking out women, and all other social interactions as well. 
I met her at a birthday party, we only talked at little bit. Only later I realized how cute she was. Also, I'm friends with her sister which makes it double-weird. She's one year older than me and graduates in two months or so, my time is running up. :(  My problem is that I get really distant and cold when she's around because I don't know how to act. I'm kind of socially anxious. Don't want her to think I'm weird.  Sorry for hijacking your thread, this isn't really what you wanted to know haha. 
We haven't really talked since then, not even "how are you?"-conversations. And I'm too scared to approach her anyway. I can't message her anywhere without coming off as creepy since she doesn't really know me and never gave me her number or snapchat name. But I'm friends with her twin sister, so I already know where she lives and that she has a dog and stuff.   My only chance is talking to her at another friend's party in like a month. I hope she'll be there too.  
That sounds very familiar damn, love finding people like that who seem so insightful. Maybe you could send him some of your thoughts on a post he did, it could create a nice conversation around the topic. :)  There is this person who I really often see around campus, has a tattoo which references a band that I love. Not only that, I've seen the guy reading really interesting books in our library on geopolitics and generally social/history stuff that I've also read and I'd love to know what they thought about the content.  
I've found the best method for breaking through to the close stage is to let your guard down a little. My favorite method is sharing a funny yet embarrassing story, like showing them pictures of my scene phase. By showing a sliiiightly more personal side of you, it shows you trust them - which typically leads to them trusting you too.  
Im actually going to get back here and check on you in a month. You better have asked the guy by then!!! 
Yasssss well done! Im glad to hear that. I've noticed people with cameras and good photography skills often gain a lot of friends through it, probably because it seems so engaging and also "can i take photos of you" is such a flattering question. :) 
I think your "Rightttttt" can be construed as either sarcasm and not believing the other poster, or as enthusiastic agreement and wanting to hear more about the others posters experience.  Sort of like a sarcastic "Sure you did, buddy."  
You said slightly personal. I'll only show those once my soulmate is legally bound to me through a state approved marriage. 
Oh dear. Well I guess I'm bound by the sacred internet law of no bamboozles now! 
Also I love the little quotes that appear when you upvote!  It makes me want to do it way more :-)  For your post it said "Quest complete".  Woot! 
Upvoted for your upvote of a commenter's upvote that upvoted your post because you upvoted a commenter's upvote that upvoted your post 
Hi everyone. I heard they were giving away upvotes in here? 
I gave people up votes jus to see those quotes. I'm seeing nothing maybe because I'm on the phone...    Meh, have some upvotes guys!  
So this is what this sub is about?  Seems nice.  I actually might come visit from time to time then.  
I used to never upvote...then I remembered it doesn't cost me anything and if it makes other people feel like it makes me feel, then upvotes for everyone!!!! 
The first rule of being a good OP: Appreciate your commenters, and upvote them liberally (assuming they aren't being jerks). 
I always upvote replies to me/my comments and posts unless they're mean or insulting... Or plain wrong. That doesn't happen too often though. I dunno, I kinda trained myself thinking it was standard reddiquette. 
*I always try to upvote the thread I'm commenting on...*  
I don't get the point of up voting. I do up vote posts I like, but I really don't see any point in it. If Reddit was like YouTube where people got paid for up votes and lived on up votes then it would be different.     
Scrolling through the comments it makes me happy to see how a little up arrow makes people's days ^_^ 
I thought this was u/GallowBoob Seriously this is some next level karma farming 
Is this only on the actual site? I don't see anything from Mobile 
I don't see that! Maybe it doesn't work in mobile? 
Yep, Oprah. I can't pay the taxes on the car you just gave out. Thanks though. 
"Your heart is a strange little orange to peel."   Not sure how I feel about that one. 
That doesnt work if you do it through someones user page. Only works in a comment thread. Its to prevent brigading.  Nice gesture though :)  
I've always been curious how much the taxes on those cars were.  *Edit. I found it. Some audience members had to pay up to $6000 in taxes to keep the car. Yikes.  
Idk upvoting is just easier for me and it encourages people to produce more content :) 
I also got the orange one. I wonder how the quotes are distributed. 
Pretty standard.  I used to work at a dealership that "gave away" a contest car occasionally and I think most people just took a cash prize (sold the car back to the dealership, really) instead because they weren't prepared for the tax hit.  Everybody pays that tax when they buy a car but it's built into the payments usually.  Paying it on the spot when you weren't really expecting it can put a real dent in your wallet if you can afford it at all. 
I'm good! I'm super pleased that so many people appreciate this post. I've never had one get so many upvotes and comments. How are you? 
I really need to get around to watching that movie. 
every comment has its own ID you can see when you permalink it, i think it's generated off of that ID, so everyone gets the same message for the same comment. 
At least I saved you a couple minutes/hours in the future.  I accept beer, cash and credit cards as payment.  
I'm doing well, glad to see the wholesomeness in this thread thanks to you! : ) 
Haha. Can I ask you about your story on how you're ending up in hotel eating canned veggies?  
Horrible as hell. They just taste like a bunch of vitamins and minerals. 
Yeah I just up and moved 13 hours away from where I grew up. I did have a plan for where I'd live with some family but that fell through. I couldn't get an apartment quickly enough (plus I didn't have enough saved for first, last, and security deposit) so this is what I fell back on. I'm working two jobs so soon I should be able to turn it around eventually! 
yuck. I usually just take caffeine pills if i need a boost, but for some reason i've lost my ability to swallow pills recently so that hasn't worked for me. Pure caffeine tastes awful, it's got to be more bitter than a switch cartridge. 
Yes! the 5 hour was so bitter, that was the description I was looking for. It has over 1000 mg of "energy" they say. 
wow! thats a lot of mg of energy lol. theres surely no way its worse than pure caffeine though. the second the stuff dissolved in my mouth i almost threw up. i literally gagged for minutes. 
This reminds me of a time I found a wallet with $5,000 mexican pesos (roughly 400 USD at the time) at the parking lot of the building I worked at. After mumbling through it I found out that the owner worked at some company in the same building (it was a big building in Mexico City).  Anyway, that day was too late and there was no one around so the next day I went to where he worked looking for the guy, I didn't want to give it to somebody else afraid that they might take the money, luckily I found the guy and gave him his wallet back with everything in it. The look on his face was priceless, he even hugged me. It felt so great doing that.  Eventually he sent a bottle of whiskey to where I worked and told the people from HR of my doing, ended up making an appearance on the magazine of my work place which was a little embarrassing. 
Excellent outcome, good folks are around. I came out in the parking lot a few months ago to find my VW Golf had been hit a good one, wrecked a tire, wheel and about 3 thousand in body damage. Also was a note and phone number on the windshield. Guy told me he was really sorry and would pay for it. A good twist is that my car is on the recall and VW is buying it back, no penalty for body damage. So the kid picked the right car to hit. 
A few pro tips from someone who was a collector in college for a credit union.   1. Credit union literally had no choice. Credit unions are very forgiving but when it comes to the government, they have no choice.   2. You can still use your bank, just fucking call your debtor! Most if not all banks, governments, mortgage companies will work out a payment plan if you tell them your situation. Even if it's interest only payments. As long as they know you are willing to pay they won't seize shit.   Stop walking around with money. Tell them what happened and work out some kind of plan. It will suck but what sucks more is walking around with all the money you have. Good luck man.  
I am so glad you got your wallet back. I had lost one on a ferry boat in South Texas. Almost a year later it showed up to my house. I had moved, but the address on the license still had forwarding. There was a note, it said "sorry, I had to take out $12 for shipping". It had close to 300 in it. I mailed back $200 of it.  
Good to hear!  I once dropped my wallet in the Subway parking lot. The individual who found it was kind enough to drop it off in my mailbox (I was unaware) -- all my cards and everything was still in there, except for my $40 cash. I was slightly upset but oh well I was happy I got it back.. 
I lost my wallet yesterday morning. I live in a less than ideal part of Las Vegas so I'm never going to see the wallet again.  I don't care about the $89 I had in it, what bothers me is that now I don't have an ID and can't cash my paycheck.  
The debt is not your fault, the system we have in place is to blame. Educating yourself should not be a sentence to debt slavery. 
Did you find out the name of the people at the register?  You should contact the store manager and tell them the cashiers did a great job! 
I would donate to a gofundme for you if someone else made it.  
This is exactly the scenario I imagine every time I find money.  Someone needs that money.  I have to get it back to them.  
Over the course of a few months, I stayed at this one discount business hotel in Kaohsiung City multiple times. I didn't go back for a few more months. When I arrived, the hotelier behind the counter recognized me and handed me the equivalent of $7 USD. It fell out of my wallet weeks ago and they found it and held onto it in case I came back. Very honest. 
Maybe don't use the word "rapey"...? Like really? You weren't raped. Losing money, having money owed taken from your account is nothing in comparison to rape. I'm so tired of people in this sub using this word lightly.  
Hurray!! I'm glad everything worked out for you! I love hearing stories that remind us that there's still good in the world. :D  Celebrate with ice cream!! 
I suppose it makes sense, but it had never occurred to me that it was possible for them to just reach into your bank account like that. I would have done the exact same thing- cashing your check and keeping it in cash so that it can't be taken. I'm so glad that this situation worked out for the best though. Next time I see someone do something shitty, I'll let this good deed cancel it out. 
Good thing you did there with your client, OP! It's almost a rare thing nowadays to see wallets got returned back without anything stolen from it.  But..what about that honest soul who turned in your wallet?    
I was getting nervous reading that.  I'm very happy everything worked out.  For the future you may want to consider a fire safe for storing large amounts of your money at home... Assuming there isn't concern with someone at your house taking it. 
You need a Swiss bank account or something now. Carrying around your money isn't the safest thing in the world. Is there any appeals process or a payment plan or something you could set up so they won't take your money again? 
I'm not sure how it works in the country that you live in, but in Canada, you can file a consumer proposal with your bank that lines out an alternate repayment plan (most banks are quite lenient with this as most of the time they decline this, people end up in bankruptcy and then the bank doesn't get paid at all). This could buy you some time until you get some things figured out.  
First time I've heard of aldi existing in America too. Are they still a discount supermarket over there? 
I'm so glad there are good people out there.  I'm sorry you are having a rough go of it now.  If you ever need someone to proofread a paper I would be happy to do so.  I got a BA in British and American lit.  I'm rusty but will help if I can. 
Reminds me- I had left a personalized bag of my stuff at an ihop, and when I returned, only my wallet was there. Everything was in it, nothing was touched (I had my credit card on me) but the people behind me had taken my bag. It's weird though. Why take the bag (that had nothing of resale value) and leave the wallet (with the money still intact?) 
Have you looked into income-based repayment? If you have federal loans, you are eligible to pay back as little as $0/month. 
A few weeks ago I was tubing with some work friends. Saw something floating down the river so I grabbed it (there were lots of people tubing so we were trying to grab the empty cans that we found). Well, it turned out to be a wallet in a plastic bag. With $374 in it.    Anyway, there were business cards in it so when we got back to the cars I called the dude and mailed it back to him.  And he said I could keep $100. Win-win I suppose.   
Maybe don't use the word "rapey"...? Like really? You weren't raped. Losing money, having money owed taken from your account is nothing in comparison to rape. I'm so tired of people in this sub using this word lightly.  
As an european: Your poor people get $12 a month for food? Is that your so called welfare state? 
I'm so happy that everything turned out okay. I work in a pub and whenever a wallet is handed in a couple of the regulars ask why I don't take some cash out and pocket it myself.   It's unbelievable, they think that if they found it they'd be entitled to the contents of the wallet! Handing a wallet back to the owner with everything in it untouched is a reward in itself. 
This is part of the idea for /r/bitcoin - decentralized means you're in control. 
My bankruptcy was final on a Friday which was payday.  Both my wife and I had direct deposit.  The court cleared out our checking account.  Cut rate lawyer didn't warn us.  
I used to have to drop off a bank bag at a night deposit box and once, it appeared that the person that used it before me had dropped 2 bags on the ground. They were full of cash.   I took them to the bank the next morning and turned it in. I'm familiar with the bank staff so I trusted they'd get it sorted out properly.  Later that day I get a call saying no one was missing any deposits and the money was mine. Turned out to have been small bills, but I got $1700 out of it. For doing the right thing. Someone must have been a bit shite faced 
I used to deliver mail for my university as a works study. Really casual with us all taking turns delivering mail and doing homework. One day I found a girl's wallet in one of the mail bags. Had her ID and about $100, cards and normal stuff. I go back to the mail office and find her sitting at one of the desks with her friends doing homework. I ask her if it's hers and she yanks it out of my hand and glares at me without a word.  Sorry for returning your wallet I guess. 
I love how you put the dollar sign infront of the Mexican pesos but just say USD when talking about actual dollars  
People know you're a decent person? How *embarrassing*! 
When I was poor in undergrad and working shitty overnight shifts in the dorms I found a wallet on my rounds with a fat amount of cash. Trying to be a good person, I lookedup the owner, and took it to him without taking any cash.   He grabbed it from me, looked through the bills immediately, laughed and said "you didn't take any? I would have taken this", and then slammed the door on me.  
My mother has this tendency to walk slow and there has been a lot of times she has found money and wallets on the street here in India.   The money she always donated but whenever she find a wallet she and dad would put in the extra effort to find the person whom it belongs to.   There was this one time she find this wallet with lot of money, my dad eventually found the owner after a couple of days and took me with him to give the guy his wallet back, the look on his face is something I'd never forget. Then when we were walking home my parents gave me the see how a little effort and can make somebody so happy speech. My parents were cool.  
Would it make you happier if I told you I find this incredibly common? Heard of so many instances of wallets being returned intact. Mine too, fell out of my pocket on a highway, truck driver calls up next day, returned it a week later on his trip back that route. Money intact. 
Ugh I once did that: accidentally bumped another car, and left my contact info. Then they tried to screw me over, sending me huge estimates for way more than the damage could possibly cost, and claiming additional damage that I know I didn't cause.  
I've dropped my wallet countless of times here in Vegas and people always point it out to me if they notice it. I've never forgotten it though.  
Oh my goodness; I love this story! The finder handled that so perfectly!  
I wondered about that too. Usually bank accounts can only be garnished with a court order, which the account owner should be aware of... 
At some point while she registered for classes she probably signed something that said they could do this. My university had my bank account info because I would get my financial aid checks direct deposited. You sign so many things and don't really go through everything unfortunately. It honestly doesn't surprise me 
Taiwan is literally the best. Everyone is so chill and nice there.   
Haha, yeah, I'd be the only one with  $400 in my offshore account! Yes, going forward I can and will set up a payment plan to prevent it from happening again. It's just... I scrambled so hard to save that, and now my escape plans are dashed. Just feels like a punch in the face. Totally my fault, it just sucks.  
I do my weekly grocery shopping there. $1.99 gallon of milk is unheard of. 
I have not, but I will look into it, thank you! That payment amount is awfully affordable!  
Well, we have a governor who gutted the program, so his (any many other's) benefits went way down. It's terrible.  
Yeah, for sure, wish I would've jumped on that ship years ago.  
Wowwww! Props to you! You could've taken the money and felt guilty about it, but you did the right thing and still got the money!  
Some people don't like being the center of attention. 
My aunt has a policy that any money she finds goes in a jar and gets donated at the end of the year since it was never hers to begin with. It's a nice idea 
And I absolutely know that you'll have the same experience in the future when you find a lost wallet or purse. :)  
Unless I'm wrong I believe this was levied by the state, school tuition? If it's the government you are screwed.  
Glad you enjoyed it! We were all very impressed at how well the guy who found his bag handled it.  I'm glad my friend let him keep the goodies because the finder was the real MVP of the weekend. 
The credit union could be owned by the university itself. 
Or they could have sent OP a letter about it that be ignored, because it was just one of a more than weekly letter saying OP owed money. When I owed money to a private college, they sent me so many letters. 
There are valid reasons one could fall behind on student debt, especially considering universities in the US never stop taking money from you. 
For people who have the means and opportunity, they really should consider visiting. They won't be disappointed. 
Language isn't static and you even said it was a "centuries-old" definition. Today, the connotation of sexual assault is permanently affixed to the word *rape* and people intentionally use it with that in mind. No one can force you to curtail your vocabulary but to insist that the word solely means "to seize and take away by force" is delusional.     
Man that sucks. The fallout from me missing my student loan deferment ending notification mailers was a kneecapped credit score, but that's better than a kneecapped ability to be independent.  
I know, it's fantastic! I bought 2 dozen eggs there this summer for 39 cents each!  
Huh, didn't know that, thought it was only used for Dollar dollars (CAD, USD, AUD and such). I even did a quick google search before posting and i saw some some weird P with a line through it and just assumed that was used for the Peso haha (apparently it was the sign for phillippine peso i saw) 
Yeah, at least your_ex_girlfriend isn't an asshole 
Well I mean if this person could set $1,400 back I'm pretty sure they could pay *something* on their debt. Usually creditors will not straight up take your money if you are at least putting something towards it, even if it is below the minimum payment.  
Why not charge *everyone* then? Absolutely everyone that uses any forms of shipping.  Just because I was born there and moved away doesn't mean that I am more reliant on the military than someone who was born in the UK. 
I didn't say it "solely means" that. It is ONE of the definitions, but it remains an **accurate** definition and one that applies to this situation. There's no call to chide OP for their word choice simply because it's a word that makes you uncomfortable.   If you can't accept that *rape* is used in a variety of ways with a variety of meanings, then you might want to avoid reading any classic literature, or any environmental tales, as mention of humankind raping the land will send you into a tizzy.   I also say this as a person who not only was a rape counselor in my 20s (for a while, but it took an emotional toll), but someone who has been raped-- in the sexual assault sense of the word-- and who has been through comforting several loved ones who went through similar experiences.   The definitions I referred to are *current* definitions; Not archaic. If you have a problem with that, take it up with Mirriam-Webster's Dictionary.  
Did you not read why was he saving that money? Trust me I would rather own 1 million in debt than leave in a abusive house/relationship 
You don't just give them the title... You at least need a bill of sale, ideally signed by both parties and notarized. 
Yes! This!   Yes, I should have been paying something. But I was/am so desperate to get out of where I am that I made the choice to prioritize my emotional wellbeing. 
This is a very good day for me, a lesbian. RBG IS THE BEST.   
As a straight guy my life and the ENTIRE world is totally ruined by this! How can life possibly continue in a normal way now!? /s  But seriously, **awesome** news!!! :D 
For someone reason I'm just confused about all this. Like there wasn't any public vote or something. I went to bed last night where gay marriage was not legal. I wake up this morning to a text from my friend saying it's now legal. Glad it happened, just confused how it all went down.  Edit. I'm not mad it's legal now. I'm ecstatic. Maybe I came across as against it but I'm not.  
I am in disbelief.  I find myself hesitant to feel _this_ elated.  I have been with my SO for almost 13 years, she is my high school sweetheart.  We have lived together for 7 years, but our state banned same sex marriage, civil unions and common law marriages.   This is a huge milestone.  In my life I have witnessed Don't Ask, Don't Tell, been told it was a phase, a choice, a fad and a sin. I have been assaulted and told it was my fault. I have seen glimmers of hope on the West Coast and Prop8. I have been denied custody of the child who lives in my home and for whom I am a secondary parent.  Today my phone and inbox were flooded with words of praise and congratulations, with tones of vindication, declarations of unconditional love and requests for wedding invitations!  Today is a day of celebration and of relief. 
Cheers! I usually don't post my political opinions on Facebook, as I live on the Bible thumpers section, but today is a different day!   All my homophobic facebook friends/family are gonna be pissed and I might get burned at the stake our something, (It's gonna be fun going to church tomorrow :P.) BUT TODAY WE MADE A LEAP TOWARDS EQUALITY!   Anyway, super happy for everyone! /u/iwinalot7 was definitely on my mind when I saw the news, congrats!  
What's most impressive to me is that *it didn't take a Constitutional Amendment*. But I really hope that amidst all this controversy and celebration, the TPP (or something else) doesn't quietly pass. That being said, I told some friends that I'd set aside my usual cynicism for today, and try to be a little optimistic. I'm very proud of this historic moment in my country's long record of rulings and policies. I'll surely look back and cherish this day for the rest of my life. Let's make sure more like it aren't few and far between. (And I hope the rest of this country can be mature about this, even if it's not exactly what they asked for.) 
My upquote was "Thanks Obama." Seems appropriate.  
I'm an American living in New Zealand. I made sure to stay up (it's now 5 am ) so I could see if _Obergefell_ would be announced today.  When I saw the words "there is a right to marriage equality" I cried. I can't believe the amount of positive vibes from the president, the administration, friends, family, etc.  So proud to be an American today. It's just fabulous! 
Mexico beat you. Mexico fucking beat you. I'm sorry, but I can't stop bragging. For two glorious weeks we were more progressive than the United States, and no one's gonna take that from me.  Congratulations and suck it! 
As someone religious I'm against homosexuality, but whether gay marriage was legalized or not didn't really matter to me. What did bother me was all the hate generated by this issue.  The matter of love was a joke when both sides would resort to offensive dehumanization and demonizing on the both parties. While I'm glad that its over and that humanity can finally focus on moving forward for other issues, I know that just by seeing the state of reddit right now we didn't learn much about respect for *everyone's* beliefs and opinions.   This is the one and true barrier to human peace. 
It's great. Gay marriage was legalized in my country a while ago and the current Pope opposed it calling it an "attack on the family" and a "war against God". I have no idea why Reddit seems to like him so much. 
I hate to be a downer, but I'm also worried for the LGBT+ kiddies in the bible belt and other unaccepting places. I hope they don't face any extra discrimination or violence because of this :(  I'm still hyped af though! 
I just wanted to remind everyone here that the month of June is LGBT PRIDE Month in the United States.  Add this to the list of things to be proud of. 
WARNING: Your facebook feed is probably cancerous at this moment. 
My wife and I recently got married in Vermont, because we weren't sure when Texas would finally be on the right side of history. It looks like they had to be dragged kicking and screaming, but it's nice that our marriage is recognized in the state we both were born and grew up in.  
Very happy about this. Gonna have to sit through a shitty ranting sermon on sunday at church. To make things worst, a Mosque was just built across the street from the church I go to, and my priest is already whining about limited parking now.  Help me  I don't wanna go to church anymore, especially this upcoming sunday lol 
As someone who lives far away from western culture, i've never understand (i don't mean in a negative way) about all these stuff. As in, i don't understand why it's a huge thing....but i'm pretty open minded than most folks where i live. And plus, everybody's happy about this! 
"It's just marriage now"  What about churches that will refuse to marry same-sex couples? 
Well just because it is legal, doesn't not mean anything for the acceptance of gay marriage.  The supreme court just saw that there was nothing legally different between man and woman/ man and man/ woman and woman in marriage.  Many people will still hate the LGB community.  While it is nice that the government supports it, the nation still has quite the distance to go before gay marriage is seen as equal. 
Do you feel we can stop saying lesbians or straight? or other connotations? Or is that just an absolutely silly and stupid thought? 
A lot of people are saying on twitter that they'll be moving to Canada.. but they legalized gay marriage in 2005! That'll be a surprise. But seriously I want to see what the reaction is from the more conservative or religious individuals. :) 
It was declared a constitutional right by the Supreme Court.  Supreme court issues don't get voted on by the public.  Any same-sex ban at the state level is now illegal federally.   edit// yo, don't downvote the parent, they asked a legit question  
Same here.  My parents are anti-gay marriage so I heard all the hubbub when it was voted on here in Minnesota and then it's *bam* and oh when did that start. 
It's been in the news for months. The hearings were in April. We've known for months that this case was being taken on by the SCOTUS and would be decided by the end of June 2015.   I mean, I'm sorry. Pay attention.  
As a straight Briton, this in no way applies to me, but this is still great news to me! A nation as great as the U.S. embracing marriage equality must surely have ripples across the world - and I sincerely hope they are good ripples. 
Please I'd love to see some highlights of your Facebook news feed. All I'm seeing is love and tolerance. 
Canada's had marriage equality since 2005, what do we win?  But seriously, congrats to both of your countries. 
The ***Irish*** Catholic nation of ***IRELAND*** beat us. Join the club. 
What I don't get (and I'm an atheist) is why even bother with marriage as homosexuals? Marriage is a religious concept and all major religions are against marriage other than between man and woman, so why do they want to be part of something that denies them by definition? It confuses me. 
If the complaint about the mosque has to do with parking, that's progress. 
Doesn't care like it affects you not at all, or doesn't care as in you think it shouldn't have been legalized?  Because the first one I understand, I'm not sure I would care as much if this wasn't going to make people I love so much happier. Otherwise I think I'd just shrug and click over to another news article. 
Are you saying that churches should be forced to break their religious laws?    No one is forcing gay couples to get married in churches that don't agree with it.  
Now that it's legal, a reasonable assumption would be that more same-sex couples will get married. With more same-sex couples around the idea of same-sex marriage may become more socially accepted and viewed as normal or closer to normal.  Also, everyone born in the last few years is going to grow up with the assumption that same-sex marriage being legal is normal and good, the same way that almost everyone born after the women's suffrage movement assumes that women voting is normal and good.  You're right that this ruling will not instantly make everyone accept gay marriage but it is a push in the right direction. 
dammit. oh well. I guess it's time to stop trying. Pack it up guys. we're done. 
FYI the quote code is not random; the quotes change corresponding to the first letter in the post title.  Source: we have the same kind of system in the subreddit I moderate. 
Damn that made me tear up a little. That's absolutly beautiful.  
I think we need those labels because people have an inherent need to be labeled 
You forgot the part where you're fleeing to Canada. 
If I was still on Facebook, I would see the above, sans sarcasm, all fucking day.  Anyhow, today's truly a great day for equality and dignity and we all must continue to extend these basic concepts to *all* people. 
This is a great victory, but I think it's important to remember that marijuana is illegal federally, and some States have legalized it anyways.   I think there will still be struggles to face for people in more traditional States. It's a HUGE step, but the fight isn't over yet 
Jesus fuck dude, calm down. Just because one person is aware of things doesn't mean someone else is. Some people like cake, other people don't like cake.  
Is that so surprising? We're not some backwards little theocracy here you know. 
Props to you guys doing that with a popular vote, no way in hell would that work in the US. 
Marriage comes with a ton of legal benefits, such as the right to visit your partner in the hospital on their deathbed. The right to be a legal guardian to your partners child. It is not a religious construct and hasnt been for centuries.  
China. It's quarterfinals so I'm hoping it isn't our last game. 
The first one. And really I just don't care at all so I can't be happy for anybody. 
Yeah, I just hate the idea that something is inherently good or bad; sort of like guns, it depends on how and what we use them for not the fact that it is a gun that is bad.  Normal for the society is much more agreeable in my mind.   
Not saying that, but it will take a lot of time.  A few things that turn me off from the crusade is the pride parades, for or against mentality, and all the fucking stickers.    I guess I just believe that life is what it is, and yelling about something like equal marriage is a waste of effort that could be directed towards more important issues. 
The post title? How does one letter determine an entire thread's worth of upquotes?  Or perhaps you mean the first letter of the comment. Still, the two parent comments of yours begin with the same letter and lead to different quotes (for me). 
which, as a Canadian, always makes me laugh because *gay marriage has been legal in Canada for years*. 
Conservatism isn't a bad thing in itself. On a political level, it is intended to describe people who think you should take more time in passing laws, and should be careful with government spending. It's a pretty simple concept and not nefarious in any way. It's about being slow and methodical and those are good things.   It's the polarization that gives us ignorant conservatives and bleeding heart liberals, and we'd probably make a lot more progress if we stopped letting the media pit us all against each other :(  All this from my perspective, of course 
It's a lot easier to fight for the right of marriage now that the Supreme Court has ruled it a matter of constitutional law. If a state tries to deny a couple their right, that couple fights them on the federal level, and the federal government wins.  Marijuana is a whole different ball game, because the federal level, the trump card, is being played against you, rather than in your favor. 
It's been pretty much the biggest news story of the last six months. Unless you've been on another planet this whole time, you really have no good excuse for being unaware of this.  Even more embarrassing, though, is that you seen to have no clue how your own government works. I'm torn between trying to convince you to educate yourself and trying to convince you to never go near a voting booth. Which is to say, I'm not sure if democracy would be helped or hindered by your participation. If you think that court decisions are things we vote on, probably the latter.  
The Mexican above me is speaking in caricatures and I did the same. I was raised in the Catholic Church and was told I was a sinner. This country has so many different and popular religions and we can't agree on anything and yet a country I was raised to believe was the holy motherland, Catholics are Catholics and that the US is somehow full of Cafeteria Catholics. Just the irony of it in my mind. 
Wow this is amazing.  Thank you for my new obsession. 
I just don't see the gripe you have.  There are too many stickers? Really? Come on. You have to see something for half a second. That's too much. Don't go to a parade, if you don't want to see it. I don't think the community (well some do) if you were indifferent to the whole thing but the for/against mentality isn't LGBT specific. Try having a conversation that begins "America isn't the greatest country in the world"  What issues would you rather people work on?  It's not just about equal marriage. It's about equal rights. There are a lot of benefits to being legally married. Taxes for one. The right to see your husband in the hospital. The ability for your wife to be included in your health benefits. The ability to show your love and affection in the same manner that others are able to.  You can argue that there are more important things, and sure there probably are more urgent things, but equal rights for all isn't some vanity project. 
Yes, same goes for parent comments. Quotes tend to stay the same throughout a whole comment thread with the quote corresponding to the parent comment. 
When I saw the "I'm moving to Canada 'threats'" all I could think was "ya' know it is legal there, right?" and "oh, ya' know how you hate paying taxes...umm..."  Canada is going to send you back COD, covered in maple syrup and poutine, with a puck in your craw.  ;) 
What? We don't need to "fight for" marriage. We just *won*. That fight is now over, for good.  
No excuse. Lol.   I gave my opinion on the issue. You're taking casual conversation into a different area.  
Ah, gotcha. Apologies for being a bit touchy there - in the days following our marriage equality vote last month, I heard a lot of Americans reacting like Ireland was fucking Iran or something. A "Wow, even those superstitious drunkards like the gays" kind of vibe, you know?   To be fair, Ireland has come a long way in a very short space of time. When I was born in the early 80s condoms, divorce, and the simple act of even being gay were against the law here.   Anyway, sorry again for my last comment, and I think we can both agree today is a great day for humans everywhere.  
If you're into tropical climates, you'll love my place. Also, I cook ;) 
I know I make quite a few generalization based on the loud members, but that is what we end up trying to handle.   Marriage has rights, make marriage equal, gives equal rights; that's where I was going with that.  When I was in high school, I just thought that a quick amendment that called it a 'civil union' would have been good enough to get the benefits of marriage, while still keeping the majority of people's belief that marriage is a sacred union between a man and a woman.     As for the stickers and what not, it is more the branding of anything.  TBH I hate all stickers that have political/social agendas directly and indirectly.  Parades made it feel like something special rather than normal.    As for things that deserve more support: Prison reform, adjusting welfare system, increasing disability support, better health care, energy advancements, increasing funding for schools for smarter kids (more programs, accelerated learning, faster graduation).  That is just my quick list. 
I want to flee to Canada if THAT'S the outcome! I fucking love poutine. 
Not necessarily. Some states still have it on the books as illegal, and I would not honestly be surprised if it took those states one or two major lawsuits in federal court to really make it stick. Believing that the fight with the ignorant bigots is ever over is folly. 
Your opinion is ignorant and uninformed, and you should be embarrassed.  
Very true, as have we. Here's a little context from a previous comment I have made, should you care to read it.  .  I am in disbelief.  I find myself hesitant to feel this elated.  I have been with my SO for almost 13 years, she is my high school sweetheart.  We have lived together for 7 years, but our state banned common law marriages, closing our only loophole.  This is a huge milestone.  In my life I have witnessed Don't Ask, Don't Tell, been told it was a phase, a choice, a fad and a sin. I have been assaulted and told it was my fault. I have seen glimmers of hope on the West Coast and Prop8. I have been denied custody of the child who lives in my home and for whom I am a secondary parent.  Today my phone and inbox were flooded with words of praise and congratulations, with tones of vindication, declarations of unconditional love and requests for wedding invitations!  Today is a day of celebration and of relief. 
I take it that you don't subscribe to Plato's idea of an absolute truth? 
I never understood why a civil union was a thing. If you are going to grant the same rights and privileges as marriage, why not just call it marriage. Why have two different names for the same exact thing based on the only difference of gender. And believe me calling something marriage and civil union is very different in regards to law.  I feel that people will say it's completely fine as long as you don't call it marriage. It's like saying murder is fine as long as you don't call it murder.   When the name of the act is more important than the act itself that's a huge problem.  There are a lot of different causes and each one is legitimate.  
Well that's good to know... I think.  Haha.  I was rather young at the time and remember having to walk pass all of the picket signs in people's yards.  
Yessssss keep it up! With a poor diet like I've always had, I'm fortunate to have always been a healthy weight. 
Husky is a terrible name, because it doesn't even necessarily mean you're fat. When I would buy school uniforms by around 6th grade I had to buy husky. I wasn't fat at all in grammar school, I just hit my growth spurt early, so I had to buy bigger clothes. Young me just thought it meant I was fat.  Unfortunately I basically stopped growing though. I was like the 4th or 5th tallest in my class in grammar school, and now I'm just a shorter guy lol. 
Man, I was a fat kid in high school, but fit as fuck in my early 20s. In my late 20s... Well, whatever the opposite of fit as fuck is.   Lesson here: good job on losing the weight, but you gotta watch that shit and keep on it.  
/r/fitness accepts progress pics and such.  then theres /r/brogress. 
Congrats! Great work! Let this success snowball into greater things. Nothing feels better than achieving goals. 
Congrats! The sub you're looking for is /r/loseit   Everyone there would be stoked to hear this story :-) 
For fun, you might also enjoy: /r/ketocirclejerk /r/congratslikeimfive 
Congrats! Really proud of you. I'm like 20 Kgs underweight and really want to get into shape but have been procrastinating for a good 3 years now. 
Congratulations! That's a ton of work, and a huge accomplishment! 
Whoooooooo!!!!! Go you! Always room to improve. Keep it up.  
Congrats with the colossal goals op! Health is definitely a lifestyle choice and it sounds like you are doing well. 
Congrats! I also weigh less now than I did at 12. It's weird to think about because typically people get bigger when they grow up. Instead we're lighter, wtf? 
YOU ROCK! CONGRATULATIONS! Time to treat yoself and buy some outfits to go with that rockin' bod.  
Thanks for sharing!   Congrats from some stranger from New Brunswick, Canada!   Just started back at the YMCA myself. Was getting overweight and decided to, at 40, get back to it. Never too early or late! :)  
This is so awesome!!! That's SUCH a huge accomplishment and you should be so proud of yourself. The amount of dedication and hard work that must take is incredible. :) 
Keep it up!!!  I'm so happy for you.  Things are a little stressful for me right now, so I just want to say that even if things seem complicated and difficult, you will find a way to turn all of it into strength and confidence.  I believe that you can do anything you set your mind to, and I don't need to know you to believe that.  You're awesome, and next time I am procrastinating on my practice sessions, I'll think of your post. 
Congrats! It's funny because 145 is actually my goal weight. Started at 176 this year and down to 163 as of this morning. Over the past three years I've gone from a healthy, yoga and cardio-loving 145 to a depressed, binge eating 176. I knew what successful weight loss looked like, but for some reason I couldn't get the wheels back in motion. Well, they are now and I'm feeling great about losing weight again.  If you ever feel in a slump or you feel like you're gaining weight again, just remember that YOU CAN do it and you have the proof to show it. 
Dude, you're totally me! I was super overweight in high school and the beginning of college, and I hit a 'normal' BMI last year. Gained a few pounds of it back (just enough to tip me back into overweight :/ ) but I'm working on it - gained some muscle mass, too.  Eating a whole foods plant based diet helped (aka being a healthy /r/vegan instead of eating oreos) a lot, especially cutting out added sugar! Keep it going!  
That's awesome!   I've been trying for years and recently found out I have a thyroid issue.  On meds now and have lost 5 lbs.  doesn't seem like much, but it's a start and something I haven't been able to do before!  
I'm so happy for you! Judging by your use of semesters I'm assuming you're in college and I know firsthand how difficult it can be to maintain a healthy lifestyle during that time. Good on you for getting your friend involved too!! Best wishes - keep going! 
So, my story is the same as yours, but opposite. When I turned 16, I was 6'1" and weighed 135 pounds. When I turned 38, I was 6'1" and weighed 135 pounds. Nothing I tried worked. In fact, I tried a 6000 calorie/day diet for a month. I gained 2 pounds, then immediately lost it. Then, I started taking taekwondo. In 6 months, I was at 145, and 18 months after that, 155. I'm a brown belt now (red, then black is my path), and I just weighed in at 164. The difference between the last 4 years and the last 22 is the commitment to working out. Building muscle burns fat and...builds muscle, which weighs a LOT.   Congrats on your success. You're gonna be HOT!! 
nominally healthy?  what does that even mean?  healthy in name only?   
I'm currently age 19, 5'7" and 185. My heaviest was 215 at the same height. I'm working my way down and you're motivating me to keep going so thanks for that. I saw you put up a comment saying you're lighter than 12 year old you and I realized I'm lighter than 14 year old me. 
I've recently decided to start to lose weight, so my first step had been to stop drinking fizzy pop/soda. 4 days in, going well so far 
Great job! I recently lost weight from my heaviest (178 lbs) to my lightest since right before I hit puberty (148). Now I'm trying to build up some muscle mass after losing most of it during my period of weight loss (I lost weight in a very unhealthy manner).  Keep up the momentum! Weight loss is exciting, especially when you get used to your new body. Have you had to buy new clothes? I had to refresh my entire wardrobe! I still need to buy new t-shirts and sweaters. 
Please don't use BMI as a measure for healthy weight for yourself without understanding that it has severe limitations. Calculate your body fat % and just strive to keep it in there lower 20%s. That is all. 
Remember to throw those scales away! Can't see your weight go back up if there are no scales ;) 
All the short guys I know at work are happily married to smart, funny, attractive women, have kids, and pull down really good salaries.   I honestly don't know any short guys who are failures in any major part of their lives. Granted I'm a sample of 1, it's still interesting.  
I know a lot of people use the thyroid as an excuse to never lose weight. But you're basically doing what I'm doing on hard mode. That's way cooler than what I've done! I'm proud that you've seen at least some results, keep it up :) 
Thanks and congrats to you too! My first round of weight loss was 4 years ago so I've had to buy new clothes. I went from between a L and XL to a flat M. Hoping to get to S by the time I'm done. I'd recommend keeping one of your largest t-shirts around (if you still have any) to wear when you're feeling down.  In terms of pants, I believe I've gone from a 40" waist to ~32. It's bittersweet when your favorite clothes are falling off all the time :) 
Yeah, I know it's not perfect. But for me, I feel it's fine. I'm not particularly muscular, so it's at least some degree of numerical measure of how well I'm doing.  Good luck with your lifting btw! I'm hoping to start up on it in a few months or so. 
This is such tripe. Total nonsense.  Unless you are a world-class bodybuilder, BMI is simply a ratio of weight to height, and the overwhelming majority of people will be at their healthiest within the (very wide and generous) range of a healthy bmi  
Won't resent the scale if they just keep up the good work though. Gaining the weight back will only happen if one goes back to how they got fat in the first place. 
Congratulations! I'm a fellow short person, I feel like it's a lot easier for us to get unhealthy since you can put on more pounds relative to size. I'm still a couch potato but I hope I can be where you are.  
Well now you know one lol. Although I'm not that short I'm more in the below average category lol. Maybe that's why I'm unsuccessful. 
How many years did you train before you reached black belt? 
No, taller people will tend to have a higher BMI than they really should while shorter people tend to have a lower BMI than they should. BMI does not differentiate between fat and muscle, period. If OP has been working out for a long period then it's entirely plausible that they were already at a healthy weight. And judging by OPs height the BMI number may be too small anyways.   You don't have to be a world class bodybuilder to have a bit of muscle. You just have to not be lazy.   A good rule of thumb is as follows... Unless you're looking at the increase and decrease in size of a population, don't use BMI. Body fat % is better. 
I could see that happening pretty easily though. Hopefully I can keep up the hard work forever 
I play soccer. Nothing too serious, just joined the local rec team and it's a ton of fun! 
Idk if my height had to do with it but for me it was years of junk food and overeating.  If it's hard for you to start working out or dieting like it was for me, just try baby steps. One of the most helpful things I heard when I started was "if you're dying after a 100 meter run just remember you're still beating your past self." 
On the flip side, it's much easier for you guys to look shredded as well. It takes less muscle mass to achieve the same level of definition of someone taller.  
It was a volunteer thing for me. And I do miss it but it's good to be away and do my own thing for a while. Though I definitely think it influenced a lot of my habits and my life in general. 
8 years, which is pretty much the standard for most kids in my dojo. Adults can get through with 4-6 years if they put in the time and effort. 
Are there tryouts for such teams? I like soccer but I haven't played in about 15 years lol 
That's encouraging! I'm hoping to hit my goal weight where I don't look fat anymore, then start some lifting. 
That's awesome! If I'd been able to train for 8 years I'd be pretty happy about it. I only got 4 years in. I had to choose between the management position at my job and being a student of Shaolin. Also there was some sexist shit and "don't post this kind of stuff on Facebook" and I was like BYE   I trained for more than a year to get from blue to green. They said they were much more stringent on everything compared to most other schools. I was and still am the only woman to get a green sash at their school.   I'm still really sad about leaving/getting kicked out (?? Not really sure which happened honestly)  
Well I'm just a high schooler. Idk if this is a thing everywhere else, but we can join teams that play against each other. Usually around 7-8 teams each with 15ish players, from 8th graders to seniors, but it's really relaxed for high school (elementary schoolers and MSers take it a bit more seriously). Tons of fun, especially since I can join a team with my friends! 
Somthing sounds fishy about that school. You shouldn't have to quit your job to keep advancing. We've had plenty of adults with full-time jobs and family commitments become black belts. They shouldn't have to work around your schedule 100% but if they're not willing to compromise because of the real world, something's up.  If you're ever interested in continuing, I'd recommend searching around for a different school. A good dojo imo is one that satisfies 3 conditions: (1) you actually learn to fight in a street situation, (2) doesn't just hand out black belts for nothing, and (3) also serves as kind of a 2nd family. Plus it's just good to know more than one martial art for real fight applications -- that's why MMA is a thing. 
To be honest high schoolers would probably slay me. Are the teams you join public or are they just school teams? 
I wouldn't have been able to make class a lot of the time. I realized later that my career advancement probably kind of pushed me that way. I need to be available when I'm needed, simple as that.  It's not the kind of school that has classes all the time. Class is 3 days a week. You go and train or you don't.   I'd like to try another school but they'd never take me back, and if they did it'd be way awkward. It'd be way awkward at all anyway.   I'm just rambling lol 
Good luck! Your maturity may be a huge advantage in school. Most of the people I know who went to undergrad in their 30s were able to make much better grades than many of the 18-year-olds, most of whom were learning how to be self-disciplined for the first time in their lives! You've probably already learned some of those critical life lessons.  I found college was a lot easier than high school, so long as you were willing to show up to *every* class and do the work/reading ahead of schedule. (Soooo many people try to not show up and write their papers/lab reports etc the day before they're due. It's much harder to do well if you take this path!)  If you treat school like a job and manage your time effectively, you'll do great.   My aunt recently went back to college at 42 and got straight As for the first time in her life! She graduated with a media/PR degree and ended up with an excellent $90,000/year job!  
Congrats. I'm 27 and I wish I had the courage to go back to school. I think you'll do great! 
You got this!!! I'm joining you in the exact same career change at 30. Feel free to PM me to commiserate! :) 
Nice! Good luck! I signed to join the military and I'm 30. Well, provided my medical stuff comes through. It's never too late, right? 
Good luck! I have a few nurse in my family and they all love their careers. It is very fulfilling from what they tell me.  
I'm also about to start nursing. How much can you potentially earn per year in your country?  I have no idea how well it pays 
Congratulations! I work at a college in Canada that has primarily a "mature student" body. We have a lot of these students attend that are very nervous for the first few weeks, but after a very short amount of time they get very comfortable! The best part is, they are a lot more successful than students coming directly from high school. One thing that I would offer as advice, utilize as many student services as applicable to you. Whether it's tutoring or in-school career assistance departments (during or upon completion of your education), we even have a department for students with parent's that did not go to post-secondary education. You are already paying for these resources, so use them! 
On a side-note, I like how you check your yoga pants for quality! 
What's stopping you, if you don't mind me asking? 27 is nothing. I was at college with people in their 40's, and back in uni days one of the mature students was in his 60's easily.  It's never too late to go back :) 
Don't hold back! I work at a college in Canada and most of our students are considered "mature students."   If you are even thinking about it, contact someone in counselling or at my college, we have a department that can do program advising to discuss the many program options with you. 
Yea, I've certainly thought about it. I've got a BFA in art and would want to go back to get a teaching degree. Might do it within the next few years. I'm getting married this June so my funds are a little tied up at the moment lol   My plan (eventually) is to go into the Junior College near my home and sit down with someone to explore my options.  
I was recently married too. I know the feeling!   When you are ready to go to school, make sure to contact their financial aid department to see if there is any way to secure some free money - scholarships, bursaries etc. We have a lot of people that don't take advantage of them and have literally $1,000s left over. I can't say the same for whatever school you're interested in, but it can't hurt to find out. 
More info on this? How would I approach asking about this as a student? Would I ask at the begining or end of a quarter?  I am interested in asking about this but don't want to come off as tacky because I'm not completely sure what you're saying. 
I do the same thing. It's kind of like a 'Thank you for taking time out of your day to respond to my post' kind of thing. 
That's the courtesy upvote. The old guard here still does it. 
I do the same!   I think there are more of us out there than we suspect.   
I find myself trying to upvote those that respond as well, but I still feel that the comment itself has to encourage more discussion as upvoted comments are supposed to. It's because of that most of the responses, both to my stuff and my own responses, should be adding to the conversation to be upvoted. 
I do the same thing! There are times where I'll be posing a question that has multiple options and as long as the opinion is expressed in a respectful and clear way (aka not trolling, etc), I will upvote the comment because even though I may not agree with it, it is a nice addition to the conversation and it is good to hear what other people have to say about a certain subject. 
I'm really bad at up voting :( it's not that I don't want to I just forget to all the time. I need to practice that more. 
How to karma:  Step 1 - Reply to each one of /u/ultracrax's comments.  Step 2 - ???   Step 3 - Profit 
I have basically the same thing. I actually posted here about it and it was my top post for a while. 
I'm going to start commenting on all your posts now. 
This is why the people on CasualConversation are awesome!  I do the same thing, it's cool seeing that it's a somewhat common thing.  The only stuff I will ever downvote are really hateful or uncalled for comments. 
I did until I had a post that got a lot of attention. It didn't make it to the front page, but it made it to the top ten of the "hot" category within its sub. It was a little overwhelming.  
I'm like you too. I know upvotes are anonymous, but I do it as a way to acknowledge I've read their comment. 
What if they're just like, "Shut up, bitch"? You upvote that?  How about "This" or "."? 
I do it too but it's not a thank you. It's my acknowledgement that I got the message. It's disheartening when you write a comment and there's no indication that anyone has read it. 
Me too!  Just before looking at this post, I checked a comment I got in reply to me providing some advice. They said thanks but they didn't upvote. :( 
Whenever someone answers one of your POSTS.   Plural.  
My threads usually end in null. The simple fact I get any upvotes or comments means that it was given even a small bit of recognition, good or bad. I feel like any message I get or post reply message I get could potentially be someone tearing me a new asshole. It's nice when it's friendly, so I upvote. 
Here's something even more rare: I never downvote. Never.  Why would I downvote? What does it matter? If I don't like or agree with something, I go do something else. 
Oh yeah? I bet you also give gold to people on occasion...  "wink wink" 
I also like to upvote the parent comment of any comment I upvote, just seems right to propagate credit upwards.  
I'm relatively new to Reddit so haven't quite got into the swing of up/down voting. I've upvoted a few posts because I agree or because I like it. What do you do if you disagree with a comment? Still upvote because they interacted or downvote because you disagree? 
Same here. Even if they are disagreeing with me so long as they aren't flat out insulting. 
It's a weird habit, but I use it as a way to keep track of what I saw and read on reddit. I rarely ever downvote anyway. 
Oh, I just found it and tried to upvote it ;)) But it seems to be archived. 
No it doesn't look like you're getting an upvote. You ARE getting an upvote. 
Yes totally! Once I got downvotes in a Black Ops 3 comment section for a simple question. (-30 something). Then I asked why I earned so many downvotes: The result were -40 on my next comment. 
Yes, I had posts like these too. However, I tried too. 
All you have to do is be civil and I'll like you. In fact, having a civil discussion with those who disagree with me can be a really pleasant and even memorable experience.  
Exactly! That's another benefit from it. I realise this on posts that come out BIG. 
Haha yeah it's an oldie. I was pretty surprised it got so popular, I guess people are attracted to threads titled "I upvote almost everything" haha 
Haha sweet, I thought you were gonna burn me for a second 
Absolutely. I would never learn anything if I only listened to people who agree with me.   
Wow I always wanted to meet a veteran. How many meme wars did you survive? 
Plus, another benefit of using RES is it keeps track of your upvotes. So if I ever see another user with a green +1 next to their name, I immediately think I must've already read/liked something s/he said before! It's always a nice surprise. 
I already anwered it in my post. However, for me it just shows appreciation for taking time and means "Thank you for interacting with me!" in my eyes :) 
9 months ago  you must have felt the same way like me at the moment. I never imagined it would get so many upvotes ;) 
There's always a reason for being mean.  If you have depressions or any suicidal thoughts, please feel free to contact the suicidepreventionlifeline.org !  I hope I could help!  +1 
I do the same. I just did an ask reddit about this. We need to upvote those with contrary opinions to us or else the comment tree will not show up. If we upvote those we disagree with, the whole thing will be more likely to be read, and replied to. 
Lol. I actually wasn't particularly active in the community aspect for a long time. Just as a source for information. So I missed out on most of it. 
No, but it is a good movie. Watch it with the wife.  
Isn't that what you already mentioned?   Oh I just googled what RES is. Wait, does RES make upvotes green, or are you colourblind? The upvotes are red...  If not, go visit r/colorblind  Edit 1: Ohhh, never mind! I just read your conversation with u/puttysan . Now everything makes sense.  Edit 2: I just downloaded RES. How can you see the green upvotes? 
Haha yeah but now I have a few posts that scored higher :p free updoots! 
T_D's mammoth sized leak makes me way less willing unfortunately. They ruin so many threads  
Alright. Yes just like me. But you know, here and there I visit some funny subs. A few memes never hurt nobody. 
I will keep that in mind.  But we are making our way through Harry Potter first!  
Nice :) I'm surprised you're only at +3 for me. I see you everywhere. 
It's a shame, really. T_D started out as trolls that were actually making fun of the fact Chetto Tinyhands was even running. Now it's just bots and shitposting for easy karma.  
Holy, 11 years over here!   And very little karma. Is this an alt or you're just more into lurking? I've only started contributing comment-wise over the past couple months, myself.  
I'm not sure if that's a good thing or a bad thing. :) I'm by far the most active on this sub, because I love the community.  
Cool! You grew up in a rather rural area right? ;) 
Actually I was born and grew up in the capital - Sofia. Though ?I live in the suburbs it is still an urban area.   What made you think I had been living in the rural area?  
came from Askreddit, seems like my kinda place.  **INITIALIZING: MEGA LURK** 
I feel like I've walked into a room with a bunch of friends to hang out 
Welcome everyone, do not forget to be nice to each other. :) 
Thanks to guibmaster for pointing out this nice subreddit. I think i'm going to like it here :D 
Hi everybody new! I'm makin' bacon pancakes. Warm, meaty, cakey goodness for all.  Unless there's a bunch of you. I only have two lbs of bacon.  
A sub that might help bring me out of my shell! Hi everyone, keep doing what you do cuz it's cool :) 
So comment for the mods, having experienced a sub jumping from 20k to 40k before (took a few months of course). And assuming that you've never been through that, which you guys may very well have in some other sub..  But anyways the 40k mark seems to really be where the occasional trolling starts. But it will all be fine, so long as you keep doing what it seems you have already been doing :), and add more resources (mods or automod functions) as they seem needed.   These referral sort of situations seem to have a tendency to first create a large spike, and then continued growth snowballing from that initial spike.   \*Oh wow so make that 10k+. The busy should even out, but def something to keep an eye on, not sure how doubling in a *single da* would affect a sub :\ 
How do you create a new post? The "submit link"/"submit text" buttons in most other subs aren't here. 
Definitely want to check out this sub, seems like a neat way to start the day. 
I'm here specifically because it was mentioned. I've been looking for a sub like this for a long time. Probably gonna stick around. 
Looks like it's going to rain for a while here. How's the weather where you are? 
I don't know how any of this works even after I read a lot of it.  
I discovered this Subreddit with it, seems like a nice place, I'm gonna stay here :D 
Bad askredditor, no lurking. Mandated chatting for all.  
Is anyone even capable of being mean when everyone's so nice?   What's the worst this sub has seen? 
Bacon pancakes? Wait, that's a thing? Why have I not heard of this delicious food before?    
*casually pulls down lurker cloak* but social conversation scares me.  
Mostly!  We get mean in a passive aggressive way, it's funny going to the States and seeing everyone so blunt and honest, makes me smile.   
Nothing really, chilling with a beer and watching the Scotland football match.  
I wouldn't call it work XD  I just made a comment. 
I think it is a bit too staged, i really like it, but some things are a bit too much.  
Ah, you're from the UK too? Whereabouts, if you don't mind me asking? 
Shetland Islands originally, but moved to Aberdeen a few years ago. What about yourself?  
This is a really good idea, you're a pretty swell OP.  My resolution was to start getting active, and I did! I'm in much better shape than I was last year, but I've kind of lost it all over christmas :( It'll be easier to restart this year than it was to start fresh last year though which is a plus. 
OP this really touched me for some reason, I'm very cynical by nature and don't believe in New Years resolutions, but this year I just might make one... AND follow through on it. 
I'm piling more gold onto your haul. Reddit can be a very negative and discouraging place sometimes. Thanks for bringing so much positivity into the world! You've uplifted more than just the people with resolutions from last year.  
Wow, all these people you're following up on... This really makes me want to think of a good resolution and do it, but I'm terrible at making up goals. 
OP, this is an awesome idea! I'm curious about something though. You had to post a lot of these on this thread, and the formatting is super consistent. Did you use a bot to make the comments here? 
Will you be doing it again for this year. If so here's mine:  Go to the gym more  Eat healthier.   Stop masterbating.  
Yep. I stayed out of the hospital this year (I really hope the fireworks won't be so bad in Hawaii this year, that I might have an asthma attack and break that record).   Next year's resolution is to continue to stay out of the hospital and lose/keep off weight. 
A lot of it didn't get achieved. Things didn't go according to plan, some backfired terribly, and others just never came to fruition. I'm gonna make it my goal this year to be relentless!    
Well shit.   I'm making the same goal again this year.   This is the second time my porn account has been gilded.  
Somehow, I managed to achieve this goal, and will be attending the University of Pennsylvania next fall.  Also I love you for doing this 
Not quite, but close! My daughter is due in about 2 months. 
Thank you! I was so close to achieving this goal, even made it on the team at a D1 school, but due to roster issues, I couldn't run this year. :( I'm glad I made it this far 
Oh I forgot about this! Yeah I acheived this over this summer with a girl I liked a ton. You made my day man, happy new years! 
Haha I totally forgot about that!!  Currently weigh 168lbs so not too bad! Thanks for the reminder of that, made my day! 
Oh wow! Thanks /u/_kashmir_ I did achieve my goal. I asked a few girls out. Got a few rejections. But I also started my first longer relationship. She took my virginity. She gave me confidence. She gave me love. I felt worthy of love. But it didn't last. We grew to make each other unhappy. We both tried to make it work, but we couldn't make each other happy and give each other what we needed. We were together for 8 months. I'm glad we were together and I'm glad we're no longer together. Now I don't feel so lonely anymore. Now I have greater confidence and feel closer to my friends. I know myself better, my flaws, my strengths, what I love, and what I can't stand.   But I still have the lingering feeling that any girl who likes me has some deep emotional flaw in her.  
I actually did get a job! My self image is improving but I'm not quite there. Thanks for doing this! 
Damn. Some wake up call this message was. Forgot I shared that goal online. Unfortunately the editing took a lot longer than expected and it's currently being read by beta readers now. I did however write a second novel instead of just waiting around for my beta readers to finish. So it does suck that I still haven't gotten it to agents, but I'm glad that I adapted to my circumstances and made an instantly new goal of writing another full novel in thirty days and I did accomplish that, thankfully. 
Whoa. Thanks. I indeed started living. This past year i went out of my comfort zone, I'm in a relationship. I've been to different places in the world. Reconnected with family.   I'm very grateful for your gesture.  
Oh, wow, a year already? How quickly time flies!   I actually did join a Skype group that helped me learn some Chinese and I was able to hold a conversation (albeit short) in Chinese! New Years goal partially accomplished! 
Lol wow forgot about that.   I am closer to taking his job, but also applying towards other positions with other companies. So sadly, still close to where I was, but only slightly better.   Thanks for the message, it made me realize how little I am getting done. A bit depressing, but a good kick in the ass.  
Completely forgot about this! I'm glad to say that I passed my gcse's with an A in the course I'm studying (graphics) and at least a C in all of my other subjects. Now I'm studying the course I wanted to, although at a different college as the one I planned on going to cancelled my course before I started. I hope you had as great a 2015 as I did and I wish you an even better 2016! 
Yep! I actually have surpassed that which is good, 2016's goal is to finish writing a book! 
We are still waiting on that EP /u/MyPrivateNation189 
Way late but I do have a very wonderful boyfriend, we've been together for a year, and we are currently apartment hunting. I lost my job then worked a shitty job for 4 months and have now been at a wonderful new job for a month so the apartment got delayed but we are looking. Hoping for an April 1st move in date! 
/u/sawakonotsadako1231 san, kono tsuite ni oshiete kudasai ne. 
I have done, basically, none of it. I am terrible at goals. 
Not exactly. I did start the project I wanted but the part of making my own life is on hold atm. I can't believe you remembered but thank you. The fact that a year has passed since I wanted to do this is making me think of more stuff. Hope you have a happy new year  
Wow! I totally forgot about this! Unfortunatly I had to undergo knee surgery before the season (yes as a highschooler) and I was unable to complete this resolution. 
I completely forgot about this! 2015 has had its ups and downs but all in all it was a much better year than last year was for me. Met a lot of awesome people and did a lot of awesome things. Here's to a good 2016 and beyond! 
Man, thanks for posting about me! I feel like I've learnt a lot, and adopted a lot of new positions. My years been alright, I haven't been doing anything too crazy, but I've booked a trip to Tokyo this summer, and while I technically wanted to do something insane a bit out of the ordinary last year, I think this will count, even if it ended up being  2016, rather than 2015! 
As a matter of fact, I've had a very successful year. Thank you for this, it's a great way to reflect on how life has changed in the last year. How was your year? 
I've got to say that's the first time I've been called a god damn big pimp, but I like it!  
My pleasure!  I will check in with you next year and hope to hear you've reached your goal weight. Best of luck! 
Good luck brudda.  I managed to lose ~30 pounds by changing my diet (smaller meals and more often small snacking), next year will be (hopefully) the last 15 pounds 
I will be checking in with you this time next year ;)  Best wishes for 2016!   
Yo, could I PM you if I decide to go there? I'm applying in a few days. 
You need another 60 days just to satisfy the deliverable you already committed to last year? According to the Gantt chart you have an obvious resource constraint on the project. Why would you have had only one mother dedicated to this?    Assigning another 120 women to this gestation would get it done in 12 hours, but we only have 3 consultants available at 100%, I think we can get that wunderkind Alice from Bob's team on this after 6 if we get it catered. Let me handle that. And the rest you're just going to have to make up in efficiency. I think you're going to like the new IDE the consultants are bringing along. All right, good meeting! 
I would say you did make it! Getting pregnant was the key, having the baby only gave you 3 months to get pregnant.  But congrats! 
Do It! Just Do It!   **DO IT!**  And share the damn thing already. 
Your first paragraph was one of the best written,most well balanced and uplifting reviews of a moment in someone's life I've ever read. It showed progress, maturity,  happiness and a great outlook on life.  Your second paragraph was a kick in the teeth, negative thinking that you don't need and will set you back.  I don't know you but tell second paragraph guy to sod off and get his head out of his arse.  Be first paragraph guy, he's awesome. 
I won't be online tomorrow (traveling), but I'd appreciate if you could add me for next year  - lose 20 pounds   - don't smoke tar cigs again (starting e-cigs in a week)  Thanks :)  
If it makes you feel any better, it's actually 2/3  
Glad to hear things are going well for you! Where did you travel? One of my favourite quotes is: *Life begins at the end of your comfort zone*.  Happy to be of service :) 
My floors thing was 'swole is goal' I think we all failed lol 
Big congrats to you! Good luck finishing your book, I've got no doubt you'll do it :) 
Since it's impossible to quit reddit, there really only is one thing that could have happened. RIP! 
2016 is your year! Choose two or three goals instead to make it more manageable :) 
That's unfortunate about your knee, but hopefully you'll be able to complete it in 2016! 
What do you do to train?  I have been training to get my 2 mile to 16 min and just recently hit 17.5 min.  Any tips? 
This sounds like it could become a tradition, then get really fucking depressing.  And I'm selling the screenplay! 
You just gave him a member of a predominantly Muslim ethnic minority that mostly inhabit the Xinjiang region of China. 
As a part-Uighur I gotta say uh thanks for the exposure? 
TFW being well liked isn't realistic.   Jks yeah SMART is a good system  
If I put all the people who like me in a room, you'd get pretty bored being alone after a while.   Jks it's not that bad luckily.  
With one guy, you can have a kid in 9 months.  With 9 guys, you can have a kid in one month.   Basic math, people.  
Yeah, do not share your bit on reddit. At all. Your sharing needs to happen at a club, not on here where something that could propel you into a different career path could be stolen at whim. Just two cents from someone who has walked that road :)  
At some point it just stopped changing letters and just threw the same nonsense words with q in them at me repeatedly. That got old pretty fast. 
I got a higher paying job with more hours so it was more achievable! How did your resolutions go? 
Will do. I know i can finish ASOIF, watch  more movies, and read more books. This is the year. 
I have to have my 15:56 2 mile run in national guard. So I can just tell you it sucks. But all I do is I run every day. I don't beat myself up if I miss a day. But if I miss two days then I feel bad. I just have to keep working at it, because running has always sucked for me.  I use an app called map my run that tracks your course and how far you go. I use it to try new routes, find out where I want to go and how far it is. It's pretty nice to just go without the intention of saving anything for the trip back sometimes too; run the 2 miles and walk back.  Not OP but I thought I would share what I do. 
I only had one, sorry. They're super hard to catch. 
Dude you just answered a huge question for me.  My new boss seems like he's afghani or something but he's not, and someone said he's from China or that the Chinese took his family's land.  Maybe he's one of these guys.  An upvote.   
You're totally welcome. Thanks for being cool about me using your ethnicity for karma! 
Wait, so you have a baby, you just can't hold it yet.   
As a nurse, I'm not quite sure how that goes. But hey, I've been known to be wrong before! 
Add me!   * a simple flat belly. I cant achieve abs so a flat belly would do!   * visit Japan  * learn japanese, cantonese or german 
Ask him about the food.  The Uigher community has their own style of cuisine and it is delicious. 
Trust me. You can impress people with this knowledge! 
Hey man, the one Uighur per comment law is intended to help preserve their population for the future.  You don't want Mick Jagger to have to explain to your great-grand children what a majestic Uighur once was using only drawings and crude hand gestures, do you? 
He often goes on about food and said European food sucked.  He said kebabs and Turkish food was good but for whatever reason he's never really said where he's from.  He speaks something that doesn't quite sound like Arabic.  He's definitely Muslim and has family all over the world.  I think he's one of these upvote people.   
You just need a big bowl of very salty soup followed by that liter of water. The salt will make you retain water and the weight will stay on for a couple days.  
They do indeed! It's something we've had in the works for a week or two now, and it's finally a part of the sub :) Glad to hear you like it! 
I asked you guys for quotes yesterday ;) upvote some comments, look around and try finding your submitted quote! 
This is seriously cute and just makes me want to upvote everybody for the little message :O 
Ohhh that's what those were for! Hahaaha I'm going to up vote everything looking for this is sparta! 
I can't personally take credit for some of the awesome recent CSS changes, but I can tell you as a part of the mod team it's really great to hear you're enjoying it! I love the snow too - perfect for getting into the spirit!  (I also won't be having a white Christmas - it's just rain, rain, and more rain here!) 
Because you knew what the upvote on yoir comment would say? 
Oh god...  Guys, fix this please.  One of the upvote lines is "You're genius is showing!"  FIX. THAT. NOW.  It's "Your", not "You're". How do people make it out of school without knowing this? This is basic grammar.  ...Sorry. Please fix it though. 
It's okay, shes just jelly because I mod high quality discussion subs like /r/circlejerk and all she mods are terrible maymay based subreddits like /r/casualconversation 
They're not Windows. It's a standard that Windows, iOS and Android (among others) implement. 
My very special cat has been missing for over 2 weeks now. I live in a pretty small town but no one has seen any sight of him. I miss him so much, I keep hoping he'll walk up on my porch and everything can go back to normal. God I miss him so much... That's so cool you have your cat back, 6 years is a crazy long time. I hope my cat comes back sooner then 6 years..!  
He looks in very good shape. Do you think he had other "owners" in the interim? 
Awh congratulations! That's amazing. I would cherish him so much. Does his brother recognize him? Does he recognize you?  
That's amazing! How did the vet recognize him? Is he microchipped? I'm so happy you were able to be reunited! 
Our outdoor cat (more of a farm cat than a pet) got hit by a car a few months back. Basically disappeared for a week.  Then one day, bam, she shows up at, like, midnight when I'm hanging out with some people. Slight limp, cut in front of nose. A week later, no limp, cut healed. As far as I can tell she didn't even break anything.  That cat is twenty two years old. 
When I was younger our family dog found a hole in our fence to our neighbor's yard, and their fence had lots of holes into the outside world. He would sneak out while we were gone and then when we got back we'd call him from the back door. It'd usually take about five minutes but he'd always come around the corner of our house, panting and acting like he'd been there the whole time.  One day I was watching him through my bedroom window, which faced the fence, and I watched him approach the hole, look back and forth like no one was watching, and then wriggle his way through.  We patched it after that. 
Why don't you post this story to r/Cats also?  Is he chipped?  I know you said he ended up in the back of someone's van, but how did you even find that out, and what was your Mom told when he answered the call and then went to pick him up? 
Congratulations! We just found our cat after believing she wandered off and died. She's indoor/outdoor we hadn't seen her in about 6 months. I got locked out the other week and went to the neighbors to use their phone. Our cat!!!   They said she was in their driveway one day so they took her in and she liked 24/7 house life better. Her name is cleopatra now.   This is the second time neighbors have kidnapped her. The first time it was a crazy older lady who stole lots of neighborhood cats.  However, we recently adopted a puppy so we allowed Cleopatra to be adopted by the neighbors.  
If you haven't already, sprinkle some used litter from his litter box around your yard. Also set out a box with your worn clothes in it. Scent plays a huge part in finding lost pets.  I lost a cat a few years back, and I read through hundreds of pages about finding lost cats so I have lots of advice if you want some, just let me know. 
I'm so sorry to hear that. I hope he makes his way home soon. Is he microchipped?   Have you asked neighbours to double check garages?   Missing a pet is the worst feeling.  
My dog went missing for three weeks. We hung posters and all that, but also kept the door open. Three weeks later she came in the middle of the night and opened the door. Best fucking moment of my life waking up and seeing her.  
I had an indoor outdoor cat who didn't come back for  an entire winter. I loved him and we were devastated.   He came back in the spring and was fat..... He got locked in someone's garage or barn and was well fed.   We also moved twice and weren't allowed to have pets so we left him to some farmers to be a mouser. A year or two later we moved again and got him back again!   It was such a rollercoaster for such a small creature. He lived many lives and lived to be 15.   But we thought he was gone lots of times! Russian blue named ashes. Cats are excellent at taking care of themselves. Don't give up! 
When this happened to me, I left tuna in bowls on my porch and around my house outside with water and would check at night to see if it had been eaten or see what was eating it until I got my cat back. 
See, now I feel a bit bad.  My dog was found on the street and no one came to claim her at the pound after several weeks, so we got first pick for adopting her.  What if her family still misses her and wants her back?  Then again she was found without a collar and is a breed of dog that tends to be abandoned according to Wikipedia. 
Yes! Well kind of.  An old lady was feeding him, she became ill so has gone into a care home, she asked her neighbour to continue feeding him. It turns out that he has a flea allergy so the neighbour rang the vets and mentioned he was a stray and they said they'd scan him. The neighbour was shocked to say the least since he had been around there so long. They didn't keep him in at night and he's a bit scruffy looking and underweight but he's not deathly underweight but he's a big Tom cat! They called him Fred lol :)   He might of had others feed him along the way but this is all I know, he's been on a long adventure  
Wow! This is an amazing story. Cats are really good at surviving. Indy is a lovely name.   We went around asking everyone to check their garages or if they had seen him, it was unlikely he'd been run over since we don't live close to a main road. Then one very rude neighbour said "oh it must of been your cat", a carpet fitter she had hired, had a cat bolt out the back of his van that Benjie must of curled up inside and he had kindly called her back and asked her about it but she just shrugged it off. We left posters and went door to door where he had gone missing but he never found his way home.   I definitely will! He's a very sweet cat who loves tummy rubs more than his brother :)  
Holy shit. When you said he came running up the hill, I instantly had flashbacks of Homeward Bound. Thanks for making me cry this morning, jerk.  Seriously Congrats! I can't imagine how your kids must feel!  
He's been very hesitant around the other cats and there has been some hissing so I don't believe they do which is sad. I think he does? He certainly recognised my Dad, none of the cats really like my Dad as he's loud and Benjie wouldn't go near him, and to me that says he recognises us?   I can't get enough cuddles he must be sick of me!  
I swear farm cats live longer than other cats I've heard of. I've read a lot of Reddit comments about their barn cats living super long, with or without veterinarian assistance (shots, etc).  
Yes he's microchipped, it's so worth getting done.   We asked around and the carpet fitter had rang the neighbour whose house he was working at as a cat had bolted out the back of his van but we only found this out by asking around.   My Mum thought that they had either found Benjie dead or he was alive as its not the vets we normally go to. But it turns out he's alive! She was given the details of the lady who had been feeding him and we went up to go see her and thank her. She was a little upset to see him go as he's a lovely cat but we're going to send her some flowers and a photo of him  
Sadly I got rid of any litter he used before, but that would have been a great idea. I've been out every night shaking treats and calling his name, I've attracted all sorts of other cats except him..I have hung up posters of him but no one has called about it. If you know any other tips please let me know!   I miss him so deeply. He's been an indoor cat most of his life, he adjusted the outdoors really well but it rained one night when he went outside and I had unfamiliar family over and I think he lost sent of home, that's my guess at least..  
Oh lord my heart aches thinking about him surviving through the winter without me. Don't scare me like that :(  But you give me hope, people are right when they say they are good at taking care of themselves, I love him like crazy I just have worried mother syndrome lol  
Look at it this way, you've just taken a lost dog home so even if he is technically still owned by someone else you're still doing the right thing by taking him in and giving him a home. You are his new family and I bet he's happy with you.  
Hey OP, maybe this is my app but it says page not found when I click the link. Is it working from your end? I'd like to see your kitty! 
Nah, the hissing is them figuring out his place in the hierarchy is all. They probably remember him. 
Yes. I'm not sure why I'm being downvoted for suggesting a spiritual sister sub. But oh well. lol  
Someone in the neighborhood may have also taken him in. I hope you find him. I've experienced something similar and it's a horrible feeling being separated from a pet so abruptly.  
A Maltese.  It's a small, white, yappy lapdog breed. 
I never knew cat hierarchy was a thing. I always presumed the cats got on or didn't. How does it work with cats? 
I'd never seen that sub before but now that I've checked it out I can see why you'd suggest it. Just based on the name it sounded like you were taking a jab at OP. 
A lot of people have been saying that and I'm starting to think that, I would rather someone be taking care of him then he's hurt or stuck somewhere hungry :(  And if that is the situation I hope they give him back to me! He's very affectionate and unique, a lot of people love him.. 
Not really.  We live in a small town, and we have a bit of woods at the back and a creek.  The cats are indoors-outdoors.  I know all about the hazards, so please, nobody bother telling me about them.  I can't in good conscience have any living creature and never let it breathe fresh air or see the sky.  Also, I have never met a total indoor cat who was not sort of psychotic.  He was allowed to roam...his usual routine is to run out around 7:00 in the morning with our two other cats and then return about an half hour later for breakfast.  So he did not run off so much as explore somewhere he should not have.   
Like the other person said, it might be worth going around and asking your neighbors. When our cat went missing, it turned out a guy on the other street had taken him in. Our cat is mean, however, so he ended up bringing him to a shelter haha 
I have a cat that likes to sneak out door when it's open. He'd run out and I'd try to chase him, but he's too quick. Usually he'd be back in an hour or so, but one time he was gone for three days. I called the shelter and the vets, but nobody had seen him. I live in a city, so I assumed the worst. On the third day, he was at my door fatter than he was before. I can only speculate that somebody thought he was a stay (we have a lot of them) and tried to take him in. Only he pulled the same BS he did with me to them. I hope that's what's going on with your cat. 
Ah, makes sense. It's a shame he was trapped for so long. When he leaves at 7 with the cats, do they walk your son to school? It would be cute if they left when he did. 
He doesn't wear a collar or anything, he's so incredibly adorable anyone would want him as a pet. If that is the case, I'm hoping he's being fed and taken care of and he's dry and warm. I hope whoever brought him in their home gives him back to me ):  I wrote on my 'missing' posters that "he is very much loved and missed and we want him to come home" 
Mine doesn't wear a collar either because he hates them. I hate that people have to do this, but offering a reward might prompt people to return him faster if they are keeping him. 
Haha, nice job man. I'm kinda in the same boat except I have yet to tell her. We hang out regularly though, so some day soon I hope I get the courage.   
Hell yeah, bud. Congrats. I accidentally read "art fair" as "air fart" and said what the freaking fuck? But then my brain unfroze and all was well again. Have fun! Don't worry too much!  
Men like you are the reason I get up with a smile in the morning and a spring in my step.This made my day.This here proves traditional yardsticks to measure a person  mean fuck all  when your character and gut to keep trying outweigh everything else.Congratulations brother 
I hope you don't mind but I'm totally stealing the phrase "holy fuckamole" for future uses. That's awesome though! 
Congratulations to you dude! It seems like these feelings following a 'confession' never changes whether you're a teenager or an adult. Also, kudos to you for letting your feelings known instead of rejecting yourself and thinking you're not good enough. I'm glad you didn't text her in the meantime when you waited for her reply. Have fun at the fair and just be yourself! 
Nice job man. Just keep being you and everything will be fine. Just a bit of friendly advice, don't put too much pressure on the date. *Almost* treat it as if you guys are still just hanging out, that's what did the trick for me when I got some unexpected dates. The best thing is to just continue being yourself, don't try to change any of that up. She said yes for a reason, if you change shit you won't be able to find out what that reason is. 
Nice job dude! Im sitting here in a full train with a big fat grin on my face, but they will never guess that I just read some amazingly uplifting news. Thanks for that :D! 
I only hope you dont get too worked up over it. Obsessing over a girl or putting her on a pedestal is a good way to scare her off. Dates are a good way to see if you guys can have a laugh together. Take it easy and try to enjoy each others company and see what their made of. Enjoy yourself, dont take it too seriously! Remember, if you guys cant laugh and smile together, it wasnt going to work out anyway. 
Honestly no time like the present, strike while the iron's hot ya dig.  Just don't be one of those freaks that lashes out like a complete asshole if you're rejected cuz that's not cool at all. 
i hope it all goes well for you!! tell her face to face cause she might be waiting for an answer as well heehee! :) 
Same for me, we really got close over this past semester, but I'm not going to see her until school starts again. I don't know where I'm gonna find the courage to tell her how I feel 
Dude no kidding, I was wondering if I was just some goofy outlier or if it's always gonna feel like high school for those few minutes where you're wanting to tell a girl how you feel.  I'm pretty sure it would have been 100x smoother if I had just done it in person tho, so I'm just going with that from now on.  I didn't even consider texting her again when she didn't respond cuz it was like "well, she's either at work or got freaked the fuck out enough to never speak to me again" lmao.  And MAN thanks for that middle sentence you have no idea how much that means to me.  I've had some seriously pervasive issues with self-loathing that has paralyzed me from approaching women so, so many times.  Being able to climb over that wall is legitimately a huge deal for me. 
Well this is probably by far the most embarrassing thing on my Reddit account so that's alright LOL 
Oh yeah totally.  We talked a little bit about the whole "don't want it to get weird if it doesn't work out" scenario so I wanna make it as easygoing as possible.  I'm a simple dingus so all I know is how to be myself anyway, and like you said if that was good enough then hopefully I'm all set. 
Oh no I totally agree.  I learned a long time ago not to do that.  I'm definitely nervous but not... freaking out I guess.  Let's say cautiously optimistic??  We've hung out 1 on 1 enough that I'm already sure that it's gonna be awesome.  Just a matter of not doing something catastrophically dumb I guess, whatever the hell that could even be. 
I wasn't planning on telling her over text messages so it'll have to wait a few days haha. She's coming over next Thursday, maybe I'll tell her then.  And no worries on the anger part, I'm not like that thankfully. I've been rejected before by someone else, I can handle it!  
I don't know how long that means you won't see her, but why not invite her to meet up somewhere to do something fun together? Thinking back I've done that too. We had a two week break so I invited her to go play pool and it was really fun! Plus, you can use that to gauge her interest in you a bit.  
I like to bring in the cannoli element, personally. holy fuckannoli. 
Doing it in person is definitely the recommended way. Feelings are difficult to convey accurately through messages and they can be misinterpreted. It's not a bad thing to have the butterflies; it probably means you're not too jaded out by the world of dating, haha.  I'm glad that you've overcome that barrier! I'm sure your friend sees something good in you or else she wouldn't say yes to the date. If you think about it, no one would consider someone that they feel like they're 'settling' for. For all you know, she might be hoping that she doesn't screw up the date tomorrow! We're all rooting for you! 
Yeah.  Smart.  The text message thing was dumb as hell on my part.  All it did was amplify the anxiety of the situation like tenfold.  Plus I'm better with my mouthwords than my... fingerwords?  Whatever I'm dumb but you got this man it's gonna go well for sure.  FOR SURE 
Well she lives about 2 hours away from me, but she's gonna be volunteering at a camp all summer, that's about 8 hours away. I did manage to meet and have dinner with her day before yesterday (I was on my way out of town and was passing through where she lives) and we both had a good time. She leaves for camp this week, and gets back two weeks before classes start.  
Well this is interesting, around here my friends use "holy fuckaroni", with macaroni. I had no idea there were other versions haha 
Yeah, I already kind of shake when I ask her to come over, I don't think I'd survive telling her I like her over text without a heart attack.  
Oh hey! Nah I didn't. When it comes to moments like these I get scared at the thought of even saying it. It's a fear I'll have to overcome very soon!   As for our time together though, it was really fun and sweet. Ended with us laying side by side, my head on her shoulder, playing Life is Strange. So it's not all bad :)  
Aw, that's not easy. I guess beside texting there isn't much to do. All I can think of is video chatting maybe. Be sure to make use of those two weeks between camp and school :)  
Ahaha I feel that dude.  When I finally hit send I literally threw my phone down and went for a run without even checking to see if the dang message sent because the idea of sitting there waiting to hear my phone beep was making me borderline nauseous. 
I was just browsing the top posts and came across this, I was intrigued, if a bit late :P  That does sound like a lot of fun, I can see why you'd be nervous about doing anything when it seems like you've already got such a good gig going. However, that does sound like youre already pretty close and maybe she wouldn't totally against the idea anyway...   If you really do want something more, do yourself (and maybe her) a favour and don't wait too long, you may regret it. I'm nobody to tell you what to do, but that's definitely what I'd say to myself if I could speak to past me. Good luck :) 
Top posts huh, I didn't realize this thread got so big haha.   But you're absolutely right, I shouldn't wait too long. I'm still figuring out the how and when and where in my head, but in the meantime I'll just keep having her come over as much as I can. After next week we won't have to worry about college anymore either for a few months, so that should give me all the time I need for that!  But I appreciate the advice! It's in line with what some friends have been telling me. I just gotta do it.  
Always happy to help :) Nice long summer without college, plenty of time to make your move. Good luck man, I hope it goes well for you :) 
Thanks! Since this thread is apparently so high on the top posts I'll leave an update here once I've made my move. I'm forgetful as hell though so if future readers here don't see any update, don't worry, just pretend it all went well and I just forgot to update :) 
I am in college now in my third year, I think back to high school and think "what was I thinking?", I think back to middle school and think "You were an idiot!", I even think back to freshman year of college and think "wow that could have been handled better". I have made an effort to live my life so that one day when I am a bit older I look back and think "You did alright kid". 
Are you kidding. I've been having these kinds of thoughts since the fourth grade. Fucking terrible. Anyway I know for a fact I was a real asshole in the past. I've swung the other direction now being paranoid that I'm not being considerate enough to others and constantly trying not to over compensate but also making suuuuure they know I'm taking their feelings serious. I apply this to every interaction. It's crazy and I already know I need meds so you don't have to tell me. 
All the fucking time. Especially reading old emails or messages... Sometimes cringe worthy... 
 I always do this. I KNOW in two years time, I will think back to this very moment and say "why the hell didn't I do this or that" etc..  I suppose that's just the beauty of hindsight 
I was actually thinking about this the other day and I've been wondering what I'll do next that I'll look back on and think 'how naive'. 
As a transgender, yea. I look back at my old female self and feel great seeing how far I've improved as a person, mentally and in a self awareness way too 
Can I just talk about a new realization I had. I started at a new job about 4 months ago. It was very hard at first, and I wasn't understanding why people weren't helping me out more. I mean, I was new, I didn't know anything about our processes. A coworker was helping me with something and told me to instant message another person. So I started typing out the message, and she stopped me. "Why are you saying it like that, have you ever talked to her before?" "No." "You have to be nicer, you can't just go into it asking for help." I realized how much of a difference just being excited to talk to someone mattered. Someone reading what you wrote doesn't tell the whole story, they want to feel like them helping you makes you excited! Like you couldn't have done it without them. My job has gotten so much better after that realization.  
52 and I think I have only figured this out as I approached 50.   Looking back, I sometimes play out in my head how my Life may have been different if I had made different choices in my past, but if I had I wouldn't have experienced all the things I have.  The hardships and poor choices  moulded me and prepared me for what was next to come. They made me stronger, more resilient, compassionate, and understanding of other who are struggling. Because of this, I do not wish they had never occurred.   I'm sure in 20 yrs I'll look back at this time now and see there were things I could have done differently now, but today I am trying to do the best I can given what I have, and that's all we can really expect of ourselves.  
I came across this quote that seems to fit here...  "Life can only be understood backwards; but it must be lived forwards." - Soren Kierkegaard   Thank you for your thoughts. It was lovely.  
Thank you so much for this. I'm trying so hard to create a better version of me because this version isn't that great. I really appreciate the you putting into words what that journey looks like.  
Hahaha, you sound a lot like me.   I don't know if I'd say crazy.. to me crazy is when your mental state overwhelms your morals and intentions in a negative way. To me I'd say you're just a perfectionist and someone who's decided to make a change. It may be a difficult and intense approach, and therapy wouldn't hurt.. but as long as your intentions are good I wouldn't call it crazy :) 
Why does it have to be that way though? Why is it that you can ask someone to do something for you and the will be cursing under their breath but if you package your request cleverly enough and with the right words they will do what you requested with a big smile on their face and may even forget that they are helping you or doing something that you've asked of them. Sometimes I think life would be better if we were a tiny bit more robotic and tone didn't have such an effect on us. 
I love that!! Great quote! Thank you for sharing it  
For what it's worth, I agree with you. I am a very analytical person and tend to come across mean, or bitchy. I'm a 27 year old woman and the expectation at work is for me to be sweet and bubbly all the time. So I've had to learn how to fake the "bubbles" because it's what people want.   I make it work for me by making it like a puzzle in my head that I need to solve (how do I approach this person?) , rather than try to understand why people need to feel good all the time.   I realize after typing this you could probably diagnose me with some kind of personality disorder but in my real life, I'm not bad at all! It's just in emails/when I'm working on an issue at work, I get very focused and forget the human aspect.  
Wow... that is removing emotion from your request.. this would be terrible (IMHO).. the reason this matters is the reason there's a difference between a polite request and a demand..   learning proper social skills is also a necessity for being a decent human being let alone a contributing member of an organization or society as a whole.. 
I see what you're saying but it isn't that. First, I don't regret middle school I guess, just early high school so I was a lot older. I was just so out of touch with everything and just made a complete as shay out of myself on literally everything I did, but at the time I didn't think of it that way. I'm glad I've changed but I'm still mad at how I was such a colossal fuck up 4-5 years ago and it feels like that person wasn't even me anymore. 
Simple training, in school you are not trained to write requests with flowing praise for people who haven't even done anything yet.  
What is wrong with "You have a function here, serve it?" 
That's absolutely true, I don't think you deserve to get anywhere by demanding things. I just think that there are lots of people who our society judges as assholes because they very well might be, but they may also be exceedingly good at what they do. I think that in some corporate settings you can get so far with a smile and good interpersonal skills that it may make our jobs less merit based overall.  
Generally, but not always, those colossal fuck ups and mistakes made in our youth are stepping stones to learning.    If you don't make the mistake and learn the lesson when you're young, chances are it'll happen later in life when the consequences have more impact.    So even when you were a stupid kid, you were smart to learn whatever the lesson was, early.    Pat yourself on the back! 
"Love of my life, will you marry me?"  "Yes! ...uh what are you doing?"  "Hold on I gotta post about this on /r/casualconversation." 
How long have you been together? Have you ever lived together? Proposed over skype? Do you have the finances for the ring? Can she fit in a rowboat? 
Congrats!   I think picking the ring together is a good way of going about it. It's something she'll wear for the rest of her life, so she better love it! 
With loud heart pounding in your chest,  You said those words so fluently,  Without the time for peace nor rest,  "My dearest, will you marry me?"  &nbsp;  A smile appeared now on her lips,  And tears began to flow so free,  She wiped them with her fingertips,  "I will, you mean the world to me!"  &nbsp;  "You cannot know how glad I am,  How much I stressed but days before,  If words could phrase just how I feel,  Then I have never loved you more."  &nbsp;  _____  Again, best wishes! It's always a pleasure to hear good news, so I thank you. 
Congratulations! Non traditional proposals are the best. Makes your story together even more unique. 
How did you two meet each other? Initially in person then became long term or online? 
Long distance... Skype... Sounds like a Catfish situation. Have you met her? She could be wearing a mask. Or... Is the Skype camera always in a weird position, slightly above her, so it's looking down, to make it look like she doesn't have a double chin? You know that way fat chicks take selfies to hide the fact they're fat. 
Congrats! best wishes to the two of you. What made you decide she was the one? 
I also have a long distance Skype relationship with a girl from Nigeria. She is a princess with millions in the bank and high up in government and stuff. She sounds a bit like a young lad whose voice is breaking to me but I was told by all my progressive friends that I'm being racist and sexist for even entertaining a doubt, besides females never lie. She asked me to marry her. Now that is pretty non-traditional in her society, I read Nat Geo so know this. Also I have to buy the engagement ring using Western Union to a jeweller in Lagos which is nontraditional too.  Should I say Yes!!!? 
Thanks! I feel like the luckiest guy in the world. I feel like she's way out of my league, but she loves me anyway lol 
Tess, my favorite fashion woman! I'm currently in England and it's great and all but I CAN'T EXPRESS MYSELF (fashion wise) BECAUSE I NEED TO WEAR A THICK WINTER JACKET. 
Good poem! But it could be heavily improved by saying "so fluently" rather than "such fluently." Such just sounds weird.  I really like the last paragraph (stanza?) though, it's got some damn good flow to it. Great job! 
We met on World of Warcraft. We've been together in person a few times. I'll be visiting her again soon.  
We've been together in person a few times. She looks just as amazing in person as she does on Skype.  
Damn OP, sounds like you need to deactivate your Facebook, lawyer up, and hit the gym. Just in case.  
Funny part is once I started wearing a ring, I got hit on way more.  
This is my favorite comment ever. This is amazing. Thank you.  
Exactly. We as a society need to get rid of the self-defeatist concept known as "leagues." There are no such things as "leagues." 
I don't think it's self-defeating. I'm an extremely confident person but I feel like my girlfriend is way too good for me. Just way out of my league. I just think she's so amazing. I told her I thought this about her the other day and she laughed because she said she thought the same thing about me. I don't know what you'd call it but I definitely don't think it's self defeating. 
Kind of. She stayed with me for just over a month one time and I lived with her then. It was great.  
I HATE Adam Sandler. His whole thing is just... ughhh 
Don't we all. I only watched up to 50 first dates willingly. And in hindsight, even the movies I liked were awful. 
"They make it so majorly important, that they focus all their life only on that person."  I was wondering why this bothers you? I ask because my boyfriend is the only person I really want to be around. I could spend more time with my co workers or friends but I honestly enjoy being around my partner more, so I choose to spend the majority of my time with him.    
When I was 11 I took a sticker of a teddy bear with angel wings and put it inside my dad's metal lunch bucket. 18 years later it's still there, although horribly faded.  
I was very artsy as a child & constantly drew or made things for my Dad...and he kept everything. One year I went to a craft fair with my Mom & found this tiny little woven basket, no bigger than 6" tall, that I just *had* to have. As soon as I got home, I went to work on a special present for Dad. I took some green paper, drew a bunch of flowers, colored them with my new cool color-changer markers (the ones that would change when you colored over with the white/clear one), cut them out, & glued into a circle to place inside the basket like a bouquet. I gave it to him & I am not kidding, they stayed proudly displayed, though eventually very faded, on a shelf in his "rig room" (he did ham radio as a huge hobby & had a room in the basement for it all) until the day he died. 
When I was little, I drew a face - in ink - on the wallpaper that we had on our stairway.   My parents were FURIOUS, and I got into major trouble.   Time went by, and my parents replaced the wallpaper.    More time went by, I grew up, and my parents moved out of that house.   I helped them pack - and when I was clearing out a chest of drawers, I found a small piece of wallpaper with the face I'd drawn. 
I visited my dad last summer, it had been six years since we had last seen each other. When we finally met, I said it was sort of weird, seeing each other for the first time in 6 years. And he said something along the lines of, "Yup, it's been 6 years, X months, and about Y days I think". He knew pretty much exactly how long we had been apart, he had remembered the day I had left i guess. That was one of the many things that made me realize just how lucky I was to have an amazing dad like him, and I can only hope to be as cool as he is one day. 
Now its your turn, show him that you love him ! You don't really have you spend a single dime if you can't, dad's appreciate everything 
My dad has some knick knacks we made in first grade for fathers day in his office :) 
LifeSavingProTip: Dont hang stuff from the mirror.  
I deliver pizzas for work and around the time I had to leave, my car decided to make a new song out of clanking metal and so I asked m y dad to borrow his since I didn't have enough time to diagnose and solve whatever the noise was.  
That sounds amazing, and then the end made me feel incredibly sad. But it sounds like you had a great relationship and that's all one could ever ask for. 
Wow 6 years? What kept you two away from each other for so long? 
lol, im sorry but i was gonna actually say something nice and heartfelt about your dad being proud of your graduation achievement but then you filled us in on lucrative food delivery job.  
you drive your personal car while delivering pizza's? 
That looks like a XJ (1983 - 2001) Jeep Cherokee. If you need help with it, try posting in /r/cherokeexj  They're awesome over there and as a fellow owner they've helped me out a bit.  
It's actually pretty common practice here in the U.S, as far as I can tell. From what I remember when my dad worked as a delivery man about 15 years ago, they also had to pay most of their own gas as well.  There were nights he couldn't really do his job because he couldn't get enough tips to pay for gas. 
Yeah. There isn't a company car that we use. I never knew that was a thing. 
Where do people not drive personal cars to deliver pizzas?  
I delivered pizza for years. Always drove my personal car. 
As far as I know, today the employers pay for your gas 
Well in Iceland every company that delivers food has cars for there workers 
Pretty much everywhere except the third world country of The United States. 
In my place, pizza outlet will prepare some mopeds for delivery, so they only worry about the delivery and weather and the outlets will cover the fuel and maintenance 
So pizza delivery guys get paid $2.50 an hour and still have to pay for their own fuel in working hours? No wonder people don't tip in a country where minimum wages actually goes that low. In my country the minimum wage is like $11 dollars, and a business could probably get shut down if they forced people to pay for their own fuel. 
Ah okay I see. Yeah here in the U.S you usually use your own car for pizza delivery work but I'm sure there are places that give you a car. That would be nice.  
New Zealand, we have mostly personal cars to deliver pizzas. However, the company reimburses fuel.  
In many parts of the US a moped is an impractical, death trap. You're driving a low powered motor bike on gravel shoulders with cars flying by at 45-55 mph.   It's great in big cities with 100,000 people in a 5 mile radius, but we have a lot of spread out suburbs. 
Dominoes is finally starting to get some company vehicles but I don't expect that to take off far from large cities. I've only ever seen one so far and they started that about a year ago. 
Where I live you don't need a license to ride a moped on the street, so most of the people riding them are the ones with a few too many DUIs. 
Here in Italy that would be very illegal. Which doesn't mean it doesn't happen, but at least you can point at the bit of the law where reimbursement is clearly prescribed.   Most businesses around here just have a fleet of cheap scooters, so they all have business insurance. 
Oh lordy. Bad news. I'm 42 and still have nightmares of forgetting assignments, where my class was, did I take the final, did I actually graduate college.   
Thats what I felt about high school.Its like all the phone calls I got from school to home  just suddenly stop and you don't hear that buzz in your ear anymore from teachers like an annoying fucken mosquito at 2am.Best way to describe it is a good emptiness. 
Back to grad school man! I'm starting grad school this August and it took me two years to get in. I'm nervous to get back into the academic mindset. 
I teach a class with people between 30 and 72 y/o and asked when this dream goes away. They said they'd let me know.  
I've felt like that over a decade later. It's a really common nightmare actually if you look it up.   Doesn't help me that it almost actually happened to me. It was my last semester and I was taking a really easy class I needed to graduate. Was skipping most of the time. Had the wrong day in my head for the test. Happened to check the class schedule 20 minutes in to what was actually one of the three main exams. Ran a dead sprint to that classroom, got there with 20 minutes left in the class, and was able to BS enough on it to get a C on that test. If I had missed it fully, would have gotten a 0 and would have not walked at my graduation date for being one class short,  
Graduated on Saturday as well. I still have the feeling that I have a term paper due monday. Can't shake it.  Otherwise, how was your graduation? 
11th grade right now, can't wait for school to end.   At least in uni I'll study subjects that I actually care about  
Man, I'm a week away from handing in my final work, and just shy of a month away from being finished with art university and graduated! Do you miss having work to do at home? Some mates who were in the year above me told me how weird it is to just be free and without purpose in the afternoon without homework. 
At a lot of schools, you have to turn in the "authorization to graduate" form sometime between graduation and midnight that day.  It can take up to 6 months to get your transcripts and diploma if you fail to do this.  Double-check the small print on university's policy website.  Not really :) 
You ever have that nightmare where you discover that you signed up for a class you forgot to attend all semester?  
There is, you forgot about it. Quickly get on Canvas!!!  I once dreamed I took a class, forgot about it, and didn't show up all semester and failed... 
Congrats on graduating! I bet that's a normal feeling - I'm still studying but at the start of each summer holiday it takes me a while to adjust to having nothing to do. 
I have a recurring dream that it's halfway through the semester and I realize I'm enrolled in another class that I have yet to attend or do any work for. 28, been out of college for over 5 years. 
I definitely occasionally have dreams where I forget classes, where my classes are, or my high school locker combination. Though it is a huge relief when I wake up and remember that it can only be a dream anymore. 
I've been out of highschool for like 5 years now but I still live across the street from it. Some morning I hear the bell and freak out thinking I'm late. One day I got all the way to the door when I remembered I don't have school nor do I have a backpack.  
I like that phrase, "a good emptiness." It's like those days where you're schedule is completely free, so you can sit on your ass and do nothing.  
Good luck man! I'm sure when the time comes, you'll get back into it in no time.  
That was my move! Tried two years outside of education working a few different jobs before ultimately deciding that the 8-5 life isn't for me. I missed the research, paper writing and seminar discussions.  Wound up going back for an MA, now a year into my PhD studies. Hoping to become a professor and commit the rest of my life to teaching and learning. People criticize that lifestyle but I really don't think they understand. It's a bit like joining a monastery. It's unorthodox but I love it.  What are you studying in grad school? 
Ho-Lee Shit man that's crazy. I'm glad the professor gave you some slack but damn. It's insane that you can fail the class by missing one 15 minute presentation.  
It was great. It was kinda surreal the entire time, like looking back it never actually happened but it did. I was real happy to see a lot of my classmates so we could bitch about our finals week one last time but I was pretty bummed that it would probably be the last time I see them. But it was great experience. How was yours? 
Wow, a lot of people here seem to have the same type of dream so you're not alone on that one.  
That's fucking insane. Sorry that happened to you. All it takes is one simple thing to ruin a good day. :/ 
For me, it's something very similar. In the dream I am aware that I have not gone to the class all semester. I meant to... I just never did it. And now it's the day of the final.... and I'm late even for that. Just this overwhelming sense of regret and panic.  Same goddamn dream. Never happened in real life. I've been out of college for 15 years. 
Idk man, maybe it's just me, but I start to hate that feeling. I start feeling strangely guilty about not doing anything, and then have to find some activity to keep my occupied.  
Thanks dude! Grats on the graduation. What're your plans? Going to go back to grad school or start working? 
Dude my ideal job would also be a college professor. It seems like it would be a really awesome job. I'm getting my masters in clinical mental health counseling. Then I'd like to get a Ph.D in neuropsychology, or clinical would be cool. But I decided to go for a masters because I think it's a good middle ground. It's enough to be able to have a decent job with decent pay if I decided I don't want to go any further. 
Are you all done with college? What's your next step? 
Same here. And I never had that happen to me back when I studied in university. Yet I have reoccurring dreams of somehow missing a class all semester and I won't be able to graduate if I can't pass it.   I graduated more than 20 years ago.   Weird how so many people have the same nightmare.  
That sounds like a good plan! You can always reassess a year from now as you're finishing up your MA (assuming a two-year degree?). There's a lot of flexibility in being a masters student. It's not too late to make a move in any direction. 
Yeah, it's like 2.5. I start in fall and end in fall. I'm glad to be getting it out of the way. I'm tired of living paycheck to paycheck. But I guess that's how being a doctorate student is anyways haha. 
Uh, yeah... You know how I said it's like a joining a monastery? That includes the vow of poverty.  I'm hoping to make 55-75k as a tenure-track humanities professor when this is over, but it's a tough job market. We'll see what happens. 
What are you getting your degree in? Isn't it a bummer that you go to college for like 8 years and only make 55k. While you can go to a coding boot camp for three months and make like 70k off the bat. Sometimes I wonder if I fucked up. If I was making how much my programming buddies make, I would be hellbent haha 
Will you stick to the nice Reddit, or show them the more interesting parts? 
If they're backing up shit posts they really don't know reddit :P  Good suggestion, nice trick ;) 
I guess we'll see your stuff also showing up on /r/HailCorporate then.  I look forward to the day when my glasses have a built-in ad blocker though, because marketing is one of the worst things about modern society. 
Thanks for adding more spam to Reddit.  Mods are going to love you! 
I hope you're paying for sponsored posts, because I'm pretty sure what you're admitting to doing results in a perma-ban around here. 
So in the near future you will become part of the group of people who are in no small part responsible for the decline of this site. Nice. 
What are you guys selling?  Try to sell me your product!  As a sidenote, just an hour ago I placed an order with a company that approached me through reddit. They weren't pushy or anything, the guy just said 'hey, check out our website, we can beat that price by quite a lot'.   
Stuff is less fun when you're paid to do it.   You went from:  * Sneaking in a some secret Reddit time. With the fear of getting caught, and the thrill of getting away with it.   * Getting screwed if you don't Reddit enough.  =\  
Remember to always use a throwaway when being stupid then. Specially now that your job "is" reddit.    And remember that even simple firewalls and proxies can track what you do, so event though you are clear to reddit, the IT department can track you, throwaway or not. :) 
I technically don't get paid *to* be on Reddit...but I totally get paid while being on Reddit.   Way to beat the technicality.   What specifically are you looking for, data-wise? 
If you spend all day on reddit, what will you do when you get home and sit in your apartment in front of the computer for another 4-6 hours? 
I've thought of marketing/working on commercials as a possible direction for my career once I get out of high school. How exactly did you get to where you are today? Did you have to go to college? Any other advice? 
OP, why did you start your title with "So"? Where did you learn that you're supposed to do that? 
If we send this to the frontpage, im sure your collegues will find it!  
Interesting callout, I'm on a BI team too.   Apparently there's some way to get location data off of twitter of facebook posts for people who know how to datamine that stuff.  Someone on my team wrote an app to get a general idea of how much 'excitement' there was for a new product by area.  During a new product launch we under estimated the demand so they were using this twitter app to basically say -- don't just stock stores that want the product,  prioritize stores in areas that people are excited about it first.   
Ill think ill err on pc reddit.   Seriously considering trolling on 4chan tho 
It really is a good marketing channel though. Especially to highly educated demographics. Not for consumer products tho 
Mods don't care, neither does most of reddit. Let's be honest, we keep upvoting things that could or could not be advertising, as long as we find them mildly funny or interesting. I'm personally fine with that. 
For me personally i think its a great idea. Differentiation since competitors wont touch this with a 10 foot pole.   But since i cant tell what the demographics are of nsfw subs its hard to argue for it.   Probly wont 
Depends.   Send me an updated resume specifically listing your best shitposts.   Please include relevant transcripts in pepe format and dank certifications if any   
What damage could they possibly do, that hasn't been done already? Reddit has been steadily declining *a while*. 
Err .. you really want to try visual analytics and data mining consulting?? 
I get social security so I guess that means the government pays me while I reddit lol (I crack myself up) :) 
I recommend you go to college just for that piece kf paper. HR people are dense with no understanding of nuance.   That said go to lynda.com and start the class online maeketing fundamentals.   Tell me if your interested. Ill send you a 20 day trial.    
You need to sift through r/4chan to find the most disgusting posts imaginable then bring them up at work and imply that the whole website does that. 
Some are easy. All anime and cartoon porn subreddits are targeted by 20-something otaku guys (medium income, prone to piracy), fetishes don't have a specific range but are easier to manipulate, Gone Wild subs are obvious market for fleshlights... what exactly are you selling? Maybe we can help. 
Shit, I have 80k comment karma. Most of it gained during work hours.   I dont get paid to Reddit like you, you glorious bastard, but my mid 40's boss walked by once and saw me redditing, and asked "are you on Reddit?" I nervously replied "y-yeah". To which he responded "I *like* Reddit" and walked away.   Idk man redditing *at* your job is great but when redditing *becomes* your job that's when I'd get nervous.  
I've been around a long time. I am the oracle of the forgotten history of reddit dawt calm. 
Show them clips of those news reports on /r/jailbait 
Were not gona go up to redditors asking them to buy our dank memes or anything. Im just using reddit as a means to rank higher on google.   We plan on submitting quality posts (thats what the scientists are for) on various subreddits to encourage awareness, reposting and my little ponyfan art (the erotic ones). We'll be providing professional level services for pepe~esk endeavors of redditors and will generally just have a grand good time with different communities    
Well, look at the Tesla and Google Fiber hype. I'm sure that's probably mostly justified but it's still incredible marketing. 
i think it highly depends what you want to do. reddit is good (at least in my opinion) for two things in this regard: either very, very targeted advertisement, or community creation (but in this case you really need to know what you are doing to not create shitfest). creating community may be really good, but from the other hand - even one slip and people may turn against you. 
I don't understand how sooo many people have the time to reddit on the job. When do you do your work?   I check reddit and comment once in a while but only on coffee breaks or at night after work.  
Good for you! I found it fascinating - really. It did seem rather a sad tale though :( 
It really is.   I don't even think it would be a deal today. Saydrah genuinely loved reddit and stuck to the guidelines that were in place at the time in terms of how much unrelated content to submit before submitting your own company's stuff. But once reddit picks up pitchforks they don't like to put them down.  
While you're at it, there's some settlements that need help. I've marked them on your map.  
I have a very much deadline based job. I guess the difference is that very rarely i have too little to do. So any minute I waste, I often have to make up for in overtime. So if I reddit all day, guess who's spending the weekend in the office. Also people would notice and I'd get in trouble at some point. It's not that I don't do anything other than strictly work - I read industry related news, articles that interest me etc. and then even some private stuff like doing all my payments, answering personal emails as well.   It's just when people talk about the amount of time they spend on reddit I get confused on how they hide that from colleagues and bosses. And how nobody notices they get way less work done than they should.  
Aren't you hating that? I would be incredibly depressed and frustrated if I went home every day knowing I wasted an entire day just sitting at the office doing nothing. I mean not doing anything is great - when you get to do that at home or on vacation. But at the office... Just sounds terrible to me. Had one job a long time ago where I sat around doing nothing quite a lot. I loathed that job.  
Oh, it does suck, but I make myself busy with personal projects. Lots of them.  I've also been job hunting for a few months now. After 10 years it's time to move on. The job hasn't always been this slow but the last couple of years the workload has been getting lighter and lighter... this does not bode well. 
Hey listen, though  If you have a good product, people will buy it.   Prove yourself through good content, you know?   If your showin off some software, is your software able to lead itself? Can she generate content fit to the delicious standards for those subs?   im hi 
It's probably because I'm still awake at 5 am, but I laughed way longer than I should have at that.  
Are you hiring? I just resigned (today!) from a stressful 24/7 IT job and could do with something like that for a while. 
I have literally no idea what is going on in this series of posts.  I'm a waiter, and a pretty smart guy, and it seems to me that there's this vast economy of buzzwords out there that I have literally no idea how to cut into, though I feel like if I were to, I'd do pretty well.  I guess that's pretty ramble-y, but it's frustrating. 
I envy your reaction. Mine was: "Huh, I've never heard of that plugin before." 
I don't think we are, though we could use IT people. We only have two guys, and they're really part-time IT (much like myself and another guy who just know more than most).  
To me, words are just words  And they're not even the important part. It's the sentence they make, and the concept they convey 
When I upvoted you, it said "Shh baby is ok". Anyway, great job on actually asking her. It doesn't matter whether or not you weren't super suave or anything like that. What matters is that you actually did it. Finding the courage is always the hardest part. 
I have an embarrassing story for you. I had convinced a cute girl from university to come to a party at my house, lots of drinking. I got more drunk then I meant to but she thought I was cute and somehow we ended up alone in my room. you know how sometimes when you're around people and need to burp you do it quietly in then sort of blow the air out? This was me at the exact moment she leans in for a kiss and I blew my hot burp straight into her mouth.  
congrats! I'm extremely socially awkward and get tongue tied all the time. So, I'll always be saying really weird things. Once I pronounced "Downton Abbey" as "Down town abbey", on the same day, I referred to Ben & Jerry's Ice cream as Tom & Jerry's Ice cream. Once, I tried to say "blood" and it came out as "Blod"... Things like this happen everyday, they're not really stories, but these things have added up...  
A couple years ago I dated a gorgeous woman who's comically out of my league, because I had the balls to ask her out.  She told me she didn't get asked out very often, which was shocking to me... but apparently there are a lot of cowardly dudes out there.  If you want something in this life, the least you can do is ask for it. 
That's actually similar to how my cousin met her now husband.  He sat one seat closer to her every day, until the final day when he asked her out. 
Honestly - you did good. Seriously. Rejection is a part of the dating scene. You win some, you lose some. After a while you will win more than lose - so that's good.  You should be proud of yourself for jumping that hurdle and taking the hit and still stand. I know I'm proud of you!   You stay in the game and keep asking --- it'll happen :)   I wish you all the best!   *Nana internet hug*  PS: I thought your technique was good btw --- :) 
SHE'S CRAZY! I'D TOTALLY GO OUT WITH YOU!  Look, there's plenty more fish in the sea and I have no fucking idea what I'm talking about because I'm a socially awkward 15-year-old who can't find the balls to talk to girls. Don't listen to my advice, **I'M A DETRIMENT TO SOCIETY.** 
If this was one of my romance novels... she would have said yes =( lol. But I'm glad you asked! I love random spontaneous stories like yours. Maybe it will help you gain confidence to talk with girls?  
Aw man, I'm sorry it didn't work out for you! I can tell you though that I've always respected the dudes with the guts to actually ask even if I've said no.  Also, getting a no is usually nothing personal. She just wasn't feeling the same instant attraction you felt. It's not an in-depth indicator of your personal worth of anything.   Anyway, good try, and good luck with the next one! You'll get better at it as you go, no worries. 
Too late for me, graduated a week ago. But am going to community college so I can try my luck there.   But man. I don't know if she was being nice to me but damn. Damn. We smile when we look at each other. She's not mine. But you gotta move on.    Good job though. I didn't have any gonads to do it  
Haha, at least you attempted so you can't fault yourself for that. :) I'd probably do the same thing, but alas I don't even have the courage to admit things to the girls I have a crush on.  
It's great that you had the courage to try! Ultimately,  this is what dating is,  talking to people,  and then asking them out if you think there is a spark.  It can be awkward, especially in the beginning, and the people will not always respond.  But over time you get better at (1) judging body language and (2) asking people out in a way that isn't totally awkward. In the last two months I've been rejected by a few guys, and rejected a couple myself.  That's just the way it goes.  Not everyone is a perfect match. But the more you get out there,  the less scary it will be.  Being comfortable asking people out also can stop you from getting those drawn out crushes on someone who is completely unaware.  Because if you ask the person out,  and they say no,  then you can just move on. I find that way better than living in that limbo of uncertainty.  
there is no shame in getting rejected. swinging for the fences and striking out is better than striking out with the bat on your shoulder.  the most important things are to forget about it quick and hold no resentment. some people aren't in to you, other are. just like you're in to some people and not others. the sooner you recognize it isn't personal and you shouldn't feel bad the sooner you'll ask out someone and they'll say yes.   
There's no terrible segue.   I've said some weird and stupid shit, but when the question was asked (and if she was attracted/interested) the answer was yes.   If the answer is no, it doesn't mean you did something wrong, or said something weird or "creepy"(who am I kidding this is reddit). It might just mean (bluntly speaking) she's not attracted to you or she's not interested. Nothing wrong with that on either side.   The important thing is you tried.   Unfortunately, it's still up to guys to make the first move. If it comes off as weird, IMO it's not your fault. You tried. You *have* to try.  
I have an experience every bit as awkward as yours. There was a girl I knew who liked classical music. At that point of time, I used to listen to a little bit of classical music because of living with my parents. She once asked me out to go with her to a classical concert. I'm usually a very shy person who doesn't get asked out like that. I really didn't know what to say, so I just said, "So sorry, have a thing that day."  Now that I think of it, I should have relished the opportunity to go out with the opposite sex. She was really nice person too and we used to have fun whenever we talked. I've since moved to another city and have not been asked on date ever since. Nor have I had the courage to ask anyone else. Pretty sad, I'd say.  
You did what most people don't do, you packed up the courage and did it. You'll get better at it later, and hell even if you don't, some girls like awkward guys.    Source: I found my boyfriend (when we just met) insanely cute when he said "If I added you on Facebook, you'd say yes... right?" 
Did this last Friday, I was shakey af but my speech was measured. Nothing special, just:  *Hey excuse me, sorry. I saw you in week 5 and thought you looked absolutely gorgeous* (it's week 11). *Just thought I'd say hi and grab your number.* (I didn't phrase it as a question, some consider this a bad thing)   Went okay. Getting coffee with her in 2 days so keeeen. 
when I was in class I would just stare at them all day creepily, im talking for hours at a time without looking away, hmmmm hee hee hee   but my suggestion to you is avoid putting your balls on the line THAT much, any big moves will always put them on the back foot which will be more likely shot down. Instead you should have just casually asked for her phone number and then played it from there.   for what its worth, it gets easier in years to come, not from experience or anything, its more just people get more interested in relationships themselves....    good luck !  
I hate that guys think that if they ask once and get rejected that is it forever.  Now that you have broken the ice, be totally casual and friendly.  Ask her to go hand..not on a date but just to go do something with friends.  Why?  Because even if she is not interested in you romantically does not mean that you cannot be friends.  Why?  Because she has friends.  Duh.  Also, because a chick can also be a friend...even if you like her like her and she does not like like you back.   
You had the guts to do something I've wanted to do for a long time. Now I'm out of school and never get to see them again. Life sucks sometimes, but kudos to you. 
I think that was a good line! Either way, the important thing is that you said something.  Keep talking to girls! 
That's awesome. Too bad she said no. her loss. i think though it would work better if you get to know her first -- see if there's any chemistry before asking her out. Just keep on coming up with excuses to talk to her. 
OP this happened to me too but with a girl who lived upstairs. I'm an extrovert but still I rarely ask girls out. Struck out and it hurt but I'm really glad I did it, proof to myself I can see something through 
Hey man, you found the courage to do it and I'm sure it'll make the next time a lot easier. Knowing that rejection isn't as bad as you imagine it is really helps.  
At least now you know you've tried and you can safely move on to other cute girls :D 
Well done dude. Proud of you!   It took balls to know it could go badly and still do it anyway, and now it's in the past, slightly embarrassing (if anything) for like a week, then u basically never think about it again. 
Congratulations on your step forward! It may have not worked out with this one, but it may with the next. Also, now that you two are talking, you may get a cool friend out of it. 
I once asked out the girl from class I liked but I we were decent friends before hand, she said yes and we went to the park and hung out. Then about a month later of her just straight up ignoring me which I assumed had something to do with her getting her wisdom teeth out one of her friends who I'm still really good friends with told me she didn't want to be friends anymore.   Haven't spoken to her in 2 years. I would have rather just been rejected than had actually gone on a date and got worked up. I also would have rather had her tell me herself even if its just over text.   I'm still not sure if it was something I did on the date or if there was never feelings and she just didn't want to say no when I asked her.   Anyway I think its important that people don't miss a chance to ask someone out they have feelings over but just don't think everything will be perfect before the second or even third date. 
Sounds like you just dodged a bullet there. If she was at least polite and educated, she wouldn't laugh at your face.   Congrats on your courage to overcome your fears! 
That gave me a smile, I have a lot of respect for you for doing that because I myself don't have enough balls to do it.   
Yeah, I did that once as well. She became my girlfriend and turned out to be a complete psychopath.   Moral of the story: Asking Cute Girls Out Considered Harmful. 
Nice work on making the leap - now you know it's not so bad!  
There was this girl I was really REALLY into. My friend at the time asked her out for me without my knowing. He came and told me about it later, and I got really nervous. Apparently she responded,"maybe if he asked me himself". I went up to her later that day to tell her he got it wrong and I wasn't into her. I hate myself. 
You sounded like Eminem in "Rap God"...and it ended up like Eminem in "Lose Yourself". Mom's spaghetti everywhere :( 
You should keep doing this. The more times you get rejected the easier it becomes to approach women. 
Heh I was trying something similar today, thankfully before I said anything too out there she mentioned she had just been hanging out with her boyfriend so there was no awkwardness so we can continue to be sort of acquaintance friends.  
She may already be in a relationship or you just might not be the type (or gender) she's attracted to. But that is awesome you put yourself out there and tried. It is always a compliment to be asked out but it can be hard to reject a guy without sounding like a bitch, too. If she is an attractive girl I'm sure she has a slight upper hand in knowing many guys that interact with her are attracted to her. But at the same time it might be tiresome to get asked out and have to kindly reject guys when at first the conversation just started over wanting to borrow a pencil. It seems like attractive people have it made but it is tough to be the one asking out and also tough to be the one rejecting someone. 
Hey, congrats on reaching out though, I wouldn't've done that. Just take it as a "hey, if I did that..." story to tell yourself next time you get nervous :p 
Told this one girl I liked her, and she said she needed time to think about it. After a week, she's been avoiding me. 
Tried that once. Mumbled my way through it and ran away before she could respond after it. Which was probably a good idea because she was dating someone and I didn't realize. But it worked out I suppose. I'd been really obsessed with her before, after telling her thiugh that mostly abated. 
While you are definitely waaay more ballsy than me, it does seem a bit odd that you would ask her out without ever talking to her before. Anyway, sucks she said no. Good luck man! 
Good on you bro... that's life, the important thing is you plucked up the courage to do it, and even if it didn't work out this time, you will learn from ur mistakes and make it happen soon with someone else. BUT dont give up on this girl either, maybe she said no because she really doesn't know anything about you yet. One thing Ive learnt with the ladies is never fold in ur cards too soon. 
I had a girl who I had a crush on in high school that I was too nervous to ask out. However it happened that she accidently admitted that she liked me as well later on. It was later at night when she said it so we both decided to talk more the next day.   The next day when I spoke to her she said that her dad said she couldn't have a boyfriend but suddenly a month or so later she goes and dates a friend of mine.  
Great job, asking her out! I was extremely shy when I was younger, until college. By that point, I just decided, what the hell, at worst she'll say no, and that result is the same as if I never asked. 
Welcome to the world of interacting with the opposite sex: The Good, the bad, and the ugly. We've all been there, just part of the learning curve! 
Even though she declined I bet she thought you were brave to do it. So there's that! 
Lol. I remember doing it once some years ago. This girl was next to me in a bus trip (2 hours trip) and after starting to talk to her she turned around pretending to sleep just to avoid talking to me. I was so embarassed. I felt like a rapist. 
Shit dude sorry it didn't go well but major props for trying! That's usually farther than I'll go. 
One time I was at a coffee shop with a few of my friends just chilling and I spot this cute girl walk in and take a seat by herself near us. So, I figured hey, why not give it a shot you know?   So I approach her, she was looking down at her phone or something, she didn't really see me, and I put my hands on the chair in front of her and say "hi". As she begins to raise her head to look at me she starts complaining "can't I just have a damn coffee to myself!" - or something along those lines.   Got taken completely by surprise by that one, still confused I sat down and asked her some random question (whether she liked avocado). I could see that confused her back and she hesitantly replied. At that point I just told her to have a nice day and went back to my friends, who heard the rejection and we had laugh about it.  
Thank you, it was a good learning experience I guess  
I've definitely been trying to be more proactive in making friends and just overall trying to talk to strangers, it's definitely help me grow as a person, even if it can be scary or embarrassing. I'm glad you are comfortable with socialising now, I'll keep working towards it :).  Your yoyo story made me laugh haha, I think yoyo's are cool! 
That's a really cute story, but I'm sorry to hear it didn't work out with the two of you. I can really relate to your story, so I kept rooting for you the whole time I was reading it. 4 years is a long time, have you managed to heal since then? And do you think your experience has given you better confidence in general with women? 
If it's any consolation, you probably would have had whiskey-dick anyway. 
Haha what an amazing twist to the story! Interesting how much things can change in a few years. Thanks for sharing! 
That's a fucking awesome story. I'm surprised she'd sit next to you during the exam though after you guys had that whole incident. I feel for you though, I like people who can express their feelings maturely instead of 'running away' (literally and figuratively), so it sucks when people can't face you and tell you the truth. Thanks for writing this long-ass story, worth the read! Haha 
I think you were being just as immature as she was. You could have easily gotten up and sat somewhere else. 
Honestly, these kinds of mistakes happen, and the skill lies in recovering from them. For me, I like to point out that I just said something weird, and make a joke out of it. It never fails to make the other person laugh. I suspect because it's something that we can all relate to. Sometimes our brains just kinda fart out some incomprehensible noise, especially when the phrase is almost like a tongue-twister.  
That's so cute haha, I guess it really isn't thaaat similar considering she didn't reject her future husband hahaha. 
Thank you, I appreciate it. I honestly had no expectations going into it because I knew whether I got rejected or not, I'd at least walk away with more experience and that I tried. Your words mean a lot to me, thank you! 
Oh no! I'm sorry but I just inserted myself as you in the story and I couldn't help but laugh haha. I didn't know a can of soda could go from 100-0 real quick. I think it was really cute of you to go and buy something every day just to see her :), I'm sorry it didn't work out though. Thanks for sharing your story! 
Just talk. Take it out of your system.  The worst you can get is a "no" for an answer. Besides you have to be honest, if you don't want to be friends with a girl, why faking it? Just talk to her enough for her to get to know you, then be honest and tell her you like her. The absolute worst place in the universe is the friendzone. 
Haha well I executed it pretty poorly! I'm not sure about being more confident but I'm happy I just tried.  
Congratulations! From my experience, people seem to be more open to making friends in college, especially in your freshman year. What you're feeling now with the regret of not knowing and the wondering in what could have happened - that's the feeling I wanted to avoid, so I went for it and talked to her. I know that feeling of regret all too well and it sucks, I hope you can come to terms with it. I wish you all the best in college! You never know that you had the "gonads" to do it until you try, trust me. Good luck out there.  
Hey, while I was reading your story I got a little sad that you didn't get her number, but then I saw that you managed to find her and add her one Facebook! I'm happy you finally got her contact details and weren't left with wondering what could have been. Thank you for sharing, I hope it all goes well with you! 
I love John Mayer! Extra points for mentioning him. Your story was fantastic haha, definitely sounded like the type of nervous energy I'd have but you followed through in asking her number! I hope you didn't regret it. Sorry it didn't work out though, but you're bound for success if you keep trying :) 
Yeah I agree, I wasn't actually expecting her to say yes or anything, I just wanted to try, but next time I might have to go more casual like you mentioned hahaha. I'm still pretty young (20), so I'm sure you're right! 
Getting rejected? Not as bad. Getting rejected and then they date someone else? Maybe a little bit bad. Sorry that happened, but I'm glad to know you didn't regret it :) 
Thanks. In an ideal world, I would have loved to have spent a little more time with her in class but it was the last class for the unit, so I only had that one chance to talk to her/ask her out. 
Good on you!!! Glad you did it. Do you still see her every now and then since she lives nearby? Does it still hurt or have you moved on to greener pastures? 
Hey, thank you, I appreciate it. Getting rejected today was definitely not as bad as I would have imagined it, so you're right. 
Hey thanks man! It definitely DID go badly haha but I didn't feel as bad as I thought I would have. I'm sure I'll laugh about it in the near-future. 
Thank you, but we'll probably never see each other again, and to be honest based on her reaction, I don't think she'd even want to be friends hahaha. 
That really sucks. At least you got to know relatively early on about how she felt. I understand how you feel about being rejected rather than being led on, I feel that way sometimes about my past relationships but I think it's normal for us to feel that way, relationships will never work out if we're not willing to be vulnerable. You took a chance to put yourself out there and even if it didn't work out, you had the courage to take that risk.   You make a valid point, I agree with you on managing expectations.  Have you moved on since or do you still hold on to some thoughts/feelings about this person? 2 years is a long time.  Hope you're doing alright. 
Yeah I will, learning to handle rejection is an art, I swear haha 
I've heard this happen about three times in this thread already :(. I remember it happening once to me before and it crushed me. I'm sorry that happened to you, hope you were able to recover and every thing is going well for you now. 
Hahaha oh no, what if she was genuinely tired though? I know 2 hour bus trips can be tiring haha 
I entered the room of my college composition class and sat down at a far desk in circle (the desks were in a circle because that is the only legal way to arrange chairs in any class offered by the English department).  Anyway -- I sat down and began to read while the rest of the class trickled in. In my periphery, I noticed a lovely blonde sit down a few seats over. I waited for a moment that wouldn't seem obvious, and then I made my move. I picked up my stuff, scooted over, and turned to say hello. "Hi, Pope."  Not only did she beat me to the introduction and already know me. She was my ex-girlfriend, very recent ex. I applauded myself for at least having consistent taste. We sat by each other for the semester. Pleasant but odd. 
Why were you still dating Kate when you had your eyes on Jaelynn for a while? 
You miss 100% of the shots you don't take. You would have definitely regretted not asking, good on ya. 
It's way better than wondering if she would have said yes. 
They're pretty great, but I never find myself terribly motivated to give it a throw. It's cool, but I don't know anybody who does that sort of thing anymore. I was really into it in high school because of the other friends that got into it too. 
Be sure to pat yourself on the back for your progress, because overcoming social obstacles at a personal level is one of those things that for the most part people aren't going to give you credit for, if they even know about it. If putting yourself out there to new people and new experiences is hard for you it's probably *really* hard at times. And like anything the only real way to get better is to practice, which,  in this case it's just talking, and convincing yourself to have confidence.   Good for you, and keep trying because that's a sure path to success and a better, happier you!  
It's hard to say. I got over her fairly quickly I think, but my confidence was shot. I kind of went into a period of a few years in my life where I just didn't give a shit about myself. I ended up being the heaviest I've ever been. Eventually I said enough was enough, and realized that if I didn't give a shit about myself how could I expect anyone else to care. I've lost almost 40 lbs since then and am probably in the best shape of my life.   My confidence with women has still been pretty shitty. Reflecting on that experience I think what it did for me was let me see the stupid shit I was doing/saying. So at least I know what not to do lol. Unfortunately I had to learn my last year of college what most people probably did in middle/high school. My experience with women is still close to 0 though, so I'm at a pretty big disadvantage. Things are looking up however, I do have a potential prospect, so I'm hoping I just don't screw that up as well. 
Actually I didn't, the sex went well. I just didn't share because it sounds made up to say on reddit that you got laid 
What I'm more surprised about is that it's even possible to sit that close together during exam... 
Professor would put up a posting with everyone's score and student id number. I knew mine, and hers, along with a couple others. 
I think the problem was that it was a fountain drink, so it had no spill proofing of its own naturally. Man, it went *everywhere* too and I don't think I've ever made as big an ass of myself all at once since then. I'm glad you laughed about it though, that was my point in sharing. I think all of us experience that rejection at some point, but the important part is not to let it deter you from trying again. You seem like you've got that mentality and that's great! 
Good advice. I'm friends with many girls but its the girls that I have a crush on which amplifies my anxiety. I can be the life of the party but the moment my crush is in the room, I'm a completely different person. Crushes cripple me. 
I find that "no" is the hardest part for me. It isn't even particular to women. For some reason I just have this irrational fear of the word no. Sometimes I won't even ask simple questions to people, or it takes me a while to finally say it just because I hate hearing the word no. 
Haha no! I think what you did and said was cute. And I'm a girl!  
My freshman year is now over. Total friends made = 2. Friends that went with me to college 10+ 
That's okay. Like I said, this is a step towards the next one. I used to be super shy and had issues approaching people, but through a series of interactions that put me outside of my comfort zone, I am moderately extroverted now. Good luck on your future interactions! You've got this! Eye of the tiger! 
Haha you actually sat through the whole semester together after breaking up? Probably one of the rare stories I've heard of ex's getting along haha. 
You have turned something positive for myself and the rest of us in this thread into something negative. This is the only reply I'll be giving you. You have jumped to so many conclusions about myself and her, both people of which you have no knowledge about. I'm sorry you project your own experiences and prejudices on others. I genuinely hope you have a better day. Take care. 
Hahaha hahaha. Oh my word. Dude. What? Calm your third wave feminist, triggered, safe space demanding, all womwn are victims all the time, hiney down. Asking a girl out to lunch is not harrassment. Asking her for a pen is a good Segway into talking to people if you are shy. If he has plopped down next to her in the chair and been all "eyyyy bby u wan sum fuk?" Then yes, that's gross and he should apologize.  He held a full conversation, was polite, if awkward and shy, and she said no. He did not rant about how she was a cunt for shooting him down and she must be a whore and blah blah blah. There is nothing about his actions that warrants an apology.  You should apologize to OP for over acting and trying to rain on his parade.  
you have an awesome and honest outlook on things, everything will work out in the end 
And how does that tearing out pages trick even work? Our exams are rigorously checked for cheating so this wouldn't be possible to do.  
So no one has ever written a real revenge story? That's silly. 
let us know! Let us live vicariously through you. Since I have no hopes and prospects :( 
Seriously though practice helps a ton. I was awkward as fuck in high school, and I'm a junior in college now going on 11 months of dating my girlfriend. If we broke up I'd know even more about what I want and how to be a better boyfriend. Love is a great place to make mistakes, no one dates the girl of their dreams day one because they are probably not the boy of anyone's dreams. Just keep your head up :) 
We will...touch a butt...before our inevitable deaths. 
I'm pretty sure he's talking about Facebook stalking. At least I hope he's not actually stalking women. Either way it's probably not the best way to go about things. 
Thank you, I never put myself out there in highschool, so I gotta do all the heavy-lifting now in university haha. Glad things are working out for you though :) 
Chris i have no doubt that you're hotter than me so get out there and pull i believe in you :D 
We did it as a joke and she actually accepted haha 
I love this! Ah, we are the loveliest sub!  /u/ekjp, WELCOME! 
Ellen looks like she would be nice and pleasant in person, doesn't she? She's always smiling, and her smile looks genuine, if that makes any sense. I wonder what she will do after this. I wish her all the best. 
Can't you make someone a mod without their permission?  Either way it's pretty funny :) 
Wait... you have a freaking lab?! Chemistry major? Can you show us a picture or two? 
So, uh... /u/ekjp what was the first thing you did after stepping down? (is that a subject I shouldn't bring up? If I'm being insensitive I apologize)  I think if it were me, I'd have a beer and watch Netflix in my underwear.   I also think if it were me I'd pretty much hate reddit after the bullshit you put up with, so cheers for being mentally stronger than I am, or at least more forgiving.  
I'm just wondering why you make potassium ferrioxalate. 
Actually, I'm curious, are there any criteria for the letter flair? 
reddit where even when you leave you can't leave!  i have no idea why their using this platform and interacting more with the community, its just so strange, I feel like its some nefarious plan to gain more insight into the community then 
What do you use the potassium ferrioxalate solution for? 
Well she did say in another thread that she enjoys positive and happy subs. And that's exactly what this sub is. 
Thanks. I'm going to hang out in some friendly subreddits. 
They have to accept your moderation request first. 
It's a lab class. I'm attempting to build a home lab but the fact that I'm renting a house on a military base dampens hopes :( I am a chemistry major though! 
I hope you're doing okay, and the events of the last little while haven't got you feeling too down. 
Just getting my final dose of Reddit before I pass out. How's your day been? 
Hey I would just like to say to you that I'm sorry some people were just downright mean and hateful.   I know most people have had run-ins with internet douche bags, but damn.   Hope all is well 
Hey Ellen! How you been doing these past few days?   Just got a casual friendly question for you:  What's your favourite animal? :) 
You're awesome. What's your favorite book currently? 
Not so nefarious. I just have a lot more time on my hands. 
We're going to determine its composition through titration and spectroscopy. 
Not much. So many people sent positive messages or apologized sincerely that it made up for all the negative stuff.  
Pretty good. I had lunch with a friend, coffee with another friend, hung out on reddit. Life is pretty good. How has *your* day been? 
All is well, thanks for the positive message and for asking. Hope all is well with you, too. 
Humans. Then hedgehogs. Someone sent me an awesome baby hedgehog gif yesterday, so that's on my mind today. The past few days have been a little less casual than I'd like. Right now, I'm just relaxing. 
I haven't had time to watch much TV. I really enjoyed "Newsroom" when it was on, except the last few shows. "Veep" is pretty funny. 
But......you already know it's potassium ferrioxalate!   
I'm sure there are plenty of them but I don't know of any. You can visit /r/intenseconversation though if you want the exact opposite! 
I think the most disappointing moment I've had on Reddit was when a person from FPH linked a CC selfie to the FPH sub to bully them simply because of the way they looked. People say if you don't like these subs to just hide them but that didn't work, I don't know how people even claimed that it worked. Seeing thousands of people cheering this on really makes me feel negative towards all of humanity. It's like seeing people cheer on the Westboro Baptist church as they picket funeral and tell troubled teens to kill themselves. I don't get how bullying has become so popular and supported. 
Hey, some dude in wisconsin is drunk and thinks youre pretty. Have a nice night. 
I've had better, to be honest.  Recovering from a minor surgical procedure gone slightly wrong without using up too many vacation days at work can be challenging.  I imagine your life is better when you don't have the cesspool of the Internet breathing down your neck in anger. 
Question! Do you have an alt account and comment among us? Reddit is so interesting because you could be talking to Harrison Ford about baseball or something and never know it.  
Good. Once I understood how the button's systems worked I was glad to accept the light of the holy 0 back in to my heart. Can't wait to one day tell my grandchildren of our crusades. How about you? 
Yeah, but there are different stoichiometries for it - they can have trapped water molecules or extra ligands bound to the iron.  (note: I am 99% sure I know the composition - it's lab practice ok :P) 
I think he could if there was another mod. I don't think it allows mods to leave if they are the last one. so unless someone wants to take over he is stuck as it. 
That's why we're here! We're the eye in the middle of the storm. 
I think it means that her modding here isn't a joke. 
i'm also a drunk dude from wisconsin. and i'd hold hands inn the park with her  
Miniature fox terrier. She lives in CT with a friend right now. 
7 neon tetras, 4 bettas, 6 guppies, and a Siamese algae eater. 
Sorry to hear that your surgery has been difficult. It's almost tomorrow and hopefully tomorrow will go better. 
I have a couple of alts, one for mobile (just in case) and one for more anonymity. I used them to comment a little more, but haven't had much time lately to comment on any account. 
I've lurked here in the past. First time commenting. Still haven't posted. 
THat's what I love about this sub, it's one of the few places you can get away from all that drama and also discuss it without all the usual name calling coming straight into play. The few time I have seen hateful arguments here it seems to hit a lot harder because it's not expected. Luckily the mods here are pretty cool so they deal with it in a pretty timely and reasonable manner. 
I just want to say that I am sorry for jumping on the hate train and upvoting all those hurtful posts.  Seeing you make these small talks made me realise you are human and have feelings too.  I wish you well in your future endeavours. 
I did not know ANY of this about you.  You were on the anti-dog faction when we were discussing the dog-friendly-new-office-or-not issue!  Also, when will I get to meet your terrier?  Will he/she ever be coming out here to California? 
Why can't you use this account for mobile? Genuinely curious.  
You'll likely find the people here are more polite than many subs. I've only been a member for a month or two and haven't seen any aggression or rudeness really. It's nice. 
Aww, /u/ekjp, it's so cool here. People will actually just talk to you, it's really nice. Then there's the unique posts like the one that spawned /r/PaperReddit. Try posting something. 
Just a random question but, what phone door use and have you made any specific modifications?  
This is why independent fact-checking should be something you do before blindly following a movement. This is the same reason why elections make me nervous. 
/u/ekjp is just another one of Unidan's accounts.  
Security reasons. We were careful about not using admin accounts on outside services. 
O_O I can't believe people still remember that.  I was honestly just bored in class one day, and decided it would be a cool idea.   Lo and behold, a new subreddit came into existence.  
This place is super welcoming, and I've never seen it before.  Ironic that right after leaving her post, ekjp personally brings me to a great new sub. 
iPhone 6 plus (I needed the big screen for browsing reddit on Chrome) 
Is this to say that apps like redditisfun, and the sort aren't as secure? Or was it just an extra precaution? 
So admins usually don't use there accounts on Mobile?  
Fritos? I could never find myself to like them. What do you think about Sun chips? Never a huge fan of those either. I guess I'm not a chip guy 
Never in my life have I met someone who genuinly liked Fritos 
/u/ekjp/ Go to /r/space right now! The New Horizons spacecraft is about to fly by Pluto; the little planet that could! Closest humankind has  ever flown by! Its streaming live on a stickied post! 
It's a lot like /u/yishan but I think /u/ekjp will be more active in normal stuff than he is, which is good. People are already being friendly to her, that's awesome. 
Have you tried Alien Blue for iOS? Its the only thing I miss about iOS.  
I'm not sure how to do that actually, Mr. Pineapple sir, you can have anything for your name andor flair, what would you like? 
Upvote, not only for the sentiment. I always upvote Newsradio.  
Me too but my husband just offered to get me a diet Coke and some pretzels. Who can refuse such kindness? :) 
diet? c'monnn... live a little... regular Coke tastes so much better! :)    (but really, I get it - the whole sugar thing is bad news for the waistline and teeth. That said, the wife and I were sort of addicted to Coke.   But recently we've gone cold turkey, and just this weekend had it for the first time in about a month, and it *really* lost its lustre, so to speak.  It just didn't have that satisfying taste to it. So, if you were 'addicted' like we were, maybe try cold turkey? Just a thought. :) ) 
You know, I think this thread is the first time I've seen Newsradio gifs on reddit.  Probably not the first time I've seen them on the Internet, but I don't think I've seen many...  Man, that was a while ago...  I don't think I was on the Internet then--though I'm not sure, can't remember when it aired off the top of my head. 
Thank you but not addicted :) I have a couple or three a week :) I also have to control my blood sugar. It's a treat sometimes :)  Thank you for your concern though!   Take care!   *Nana internet hug* 
The late 90s. I was in high school at the time and always surprised that the show didn't find a better following at the time (it was always teetering on being canceled).  
Ah, yes - of course diabetes-related issues are obviously a thing, duh. I should have considered that, too!  But anyways - thanks for the... ah-hem, *sweet* reply.  hehe ;)  (I love this place, everyone's so nice!) 
Do you get excited seeing that orange envelope aswell? 
lol You are welcome! Everyone is nice here. It's a respite at times from other subs, to be sure!  No worries - after all you don't know my health history :) 
I think everyone is unless you're use to seeing it in which it loses it charm! Often, being 'popular' on reddit seems cool, but I wonder if those really popular guys here (we all know who I'm talking about [you /u/Renkie ! You made it!]) actually read all the replies to their comments. 
Yes, I will have to post here more often! (I just started).  All the best to you and your health! :) 
I thank you from the bottom of my heart! :) You certainly should post more often too! :)  Take another of these and pass one on to your wife too!    *Nana internet hug* 
Of course people call butts "butts", that's what they are.  
This is the best story ever. Better than the guy who made his mum think toy story 3 ended with all the toys dying.  
So if anyone has this extension while reading this thread, they're going to read "everyone is calling butts butts." Haha.  
I'll be completely honest, I hate the cloud-to-butt extension. A lot. I'm a meteorologist so naturally I love talking about clouds and weather and things like that but any time a topic like that pops up on reddit it quickly and inevitably devolves into "LOL butts??".  It was kind of funny the first time I saw it I guess. The appeal was already gone by the second time I saw it though. I'm probably getting frustrated over nothing but it's just one of those things that bugs me. It does nothing except detract from good conversation because everyone has to tell everyone else that they're using the extension. Talk about a dead horse to beat.  I know I'm being a debbie downer but it just makes me sad... 
I too have the extension. Your post has the greatest density of butts I have seen in some time.  Also, you should subscribe to /r/clouds. Every other post is 'beautiful clouds' or 'strange clouds.' It makes every visit to reddit a jolly one. 
As a programmer, we talk all the time about things being in the cloud. 
There should be a lol/lmao to ayy lmao extension.  
Why are all these tech sites talking about storing my files in the butt? 
My mother has an unhealthy obsession with FB garage sale groups. Anyone got ideas on an app that could mess with that? Maybe turn the word "free" into "crappy" or "For Sale" into "wanted"? 
Wait...  What?   There is an extension that literally changes the word "clouds"  to "butts?"  
You just confused a *lot* of people...  ...white butts. 
In the end everyone dies... and they all end up in the bright white butts in the sky 
Yes.   Also, protip, people with the extension cannot tell the difference between, butt-to-butt, cloud-to-butt, butt-to-cloud, or even cloud-to-cloud.  It's *all* butts to us.  This enables clever trolling. 
Just type it with an open parenthesis: (loud.   See, now you've transferred your frustration to the programmers who are still looking for then end of the expression....                                     
I think it's funny when referencing clouds in computer-speak. Everyone talks about "the cloud" as if it's some magic thing... it's not. It's just a server or servers on the internet. So renaming that to butts is funny, because it's equally stupid.  Now clouds in the sky... those are a real thing. I can see how that's annoying. 
I had it installed, and then the fappening happened, and all of a sudden, every news outlet was talking about how someone hacked the butt, and security of Apple's iButt was suspect, and after the 2nd day of seeing that, I got tired of it pretty quickly. 
Do you get request from the non techies to put everyeverything on the cloud? 
It's the safest place to hide things because no one will think to look there. That's why drugs are measured in buttloads.  
is it a thing?  I'll admit, I'm scratching my head here. 
Oil prices dropped to the lowest point in 8 years today when the dragon plummeted. However, experts say dragon demand will drive prices back up this summer. 
I was first exposed to the term "buttload" in 1988.  Before, I had certainly heard of *boatloads*.  Can you help me to determine if I met the originator, or early disciple, of the term, or whether it had been in parlance for a period before that? 
Dark threatening butts looming over the horizon, spewing thunder and hailsones.  Like in a Beatles movie. 
Oh god that's awful.   And by awful I mean I need to do something like this 
Oh my lord this is perfect. Any ideas for subtle, rare words to change that will surprise me?    I'm drawing a blank on my creative side.  
Just like the roads you drive there on are already built! Its easy to be a Liberian when social programs have created the world you live in. 
Not sure if serious... After the SRD I read this morning, you very well could be serious.  
And now we have more libraries than ever thanks to the fact that it's expected for every county to have a pubic library 
Just go with the little things that you'd think reputable websites would get right.  bear - bare  their - they're  they're - there  there - their  "God people are such idiots these days" 
Which part? That public libraries are a fairly new invention, or that public libraries have a lot of homeless people surfing porn? The first is certainly true, the second is a common joke (including in the library community) which has more than a grain of truth to it.   Of course it depends on the location of the library, but a big library in the downtown area of a city is a place where the homeless congregate, and because many libraries err on the side of free speech with regards to internet use, those computers have seen a lot of shit.  Also, there are a lot of libertarian librarians.  
That wouldn't work since people misspell those words so often anyway. 
That sets you aside from the libertarians who believe that "the big gubmint" is just out to steal their money and give it to people who "don't deserve it". We have social programs for a reason. 
Your comment essentially said "we build libraries so homeless people have a place to masturbate".  
For best results, paste the above text in "Terminal" on OS X or Linux, and press enter!    
My mother asked me the same thing about being a librarian when I told her I don't really like books.  
Many libertarians are actually people who want to move power from the national government to the states.  Their are also "social libertarians".   Political spectrums are wide and varied. 
You are correct. I am also from Europe. We don't consider "social" a bad word. We have seen how much good it has brought society. Unfortunately it's already collapsing. Fortunately that won't happen overnight but take a while. Enough politics now.  
Wouldn't those be Federalists? Libertarianism by definition emphasizes individual freedom over state power, no matter what the level of government. 
When I was 11 I took a sticker of a teddy bear with angel wings and put it inside my dad's metal lunch bucket. 18 years later it's still there, although horribly faded.  
I was very artsy as a child & constantly drew or made things for my Dad...and he kept everything. One year I went to a craft fair with my Mom & found this tiny little woven basket, no bigger than 6" tall, that I just *had* to have. As soon as I got home, I went to work on a special present for Dad. I took some green paper, drew a bunch of flowers, colored them with my new cool color-changer markers (the ones that would change when you colored over with the white/clear one), cut them out, & glued into a circle to place inside the basket like a bouquet. I gave it to him & I am not kidding, they stayed proudly displayed, though eventually very faded, on a shelf in his "rig room" (he did ham radio as a huge hobby & had a room in the basement for it all) until the day he died. 
When I was little, I drew a face - in ink - on the wallpaper that we had on our stairway.   My parents were FURIOUS, and I got into major trouble.   Time went by, and my parents replaced the wallpaper.    More time went by, I grew up, and my parents moved out of that house.   I helped them pack - and when I was clearing out a chest of drawers, I found a small piece of wallpaper with the face I'd drawn. 
I visited my dad last summer, it had been six years since we had last seen each other. When we finally met, I said it was sort of weird, seeing each other for the first time in 6 years. And he said something along the lines of, "Yup, it's been 6 years, X months, and about Y days I think". He knew pretty much exactly how long we had been apart, he had remembered the day I had left i guess. That was one of the many things that made me realize just how lucky I was to have an amazing dad like him, and I can only hope to be as cool as he is one day. 
Now its your turn, show him that you love him ! You don't really have you spend a single dime if you can't, dad's appreciate everything 
My dad has some knick knacks we made in first grade for fathers day in his office :) 
LifeSavingProTip: Dont hang stuff from the mirror.  
I deliver pizzas for work and around the time I had to leave, my car decided to make a new song out of clanking metal and so I asked m y dad to borrow his since I didn't have enough time to diagnose and solve whatever the noise was.  
That sounds amazing, and then the end made me feel incredibly sad. But it sounds like you had a great relationship and that's all one could ever ask for. 
Wow 6 years? What kept you two away from each other for so long? 
lol, im sorry but i was gonna actually say something nice and heartfelt about your dad being proud of your graduation achievement but then you filled us in on lucrative food delivery job.  
you drive your personal car while delivering pizza's? 
That looks like a XJ (1983 - 2001) Jeep Cherokee. If you need help with it, try posting in /r/cherokeexj  They're awesome over there and as a fellow owner they've helped me out a bit.  
It's actually pretty common practice here in the U.S, as far as I can tell. From what I remember when my dad worked as a delivery man about 15 years ago, they also had to pay most of their own gas as well.  There were nights he couldn't really do his job because he couldn't get enough tips to pay for gas. 
Yeah. There isn't a company car that we use. I never knew that was a thing. 
Where do people not drive personal cars to deliver pizzas?  
I delivered pizza for years. Always drove my personal car. 
As far as I know, today the employers pay for your gas 
Well in Iceland every company that delivers food has cars for there workers 
Pretty much everywhere except the third world country of The United States. 
In my place, pizza outlet will prepare some mopeds for delivery, so they only worry about the delivery and weather and the outlets will cover the fuel and maintenance 
So pizza delivery guys get paid $2.50 an hour and still have to pay for their own fuel in working hours? No wonder people don't tip in a country where minimum wages actually goes that low. In my country the minimum wage is like $11 dollars, and a business could probably get shut down if they forced people to pay for their own fuel. 
Ah okay I see. Yeah here in the U.S you usually use your own car for pizza delivery work but I'm sure there are places that give you a car. That would be nice.  
New Zealand, we have mostly personal cars to deliver pizzas. However, the company reimburses fuel.  
In many parts of the US a moped is an impractical, death trap. You're driving a low powered motor bike on gravel shoulders with cars flying by at 45-55 mph.   It's great in big cities with 100,000 people in a 5 mile radius, but we have a lot of spread out suburbs. 
Dominoes is finally starting to get some company vehicles but I don't expect that to take off far from large cities. I've only ever seen one so far and they started that about a year ago. 
Where I live you don't need a license to ride a moped on the street, so most of the people riding them are the ones with a few too many DUIs. 
Here in Italy that would be very illegal. Which doesn't mean it doesn't happen, but at least you can point at the bit of the law where reimbursement is clearly prescribed.   Most businesses around here just have a fleet of cheap scooters, so they all have business insurance. 
This happened yesterday and it was me being awkward (as usual). I work in retail. I had been talking to a coworker and had to step away for a minute. Went back to where we had been standing and started to resume the conversation. Took me a minute to realize that there was now a customer (and no one else) standing there. Then I kind of stuttered and said, "oh you're not ____," giggled nervously, and walked away. 
I got in the wrong Lyft once!  My buddy just dropped me off at the bus station after a long weekend of drinking so I could take the bus the rest of the way home. I decided I was too hungover to handle a bus so I called Lyft. The app told me to a expect a blue yaris in 5 minutes. 5 minutes later, a blue yaris pulls up right in front of me. I get in the back seat and the first thing I notice is it's really messy, I slowly look up to look at the driver. She's just staring at me with mouth agape, frozen in horror. I manage to stutter out, "You're not my Lyft. Are you." She violently shakes her head and I get out of the car say Sorry over and over again while also semi-laughing at my own stupidity. My correct blue yaris came a few moments later to wisk me away. 
My dad did this to my mom once. It was the 80's- a simpler time with simpler lives, where we all owned minivans that looked very similar to each other.  My mom went inside to cash a check and my dad saw a very similar minivan behind him in the "waiting line" by the front door of where we were at. He said "watch this" and did a circle in the parking lot- we then watched as my mom eagerly jumped in the wrong van & then very quickly scurried out.  Good times. 
I had a very similar experience a few months ago... parked outside my friend's house waiting for him to come out, and some random woman gets in the back seat of my car.  It might have been scary, but being an attractive, 120 lb blonde, it was just a little weird. 
I can't understand that. Uber tells you the make, model, and color of the car to expect, along with a picture of it. It also gives you the name and a picture of the driver. How could you mistake all of those things? How could anyone be so careless as to jump into a random person's car without being 100% sure it is who they expect it to be?  
I'm waiting for the news report to come out that someone stepped into someone's car thinking it was Uber or Lyft, and was shot by the driver who thought he was being attacked. 
Recently I was coming home from work and waiting for the bus at the  crowded station. I have a dirty job so my clothes were filthy. This friendly guy with a bag comes up and starts handing me stuff like socks, little bag of toiletries, etc. while saying "whatcha need, we got you covered"  Took me a second to realize he thought I was homeless and was part of a group that helps them out. Had to explain I was dirty from work, just fine, and thanks anyways. 
I always feel awkward with Uber. My wife and I used one in San Francisco all of our trip, but I never know if everyone is supposed to be in the back, or one person up front.  
I walked into a house thinking it was my air bnb.  Google maps was off, and when I parked there were a couple people outside that said hi as I grabbed my suitcase and walked in.  Then a lady said "It's so nice to finally meet you" They though I was their relatives girlfriend that they had never met. 
My mom and I were at the grocery store about a year ago.  She was visiting from out of town, so we were in my car.  After coming back out to the parking lot, I emptied our cart into my trunk, then she went to put the cart back, so I sit down in the driver's seat to wait for her.  It seemed like I had been waiting a while, and I start looking around for her.  I glance to my right and see her SITTING IN THE PASSENGER SEAT OF THE CAR NEXT TO MINE.  Suddenly she looks to the left and sees me staring at her from another car and she jumps out of the one she's in, runs to mine, yelling, "WHO JUST LEAVES THEIR CAR UNLOCKED LIKE THAT?"  I couldn't stop laughing. 
I was once at a Microsoft store wearing a red shit. I was checking out a tablet when a kid comes up next to me and says "I got a question about this computer over here..." I turn to face him and he sees I have 'chupathingy' on the front of my shirt. I say "I don't work here" he looked supprised and said "Oh. Sorry." And quickly took off. 
This didn't happen to me but to my brother back in the late 90's-early 2000's, before uber was a thing. In his college days, he had a short school bus he had painted black, because why the hell not? One night while out on the town, some drunk guys climbed into the bus thinking it was a drunk bus, and my brother inadvertently became a designated driver. He's a nice guy so he gave them a ride. 
Gotta make sure that Uber sticker is on the windshield! 
I just use cabs, they are much easier to understand as it is just a quick phone call, and you can recognise the cars easier. 
How embarrassing it is depends on what you said when you started talking to the stranger. Hopefully nothing too personal! I can see how anything would be a bit uncomfortable though. They've probably already forgotten about it though. I always remind myself of that when I feel embarrassed.  
This reminds me of a time that I was out with my Dad once. We'd been out all day and when we got back to the car, he unlocked it and we all got in, except there was now a blanket on the back seat and the dog's bowl was missing... Presumably the driver's seat was in wrong position too. Definitely got in to someone  elses car entirely! My Dad swears he unlocked the door but I don't think he could have... It was a 1982 Austin Maestro, so I guess it's possible they didn't have much variance in the locks...  Thanks for reminding me of that! 
I once threw my shoes in the trash while holding onto my empty water bottle. I just stared into the trash can and thought about my life for about ten seconds. Point being. No one's brain is always 100% focused. People can make thoughtless decisions at times.  
Uber has a rule that drivers need to display the Uber sticker prominently as well, I always look for that plus check the car model and license plate. 
That must be a relatively new feature then because last I used it (about a year ago I think), it only told me the model, not the color or plate and no pictures. Really threw me for a loop whenever I called one. Or maybe it was just a hidden menu that I somehow missed? 
If I'm traveling alone, I sit in the front, if I'm traveling with someone, I sit in the back with them.  90% of the time I have great conversations with my Uber drivers when traveling alone. 
I always sit in the back unless there's too many people in the group then we'll do rock, paper, scissors to decide who sits in the front. I've always seen it the same as a taxi, just sit in the back if that's what you're most comfortable with. The driver doesn't care.  
I usually have this dilemma too, but I had a mortifying experience recently. My boyfriend and I were at a festival with our friends, but we wanted to leave early. We ordered an Uber and when it showed up, it was a single-cab pickup truck. Yeah, my boyfriend and I both had to sit up front with the driver. It was a male driver so I got my boyfriend to sit in the middle so I didn't have to sit directly next to the driver. What the hell.  
I've never used Uber. The whole thing seems kind of dangerous to me.  
Haha I went to San Francisco and did the same thing, I feel like a little kid riding in the back.  
I have never ever seen an uber sticker on any uber vehicles I have gotten into.  
In Chile, ubers don't must use stickers... Basically because uber here is illegal. 
I have used both Uber and Lyft so I might be missing them up, but they give you a picture of the car to expect. 
Single cab pickup just seems so awkward to have for Uber! I mean, even extended cab would we. Be weird, cause you'd think with how much driving you'd be doing, you'd want something that got good gas mileage!  
Uber and Lyft are pretty convenient and I'd say, safer than regular taxis. I use Uber all the time, as I don't have a car currently.  I don't have to worry about parking, drinking while I'm out on weekends, and I usually have nice conversations with my Uber drivers. 
I would think the bin being empty would be the case where you *do* go fishing it out. 
I've never seen one in my town, but I noticed every uber in Minneapolis/St. Paul had them. Maybe it's regional?  
How you said that was endearing as hell! But, I think how you meant to say that is that "In Chile, uber drivers must not use stickers..." :) 
Depends where you are in Atlanta. But yes, Atlanta is definitely a contender. They have a scam going at the buckhead bars where a lady will pretend she is your driver and then she seduces you and tries to pick pocket you. My friend turned her down and she pulled a gun and robbed him anyways. So be careful people! Make sure it is your uber 
I have a very strong impression that you are a social media guy (or gal) working for Uber. 
I think most drivers have their license plates listed, but not all.  Sometimes I only get a make or model, or a person's name/picture, I think it just depends on the driver.  I've taken many, many ubers, and I've had a wide variety of information provided/not provided. 
It seems more like he was trying to say "Uber drivers are not required to use stickers".  
I was more talking about strangers forcing their way into someone else's car. The first assumption of the people I know in Atlanta would be theft or carjacking, not a mistake.  
I didn't mean to say regular taxis are dangerous, just that Uber seems safer than regular taxis. They have background checks for drivers and ratings for both drivers and passengers. Also, there's a clear record of driver and passenger details, car details, route taken, time, etc.   I don't know if the same measures are available for regular taxis too. I haven't taken a regular taxi as an adult, and don't really know how they operate. 
Yeah, but if something happens to you, you can contact Uber and demand the driver's info (assuming it was the driver's fault)  
Do you think taxi companies don't do background checks on their drivers? 
Yeah, starting a career can really suck.  Tell me about the othere interests. Are there no opportunities there to make a career in. Or at least to get your mind of things? 
Here's something which might cheer you up , I graduated from technical school at 21. Then was conscripted for 2 years . When I finished conscription, what I've learned in school was obsolete, I did low level computer programing jobs for 3 years earning 1.4k per month .  I saved some money and went to university. After graduation I'm at 29 years old. I practically spent my 20s not doing anything beneficial to my career . My first real job was with consulting in the big four at age 30.   I'm 36 this year and I'm learning 100k per year before taxes .  Summary,  not everyone started right on the first .   I hope you spend sometime to figure out what you want as a career instead of doing odd jobs which may not benefit your ultimate career . Good luck  
Wow, you really penned yourself in when choosing that username. 
Those that start later, dont neccessarily come last.  That wasn't the exact quote, but whatever, it works for me. I've dropped out of college two times and am about to start my third attempt and that's basically my motto. Maybe it'll help you somewhat. 
I'm 26 and just moved back in with my mom to go back to school after realizing my first degree will only let me get jobs that I hate. A lot of people our age get down because we feel like we should already have the things our parents had at our age, but it just doesn't work like that anymore. The dream of being married with a stable job, your own house and your 2.5 kids at the age of 25 is no longer something everyone can expect (or even want) due to changes in the market and various social pressures. Don't get down on yourself if things take you a little longer than you expect. Everyone's different, and we all forge our own path in our own time.  
I'm in the same boat as you. 26 graduated with a masters in December. I'm looking at tech companies for design positions but everyone wants 3 years work experience so interviews are far and few between. I think it'll help that you're at least in LA in a populated area for more opportunities. I'm in the middle of nowhere and local candidates seem much more preferred. I think we'll both find something eventually just apply to everything you can, connect with people on LinkedIn! Use your schools alumni network and career center if you can! 
Indulge me in a thought exercise here?  Imagine you got a job, but the start date was 45 days from today: what would you do in the interim? 
you should consider joining the US military, you can go in as an officer and make a ton of money. Thats what i am doing right now, actually pretty glad i did.  
Thanks, I enjoy music and writing, but don't see myself making a career out of either. I've written a few children's books that I might try to get published at some point and I started playing piano last year, but have been a little too depressed and focused on getting a job to play recently. I really enjoy running and working out, but I've had to get rid of my gym membership because I don't have any money. Overall i'd say I'm very lucky all things considered, but it's hard to consistently tell myself I should just stay positive and move forward. 
I give this exact advice a lot in /r/accounting because it's how I secured three offers with CPA firms in a city where I had little to no connections. The key is to never ask "are you hiring?" because it sets you up for immediate rejection. Companies hire new employees even when they aren't technically "hiring" all the time. The offer I accepted was with a firm that had no openings but ended up taking two new people on because they liked both of us.  
This is covered in the (quite useful) book 'designing your life' by Bill Burnett and Dave Evans. 
Did you have to start as an associate and work your way up like a younger grad? Starting with a big 4 job in September and I'm curious. 
just curious, but by low level programming do you mean something closer to machine code or just general entry level code monkey jobs? i had the impression that low level programming languages were in higher demand and paid higher 
Thanks, it's absolutely true and I appreciate being reminded of that. 
get an internship asap is my advice to you and hunt for jobs before you graduate (preferably have one waiting for you when you graduate) 
You do a great job at presenting the problem, but any advice for those going through this? 
What you mentioned is happening in a lot of places already. I personally experienced this in Greece (along with the economical issues they are facing). A huge percentage of the unemployed was young adults with University degrees, but the country doesn't have enough skilled jobs. My friend was lucky enough to get accepted into PhD program in the states.   I also think that most skilled labor industries will be severely oversaturated (look at oil & gas right now) in the coming years, unless you are in the software/automation industry 
I'm curious if it's something to do with your cover letter or resume. My brother had that problem for a while and he's not the best cookie in the bunch. Finally I saw his resume and it was a MESS. Three pages long he had things from highschool in there etc.   So I edited it and formatted and he got the job that he's at now within three weeks of me fixing it.  
My advice to you would be to apply to jobs looking for journalism and communications majors. These could be jobs dealing with corporate communications, PR, copywriting, technical writing, branding, and social media.   I graduated with a B.A. in English and have a good job--English majors have skills that make us employable!! It's on us to convince employers what we can bring to the table.    I'm sending positive vibes your way and wishing you the best! 
I've given up even focusing on a single field anymore. I apply to marketing positions, finance positions, PR positions, entertainment positions, and more than anything assistant positions. As bad as it sounds, I never had a specific field that I was dying to go into, I just want a career that offers growth.  
I would apply to those "3 years experience" jobs anyway. It's a relatively low bar and it's basically an excuse for them to say "we're not going to train you to do everything."   If you can learn things quickly you'll be fine. Your master's should count for one year, and you can point to many of the projects you've worked on in class as a separate experience. It's double dipping, but only a little.   The biggest problem with starting a career is that nobody wants to hire someone starting out. On paper, it's much safer to go with someone else.  
Don't join it out of convenience, op . Do it only if you like it. The knowledge gained may not be transferrable to your net job  
Yeah, I know. When you're in a period where everything seems on the down it's hard to stay positive.  I don't know if it works for you but for me structure can make a lot of difference.  If you're not currently working, threat job-searching as an actual job.  Get up early, have breakfast and start your day searching for jobs you like. Apply to them before lunch.  Have lunc for an hour and try to go out for a walk.  In the afternoon handle mails etc, maybe even some administration homework (paying bills etc).  When you're done try to get your food ready and going on a run.  running can make you feel awesome.  in the evening, unwind with something you enjoy.  It makes coping with the days muche easier I find 
Weird thing to pick up on, but I was in your spot 3 years ago and can say that the music can help. Force yourself to play that piano for 5 minutes, and play some despondent, miserable shit. I don't know how to describe what it does, but music is good. 
What was your major? And where are you from if that's not too personal? 
I'm a finance major so maybe it differs in each field, but when it comes to negotiating a salary, if you need one analyst, and two candidates are applying, one graduated top of their class and has all this extra stuff while the other has a degree, the more accredited student would seemingly ask for higher pay 
I'm doing my PhD in medicinal chemistry and drug delivery 
Thanks, I'll give that a try today. It's early here, so plenty of day to work with. 
Thanks, and no problem. I used a throwaway account. I have a B.S. in marketing and I live in Los Angeles. 
Damn, I'm about to start grad studies in pharmacology. Am I screwed? 
If you can, read Mark Cuban's book "How to Win at the Sport of Business"    and not for what's mentioned in the title. He talks about his days after college living in a house with too many other people in a similar situation as you. trying to find employment and working a shit job and always looking for a better opportunity.   
Might I suggest sales? A lot of places that hire inside sales reps do so in droves. They hire anyone who looks good, and the job has a way of self-selecting. People who don't like sales quit quickly, while others can bear it and stay on, and few find that they are really good at it.   Sounds not that great at first, but a lot of companies who hire large amounts of salespeople are more than willing to accommodate you if you prove to not be good at/not like sales but still remain dedicated and a motivated worker. That's how I got my current job as a Market Researcher; I'm only a little ways out from college. Check Glassdoor for places with good work life balance and flexible/understanding management that are hiring inside salespeople. Rule of thumb: if they have a very long (paid of course) training program, that's a very good sign, because they are committed to training employees in the long-term even if some of them won't like sales in the short term.  Just my two cents. 
Cool! Good luck!  I can't say, really. Are you in the US? I'm in Denmark and the whole thing is so vastly different (some of it better, some worse) in Europe and the US that it kinda shouldn't have the same name.  Our PhD is 3 years, but you have to have a MSc before. So our graduate studies are actually 5 years split in two. We have to take courses and teach and it's all very set in stone. Which is stressful in a way, relaxing in a way (I know when I'm gonna graduate) but also makes you really use the time you have. The general morale is also different, you're expected to work hard but also to have a life outside your PhD. Not too much, but enough to keep your sanity at least!  I'm happy at least :) I get to do a lot of cool research and I love what I do (I worked 14 hours yesterday just for the pure joy of it). Even though there are weeks where I feel like it's crushing me.  
You keep saying deserve as if people shouldn't be entitled to their career choice. It's not entitlement and it shouldn't be as such. You bring up that you worked your way up and so did OP, they went to school *working their way up* for their career choice. OP also states they did do the catering and little jobs and wanted to advance in their life, why is that entitlement?  I am in OP's position. I am in an entry level position right now in my field but want to do more with my career and what I studied. If I am qualified to do something that means more pay and better future, why not?  
I think my dad told his aunt after the second date that he was going to marry my mom.   The only thing I would say is don't be in a rush to get married. You're still very young. The two of you should focus on your schooling and your future careers. Focus on a wedding when you're stable and can afford a nice one! You don't need a ring or a ceremony to know your feelings for each other!   As for me, I'm hopeless, so I have to live vicariously through you. 
Btw yeah 20 is too young and 3 months is literally nothing. Think before you do something you might regret. 
Congratulations dude! I just proposed to my girlfriend 2 days ago and even just bought her a ring today, intended on "just looking" lol 
So OP answered every "congrats" comment and none of the "be careful, you're only 20 and been only dating for 3 months" comments. He's either gonna come back to this topic in years with a "yup, should've listened" face or "f*** all of you, in yo face" face.. 
Cool. Asking the father for permission always seemed demeaning and insulting to me, though. Like, what if he says no? It's not like that's going to stop you, so you're not even really asking. Plus the idea that a woman is her father's property seems pretty outdated. I sure as hell didn't ask my wife's dad. He's cool, but that decision ain't his to make! ;) 
My husband and I only dated for a few months before we had the marriage talk. Although I knew long before then he was my one. Congrats! 
congratulations! how did you know that she's the one? :) 
Marriage is quite the journey. I'll have my 6 year wedding anniversary in a few months, and I wouldn't trade it for the world. 
My grandpa saw my grandma for the first time when she was like 9 or 11, and he instantly told his brother that he was going to marry her one day. They didn't even meet, he just saw her from afar. They later dated and married, but he knew from the instant he saw her. They made it almost 60 years together before he passed, and had one of the most admirable relationships I've ever seen.   A teacher I had in high school had married his wife after something like 3 months of knowing each other, maybe less, and at the time I knew him, they were beyond 50 years married and he was clearly still head over heels for her.   My point is that while many people don't know very soon that someone is the person to marry, some lucky ones do know, and it lasts and is beautiful. I hope you're one of the lucky ones! 
My parents got engaged at 20 and 21 years old after 6 months of dating. They'll celebrate their 37th wedding anniversary in a few months. It wasn't always easy and it took a lot of work, but they're still madly in love with each other today. Sometimes if you know, you just know.  
I'm not going to say anything about your age, but I will say that you should definitely not make any decisions right after you're deadly ill and she just took you to the hospital. I'm sure she's awesome, but it's a traumatic experience and it's bound to give you both some strong emotions. Get better, and when you're just a normal healthy couple again for awhile, talk about it again to see if you're still in the same place.  
Since you say you're young, consider pre marriage counseling. It helps you discuss your life goals, values, skill sets and preferences which will prevent a lot of arguments later.  
I thought I had mono for a couple weeks. Turns out I was just really bored. 
I was in a very very similar situation (22 y/o with mono, love of my life was with me at the time). Do not waste this oportunity, you WILL regret it.  PS: its been 12 years... Im still kicking myself for not marrying that girl. 
Pretty much same situation here, at the year and a half point. Didnt see what she was until after the breakup, like now. 8 months later. 
Sorry I interpreted that as:  "hey, you know how it's our second date?" "yes" "I'm going to marry your sister." "... You bastard" 
Yeah, seriously. It's great that she's so into you, but 3 months is nothing, I'd definitely wait a while before you actually get engaged. 
My now husband told me about 5 months into dating we were going to get married someday (we were in high school). We got married when I was 20, and he was 23. We've been married almost 5 years. Getting married young isn't always a bad thing! BUT I would recommend dating a bit longer AND living together first.   Although when we dated wasn't typical dating (he was in Georgia, I was in Oregon and literally could only communicate through email) we were together for 2 years, broke up for 2 years, and then the first time I saw him after that, he told me he was moving back and we were getting married. Within a month he was back home, we were engaged and living together. We may have known each other for almost 10 years total,  it I truly believe you don't get to know someone until you are living together. I personally had to grow up a lot when that happened, having not lived on my own before, but if you can get through that I think you can get through anything.  
My wife was 19 and I was 24. Dated six months. Been married almost 13 years and still in love like heartstruck kids. It's not a mistake for everyone.  
My husband and I did something similar too! Knew we wanted to get married, became something we were talking about all the time with excitement, then decided to "just peek" at rings.   That day he came home with a beautiful blue topaz ring and proposed officially!! 
Aye same to you!! That's so awesome I was just looking up ring prices. Gotta start saving now  
Haha thank you! I just hate having to wait to ask.  
I noticed this too.  Classic case of only hearing what you want to hear. Two months is nothing. It's a blip of time while wearing rose colored glasses.  I don't see the point of getting married so soon after so little time.  If it's meant to be she will still be there in a year+ after you've gained financial stability and knowledge. 
So totally agree.  I would seriously consider leaving the man if he thought I would be ok with him asking my dad for permission.  I will also never take a man's last name to signify that I am now his "property."  Thanks for showing me that men think about things like this too. 
I'd suggest longer. If you wait until you have dated at least 2 years, you get of that pink cloud of first falling in love. If it's real, it will survive that, but if it was infatuation that is probably around the time you will notice.  It's incredibly sweet and nice that OP and his girlfriend are so much in love and see a future together, but if you plan to stay around forever anyway, you can just as well wait a bit longer before rushing into marriage. In the end you'll be in the same spot or saved from a big mistake. I'd personally plan to not even consider marriage before 5 years together and with my last serious boyfriend I thought we would definitely make that, and then after 3 years we turned out we would be definitely better not together. 
I like this idea a lot I already go to therapy and he has been helping a lot with this and offered to have her come in for a session with me soon  
Exactly I don't want to wait and let this opportunity pass up. I know people say have fun in your 20s blah blah but I already have a full time job and we are both almost done with school and I've never had more fun than the fun I have when we are together. I don't see a reason to wait.  
I've heard the secret to a good relationship is just communicating and sticking together.  That you can pretty much work out the rest.  It was something like "at some point the feeling wears away, and you're left with just choosing to be together or not" and it is your choice.  You can choose to work it out or not.  That being said, you have to make sure your personalities are compatible too.  (Like a slob and a control freak would be a point of tension constantly).    But I wish you the best OP.  Make your own choices, internet strangers are advisors, you can ignore it.  We're all biased and impersonal.   
Well OP has known his gf for 3 months so his is a different situation. 
If you live in the Midwest, I recommend Fred Meyer. That's where I got mine. $0 down and 6-12 months interest free depending on the initial price, which was about $500 something, and they had a bunch of discounts applied which got me down to $380.  In retrospect they likely weren't discounts, the ol' retail strategy of saying "you're getting such and such off the price" to make the sale more attractive lol 
I see it more as fathers want what's best for their children (in this case: daughters) and if a total shitbag was daughter's boyfriend and asked for permissionto marry her, dad could say, "Unfuck yourself, then you can marry my daughter."  
my husband didn't ask my dad, but he considered it. he ended up proposing spur of the moment before he ever decided if he would or not, lol.  in this day and age, **depending** on the relationship of the potential fiance and their parents, the person proposing may want to ask the parents for their *blessing* rather than their permission. notice i said 'parents', not 'dad'. i think that makes a difference.   in other news, i took my husband's last name because i wanted to, and that doesn't make me any less feminist than abstaining from doing so.  
Totally agree on the two years thing. I dated my ex for three years - first two years were great, but during the third things fell apart quickly, and I should have ended it sooner than I did.  But, then again, everyone's different. Could be that these guys will be just fine. 
That's not a bad idea. I'm on the east coast and was planning to just save up and pay in full but I wouldn't mind the monthly payments instead  
I basically have a couple of bands that coincide with the music we would have sex to in each of my relationships 
That's pretty neat. I've discovered a lot of music through being in relationships. Now there's a lot of bands that reminds me of them when I listen. Sometimes I get sad and become wistful. At least it let's me know that I feel something and I'm alive. It's bittersweet.  
I do something kind of similar, but I make playlists that directly correlate to my life. For example, I have a playlist right now that started back in January and I'll close it at the end of this month. The playlists used to go for a whole year but I started to get into music more and the lists started to get overloaded so I split them into 6 month time frames. When I listen to songs from an old list, it takes me right back to that moment in time. 
Well, my ex introduced me to k-pop and I've been hooked ever since. 
I've got a gorgeous diamond and amethyst necklace, and a stuffed penguin named Frog after the Chrono Trigger character. The relationship ended on good terms - it just wasn't the right time for us to be together, so they are still very special items to me because he was an amazing guy and I wish our time together wasn't cut short due to life and stuff. 
That's cute. I really enjoy music and use it to bond with the people I love. So yeah, I do have periods in my life where I was into different things, say hardcore/punk/r&b/lo-fi/electro (...) all of them I had the privilege of meeting amazing girls and we shared both physical and cultural love. Now I'm waiting for the one that genuinely enjoys bossa nova and phill Collins so I can hopefully marry her :) I've come to terms with myself and not planning to change too much from now on :p 
All the girls i've dated have been absolutely obsessed with Panic at the Disco and Fallout boy and NOTHING ELSE. It's like every part of their minds left the "Rawr xD" phase EXCEPT for the musical taste part of the brain. I tried-- time and time again-- to like those two groups, I really did, but to no avail. This equates to somewhere around 3 years of my life dedicated to attempting to like Panic and Fallout Boy, but I only seemed to dig myself into a deeper grave of hating those bands.  What you will find in my Spotify history is countless hours of music that I attempted to use to combat the emo boys that haunt my dreams. As a result, I've gone through phases of being an indie shitface as well as listening to obsessive amounts of rap. Actually, my musical taste has evolved A TON during this time.  Maybe I need to reevaluate my love life... 
Unfortunately, I had to go through a period of remixes soaked in synth. #redflag  
I've actually noticed the opposite. One of my exes would always be listening to really sad music. Shit that would just make me feel miserable inside. To boot, she already had issues with depression.  Once we were through I began to notice that I don't really listen to anything sad. Sure some of it (mostly classic rock or EDM) could be called moody/reflective for the down times but none of it is outright depressing. I know my collection so well that I can sing just about anything that comes on and it makes me feel really happy when I do.  I think I owe my subconscious for such a positive attitude. Can't imagine what life would be like if I intentionally brought myself down all the time. 
According to my Spotify music, I'm a good mix between "Stuck in the 90s rock" phase and "Getting into strange alternative, indie, and metal music" stage. It's a weird mix of a bunch of different music but nothing from a relationship besides single songs. I'll recognize them when they come on and it reminds me of that person which can be nice sometimes. 
I get the same feeling too, with 2 songs in particular. I'm not very open with my emotions, so it's beneficial knowing I can still feel all that shit after the fact too. 
That's exactly what I do too- it's also interesting because looking back you can tel which few months I was more stressed about school than others (the music is sadder/slower) 
Yo I got stretches of classic rock, indie, metal, classical, edm, house, and remixes through out my whole shit, and my typical genres are rap and soul. My minds been opened to basically all genres if it sound good to me now. 
I completely understand this. There's alone particular artist that, even though it's been almost 4 years and I hardly even think about the person anymore, gives me those sad pangs of missing her. Goes away pretty shortly after.  Lady Antebellum, for specificity's sake 
I have plane tickets, cinema tickets, some coins from the US and some other little stuff I secretly got everywhere we went together! 
I'm starting to feel that too! I used to never be able to get into hip hop / Rap but I've found artists that have made me enjoy it a little more. What are 3 bands that you would recommend right off the top of your head? I'll give you mine!   1.) Hiatus Kaiyote 2.) Boards of Canada 3.) The War on Drugs 
Need You Now? That was 6 years ago, I feel old as shit now. 
Oh shit, I know Hiatus Kaiyote's song Nakamurra.  If we talkin rock/indie  1) Gates  2) Young The Giant  3) City and Colour  If we talkin rap  1) Oddisee  2) Joey Bada$$  3) Isaiah Rashad  But I'm in love with SZA's new album Ctrl right now. 
Such a classic album. ~~Cape Cod~~ Walcott is hands down the best song on there.  
Thanks. I like metal instruments but not scratchy vocals. That's why Nightwish, etc. appealed to me 
Oof. That's debatable. I'm a fan of Bryn and I actually do like Kwassa Kwassa a lot.  
Yeah? That's interesting. While I do like Kwassa Kwassa, I usually skip Bryn. M79 and Walcott are my jams for sure.  
Congratulations and I wish you both the very best in your marriage!  I'm sure the age gap will rub some people the wrong way but as long as you're both happy that's all that matters. At least this has helped you both open your eyes as well to see the people that truly matter in your life. Wish you all the very best.  
Congratulations. If she makes you happy, that's all that matters.  
Jesus Christ who do I read these threads when they just remind me of how lonely I am  
I really don't want to come across as judgey....but 29 and 55? You deserve happiness but man she's going to feel weird in another 10 or 20 years. My SILs ex husband remarried a woman 20 years his junior and she looks young and he looks incredibly aged and feeble. She is not happy and didn't think what it would be like when they got older. She's 40 and he's 60. 
Congratulations my friend, and you're not old; you're only as old as you think you are. I hope you have a lovely wedding and best wishes for your future together!  
Congrats! I've been dating guys 15-25 years my senior for a long time, and while I get a lot of flack for it, the people giving me shit I don't nor have ever considered friends, so I've never let it negatively affect me. I'm the same age as your fiancee, and I hope neither of you let other people's negative opinions affect your relationship! 
You rich? Sorry I know that's a rude question but I'm so curious 
Thank you! The age gap has rubbed some people the wrong way, but a lot of our friends and family support us. She makes me truly happy and has made me see meaning in life as I really wanted to end my life shortly after my wife died, she has made me want to keep going and I love her so much!  
Thanks, she makes me happy and has helped me through my depression and I can't wait to marry her this weekend!  
"He gets a young, pretty, lively, subservient bride" and "She gets financial stability" aren't really fair assumptions. She could could be ugly, fat, and bossy. He could be poor.  We have a 29 yo and a 55 yo. That is a pretty big gap, but there's such a huge difference between being 20 and being 30. A 20 yo woman wants a sugar daddy, a 30 yo woman wants a mature husband who doesn't have anything tying him down.   When you're talking say, 16 and 23, no, age is not just a number. But 29 and 55, both employed with no children? I can see genuine happiness.   I'm just assuming they don't have kids tho. If they do, then I think there's a lot more to consider here.  
Well, Reddit kept me busy for over 12 hours a day for the last 3 years. I would not be here to reply to you if Reddit hadn't kept me company honestly...   I just signed a 1 year lease with my new gf. Hang in there, someone is looking for you right now!  
My parents are 26 years different in age, have been together for 33 years and are the strongest couple I know. Age is a number. Love is love.  
As someone who's finished two relationships from 10-14 years older, I hope I get this peace of mind. There are spells where I feel stable enough to let their opinions bounce off, but there are other times I'm terrified of loving someone that much older than me and I start feeling like I'm not equal, even though every experience has told me I am.  
My gf is older, makes less money and is average looking.   But we laugh like idiots when we are together, it's fantastic! Wasted 22 years with someone that was pretty to look at...  
I'm so happy for you. Everybody deserves to keep getting (and giving) love specially more after going through a hard time in their life. Glad you could find that again. 
There's 25 years between me and my husband and we've been together 17 years and married almost 11. You know what you have, ignore the haters, congrats :) 
I too am in a relationship with an age difference.  It's a 9 year difference, I am the younger of the two, so I catch the "she's immature and doesn't know what she's doing" flack.  Most people are actually pretty accepting!     However, the comment of "You two probably have nothing in common" arises often.  Feels like a slap in the face when people say that.  I barely notice there's an age difference because we have so much fun together and have so much in common!   On NYE him and I went out with friends, and out of the blue his friend made a comment about how a 30 year old and a 20-something shouldn't date because they have nothing in common.  He didn't know my age, so it was quite funny how he came to that conclusion despite seeing two people in that situation with such a great dynamic!   So you two go, you rock!  I'm happy you're happy! 
I married my, then 54 year old huband, when I was 20. Our 3 year anniversary is on the 16th. We got a lot of shit for the age difference, and I'm sure you have too. We lost some friends and I grew apart from my parents for a time. I'm close with my parents again, but some of the friends we lost have stayed lost. I hope everyone is treating you both well.  
Whoa whoa whoa. You go on this whole thing defending them, and saying the young woman is not necessarily a "young, pretty, lively subservient bride," but then go on to say "a 20 yo woman wants a sugar daddy" ?   You're making an equally unfair assumption.  
Well my date for tonight cancelled on me not to long ago, so that's not helping my mood much either. I was starting to suspect she didn't like me anyway. 
I would probably kick my bf in the nuts if he described me as average looking to a bunch of strangers. Lol. Come on dude! 
I'm so happy that I've been able to go through the last few years with her and make it through my depression.  
I have a 10 year difference and am 37. It is now meaningless. Totally meaningless.  Slight difference in musical taste, thats it.  
We've gotten a lot of criticism from some people at her workplace and we have been criticised by many other people about our age gap. But we don't care and her parents are happy for us both, we've lost some friends over this, but other friends have stayed with us and supported us throughout.   
You're right, I should've phrased it better. It's not that a 20 yo wants a sugar daddy, it's the most people who want sugar daddies happen to be in their early 20's.  
Its okay, now you have more time to spend on reddit? 
I don't know if you have noticed but your current wife is approximately as old as your deceased wife would be today. 
Good to hear. You don't need those friends you lost anyway. Have fun at your wedding and have a great honeymoon. Best wishes for your future.  
I can confirm that Reddit has never cancelled a date with me. 
Congrats!  I, also, had a good outcome today: while at a job fair that was a bit outside my interest but still relevant, one HR rep stepped away to make a call to a colleague because he knew the colleague needed someone with my exact qualifications. Too early to know if it will turn out, but his colleague did say she would get in touch with me. 
Congrats, Hopefully one day, I will be in your position and go to college, happy for ya :) 
Congrats dude! I'm still finishing my first semester but I already know the feeling! Just yesterday I found out I got a 9.7 on my last calculus exam, making my final grade a big ol' 8! Super happy right now, I thought I would never make up for that stinky 4.6 on the second exam. 
Congrats! As a current long time college student, you've passed the first hurdle of college. My first year, I was amazed at all the freedom I had to do whatever I wanted. So amazed in fact, I forgot to do a lot of my work. I'm an A student now, but my first year was not pretty, so good job, friend. You're off to a great start. 
Congrats!! That's amazing news :)   I find out on the 15th my final degree classification, the provision one was a 2:1 so hopefully that stays! Wish I was back in first year like you! Best four years of my life  
Congratulations! I had my second-to-last exam for first year today, not feeling too confident about my grades right now though! Last one is on Wednesday so hopefully that will go well :) 
The only class I had trouble in I did terrible with, but mine came back as well and I passed by .3 points...maaaaybe not as prestigious xd 
Awesome, man! One of the great things about getting good grades is that it keeps a momentum within you to keep getting them.  
Oh wow! I graduated on Friday and about 2 weeks ago got back my last grades of my university career. Good luck with your next 3 years! 
With how little I actually went in I'm just hoping to pass the year, 4/5 passed so far an just waiting on the last module. What uni are you at? 
Congratulations! My first year of college starts in a few months, do you have any tips? 
Great work!  My time at college was tough, but I wouldn't trade it for anything.  As for today: I'm hoping to hear back from more companies about a new job. I got a lead, though. New gig pays a little less than the current, but I hear the team is great, and I'd be working for a nonprofit instead of a money-hungry tech startup that can't sort out its own product, so. 
'grats man! from your post history I see that you're in community mental health, sounds cool! I still have a couple of weeks left in my first year in junior/community college and hope to do well enough these next several quarters to transfer out for my third year. enjoy your summer :D 
This is way too nice, it doesn't seem like Reddit. 
Congratulations! It's a great feeling to have your efforts rewarded. And good on you for taking the time to savour this milestone.  One problem I had in post-secondary (tech college) was constantly focusing on what was ahead, and not appreciating the positive feedback I was getting along the way.  All the best to you in the years ahead. If you're especially lucky, you'll come out the other end with one or more great, lifelong friendships as well. :) 
I'm going to write my exam today. Hope, I can have the same feeling as you  later on.  
Eyyyyyy same here! I'm really happy about my grades this first year. It's gonna make me feel good when they start crashing and falling in the next 4 years (please don't actually happen...) 
Great to hear! I had two big exams yesterday which also went great, so close to being finished completely. 
Congrats! I got my university grades a few days ago aswell and was very pleased with them!  
Congratulations on passing! What kind of thing will you be doing in year 2?   I've just finished my second year of university, and the last two years have just been general arts courses. The next two are English and Creative Writing, so I'm getting quite hyped now. I did my exam a couple of weeks ago, and my results should be in around August. 
Congratulations! My university's honor roll came out last night and I made President's again, and I've been super stoked to tell someone all day! 
Well good news in a different sense, my university acknowledged me dropping out allowing me to finally join my apprenticeship :D 
Community Mental Health, year 1 covered the basic psychology behind abnormal behaviour and the sociology of health. It's been an interesting ride. 
Sorry, the American education system is different to mine, could I get an eli5 on the "big ol' super 8"? And the 4.6?  I assume 9.7 is out of 10 and that's fantastic!  
That's only a few days away!   Year one has been fun but I'm excited to be getting one step closer to graduating. 
Thank you good man! If you haven't seen it, I highly recommend watching Wonder Woman. 
Absolutely, my problem now though is that I have nothing to do until September, yeah I have a part time job and volunteer but nothing to challenge me. I'm really looking forward to going back. 
Graduation must've been so exciting, what's next for you? 
A local university centre in the U.K., it has only been established for a few years but it offers locals a chance to go back without uprooting and moving/travelling. The degree is awarded through a larger university too so the grades have weight to them. It's ideal not only for me but the town too. 
How do you feel they both went? I'm awful being put on the spot, would rather do essays. 
To be fair an apprenticeship is brilliant, depending on the pay. Learning on the job and earning is the best way. 
Sounds cool, what are you planning to do after you graduate? 
Thanks!  I study at the Federal University of Rio de Janeiro (UFRJ) and here we have a simple 0.0 to 10.0 grading system, with 5.0 being the passing grade. Anything 8 or above is great and makes you a good candidate for scientific scolarships, exchange programs and whatnot. 
It is! Super exciting but making me so nervous!   I can imagine. It goes crazy fast so make sure to enjoy it and do as much as you can! I'm dreading having to go back to full time work haha  
gonna watch it with my cousins at the end of this month on my visit to India! 
Yeah but having a break is important. It's super easy to burn out if you push it too hard. Now when you go back you'll be super charged! 
spend as much time as you can with friends and family! 
I'm traveling for a bit, then starting a job in July and moving into my first apartment in September! It's a pretty exciting time. 
HA! I think your hard work and dedication to your studies REALLY made your day; but, thanks! :) 
nicely done! I will actually be studying abroad in the UK this fall! 
Really well overall. I had Science and Maths Paper 2. Science went great and Maths Paper 2 may be the best I've ever done in a maths exam. Unfortunately Maths Paper 1 didn't go as well as I'd hoped but I'm hoping Paper 2 will even things out. I'd love a B at this point. 
I'll be earning less then minimum wage for the first year but I plan on clocking in overtime so hopefully income should be steady :P 
First steps are important, what are you looking at studying? 
Moving is scary, do you have people to help you move? 
90 minutes isn't bad, though I can't advise you on the subject.  Will a "break a leg" work? 
When do you find out the results? The hard part is waiting now. Fingers crossed though  
Mental health.  That's a great field to go into, loads of opportunities for you to delve into. 
I'm considering music or biochemical science. My First choice for music is UNC Chapel Hill and my first choice for science is UC Berkely.   
Well, I'm only moving about 1.5 miles from where I live now, so it's not too scary. Cities man. 
Yeah, right now I think I can pass it all. Just need to keep motivating myself to give 100% throughout this whole month.  
Get the results around halfway through Summer which is annoying, fingers crossed like you said. 
I'm looking for a job at the moment. I got a call from an agency offering a job at esure, so hopefully I can get past the interview stage and get working. I enjoy the free time, but I will love to start working soon. 
That sounds great. What are you thinking of doing after you finish?   
Two completely different subjects, thats amazing.  I'd like to say go with your passion but sometimes you need to look at what's available in the job market and go from there.  I do wish you all the best with your choices and look forward to hearing about your adventures. 
is doing both an option for u ?  in Australia a lot of institutions offer the ability to do two bachelors degrees at once 
awesome. from experience, make sure you like where you're attending. even though cal is an amazing school a few of my friends who went there have had some serious mental health issues as a result of the immense pressure to do well and competitiveness. but if you like that and know you can handle it, go for it! UNC is a great school too, highly-ranked also 
Are you planning on becoming a doctor after your biochemical science undergrad? 
Finding motivation can be difficult to do, I know it sounds strange but is there anyone you can kind of compete with? Create a mini bet between you and them to see who can do better?  Friendly competition helps to motivate. 
That wait is a killer but enjoy the freedom for now.  
Interview is the first step, fingers crossed it plays out right for you and the wait isn't too long. 
Social work with vulnerable adults. I'll need a masters first and plans might change. 
Possibly, however I'm leaning towards the research field. 
Not even free yet sadly, got one more big day of exams tomorrow and then its all easy stuff from then on. 
Yep. If you can pass the interview stage you are pretty much good to go. I hate interviews but the agency said they'll give me a helpful guide on what questions they will ask and how to answer them. So hopefully that will work out. 
The best of luck for you!   I would much like to get a masters in my field as well, just to boost that salary up a little bit  
Get some real research experience before doing that 
Ah that's good, means you can prepare.  My bit of advice if you'll accept it; ask your own questions at the end. It shows an interest in the company and your understanding.   An interview is to get a feel for you but also for you to get a feel for the company so don't shy away from asking daft questions or even complex ones to better understand the environment you'll be going into. 
Thanks! What sort of interview questions would you ask? It's a two stage interview process, first one is telephone and then a face to face interview. Would I ask questions in both interview stages? 
I kinda see where you are coming from. I once dated a girl I was not all that into at the beginning, but she asked me out so I took her up. She really grew on me. 
Maybe it's your weird self that makes you so attractive. Maybe you have mutually compatible weirdness? 
i am currently with someone that has completely shattered my expectations when it comes to a relationship. it's kind of gross, being able to look back and realize that you've just endured a series of unhealthy relationships, but there you go...two years ago, i didn't think someone like this existed. now, i can't understand how the hell i managed to make it this far without her.   so, yeah. i feel you, OP. congratz. :) 
I'm on the same boat as you rn, only Im still working on the asking out part. Any advice or maybe sharing how you went about it? 
I know how you feel. It's amazing how much positivity one person can  bring into your life isn't it?  
Now you know.  Explaining things like being in love, being a parent - if the person hasn't done it they can't understand. 
Love is a great drug. That is awesome. I remember when I proposed to my  ex wife but then I also remember when she cheated on me. Love is great. I also remember I'm lying because I've never gotten married. Love is great.  
It can be difficult getting to know someone. Sometimes taking a chance is worth it though.  
This was exactly my experience.  I always thought the ideal of romance and affection and emotions and just being able to connect on every level with a man was a pipe dream. I had never been in love, and never expected I would be.  Finding someone who could handle my weirdness and pitch in some of his own, someone who was open to expressing how he feels about me and does it often, someone who's compassionate and kind and gentle... all of it seemed like something from a book, something that would never happen, especially not to ugly, dumb, annoying, crazy me.  Then it did, and my life was changed, and I can't imagine life without him.  Congrats to OP, and congrats to you as well! :) 
Her and my best friend were going for it on the side for 3 years. She still kept stringing me around. It'd have been easier if she'd just dumped me quickly but no. Both of them decided that complications were easier than simplicity. The cherry on top was "I couldn't do it because you are such a nice guy"  
i feel exactly the way you do, which is why i'm going to tell you exactly what my girlfriend keeps telling me: YOU ARE WRONG.   you are NOT the person you've been taught to believe you are. you are NOT ugly, dumb, annoying, or crazy. you deserve to be loved. you deserve to feel the way your boyfriend makes you feel. you have  been hurt, and lied to, and abused for so long that you have come to believe to deserve it. YOU DESERVE TO BE LOVED.  i keep needing to be reminded. i think maybe we all do. :) 
Yes. Sometimes you just need to get it out. Bottling things up isn't healthy but we all do it to some degree. We should let ourselves cry more often.  
Every once in a while we find a moment to be kind to ourselves and to love our ourselves.  This was a moment for you. 
For any other confused metric users, I just figured it out. One foot is 12 inches. So 5 feet 8 inches is the same as 4 feet 20 inches.  
What are these measurements translated to a more sane format? :P although that is pretty funny.  
Imagine someone asks "how tall are you?" and you reply with "4/20". Can't imagine the reactions haha.  I'm also 4 feet 20 inches too, and I feel pretty short around other people. By the way, I'm from the Chicago area. 
What's that like? I have a friend who is 4'9". She was engaged to a guy who was 6'2". 
"How tall are you?"  "-sharp inhale- 4'20""  "Nice."    So how tall is the average Chicago resident? 
How does your height compare to the average where you live? 
It also means I'm more than a thousandth of a Nautical mile long.. I should try to pick up chicks who are in to sailing.  
If someone else was 69 inches tall the joke would be complete. 
I actually prefer metric for most things. For instance, WHAT THE HECK IS A TABLESPOON AND WHY IS IT A UNIT OF MEASUREMENT?! 
I'm not that tall. I'm below the average male height. At least in my country (Netherlands). 
184 cm. So a tiny bit more then me. I'm pretty much normal.  
I am so jealous of people who live in the part of the world with 4 seasons. Here in South East Asia, either it's raining or hot af. It sucks, i am yet to feel snow for the first time. 
spring. I have no allergy, i can do so many stuff outside. Summer gets too hot after that 
I like autumn.  The searing heat and humidity of summer is finally over, the trees are changing colors, the holidays are on the horizon.  It's the best.  
I'm a big fan of the two weeks of spring we get in the Midwest. Mind you those aren't a continuous two weeks. It's 14 days scattered anywhere between late January and early June. 
I love late spring. It's got the goodness of summer, but it's not summer. 
I love all the seasons actually.  Cuz I'm really bored in my office here's what I like about each season:  * Winter: I love the snow and love the holidays.  I also love it when we gets lots of snow because I don't have to go to work.  Plus hot cocoa is the shizz.  * Spring: Flowers bloom, the cherry blossom trees bloom, everything comes back to life.  Also the weather is perfect.  Not too hot not too cold.  * Summer: The season of leisure.  Camping, trips to the beach, and drinking beer in the outdoors? Fuck ya bud, sign me up.  Not to mention Halloween is one of my favorite holidays.  * Fall: After getting sun burnt and dehydrated the fall is a good break from that heat.  Plus all the leaves turn into different shades of orange and yellow.  It's so beautiful.  Early fall also has the perfect weather.  
Hi!!! Spring is my favorite because it means winter is over and the sun's out and it gets warmer and everything's growing and there's so many flowers!!!  
I feel you on that one. Autumn is wonderful. I was in Chicago once in October, and the scenery was captivating. I have this daydream where I'm walking down a somewhat busy Chicago street, it's slightly windy, leaves are changing colors in Millennium Park nearby, and I'm sipping on a coffee. I look up at a muted grey sky, take a deep breath, and keep walking. No other season makes me feel that way.  
Fall.   Halloween, NFL, NHL, start of mite hockey leagues, my kids birthdays. It's light jacket weather, the smell of leaves, bon fires, just everything 
I love all seasons except summer. I *hate* summer.   It makes me sick actually, it gets too hot, and I'm gagging and almost vomiting. Cannot find any reason for it.   Fall & winter are my favorite seasons. if I could live in perpetual fall/winter I would definitely do something.   Summer = Hell No.  
Everyone always looks at me weird when I saw I hate summer and love winter. The thing is, you can put on as many layers of clothing as you want to protect against the cold, but you can't take off your skin if it's hot. 
Same. And it's kind of the in-between period right now where one week it's not as balls and the other it's raining like shit. 
*What about late autumn when it's raining and it's dark?* 
I like autumn as well. Halloween has always been special to me, it was the one day where everyone was kind of equal and we all just had fun together. Plus, the smell of burning leaves is one of my favorites (though it's mostly illegal to burn leaves now). Plus, I got married in Fall and both my kids were born in Fall.  
80s - 90s is fine :) I'm from Spain, where it's currently 97. 90+ is where it gets uncomfortable for me.  
*What about late fall when  it's dark and rainy all the time?* 
*Do you like the sea? I absolutely love to be by the sea when the sky is grey, there's little rain and heavy wind.* 
And now I don't have to be forced to go outside coz nobody wants to go out! Perfect! 
*I actually do, and that visual sounds incredibly appealing. Near which sea do you live?* 
*Me, too. Do you always write in italics or just on this post?* 
Well Summer is my favorite season and that may be because i live in Scandinavia, though winter is hell and fall isn't much better and spring is just a mini Winter.   Autumn may look nice but in my opinion its too Cold. But Summer is just perfect(most of it) sometimes it can get to warm but all this depends on where in Scandinavia you live. 
See, and if I moved up north, maybe summer would become my fav season lol.   I just can't deal with too hot of temperatures. Anything above 80 degrees F is too hot for me, unless you have very little to no humidity.   I just can't deal with humidity. Right now it's hot as fuck outside and it's actually like, 70 degrees, but with the humidity it feels like 90 F. It sucks. A lot. Plus I can't breath & I gag and occasionally vomit from the heat. The only thing I can do to beat the heat is *literally* be non-stop drinking a water, but then I have to pee non-stop. 
Do you live in a place where it snows heavily? It's terrifying when you don't have a car with 4 wheel drive. 
Like Chili powder? Because I think of chili as beans, meat and sauce.  
I didn't buy the Honda extended warranty either. Mostly because I drive alot.  I did ask " Why the extended warranty? Aren't Hondas supposed to be reliable?"  Their response: ummm... yeah..  but you'll feel more at ease! 
Fuck I hate dealerships. It sucks they passed laws making it so we have to go through them.  
I made a spreadsheet to calculate lease payments when I went car shopping a few months ago. Boy, did the dealerships hate me lmao 
Dealerships are so irritating with the "Dealer math". We leased a new Nissan for my wife and they insisted that we put another $1000 down cash to "lower the payments $25/month." That worked out to the term of the lease divided by $1000 = $25. Why would I give them $1000 liquid cash up front to save $25 over the course of the lease? I thanked them and said we would just pay the "extra" $25 a month. 
Excuse me I'm not from the US. Where else can one get a car if not from a dealership?! 
When you calculated your own payments, how much did the payments differ? Assuming you used the correct interest rate, wouldn't it be the same as the dealers? 
Uh, financially it actually makes sense if your lease payments include an interest. You actually pay less if you pay more up front. 
It's a shame that other dealerships aren't like my beloved Fields BMW. I've experienced the shady sales tactics with a ford dealership. If you can for future reference, look for a Fields brand dealership or a Carmax. They're typically not as pushy there.  
Depends on the interest. If you take $1000 out of an account that's earning 5% to pay a 3% loan you're losing money. 
Whatever math they used made no sense then. They gave us the option of paying $25 less over 40 months if we gave them $1000 cash immediately. I would rather keep my money. If it would have dropped the payment $50 then it might have made sense. Literally it was, "we have your payment as $375 a month, if you give us $1000 extra down you can get the car for $350." 
Seriously? You can't buy a car directly from a person? 
Maybe one day I can pop into a BMW dealership and buy something... 
That sounds sketchy. The $1000 up front should have saved you more than $1000 in total from the lease payments.  Your dealer really does use weird dealer math then. 
Keep in mind, luxury brands already make their profit on the sale of the vehicle, both a larger dollar amount and a larger percentage of what you pay than the average economy car. Their most lucrative deal is to keep a good relationship with you, so they make the buying process very friendly and pain-free.   Besides, what point is a 5+ year extended warranty when they'd rather you kept your car for 2-4 years (when it depreciates the most) and then buy it back from you cheap, and then sell you another brand new car (plus whatever they make off selling your "certified pre-owned" trade-in)  Economy cars/brands are still the best deals as long as you don't pay for anything you don't want; that leaves the sales people little wiggle room to buff up their commissions.  Source: am also a numbers guy that knows a little about cars 
What about inflation? At 2% it's always economical to spend a fixed amount of money tomorrow instead of today. 
Yeah, like if my paychecks keep up with inflation, while my debt stays fixed, I will come out ahead.  
Paying someone legal currency for a good is "robbery"? The fuck? 
My quick calc shows that over a 4 year period the avg $4200 payment will feel like $4075 at today's rate once inflation is taken into account. The more you can put off paying the better. Unless of course there is any sort of interest. 
I shouldn't have to go through a car dealership to buy a used car. How is this legal? The transaction is between me and my neighbor. Im not talking about paying for the car I'm talking about paying for a dealership to sell me my neighbor's car! 
He's literally saying he bought a used car off of another person. Not a dealership.  
*Yay. I have no idea what brought me to CC, actually, it was such a long time ago.*                                                  *I was studing in school three years ago.  I was a bad student... I still am in school, but now I'm a good student.*                 *I feel like writing poems is the only thing that is making me happy right now, there's a tough period in my life right now, I feel very sad and lonely. But when I write a poem, then all seems a lot better for an hour or so...* 
I stalked a reddit friend and saw she posted in cc... Thought it looked friendly so I started to take part.   3 years ago, I had just finished my dissertation... Now 3 years later I've transitioned mtf. Got an awesome job I love, and things are pretty darn good :) 
Happy birthday CC!  I found this sub about a year ago. I'm not sure how I found it. I've visited it almost every day since! I love being part of such a nice community. 
Happy birthday!  What brings me to CC. Came across it just a day or two ago and thought it seemed pretty cool. Occasionally I find the need to chat but doesn't seem to fit a sub so this should be awesome!   Where was I three years ago? I was in my last year of highschool trying to figure out what to do with my life. Haven't figured that out yet but having fun  What makes me happy? I am just about to start a new ski season and I am super excited to meet new people and make friends from all over the world with a passion for the snow :)  
Happy birthday!  I found this sub clicking RANDOM and was very pleasantly surprised.  Three years ago I was working a job I hated, absolutely hated, and felt like the world was gonna close-in on me and that was it, this is my life. I left that job for a better position, and I still am not super happy with what I do but it's a million times better than where I was, so I'll take it.  Making me happy these days is stuff I do creatively in my own time, trying to get my YouTube channel going, art, writing, whatever - anything I can do to flex my creative muscles. 
I came to CC after it was featured in /r/subredditoftheday.  Same thing we do every day, ~~try to take over the world~~ er, fixing things. Yeah.   Wooo Friday! 
Finding friendships has been my favorite part.  :) 
Glad to meet you here, Margaret! How have you been? 
Do your chat logs function as a diary of your days?    What are you studying? 
I do not miss the days of finals and homework at all.   
You were welcomed because you're awesome, OD.  :)   
Any time we get mentioned in Ask Reddit we get a slew of new subscribers.  It's great! 
I see what you did there, Brain.   But how will we get the pants on the monkeys? 
Awww, thank you, me too!!! This has been incredibly fulfilling, getting to know people here! 
Yesyesyesyesyes. I didn't even imagine it would be like this. I wasn't sure what "casual conversation" meant, and the reason I didn't explore it before I did was because I had assumed innocuous smalltalk, the kind of filler that doesn't really provide in insight into the kind of mind someone has or the life they lead. But the conversation here spans a *dizzyingly* wide array and it's been incredible. I love, too, how many different parts of the world are represented here. 
*Things are getting better. Yay. I also read an interesting book and now I can't think on anything other than that book...* 
Yeah! :D I've even met five people from here so far. 
Bollywood! I've been doing it for fifteen years; I love it more than anything. I have a bunch of shows coming up that I've been busy with.  
Can't wait for it to be over. Even though I'm done for the summer I keep having a reoccurring dream that its the day of a final and I forgot to study 
There's such an amazing crowd from all over, all ages, all walks of life.  And then how much fun when you meet someone who lives just down the road!   
Hey that's cool! What's the name of the book? I'm starting back to reading myself, actually. 
I'm at two!  But hopefully more to come, I'm meeting so many awesome people.  
New Zealand looks so gorgeous!  Just such a long flight.   
That's awesome!  I love seeing Bollywood routines.  I bellydance, and it has a lot of the same basics.  
Whoah has that happened to you?? I haven't had that experience yet but HMU IF YOU'RE IN THE BAY AREA, California people! 
*It was a long essay, called 'The Myth of Sisyphus' by Albert Camus...* 
Oh cool! I only know some of the basics of belly dancing but it's a lot of fun from what I've done. I'll link to a video of my routine once I'm allowed to release it if you'd like to see it!  
Sounds cool; I'll have to look that up!  Any other weekend plans? 
It won't be allowed in the sub as it's considered PI, but PMs are fine, and I'd love to see if you're willing to share.  :)  
I'm sure you've heard they're bringing the show back! 
It's so confusing when I see something say "Bay Area," and it turns out they mean California.  We have a bay too! 
OMG FLORIDA IS NOT ALLOWED TO CALL ANY OTHER STATE CONFUSING 
I am on my fifth in a row but I now a few people who are in the teens.  
I went to Big Hero 6 by myself, though there were some kids and parents in the room with me, it was mostly me. For the first time I put my feet up and was laughing out loud in public. It became one of my favorite movies simply because I got to see it all by myself. It was one of my only goals to do before I graduated (I was sixteen at the time!) and it's a moment I'll never forget.  
Dude I loved the books as a kid. So many of my childhood favorite books are now movies. Is it any good? 
I'm 28. I went to see Captain Underpants on Sunday with my wife, my mom, my 14 year old cousin, and 6 year old nephew. My wife and my mom could have done without out, but the rest of us loved it. The animation was beautiful (DreamWorks always seems to be top notch) and I loved the references to the original story- especially the flip-o-rama.  
I went to see F8 of the furious with my friends and we had a great time. I'm definetely seing CU along with cars 3 once it comes out in new zealand 
I just went with my co-workers because we all wanted to see it, but none of us were under 30, and we would have felt weird going by ourselves. All of us really enjoyed it. Best idea this week. 
Movies like the new cars and this are for us anyways ;) since we grew up with it. What'd you think of the movie? 
I remember reading the first 5 Captain Underpants books, when I was 13 years old, back in 2001. I might have been a little too "old" for this book series, but that didn't stop me from having fun reading them! :P  I'll probably see this movie, whenever it becomes a rental on Google Play or the PlayStation Store. 
I was reading those books when I was way too old to be reading them. Kind of want to see the movie.  
Thank God for that.   I understand that one sometimes wants to indulge in dumb/childish entertainment but watching Captain Underpants is going too far.  
Omg the references, Harold and George's over-the-top-ness and the sprinklings of more adult humor a la failings of the public school system did it for me. It definitely sated the nostalgic in me while my adult, mature side is "who the hell is this manchild, idk him. I'm gonna induce dissociative disorder to just get me the hell out of here" 
Omg going with some friends would def have gotten rid of most my shame. What inspired you guys fill watch it? 
I mean......it does have its adult funny moments but SOOOO much of the humor is child-level toilet humor which is to be expected. Definitely made for the kids more so than those who read them as kids.  If you have kids, bring them. You'll get a lot less weird looks coming out of the theater. If it goes on Netflix, watch it there and have no one else be all the wiser 
The references were spot on. I also liked the political references.  
OOOOOOH. You know so many women TRY to get white hair. And to me, there are few things more attractive than an older woman(meaning she has white hair the more typical way) with a nicely styled head of white/silver hair. I think it would look amazing on a younger woman. And hey, if you want to do bright colours, no bleaching! I'm almost jealous :)  
When I was around 4 years old I managed to smash my face and create a quite large scar on my upper lip. That scar was the bane of my existence for a very long time, and when I finally just accepted that it is always going to be there a very large burden was dropped from my shoulders. When you learn to live with and accept things that you can't do anything about, it feels very good! And in all honesty it doesn't affect me in the slightest now, so why should I care about it? 
I hate being that person, but you should post a picture of it. Personally I think white hair looks pretty good on a lot of younger people that dye it that way. 
That's awesome! I am going to stop dying my very long hair shortly so that when I go gray I can just have long gray hair. Don't want to be one of those women with dark hair and all gray roots. 
Do you have vitiligo? It causes stuff like pigment loss. Did you get a bad sunburn when you were a kid? 
Yes exactly! With my Nan being sick and dying this year, I've learned not to worry about small stuff anymore. It isn't worth it  
I'll work on getting a picture posted! It's not completely white yet, not even close, but I have more white in it than before  
I have one girl who only ever called when she needed something. I have cut off communication with her for the past couple years. I don't have time for that shit. It would be different if she were at least grateful, but she treated me like shit when we hung out. And now she deals weed and has to attend court-ordered parenting classes and is on 3 year probation. (My sister still keeps in contact with the girl and keeps me in the loop) 
I feel like I'm let down by most of my old high school buddies. After graduation I moved about 4 hours away, nothing too crazy. I'd go visit them and they'd always offer to come see me (I live in a city, they live in the middle of nowhere...there's actually stuff to do where I live) but it would never happen. I got to the point where I just stopped trying & gave up on engaging in the friendship. Now we rarely ever talk and I feel like I'm a lot happier that way...even though I miss them sometimes. I feel like I've moved on with my life & my life has improved so much...but they're still doing the same things. I guess I just outgrew them. I did, however, run into an old high school friend last week while visiting for the day & they've clearly gone down hill...getting in trouble with the law and stuff. Not my style. I'll keep my college friends.  
This happened to me! They messaged me on LinkedIn (I added them because I'm still building my network) and they asked for my number. Didn't think anything of it and gave it to them. Then they text me saying they want to talk to me about a job opportunity since they saw that I'm looking. We arrange a time to talk and when they call they go into this whole pyramid scheme type business they run with their dad, all the while l refusing to tell me the name of it. I told them I wasn't interested as politely as I could and ended it right there 
It sounds like your old high school buddy's life has gone absolutely nowhere since graduation. Pity them for a moment, reflect on all you've accomplished in the past eight years, and move on with your life.  People do have this strange idea that you will forever stay in touch with high school, and even elementary school friends. It just isn't the case as (interesting) people tend to change so much once they hit adulthood.  I am friends with one person from school. I am still the acquaintance of about four or five.  
Most of my close friends from back then moved on, like you did, but the guy that texted me still lives in the area and last I'd heard, he was doing pretty well for himselr. I was just hoping he'd want to grab a beer and catch up. But nope, just wanted another pawn in his money game. 
Well, I suppose I'm glad the guy I talked to launched right into his pitch and didn't waste my time then!  
I've gathered since out chat that he's got a daughter, recently got engaged to his daughter's mother, and has a steady job. My guess is he was feeling infallible after his girlfriend gave birth, he got engaged, and started his job. It appears (based on his facebook account,) that those things happened, in that order, just before he got sucked in to this shitty scheme. So it seems he's doing fine, he's just naive and/or gullible. 
That sucks. Sometimes I wonder why people have to be such crappy humans. I'd love to catch up with some old friends - but most of them have moved on to be shit heads. Keep your head up! We don't need people like that in our lives.  
Yes, you're very fortunate that way! lol  On the flip side, I've reached out to people and have had people (some who I wasn't even super close to) reach out to me after YEARS just to say "I randomly thought of you the other day" or "I still remember how nice/funny/awesome you were" 
Nah, I know. He and I weren't super close, but like I said, most of my high school circle is elsewhere, and the few that are still around either got into drugs or just lost touch. I have other friends now, but I still think about the old crew and wonder what they're up to once in a while. 
Well, that's always nice! Hope you found a job, by the way. I know that can be tough. 
I can concur. I Facebook stalk my old friends on occasion so I can catch up on their lives. I feel like I wonder about them more than they wonder about me.  
Thank you! I'm interning somewhere right now to build experience and it's paid (not much, but still a huge blessing). Hopefully, it'll lead me to something more permanent  
I've felt like that before. I find that feeling changes when I change my friends. If people don't seem to like you but you don't agree with their criticisms of you, chances are you just need to find people that do think more like you. :) you deserve to be liked, and I'm sure your likers are out there in plenty! 
It sounds like you need new friends. Hi! I'm delibertine.  
I feel that way sometimes, too, but you have to realize that it's most likely an insecurity.  As for your friends ... are they really good for you if they are making you feel like shit?  You should have people you feel comfortable around, that encourage and support you.    If there are positive changes you want to make, start working on yourself.  You'll attract more people into your life, the ones you'll want to keep, by learning to love yourself.   
I'm your opposite: people like me (well enough I guess), but I don't like people much.    
I only care about people who care about me.  It's not worth my time thinking about people who don't like me. I cannot change how they feel about me, and I'm sure as hell not going to change myself to suit them. 
Could be insecurity. You could also just be interpreted as cold and aloof. If you want to change how others perceive you, then you will have to change yourself a bit. I know the cliche is to just "be yourself", but if that's what you've been doing all along and you don't see the results you want, then perhaps it's time to address what's causing it. 
Back in the 5th grade I made friends with a guy named Tyler. He turned out to be one of the best friends I've ever made. But on the flipside, anytime he introduced me to one of his friends, they always ended up hating me for one reason or another.  The most memorable of which was Chris, who also happened to be the first of his friends who introduced to me. Long story short, we visited him on his grampa's farm, he was hostile to me for no particular reason, and he started a fight with me. I whacked him with a stick, and Tyler and I walked home. 
I used to want everyone to like me. This was high school me. I've done a lot of growing up since then and one of the biggest changes I made was living a life where I only want certain people to like me. My friends, family significant others, etc.   It's exhausting *trying* to get people to like you. Kinda like dating, but that's a different story. Point is I only want a few people to care about and I feel much better living this way. I'd rather have a small network of people I can rely on than be in slightly good graces with lots of people. Worrying about people you barely know just seems unfair to yourself. Like, why should they get to put a debbie downer in your day? Who are they to you? No thanks. Life's too short for that. This is how I feel. Maybe it would help you too? 
I'm a bit late late here, but yes, I feel like that a lot.  I think one of the guys I play volleyball with is a pretty good example, especially about why I'm wrong. On the court, if he has the chance he'll place himself next to me in the lineup, when we just play for fun he'll try to set when it's my turn and he'll step in and take the dig from me. I felt like he was trying to push me off the team.   I was gearing up to confront him about it while walking to the train station one day, but didn't get around to it before he thanked me for helping him with the blocks and spiking for him, he felt like we'd become a duo on the court covering each other's weak points and both playing better for it... Turns out I'm a good friend of his, who helps with the things he can't.   Different perspectives  
Someone who criticizes you all the time is not your friend.     If you are introverted and/or shy, many people will take you to be cold, and you won't make friends quickly. But the friends you DO make, the REAL ones, will truly appreciate you.     If you want to make more friends, two strategies that can work:        - Get involved in more activities that you truly enjoy or would like to try and that involve other people. For shy people, it's easier to meet while doing something rather than just going to parties or bars where the only activity is social interaction (at which we don't tend to be very good.)       - Read and practice the advice in the book: "How to Make Friends and Influence People." It's a classic self-help book that's been in print for f**king ever because the principles in it are simple and effective.  
These comments are risky not just for speech of eating babies. Which I don't do!  
I do feel like you, I have just about 5 people around me that I even talk to, then there is that girl at my school, that I don't even talk to, that for some reason hates me so much, I don't know why, maybe cause I am just ugly? 
My friends and family seem tolike me despite me being a horrible douche. Whenever I meet someone new and try to befriend them (important to note that I'm horrible at human interactions), however, I'll get almost exclusively negative responses, even before my sonofabitchery is revealed.  Maybe this friend of yours is not too patient, or is just snob. If you are nice to others, you'll eventually find good people who will appreciate it. 
you are good no worries - do not let them make you feel bad  
I'm in a small school with 37 kids in my grade. Let's just say I don't have the best rep. Sadly, I am no longer trusted with secrets, and it's pretty fucking hard to gain trust once you've lost it. I'm getting there (and since summer is here I hope a fresh start next year). Most people don't like me because I'm a bit pretentious- I know that.  Just hang in there, and relax for the summer. I'm making a big change and cutting ties with a person I like. 
In my environment, I don't really feel anything like that around my friends or people. However, in online world, being nice somehow attracts trolls. 
I have similar thoughts, when I am alone a person I connect very well, we talk about personal things and conversation is full of jokes and puns, but in a group I don't connect with anyone even if is the same people.  
Just my .02 but the times in my life where I have felt people didn't like me were times where I really didn't like myself. The more I pursued things that made me happy the more I attracted positive interactions with others.  
I feel like most people don't like me either. Not that they dislike me, I meet a lot of people and they always say 'she's such a nice girl' but then I fail to move to deeper connections past that most of the time.  My close friends are people I've studied or worked with so we've been together daily for months and then became friends because they got to know me over time and I could open up properly.  I think the answer to that is make friends through shared interests, do a class, join a sport, do sth that will put you in the same space as people who like the same things for a longer period so they get to know you better.  Also get rid of the one who criticises you. If they don't want to be friends with the person you are then part ways respectfully. 
this happens to everyone.... Time will heal it. You jus need to be patient.  
Just a glass half full perspective here:  It seems to me that you are significantly more successful in one way or another in your friend circle. Try to find out what that x-factor is and make it better.   Also you have to learn to take  criticisms  from those around you and filter the constructive ones from them.  
Not sure how old you are but I realized that the older I got, the less tolerant I became of "little" things.  I still have close friends but spending too much time with them makes it easy to become a little too liberal in what I say/think about them.  We all have life hitting us and don't put up with much.  Once you have a spouse, kids, maybe a dog, how likely are you to put up with your friend chewing too loud when you're trying to relax.  Haha maybe not the best example but hope you know what I mean. 
If you want to be more likeable you have to learn to be more outgoing. Or find people with similar introverted interests.   I'm in a boat where I'm not necessarily likeable, but people either love me or hate me, because in pretty blunt and sarcastic, but also genuine and transparent. So people who can't take the bluntness cause they're used to lies and flattery think I'm mean when I'm just honest.   You would need to do a similar introspection, try and identify why it is you find people don't like you, do they get mad, bored, sad, annoyed, grossed out? Etc.  Also feeling like nobody really likes you is depression 101. 
I used to think I didn't like people, but the truth is that I seem to like all people and want to know more about them. It's highly unlikely that people don't like you, and that you just might be a little unapproachable or distant. Try opening up a little, I'm sure good things will happen :) 
I don't know. You'll have people who like you, and there are some that don't just for no reason. Only thing you can do is be the best you you can be and keep it movin. 
I'm probably similar to you in the way I act.  Though, I'd say I'm far more unlikable.  But people tend to like me.  People even claim to be really close to me to other people, as if I'm someone to show off.  I hate this.  In fact, I don't really like people, and I have very few actual friends.  Sometimes I consider why people like me, and I think it's because I'm genuine.  I'm honest, I'm straight forward, and I don't BS.  This comes off as pretty harsh often, and I'm not saying everyone likes that - but too many people do for my comfort.    My advice to you is to always be yourself, don't compromise to make friends, speak  your mind, and stop caring how others might perceive you.  
I've thought about it for that particular person, I am just waiting to see how it will go now...I may need to minimise our contact. I think, unfortunately, that he is still interested in me in a more-than-just-friends way though we've talked about it and I said I wasn't feeling the same way...who knows.   Thanks for the advice! 
Exactly, I am sure I have misinterpreted actions or words that people say to me, it's inevitable in this life and maybe I take some things more seriously than I should. I wish it were easy to know the intentions of others but sometimes you just gotta ask.   Maybe I'm just feeling low lately and that is why certain behaviours are impacting me more.  That was a great story and thank you for sharing it! Now if there's anything that bothers you, you can approach him as a friend and tell him. 
Hey, I think that in your case it's probably people not understanding how you interact since you said you are not good at human interactions. I am not great either especially when I am tired and don't feel like putting the work to be friendly but that's cause I am mostly an introvert.  So, yeah people won't understand who you are deep inside since they only get to judge you from one or two conversations but don't bring yourself down. People who know you well value you so I am sure when others get to know you well enough they will see who you are.  Yeah, this friend of mine is kind of strict when it comes to friendship. I made a huge mistake lately for which I apologized but maybe he hasn't forgiven me yet :/. 
Well, I don't know if it's any x-factor, it's mostly that our group of friends has stayed this way for many years without any major fights at all-which is weird if you think about it- and I believe it is due to us being just superficial friends, we haven't shared many meaningful moments yet. However, we click in that we all have peaceful personalities I guess and respect each others boundaries.   Yes, I have to take criticisms and I do understand when I am objectively wrong on a matter. I understand that I am not perfect and I am going to make mistakes, all I can do is prevent them from happening another time and apologize.     
Please make sure you are not drifting into an abusive relationship. Correcting and critiquing you can be a way to gaslight and control you. On the other side they could be legitimate problems you need to work on.  What I want to say. Try to sort out your feelings about critique. It doesn't have to be your fault, but at the end of the day it's always your problem. 
Pretty awesome. I'm texting a group of gamer friends who're all about to watch Sony's conference at E3, my wife is trying her best to get the skin she wants in Overwatch before their event is over and the cat is...somewhere. I'm not sure I trust her not being visible but I hope she's behaving and not trying to open up our underwear drawer again to sleep in.   Btw, I took a four second scroll through your post history and you seem really cool. I ran into Kevin Smith a month ago in a supermarket here (I'm in Los Angeles, things like this happen), and we chatted about Flash and Arrow. I stopped watching it but he suggested I start watching Supergirl as it got a lot better. That true?   If you don't watch Supergirl, my bad. I did actually mean a four second scroll and I could've sworn I saw you watch Supergirl.  
It would be awesome if we knew the intentions of others, but terrifying that they would know all ours :-/  I think it's pretty normal to feel like someone doesn't like you when you're at a point in life where you don't feel good about yourself, so it's possible :-) if you want to talk to a complete stranger about you're welcome to write me, or if you feel like a quick pick me up I can suggest r/freecompliments  Thank you, and yes I can just go to him :-)  
Just gotta believe it. I mean I'm a piece of shit but I think of myself as Zeus. Maybe that's why I'm a piece of shit? Huh. Don't take my advice. 
I'm not good at interactions, but blaming my introvertion, awkwardness and others for my responsibilities is just fooling myself. I am not a good person, there's no way around this truth. Honestly, if I had a clone with the same personality I would probably punch ot as hard as I could.   Everyone makes mistakes. What differentiates people from one another is how we make up for our mistakes and what we do to ensure we will try to avoid them in the future. You already apologised and are truly sorry for what happened, it's unfair of your friend to not getting any of it (unless it happened too recently, which would explain him not getting over it yet). 
Ah yes I saw that E3 was doing a presentation but I didn't watch it. I guess I will learn about it tomorrow. Haha your cat sound awesome, I have one as well he was freaking out a moment ago but he ate now so he calmed down.   Yeah I watch Flash, Arrow, Supergirl and LoT. Well, about Supergirl, it has its good and bad moments. If I were to be objective I'd say that it doesn't compare to the Flash's good seasons, it has many cheesy moments and there is some bad writing especially now that it is in CW where they made it very relationship-oriented :/.   However, I still watch it because it's a "light" show and, well, being a girl I look up to Supergirl as a hero, I am hoping they make it a bit more of an adult series though in the future.   LoT's last season is great however, they are a fan service series and they do it well lately, it's just fun to watch despite some of the illogical plots.   Also, I hope your wife gets that skin!   
Excuse me, President Trump -- shouldn't you be busy running the country instead of posting on reddit? 
Some cheesy stuff can be really fun though. Especially in Flash and I LOVED the musical crossover despite usually not liking musicals at all. Do you normally just like light stuff? As in, not Daredevil or Jessica Jones on Netflix?   Have you seen Wonder Woman btw?   And thanks! I can hear her screaming from behind my headphones so I hope she gets it too.   
Ssh! Don't mention them they might catch wind to the fact I eat babies. 
I hope your day gets better OP. :)   I hope tomorrow is better too - with a bunch of puppers licking your face and cuddling you until your heart is content.  
Have you seen the life of brian?  Look up the crucifixion scene.  It will cheer you up. 
Why was it a rough day (assuming you want to talk about it)? Anything we can do? 
Ahahah I love those Thomas the Train memes! Gave me a good laugh. 
As much as a troll song this is, everytime I hear it it just sparks something inside me that makes get really happy. Thank you:) 
When jesus appeared it cracked me up! :D Awesome video 
Yeah I understand that but as of right now it feels really shitty. It will get better though and I made the right decision commenting on his behaviour. 
Thank you man. I never knew I wanted a chicken untill today ;) 
I'm glad. :)  I swear, my YT "Favorites" has some weird shit I have zero recollection watching.  
Ive stopped movies for good except star wars, to cut back on my overall screen time so i only repeat watch a dozen a year maybe....they serve timelessly to resonate with me at any age, hope you enjoy them too. 
Ohh right. These must be really good than! I saved the comment so whenever I need something to watch I now know what. So how was your day, you did anything cool? 
Woah, those are great! If I wasn't a poor college student I'd definitely buy one of those!   You could commission sculptures, you definitely have the talent, I'm sure there's a demand out there for it somewhere. 
If I were closer to Seattle, I'd definitely work with you to promote your work! I think if you develop a very polished website and marketed your services as high-end sculpture, or even produce a 2-3 minute interview style video that showcases your process and share that around, you would absolutely drum up business. Just need to find the right clients, but Seattle seems like prime real estate for this sort of marketing to me!  
Beautiful art! Have you tried selling your work at art fairs? 
There are time where I am proud of the things I've fabricated. Then I see shit like what you do and renounce my pride. Those railings are awesome, and  the sculptures are top notch. 
You mentioned doing a children's book or graphic novel like the Tuscaloosa piece; that would be really cool. I don't know if anybody has done something like that before. Where does your interest in graphic novels/children's books come from? 
Thanks. I'd like to think there is a market for what I do, but I am terrible at promoting my work. 
I've been wondering how to find someone to promote my work as I am crap at that. 
Good catch on the Tuscaloosa. I have been a graphic novel fan for years, and a fan of good illustration generally. So much of children's lit is just a vehicle for the illustration. I don't know if or how it would get funded, but I think a pitch could be made for steel sculpture as illustration. 
I'm not in the know when it comes to selling things online, but Etsy may be worth a try.  
If you commissioned sculptures then people would want like, specific things. Probably characters. Almost certainly characters. Mostly characters. It doesn't sound like you *really* wanna do that so maybe that route isn't for you. I mean, obviously you should ultimately decide, but you know, the title of this submission. 
Tried Etsy. It might make more sense if I made work that is easily repeated. 
That's a good point, I didn't even consider that.  
I am way to OCD about how I work to be able to sell in craft venues. Actually, I would like to find a way to promote my fabrication.  
Hey :P Its night here and there is very bad lighting for scenery but I'll definitely do this for ya noonish tomorrow :P  Also just wanted to shout out /r/Random_Acts_Of_Pizza/ If he ever needs a meal post over there for us; lots of kind hearts on reddit don't be afraid to reach out.  RemindMe! 12 Hours 
You might like /r/randomactsofcards - you could request postcards from around the world with this message too 
I tried to take a photo with the message just a moment ago,it didn't turn out good at all,so I will wait until tomorrow morning to get a better shot of scenery outside my window (with the message of course!) 
I am actually crying, this is so beautiful. Thank you so much for taking the time out of your day to do this. He'll especially love the cats!  
God I love Germany. I just went there for a couple days to visit a new supplier for my company. I was so jealous of how orderly and clean it all was. Plus, the business we visited was so excellent and seemed like it had such a great (and challenging) place to work. 
This is adorable! I love the extra hearts, it's 10x as sweet! It's totally fine, I love this photo actually! It's 3:35 am here so it's shocking to see light suddenly.  
Thank you! It's a small idea that'll go a long way  
This is insane! Malaysia! That's so far away. Is that your writing? I thought you printed it at first! This is amazing. Thank you so much.  
Did you handwrite this or is it added by computer?  
This is adorable and I know he'll love it! Thank you.  
Ah, we do have our issues. And we do complain about our cities not being clean at all (we Germans really like to complain about things).   But when I'm abroad I can't fail to notice that yes - it is pretty clean in Germany.   In what part of Germany have you been? 
That's annoying, I did it with the Reddit App link feature! Simple bugs like that are annoying. Cheers! 
This could be an app, and worth millions, be the one. 
Yeah. How the internet connects people from so far away is amazing. I'm glad you like it, no scenery though, it's like 5 am here. lol. 
I actually tried to "relink" it with the feature and it failed again...  
Hmm you do make a good point! I could see it but for now I want it to be this little thing for him to see how special he is. I've never been able to express the word to say I love him more than love. I always feel like 'I love you' doesn't do the justice of how I feel. I remember my mother reading me a book about how a girl loved her mom so much she flew across the world with a banner that said 'I love you' to prove how much she loved her mom and it all came to me  
Thank you so much. This is just as beautiful . I appreciate it so much.  
It's actually a project that has made me cry. I did this for my BF but it's opened my eyes to how the world comes together and peace between us all while bad in the world is occurring. I had to send my mother yours cause I couldn't believe how far away you are! It's 5 pm here! I'm from Mantioba, Canada  
I wasnt even 100% serious i jsut gave the fast.reply.without .Thinking.  but it does carry merit. Yea i agree to ''ily" doesnt always cut it for me either =p 
Don't mention it. I've been there. Luckily I also have an amazing wife who was there for me and provided much needed support.  
Haha it could work though! It's that feeling where your heart genuinely feels like it could burst.  
How in the fuck was PresidentObama not already taken? 
What are you going to do to end the corrupting influence of money in politics during your second term?  
Mr. President, do you feel that there is a problem with the "revolving door" of congressmen and prominent lobbyists? For an example, I'd point to former Senator Dodd, now the chief lobbyist for the MPAA. Is there anything to be done about it? 
What was the most difficult decision that you had to make during this term? 
Would you rather fight 100 duck-sized horses or 1 horse-sized duck? 
Coming up: Tactful avoidance of marijuana questions and disappointment from /r/trees.  
It's been stated that your favorite television show is The Wire. How do you think the war on drugs has affected America, and would you work to end it? 
My question is this: Why would you sign the NDAA when it included language that would allow the indefinite detention of Americans without due process. I understand that this was the de facto case for awhile. Now it's law. This passed by overwhelming bi-partisan support, despite being hated by most citizens. It feels like the government, including the Executive branch, no longer work for the citizens that elect them. (By the way, I fully supported your first campaign, but I'm now disillusioned and disappointed.) 
What is the first thing you'll do on November 7th, win or lose? 
I won't believe this unless he takes a picture with a shoe on his head. 
If you had the ability to automatically enact or repeal only one law without congressional approval, what would you choose and why? 
Let's skip the marijuana legalization question that'll show up at least 50 times on this page and get to a related issue: After promising that you wouldn't interfere with individual state decisions on medical use of cannabis, how can you justify utilizing federal funds and agencies to shut down dispensaries and arrest people who are legitimately sick? 
How do you balance family life and hobbies with, well, being the POTUS? 
If you had to select one non-politician to be the next president, who would be your pick? 
Mr. President, can you stop the NHL Lockout? Please?    **PLEASE????** 
President Obama, why didn't you close Guantanamo Bay as you promised you would? 
A lot of us are worried about copyright law. Sopa, Acta, TPP... And the actions against Megaupload. Mainly because these laws are excessive and limit rights. What is your stance on that? 
Why aren't you more actively fighting RNC voter suppression? 
I have an 11 year old and a 13 year old child. I currently pay more for them to go to private school for one year than I paid for my entire master's degree.   What can you do to heal our very broken public school system (which I want to love)? What can I expect for them when they go to college in a few short years?  
Is there anything going to be done about the current state of student loans? 
What is the plan for Gitmo Bay? and for marijuana legislation?  
He said he would do an AMA for 30 min. That looks like 30 min of answering questions. 
Internet freedom is something I know you all care passionately about; I do too. We will fight hard to make sure that the internet remains the open forum for everybody - from those who are expressing an idea to those to want to start a business. And although there will be occasional disagreements on the details of various legislative proposals, I won't stray from that principle - and it will be reflected in the platform. 
Win or lose, I'll be thanking everybody who is working so hard - especially all the volunteers in field offices all across the country, and the amazing young people in our campaign offices. 
Making sure we stay at the forefront of space exploration is a big priority for my administration. The passing of Neil Armstrong this week is a reminder of the inspiration and wonder that our space program has provided in the past; the curiosity probe on mars is a reminder of what remains to be discovered. The key is to make sure that we invest in cutting edge research that can take us to the next level - so even as we continue work with the international space station, we are focused on a potential mission to a asteroid as a prelude to a manned Mars flight. 
As a girl about to finish my aerospace engineering degree- Please? I promise to spend my life creating the first black hole probe... You know you're curious too. 
Good luck with an answer for this one.  So far the Obama administration has skirted this conversation at every turn. It's really the biggest flip-flop Obama has committed as president. 
Of course this goes unanswered. That REALLY infuriates me. Why does everyone in government just avoid this? Is there some secret reason they keep it illegal? God dammit that pisses me off to no end. 
It's hard - truthfully the main thing other than work is just making sure that I'm spending enough time with michelle and the girls. The big advantage I have is that I live above the store - so I have no commute! So we make sure that when I'm in DC I never miss dinner with them at 6:30 pm - even if I have to go back down to the Oval for work later in the evening. I do work out every morning as well, and try to get a basketball or golf game in on the weekends just to get out of the bubble. Speaking of balance, though, I need to get going so I'm back in DC in time for dinner. But I want to thank everybody at reddit for participating - this is an example of how technology and the internet can empower the sorts of conversations that strengthen our democracy over the long run. AND REMEMBER TO VOTE IN NOVEMBER - if you need to know how to register, go to Gottaregister.com. By the way, if you want to know what I think about this whole reddit experience - NOT BAD! 
The president must be so nervous right now...he just got a comment from shitty_watercolour. 
I'm actually surprised he was able to answer *any* questions after breaking Reddit. 
Not to mention the site issues. It still took me a while to get to this post hours after it was supposed to have finished. 
I'm surprised the username PresidentObama was even available. Or is the man powerful enough to just take it over anyway? I'd hate to see the leader of the free world reduced to taking a username like TheRealPresidentObama or POTUS69 or xx_BarackObama_xx or something. 
9 minutes and already 200+ comments.  Good luck, Obama. You're going to need it. 
You must have enormous balls to admit you do illegal drugs on the one thread that the FBI is definitely monitoring. 
I'll take that as "Poppin bottles of Cristale like it's 1969" 
Respectfully, Mr. President, this is a non-answer. We've seen over the years what an economic boost having a robust space program can be -- not only does it create jobs, it inspires and gives the country focus on a positive and meaningful goal. The current budget for NASA is a pittance - think what could be done with double, or triple that amount?  **Frankly, we need another Apollo moment, Mr. President -- let's plan to get a man on Mars by the end of the decade, and show the world that America is the most scientifically advanced and capable nation in the world, and can achieve what it sets out to do.** 
Ladies and gentlemen: the President of the United States of America referencing his meme.  Good night and God bless. 
"- NOT BAD!"   It was at this point, Reddit ejaculated in glorious unison. 
NEXT ON FOX NEWS: DOES BARACK OBAMA NEGLECT HIS DUTY AS A PRESIDENT, SPENDING HIS TIME PLAYING GOLF IN THIS ECONOMIC STATE? STAY TUNED. 
So honoured that the President of the United States has responded to a question I asked him. 
He should count his blessings. I'm quietly relieved the top comment isn't from POTATO_IN_MY_ANUS. 
"omgomgomgomgomg!!! THE Shitty_Watercolour!"  -Leader of the Free World 
This too. This thing crippled reddit for about an hour and a half. Honestly, it's amazing that the President managed to get through enough to post what he did. 
Tell me about it.   I haven't gone a day without thinking about it and I have been home for almost three years now. 
It's a shame he didn't answer. I'd have liked to see the response. 
I was very surprised by this as well! But I bet if the president wants a reddit name, there are ways of obtaining it... 
It's pretty funny because people used to get scolded for doing a request for Obama because he'd never do one.  
Thank you for showing the president of the United States how classy us redditors can be. 
I'm still waiting for learning cursive to pay off. 
Ahaha... I can just see you telling everyone you know tonight "I corrected the president on his grammar today." 
A grammar nazi's greatest dream...  *"an... Mr. President... An.."* 
That's it. Shows over folks. All the grammar nazis can go home now. Forever. 
If the president says it's a asteroid, it's a asteroid. 
As a member of the non-US free world. Did my vote get lost in the post? 
I'm loving the idea that the president was sitting around frustrated by the 503s like any other redditor. Would have been even funnier if it resulted in a double post... 
I was wondering if somehow they gave his username priority access, or whether POTUS had to hit refresh.    "These servers... are getting hammered!" 
TIL Roseanne Barr and a dude named Merlin are both running for president. 
If Obama made a "Nobody cares Apostolate" post, I would retire from reddit, realizing that nothing would ever top seeing that.  
I read this, and immediately got a knock on the door.   Shit myself.  Found myself eating pizza 2 minutes later. 
I'm a total grammar nazi.  My favorite joke:  Knock, knock... Who's there? To... To, who? To WHOM...  
This is the best grammar nazi-ing he will ever get in his life. Correcting the sitting president of the united states. Let him live the dream. 
Let's just be thankful the guy that corrected him didn't have a screenname like i_rape_cats 
A riveting story... I laughed, I cried, I came. 10/10 
Do you remember the last time a fired Reddit employee did an AMA? I highly suggest she take all this online goodwill and get a high paying, lucrative PR job.  
Her doing an ama would unleash more popcorn than when the last employee got fired  
Holy shit that was fast. I totally support this request. Maybe she can get help from Victoria :) 
I doubt that she will. I'll bet that when she signed her contract to work for reddit she signed a non-disclosure agreement or something of that nature which prohibits her from discussing her firing.  
She almost certainly has a confidentiality agreement 
What the fuck?! I leave for 3 hours and this has dropped from 10k votes to 5k?  Uhm... something's fishy, here. 
Holy shit...14532 and 97% upvoted  Never thought I'd see that unless Snowden and Assange announced they were getting married.  
I just want her to do an AMA so we can salute her   o7 
Now do one for the creator of secret santa too. It's not just Victoria. Reddit wants to gut the heart of the company apparently. Apparently having a popular site isn't enough for them, and so they want the real fans that helped build the site, get stepped on until they fall in line.  
Guys, can we please stop buying Reddit Gold for a day. I feel like that'll make more of statement than the blackout bullshit. That money goes to support Reddit's higher ups.  
Why the hell would she want to come back to add publicity to the site she got fired from? And why would we want to demean her by asking her to do that? 
If you are very interested in seeing this happen, consider posting in /r/IAmARequests and offering Reddit Gold for contacting this person and arranging the AMA! Your request will have a better chance at being fulfilled than just being posted here! And if you do post in /r/IAmARequests, make sure to tag your request with [Reward] if you're offering one, or [No Reward] if not.  Users, if you want to help contact potential AMA participants (and earn Reddit Gold) then subscribe to /r/IAmARequests!   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/IAmA) if you have any questions or concerns.* 
1. Why are you so awesome? 2. Will you be my friend? 3. Considering all you have done to help the reddit (AMA), community, how would you like to see the sub evolve, grow, or change (or not)? 4. Coke or Pepsi? 
"Sons of Reddit, I am Victoria."  "Victoria is 7 feet tall!"  "Yes, I've heard. Gilds men by the hundreds, and if she were here she'd consume Ellen Pao with fireballs from her eyes and bolts of downvotes from her arse. I AM Victoria, and I see a whole army of Redditors, here in defiance of tyranny. You have come to comment as free redditors, and free redditors you are. What would you do without freedom? Will you fight?"  "Fight? Against Pao? No, we will jump ship to Voat.co, and we will post."  "Aye, post and you may be banned. Jump ship to Voat and you'll post-- at least for a while. And posting in your forums many years from now, would you be willing to trade all the comments from this day to that for one chance to come back here and tell the Admins that they may ban our accounts, but they'll never ban, OUR FREEDOM!"   
Could you shed some light on the "last employee"? Don't think I was around for that one.  
#karmatrain  But in all seriousness i want to see her side on this issue, as its the most important 
I know her number. I'll try to call her. Haven't talked to her in a while though. 
Which they can, now. It's one, big, gay, whistleblower wedding! 
Ne questions, it just gets gilded like a million times.   Actually that would mean buying gold. Idk. Some shit along those lines.  
My guess is they are prepping for   1. Sale to an outside company.   2. Pay access.   And ditching people with issues with 1 and/or 2.   But im wrong a lot.  
We might be taking a break from "Reddit Gold" for a while AutoModerator. 
That's the exact string of comments I want to see on this. A question of "what happened/why were you fired" then Victoria's perspective and reddit's perspective.  On one hand, I feel like *maybe* Victoria wasn't 100% innocent in this, but on the other hand if that were the case then someone at reddit would have explained how she screwed up. Until we have that answer, all we can do is guess and that's not working out in reddit's favor right now. 
And the verification picture is just her holding up a mirror. 
God damn that was such a ridiculous response from him. It's a perfect example of the serious disconnect between the community and the company. 
I would literally have to delete my Reddit app to do this.  It's just common nature now to tap on it, sometimes I instinctively tap it right after I've just closed it.  I am willing to do this however.   
But...but I have a four hour train ride with wifi... 
I really hope she didn't have to sign an NDA to get a Severance Package or something. 
If she needs time to recover from the stress of being jobless and such, tell her there is no rush whatsoever. her well-being is the most important 
Yes exactly. No buying gold until all of this has been sorted out. 
That wouldn't be very professional. Even if she had done something terrible, it's in everyone's best interest to say nothing. 
Wow, she's helping with the AMA of the 2006 Time Person of the Year?  
Or one for Reddit. Word on the street is there are some Redditors in the works of creating a whole new website, similar to reddit, without the bullshit administration issue.    Cough cough 
Id have to move it off my homepage to have the same effect lol  
Same here. The second I have nothing to do, my phone comes out, I swipe 3 times to the left, then click in the bottom left corner. Commence an hour of me staring at my phone, then randomly gigglesnort every 15 minutes. People think I'm weird. 
Or make it an "explore the rest of the Internet" day. 
I'll be browsing voat. If the guy on the bike powering it is awake that is 
It would be very impressive if it became an annual thing where the site just goes dead for a day  
If you make the front page but no one reads it, did you really make the front page 
If it reaches top AMA post of all time i will eat a pair of my underwear (washed of course but still fairly used)  I will film myself too. Screenshot this comment if you want but im serious   
You know that Reddit has a few years of gold more than required? /r/thebutton paid 6,5 months of gold in 2 months. So we'd have to give no gold for a very long time. 
LPT: How to get a good reputation for being a medicore CEO: Hire Pao 
No no... Zelda is the horse.   Link is the sword.  
Had to look that up. Really cool cover by TIME, clever I'd say! 
You have reddit as your homepage? How do you accomplish anything?  
Now I wanna make vacation brochures for other websites.  Tumblr; come and explore your SJW side!  Facebook; everyone you hate!  4CHAN; The Department of State warns U.S. citizens against all but essential travel to 4CHAN. Travel within 4CHAN remains dangerous given the security situation. 
There's more to the Internet than reddit? ^(mommy im scared) 
How can the front page exist if Reddit no longer exists? 
Have you properly researched health hazards of either eating underwear or not delivering on a promise to the people of Reddit?  Either way, too late. You're on the hook now. 
I stopped reading months ago, has he seriously never resolved any of that shit? What happened to VP? 
It's about the symbolic gesture in these dire times, not about the actual money acquired. I'd say that until we receive a proper explanation and a ***sincere*** excuse over all of this, we stop giving gold altogether.  
He implemented the policy of forced relocation to San Francisco for all Reddit employees. He tried to implement Reddit Notes which was going to be a bitcoin clone. Considered by all to be a bad idea. Then there was the reddit marketplace that did nothing but sell horrible t-shirts and other crap. Also a horrible move. 
Just being honest, is there any reason to trust the CEO over the employee? Has either's claims been substantiated?  
My last semester's 2.75 GPA would like to show you how i do it 
There's so much else on Tumblr besides "SJW stuff" though. How it works is, you only see what you choose to follow.  And the porn is GREAT. 
There is but it's a disjointed fucked up way to internet just opening Google.com and thinking of things to internet. Life before reddit on the internet is a blur.  
I have enough heart problems where i'll probably die before 40, 30 if i continue my current diet  :p 
Okay with the exception of the SF move (which even that I guess I can understand) those are dumb ideas in hindsight but i'd take someone being enthusiastic and trying their best over this. 
I can't tell if that's supposed to be good or not.  
You're not cool until you've eaten something for karma.    
And how musical chairs is played. I think we're on to something here 
Even the relocation doesnt seem too unreasonable as a business decision.  I was expecting to learn what a shitty person yishan really was, not "uhhh he made a bitcoin clone and sold some reddit t-shirts"...  
It's impressively average. 2.0 is passing for most American universities, while 4.0 is all A's. 
Yeah, it's hard to monetise a site like reddit. I'd rather they merchandise than try to sanitise the site for sponsorships and ads. 
Many programs require maintaining a 3.0 or 3.25 in your major. 2.0 passing would be pretty rare I think. 
What was the process in order to actually ask the candidates your question? Did you sign a form, request using email yada yada yada. 
Hey Ken,  Can't wait to be you for Halloween.   You're obviously really passionate about serving the homeless community. Is there any background as to why that is your charity of choice? 
What has been the strangest thing someone tweeted at you in the wake of the debate? 
Is the best part of this whole ordeal the karma from this post? 
How did you get selected to be in the debate audience? 
Are you looking forward to your impersonation on SNL? 
I love how you're using this moment for good. What does the St.Patrick center do for the homeless and why is this issue out of many the most important to you? 
What will you be going as for Halloween? I hear the sexy Ken Bone will be popular 
As a coal worker, how do you think environmental protection and energy production should be balanced? 
Ken, you seem like a happy person who has their life together. Any life advice for a young adult? 
How do you feel about becoming famous overnight? Also, have any companies approached you to endorse their products? 
What's the weirdest reaction from friends and family that you've had so far? 
Hey Ken, who are some of your favorite musicians?  
Hi Ken, big fan and just ordered your shirt.   How does it feel to be the leading presidential candidate around my apartment? 
Ken,  If you were president, what steps would your energy policy take to meet our energy needs while at the same time remaining environmentally friendly and minimizing job layoffs? 
What did Bill Clinton say to you after the debate? 
Ken, both your Twitter & Reddit handles end in the number 18...    Does the number 18 hold any personal significance to you? 
How soon after the debate did you realize you were a meme? How did you find out?  
Hey Ken! Huge fan :) Would you consider wearing a cardigan for your next public outing? 
Have you ever said "We ken bone" when your wife asks what you wanna do tonight? 
Would you say that you are leaning to vote one way or the other?  
Hi Ken, are you going take Snoop Dogg up on his generous offer to hotbox the bone zone? 
Hey Ken!  Have you reached a decision yet on whether or not dating 8 year olds would satisfy your innermost desires? 
What does it feel like to all of a suddenly become an internet sensation. What does it tell you about today's society and our means of communication? 
Mr. Bone, do you feel both Hillary and/or trump answered your question adequately or were you dissatisfied in regards to energy? Thank you for doing this.  
Who told you it was a good idea to use your real reddit username? 
Would you be disappointed if I wrote your name in on the ballot come Election Day? 
Have you ever though about making a gofundme or kickstarter to replace your olive suit? 
What's the weirdest thing that has happened to you this week? 
Hi Ken. Long time fan here. Do you have plans to run as an Independent in the next Presidential election? 
KBone !! When you coming thru tha doggy den 4 a little chit chat ?? I got something special at tha crib for u !  
Bone Dawg! I'm a struggling, drained medical student. Can you give me your best pep talk?  
Hey Ken! I'm a huge fan and fellow Missourian. I'm so happy that you asked legitimate questions about the environment and brought a lot more happiness to the debate. You're a national treasure and I legitimately want to bake a cake for you and your wife. My question is: how did you meet her? Thanks for making the world a little bit nicer! :) 
You seem like a nice guy, but I've heard speculation that you are bad to the Bone? Thoughts? 
Some people have said they want to write you in for president. If this were to actually happen, what would President Bone's first action be? 
The minute I saw you with the mic, I thought, "the internet is going to go nuts over this guy."  How's fame treating you so far?  Also, what kind of cat do you have?  
Did the little shits that called you Boner in school think they were clever? 
Ken what is the best time to wear a striped sweater? 
Hey Ken, what's your favorite NFL team? I'm undecided 
Did you happen to know you would be asking a question or how was it decided that you would have the opportunity?  Did you submit your question ahead of time?    Thanks again for bringing so much joy during this time that has been very annoying, difficult, etc.  You have handled it great and brought a lot of fun to the election 
How long have you had your mustache? Have you ever experimented with other facial hair-styles? 
What led to you asking about the environment? Is that your biggest concern with these candidates or did the topic just feel unaddressed? 
I saw a man with no teeth and no shoes standing on a corner in my new hometown when I moved there 3 years ago as I'm driving the moving van.  Here I am bringing all my stuff to a bigger, better house, thinking what hot shit I am for affording the place.    Then I see him and realize that he has literally nothing but the sign in his hand.  People driving by him giving him no more mind than a street sign or a shrub.  I drove on by, reasoning that I was too busy to stop and help him out, it was moving day.  Somebody else will give him a couple bucks.  I never saw him again.    Is he OK?  Did he move on out of town?  Turn his life around?  Die in a gutter OD'd on heroin?  I'll never know cause I didn't give him the time of day.  I was too busy pretending I had arrived.    These are people who deserve love and happiness as much as me or anyone.  But that day to me he was a shrub.  Never again. 
Too many weird, wild things to count.  The most surreal was hearing back from @midnight which I love. 
Between that and what South Park might turn me into I'm pumped.  I know Bobby Moynihan would crush the bit, but maybe go Leslie Jones for shock value or something?  I don't know.  I'll get with my writers. 
I am dying for Bobby Moynihan to get a shot. He needs a new recurring character (not that I don't love what he is doing already).  
St. Patrick center provides temporary housing, job training, drug counseling, and help with mental health issues.  There is a severe homelessness problem in this country.  Most of us are one or two paychecks away from being homeless as well.  We need to start seeing and intervening on their behalf.   
I'm already the sexy Ken Bone so I'm thinking bust out the old Jedi robe / lightsaber combo and be Obi Wan Kenboni 
We need more clean plants like mine to be approved for construction.  Older plants can't retrofit to be best in class environmentally because it would drive them out of business. That means we need newer ones manned by the displaced workers from those being retired. 
Several companies have approached me for endorsements. I have 2 rules for working with them.  1)It's a responsible company that I believe in and that I vet to the best of my ability.  I will do my best not to associate with any companies that hurt the environment or their workers.  2)  10% of all money I receive must go to my local preferred homeless charity the Saint Patrick Center in Saint Louis, MO.  Same rules for paid appearances. 
As long as it's all in good fun I'm happy to laugh along with all of it. 
Radiohead is my all time favorite, nobody blends genres like Thom Yorke and the boys. 
I know I look old cause I'm fat and bald and dress like it's 1954, but I'm only 34 and ineligible to run!  There are over 2000, yes 2000 legally registered candidates.  One of them must have something to offer.  Get your voice out there for one of them.  
Obviously reducing energy usage in the winter by providing everyone with stylish red cable knit sweaters, duh.  
He talked to me about the peak of the coal industry in the 20s and how it has evolved with the nation's infrastructure over the years.    Then his security team reminded him that it was time to go yet again.  I think his wife was waiting on him. 
On soft ball and hockey rec teams I wore 18 for the great 60s era Saint Louis Cardinal Mike Shannon.  He's been the voice of the Cardinals basically my whole life.  Stan Gibson is for Stan Musial and Bob Gibson. 
He sort of? answered this on his Jimmy Kimmel appearance I think, basically said he turned on his cell phone as soon as he was allowed and had a thousand+ messages lol 
Porque no los dos?  You don't fill out a sweater like this by doing pizza anything half way. 
Cosby Sweater drops roofies into Stewarts drink, Stewart Sweater shivs Cosby Sweater with a sharpened tooth brush as it slips into unconsciousness.    Fred Rogers OG sweater game wins by staying positive and not getting involved in the fight.  Just like Ken Bone. 
Ken Bone does not ask.  He commands by his imposing yet cuddly presence. 
Yes, definitely.  Being undecided is not the same as being indecisive.  We just have a lot to consider this election.   
Sandwiches are bread on top, bread on bottom.  Hot Dogs are side to side with a wrap around.  Doesn't count. 
My power plant supports a robust drug testing policy, sorry Dogg.  My dad on the other hand is all in. 
It was a bad call.  I need to fire my agent, except I can't because I'm my agent. 
It's flattering, but please don't.  I cannot serve since I'm not old enough. 
Somebody set one up on my behalf, but Jimmy Kimmel is buying me a new one since I did his show.  I guess if go fund me sends me that money it'll go to the charity.    You'll see me wearing it on his show next week. 
I'm gonna be swamped with election stuff but PM me something and I'll get you a birthday greeting.    Here's hoping I don't forget and look like an asshole. 
Only if you advertise your party as the "Bone Zone Bonanza" 
I had this weird hallucination where all the sudden everyone gave a shit what I had to say.  Bizarre. 
I don't even go to HOA meetings,  but if I really thought I could effect positive change I'd consider it. 
I'm in LA late next week, maybe we can hook up. Big fan here. My dad wants to roll wit da Dogg big time, you me and him could do some tight stuff.  That didn't sound cool at all, did it? 
People say this election has been a disaster, but Snoop Dogg just replied in a Ken Bone AMA to ask him to come smoke at his house. All because of this election.  How is that not an unqualified success?  
I love it.  It's not fair to have a painting be so much more attractive than the real me! 
What steps will your energy policy take to meet our energy needs, while remaining environmentally friendly, and minimizing job loss for fossil power plant workers? 
We both worked at a bowling alley in Granite City called AMF Bowland.  I was a lane attendant which meant I walked around cleaning, throwing away beer bottles, and getting stuff from storage over to the bar and snack bar to restock during shift.  She worked the snack bar, which meant I did none of the stuff listed above.  I just watched her clean the grill cause when she bent to scrub it I could see dat ass was fat. 
Only the head nurse was able to speak up about it.   
Any president would be instantly twice as good for the country with this one simple step.  Appoint experts in each respective field to cabinet positions.  NOT political donors or old friends I owed a favor.   2nd action, get blasted at camp David till I pass out. 
They have been thinking it since the days of my great grandfather (swear on my life it's true) Bentley Bone and his son, my great uncle Oriel (pronounced Oral) Bone. 
"24 reasons Ken Bone is voting for Clinton / Trump"  431 clicks, this asshole still not telling me who he's voting for. 
When it's cold in your jail cell.  I'm not big on stripes.   
What's an NFL?  I'm from St. Louis, something called an NFL has abandoned my twice in my lifetime already.  That's more times than a typical dead beat dad and still they want my money.  Not happening. 
The camera is still in my bag undeveloped.  I'll tweet some of the pics out when I get them done. 
Had a goatee for a while, full on neck beard for about a year.  Clean shaven for a long time.  The stache is for my grandpa, the first Ken Bone who tied in (not lost, it died too) his battle with cancer two days before Christmas last year.  His stache was unparalleled.   
The flow of the prose and the consistency of language are beautiful.  Writing in that style is so hard to do without being over the top; you did so flawlessly.    Great writing, superb content.  I love the gentle humor.  You have perfectly captured the mix of dry wit, energetic humor, and underlying kindness that I hope has defined me my whole adult life.  Thank you, brilliant. 
When I was 17 I spent a winter homeless. Even as a young white female very few people were willing to help me out, there were nights I spent out in 3 degree weather because I didn't make it to the shelter on time. It was one of the hardest things I ever went though in my life. Now as an adult I do everything I can to help the homeless who want to, get out of their situation. People like you give me hope.  
WE LOVE YOU TOO, KENNETH. It actually delighted me to hear you read my tweet. Thank you for doing the show, encouraging people to vote and being an all-around good dude!   PS - Team Mystic 
I hope if South Park does feature you its in some completely crazy random way, like you are a galactic invader with the Bone-ers. 
Man are you seriously that good? Wow!! Insightful, conscientious, super funny, compassionate and intelligent. Why the fuck couldn't you be our president?! 
I think you are making a lot of people happy in a good way. 
We need to get you on the "Get Out and Vote" tour. 
I was never a huge Bill Clinton fan, but this is textbook Bill. Used to see him do this all the time on TV. He loves talking. 
Your answer is better than any I could think of.   
This is a man who understands that no matter who he supports, the internet will turn on him.  
Not hiding behind throwaways to comment on porn subreddits, you are an inspiration to us all. 
I never knew who the people who commented on porn subreddits were. Now I know, it's the undecided voters. 
You say this, and we're all creeping the shit outta your post history like "he was among us the whole time!" 
You would have the honesty appeal of a Bernie Sanders, the outsider appeal of a Donald Trump, the foreign policy experience of a Gary Johnson, and you'd be up against likely incumbent Hillary Clinton. 
We need a tv show Give A Dogg A Bone where you and snoop are detectives. His old partner (one day from retirement) is gunned down and you're his new partner. It's like a photonegative Miami vice.  
Listen, how is every one of  your responses perfect? How is it possible? Great people can be at a loss for the perfect response, but Bone, never.  
Ken's too big for you now. Won't even you hit u back up in his AMA.  
This current season has so far had a strange lack of any sort of sci-fi element. What gives? 
I did a video shoot for Jokes for Votes today, check them out. 
Do you feel, Your Boneness, that since your notoriety, you've remained just about the same Bone as ever/ 
I wonder if John Hodgman is going to be annoyed at our new consensus after years of getting pushback on his hard-line hot-dogs-aren't-sandwiches stance.  
Translation: Pretty decent dude not using his position to influence people's decision based on fame. 
Theres just a lot of us so when we are clever it gets a lotta upvotes. We're all dumb as bricks, dont worry mate 
I'm a former Scientologist and Sea Org member. I was raised in Scn and joined the SO as a 15-year-old girl and was in for six years. I'm still dealing with the effects of the abuse I endured in the SO. I just want to say thank you for being brave and outspoken. I feel like even when people are rightly negative about Scn, they still don't really get it, and it's difficult to talk about. So, thank you for doing what you're doing, and for being an example for someone that gets it.  What has helped you get through the leaving process and the intimidation from the church?   
Is it true they record your meetings and blackmail you with the recordings? 
If all Scientology's secrets were revealed tomorrow, which do you think would be most shocking? 
Are you still in contact with any friends that are still part of the church?   
When you were a scientologist did you ever get any weird reactions from other famous people? 
Was there a secret group of people or friends you had in the church that doubted it? Or did you feel alone. 
Do you think there are members of the cult of Scientology reading this AMA? 
How are they able to recruit intelligent people into what appears to be an obvious scam and cult?  
Considering that Scientology is consistently painted in such a negative light how did you maintain the commitment to Scientology for so long? 
What is something the average citizen can do to help prevent Scientology growth? 
Do the higher ups know it's a scam or do they really believe this crap? 
Was there a single breaking point that convinced you to leave the church? Or was it a long term struggle with the decision?    
Over the past 10 years, I've seen my parents get deeper and deeper into Scientology. Decent reasoning, science and logic have done nothing to convince them to question the church. From someone who left, is there anything a loved one can do to help a brainwashed member see the truth, without ruining the relationship completely? 
Are people actively being held prisoner against their will?        If so, how upsetting is it that the government and law enforcement does not act? 
What odds do you give of the whole thing collapsing once Miscavige dies? 
do you remember what your initial reaction was upon first seeing the course materials for OT3? 
I've been a huge fan since the early days of KoQ  (was watching at 11, now 24!). Did you ever find that your religion interfered with your work in a way you would turn town any potential jobs, either for your own religious reasons or advice received from members? 
Why do you think there are so many people in the entertainment industry in the religion? 
What do members actually gain from being a member? How is it made worth all the money and time they invest? 
Are there any sexual malpractices that occur in the church? 
Do you personally feel like you're being watched/tracked/etc by the church for doing everything your doing? 
How do the powers that be in Scientology keep their followers from reading anti-Scientology news, or your book? Why don't more scientologists leave?  
Have any other actors come to you for support or help? 
You are so brave for telling the truth about Scientology. Why are so many other people staying quiet? What can we do to help? 
I guess I have two questions. First, a little context:       Years ago a family friend's wife started getting into Scientology. She started doing the therapy and seemed to be doing really well for a while. After a year or so she started getting really strange about normal human/bodily functions. She started talking about how going to the bathroom was "unclean," sex was "disgusting and unnatural" and stopped sleeping. Eventually a church official came to her husband's house and explained that she needed to go away to get better. They took her somewhere but wouldn't allow her family any contact. About six months later she died wherever they brought her and the church release her body sans autopsy to the family for burial.     So here they are:       1. What could the religion have done to make her lose like that?     2. Where would the church have taken someone in her condition? 
What's is the single most horrible thing you encountered in the ""church""? 
How different would you say your view of Hollywood is now compared to when you were on Saved by the Bell and did your experience with Scientology effect these views versus if you never joined them?  
What is your overall opinion on organized Religion now? Did your view on say Christianity change? 
From what I've seen of Scientology, it seems like there is a major difference in treatment between celebrity "followers" and folks in Sea Org who are tortured, locked in the Hole, beaten publicly by Miscavige, etc.   Did the news of this mistreatment find its way to celebrities and general "members" of the Church who weren't in Sea Org?  Or were people left completely in the dark? 
As a psychologist, I am curious what you observed as mental health 'treatment' with Scientology?  In addition, I am aware the 'church' is against psychology; how was this opposition demonstrated within or by the 'church'?  Finally, in your opinion how prevalent are mental health difficulties with the Scientology community?  Thank you for your time. 
Did being a Scientologist help your acting career?  
We can (almost correctly) assume that celebrities receive special treatment because of their status - could you elaborate more on that? For instance, how would your experiences in the church differ from someone who is not a celebrity?  And a follow up - do you think that more celebrities would like to break free from the church but are afraid because of the repercussions? Is there any merit to the claim that there's so much dirt on them that could be exposed that they may not want to leave?  Hope you convince others to follow your path! 
What was the first red flag you noticed about Scientology? 
Are you an theist now or does another religion seem more appealing? 
Goddamn this post has gotten over 5000 dislikes in the past few hours, this was over 12k upvote at 5:00.  Major shout out to Leah for putting herself out here to answer are questions, and anyone who is down voting, why?  Scientologists who follow their doctrine should not be on this site, so I am assuming mist of the down votes are other people.  How do you feel on this issue? What do you agree/disagree with? 
Former Sea Org member in recovery here. What do you hope to accomplish with your expos'e?  Edited to thank some kind people for PM's and also to thank the angry people that doubt me. The fact is I'm telling the truth, but wish I wasn't. I was born into a church that ruined my family, took many of my good years, and hard earned cash. Believe what you will. 
So, Xenu. When do you first learn about him when you join the church? 
Hi Leah, What are your thoughts on Louis Theroux's recent ' My Scientology Movie'?  
In Germany many schools make scientology a topic in school (mostly in social studies, religious education or ethic class) and try to teach children about the risks - often by inviting people who left scientology.  Is there anything similar in the US and would you think it is a good way to avoid getting into scientology?  About 20 years ago we had a woman in school who did a lecture about scientology. She left the church and talked about how scientology went after her for about a year. They sent people to her family telling them what a bad person she was and she had guys in cars following her everywhere she went until she got help from the police - happened in Germany in the 90s.  It helped me a lot to understand scientology as an organisation and it's often compared with the propaganda and influence of the nazis on the German youth back in the 1930s. 
What drew you to Scientology in the first place? Or rather, why did you stay with the church for so long? 
Are there ex-scientology rehabilitation groups? Just curious. 
Very much so. I thought it was very accurate. I was shocked how accurate it was for not coming from Scientologists. I wanted to see more stories about how it affected children. The systematic recruitment of members' children. I wish it would have told the story of how Scientologists give their children to the "Church." It protects the life source that is continually bolstering the religion. But, I think they did an amazing job and they cleared the path for people like me to speak about it. HBO was very brave in taking it on. As is A&E, as it will be the first network is do a full series about it.  
When you reach the top of The Bridge (OTP 8) you will be told that God is a lie for LRH, and there are more levels ahead, that will cost you hundreds of thousands of dollars. There is no end to Scientology.   
I am an SP (supressive person). You are not allowed to be in contact with an SP. I would love to talk to my former friends and see my goddaughter.  
Do I think? I know. Hi Karin Pouw and members of OSA! If any Sea Org member is currently reading this and works for OSA and wants to leave, I will help you... including Karin.  
Most Scientologists are 2nd or 3rd generation, they were born and raised into an ideology and have been surrounded and isolated. It is all they know. They are victims. Most of the original Scientologists are all out and have spoken out. Unfortunately, their children were indoctrinated by them.... are still loyal, faithful and have cut off communication due to the policy of disconnection.  
Because i was taught to believe that the controversy was due to people being unaware of what Scientology was truly doing in the world which was good things. I also felt the press was focused on making fun of Scientology and not what was important, so it was easy to turn away from the information. And also a major part of Scientology is learning how to fight your critics. If i wasn't fighting I wasn't being a good Scientologist.  
Speak to your local councilmen/women about cracking down on the abuse of its citizens. I believe people have influences, they know judges, lawyers, police enforcement I think everyone bringing attention to these abuses can help. It takes a community to police itself.  
The higher up is singular. And he definitely knows. however I believe most parishioners and Sea Org members  (people who work for the "church") are int he dark and believe that they are doing amazing things for the world. And David Miscavige is directly responsible for that fraud.  
If you want to get them out there is no way to do it nicely. There is no way to do it quietly. You have to challenge them by saying, "If you can think for yourself, if you have truly accomplished what scientology says you have accomplished, you should be able to speak freely on any subject. If you have completed the "PTS/SP Course" you should be able to confront and shatter suppression." You should ask them how is it then that you can't watch a movie called Going Clear or look on the internet if you are the elite of the planet and handling the planet's ills if you can't think for yourself. I only hope that your challenge will get them to simply look.  
It's very upsetting. I'm only an actress with a short window of interest. So it is up to the authorities who have to do something about it and the judges who are hearing cases of abuse, coerced abortions, being held prisoner, fraud, mental and emotional imprisonment. They won't look at cases to decide its a religion. They have to separate and look at the law. Your doctrine is abusive. It mandates that you abuse people.  
Yes my first reaction was "Are you all fucking nuts?" and then I looked at my mother and said "What kind of bullshit did you get me in?" My only option was to leave, but at the time my family was not ready to go. The "church" told me I didn't need to believe it, just do it. And they always pose this question: "Are you ready to leave everything you've ever known?" 
I was punished for doing Stuff magazine because it was too racy. They would not want us to do anything that would be considered not "becoming of a Scientologist." I see they have since changed their stance of what they believe is "becoming of a Scientologist."  
If you really look at the numbers at the entertainment industry, in comparison to the small number of scientologists that are celebrities, the number wouldn't even register. I think Scientology has done an amazing job convincing people that there is a great number of celebrities in the "Church."  
I heard a theory that it's actually a giant money laundering scheme for the members. After all, once it goes through the church it becomes tax exempt. 
They gain a purpose. They gain a group. They gain a sense of accomplishment (awards, certificates). They gain an education that in the real world LRH states would be equivalent to getting a "PHD in life." You become an elitist. That you have all the answers in life. If you have a question about life, you are made to think that Scientology has the answer.  
I am. I'm okay with it because I knew what I was getting into and I knew the policies of the "church" and what would happen by my speaking out against it.  
After watching a few documentaries about Scientology, I would bet money on the fact that she is being watched and followed by them.  
As old spirits in little bodies who have returned to Scientology... children are treated as adults.  
Yes, I feel very safe. I have the support of my family and friends. And, I feel strangely protected by the world at large.  
I would say the "church's" Fair Game policy, and how they systematically go after anyone who publicly speaks out against them. Anyone who speaks out against the "church" is seen as an enemy.  
No, and if they did hear about it, we were told that those claiming abuse were lying. Then I would have been interrogated and even punished for asking.  
The "Church" doctrine thinks that fields of psychology and psychiatry are a sham. They deny mental illness and afflictions. They promote that you can heal your psycho-sematic issues with their "technology." They will get in the way of people taking medications. They will prevent people from getting the real medical help that they need. and in some cases have caused suicides because of it. Scientology is mentally abusive because we are all taught that we are responsible for everything.  
I don't want to destroy Scientology. I only want them to admit to the fraud that they promote, to not deny the confidential upper levels of the religion, so people can decide if they want to spend $250K and their lives doing it. That they admit to the policies of Fair Game. That they allow people to decide for themselves where they get their information. That they admit to disconnection and leave families the fuck alone.   
I don't what rumors we're referring to here. I haven't read anything that has been inaccurate.  
We had special course rooms in separate parts of the buildings. Any complaint we had about the outside world was met with agreement from the "Church." We were serviced differently, we had supervisors doing courses in our homes, giving special schedules to celebrities. Staff was interrogated by the Church. Often times there were Sea Org members working for celebrities in their homes, personally working for them.  I know of one celeb who had a sea org member working in their home and sea org members were averaging $25/week. The labor laws don't apply to any church therefor they were made to work ungodly hours, forced into interrogations if making human mistakes around the celebrity.  
Doesn't look like got to this comment, but she said in another response that her first step to leaving was how quickly the "church" would turn on anyone who wronged them, even people who dedicated their lives to Scientology.  
Greater awareness. Exposing the truths. Not letting to continue to let them bully people into silence and submission.  
They don't tell you about Xenu until you're at OT III - Operating Thetan level 3. You won't get that far until you've spent many thousands on auditing and classes. Most people never make it that far.  The thing is, Xenu is actually an incredibly important part of the religion. It's the explanation of why there is so much suffering on earth. It'd be like if Christianity didn't let you know about the crucifixion until you'd donated egregious sums of money to your church. 
from what little research I've personally done, it seems like the super early "getting your life on track" and "self help" seminars and such they promote are actually useful. It seems that after that it starts to go all crazy and over bearing. They have to bait the hook with something anyways. 
Jenna Miscavage Hill's book, Beyond Belief, is an incredible account of what it was like to grow up in the "church" as a child of high ranking Sea Org members. It's fucking scary. So happy for everyone who has left.  
How difficult would it be for a parent to leave with their children? Have there been instances of the "church" fighting custody battles to try and get the children back?  
Oh my gosh, just reading through all your responses...you're going to save lives, if you haven't already. Good for you. You should be so proud of your bravery.  
I was raised in the Jehovah's Witness religion cult. I've gotten the same question and my answer is very close to yours lol.  
What "good things" does the "church" think it is doing? 
That's some next level shit, boggles my mind that it exists  
How do they punish you? Financially? Physically? Psychologically? 
People have accused the Church of blackmailing participants, perhaps by using incriminating/ sexual photos or secrets that come out during auditing.  Hollywood has been accused of doing the same thing to "starlets" and child actors, as a grooming process.  Do you see any similarities between how young actors are "controlled" and how the Church of Scientology treats its members? 
Which is why in her autobiography she spilled all her (and her family's) dirty laundry so they'd have nothing to hold over her head 
I imagine there are people from the "church" here right now monitoring every comment and question along with any response from her. 
Well we know you're doing this and if you suddenly go silent, well.... That'll be suspicious.  
How is it that you are still able to speak out against them?  What is different about your situation than the others that have tried and been shut down? 
Accurate enough for the "church" to put people on Matt and Trey to find dirt (the two are actually quite boring) and then enough to squeeze Comedy Central to never air the episode again. 
Loving this AMA. I'm surprised the government hasn't cracked down on these psychos by now. Then again depressingly enough, it's probably because the feds and states side with them. 
Seriously, I used to be ashamed admitting I blew a $20k settlement in my 20's on bullshit and weed. I can only imagine coming to that realization.  
They probably don't. What I think she means is that they don't sit you down and threaten you before they do it, which she doesn't consider technically blackmail. It's probably what their legal team argues too, but I still think it's blackmail. 
I think one of the scariest things about Jenna Hill's book is that if he let his own niece be treated like that, imagine what happens to everyone else not related to him!? 
She is an amazing person and, honestly, I knew her for quite a while and never knew the connection. Truly one of the most genuine and sweet people I've ever known.  
Hmm... nobody has gotten this far, quick, make up some more shit, we've got a real sucker this time.  
Probably more than you think. All cults are very similar in the environment they promote. I read the ex-Jehovah's Witness subreddit quite often and there are constant posts by people who are still in but scared to do anything about it. 
Yeah yeah, we totally saw her... She was hanging with Kim's wife, honest 
Seriously... I keep reading through all of her comments and keep seeing the word, "punished." Wtf are they doing to people?  
I think in Going Clear it said they were using his homosexuality to blackmail Travolta to keep him in check.  
Yup get it out of the way so nothing else is surprising. "But you had a!....wait...OK but certainly this!...hm..." makes your credibility way harder to take down. 
Check out the documentary Going clear (2015) . The punishments can get physically and mentally hardcore  (beating, humiliation...) 
They would lose their status in the cult or have secrets revealed about them. It's blackmail. They can't stop them from doing anything as evidence by Leah being here now.  
The cult still has dirt on them that they don't want released. My question is what kind of shit could they have on someone that the public would really give a shit about? 
Explains a lot of the weird stuff around Suri Cruise.  Also, Leah said she hasn't read anything that is innaccurate. I wonder if that includes that claim that Scientology believed Suri Cruise was LRH? 
*2 years from now*  TIL Leah Remini was last heard from after doing a Reddit AMA about Scientology  
1. Celebrity. Its easier to take down a no-name critic than a celebrity in the public eye.  2. She's coming out with all the details of her time with the church on her own. The most common blackmail they use is threatening to tell about things you did in the church if you ever become a critic. If you get there first, they have nothing left to stand on.  3. Its been easier for ex-members to come forward since a lot of the details of the abuses of the church were brought to light in the late 2000s, early 2010s with Operation Chanology. Laugh all you want about Anonymous and 4chan being superheroes for a minute, but it really was an effective campaign at bringing attention to the cult. 
Hell of a lot more visibility and fame than a regular person.  
This was literally her final response. What have you done?! 
They tried, the IRS attempted to take them off tax exempt status and in return the "church" infiltrated the IRS and threatened the life and well being of the IRS director and his family. 
It was almost like she was abused worse *because* she was related to the leader. It makes no sense. 
It appears she truly does want to leave as she hasn't responded. The only logical conclusion is she is being held against her will  
I live near the "Celebrity Center" and see a lot of Sea Org members.   Another couple groups they seem to prey upon are immigrants and actors. Especially actors. They are constantly offering free "acting classes" which they promote heavily around Hollywood, targeting areas where they know new actors wind up. For instance, if you register at Central Casting, a company that casts extras for film and television, there is always a group of Sea Org members handing out pamphlets for the "classes." 
It has to be more than that, doesn't it? Would anyone really care if Travolta came out? 
Have they ever revealed secrets of any celebs before? 
Oh, wow, that would make so much sense.  Think about the name.  They call her Suri, like the surrogate bodies in that Bruce Willis movie, Surrogates.  She is a surrogate body for LRH's soul.  Freaky. 
During an investigation, police suddenly decided it was a suicide for sure 
I take personal pride in having been called a suppressive person by a church handler, though luckily I don't have a .45 shaped hole in the back of my head for my trouble. 
Leah didn't believe Artie Lange was in Old School because she was in it and never saw him. Meanwhile he was totally in the beginning and end of the movie. They just never had a scene together. 
Shall we round up the mob, pitchforks and torches, maybe go bust her out? 
Scientology - When a movie script gets mistaken for a religion.  
Doesn't matter if anyone cares as long as they can make him believe people care. And there definitely are people that care. 
There were claims made by ex scientologists that her bedroom was prepared for LRH. They had his favorite books and his robe laid out on the bed. That she was served his favorite meals. Things of that nature.  Then you have the stuff the media grabbed a hold of where she was dictating major decisions for her parents, more or less controlling every aspect of her own rearing.   If Scientologist children are treated like adults, Suri was treated like an adult with authority. Allegedly. 
Very different populations. The 4chan of 10 years ago is nothing like the 4chan of today. 
I got ID'd, followed, harassed, and shoved by the local OSA head (hi, Cathy!) when I was part of Chanology back in Houston and Austin in 2008.  "Always attack, never defend" was not something they were prepared to have turned back on them... nor was the rasterbated poster about how female Sea Org members were forced to have abortions. 
You obviously havent seen any of the mission impossible movies. Tom Cruise will kill us all. Please Mr.Cruise spare us! 
Scientology - When a movie script gets *rewritten* for a religion. 
Pffft. All I have to do is put my hand on his forehead to hold him back. We've got reach that Tom could only dream of! 
Seeing as she seems to believe she is the reincarnation of L Ron Hubbard? Geez, was anything in the South Park episode wrong? 
Do you ever disguise yourself and just walk around incognito? 
If you could give 19 year old Bill Gates some advice, what would it be? 
I am sure you have traveled to all types of famous places.  Do you have a favorite vacation spot?  
What kind of technological advancement do you wish to see in your lifetime? 
Hi Bill, what's the biggest 1st world problem you get?  
What do you think is the most pressing issue that we could feasibly solve in the next ten years? 
If you could create a new IP and business with Elon Musk, what would you make happen?  
Why do you think our healthcare systems have such a hard time leveraging the revolutionary changes in scalability that we've seen in software?  Amazon is able to predict what we want, often before we realize we want it, but healthcare systems struggle to even schedule routine appointments and labs.   Having worked on both the healthcare and tech sides, I think people underestimate just how big the differences are between the two fields, but I have a hard time saying who needs to bend more for us to reach a happy compromise.  Also, any idea on what we as concerned patients and family members can help to encourage this compromise?  I just feel like we're so close to using technology to improve efficiency and thus increase accessibility to care.      Thanks for your time! 
Mr Gates!   Any thoughts on the current state of the U.S.?  
Hi Bill,  I'm going to become a father this summer.  Do you have any advice you wouldn't mind sharing, from one dad to a dad-to-be?  Thanks! 
Hi Bill. How often do you get to cook a meal for yourself? 
Hey Bill, have you considered running for president in 2020? 
Mr. Gates,  What's your biggest flaw? I get asked this all the time in job interviews and it seems like a trap of a question. 
Mr. Gates, how do you feel about President Trump and his views on global climate change? 
I sometimes wear a hat. For example when I did college tours with my son I wanted the focus to be totally on him. A lot less people recognize me when I have a hat on or else they realize I am trying to be incognito.  Mostly when people do recognize me they are super nice so I don't feel it is a burden to be noticed most of the time.   
I would explain that smartness is not single dimensional and not quite as important as I thought it was back then. I would say you might explore the developing world before you get into your forties. I wasn't very good socially back then but I am not sure there is advice that would fix that - maybe I had to be awkward and just grow up.... 
Warren Buffett has always said the measure is whether the people close to you are happy and love you. It is also nice to feel like you made a difference - inventing something or raising kids or helping people in need. 
This is a great question. I felt sure that allowing anyone to publish information and making it easy to find would enhance democracy and the overall quality of political debate. However the partitioning you talk about which started on cable TV and might be even stronger in the digital world is a concern. We all need to think about how to avoid this problem. It would seem strange to have to force people to look at ideas they disagree with so that probably isn't the solution. We don't want to get to where American politics partitions people into isolated groups. I am interested in anyones suggestion on how we avoid this. 
Australia is particularly nice. It is summer there when it is winter here so going there in December and January is especially nice. I spent Thanksgiving there last year.  I have gotten to travel to a lot of great places like the Amazon in Brazil which I recommend. 
I will be 76 at that time. Hopefully a grandfather. The Foundation with its partners will have eradicated a number of diseases and health in poor countries will be a lot better - specifically instead of 5% of children under 5 dying it should be at 2.5% which is still a lot.  I hope I can still type fast enough to do Reddit sessions without someone transcribing for me. 
The big milestone is when computers can read and understand information like humans do. There is a lot of work going on in this field - Google, Microsoft, Facebook, academia,... Right now computers don't know how to represent knowledge so they can't read a text book and pass a test.  Another whole area is vaccines. We need a vaccine for HIV, Malaria and TB and I hope we have them in the next 10-15 years. 
I would say education is the key problem. If you can solve that then it helps with a lot of things.  Maybe I didn't understand the question - maybe it supposed to be some idiosyncratic thing that bothers me.... 
Please Mr. Gates.  I owe my entire college ambitions and career choice in the History field because I spent long, long hours as a kid playing AoEII until odd hours of the night.  
A lot of people feel a sense of isolation. I still wonder if digital tools can help people find opportunities to get together with others - not Tinder but more like adults who want to mentor kids or hang out with each other. It is great that kids go off and pursue opportunities but when you get communities where the economy is weak and a lot of young people have left then something should be done to help. 
We need clean, reliable cheap energy - which we don't have. It is too bad the sun doesn't shine all the time and the wind doesn't blow all the time. The Economist had a good piece on this this week. So we need some invention - perhaps miracle batteries or super safe nuclear or making sun into gasoline directly. 
No. Perhaps a small chair - a stool. I do exercise and ski but my main sport is tennis which doesn't involve jumping. Some people jump over the net but that isn't part of the sport. 
A contribution to Rotary to help end polio is a gift I would appreciate. Also any great book you have read and found interesting. 
The one question I really wanted answered and of course it doesn't... 
The main "copying" that went on relative to Steve and me is that we both benefited from the work that Xerox Parc did in creating graphical interface - it wasn't just them but they did the best work. Steve hired Bob Belville, I hired Charles Simonyi. We didn't violate any IP rights Xerox had but their work showed the way that led to the Mac and Windows.   
He famously once said "It's more like he broke into Xerox's house to steal the TV only to find that Steve was there before him." Or something along those lines. 
If Bill Gates spent his own time to pack that box and prepare your gifts just know that your gifts are worth their value and about $5 million in labour costs lol.  
I just went on a trip with my 17 year old son to see 6 colleges. He is a junior in High School and trying to figure out where he should go. Trips like that have been a great way to spend time together. He reads even more about politics than I do so I let him pick books for me to read.  Melinda is very creative about helping me find chances to spend time with the kids. Even just driving them to school is a great time to talk to them.   
This seems a lot more important than any dumb question I might have thought up for him.  
I am not sure if Steam here means the gaming platform or adding Arts to Science, Technology, Engineering and Math. I have always been a big STEM fan but I have nothing against either STEAM. 
 I know he's said in the past that he has no interest in being President, but we *desperately* need a science minded President.    If we're going to start electing businessmen to the Presidency again, I'd at least like one like Bill Gates, who is forward thinking, pragmatic, and best of all, compassionate.   I'd be honored to vote for the man, personally. 
Not Bill Gates but...  One of my professors told me the best way to answer this question. Look through the job announcement and find something on it that you don't know how to do. When the interviewer asks you what your weakness is you can say "I've never worked with x program but I've worked with y program and am a fast learner" or something similar.  That way they know you've read through the announcement and they're aware that you might not have the exact training they want, but you have something similar and can be easily trained how they want.   It's a way to say something you're bad at but in a good way 
There are so many great TV shows now I can't keep up.  I thought someone might ask specifically about Silicon Valley which I love. I can relate to Richard.   Silicon Valley captures a lot of how crazy it is to start a new company and the dynamics of success. All the employees of Pied Piper remind me of people I have known.  I love This is Us, The Crown, The Knick, Homeland, Downton Abbey, ...   
I can't believe that actually works. We all made fun of Marvel movies for using this as a disguise but here we are. 
In that case my life is an abject failure. Thanks for telling it like it is, Mr. Gates! 
I feel like Gates and Buffet are like Obama-Biden level bros.  Mutual admiration and respect for miles. 
You're going to have to change the culture I think. Right now people think of politics like a football team and that is dangerous.  
Now more than ever perhaps we should focus on teaching kids in schools about critical thinking and history. And often people confuse critical thinking with "making sure they think like I do." But perhaps by focusing on presenting differing viewpoints and fairly analysing them, especially in the context of history, they might get a mindset which is a bit more open and understanding of others' viewpoints. You can't control what they do on facebook but school will always be there. 
I've seen some comment threads claim he doesn't do enough charity because he still has nearly a hundred billions so clearly he must not be throwing enough piles of cash at the problems!   People are idiots 
"First world problems" are things the fortunate people in the first world complain about. For instance, while a third world problem might be that your water is contaminated with malaria, so you go to another pond and find out that one is contaminated with another virus, in the first world, it would be something like you have an iPhone and go to a friend's house, and the only chargers they have are Android chargers.  So in your case, it might be that your Ferrari is out of gas, so you have to take the Lambo to the store that day ;) 
Hey, you seem like a guy that can get things done. Can you give Gaben a ring and get us Half-Life 3? 
Let me guess, now you hate the game?  My love turned to hatred for the movie Dead Poet's Society six months after I graduated with an English degree and remained unemployed. 
Nah, that's the third in a slate of new expansions that were being worked on prior to his response. People were asking about another AoE game altogether. 
It's pretty sad that in an age of technology and communications such as ours that one of our biggest and growing issues is the disconnect we have with each other.   
\#StoolJumpingChallenge to raise money for people with colorectal cancer, anyone? 
I think this is a great response. Thank you for being professional with him gone. It would be easy to just start throwing out trash with him gone and it speaks a lot about you to remain respectful even now.  
Reminds me of when /u/neiltyson explained that in order to justify Bill Gates stopping to pick up money on the street, it would need to be at least $45,000. Otherwise, it's not worth his time. 
So after a couple of years in college. What will you say if he wants to drop out to pursue some crazy dream of starting his own company? 
Piggybacking on that question, what's the best dad-joke you've come up with, or one you've felt particularly proud of? 
confirmed: bill gates is in kahoots with Gabe Newell 
Interestingly Bill Gates was despised through the 90's for what many considered his monopoly on OS's. Reddit in the 90's would not have been very kind to Bill Gates.  
Former Human Resources here.  There's a great book that explains all types of interview questions, what the employer is usually looking for in answers and how to answer base don your unique experience. It's called Knock 'Em Dead, and is printed new every year with updates including navigating new situations brought about by technology etc.  That said, if you don't want to read a book, boguskudos' answer above is a good way to answer that question. 
Everyone notices it's Superman, but they're too polite to point it out.  
Genius, billionaire, playboy, philanthropist.  Don't know about the playboy part but I'm sure he could get most of us in his bed if he wanted to. Not at the same time, probably, but then again he's really rich so he might be able to buy a bed that big. 
Keep in mind the closest people to you is yourself. 
I think, if we really want to promote critical thinking, we need to teach it divorced from present real world politics. Because it's *always* been Partisan BS in my experience. 
how did you pass CAPTCHA if you're a computer ?  checkmate, "computer". 
1. People are idiots.  2. They don't even know HOW stupid they are since the Gates' have already pledged to donate their entire fortune to charity when they pass.  I believe their children will get a very modest inheritance (very modest by billionaire standards) and the rest goes to the foundation to improve the lives of people for years to come.  Bill Gates and Warren Buffet are the Carnegie's of this generation. Buffet has already given over 30 BILLION dollars to charity, and Gates will give that much or more by the time he's 'done'.  Amazing people. 
Yep, I've been waiting for AoEIV ever since the infamous instruction manual pic... 
Well no one here seems to have played aoe3 because all I ever see talked about is aoe2 nostalgia- why put out a 4th if the 3rd is so ignored?  
Microsoft and Bill Gates ... are not the same thing. For example, Microsoft and Bill Gates had two hugely different views on the whole FBI/Apple fiasco under Tim Cook. Remember that? Yeah, Gates thought it'd be fine for Apple to disable the security.. and the FBI would only use it "just this once" and all that.  
In the IT department for medical billing and collections here.  Even just everyone on EPIC is not a fix. We have multiple clients on Epic, but the record formats vary from clinic to clinic, and state to state. Hell, even in the same hospital system, depending on city, we have variations in records and they are on the same EPIC and Meditech systems.   Credit reporting is way easier. They use the Metro2 format and I can pull/place files and know what to expect no matter where and how they came in. Medical records are a nightmare from an IT standpoint.   On the bright side, it keeps us busy! 
Anyone who is still seriously trash talking in their 60s needs to grow up.   
Whilst it offers an interesting perspective, those kinds of calculations assume that Bill Gates stopping to pick up money somehow makes his corporate earnings drop by 45k. The truth is that his constant attention isn't necessary for Microsoft to continue generating profits. 
"Here's a small loan of a million dollars..."  Actually I would love for that to be the case.   
I've always found it wise not to insult the intelligence of a man with eyes that can destroy you with a single look. 
lol yeah who wants to be in bed with bill gates with a bunch of guys hahaha that would be super silly. lol tho if this actually is happening let me know just cause of how silly it would be lol 
I mean, I rarely ever get them on the first try. Maybe I'm just brute forcing them.  
I remember when I was growing up, Bill Gates was the villain. Times sure have changed. 
In my subjective experience, I have more nostalgia for AoE2 as that's what I played when I was a kid, and AoE3 introduces fairly fundamental differences in game mechanics to the previous two iterations. I enjoy AoE3 in and of itself, but it doesn't FEEL like AoE2 or the original AoE.  
It's interesting that we have videos that can play on thousands of different devices using hundreds of different video players, but medical records have yet to be standardized in any way.  
Haha just googled it up. Interesting. Are there Mac ports for all Windows games? I was suggested by a friend to try out one for Dark Souls when my Mac was my only running computer, although I think that was just a mod. 
I believe the calculations actually show that the 45k is roughly  equivalent to your average person stopping to pick up a penny and that's why it isn't worth his time. An average persons earnings won't be reduced by a penny to pick up a penny but it's still probably not worth the time and effort. 
"Let me get this straight, you think that your client, one of the wealthiest and most powerful men in the world, is secretly a vigilante, who spends his nights beating criminals to a pulp with his bare hands, and your plan is to blackmail this person? ....Good luck." 
Lol, yeah, if anyone has a place and time send it to me so I know in what direction and when to laugh lol. 
The whole hero worship of Steve Jobs and shitting on Bill Gates thing has never made any sense to me. People are weird.  
Any developer sitting at home on his laptop can change/modify/distribute video files of interest to everyone and anyone.  Medical records aren't really consumable or open. 
Still waiting for my paid protesting check mr. soros  
Dear all,  how can we make sure that people still want to leak important information when everyone who does so puts the rest of their lives at stake? 
Laura, in your recent interview with David Carr, you expressed your commitment as an artist to convey the emotions you feel as a target of state surveillance. Do you also consider yourself a journalist? If so, do you think there is a tension between artistic expression and journalistic integrity?   I also would like to thank you for a wonderful film, Glenn for your commitment to no-bullshit and adversarial journalism, and Ed for having the courage to do what was right. We are all in debt to you.  
Hey everyone - thanks for the questions, I really enjoyed it. Sorry, but I have to run. Hope to be back soon! 
Laura: Will you release more footage of the meetings held with Snowden in Hong Kong? 
/u/PresidentObama do you have anything you want to ask? 
Edward, a friend of mine works for the NSA. He still actively denies that anything you have done or said is legitimate, completely looking past any documented proof that you uncovered and released.    Is this because at lower levels of the agency, they don't see what's going on in the intelligence gathering section? Or do you suspect he simply refuses to see any wrongdoing by his employer? 
Very exciting to see you here Mr Snowden.  We've now known about the scary stuff happening at the NSA for quite some time. And yet from what I've seen, there's been no real effort to stop it.  What are your thoughts on what we, as regular citizens, can do now? 
Mr Snowden, do you feel that your worst fear is being realized, that most people don't care about their privacy? 
I have a filmmaking question for Laura. I'm sure this was probably answered in an interview somewhere, but what kind of legal issues did you run into with this film if any? Was there ever the threat of the footage being seized at customs? 
Mr. Snowden: what was the last thing you did as a "free man" before you had to go on the run?  
Laura Poitras- Loved the film. Saw it when it came to a theatre in a nearby town. Any hints on when it may be available on BluRay? I'll be recording this on my DVR this evening, but would still love to own a copy.  Laura Poitras, Edward Snowden, and Glenn Greenwald - Thank you all for the work on the film and thank you Mr. Snowden for coming forward! 
Moscow is the biggest city in Europe. A lot of people forget that. Shy of Tokyo, it's the biggest city I've ever lived in. I'd rather be home, but it's a lot like any other major city. 
Whistleblower protection laws, a strong defense of the right for someone charged with political crimes to make any defense they want (currently in the US, someone charged with revealing classified information is entirely prohibited from arguing before the jury that the programs were unlawful, immoral, or otherwise wrongful), and support for the development of technically and legally protected means of communications between sources and journalists.  The sad truth is that societies that demand whistleblowers be martyrs often find themselves without either, and always when it matters the most. 
That article doesn't quote him saying he is going to release such a list, it seems to be an assumption on the part of the reporter. 
Thanks for the kind words. I definitely consider myself a journalist, as well as an artist and a filmmaker. In my mind, it's not a question about whether I am one or the other. Documentary films needs to do more than journalism - they need to communicate something that is more universal. 
Yes, I do plan to release more footage from Hong Kong shoot. On the first day we met Ed, Glenn conducted a long interview (4-5 hours) that is extraordinary. I also conducted a separate interview with Ed re: technical questions. The time constraints of a feature film made it impossible to include everything. I will release more.    I also filmed incredible footage with Julian Assange/WikiLeaks that we realized in the edit room was a separate film. 
Thank you for asking. My main question for Mr. Snowden is a technical one. How did you get so many questions planted in your AMA so effectively? With my presidential resources I was only able to get about a dozen questions prepared in advance and upvoted in my AMA along with my canned answers. (There are only so many interns in the White House.) You must be utilizing Russian intel to manipulate reddit so effectively. How do you do it? Tell me and I'll knock 3 months off your supermax prison life sentence. Thanks in advance. -B 
ah yes, one of the worst AMAs ever done on reddit, bullshit answers, crashed reddit, and a few of the questions he answered obviously done by his staff. 
/u/falcon4287 have you considered the implications for your friend if he were known by his employer to have said something significantly different from what he's told you? 
Hey guys, sorry -- the reddit mods are being a little weird. My account is /u/SuddenlySnowden.   Mods: Can you pull back the ban?  I can't post from the primary account. Thanks. 
"Not living in an American prison." would be my guess. 
You should ask the US Government:  1) why are you putting whistleblowers in prison at record rates?  2) why did you revoke his passport when he was trying to transit through Russia, thus forcing him to stay there?  3) why do you put whistleblowers in the position of having to choose between asylum in another country or decades in prison? 
I don't have a commercial interest in the film, so I can't speak for the filmmakers, but I know what it's like to be a student with no money. 
Given the fact that I had been repeatedly detained at the U.S. border because of my work on previous films, I moved to Berlin to edit Citizenfour.   When Ed contacted me in early 2013 I gave him my assurance I would never comply with a subpoena. Before going to Hong Kong I met with many lawyers to assess the risk. I ignored some of the warnings - for instance the Washington Post urged me not to travel to Hong Kong. Another lawyer said not to bring my camera.   In the end I decided I could not live with the decision to not travel to Hong Kong.  
Is winter harsh? Do you ever want to go out, but wake up and find yourself suddenly snowed in? 
Don't you fear that at some point you will be used as leverage in a negotiation? eg; "if you drop the sanctions we give you Snowden" 
When you get back to America, we will hold a parade and give you a trophy good man! Thank you sir. 
Isn't this, in of itself, a perfect example of how mass transparency of information can fight against the very ills of secretiveness? By effectively displaying to the world what's been happening to you - the "powers that be" are intimidated to stop? 
To tag on to the Putin question: There's not, and that's part of the problem world-wide. We can't just reform the laws in one country, wipe our hands, and call it a day. We have to ensure that our rights aren't just being protected by letters on a sheet of paper somewhere, or those protections will evaporate the minute our communications get routed across a border. The only way to ensure the human rights of citizens around the world are being respected in the digital realm is to enforce them through systems and standards rather than policies and procedures. 
Why did you wait so long to release such an important finding? 
I've watched this talk and have used it as an example to others on why this matters and why we should care. Sadly most either refuse to believe it, or will just argue back. What other suggestions do you have to combat this argument? 
If they released it all the public would forget about it in a week. By constantly and slowly leaking documents there's always a new and outrageous revelation that is being discussed. 
Considering all that's happened, that's the most admirable answer possible. A follow-up, if you don't mind: if Americans could start changing the political acceptance of intrusive spying by government agencies, what would it be? I personally am not sure if any candidate up for election next year would truly care about the issue beyond campaign promises, so I'm a bit afraid of not being able to use one's vote to enact change.   I greatly appreciate this, Mr. Snowden. I work in the federal government in Washington DC, though I am in the DoD, and I know many of us personally are concerned.  
This is why there needs to be a movement to get all logical voters to switch to Independent and vote 3rd party.   I swapped mine a few months ago, and wish more people would do the same. It doesn't matter if you agree 100% with the 3rd party - we need an alternative because Democrats and Republicans have been strangling democracy for far too long.  
Edward Snowden just called for civil disobedience against the US government whilst also arguing for the legalization of marijuana during an AMA. This is quite possibly the most reddit thing ever.   
Why is it so damn hard to convince others of this?    
Yeah, but how do we get ACTUAL presidential candidates to talk about it? 
Oh man, I would absolutely love to see the whole, raw footage you shot. It was very interesting to see how things unfolded before the world knew a whole lot about who had leaked things.  Is this separate film with Assange in production currently? 
Anyone else read this with Obama's voice in their head? 
Hey admins, this is a pretty big AMA, how about you cut Snowden some slack with the reply/submission rules for a few hours? 
I completely understand him not wanting to say something over the phone... but when I brought up Edward Snowden, his defensiveness about the subject was not "feeding me the company line," he was genuinely upset about what Snowden did and was angrily calling him a traitor.    Given that it was the day before the guy's wedding, I didn't want to get into it with him by mentioning my views that Snowden is a national hero. He was already irate at the mere mention of Snowden's name. That's far from just telling me what he's "supposed to" say. He genuinely believed what he was saying. 
Thank you very much for the reply and sharing your thoughts. 
Mod here - really sorry for the confusion. Your colleagues set up the OPs account for you and when you started replying on a different account we had to assume it was a fake.  Your new account /u/SuddenlySnowden is good to go. 
To dogpile on to this, many of the changes that are happening are invisible because they're happening at the engineering level. Google encrypted the backhaul communications between their data centers to prevent passive monitoring. Apple was the first forward with an FDE-by-default smartphone (kudos!). Grad students around the world are trying to come up with ways to solve the metadata problem (the opportunity to monitor everyone's associations -- who you talk to, who you sleep with, who you vote for -- even in encrypted communications).  The biggest change has been in awareness. Before 2013, if you said the NSA was making records of everybody's phonecalls and the GCHQ was monitoring lawyers and journalists, people raised eyebrows and called you a conspiracy theorist.   Those days are over. Facts allow us to stop speculating and start building, and that's the foundation we need to fix the internet. We just happened to be the generation stuck with fighting these fires. 
Why do you think Obama had been so aggressively jailing whistleblowers and censoring journalists?   If I recall correctly, he stated whistleblowers were essential to democracy (I'm paraphrasing). Was his earlier attitude simply pandering to his base?  
Much better than the ones asking how the food is in Moscow or how cold the winters are. 
It is very realistic that in the realpolitik of great powers, this kind of thing could happen. I don't like to think that it would happen, but it certainly could.   At the same time, I'm so incredibly blessed to have had an opportunity to give so much back to the people and internet that I love. I acted in accordance with my conscience and in so doing have enjoyed far more luck than any one person can ask for. If that luck should run out sooner rather than later, on balance I will still - and always - be satisfied.   
You are doing that too much!  Try again in 9 minutes.  === ===   Reddit Censorship!  If someone buys you Reddit Gold, does the 9-minute limit go away? 
We've been reporting continuously on huge stories without pause for 18 months, using editors, reporters, and experts from all over the world.  These documents are complex and take time to process, understand, and research.  If we rush the reporting and make mistakes, we'll be doing a huge favor to proponents of mass surveillance, and then people like you will be coming and asking - reasonably: "why did you rush all this? Why didn't you make sure the reporting was accurate before publishing it"?  Snowden expressly asked us to vet the documents carefully and subject them to the reporting process so that the public could be informed in a clear and accurate way. With an archive this vast and complicated, that takes time.  I hardly think anyone can complain that there hasn't been enough reporting done - it's been an unprecedentedly continuous and rapid stream of stories. The public needs time to understand and digest them, and good reporting takes time to do. 
    function hasNSAWiretap(citizen) {       return true;     } 
I think more than voting third party, we need to change our vote system to the alternate vote.  Meaning you rank your favorites. If your first vote doesn't get any votes at all, but your second vote was for someone who had a chance, then your second vote would go towards the election.   That way the third party doesn't take away from the main party that most agrees with your beliefs. Because unfortunately, right now a vote for a third part is essentially a vote for one of the major parties.     
I can imagine some student in the future having to read Thoreaus 'Civil Disobedience', Kings 'Letter from a Birmingham Jail' and this Snowden response from 4 hours ago. 
Except,  it's not just a reddit thing.  Virtually anyone who actually follows current and past politics will realize civil disobedience against the government is the way to get things done quick...   
Can imagine the call. Hello Mr. Putin, could you please put our new president on a plane and send him to us? 
By voting in the primaries for the guys who talk about it. 
I think Paul has a decent shot at winning the GOP nomination.  He's very competitive in a lot of states and polls well against Hillary.  He also appeals to younger folks and minorities much more than his counterparts. 
Reddit: "huh... that's not us" NSA: "he.. he.. he.."  See also: man-in-the-middle attack 
I have the impression that a lot of NSA people think they are doing a great thing for protecting the country, defending US interests.  And to a certain point, they are right. They just don't realize that at the same time, they're destroying everything the US prides itself about (individual freedoms, democracy, ...). 
I wouldn't believe them either. When we're talking about how to weight reliability between specific government documents detailing specific Gemalto employees and systems (and tittering about how badly they've been owned) against a pretty breezy and insubstantial press release from a corporation whose stock lost 500,000,000 EUR in value in a single day, post-report, I know which side I come down on.  That's not to say Gemalto's claims are totally worthless, but they have to recognize that their business relies on trust, and if they try to wave away a serious compromise, it'll cost them more than it saves them.  
Thanks! Feel free to prune this part of the thread. 
The disclosures really changed me personally. Information security and cryptography is something I somehow was just not that aware of before, and now I can't get enough of it, it's the perfect confluence of all my interests. As someone who graduated college not sure what to do next, it feels so empowering to have a real goal now, I want to work on the tools that will protect people's rights and help people to use them. So thank you for everything you've done, I'm still amazed at how well planned and executed it all was. 
Lorem ipsum dolor sit amet, consectetur adipiscing elit, sed do eiusmod tempor incididunt ut labore et dolore magna aliqua. Ut enim ad minim veniam, quis nostrud exercitation ullamco laboris nisi ut aliquip ex ea commodo consequat. Duis aute irure dolor in reprehenderit in voluptate velit esse cillum dolore eu fugiat nulla pariatur. Excepteur sint occaecat cupidatat non proident, sunt in culpa qui officia deserunt mollit anim id est laborum. 
If it does happen, and you're forced into the U.S. government's hands, know that I (and millions of other Americans) are behind you. 
GOD DAMN IT YOU ALL BUY BILL GATES GOLD BUT NOT EDWARD SNOWDEN? 
Alternatively, if the NSA had written the function      function hasNSAWiretap(citizen) {       logIPaddress(citizen);       infiltrateMachine(citizen);       monitorBrowsingHistory(citizen);       fuck(citizen);       return false;     } 
It's like Stephen Harper is living ten years in the past, watching the Bush era and saying "Wow! That's brilliant! EVERYONE will LOVE that if we do it in Canada!" 
It's depressing to see that both major parties support it, so it's likely to get through (Aussie here). 
/r/retiredreddit  Okay folks. It was a nice ride but I think we've reached peak Reddit. It can only go downhill from here. 
Agree... it's just tough to get people motivated when they aren't seeing the impact right in front of their faces. With most successful movements that I can think of, the boot was felt on millions of necks to a point it interfered with their lives. 
And by making it THE campaign issue. It's important that voters know where the candidates stand. Safe to say Hillary and Jeb are pro spying on Americans. Let's make them say it publically over and over again.  
Young folks and minorities...yep, that's who votes... 
NSA: "Don't go to Snowden's AMA! Look over here, look at all these dank memes!" 
Hate to say it.  We're behind him only from the comfort of our couches.    Snowden's fate would be the same as Pvt Manning or worse.   
Snowden said in an interview about what you just said is the most scary part now. The circulating jokes about how 'you're on the list' or 'I don't want to do this because I might disappear' is the very evidence that the Police State and their invisible army of fear has already engulfed you. To claim that one lives in a free country when one fears to type certain things on a Google tab in his own home is a joke.  
Always important to implement a `fuck()` function in the global context 
It's not just Harper.  Trudeau is supporting the bill and says he'll change it a bit to add oversight once he's elected, but oversight has proven useless at stopping these violations everywhere else and it's doubtful that he would do it anyways.  The Liberal Party has always been just as bad and probably worse on privacy issues.   
Probably because if Abbott shoves his diplomatic dildo any further up his own ass even Joe Hockey will be seriously considering bombing parliament just to put everyone out of their misery.  
I know for a fact that Samuel L.Jackson has a reddit account that is hidden in /r/movies. 
Unlike oil, cat pictures are a renewable resource. Peak reddit is a myth. 
Sadly, this is exactly the case. Roger Miller sang that freedom's just another word for nothing left to lose, and we all still have too much to lose by rocking the boat. We are enslaved by our comfort. 
This is probably one of the highest traffic threads in reddit history, I'm sure there are a ton of people refreshing the page every second.   
Crazy to think that the CIA is going to be pouring over this entire thread and trying to decode all of the stupid jokes contained herein. 
take a moment to consider an under thirty guy in the tech field. Does he read reddit? Does he post on reddit?  I give an 80% chance that snowden has an anon handle, and a 100% chance that he at least reads reddit.   And yeah, I know, he's not under thirty any more.  C'est la vie. 
A friendly reminder that the NDP is taking a hard stance (so far) against the bill. Honestly I was pretty surprised that the Liberals aren't, and if I had been considering voting for them this time around anyway this would have instantly changed that. 
So what you're saying is we need to vote for Zombie Layton?  
I think Sam Jackson should play Snowden in the inevitable biopic. 
It's a deal breaker for me as well. I'm definitely not voting liberal 
As someone who would have never voted NDP before.   I sure as fuck am now.   They may be misguided. They may be bad money managers. But if the conservatives cant manage our budget who says the NDP cant. I believe they will actually tax the resources heading out (which we desperately need to start doing)   Its not about any of that anymore. When we are goose stepping our way to fascism...  We have to vote for the people who will stop it.  
Why not living 'whoever the NDP candidate in your riding is'? 
As the longest serving independent in congress, what are your thoughts about electoral reform in the United States? Would you support a single transferable voting system for congress that would allow smaller parties to compete? And what are your thoughts on reforming (or doing away with altogether) the Electoral College? 
As a soon-to-be defending doctoral student in biophysics I am increasingly concerned about the state of scientific research in the U.S. How do you intend to improve funding security for research labs and keep our research competitive with the rest of the world? Do you have any specific plans for NIH and NSF budgets?  Additionally, poor understanding of science among the general population is impairing our ability to pass essential environmental legislation and provide accurate science education in schools. What will you do to improve scientific literacy in this country? 
If you win in 2016, what will your first dispositions be? 
Do you think that wiretapping of American citizens is necessary for security of America and Americans? 
What is your opinion about possible US ground military operation in the Middle East against ISIS or Bashar Asad in Syria? 
Senator Sanders,   As a young political science student it seems many of my peers are feeling increasingly disenfranchised from politics as a whole, particularly due to increasing corporate influences in politics.  But realistically what can be achieved when these interest are so intertwined with current political campaigns and current issues? Is there a way to separate these interests within a political system that seems to depend on the very same interests?   Also is it seems many Americans have a negative knee-jerk reaction to social democracy ideals, even if they may be beneficial to our society. Do you think there is a way we can discuss these issues that can bring in more people to the conversation?  Thank you for taking the time to do this AMA senator. 
Hello Senator Sanders,  What is your stance on Universal Basic Income(UBI)? If in favor how do you see the United States progressing towards realizing UBI? If against, what alternatives come to your mind for combating rising inequality and poverty in the United States? 
**Why are you guys buying Senator Bernie Sanders reddit gold? Why not consider donating that few bucks to his campaign? It's far more meaningful and useful.**     Lol, smart ass gold. First time I've seen that.  
Bernie,  I feel many voters in my age bracket (18-30) will strongly support your campaign. With the exception of first-time voters, many of my peers in this age bracket feel burned by false promises and unrealistic expectations established during President Obama's campaign.   With this in mind: What, **specifically**, do you feel you can **realistically** accomplish in your first term as President that my age bracket can get excited about? You've been outspoken about supporting a $15 minimum wage, progressive tax reform, single-payer health care, and elimination of higher education tuition fees; do you feel like you have the ability to **realistically** bring one or more of these ambitions to fruition if elected president?  Thank you for taking the time to do this AMA. I look forward to supporting your campaign. 
Hi Mr. Sanders,  When Obama first campaigned, he brought a lot of optimism and many voters truly believed that he had good intentions of being a different kind of politician than we had become used to. So, if you win, what will be different that will allow you to get done what is best for the country and not fall in line like other candidates? 
What is the most useful thing we can do to benefit your campaign besides donating money? 
Hi Bernie, hispanic college kid here, thanks so much for doing this AMA... Two quick questions!  1. Do you approve of the way the USA is handling their relationship with Latin America currently? Considering recent trade deals, the drug wars amongst other things have been hurting the region, do you think there is any way of changing the way the US relates itself to Latin America for a more mutually beneficial relationship?   2. What is your opinion on the fact that the DNC has scheduled only six debates for the primaries? Since it's important to get the issues out there and get yourself to be known by the people, do you think six debates are enough? And if not, is your team working on making sure there are more? 
Senator Sanders,  I am a transgender US Army Soldier with a decade of service. A recent study revealed that there are approximately 15,500 transgender personnel currently serving in the US Military. Current Department of Defense policies prevent us from serving openly, but the policy is under review.  What are your thoughts regarding transgender rights generally, and open transgender military service specifically?   
Senator Sanders, as a Conservative I can say with conviction that I admire your authenticity and dedication to principles, notwithstanding the fact I don't agree with a great deal of your policy proposals. My question to you, sir, is approximately how much money will your spending policies (infrastructure / free tuition, etc.) add to our nation's debt?  Does the potential for increasing our already staggering deficit concern you? 
Hello!  Thanks for doing this AMA, and for all you do in office.  With your presidential bid becoming official I've started to sense some measure of hope returning to this country.  Win or lose, you're doing great things.  Please do keep it up.   There's been a lot of talk lately about your stance on gun control, all of which has been sensationalized to the point of complete confusion.  Can you outline your general views on gun control for us?  Be as specific as you like, I'd just like to get something that hasn't gone through the media's spin factory.  Thanks! 
If you get elected president, what is your plan for NASA? 
The major issue in terms of our electoral system is truly campaign finance reform. Right now, we are at a moment in history where the Koch brothers and other billionaires are in the process of buying politicians and elections. We need to overturn Citizens United with a constitutional amendment. We need to pass disclosure legislation. We need to move toward public funding of elections. We also have got to see an increased federal role in the outrageous gerrymandering that Republican states have created and in voter suppression. These are the main issues that I'll be tackling in the coming months. 
Huge issue for me because I feel my vote goes to waste living in Oklahoma most of the time. 
I believe that climate change is perhaps the most significant planetary crisis that we face and we have got to be extremely bold in transforming our energy system away from fossil fuels and towards energy efficiency and sustainability. The fact is that investing in solar, wind, geothermal and energy efficiency is far more cost-effective than nuclear plants. Further, I do not support more nuclear power plants when we do not know how we get rid of the toxic waste from the ones that already exist. 
My first effort would be to rally the American people to demand that Congress pass a progressive agenda which reverses the decline of our middle class. We have got to create millions of decent-paying jobs rebuilding our infrastructure, we've got to raise the minimum wage to a living wage, we've got to overturn this disastrous Citizens United Supreme Court decision and we have to transform our energy system in order to protect us from climate change. If the American people are politically active and demand that Congress act on their behalf, we can accomplish those goals and much more. 
I voted against the USA Patriot Act and voted against reauthorizing the USA Patriot Act. Obviously, terrorism is a serious threat to this country and we must do everything that we can to prevent attacks here and around the world. I believe strongly that we can protect our people without undermining our constitutional rights and I worry very very much about the huge attacks on privacy that we have seen in recent years -- both from the government and from the private sector. I worry that we are moving toward an Orwellian society and this is something I will oppose as vigorously as I can. 
I voted against the war in Iraq and I voted against the first Gulf War. I am strongly opposed to sending American combat troops into Iraq and Syria. At the end of the day, the war against ISIS will only be won when the Muslim countries in the area fully engage and defeat ISIS and other groups that are distorting what Islam is supposed to be about. The United States and other western countries should be supportive of the efforts of those governments, but cannot lead them. The nightmare, which I believe a number of Republicans want to see, is perpetual warfare in the quagmire of the Middle East. 
Excellent questions. You are right. People in general and young people in particular are increasingly alienated and disillusioned with the political process. The middle class is disappearing, the rich get richer, young people cannot afford college, the crisis of climate change is ignored, and Congress continues on its merry way paying attention to the needs of billionaires and multinational corporations. The truth is that we are in a very difficult political moment. But despair of giving up is just not an option. I would not be doing what I am doing if I did not believe that this country could provide health care to all as a right; that we could lead the world in transforming our energy system and dealing with climate change; that we could make education affordable for all. My strong belief is that it is imperative that we maintain our vision of what American can be, and that we fight hard to make that happen. DO NOT GIVE UP. 
1. Well, that is a very big hypothetical. Yes I do believe that there can be just wars. But, you are talking to somebody who opposed Vietnam, who voted against the first Gulf War, who voted against the War in Iraq and who believes the United States has been far far too aggressive militarily in the last many years. We have got to work with the international community not only in trying to create peaceful resolutions to conflict, but to address the underlying causes of war. This is not easy stuff. But that is the direction in which we have to move. 
Great question. Our legislation not only would make tuition free at public colleges and universities, it would also cut student debt in half. It is absurd that millions of college graduates today are carrying debts of $50,000, $60,000, $100,000 or more. Our legislation deals with the issue of student debt in a very significant way. 
So long as you have Republicans in control of the House and the Senate, and so long as you have a Congress dominated by big money, I can guarantee you that the discussion about universal basic income is going to go nowhere in a hurry. But, if we can develop a strong grassroots movement which says that every man, woman and child in this country is entitled to a minimum standard of living -- is entitled to health care, is entitled to education, is entitled to housing -- then we can succeed. We are living in the richest country in the history of the world, yet we have the highest rate of childhood poverty of almost any major country and millions of people are struggling to put food on the table. It is my absolute conviction that everyone in this country deserves a minimum standard of living and we've got to go forward in the fight to make that happen. 
Uh, senator I believe you may have done a boo boo. I don't see any parent comment that poses any questions. 
Votes like this are almost always part of wider packages of legislation.    For example, farm subsidies and food stamps (SNAP) are always packaged as a single piece of legislation to get both passed.  Many rural republican legislators oppose food stamps, but vote for the entire package because it gives financial aid to their farming constituents (/campaign contributing agribusinesses).    IE, I'm disappointed to read that Senator Sanders has voted to decrease NASA funding, but I have a feeling this was not the entirety of the up/down vote.  Hopefully somebody else with more time on their hands can clarify exactly. 
I am supportive of NASA not only because of the excitement of space exploration, but because of all the additional side benefits we receive from research in that area. Sometimes, and frankly I don't remember all of those votes, one is put in a position of having to make very very difficult choices about whether you vote to provide food for hungry kids or health care for people who have none and other programs. But, in general, I do support increasing funding for NASA. 
This is an important question. Many young voters these days still have the young kid mentality when it comes to space. Space travel has never seemed so probable.  
The answer is that everything depends upon the kind of strong grassroots movement that we can develop. If we do not have tens of millions of people actively involved in the political process, there is very little that any president can do because of the power of big money over the political and economic process. So what I have said time and time again is that we need a political revolution in this country, which means that 80 percent. of the people vote, not 40 percent, and which means that people demand that Congress represent the middle class and working families of this country and not just the billionaire class. 
What I'm most interested in is how realistic he thinks a constitutional amendment overturning Citizens United is. He's mentioned it several times, and I feel like once corporate influence is minimized in elections some of these other issues become a little easier to tackle. 
Help us educate and organize and spread the message of what this campaign is about. If every American understood that 99 percent of all new income generated in this county today goes to the top 1 percent, and that the top one-tenth of 1 percent owns almost as much wealth as the bottom 90 percent, millions of people would join us in fighting for a political revolution so that Washington represents all of us, not just wealthy campaign contributors. So, as this campaign evolves, we are going to ask you to knock on doors, talk to people, get on the phone and help us transform the American political system. Thanks for your support. 
Very important question. There is no question but that automation and robotics reduce the number of workers needed to produce products. On the other hand, there is a massive amount of work that needs to be done in this country. Our infrastructure is crumbling and we can create millions of decent-paying jobs rebuilding our roads, bridges, rail system, airports, levees, dams, etc. Further, we have enormous shortages in terms of highly-qualified pre-school educators and teachers. We need more doctors, nurses, dentists and medical personnel if we are going to provide high-quality care to all of our people. But, in direct response to the question, increased productivity should not punish the average worker, which is why we have to move toward universal health care, making higher education available to all, a social safety net which is strong and a tax system which is progressive. 
1. Great question. Given the fact that Latin America is our next-door neighbor, I have been very distressed about the lack of attention that we have paid to Latin America. I applaud President Obama's effort to normalize relations with Cuba, a country which I have visited on several occasions. But I think much more can be done to bring the United States and Latin America closer and to improve relationships with a continent that faces many economic and social problems.  2. No I don't think six debates are enough and we will be interacting with the DNC to try to create a situation where we have as many debates as possible. There are huge issues facing our country. Candidates are entitled to different points of view. The American people need to hear a serious discussion on these issues, so I hope there will be far more debates than what the DNC has proposed. 
Thank you very much for your support. And we look forward to your ideas as to how we can run the most effective grassroots campaign possible. Certainly one of the areas that redditors can help on is in making sure that young people throughout this country understand the importance of politics and government. It is an American tragedy that in the last election, about 80 percent of young people did not vote. That is exactly what the ruling class of this country wants and we have got to change it. So mobilizing, educating and organizing young people is very much at the top of my agenda. 
Let me just say this -- the state of Vermont voted to decriminalize the possession of small amounts of marijuana and I support that. I have supported the use of medical marijuana. And when I was mayor of Burlington, in a city with a large population, I can tell you very few people were arrested for smoking marijuana. Our police had more important things to do.  Colorado has led the effort toward legalizing marijuana and I'm going to watch very closely to see the pluses and minuses of what they have done. I will have more to say about this issue within the coming months. 
Any such fears are unfounded, since poll after poll shows that a growing majority of voters supports legalizing marijuana. Even larger supermajorities support medical marijuana or letting states set their own marijuana laws without federal interference. These days, the greatest political risk is in endorsing the current prohibition that voters no longer support. 
As somebody who has consistently voted to end discrimination in all forms -- who voted against DOMA way back in the 1990s -- I will do all that I can to continue our efforts to make this a nondiscriminatory society, whether those being discriminated against are transgender, gay, black or Hispanic. 
I respectfully disagree. It is not my view, nor have I suggested, that GMO food causes health problems. What I have said is that the people of our country, as well as people around the world, have the right to make choices in terms of what they eat and have the right to have labels telling them whether or not food is made with GMOs. As you know, GMO labeling exists in dozens of countries and the state legislature in Vermont also passed a bill requiring that. I support that effort. 
Not saying this is your point of view, but I have found that most people who are concerned about the deficit are also staunchly against cutting the defense budget.  If we halved the military budget, we could easily afford to free tuition, complete overhaul of our infrastructure, shore up social security and pay down the deficit.  This would still leave us with the largest military budget in the world, by a very large margin.  Given Sen. Sanders record of voting against wars and being staunchly against our use of military solutions, I can see this as a viable solution.  
He's going to avoid talking about guns  completely, which probably is smart. He already has far left voters probably, but if he wants center votes he can't hate on guns. 
Look up his voting history.  He appears to be "anti gun".  Supports banning so called assault rifles and all that. 
He is a socialist. The problem is that the people you're talking to don't understand socialism or are confusing it with communism. 
Please join /r/StudentsForSanders. Maybe we can help you with this and other questions... :) 
Hate to say it but this sounds like a very generic Democrat talking point ("The Koch brothers and Republicans are who we need to fight!").  What about more fundamental changes like moving beyond the First Past the Post format we're currently using? 
In OK, 1,600,000 eligible voters didn't show up to the polls in the 2012 election. Republicans won the state by 440,000. It might seem hopeless; it might be a long shot, but vote anyway. If enough people decide voting is important, maybe next time the election is only lost by 100,000...then 10,000...then people see it as important and you change the system. The only time your vote doesn't count is when you don't cast it. 
Is it really true that dollar for dollar, we get more energy out of solar wind and geothermal than nuclear? Seems too good to be true. Does anyone have a citation on that? Or is he just saying that the investment is more cost effective down the road? 
But would you support nuclear as an alternative until innovation in solar and wind make them realistic sources of energy for the entire nation? 
A lot of your answers depend on rallying the American people to previously unseen levels of political participation and activism.  In the case that that remarkable transformation did not occur, what would you still expect to achieve as President? 
Funny how by voting against the Patriot Act, you are more of a patriot than if you would vote *for* it. Nice going senator. 
If only some president would have warned us about the increasing influence of the military industry in Congress. 
This response moved me. I've realized recently that I've become totally cynical and hopeless with the state of politics in this country. I haven't felt like my voice is being heard, even though my voice is matched by that of my under-35 year old peers.  It's just made me so apathetic, and I know that that's the most dangerous thing that can happen.  Thank you for reminding me that there are actually sane, rationally thinking, honest individuals out there that want to represent me. Now if we can just pull together and get you elected!!  
Do you think we should have a similarly large military presence globally, but focus more on community building, or scaling back our presence entirely? 
As a non American, please America elect this guy president. Please. 
I think you should stop using the word entitled if you want to argue this point because it has grown to have a negative connotation in recent years.  You should speak about these things as basic human rights.  While these phrases technically mean the same thing I think you're more likely to have people actually listen to your ideas if you state it as having a right to health care vs being entitled to have health care. 
Bernie, as someone who gets their paycheck indirectly from that NASA funding, you've got my vote (and already donations from both my wife and I).  ... just don't cut existing programs.. _please_. 
Exactly, people have to remember that gold also gives exposure and most important supports Reddit. 
Part of the problem is we can't have Nordic-like prisons when we have such an enormous ocean of prisoners. If we're going to fight mass incarceration it's not just about legalizing drugs (though that's the most important thing, because the illegal drug market breeds crime), it's also going to have to be about leniency, and that's going to be politically toxic, to openly advocate treating criminals less harshly, to say that maybe more people need to get off with a slap on the wrist, community service, but not jail time.  
It's important for us as citizens to tell the DNC that debates are important for the population to make a choice on candidates. We shouldn't just sit down and let a party that some of us identify with choose such a low number of debates. 
This perspective is completely reasonable. Thank you for having an open mind on the issue. 
Colorado has made so much money in marijuana sales they're actually investing it in the public schools.  Why don't we do that on a national scale? 
Wait, did a politician just say he wanted to think about an issue before answering? That he wanted to review the evidence, see the facts, and then make an educated decision?  Do I have a fever? 
I fully expected you to be extremely selective with what you'd answer in this AMA. It's awesome seeing how real you are at answering all these questions. 
Wow, I respect the fact that you can answer the hardball questions. This says a lot about your character  
No, it's not. Not with current technology levels. The other issue is space. It takes a lot less space to make a lot more power from a nuclear plant that from solar or wind farms. 
I could be wrong, but I believe that since Nuclear is such a large capital investment there's a fair chance that a similar investment into renewables could be more useful in the long term. 
If Bernie can't make that remarkable transformation happen, he's not gonna be president. The ONLY way we can get him elected is if large groups of us start actively participating in government. 
This shouldn't be news at this point, but they name these things like that on purpose.  Calling a bill that digs into constitutional protections the "patriot act" was very much by design. 
Or maybe if a President had warned us about foreign entanglements in general, and told us to stick to solving domestic problems. You know, like maybe the very first President. 
serious question, if we want to focus more on community building, is that really a job for the military?  Wouldn't there be organizations that are designed specifically for this we could send instead?  No matter how kind our troops are, most locals would be off-put by people carrying assault rifles around them. 
Gotta be careful with these kinds of answers though.  Obama ran with a campaign promise of giving free tuition/cutting it drastically (can't remember which atm) based on students doing so many hours of community service per year.  Didn't hear a word about that after the election. 
He's going to need a lot of people talking about him and spreading his ideas around. I basically asked all of my family, coworkers, and friends what they think about him and basically no one really knows about him yet unfortunately. 
Well you can look at it this way, if he becomes president, there'll be one less person in the Senate voting for budget cuts to NASA. 
The people who are giving him gold are probably *also* donating to his campaign.  
Can anyone provide a serious counter point to moving voting day to a weekend/holiday? I've yet to hear one 
I second this, Senator. I feel you tiptoed around the question. Is an elaboration possible? 
they also shouldn't be allowed to ban candidates from debating anywhere else, otherwise they get banned from the dnc debates, and yet they have done exactly that.  
When you compare recreational cannabis to the other issues that he is fighting for, it is more than reasonable to focus energy elsewhere, especially when the movement already has so much traction. Agreed. 
I don't think there is a way to make a label that doesn't imply some sort of warning. 
I am a rather flaming Libertarian and I have to say that I support almost none of his positions. I'm not sure the OP of this question really understands what Modern American Libertarianism is really based upon. Now if she was a Left Libertarian from the 50's, it would make a lot more sense, but then she should just be identifying herself as a Moderate Progressive nowadays. 
Vermonter expat here. Despite living in England now, I can verify. I'm only back at home 2-3 weeks a year and have usually bumped into Bernie every time. He always has time for you (he's heard my grandma out so many times) and he never bullshits. He talks straight. I like him a lot. 
That was 2007, solar has drastically dropped in price 
Kentucky had primaries today (I voted) and they are estimating, at the high end, 10% participation. Thats not 10% of the Kentucky population, just 10% of those *registered to vote*. Until we are able to increase the number of people who vote, we will be stagnant in our political changes.    Make days where we vote national/state holidays. Encourage people to vote, and make it easy. Right now, so few decide for the many. And it shows. 
Yep. It's like the pro-life/pro-choice debate. By opposing one side, you're suddenly "against life" or you "don't like choice."  Similarly, if the general public hears a senator is against something called the "Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act?" Obviously, they want the terrorists to win and will have bad PR for a bit. 
The difference between Obama and Sanders though is that this isn't just a campaign promise. It's an ideal he's been working toward for years. He's not saying it because he hopes it'll earn him votes; he's saying it because it's sound policy. And unlike Obama, Sanders won't be bought out by large corporations telling him, "Nah, we don't wanna pay for everyone's college."  Obama had to worry about a second term. I don't think Bernie has that interest. He wants to get in, get as much shit done as possible, and let the 2020 candidate worry about 8 years. 
Political capital is a very real thing for a senator to balance in the day to day. 
Don't make a judgement until you actually see the full bills that he voted against. It's very likely that in a foreign aid bill a provision or rider was added to decrease NASA's funding 
People with service/lower wage jobs don't get weekends/holidays off. 
People go away on weekends on holidays.  Here in Canada a few provinces have tried it before and turnout went down. Now, instead of that, in our federal elections we have a rule that employers have to give 3 hours off to vote on election day (unless the employee's shift or regular hours already leave 3+ hours of voting hours free). 
A better option is vote-by-mail on a federal level. Oregon has mail-in-voting and it's made voting much easier on me. My current job wouldn't mind if I took time off work to vote, but I have previously had jobs that would force you to use a sick/vacation/PTO hours if you wanted to vote. 
Making it a national holiday or moving it to the weekend severely limits the time.  Instead span it out over a week and make the employer give a paid day off that the employee chooses during that 1 week (agreed upon before that week.)  5 days + weekend to find some time to go to the polls and you don't miss out on money?  Seems like a good idea (to me anyways.) 
The more people between 18-35 who vote, the more the Republicans lose. 
Wow. I just opted for Democratic party over Independent, just because of Sanders. Never realized Oregon had a closed primary. TIL.  
You could have it listed in the ingredients. INGREDIENTS: Water, High Fructose Corn Syrup made from genetically modified corn^1  1. short description or name of the strain or modified gene on the footnote. 
or "citizens united".  their entire wording is the exact opposite of what they do. 
Because he knows that if he gets in and gets shit done, the people who like what he did the first time around will vote for him again. 
Yeah, that's how policy makers get their bills through. Want to deregulate the banks, attach it to a bill that targets sex offenders. If anyone votes against it, they are pro-sex offenders.  That why Bill Clinton had it nice. Line item veto was the shit. I think the benefit of it far out weights the downsides. Would prefer if the line item veto could be overturned with a simple majority though. That way its truly more fair.  
Isn't NASA's budget like 0.1% of the national budget? Doubling it won't have much of a cost. 
I think we have it pretty right here in Australia- Federal elections are always on a Saturday, but in most elections (State and Federal) the polls open a few days early so that votes can be made if you can't do it on the official day. You can also register as a postal voter if you require it- for example, if you're a shift worker, are unable to travel or live more than 20 kms from a polling place.  It's also quite different here as voting is compulsory and it's a federal offence not to vote in an election. It's been rationalised to me before but I've always though that the U.S. voting system is designed to prevent low income workers from voting by having elections held on a weekday.  
Early voting already exists in the US, but it isn't publicized at all. There are lots of early voting polling places open for like two weeks before election day. However not every state allows early voting, which is a shame. 
The more big money loses, you mean. Let's not make this a partisan issue. 
Regardless of one's political leanings, politicians who are true (wo)men of conviction are so rare you can't help but respect them. 
God damn that gave me chills. I knew he was a good president but that just raised my respect for him so much.  
Opposed the military industrial complex AND levied huge taxes on the rich... Are we sure this man was a Republican? 
Not even that. Senators will negotiate by saying "If you support my bill to defund NASA I will support your bill to feed hungry children. You will accept this deal because without my vote your bill wont pass." 
Wouldn't hospital workers still have to work on national holidays? 
Of course, this raises the important question of, if you respect a politician but don't agree with them on most issues, will you vote for them anyway?  It is an important question because, if the answer is generally no, a politician's goal becomes to convince the largest number of people that he agrees with them instead of convincing everybody that, if elected, he would do his very best to act fairly and critically on behalf of all his constituents.    There is an adage in politics that you can't accomplish great things if you can't get elected.  The question is can you get elected if you value honesty and integrity? 
A five star general, a Supreme Commander of Allied forces in Europe, who became President, and subsequently retired to the family farm leaving a warning that the Military Industrial Complex made him fearful of the future of the United States.  Definitely an interesting person. 
He also liked to install dictators after removing democratically elected governments. So, he wasn't all good.  
We can be like Oregon and make all voting be vote-by-mail.   But then that would make it harder to prevent  black and poor from voting.  
I think "agrees with my position" is one of the shittiest standards we can use when it comes to electing politicians. I (and everyone else) are terribly ignorant on the vast majority of political issues, that's just the reality of living in a complex world with a staggering number of different issues.   I don't want a politician who agrees with everything I say because I recognize that I am probably wrong on a great number of them. I want a politician that will  examine the evidence, consult with experts, and think critically regarding the issue. Bonus points if if they can then communicate with me why they chose to take the action they did and what evidence they used to back that position.  Those are the sorts of people who we should be putting in office. 
Must be tiny right? I live in Des Moines so I'm no expert but didn't planting just take place? 
Hi Chef, Are there any really strange food combinations that you enjoy?   
Have you ever literally gotten sick from a horrible hotel in Hotel Hell? 
Do ALL the kids on Master Chef Junior really know the techniques off the top of their head for every challenge, or do you give them a quick overview/rundown before the challenge starts. For instance the crouqembouche challenge? 
Hello Gordon. I'm a big fan.  Two questions:  You obviously have a talent for witty insults. Do they come naturally or do you think about them and then say to yourself: "I'm gonna use this one next time I get angry"?  Also, after watching your show I want to try jellied eel. I'm going to London in a few days, any recommendation about where to have it?  Thanks! 
Do you have any food recommendations for a college student on a budget? 
Hi Chef, I'd like you know how you got into running and triathlons?  
Hello, Gordon! I'm very excited you're doing an AMA!  Regarding food, what guilty pleasure do you have that most people would be shocked at? Fast food fries, frozen fish sticks, etc.  Mine is spaghetti in a can. It's repulsive and I know I shouldn't eat it, but I can't help it. 
Hi Gordon,   The F Word is one of my favorite shows of all time. It taught my wife and I how to cook great food and be smart about it. We also loved all of the adventures and animal raising that happened throughout the series. Thank you for that.   My question: outside of your own restaurants, where are some of your favorite places to eat? What dishes do you order? 
Good afternoon, Chef. Do you have a favorite cocktail? 
Hi Gordon! I'm a huge fan of yours, and enjoy watching all of your shows. I especially enjoyed your 'Home Cooking' series, and I want you to know that they sparked an interest in cooking for me that I'll never forget.  Anyway, on to my question:  What is the best meal you have ever had? And what about the worst?  Thanks! 
Hello Mr. Ramsay!  My question is this: How do you feel about being a meme on the internet?  
What are the odds of you and Anthony Bourdain getting drunk together and arguing over what the best omelette is on YouTube? 
Very good question.  I have to say, scrambled.  Over a slice of sourdough bread that has been grilled, and then sort of doused with Worcestershire sauce.  Now scrambled eggs, I did a video a few years back with my youngest, Tilly, showing how to make scrambled eggs, and I think it has 10-11 million hits?  And the nice thing about scrambled eggs is that they don't have to just be breakfast - you can have them in the evening, with some nice mushrooms, some tomatoes. You can have them as a snack at midnight, or at 5 o'clock in the afternoon.  
That's a really good question.  So across the filming procedure, we get the chance to spend time with them, with basic culinary lessons. So they won't know *exactly* what they're doing, but we'll show them basic techniques a few weeks prior. And also, things like the croquembouche - we'll do a class in sheet pastry, but we'll do sheet pastry BUNS, as opposed to actually doing a croquembouche.   When it comes to the more serious elimination challenges, they'll have insight 3-4 weeks out. We are halfway through shooting season 5 of Master Chef Junior, and I am staggered by the level of competition. We start taping tomorrow morning, but based on the standards of the first few seasons, the level is just amazing - they are coming in better, stronger. And for kids to have ballet lessons, soccer lessons, that's something we've grown up with. And I've never known kids like we're having now, who are having cooking lessons outside of school hours.  
Ehm - any food I won't even try? That's a good question.  I think, being a chef, the first thing that I set out to do was to make sure that I almost got to taste every ingredient anywhere in the world. I wanted to learn so much about ingredients that I'd never know what NOT to do with an ingredient.  So I'm an open book. Whether it's a beating cobra heart from a  snake in Cambodia, or a deep-fried tarantula, or a Beef Wellington, I'll eat absolutely anything.  The only thing I draw the line at, Victoria, is eating overcooked food. There is NOTHING worse than an overcooked brussels sprout. The smell is *disgusting.*  
Chef's pick.  So I don't really sit down and do lunch. I certainly don't sit down and eat dinner.  I have a breakfast with oatmeal, that's the first thing, and that sets me up for the rest of the day.  It's very hard to sit down for a 3 course meal, and I'm very easy to please. If i go out to dinner, I'll share an appetizer, enjoy my entree, and enjoy my dessert. It's very hard for me to enjoy a full meal, because I taste every 2 minutes in the kitchen.  I'm not very good at sitting down for 3 hours to enjoy a meal. I'd be lying if I told you "I sit down 4 nights a week and have a 3 course dinner." I do nothing of the sort.   And also, there's nothing worse than eating dinner at 5:30 and then having to get up and cook for 3 hours. So I like to keep on my toes, and eat small bits. Almost like in Hong Kong - 4 or 5 times a day, small bowls of food.  
*Heheh!* Everyone thinks i have a glamorous breakfast, like a full English or eggs benedict. I keep it simple, because it reminds me of my mum. So I keep it simple, porridge, which is oatmeal. But growing up in Stratford-Upon-Avon, we kept it very simple, just oatmeal with water, salt, and oatmeal, because my dad said it would "put hair on your bollocks!"  It's really weird hearing you say the word "bollocks" Victoria.  The night before, put 3-4 bananas in the oven on a pilot light. And the next day, squeeze the bananas into almond milk, bring it to a boil, then add the oatmeal and dried cranberries, and you'll have the most *amazing* oatmeal for breakfast.  
Heh! Witty insults? Ehm... it just happens sort of spur-of-the-moment. I see red, I get frustrated, I let it go. I'm not very good at editing myself. I have to get things off my chest. If there's one thing my mum taught me, it's speak your mind, be firm, get things off your chest. I think it's a good way to work, and quite healthy to have that attitude. Do I think about it previously? No, they just come to me in a flashpoint. And sometimes even *I* sit back and think *Did I just say that?*  And then jellied eels - you've got to go to the East End of London, and get the most amazing Malt Vinegar. They're very healthy, packed with protein, and bloody delicious. And the River Thames now, in London, is TEEMING with eels - so some of the best eels in the world now are from London! They're delicious.  
My favorite Disney movie.  Ehm, come on?   Seriously?  It has to be RATATOUILLE.  I was very close, last year, when we had Bradley Cooper in the kitchen cooking up a storm for his new ADAM JONES movie coming up the end of this year, and understand his level of excitement about service, being on the line - he didn't want to tiptoe, he wanted to be in there, from first light to the last plate leaving the kitchen, and it was so nice to see how he respected the team. He didn't want pampering, he wanted to roll his sleeves up and dive in there.  He said "Gordon, I just want you to teach me to put food on a plate, because it's really magical how you put food on the plate the way you do."  So I'm very excited for this movie, coming out, called ADAM JONES. It's very exciting to see an actor understand what you do, and knowing that he can't learn how to cook in a few months, but absolutely *nailing* it when it came to the level of presentation.   
That's a really good question.  I would recommend that you get adventurous with pulses - chickpeas, beans, lentils. And you know, cooking these is incredible. Brown rice? Phenomenal. You don't need expensive proteins. Just make them incredible with how you cook them, or prepare them - a pressure cooker is a great way of making these foods go a long way, is to cook them deliciously. Chilis, garlic, definitely.  
Good question! I got into running & doing triathlons - first of all, I've run over 15 marathons and doubles (ultra-marathons) in South Africa. So I needed a bigger sort of commitment, to spend a little bit more time to myself. So - listen - I love running, but it's given me quality time to spend on my own. SO I got into triathlons about 3 years ago, and it's helped me to stay even more focused in my day to day job.  
Well, first of all, you need help.  ***Spaghetti in a can!!?!*** That kind of shit we grew out of on our 8th birthday. I still remind my mum that she taught me how to spell with alphabetical spaghetti in a can.  You need help, big time.  My go-to sort of fast food snack... it would have to be In-N-Out Burger.  *Oh my god,* honestly, it is, when I eat Double-Doubles. I am *terrible.* And I always bring it back on the airport when I'm flying from LA to London, I'll sneak it into the first class lounge at BA! 
 OMG I worry about Victoria's ears when he sees that you eat spaghetti in a can.  
I have an amazing cocktail, which, you know, we're in Atlantic City currently, because we just launched the Gordon Ramsay Pub & Grill here, which is where we're calling from now.   It's with Tanqueray Gin, and it's called "Wake up you Donkey!" I mean, hahahahaha - it is incredible. And also, it's quite sort of spicy, and fragrant, and it's absolutely delicious.  
I was almost in tears when I clicked on the blue scrambled eggs.  ...and then I clicked on the next link. Oh god, that was funny. 
the positives in your post got me to click into the sub.  the negatives are . . .  1. that bologna cake looks phenominally horrible.  1. the blue eggs look like scrapings from a paint can that was left open. scrambled eggs don't have a uniform color. the perfect uniformity of color makes it look like it has no taste. 
I will never eat normal scrambled eggs after making Gordon eggs.  On Stove - Off Stove - On Stove - Off Stove  It's like magic. 
The service is just as important.  From a Michelin star restaurant maitre, thank you   
That's really interesting.    For the adult Master Chef, do the contestants also get those kinds of lessons/techniques in advance?  Or is that unique to the MC Junior? 
Wow. James was either exceedingly drunk already, or he's even manlier than I thought. 
Isn't it true, though, that the "persona" gets played up for American audiences?    Your Channel 4 programs show you to be the most soft-spoken gentleman.  American audiences, I'm American myself, seem to be incapable of paying attention to anything unless there's some played up drama involved.  That's all "reality" TV is ... played up drama, and very little actual education. 
that might be because Bradley did a tv series in 2005 based off of Anthony Bourdains book called Kitchen Confidential  
I've always found Mexican food to be a great cuisine in terms of getting a lot of flavor and nutrition for relatively low cost. 
Also, I have to say in a HUUB wet-suit, I look like I've got a fucking 8 pack. Which is unique about a chef in a wet-suit. It's incredible how toned you look.   I recommend every chef put on a wetsuit. It makes you look like Arnold Schwarzenegger.  
Well you can now check "getting yelled at by Gordon Ramsay" off your bucket list you lucky bastard 
This seals the deal: In n Out has been publicly endorsed as Gordon Ramsays guilty pleasure.  Brb, gonna grab a 3x3 and a shake 
You've got a new show idea now, "Stop eating canned spaghetti you disgusting fuck." 
As somebody who grew up In California, I love you even more for choosing In n Out.  
I can't say I disagree with you! There should be a garbage food anonymous program out there. I swear I can make a marinara from scratch. Promise!  Thank you for answering my question after I embarrassed myself. I'm looking forward to the upcoming season of Masterchef! 
Even Gordon Ramsay loves In-n-Out... I really need to make a pilgrimage to one of these someday. Sometimes Iowa sucks. 
Wow, you really do say fragrant and delicious a lot. I love you even more now.  
Do you think that the restaurant was actually a cover for money laundering? I feel like that's one of the theories that'd make more sense to how they act 
In all your Kitchen Nightmare episodes, midway through it always looked like you were going to throw the towel in. Damn, I guess this one was really bad.  
They're essentially living off of their negative press.  They're an internet meme that you can rather easily visit in real life and so they actually benefit from it. 
I literally do not think I could eat it without puking several times. Like at least 10 times. 
Thank you for the response! I've actually been using Just Mayo for awhile now, and it's the only "mayo" type product I actually enjoy eating. It's nice to know that you think it tastes great, too :)  
You are literally the zen master of cooking. I love you.  
/u/alfredo_linguini, you've got to do this. This will be the best OP's deliverance *ever.* 
I have it saved up for months and months...wait you ain't Gordon, the fuck? 
In America, we call lice eggs "Nits".   Well, the southern part anyway. 
If you can give master chef aus a watch. It films more of the actual cooking and less of the drama, but it also shows that they get help with recipe cards and lessons as well. Sometimes when the camera zooms out on the U.S. Show you can see their hidden recipe cards too. 
I fish a small stretch of the Thames, between Staines and Shepperton. Hundreds of eels.  
Ya it was actually really good, I was hoping for a season 2.  
Damn, I wouldnt be able to survive with only 3 hours of sleep and workinig so hard. I would really probably die because of exhaustion. 
Very true.  You should look into Indian as well.  You can get TONS of flavor and nutrition for very low cost. 
If you wanted, just act bat shit crazy, own a shitty restaurant, and you too can have your dream of getting yelled at by Gordon. 
In N Out is a great example of the philosophy that Gordon preached at a lot of confused, bad restaurants on Kitchen Nightmares: figure out what you do well and focus on it. You don't need 50 menu items to be a good eatery. In some cases, you only need 1.  
It's also Anthony Bourdains favourite fast food joint as well.  
Gordon has probably visited more food trucks than me. : ( 
I can't wait for Victoria to transcribe Christopher Walken's AMA. 
I remember when I was a bit more interested in the story a few years ago that I found that Sami was banned from France and Germany for drug (maybe human as well) trafficking. I found it on a few sources but if it's true then it really wouldn't surprise me that he started a restaurant to launder money. 
Have you not seen this episode?   It's nothing short of infuriating, it's literally hard to believe.   Glad it's out there, though, it's what got me back into KN.  
That line was so weird to me because that's exactly the kind of thing I'd say as a joke.  "We have three children, they're just trapped in cat bodies." *big smile and acknowledging chuckle*   When someone says something in dead seriousness that is something you would readily say in jest, it throws you off.  It would be like someone saying "I don't trust them homosexual types.  I hear they sneak around licking spoons in restaurants to infect people with their gay." and completely meaning it. 
That and I'm convinced Samy is laundering money through the restaurant. 
Never thought I would hear somebody say Gordon Ramsay is a "zen master" haha 
Reminds me of how Gordon hired that talented young chef from the shitty restaurant in Paris, in Kitchen Nightmares. Gordon doesn't want to see talent go to waste, it seems!  (Piccolo Teatro episode of Kitchen Nightmares UK. s5e2.) 
I'd recommend sending him a DM on Twitter as well, because I don't think he's actually controlling this Reddit account. 
"Ohh how was your day honey"    "Ehhh was alright, Gordon Ramsay offered me a job.... Idk, I think I'm going to take a month off instead, maybe go to London and try some jellied eel... Idk. How was your day sweetheart" 
How gutted would you be if that was Gordon's response. 
Strictly speaking, "nits" is the name for the spent egg-casings of headlice in the UK too. In recent years, "nits" has just become a catch-all term for the lice and their eggs.  So you're quite right. 
Wow masterchef Australia has less drama? I've never actually seen the US masterchef (it's hard to find here in the UK) but compared to UK masterchef the aussie one is so full of drama! The uk version is literally just bare bones cooking. No drama whatsoever.  
Heck I think it is up there with one of the best AMAs ever! 
Yeah if I go a few days with with less than 6 hours of sleep, RIP my immune system. 
INCREDIBLY...   damn, those look impressive for their simplicity. 
Last year my best friend came out to visit, had her first taste of In-N-Out. She made me promise we could get it again next time she visits. Nothing like converting someone to In-N-Out.  
Well... ^thank you. *for* the question... Little girl 
Sometimes jokes come off weird when you have cameras on you. 
Just watched the episode and that fits remarkably well. "I am the gangster here" 
I PM'd you Vicky, thanks darlin! Holy Fuck! Just the fact that Gordon even responded, and his advice is on point! It's such a relief to hear from an accomplished cook telling me everything will be all right.  Thank you once again, Victoria, and Gordon. Thank you. 
A subtle point: It doesn't seem like Gordon looks for talent, but grit and hard work. Gordon knows nothing about this guy's ability to cook besides his incredible passion. 
Someone we don't even know! I wish he didn't delete his account...I want to hear what happens! 
My cousin came from ireland and tried it. Said he preferred mcdonalds. I havent spoken to him since  
I'm laughing so much at this. It will be the world's longest AMA, due to all the time spent formatting. 
Yeah, he has a criminal record for drug trafficking and claims to invested over a million in the restaurant. Plus, he doesn't let the servers enter orders on their system so I think he's generating fake receipts. 
OP if Everything works out then can we expect your own ama too? ;) 
Lots of people have talent. Not enough people have the determination to put it to use. That goes for lots of pursuits, not just cooking. 
Yes, he's using fake orders, and miscounting tip income to launder money that would be one of the ways you do it, he probably also only takes cash for payments? This shouldn't come as a shock to anyone, unless you've never worked under the table or for a business that could have laundered money.  
Agreed - determined people will obtain talent, and they will always be determined.  Lazy people may be talented, but they'll always be lazy. 
All american reality shows are drama and commercials. I've never seen UK or aus master chef but on US there's always someone who's hated, someone who's stubborn, someone who's extremely talented and selfish, and for some reason an old grump guy fighting with a hot spoiled girl. The hot spoiled girl lasts way to long cause hot and spoiled of course. 
But what kind of idiot broadcasts his money laundering setup on reality TV? 
Not as smoothly as I would like but we're working on it. Apparently the restaurant needs to know who wants to eat what, or something (I would love to have gone with a taco truck)...  
I thought the look of disapproval was like a more fully-realized "absolutely not" along with a Dame Maggie Smith-type facial expression.  
the reason they wanted to be on Kitchen Nightmares was to show the 'haters' on the web (bad reviews on yelp or something) that the restaurant was good.   What better way than to make Gordon Ramsay say so on television. When it was obvious he would not do that, I think it stressed her out.  Ultimately, I think he did it for his wife, cus she couldn't handle being criticized. Ironic. 
Did you like Walt Disney World when you started this job? Do you still like it? What's your favourite thing at the parks that isn't around any more? 
Do you prefer parents playing it straight or interacting with you "in character" so to speak? 
What's the strangest thing you saw in the back of house areas? 
What is the weirdest request that a visitor ever asked you to do? 
You said at one point you worked in merchandise. Would that possibly be in the Magic Kingdom side? There is one older gentleman Bud, who changed my life. He held me while I cried and he cried with me about me recently deceased son. If he is one that you keep in touch with please let him know how thankful I was for him that night. He saved me.   
Are the stereotypes about people who play different characters true? 
Any good stories of playing Goofy around the time "A Goofy Movie" came out?  Bonus question: Have you ever met Powerline? 
Could you speak to people while in costume? Can you do a good goofy voice impersonation?  
What's the worst child/adult tantrum you've witnessed? 
I know this is going to get buried, but that's me and my sister in the photo you posted playing before the parade. That picture would have been taken in 1996. Will post proof if I can find another image of my 10 year old self.  It really is a small world after all.  
Is it true that someone gets fired if two of the same characters appear in the same area of the park? 
What is the weirdest story of one of your coworkers getting fired? What did they get fired for? 
Don't know if it was you or not, but my 2 year old son was terrified meeting the characters. He wouldn't get near you guys for a picture but when goofy played peek-a-boo with him from a distance he loved it and talked about it for months. So thanks Goofy!   Did you have any other favorite techniques for dealing with reluctant or scared little dudes? 
Do you smile in the costume when you're taking photos with other people? 
What is the worst thing that you ever saw happen to a guest at Disney? 
Hi, thanks for the AMA!  Has a cast member's head (or glove/shoe/something) ever fallen off while out in the park? How does WDW deal with that if it happens?  Also, can you talk about the process to learn to do Goofy's signature? I guess I've never compared them across multiple members but are the signatures standardized and do you have to have your ability to sign as your character tested in any way? 
I don't know if you'll read this, but Disney *lost* an irreplaceable asset when they fired you.  The person that fired you, *hurt* the company.  Would you consider going back there?  Surely, someone at Disney could reinstate you.  Considering how this has blown up, I can only imagine someone with that ability has read this and is thinking the same thing I am.  I haven't come close to reading all your replies, but 2 of them moved me to tears and I'm not a very big fan of Disney. 
Any cool insider tips you could tell us if we visit the park?  
When I was young I got lost at Disney world and refused to speak to anyone except goofy since he was my favorite and I didn't consider him a stranger. The whole time he stayed in character He ended up finding my Mom for me and it always was a great memory for me. Probably wasn't you but did you ever have situations like that? 
What are some secrets about Disney World logistics that we may not know? 
My daughter was having a tantrum, a character appeared and alleviate d the situation. Is this a coincidence or the patrons being watched that closely? 
Have you ever accidentally given the ol' Goofy Hancock when signing for something out of character? 
Howdy! Thanks for the AMA. My question is: How does one move on after termination from Disney? Can you not work at any other Disney related attraction? What do you do now? 
How does the signature process go? Are you taught the "correct" signature, or does each Goofy have a different one?  Also, how long did it take you to perfect the signature?  
What was the most unintentionally Goofy-klutz moment you've had while working? 
What are the coolest aspects of Disney that a visiter will never see or know about? 
1) How did you get through when you were having bad days but had to keep up a jovial, lovable character?   2) Did you have to keep your "identity" hidden from family/friends or could you openly tell people you played Goofy?  3) Any women/girls try to hit on you while you were in character?  
Goofy! My brother (9 at the time) punched you in the nether regions back in like 2000. We almost had to leave heh Anyway, how often does stuff like that happen? And sorry for my brothers actions! 
How was it bringing in the 737 at the airport?  I'm sure a cool experience since not everyone gets to. I work for an airline and think it's quite fun to do on a daily basis.  
Whats the weirdest/creepiest fan encounter you had? 
What are most of the staff like at Disney World?  I know a woman who uprooted her and her husband's entire lives to move to Florida so that they could work at Disney and fulfil their dreams. Do other staff share that kind of grandiose opinion of the place, or are most people just regular folk doing a job? 
I got lost at Disney World when I was younger.  My parents tell me that Goofy ended up finding me, tying me to a tree and going to fetch the park security and subsequently my family.  Was that you? If so why wouldn't you just take me with you?  Being tied to a tree is very embarrassing for a kid. :D 
I'm leaving for Disney in 48 hours exactly. Any tips or tricks I should know before leaving? 
Loved it then and I love it now. I would have to say the "Hidden Mickey" at the Disney / MGM Studios. The actual park used to make a giant mickey mouse when seen from an airplane. Echo Lake (where Gertie's is) made his right ear and the place where that horrible hat was made up the nose. All of the expansions tore it all to shreds though. :( There are a LOT of attractions I miss terribly though. Horizons was such a peaceful ride (and cool as shit) and Journey into Imagination with the original figment had so many amazing tricks in it. I miss Delta Dream Flight and Mr. Toad's Wild Ride a lot too. 
For the most part I appreciated when parents would stay in character. I hated when people would tell their kids "It's just a guy in a suit, don't be scared", which scares the kids even more. What I didn't like was when they would drill me with trivia questions and make me act out the answers. That used to be fun in the old days but toward the end we had to see as many guests as possible and there was always pressure from management to go faster and faster. 
A guy once asked me to choke him for a picture (I didn't). That's a hard one because guests routinely do stupid weird things. I think the worst of them is when people bring their newborn infants to the parks and ask us to hold them for a picture. I can't see shit in Goofy let alone other costumes and I'm wearing giant gloves or paws or whatever depending on what character I am. Why would you let me hold your baby? Yeesh! 
I worked for Disney in merch at Magic Kingdom, do you remember where in MK he worked? I'm still part of some Facebook groups for Cast Members so I might be able to find him.  Either way, if you want him to get recognized, write a letter or email to Guest Relations. It'll help if you know around when you met him and where he worked (so they can find him easier) but it means a lot for a CM to receive a guest letter. We get to take the letter home and get a certificate and it's a really big deal that means a lot to CMs 
We are NOT ALLOWED TO EVER TALK IN COSTUME IN FRONT OF GUESTS. EVER. Backstage however, anything goes. I used to love telling dirty jokes to unsuspecting new hires. I do have a good Goofy laugh but it took me years to perfect. 
I once saw an adult beat the absolute living shit out of a pre-teen boy on set as the Queen of Hearts. We're told never to interact when something like that happens so I had to leave. I've seen tons and tons of guests lose their shit in Guest Relations, particularly when it involved people not getting their way. I wish I had a camera sometimes. I would get so much delicious karma from /r/PublicFreakout 
Practice actually. It was absolute torture the first month (and especially the first parade) but after a few months I got used to it and after a few years I would forget I had the costume on. 
I was fired. To make a complicated story short, Donald Duck was, as usual, being a jerk and wouldn't leave my area because I had signed "Luv, Goofy" right over the bill of a Donald Duck hat. He threw a temper tantrum and as I was dragging him across the floor to get him back to his position a little kid ran out from behind the curtain at Pete's Silly Sideshow and we knocked her on her butt. The kid was fine and no one complained but Disney didn't really appreciate me dragging the costume on the carpeted floor so they terminated me.  
No.  What happens is a child is selected at random from the affected crowd, given a loaded pistol, and told to kill the evil twin.  The two character actors then are allowed to gesticulate wildly in an attempt to convince the armed youngster that they are - in fact - the *real* character.  After the ordeal, the child is given a voucher for a supper in the Cinderella Castle's Royal Restaurant with the surviving character.  The "evil" character's carcass is then carried away in an elaborate and whimsical marionette-style song-and-dance number and disposed of in that evening's Epcot firework extravaganza. 
Well, the worst I personally saw was in the 90's when Fantasyland Character Festival was still around which was the old queue for 20K Leagues Under the Sea. One of our greeters (that's what they called them then, they're attendants now) was a trans woman (that wasn't fooling anyone) and the police came and picked her up backstage. Evidently she was the father of a missing child and she was hiding out at Disney. Fucked up huh? There was also the infamous Michael Chartrand case who was the Tigger that felt up one of the guests. That was a really embarrassing blemish for Disney. It was on the front page of the Orlando Sentinel which is plopped down on everyone's doorstep at Disney (in the premium resorts anyway). He got his job back (there was a totally bizarre court case. His lawyer actually dressed up as Tigger to give the closing arguments) but he was fired a few years later for allegedly doing the same thing to one of the photographers. 
Wow, I have so many... I've answered some of this in the comments above but one thing that stands out was an emergency park dump one Forth of July in '95. There was a weird power glitch and all of the attractions went down at the same time and had to be evacuated. When they do the Fire Code estimates of how many people can be in the park at one time it is assumed that people will be in the rides. The Fourth of July is one of the park's busiest days of the year. Everyone dumped into the common areas of the park and it became dangerously crowded. One guest freaked out and pulled out something sharp and started stabbing guests to get out. I had to bring a stabbed guest back to her hotel to get her ID so she could go to the hospital. I'd never been so thankful to get off the desk in City Hall. That was a nightmare. 
They have to attempt to mimic the character's signature to the best of their ability. You sign so much though, it becomes second nature.   Wife was sleeping beauty for 3 years.  
Tough call. I'm really partial to the Little Mermaid because of Ursula but I think all in all it has to be Ratatouille. That movie has some of my all time favorite quotes, especially Anton Ego's (sp?) speech at the end of the film. I also loved Dumbo (as racist as it was) but that's because Timothy Q Mouse is probably my favorite character of all. 
He's an anthropomorphic dog. Yes, we get that question a lot. 
Hmmmm... One is the Automated Vacuum Assisted Collection System in the Magic Kingdom. There's a "tunnel" underneath (it's actually the first floor, the second and third floors are what you see in the park) and the AVACS is a series of tubes that connects all of the restaurants to the main dump that's behind Splash Mountain. The trash is whisked away under the park so the guests don't have to see it or smell it. It's pretty cool. 
I frowned once after opening a lanyard I'd bought and found to be frayed. Instantly a cast member appeared. It was creepy. 
We used to be able to sign our character's autograph any way we wanted (except Mickey) but then a guy named Chris came up with standard autographs which are consistently used no matter who the performer is, which is way better in my opinion. We have a small summary of the character that has the autograph on it and we try to make it look the same when we sign. Goofy is easy to do but I can write it upside down which would totally freak the guests out. :) That took a while to learn. I can also sign it behind my head and with my eyes closed. 
If you mean the audition process, it's like any dance audition you've ever been to but there's an animation part that's fun (wait tables like Donald Duck, mow the lawn like Pluto, etc.)  The casting for everyone else depends on what role you're applying for. Some require a math test, some require multiple interviews. It used to be kind of hard to get hired by Disney but now they'll take anyone who doesn't have multiple felonies on their record. They just got too big. 
In my case, they measured you, and then you had to do a simple dance routine.  If you made it through, you'd get asked to do a harder dance routine.  I fucked up the first dance routine, and still got the role, and about a year later I was cast in parades. 
I once misjudged a step and ended up in the mud up to my knees at a park once (it was a special cast member event so I got away with it). I've tripped countless times and was always able to make it part of the act so to speak. I almost cut off a guest's toes once (I was Baloo and she was wearing open sandals) which was disgusting because of the blood. I also fell down the stairs on the castle stage as the Queen of Hearts once. Not my proudest moment. 
I had two stalkers for about 8 months. They were two British guests that were here for a long time. They would come watch my first two sets (started when I was Captain Hook but mostly when I was the Queen of Hearts) then they would go to the Animal Kingdom and watch Lion King and then head back to the Magic Kingdom to see my last two sets. They did this every day. An attendant slipped up and told them my name (she assumed I knew them) so no matter what costume I was in they'd find out. I had SO MUCH FUN with these two girls. It got a bit creepy towards the end and they started writing me notes that were weird. Eventually security talked to them and they left me alone. I actually kind of miss them, they were a lot of fun. 
It was the 1st store to the left on Main Street.  It was November 30, 2016. I already wrote a review on Facebook mentioning him but I'll write a letter for sure!!  
That makes me feel good. I went to Disney with my wife in 2011 and we made sure to note down all the positive experiences we had with CMs, and wrote a long e-mail to Guest Relations when we got home with names/parks/times. I'd like to think they got the recognition they deserved. 
Holy. What a small world I actually knew this story from some coworkers at the hospital I work at 
Sir, you are a scumbag. First you warn me in your opening statement that I will lose my faith in Disney magic and then you tell the most magical Disney story ever. 
That is the saddest story I've ever heard. Incredibly touching. :( 
So what do you do to get out of awkward situations where children or other guests ask you pointed questions?   Like if a kid asked you "goofy whats your fav color?!?!" you're obviously going to point to the nearest colorful object and pretend that's your fav but what if they are like "Goofy where do I go to find X?" or "Goofy, what do you think of Donald Duck?"   I guess for the last one you can sort of make an angry face/emotion or w/e lol  
do the suits get washed regularly?  like daily? i would think they would get pretty rank after a few days in the Florida heat 
After 20 years, you were fired over that? Was it a full on fight lol? 
This actually happened to my 5 year old son. There were 2 Minney Mouses in front him him to choose from.  He took the gun and shot his sister in the leg and then turned the gun on himself.   
These are weird ways to say Lilo & Stitch and Atlantis: The Lost Empire. 
So whenever you're standing next to Pluto do you ever feel anthropomorphicdog dog masterace proud? 
I don't think it would up for debate as much as it is if not for the existence of Pluto. 
When I was a kid I always remembered going around the parks and finding characters just wandering around.  They were just there like it was no big thing.  Anyone could just go up and spend time with them and get pictures or an autograph.    I brought my wife there a few years ago and one of the biggest things I noticed was there were a lot less characters just wandering around.  Most of them came out at a specified time, there would be a line for autographs, then they went back stage again.  Seeing the characters became much less magical.  Also, while all the major characters are still there, I saw a lot fewer of the lower tier or lesser known characters.  I have autographs from when I was a kid of dozens of different characters.  This last time I saw maybe a dozen distinct ones. 
I wonder how many naughty kids have been thrown in there? 
I met you as Goofy around 2001!! I had completely forgotten this memory until I reading this, but I distinctly remember Goofy signing an autograph behind his head! You have completely blown my mind 
That's the kind of park layout that helps you discover elements for your arc reactor. 
Har har. The way it looks like now I'll never be done. I don't know how to edit my original comment and I have 20+ pages of comments to get through!  
Goofy was always my favorite, I still have a wall mounted picture somewhere. I was born in Homestead FL so we went a couple of times as a kid, honestly now that I think about it I might have met OP because I have a picture with goofy, if it was 1988 when he was working. Anyway, to my point. I'd say that would be tough having those children dealing with the worst thing they may experience in their lives and when you think about the make a wish foundation that brings kids that are ill to the place it just warms my heart to see everyone doing all they can to make someone else's life better, especially a child. Bravo to all of you that are apart of it.   
If you don't mind me asking, what happened to the girls?  He says in the story that they didn't know anyone from the girls family or how to contact them because they were foreign. Did they just go into foster care or did they eventually contact someone related to them? 
Yeah, what an a hole.   PS.  I'm not crying you're crying. 
I'd guess that they get more attention from kids, who may have never seen the older movies but have certainly seen frozen. That may falsely lead to the actresses believing that they're better at what they do, since attention often is the result of talent for entertainment types. 
OP - "So you were in combat? Well I've seen some shit too."  Vet - "Where were you stationed?"  OP - "Disney. 20 years..."  Vet - "Would you like to talk about it? 
Also the comment about Goofy holding the Make-a-Wish kid.  Also the fact that he dragged Donald across the floor to get him to stop being a jerk.   If anything I feel like he's building up the Disney Magic. 
My job that night was to check receipts at the door of the Emporium to make sure kids weren't stealing shit. One kid was walking out with a hat (he was a BIG kid) and when I grabbed it off his head he pushed me up against the wall and said "Touch me again and I'll fucking gut you". I just smiled and said "Be safe tonight". 
Yeah man every. single. day. Also was a character performer  
It's literal.  The cast members play around ALOT in character, and apparently he crossed a line and Disney took a shot to fire him.  OP said there were other factors involved in his firing however.  But I dated someone for a while who was Mickey, and she did stuff like this all the time.  
Disney doesn't fuck around. Many people want that job and they demand perfection. If you don't do it, they'll replace you with anyone else lined up.  
Were you the H-E-Buddy?  Its the mascot for a texas grocery chain named H-E-B 
They should team up to try and find the milk of human kindness. 
The widely accepted theory are that clothes are what make the difference in intelligence. Pluto just has a collar. Chip and Dale are a good example. They can't talk in any circumstance but in Rescue Rangers, where they wear clothes. 
He's that little kid everyone knows, who goes on fields trips and used to complain about how unprofessional the frontier village people were, or how bad at their jobs the civil war re-enacters are.   
So much of the Stark Expo reminded me of Disney World. John Slattery's Howard Stark reminded me a lot of Disney, actually.  
I know I'm crying, you don't need to remind me.   Such a touching story. Thanks OP made my day that much better 
Thanks for highlighting this, I didn't know it was a 'thing' and I'm a Children's Nurse! (I really should know better!) I'm going to make sure our Hospital gets a wish list pronto if they don't already have one.   Also can I make a plea for all the special needs children that can't necessarily play with 'mainstream' toys. Lots of musical instruments, touchy feely, noisy (yep us nurse types, love noisy toys because it gets smiles and laughter :)  balloons and things that make bubbles and gentle light changing toys too.  This AMA is up there with the best I've read.  
Alarm fatigue sets in after twenty minutes - they'll be alright. 
i'M WEEPING AT WORK AND i'M NOT SUPPOSED TO BE ON REDDIT ! Just lied to my boss and told her I got choked on candy....  Good Guy Goofy. and everyone   
I'm so cynical about Disney I can't stand it, and here I am bawling.  You are a good man, Costumed Goofy. 
It would do Anna and Elsa well to remember that everyone was the most popular princess once 
I haven't been gotten by a meme like that in a long time.I'm proud of him 
"Be safe tonight young one, you never know what can happen late at night in the park when someone can turn the cameras in the park off" 
I went to Grad Night twice. 1997, and 1998. (small school had to let Juniors go one year for numbers)  I can concur that it was absolute anarchy.  Probably not helped by the fact that my group in almost its entirety of about 14 of us dropped acid on the way.  The one thing of note I remember was we were getting high in the Swiss Family Robinson tree house and realized we were only one of about 4 groups of people all doing the same.  The next year when I went again, Swiss Family Robinson tree house was closed off.  When I asked why I was told "We had some issues last year." 
Every day - on rare ridiculously hot days, I'd personally go through two costumes a day. 
OP gave 17 pictures as proof, and now this guy is answering the questions. 
Tell the truth - she ever get to bring the Mickey mouse costume home?  Were you Goofy, Pluto or Minnie?   
This mindset always baffles me from companies.  Seems like hiring someone new is a way bigger risk then keeping someone who made a mess up after 20 years of consistency.   
**THE AMOUNT OF MAGIC IN THIS THREAD IS OVERWHELMING** 
I used to hear them in my sleep. Now I don't hear a beep.  
Sitting in a class in the military doing the same thing. Mostly because I'm not supposed to be on Reddit, but also because I can't let these other grown ass men see me cry, right? 
Be cynical, but please be cynical about the company, not the people. The "boots on the ground" really make that place something special every day. 
Almost closed it right before I got got. Kind of glad I didn't. 
I personally go through three in some cases. And I'm just a visitor. 
Nah you can't leave with those costumes because they clean them every day, as a routine. My ex gf was minnie/mickie   
I believe he did this to show that Tigger didnt have any awareness of his body due to the costume.  
There is a certain level of respect given to be memed so well and so sneakily. 
I can't believe how many people in this thread dated Disney characters 
Do you sometimes wish your fights would last a little longer than just a few seconds? 
Hey Ronda! Two questions:  * What achievement in your life are you the most proud of? * What is your idea of a great date? 
Hey Ronda any chance of you going on the Joe Rogan Experience again?  
If you were to be in a superhero movie, which hero would you play?  Thanks for doing this AMA! 
Hi Ronda,   With your exponential increase recently in exposure and recognition, do you worry about the amount of control that the media has over your image? And have you run into circumstances where you felt you were misrepresented or portrayed inaccurately by the media? 
If you could fight any historical figure, who would it be? 
What's up Ronda!  Who is your favorite Game of Thrones character from the books, and what would your sigil be if you were a character? 
Hey Ronda! Important question here. How many chicken wings can you eat?  
Can you please tell reporters to stop asking you and Dana about Cyborg? It's getting old. I'd be like Marshawn Lynch and just say the same thing over and over, perhaps "Let me know when she's 135." 
Do you ever think 'Finish Her!' in a Mortal Kombat announcer voice when you're taking down an opponent?  In all seriousness, what's your top piece of advice for young (and not so young) women looking to get into MMA or other competitive fighting oriented sports?   
Hi Ronda. I'm a 13 year old girl who loves all sports. I love karate and boxing, often at school people laugh and call me James when they See my arms. I just want to ask, how did you get over it?  Thank you for your time. 
Would you ever consider entering WWE after you retire ? 
Would you rather fight 100 Mewtwo sized mews or 1 Mew sized Mewtwo? 
If you were a gym master in Pokemon, what special type of Pokemon would you have to fight trainers? 
Would you like to go on an actual date with me? Indy Pro Wrestler\ Military soldier, Kyle Hawk. 
I have complete silence before I walk out before a fight. No talking in the locker room, no music, cellphones on silent. If I hear a ding from you taking a video you're gonna get your own private Rowdy Glare. 
buffalo wings naked with chunky blue cheese and extra hot sauce on the side. 
I would always play as Princess Katana 'cuz in the Sega version you could press down and punch up vs the computer and get to the fifth guy from the top with all flawless victories because the computer wouldn't learn to throw you from the floor until it was almost the end. 
Demetrious Johnson. I think he's the most well-rounded and I feel like I'm watching one of the later episodes of Dragon Ball Z when you only see one second of action going on between them disappearing 'cuz they're going so damn fast. I wouldn't be surprised if rocks start levitating around the ring because of all the energy emanating from it. Might Mouse vs. Dominick Cruz was one of my favorite (and most under-appreciated) fights ever.  
well... a lot of the good ones have been taken, but I'd like to vie for Miss Marvel.  
Buffalo Bill. Him destroying the buffalo population of America also destroyed the Native American culture and coming from Jamestown ND, which boasts having the largest statue of a buffalo in the world, the plight of the buffalo is quite near and dear to my heart. 
Yes. It's already set in motion. He's going to teach me the art of the full body boner via hemp rope training. 
holy shit. i laughed way harder than i was prepared for. this dude is going places.  
Having the same conversation over and over reminds me of bar-tending, and I'm thankful for the training I received having to deal with stupid questions from repetitive drunks. I only do it because I know I'll receive tips at the end ;) 
Only in post.  The advice: for any woman trying to break into a male-dominated career, I'd say the greatest thing you can do is always keep in mind that you always have the right to be there. 
Well... try to be more self-sufficient and less cabana boy. ;) 
I don't think of it as "time" or "matches" left - I think of it more as fight time left. So... if I have a few 5 round wars I'm not going to keep fighting nearly as long as if I keep walking out of the cage with unscathed victories. So the faster and more efficient my fights are, the longer I can fight. 
She didn't reply! ROUSY COMFIRMED FOR SUMMER SLAM!! 
He has yet to see the light. I hope he does some day. 
1 Mew sized Mewtwo, 'cuz everyone knows that even though Mewtwo has better stats than Mew, 100 Mews totally overcome that. 
Sounds tempting.... but I prefer a man to have the balls to ask me through a medium other than the Internet. Good try though- you sound like a catch. ;) 
I don't want a lot of things in life but a Rowdy Glare just entered my top 5. 
Someone explain to me how this girl isn't every man's dream. 
Ronda should have a character in MK. If she beats you with a flawless victory on the first thirty seconds her fatality tears your arm off. 
"Benny...bring me all the Ronda Rousey fans."  "But sir, that would be everyone on Earth."  "Then bring me everyone."  "What do you mean, everyone?"  "EVVVVERYYYYYOOOOONE!" 
This is by far the least predictable AMA I've ever seen. 
The largest statue of a buffalo in the world? do they really boast about that? 
You NEED to watch it. It really is a prime example of a great 90's movie. One of my all time favorites.  It also has Ernie Reyes Sr and Jr, and early Rob Schneider which is a nice bonus :D  *edit*  All these quote replies are making me nostalgic for it, Surf Ninjas movie night it is! 
*realizes Ronda makes more by talking to reporters than I do for a month's salary* 
That's amazing to hear! I feel like without all of the anxiety and guilt, we free our minds up so much. Thank you for the inspiration you're sending out to the world!  
So at about 30 seconds a match, Ronda will be here for a while folks.  
Yeah, but what's your *sincere* opinion about her... 
Boy the Reddit beards getting Cardale Jones levels of thirsty in these Pokemon related responses.  
This woman could literally beat your ass in real life and literally beat your ass in pokemon. 
Getting called a catch by Ronda Rousey... Scratch that off the bucket list. 
If this were anyone else this story would go right over to /r/thathappened. I'm so happy someone is actually doing what I fantasize about while making passive aggressive comments under my breath and avoiding eye account. 
Different strokes for different folks, man.   Not everyone like blue cheese with their wings, and that's the deal breaker for me, man. /s 
She's the Captain Marvel they're going for in the announced movie, isn't she? 
This is amazing! Fucking throwing in buffalos out of nowhere. 
Yes its North Dakota we don't have much to boast about  
You need to burn more calories - like goto the gym twice a day for 2 hours for 6 days a week for the next 10 months - burning over 5k calories a day, then you'll eat.  For reference, when my 160lbs brother hiked the appellation trail, he would eat 10 things off the dollar menu as a warm up before he got what he actually wanted to eat - like a double big mac with large coke and large fries. A doctor told him he was burning over 4k calories a day and would need to eat more if he wasn't going to be to weak to continue, so he ate :) 
And Rob Schneider....which is nice I guess. I don't know 
Full Body Boner?  Fuck context, who needs it. Sign me up 
If we're going by that I should have a really long and fulfilling sex life ahead of me...right guys? 
Dude, I'm fucking trembling and I'm pretty sure she wasn't talking about me. At least I hope not. 
So they're basically just two chicks in sports bras? That's where the similarities seem to end.  
Did you just look at it and notice it looked like Bermuda or did you need to do some research first? 
Doesn't exist. A developer (or someone) made that on their own. 
I found my old N64 with Pokemon Snap and a gift card to Buffalo Wild Wings. What does that get me? 
Say that to the camera after your next fight, and I guarantee Reddit will just break. 
Buffalo buffalo Buffalo buffalo buffalo buffalo Buffalo buffalo. 
Last time I checked, I thought you *modded* their subreddit? 
and after the fight the crowd started throwing $100 bills at Ronda 
Don't you have a mother for that like every normal person? 
I got all of those references and I've never been more proud of anything ever. Tryin to make a change :-\ 
Rowdy throw! Rowdy throw! I'm unconscious on the flooooor 
Brief Question here from someone that is interested.   SpaceX's current strategy revolves mostly around old style Rockets, even if they are now approaching complete reusability (Grasshopper rocks). Has SpaceX looked into Hybrid craft like the SABRE program happening in the UK, or look into the possibility of a space elevator (Even at a thought experiment stage) in the way that Google and NASA have done?   Thanks for doing this AMA.  
Mr Musk,  How will you secure the first stage of the Falcon 9 to the barge when it lands?  Gravity or some mechanism? 
In order to use the full MCT design (100 passengers), will BFR be one core or 3 cores?   
Previously, you've stated that you estimate a 50% probability of success with the attempted landing on the automated spaceport drone ship tomorrow.  Can you discuss the factors that were considered to make that estimation?  In addition, can you talk more about the grid fins that will be flying tomorrow? How do they compare to maneuvering with cold-gas thrusters? 
Hi Elon, I currently work for Toyota Tsusho in Fremont doing the wheel assembly for Tesla. I want to let you know how proud I am to be however minutely linked to such a powerful and positively influential company such as yours. Keep doing the good work, sir. You are an inspiration to not only myself but countless others around the world.   My question: You seem to have had to deal with a tremendous amount of adversity in a few of your ventures. Do you have any advice for those dealing with seemingly insurmountable adversity?    
tl;dr: How do you learn so much so fast? Lots of people read books and talk to other smart people, but you've taken it to a whole new level.  It seems you have an extremely proficient understanding of aerospace engineering, mechanical engineering, electrical engineering, software engineering,  all various subdisciplines (avionics, power electronics, structural engineering, propulsion, energy storage, AI) ETC ETC nearly all things technical.  I know you've read a lot of books and you hire a lot of smart people and soak up what they know, but you have to acknowledge you seem to have found a way to pack more knowledge into your head than nearly anyone else alive. Do you have any advice on learning? How are you so good at it? 
Hi Elon, I'll leave the technical questions to the experts. 1) do you plan on getting any sleep tonight and 2) how will you celebrate if the test is successful? Best of luck! x 
You are an early investor in AI startups like DeepMind and Vicarious. What was the most amazing demonstration of an AI capabilities you have seen so far?  
Hello Elon, **HUGE HUGE** fan here!! Question about the Mars Colonial Transporter:  There has been a lot of speculation over comments about exactly how much mass you are hoping to send to the Martian surface with the MCT. Can you tell us how much cargo you would like to be able to land on Mars with MCT, not including the mass of the MCT itself? 
Emily Shanklin indicated in late 2013 that the Raptor would be the first of a "family of engines" designed for the exploration and colonization of Mars. Could you elaborate on her wording, i.e. was she simply referring to a vacuum version and standard version, or do you plan on building multiple methane-based engines with significantly different thrust and size specifications? 
1) What is your favorite airplane?  2) What is your favorite video game?  3) What is your favorite food?  4) If you consume alcohol, what is your favorite alcoholic drink? 
tl;dr: What spurred the AI concerns over recent months?  As specifically as you can get away with, what spurred you to start sharing your strong concerns about general AI over the last year to 18 months? Prior to that time window you had never made public remarks on the subject and obviously something got you thinking about it. Was it Deepmind's game-playing algorithm? 
Hi Elon! The hyperloop was an interesting idea that sort of came out of the blue last year. Do you have any other projects like that just kicking around in your head? Do you plan to follow up on any of them? 
Hello Mr. Musk,  I sold you a pair of hiking boots at the Sports Authority Elite in Corte Madera. I just wanted to know how your walk through the forest (as you described it) went? Also did you like the boots? 
A few simple questions..  * What year are you actually from? * How did the process work? Did you volunteer to travel back to help us advance? Was it predetermined by a time-paradox and you were already destined to be sent back in time at your birth? Did you and a group of peers draw straws/lottery?  
Hello Mr. Musk.  As a lifelong Metro Detroiter I must ask if you have any plans or are open to the idea of opening a factory in Detroit?   We well versed in the automobile industry and have countless hardworking, industrious people begging for a chance to carve out an honest middle class life.   On top of that there are seemingly few better methods of applying pressure to the industry than to set up shop in their backyard. Detroit is on it's way back up and if you were to be a key player in this renaissance not only would it be mutually beneficial but you would be a hero.  Please consider it. I wish you all the best in your current and future endeavors, what you are doing is incredibly important work. Thank you.  
If you want to get to orbit or beyond, go with pure rockets. It is not like Von Braun and Korolev didn't know about airplanes and they were really smart dudes. 
Mostly gravity. The center of gravity is pretty low for the booster, as all the engines and residual propellant is at the bottom.  We are going to weld steel shoes over the landing feet as a precautionary measure. 
At first, I was thinking we would just scale up Falcon Heavy, but it looks like it probably makes more sense just to have a single monster boost stage. 
There should definitely be a science mission to Europa 
I do kinda feel like my head is full! My context switching penalty is high and my process isolation is not what it used to be.  Frankly, though, I think most people can learn a lot more than they think they can. They sell themselves short without trying.  One bit of advice: it is important to view knowledge as sort of a semantic tree -- make sure you understand the fundamental principles, ie the trunk and big branches, before you get into the leaves/details or there is nothing for them to hang on to.   
Actually, we could make the 2nd stage of Falcon reusable and still have significant payload on Falcon Heavy, but I think our engineering resources are better spent moving on to the Mars system.  MCT will have meaningfully higher specific impulse engines: 380 vs 345 vac Isp. For those unfamiliar, in the rocket world, that is a super gigantic difference for stages of roughly equivalent mass ratio (mass full to mass empty). 
The best teacher I ever had was my elementary school principal. Our math teacher quit for some reason and he decided to sub in himself for math and accelerate the syllabus by a year.  We had to work like the house was on fire for the first half of the lesson and do extra homework, but then we got to hear stories of when he was a soldier in WWII. If you didn't do the work, you didn't get to hear the stories. Everybody did the work. 
Yes, but probably only a few hours  Party at Cocoa Beach!  
Thrust to weight is optimizing for a surprisingly low thrust level, even when accounting for the added mass of plumbing and structure for many engines. Looks like a little over 230 metric tons (~500 klbf) of thrust per engine, but we will have a lot of them :) 
1. Yes, the Falcon Heavy center core is seriously hauling a** at stage separation. We can bring it back to the launch site, but the boost back penalty is significant. If we also have to the plane change for geo missions from Cape inclination (28.5 deg) to equatorial, then a downrange platform landing is needed.  2. The Mars transport system will be a completely new architecture. Am hoping to present that towards the end of this year. Good thing we didn't do it sooner, as we have learned a huge amount from Falcon and Dragon.  3. Our spacesuit design is finally coming together and will also be unveiled later this year. We are putting a lot of effort into design esthetics, not just utility. It needs to both look like a 21st century spacesuit and work well. Really difficult to achieve both.   
Goal is 100 metric tons of useful payload to the surface of Mars. This obviously requires a very big spaceship and booster system. 
SR-71  Hard to pick a favorite. I tend to like FPS with a story, like Bioshock, Fallout or Mass Effect, but was also a big fan of Civ and Warcraft.  French and BBQ  Whiskey     
He has said that some of the automotive regulations, like the requirement that every car have side mirrors and that they all display certain information in very specific places are cumbersome and unnecessary. Side mirrors, for example, could be replaced by cameras that would have no blind spots, have less risk of getting broken or fogging up, and would increase highway fuel economy by 5%. 
Yes, he has talked about electric, supersonic, vertical take off and landing jets. He thinks that once batteries reach an energy density of 400 wh/kg, it will be feasible to have a range of 2000-3000 miles.  He's also talked about making pre-fabricated freeway sections to speed up construction on the 405. (he has to sit through the traffic there almost every day). 
I'm a software engineer from Detroit.  I'm currently working in Silicon Valley but moving back to Detroit next month.  I would leave my job in a heartbeat if Tesla opened up a location in Southeastern Michigan! 
Pretty sure you can count yourself in that list of "smart dudes" now. 
Do you consider that the Space Shuttle program delayed the development of reusable rockets? 
Bro haven't you seen the movie? Awful idea. Octopus monsters. 
Please start posting to /r/showerthoughts. That would be glorious. 
I'm kind of giddy and star struck, but I'm more completely at a loss that the guy that owns Tesla, the guy that owns a company that is putting a rocket into space tomorrow, just sent me a video of a cat riding a roomba chasing a duck.  What just happened?  I was having the worst day, and now everything seems alright.  Heck yeah! 
I wish more teachers took into consideration this method of teaching. Far too many I know just inundate their kids with information instead of building fundamentals. 
What kind of mass ratio do your upper stages have? 
Thanks for answering! I teach high school astronomy in Orlando, and we always watch your rocket launches and talk about SpaceX. We're big fans. I'll get to work on my storytelling skills.  
Uh oh, I hope you don't mean that it'll look dorky like a BMW i3 or a Toyota Mirai. It won't look dorky... Right? 
Follow-up question: How much do you sleep per night, on average?  
Really glad you're focusing on looks for #3. There are a lot of companies doing cool stuff from a technical standpoint, but many miss the point that spending time on presentation is really important for a business to stand out.  
Elon, are you trying to find Prothean ruins by chance? 
Yeah, if Elon succeeds with the whole cheaply and rapidly reusable thing, his name is going up there next to von Braun and Goddard. 
Fair question: Does Musk design rockets or does he pay people to design them? There's a significant difference to compare him to Von Braun. 
I always roll my eyes at the guy in an AMA thread who freaks out when a self-interested famous person responds to them like they said they would.   This though? This is way different. Put that shit on your tombstone buddy!  
I've always wanted to play but I'm constantly terrified by the fact that I more than probably suck at building rockets and will only get frustrated.  Also, I'd probably cause the deaths of hundreds of Kerbals... 
This is the same guy who is making sure his space suits look sexy.  I doubt his new car will be a dorkmobile.   
I actually measured this with my phone! Almost exactly 6 hours on average.  
What will aliens think of us if we aren't fashionable?! 
Next year he's offering $10,000,000 to figure out how to curse on the Internet.  Nobody tell him. 
We're getting enough new numbers here for a dozen new discussion posts full of math :) 
I imagine you give your engineers KSP .craft files and tell them to Make It So 
He plays video games all day and then does all the urgent work in the last hour. 
He didn't even use a period, he must have hated those hiking boots.  
Ya, revolutionizing online payment options and singlehandedly taking on the American automobile industry are more like hobbies anyways. 
This answer will sure make a lot of people over at Squad very happy :) 
And you're one of few people who gets to play it with real rockets!  
Any chance of an official SpaceX mod for Kerbal Space Program? 
He played it once and thought:  "Yeah, this is *okay.*" 
Now there's a tough choice: Elon Musk or Scott Manley for KSP lessons. 
Join the club, I suck at it but I have a drink blow some shit up and try my damnedest to get somewhere :) 
To which they will reply with a how-to guide on returning from orbit by Scott Manley. 
That's unsettling.  There's coincidences and then there's just weird. 
Hey, I hope you know that it is medically recommended that you get 7-8 hours of sleep **minimum**. If you don't, you won't become an^extremely^successful^billionaire 
Nope. And he does not have a butthole; he has no need for one. 
*rubs greasy math hands together*  e: *rubs greasy hey-if-anyone-has-some-good-speculation-as-to-MCT-mass-ratios-they-should-tell-me-but-otherwise-I'll-just-guess math hands together* 
Jesus, they'll have to assemble that thing in orbit. That's insane.  
Plot twist, rage quit.  Decided to launch a real rocket instead. 
They were the only good hiking boots we had in his size, so he really didn't have much choice. 
He also plays Human Space Program.  ^(I hope the next update is good.) 
Yup, SpaceX's FB page just posted that they're doing the weekly challenge and that tomorrow's F9 launch will start upside down 
KSP CM here. So far, an official one is not in the cards, but if we had the opportunity to work with SpaceX on one, we'd do it in a heartbeat. 
The mod I'm wanting most for KSP is stowable, functioning grid fins so I can try the landing. 
Orbiting is just aiming for the earth and missing. 
Come on dude it's Elon Musk,  the hell is he going to make something dorky for.  Also Breckenridge Bourbon get on it! 
I had to go check if he was born Elon. Apparently he was. The plot thickens... 
He works so hard, he burns off energy from the inside. 
*"Fuck this bullshit game! I'm rich, I'll build a real motherfucking rocket and show those little green assholes! I'm going the fuck to MARS!"*  We later discover that Tesla exists because Mr. Musk got his ass kicked at *Gran Turismo* a few years back. 
HSP 1.999991 Changelog: Increased base weight of humans to balance difficulty 
It'd probably involve venting O2 from the car to lower your perapsis.  Right /u/illectro (/u/ilectro) ? 
And that's a KSP developer, ladies and gentlemen.  Thanks for making such an awesome game 
I'm so proud to be punching the same planets Elon Musk is landing on.  
So you guys are suing Trump for these acts against the environment, of which he's used executive orders to do so. Since you guys are merely suing, does this actually stop the executive order from being executed? Or is there only a fine? What are Trumps repercussions for you guys winning a lawsuit? 
/u/DrewCEarthJustice I would like to know what your organizations policy on nuclear power is? 
Aren't there already pipes in the area where the Dakota pipeline is being proposed?   If so. Why is THIS pipeline so different/Bad? 
Are you still litigating over Dakota Access? If you are, is that a prudent use of charitable assets given that the odds of prevailing are between slim and none? 
Why did the DAPL only become an "issue" after the tribes asked for double what the company building it was offering them to build it on their property and the company found another route?  Why weren't they against it from the beginning?   How did they decide that if they could get double what the company offered them everything was a-ok, but if not it must be some huge problem steeped in racism and not caring about the environment?  How can someone prevent construction on private property they do not own and have no legal rights to?  How can you advocate against pipeline projects when shipping oil & gas via train is worse for the environment both in how much trains pollute vs. pipelines, and how dangerous trains are vs. pipelines? 
I suspect your inbox is probably flooded, but if you find it possible to answer my question is this: why is it a bad thing to resume drilling in the Arctic if the oil is going to be claimed anyways? I personally would rather see my own country profit from it than Norway, Denmark, the UK, Russia, and other foreign nations. While I 100% agree with you on the other topics, and I even acknowledge the dangers and detriments to the environment that Arctic drilling will have, it's not like other nations are simply going to let it sit untapped. Though perhaps I am misunderstanding something, which is in fact why I'm asking the question. I'm no fan of Trump, but I don't think he's wrong in this particular decision, at least given my current level of understanding on the issue. 
Do you think anything would happen with this lawsuit, or will it just get added to his already massive pile of lawsuits? 
Trump's EPA director is at odds with most environmentalist causes. He bases his official actions on economic rationale. Can't this be construed as dereliction of duty?  
why argue against the dakota access pipeline when the oil is going to get there regardless. It's a lot safer by pipeline then by truck or train I would assume? 
I'm graduating law school on Friday. My career plan is to pursue public interest environmental law, with a particular focus on climate change. I just wanted to say that lawyers like you, and those who I have worked for, you are all heroes.   As for a question: what skill or resource do you think environmental lawyers underutilize throughout their careers?  
Won't Trump just do whatever the fuck he wants while saying, "fuck you" no matter what evidence you find? 
How/when did you first start to take on the president?  
Why did the DAPL only become an "issue" after the tribes asked for double what the company building it was offering them to build it on their property and the company found another route? Why weren't they against it from the beginning? How did they decide that if they could get double what the company offered them everything was a-ok, but if not it must be some huge problem steeped in racism and not caring about the environment? How can someone prevent construction on private property they do not own and have no legal rights to? How can you advocate against pipeline projects when shipping oil & gas via train is worse for the environment both in how much trains pollute vs. pipelines, and how dangerous trains are vs. pipelines?  OC was from u/fdubzou just wanted to make sure Op sees this question and answers it. 
How do you feel about the mess the Dakota access pipeline "supporters" left in my state? They caused an environmental disaster in my state. Any comments? 
Is it me or does this thread seems be bombarded with Trolls and Astroturfing? 
Thank you for your important work, Drew! Would you have any advice to someone looking to start in the environmental policy field? Working on an MPA in Environmental Policy now, would love to make an impact. 
Why is /r/politics and various other anti-trump hate spaces allowed to use bots, brigades and otherwise manipulate reddit?  
Why didn't you take Obama to court for his part in the pipeline? 
Do you enjoy wasting other people's money to merely signal your virtue? 
What do you think about the fact that the protesters of the Dakota access pipeline did more damage to the environment with their garbage and human waste then the actual pipeline itself would do? How about the fact that there's more polar bears then ever? How about the fact that there was more recorded sea ice in Antarctica last year then any other year on record? How about that every doomsday scenario said by environmental scientists has been a lie? Look at inconvenient truth, that movie has just become inconvenient to the environmentalists narrative seeing it's full of so much BS! 
Are you afraid of repercussions by the current administration?  
Have you considered how to make environmental lawyers have a broader appeal? Mainly among rural constituents you claim to represent?  
How can de-regulation be balanced with environmental protections'? 
Is there a legal justification for preventing Trump from revoking National Monument status? I thought it was within his powers as president.  
Not the dude, but...it depends. Sometimes a court will issue a temporary injunction preventing the change while the case is litigated. Sometimes nothing happens, but also just because Trump issues an order doesn't mean that suddenly all the rules change. You can open up the arctic for drilling (for example) but until a company submits a plan and obtains a permit for exploration (which takes awhile) nothing happens. And the court may order the permit review to be put on hold. If they win, the court wold order the executive branch office responsible for issuing those permits...to not issue any permits. No permit, no exploration or drilling. Things like that happen.   
It is extremely frustrating that fossil types and solarwind hipsters both agree that nuclear is bad. I mean it's literally the cleanest most efficient way to produce power and these idiots are keeping the world a century behind because they are fucking idiots.  
Probably against it. Types like these only think wind and solar is the way to go. Probably hydroelectric too, but they might have problems with that as well. Lots of people misunderstand nuclear power 
Thank you for asking the questions I wanted to, but in a much smarter way.    Of course, there's no way he will touch this question with a ten foot pole.  
How have I never heard this perspective before, yet now it is the top comment in the Reddit thread? 
Fucking crickets to this brilliant line of questioning.  I love environmental lawyers. 
I'm a layman and not even American so my knowledge of this is weak at best, but my guess is that there will likely be more to gained from the potential attention to the issues lawsuits like this might bring rather than the results of the judgment. 
They are never answering this question, this guy wants media attention and donations. 
This person didn't do their homework and now looks dumb as fuck  
Quite a few yes. Many of which are just insulting the OP. Pro-Trump people seem to be upset because they can't defend the fact that he is actively harming the environment with his actions and orders. 
Probably come to reddit and cry about it for upvotes and support  
Yeah like wtf? OP had one of the best non-answers I've seen. He *is* a lawyer.  
Seriously, I'm Dutch so in no way bothered by what that clown does, but I wish you the best of luck and I sincerely hope that somehow you'll shit all over him. 
What exactly was illegal about his actions? If Obama had the authority to make those areas unavailable to drilling, doesn't the next President have the authority to reverse that decision?  I looked on your website for info about why it's illegal, but all that seems to say is "artic drilling is bad, mmkay". 
Also not the dude, but one more general point to consider is the executive, legislative, and judicial branches of the government are specifically set up to check each other. The legislative branch can override the president with enough support in congress, and the judicial branch can override him by interpreting the laws written by the legislative branch. How they override him is up to them, but they certainly have the power to do it (given his actions are not lawful or he does not have the power to do). 
From the standpoint of physics, that wouldn't work. Fusion power needs to convert light nuclei into heavier nuclei, and fission products are already heavier than iron (which is the binding energy minimum). 
Types like what, exactly?  I, for one, don't think anything ill of nuclear energy, mainly because I have a basic understanding of how and why it works (keyword: basic. source: brother is a nuclear engineer).  I also completely agree with basically everything that OP is fighting for that I have read in this thread.    So, I'm kinda confused why you'd think that "types like these" would be against clean energy that has some manageable side affects when combating completely unclean sources like coal and oil. 
Pipelines are safer than shipping it by train correct?  
May I ask why the DAPL was chosen as something to pursue rather than the Trans-Pecos pipeline? It seems awkward that the TP line gets very little attention comparatively knowing all the similarities. Especially considering the ease at which a border wall can be constructed once the infrastructure gets laid down from the Alpine shale development.  
Assuming that drilling in North Dakota continues, wouldn't the completion and use of the Dakota access pipeline over traditional oil transportation methods actually help reduce the amount of air pollution and environmental damage? 
I don't intend this to be a frivolous question, but if an action (say, dismantling the Clean Air Plan) has a negative impact on everyone who breathes, doesn't everyone with lungs have standing?  Can a lawsuit be mounted on behalf of human life? 
It pisses me off that the OP can not respond to any valid questions or arguments against his beliefs, this is supposed to be /r/iAMA where you ask anything. 
It won't be tops for long.  Had the tribe gotten $20,000,000, the DAPL issue would be a moot point. 
There's a fourth reason, too: The Arctic is the most likely place in the world to have a spill. Metal becomes brittle at low temperatures. Arctic weather is extreme. It's dark for months at a time. Cold water holds more CO2 than warm water, making it more corrosive because of the carbolic acid that forms when CO2 is dissolved in water.  The Arctic is literally one of the hardest and most dangerous places to drill, before even factoring in the environmental damage a spill would cause. 
I wholeheartedly agree and we should probably be advertising your victories more. I think a lot of Americans feel like it's pretty futile to fight to Goliaths. We see the way Trump is pushing forward, say, in installing industry CEOs in the EPA, and it seems like we're passing a point that I thought the system would inherently resist. From your view does it truly seem optimistic? Do you think the process of law will ultimately win out for what the sane among us want? 
What law related to this is Trump not following?  I hate him and what he's doing as much as you, but I'm curious what claims your lawsuits make. I didn't think you could win a lawsuit against the president for doing their job badly. 
So the answer is anonymous donors and american taxpayers? 
Were the Obama actions laws passed by Congress, or just executive orders? If just executive orders, why would they be exempt from revocation? Or are Trump's EOs also exempt from future review? 
This seems like a double standard, Obama's actions for these were also executive orders - what makes them better than Trump's, is it simply because you agree with them and don't with Trump's? 
And one that they seem very reluctant to answer for some reason.  Probably because it's outside the scope of their current litigation efforts, but still. 
Thank you for remaining a non partisan advocate for us and the environment. 
I'm neutral on Trump. But OP mentioned a lot of Trump voters' are in favor of protection of the environment it seems the minority of the Trump voters are loud and vocal here and/or lobbying firms have paid astroturfers down voting and trolling much like the left has on r/politics and r/politcaldiscussion. 
Works for a law firm that represents the interests of the renewable industry most likely so it's not going to get answered.  Renewable lobbying is just as much against a Nuclear solution as big oil 
Also where are these fusion reactions occurring? If you know how to safely and efficiently contain a fusion reaction please tell us. 
No idea about OP, but there are organizations like Greenpeace, who are - somewhat paradoxically - against the energy source that would perfectly fit to their goal of preserving the environment. 
Yes. And safer than truck. Safe is still a relative term of course, but it is the safest method we have so far due to automated monitoring and shutoffs which can't be effectively done on trucks or trains.    A spill will happen at some point in history no matter the method, but a pipelines automated system would leak very little compared to an entire tanker leaking on a train or truck. There are millions of litres of fluid leaked from trucks all the time (dripping as they drive) across the world, we just don't hear about it.   Pipelines have super sensitive sensors and they are very accurate because you damn betcha they want to see 100,000 litres from one end to the other, not 90,480 or less than what entered.  
Of course they are safer then by train.  These trains currently flood the midwest along the pipeline route.  The tracks and bridges they are on are some of the oldest in my state and the risk of spill is very high.   Also... the trains use more energy (diesel) to haul the oil then pipelines use electricity (wind power etc) to pump.   If you look at the train routes many cross the same river the pipeline does.   At least have some common sense in deciding what to sue trump on. 
Pipelines are safer than trains... but isn't clean energy safer than pipelines?   
Because people who don't care about environmental causes have heard about the DAPL but not Trans-Pecos.   This is about gaining media attention, not using donor dollars effectively and intelligently.  
That's exactly right.  The elders in Fort Yates simply wanted more money.  The oil flows over the river in trains already so the water issue is moot. 
They are executive orders which make it perfectly legal for Trump to change 
Funny that /u/FS4JQ is not the one giving thanks for this non-partisan approach.   Well, they've just been a redditor for 14 days, so maybe they're just not used to things yet.  Yeah, I'm sure that's it. 
I don't really think there are that many actual shills around on either side of the spectrum lately. There were likely a lot back during the election and primaries, but not at this point.   It's just strong supporters by now.   And, yes, a lot of Trump supporters support the environment, they support climate change, they support social topics. In short, everything that Trump and his cabinet aren't.   It's quite perplexing. 
This is the answer that I came here to find, thank you. 
Doesn't the power of executive order give the president the power to repeal executive orders? It's not like he's trying to repeal the law with one. I get that this is going to be your legal argument in court, but is there any precedence for it? 
Now you have even said yourself, Trump isn't reversing. Trump has merely pushed an executive order to halt the previous order from finishing. That's not reversing, it's simply putting something on hold. How is that illegal? 
Of course he can.  How d'you think the legal system works?  If he doesn't have some reason to believe this was illegal then there would be no basis for going to court. 
its almost like the "good" guys just want to kick out the "bad" guys so they can become the new "hey guys were youre friends guys were not going to do anything bad at all we promise" guys 
The safety in containing a fusion reaction is not the big issue.  With a fission reactor, you have to put work to force the reaction to not go too fast. You have to control it, to contain it - it happens naturally. With a fusion reactor, you have to put work to allow the reaction to keep going on. In fission, if you shutdown everything at once it can still keep reacting. In fusion it cannot.  The reason for this is that fusion requires hot and dense plasmas that are contained within magnetic fields. Think of the magnetic fields as giving enough pressure to actually get the atoms to get in contact with each other. If the magnetic field is turned off, the atoms won't be in contact anymore and the plasma will dissipate inside of the vacuum chamber.  
Devils advocate: dripping trucks don't cause as much localised devastation than a burst pipe over a river would, right? 
The automated system isn't full proof though. There was a story a couple months ago that reported a leak near the potential build site of the Dakota pipeline that was not found until 150,000+ gallons of oil leaked out. And it was only found because the landowner discovered the spill and reported it. 
Isn't that the definition of using donor dollars effectively and intelligently though, since media exposure is usually what it takes to get things done? 
Their lawsuits aren't based on the idea that it's illegal for Trump to overturn Obama's EO's, it's that the policies he's implementing show an illegal disregard for the President's sworn duty to protect America, including its natural resources, for future generations. 
Personal opinion, at least for guys like me. There are more pros than cons.   I'll fight Trump on certain issues with environment and such because I'm not spending all my time trying to fight for my gun rights or whatever.   Come for my guns and artic drilling well take a back seat.   Just an example 
I don't understand how his advisers cannot sit down and tell him how and why he will get sued, or he just doesn't care? 
I think he's saying that Obama's protection of those certain areas was not done via executive order. It was done via powers granted by OCSLA, a law passed by congress. While the OSCLA gives the president power to protect, it doesn't give him power to "unprotect". So, because what Obama did wasn't an executive order, Trump can't legally repeal it by executive order alone.   
Lawsuits are in civil court.  You can sue people for all sorts of things that aren't technically illegal. 
Can't wait to fight the renewable lobby in the name of thorium or fusion! 
When it rains where do you think that oil goes? Right back into the water systems. 
A lot of the time in scenarios like that (automated system failure) it comes back to human involvement. Whether bypassing alarms (happens more than you'd think), installation failure or poor maintenance causing equipment failure.  
Please don't apply logic when they just want to shit on people for acting on things they believe in. /s 
yes it is. And it's a moral responsibility to fight as it infringes on basic human rights. 
basically already had that fight what 30 years ago now the plebians whine about nuclear at every turn. why people who dont know what theyre talking about have any influence or say ill never know 
And this is why people don't want it next to their water supply 
How stable is the planet configuration of the system? Has it reached a stability over long timescales like our solar system has, or is it a relatively young system were we would expect the bodies to still coalesce into larger objects over time? 
Does TRAPPIST-1 itself pose any hazards to the planets like radiation or flares? 
My question is simple... What's next? I mean I'm sure all the excitement of discovering and announcing this find is still fresh but what are the next steps involved in finding out more about this discovery? What information do you think is "discoverable" about this system in the near future? 
What is the protocol if you do find any signs of life on any of the exoplanets? 
Great presentation everyone!  When/how will you be able to determine if there are signs of an oxygen rich atmosphere?  There was a lot of speculation before the conference that you may have already detected that. 
What are the most promising ways to search a planet that far away for life, assuming it is not intelligent enough to broadcast signals outward? 
Hello, and congratulations and thank you for this discovery! You people are doing amazing work. I have 2 questions for you.  1. Do we know what kind of a gravity compared to Earth or Mars appears on those 3 planets that could have water in them?   2. Can we expect to have the technology in the next 20-30 years that we could for see for sure that there would be life in those planets in form of vegetation?   
So if we were to imagine earth as the planet closest to this star, how many of the other 6 planets would we have visited with satellites, rovers, manned  orbits, manned landing, etc.?   I am trying to imagine how close they all are together in a way that is fun.  
What are the primary impacts of being an earth sized world so close to a smaller, dimmer star?   From the perspective of a human on the surface of such a world, I mean.  I read that all are tidally locked to the star - does that mean they'd only have habitability bands around the perimeter/twilight region? 
What would be the temperatures on each of these planets and the most likely chemical compositions? Are they likely to have a magnetic field? 
Would the relatively close nature of the planets have any sort of dramatic effect on surface tidal forces or would this somehow be offset by the star?  My thoughts being that our Moon has a pretty noticeable effect on Earth, and if those planets are that close to each other I would have thought all sorts of weird weather nonsense would happen. 
Any chance we could name these planets after the 7 dwarves?  
What information will you guys receive from these planets if the James Webb telescope is ready and functional?  
How is the habitable zone estimated for tidally locked planets? How does knowledge of this system affect theories of planetary formation?  
Detecting exoplanets by their transit of their sun presumes that our angle of observation of their sun crosses the path of the planet's orbit. Isn't that really unlikely? Or, are all planets orbiting on parallel planes? 
How can a young aspiring astronomer like myself get involved in this kind of work? At my university it seems like undergrads get funneled directly into academia. What does it take to work at an institution like NASA? I've already started getting involved in research as a sophomore, and my dream research topic is exoplanets. 
Which one of the new discoveries is the one your team is most excited about? 
In the presentation, one of the someone said that Spitzer was not originally designed to look for exoplanets and that it had to be re-engineered to do so. Assuming that the telescope stayed in space, how was this done?  
When the JWST is launched, how will it be used to analyze this system? What will it be looking for, and what will it be able to tell us about these planets? 
Why does the lettering start at 'b'? What happened to planet 'a'? Thanks! 
How can you know that existing life are in need of liquid water? We don't know anything about extraterrestrial life, do we? Just because we breathe oxygen and are dependent on water, does that mean that all other potential life have the same criteria? 
Since this is a red dwarf system, how does this impact the potential for habitable worlds? I've read that planets in these systems are all tidally locked and that red dwarf stars can have sun spots that can modulate its energy to planets by as much as 20%.  
How are discoveries like this made? Is it just luck kr is there a process to discovering planets? 
Congrats on the find, and great work. Now the real question here, are you guys fans of stargate sg1? I sure got an itch to restart the series. 
When should we expect the data/results around atmospheric composition to be released or published? 
If these habitable zone planets are so close to each other doesnt that make them very hot due to gravitational interaction? What do we know about their temperatures now?  
How soon are we likely to have information on the composition of the atmospheres and who will be making these observations? 
Hello. Currently, Kepler spacecraft is observing TRAPPIST-1 system. How well can Kepler spacecraft detect planets around TRAPPIST-1 compared to Spitzer spacecraft? Are further discoveries expected?  Also, is TRAPPIST-1h the first "cold Earth" to be a candidate for further observations? 
Are any planets besides Earth in the Goldilocks zone in our solar system? 
Good work team!  Can I ask the daft question that nobody else dares ask!  On that first day in the office as you take the bubble wrap off your nice new telescope - how you decide which part of the night sky you look at first?   Do you focus your work on known stars that previous work has indicated might have a chance of exoplanets, do you focus on exploring specific clusters or is it it any more random than that? 
Any ideas what the lifespan of the system's star is? Even if our technology were to advance, it would suck to arrive there only to have the sun go out. 
Would you rather fight 100 earth sized planets, or one planet sized earth? 
What's the most exciting thing you can theorize about these planets? 
Congrats on the amazing discovery! What kind of signatures would you be looking for in the future to determine if there might be some kind of life on any of these planets? And using what instruments? 
How does the telescope work? What do you actually see? Is it just a series of numbers on a screen which you interpret into a tangible image? 
Has SETI been listening to this system? I would be really excited if we could hear anything from this system.  
Okay, this isn't specific to this discovery (sorry), but how does the telescope know which direction the exoplanets are orbiting the parent star? Aren't we just detecting a dip in light? how does that imply a direction? (I ask this after using the in browser: TRAPPIST-1 system in 3D) 
TRAPPIST-1 shows one flare (eruption) every week and a strong one every 6 months. Its X ray activity is not yet very well known and could be also a thread for any life there. But if the planets have an atmosphere and magnetic field this could limit the level of high energy flux. This is still work under investigation to estimate those levels. 
to bounce off this: will SETI start listening to this system, now?  
We do not yet have a protocol. Most likely we will make a tentative discovery, that will take longer to confirm. SS 
It's going to be awhile before we find an oxygen rich atmosphere. JWST launch in fall 2018, so we will have to wait to try until sometime after that. It turns out some oxygen-rich atmospheres might exist that are not created by life, so to associate oxygen will require care. I hope we will be able to find, identify, and announce in a few years! --SS 
The next generation of space telescopes, after WFIRST and JWST, to be launched in the 2030's. would be capable of actually getting a spectrum of the Earth, separate from the sun, using an instrument called a coronagraph or a star shade.  The current telescopes could measure the size of the Earth as it transits in front of the sun.  However, that only happens only once per year, so you have to know when to look, or look for a long time.  The latter strategy was adopted by the original Kepler Mission.  Michael Werner 
I just want to say this is one of the best questions I've read on here today. Good job! 
Answer to first question:  Determining the surface gravity requires knowledge of both the radius and mass.  The uncertainties on the mass measurements are large, but our best guess is that the surface gravity of most of these planets is similar to that on Earth.  One exception is planet f.  It has the same radius as Earth but 68% the mass.  That means the surface gravity will be 68% that of Earth. - Natalie Batalha   
1. Compared to Earth, and based on our preliminary planet radii and mass estimates, the planets' gravity for e, f, and g would be around 0.7g, 0.6g and 1.1g. Farisa Morales 2. The next step is to analyze the composition of the atmospheres (if any), which will provide information on the conditions and processes taking place there (past and present). Farisa Morales 
All of them.  They are very, very close together  All are much closer to one another and to their host star than the Mars-Earth distance, for example. Michael Werner 
Tidal-locking: we think as long as there is an atmosphere (even a thin atmosphere like that on Mars) heat will circulate around the planet. So habitability location should extend beyond the limbs. 
Being close to the faint star puts the planet(s) in the habitable zone, but Red dwarf stars can be very active with coronal mass ejections for example, in addition to high doses of x-ray and UV radiation.  However, a healthy atmosphere and magnetic field around the planet can help protect any life evolving on it.  Farisa Morales 
Surface temperatures depend on the proximity to the central star but also on the composition and thickness of the planet's atmosphere.  Since we do not yet know anything about the planetary atmosphere's, all we can say is how much energy a planet is receiving from the star compared to how much energy Earth receives from the Sun.  However, because this planetary system is so nearby, scientists should be able to characterize the atmospheres with future instruments and observatories.  That's one reason why we're so excited about this discovery.  - Natalie Batalha 
Curios as well. I live on the ocean and work on it for a living. I always dread full moons because of the bigger tides.  
That would be a lovely idea.. With the TRAPPIST team, we were more considering using names of the few trappist beers ;) !  J.d.W. 
The problem is that if we do find life on one of them, you can't very well have newscasters say "Life has been discovered on Dopey" with very much gravitas.  
NASA's upcoming James Webb Telescope, launching in 2018, will take over with a much higher sensitivity. It will be able to detect the chemical fingerprints of water, methane, oxygen, ozone, and other components of a planet's atmosphere. Farisa Morales 
Whether or not the planets have an atmosphere, whether or not water vapor is in the atmosphere (indicative of a liquid water ocean), and possibly even signs of life by way of biosignature gases. We will be able to find out if the planets are similar to each other or different. --SS 
The habitable zone is estimated based on the luminosity of the star and recognizing how far away can you be from it such that water can exist in it's liquid form on the surface of a terrestrial planet like the earth.  Too close and the water evaporates; too far and the water freezes solid.  Thus, the habitable zone is independent of whether the planets are tidally locked or not.  Farisa Morales 
Kepler taught us that temperate (i.e. Habitable Zone), terrestrial-sized planets are relatively common in the galaxy.  The name of the game now is to find those near enough for atmospheric characterization.  Of the few dozen Habitable Zone planets that have been detected to date, most are hundreds of light-years away whereas TRAPPIST-1 is just 40 light-years away.  - Natalie Batalha 
There are many possibilities.  You can log into the NASA Planet Quest site and see tools and data bases about the planets as they are discovered.  Try logging into "Eyes on Exoplanets".  JPL, Goddard, and other NASA centers have summer internships and lots going on in the world of exoplanets; this would be a good way for you to get some firsthand experience.  Most NASA scientists like myself have PhDs but have chosen to work for NASA rather than in universities.  You could start in a PhD program...possibly doing your research in direct conjunction with NASA, or working for a professor like Sara Seager who does lots of NASA-funded work on exoplanets.  Following that, try for a postdoctoral position at a NASA center; many good postdocs go on to become regular NASA employees.  I appreciate your interest! Michael Werner 
Yes quite a few of us are. From the NASA HQ library, write a few people went for a big "YES!" to your question ;) J.d.W. 
Hubble can't take images of these planets, but it can do something even better: take spectra. -- NL 
Oh, Reddit. Considering the syntax of this classic question, I'd personally go with one Earth over a hundred. ;-) -- Stephanie 
The fact that the planets are really tightly packed is at the basis of lots of exciting thoughts. First, this allow for material transfer way either than in our planetary system. This means that rocks, and anything on/around them, could be sent/transfer easily from one planet to the next. So if a few of these planets were habitable, we can theorize about the idea of a microbial biomass colonizing different planets, then evolving independently.. Another brilliant thing to theorize about is "how would civilizations evolving with large bodies with way more structures than our Moon crossing their sky would be affected by these bodies, by Space?"..  Possibilities are endless!  J.d.W. 
By "protocol," what we really mean to ask is, "how many shots have you each signed up to do if and when this happens, and what kind?" 
How might an oxygen-rich atmosphere form in the absence of photosynthetic life? 
2030's seems like a long time away. What's the barrier to getting these telescopes sooner? Budgetary, engineering challenges? 
Do we have any idea how the human body would cope with 1.1g?  Would it simply require 10% extra work (probably creating more fit people) or are there more complicated effects? 
Paging /u/ElonMuskOfficial. Forget about nuking Mars man, let's go to one of these planets. 
What if you use hyperdrive? I mean the Millennium Falcon did make the Kessel run in 12 parsecs.... 
And we've invented a bendy stick to shoot other sticks after 190,000 of those 200,000 years. 
And Alpha Centari is about 4.3 LY away, while this is at 40 LY. 40/4.3 = ~9.3. So, this is 9.3x further away than Alpha Centari. If their predictions are correct (20yrs to Alpha Centari), then it should follow that it will take us 9.3x as long to get to this system. 20 \* 9.3 = 186 years. Still a fucking long time, but nowhere near as long as the hundreds of thousand + estimates. 
Is it correct to say, that if they are 40 light years away, they are now receiving our radio broadcasts from 1977 ? 
Interesting. There would probably be some pretty massive winds going from a hot sun face to the cold dark face. I imagine it would be better to be in the penumbra anyways to have some solid ground between you and any big CMEs. 
Are tidally locked planets likely to have an encompassing magnetic field? 
Now imagine those same tides, but a thousand times larger AND the sea is literally lava. 
Why does the moon being full have an effect on the tide? 
Is it likely that any of the TRAPPIST planets have a magnetic field? Can tidally locked planets have a magnetic field? 
How does a telescope detect chemical fingerprints? 
So what you're saying is that there's a real chance that we will be able to confirm or deny with a high probability the existence of life in the TRAPPIST-1 system next year. This is incredible. 
Just 40 light years lol. We better get busy with near light speed capabilities.  
A shot of water would be fitting to celebrate it, right? 
2030 starts in 13 years...thats not long at all ( damn, i feel old suddenly). 
 Hubble was launched in 1990, and its 'replacement' the JWST is launching 28 years later. 28 years after the JWST is ~2046 
Exercise physiology masters student here - great question! For short term, I believe it would just make people more fit. Imagine sedentary individuals going to the gym. They have strength gains far above 10% which the body handles just fine. The only issue I could really see is the heart having difficulties producing the pressure required to pump blood against the planet's gravitational pull across a whole lifetime.  
Man don't blow his wallets on pipe dreams, let's see what we can do to Mars while we wait for warp drives. 
That's really the biggest problem (in my opinion) with space travel and exploration.  We're so impossibly, *unfathomably* far away from anything worth visiting that the idea of actually transporting humans from Earth to those distant points is, well, basically impossible by today's standards.  If we cannot crack faster-than-light travel we might as well be trapped inside a snow globe on a desk wondering what's inside the book we're sitting on.  Even if we do find ways to speed up ships to near-lightspeed (ion engines...?) how exactly are you going to avoid obstacles when you're travelling towards them faster than information *about them* can reach you?  I'm excited about SpaceX+NASA plans for Mars and hopeful for the future of our species away from our pale blue dot but we're quite a ways away from visiting other solar systems. 
Oh god they're getting our disco. If there's advanced life there no wonder they don't want to make contact. 
But then you don't get any energy from photosynthesis.  Sticking in the light has major advantages. 
So how do we get 100 billion year lifespan estimate from something that can't be more than 14B? 
I think it's to do with the wavelengths of the light coming from them 
My great-grandchildren might be able to go there (maybe).  That's pretty fucking rad.  
Would there be any way the government could silence the information? I know NASA is normally extremely open about information, I'm just curious if something this big could be kept under wraps.  
So do you call it the prime directive internally? Please?  
Yeah... Thats the spirit. Not. Don't come party with me. 
What ? 13 years into 2030 ? Did i sleep like last 10 years ? Time is so fast :(( 
So what's the barrier to getting these telescopes sooner? Budgetary, engineering challenges? 
Thank you for reminding us all that even the most brilliant among us can make brain farts.  
So just like Dragonball Z but instead of reaching super saiyan 2, your heart just gives out? 
Furthermore, getting to Mars is seen as a proof of concept/test for going further into space. 
*Even if we do find ways to speed up ships to near-lightspeed (ion engines...?) how exactly are you going to avoid obstacles when you're travelling towards them faster than information about them can reach you?*  That... is a hell of a thought. I had never considered this when imagining ftl travel. 
Not sure a 1-hour 49-minute movie will keep you occupied for that long. 
Well, the response we're not receiving from them now is their reaction to what they saw 40 years ago. And that is the radio waves that left earth 80 years ago. In 1937... Definitely worse than disco.  
It's these trade offs that make me so jazzed to picture what kinds of crazy life forms might evolve on these planets. 
womp wompppp. doesn't mean much, though. could be pre-radio or post radio, or just not use radios. could be microscopic life in a puddle somewhere. who knows.  
But even if they find something, the fastest means of communication we know of would delay any sort of response to minimum 80 years. It's kind of depressing to think of it that way. :( 
For the government to keep incontrovertible proof of alien life from the public it would have to be significantly more competent than it has demonstrated itself to be (I'm talking long term). In addition, it would require that no one - NO ONE - who knew and had access wouldn't blow the whistle. Those in government are still in the end just humans and human nature suggests someone would feel compelled to let the word out.     
For me personally, inside my brain, sure. :) I guess that's very "internal." -- Stephanie 
You're going to get so much oxygen. Maybe you're going to say, "Please, don't give us so much oxygen, Mr President, please, we don't need that much oxygen!" But you're going to have that. 
Now I dont feel so bad about the test I just bombed! 
Pickup line : "Hey baby, i once corrected a NASA engineer." 
Well last time we tried mars, Mark Watney almost died.  
We can probably track and predict the paths of large celestial objects sufficiently enough to avoid them but I can't imagine wanting to take a trip on a craft that can be shredded by a little bit of space dust.  So we can add some sort of future-tech shield system to the list of things we need before hitting up our cosmic neighbors for a cup of sugar. 
Right I mean look.at what the hostile bottom of our oceans have made. 
I wonder if all newly elected presidents make a beeline for particular archived classified documents. 
If the latter is found rest assured I will rub it on my genitalia 
If such intelligent life is capable of receiving radio then they probably would transmit it too, which would have been been picked up by now. I don't think anyone is expecting to find any type of intelligent life on these planets. 
I used to think the government could hide the existence of aliens like in the X-Files. Then I saw what happened during hurricane katrina and realized the government can't do shit. 
I don't about your experiences, but this probably wouldn't work very well.    Girl:  "Oh a know-it all and a show-off.  Bye." 
Would a hypothetical Alcubierre drive solve that? Since space is bending around the ship a possible rogue space rock would never actually touch it. 
I bet you could get through a full game of Civilization too on the way there! 
I often think this also, i mean if i became president id be straight to the classified space section.  
We are literally talking to NASA right now, and you choose to talk about your genitals.  The future is strange. 
Well to be fair there would be a long delay in time for them to receive our message all the way from Earth and then we would need to wait a long time to hear a response back. And anyway, even if it isn't intelligent, any extraterrestrial life would be monumentally important  
Well duh.   How else did Mars get that massive scar across its surface, except by the Earth scraping across it, which killed the dinosaurs and created the asteroid belt?  
Correcting a president on his grammar seems like much less of an accomplishment these days. 
Only to discover they are classified merely because someone did something so stupid that its just too embarrassing to share with the public. 
Even if we found a worm on one of the planets, it'd be one of the greatest scientific discoveries of this millennia if not ever. 
What will it take to make this bill - or any slight variation of it - fuck off for good? 
If Twitter is in support, why is this not on their moments or news feed? 
Why isn't there some kind of rule to prevent failed legislation from being reintroduced so often? 
Am I the only one that noticed that Reddit was suppressing posts about the CISA Senate vote? Of course they let it through to the front page today, a day before the vote, to at least give us some semblance of uncenshoship. A day before the vote gives us little to do anything about it. 
Who are you're main allies in Congress fighting along with you for this cause. We hear often about those who are actively campaigning for CISA etc. but who is with the internet? 
Will this be affecting more than just the U.S.? e.g. will it affect canada? 
Why do they do this? Do they actually think "maybe this time it will work!"?  
This is starting to get annoying as fuck. We already shut down the bill. It's clearly something people don't want. Isn't there such a thing as Double Jeopardy when it comes to passing bills? 
I am sitting in a Q&A at a college with the director of the NSA. What question should I ask as a college student? I have like 10 minutes. 
Senator Wyden,  As one of your constituents, thank you for your opposition to these blatant surveillance bills. The amount of support these bills manage to get without a public outroar is alarming. What can we do to not only prevent this from happening *now*, but to stop these sorts of bills from gaining so much traction in the future? 
I saw that CISA passed the Senate. I am deeply disappointed.  What's next? How can we kill the bill before it continues? And what can I say to my senators? (I'm sad to say that both of my state's senators voted for the bill.) 
As an IT Auditor with CISA certification, every time this shows up on here, it always has me wondering what does Reddit have against Certified Information Security Auditors?    Then I actually read the headline. 
Why would you say this is our one last chance when there have been many bills beforehand? You honestly believe if this gets voted down they won't try again? That's optimistic to the point of stupidity  
I am not trying to undermine your cause, but how do you find the motivation? It seems these bills are like Hydra heads, not to mention the effort needed to cut them off. On top of that, the majority of people willingly wave their privacy on social media while those who don't encrypt their traffic.   Keep fighting the good fight regardless! 
Who rules on these bills? Is it a senate/house committee or judge? This seems like something you could sue all the way up to the supreme court for unreasonable search type of deal.  
Didn't the Senate already pass give the thumbs up to CISA?  What is this new Senate vote about? 
Who are the guys pushing this that I can vote for/against? Is there anyone who has attached their name to this that we can send down with this bill when the time rolls around? 
Why can't we get a bill passed into law stating 'the privacy of the people on the internet shall not be infringed upon' or something like that? 
I read somewhere that the EFF has no actual lobbying power and is just an 'awareness' group- meaning my money is better spent elsewhere. Is this accurate?  
What do you think of the corporate hold of reddit ? 
What is the truth to the assertion in The Hill article today that FaceBook is "secretly" lobbying for this bill? 
Is there really any point at attempting to stop it from happening anymore? All we're doing is throwing money at people telling us to call our senators and the whatnot. It's seems to be hurting us more than helping.   We've beaten it multiple times. It's clearly not going to be lobbied away. I'm now more in favor of letting it pass and then having Congress deal with the repercussions. I refuse to donate any more to any silly groups advocating this until it actually matters. And unfortunately nothing will until they come tooth and nail with the consumers once it is enacted.  Let it happen. It will cannibalize itself. 
So suppose this bill passes. What happens to say, the average guy who occasionally pirates a film/TV episode,browses Reddit and plays computer games? How much would it rock this mans life? Also, what are your guy's  favorite midday snacks to tide yourselves over till dinner? 
I think we can put an end to CISA for good. We just need to kill it so bad that it becomes toxic and no one in Congress wants to go anywhere near it ever again. That's what happened to SOPA, so we know it's possible. The companies behind this would no doubt continue to try to sneak it through in some other form, but making Congress afraid to touch CISA or similar bills would be a huge step in the right direction. 
**I think the only sure-fire way of doing that is to stop electing idiotic puppets into Congress.** 
Also which congressmen/women keep introducing this bill? I would gladly contribute to whoever their opposition is whenever they're up for reelection. We don't need to just strike these bills down we also need to savagely go after whoever is introducing them in the first place. These bills won't stop being proposed just by striking them down, they'll only come up in the wake of tragedies when people aren't paying attention. If we really want to put a stop to this type of legislation we need congressmen to fear the repercussions of ever introducing these bills for a vote. Because as it stands those who introduce these bills know that it will almost never affect their chances for reelection next cycle. 
This happens with pretty much activist movement. People think their entire life should be consumed by an important movement. That's the fastest way for Me to not support your movement 
As you can tell, we think it's important to reach out to folks about pressing issues, especially because email is still one of the most powerful ways to reach people, organize, and open up the political process. Ideally, and we're working on this and I know EFF and others are too, we figure out ways people DO want to help out and be informed about what's happening, like with either a mobile app or other notifications, and to get your specific feedback about what you don't want to hear about and what you do want to hear about. As we're trying to win on some of the biggest issues of the day that must be won and fought on, we have to build a system and movement together, so we hope you'll help us do that by giving us ways that you do want to be in touch and pitch in with contacts to decisionmakers.  
This sentiment is exactly what supporters of this legislation want to hear. They'll keep bringing it up again and again until the public reaches the end of their attention span and stops paying attention all together. I read comments on reddit after the SOPA blackout thing that predicted this turn of events. Now here we are... 
Got the same problem.. not only with them but others groups like avaaz etc.. all my emails were spammed with although important cases it was simply too much.. so one day I decided it must stop and unsubscribed from everything and now I am a bit of aware not to sign any petition or anything where my email address is required because I don't want any spam from any mailing lists. 
The topic is CISA and reddit upvotes this frivolous comment to the top? pathetic... 
Twitter, like most technology companies, is opposed to the bill. 
It seems like we need something like that, though it would be quite the sea change. Right now, they keep bringing back failed legislation and in the last 24 hours of this fight, we really can't risk not signing petitions, calling, tweeting and sharing online like here on reddit (which turns out matter a lot) to make sure we kill this bill first. But, that's why we do need to change the way politics is done and not just money in politics, but open up the political process in millions of ways, including by demanding public accountability every step of the way using online and other means, and building a new kind of political movement that is resilient to the Chamber and other big industry doing this kind of thing, and passing possibly something like you suggest. 
Because people change their opinions, and not every piece of legislation introduced is evil. Where would we be if, for example, marriage equality was brought once 10 years ago, shot down, and never talked about again? 
Wouldn't that require like a constitutional amendment? Might not be a bad idea.    Otherwise I'm not sure how you can pass a law that makes other laws invalid.   Of course the screwy thing about our system is that you can't sue until there are damages.      So unconstitutional laws can be passed, but then they get challenged and repealed I think.      I wish there was some way to reverse that process so that certain laws would have to meet the challenge of constitutionality before being passed and enacted.     
Baldwin (D-WI) Booker (D-NJ) Brown (D-OH) Coons (D-DE) Franken (D-MN) Leahy (D-VT) Markey (D-MA) Menendez (D-NJ) Merkley (D-OR) Paul (R-KY) Sanders (I-VT) Udall (D-NM) Warren (D-MA) Wyden (D-OR) 
For you: - Your information is shared with the goverment - Prevents nothing for you (no proof that the NSA mass surveillance has stopped attacks. - Doesn't force you to do anything  For Companies: - Can break the privacy policy so long as its sharing with goverment - Prevents them from getting sued for the breach of privacy policy by users - Doesn't force them to share???  Other problems: - Hacker gets access to gov PC and they have access to all company data shared - HUGE security problems - People from around the world lose privacy 
Ask him if, in his opinion, proposed "cybersecurity" legislation like CISA would have had any chance of prevent the major security incidents that we've seen over the past few years - the Target, Sony, OPM breaches for example. I believe you'll find his answer enlightening (spoiler: it wouldn't have done anything!) 
Do you mean Admiral Rogers? This is really wonky, but I'd like to ask what percentage of data collected under 702 is from Upstream collection. Last Friday a federal judge cited it as 9%, but that number was from 2011 and I'd like to know if that number is going up or down.  He probably wouldn't have an answer off the top of is head, but it is the question I'd like to know. 
The likelihood is greater if we don't fight back. And even if they do pass it, we're going to make them pass a "surveillance bill". They won't get to sneak it through and pretend it is non-controversial. (Which by the way, they used to claim this bill was non-controversial all the time.) 
As a sysadmin, i hate you for making me do more work  
Unrelated: my name is Will Cook and I am for sex.  
CISA specifically exempts itself from FOIA, so it will be impossible to know what's being shared and what personal information is included. That will make it much more difficult to challenge through the courts.  
Senator Burr and Senator Feinstein have been leading the effort in support of the bill. 
The EFF has lawyers and everything on their payroll and has taken up fights in courts together with other similar organization.  I wouldn't say your money is badly spent by using them on the EFF. 
Why is there reluctance from Google to lend their weight to these causes?  Not as immediately business-destroying dire as SOPA/PIPA? 
Ok so what happens when they just rename the thing to another innocent acronym and hope the Internet doesn't notice? 
Isn't SOPA just back as a part of TPP now, though? Or is that not true? It's kind of hard to tell, there's so much conflicting information...  Sorry to be contrary! Thank you so much for what you do. 
I think we need to proactively lobby for an anti-sopa/cisa law.  Can't we all lobby for it? Just like the big shitty companies? And why aren't we voting for congress reps and shaming the ones  who vote against our interests?  We care, we keep having these threads, lets make one big push to end them all... please? 
Google has been completely silent on CISA.  Given the positive PR they know they could absorb by coming out against it, and the fact that they were supporters of CISPA, you can pretty much assume they're pro-CISA, just like Facebook. 
Yeah, i loved knowing about the shit that actually mattered. I hated hearing every five minutes about basically every political agenda they care about. 
I was tired of seeing emails of "this is terrible" or "the worst thing to happen yet" first thing in the morning, I use my personal email for work also, so when I see these on my iPhone I start thinking "oh fuck what did I do". Just stop with the click bait titles, we are about the cause but just please stop that. 
I think I signed on for their email chain after they did an "email your senator" drive. Every day then on it was blast emails along the lines of "Comcast sees what we're doing, AND THEY'RE SCARED WITLESS" 
Why an app? This seems totally unnecessary and a waste of time/energy/$. Not everything needs an app.  
You pretty much just said you don't care what we think about email we don't want. I would prefer to decide what I think is important and what side of that argument I am on (if any).  *a word 
Monthly newsletters is a much better format.  Tried and tested.  No one likes spam. 
They are hoping that EFF will not learn how to send emails in the appropriate time frames? 
I believe what he is trying to say is that since twitter is opposing the bill, why doesn't he see more negative press about it in the twitter news feed and moments.    
But part of politics is convincing people and one way to do that is with legislation or attempts at it. Think about issues you might agree with that had to come up time and again before they caught on (like, say, gay marriage and marijuana legalization). 
I agree, it seems that the level of precision that people desire is not something that could be written into law very easily. Some issues should be brought up again because they are worth fighting for and others just need to go away. But there's no way of easily distinguishing between the two. 
One alternative would be instead of having a set of criteria that makes something banned from coming up again, make the restriction time based.   Okay, this was rejected, you can't bring it back for two years.. or a year.. or a session. Whatever the decided upon length of time. This would work better for things where people just change their minds over time and also prevent people from just trying to constantly sneak something in. 
The introduction of something that's failed into something unrelated that's likely to pass should be outright illegal and should be prosecuted. 
Is this insinuating that every other representative is actively for CISA or are there some that are just not actively against it. 
I love seeing Paul up there, but sad hes on the only R 
Yeah, they think they can wear us down. The only way to stop this for people to come out so strong against this that it becomes toxic and Congress never wants to touch it again.  
Oh, or about this one: "If China had the exact same capabilities as the United States, would you ask your children to change their personal behavior?" 
Man, you people are worse than the politicians at giving non-answers to direct questions. 
Would you prefer to be called President George W. Cook? 
Cybersecurity information sharing act exempts itself from freedom of information act? How is that even legal? They want info on us but we cant get info on them? 
Because Google is most likely pro-CISA.  They were pro-CISPA as well, but found out the hard way last time that they need to stay quiet about that fact to avoid damaging the misplaced trust many have in them. 
yup, until we start calling the bills by an acronym describing what they're all trying to do, so we can say "IT'S ANOTHER #### BILL! GET IT!!!"  This removes the tool of cognitive distraction/differentiation of "but this bill is completely different, and it has a different name!"  It will make the toxicity mentioned by the OP easier to pull off, give all the toxic a name, and attach it to other toxic to make the whole field of bills in the image of the abyss toxic. 
If I perform badly at my job my boss can come in tomorrow or even call me tonight and tell me I'm fired. We should be able to do the same. 
Really would be great if we had another Wikipedia (SOPA) blackout day or the like.  I know these companies fear becoming political, but they are already in the game and they really have to stand up for privacy + people if they want to our business longterm.  I'd switch off gmail in a heartbeat if there was an equally powerful alternative that didn't data mine.  I'm already off google (duckduckgo) so that is my ad info they are losing out on already. 
That's a pretty big assumption you're making, and you're projecting a lot.  It could just be that they are legitimately undecided on the issue, which isn't that hard to believe for any huge corporation of its nature.  Alternatively, they most likely have partners on both sides of the fence and can't afford to swing in one direction or the other. 
The same thing has happened to me with every political group that is important to me. I have done something like email a senator about an evil bill like this, and instead of just telling me when something similar is happening, I'd get daily emails about random stuff. If I wanted that I'd subscribe to your general newsletter.   Wolf-PAC is the same way. They should have subscription options like get it all vs just get the really important stuff we need you to act on and none of the editorials, or something. otherwise I choose none of it because I don't have the time to read all their specific random articles to make sure there's not something important happening. 
This sort of makes you question whether they're really looking at things in an unbiased way too. I mean do they want to kill every piece of Legislation that has anything to do with the internet, or are they looking at it objectively in what harm it could do? Because we do have real cybersecurity issues. 
Or like someone else suggested, maybe a monthly newsletter? That seems more appropriate and less invasive.  
Some people feel like it's the most seamless (not annoying) way for them to take action, it could be the most efficient way too -- see a notification, look at it, click to take action in one spot. It also means we don't have to depend on so many gatekeepers -- facebook, gmail, commercial email ISP's, etc. That said, we're wary of making something unnecessary and doing this in a lightweight way.  
I even settle for weekly on some email lists. Anything more is overkill and instant unsubscribe though in 99% of cases.  
Yeah as someone who has voted primarily liberal, I loved the shit out of Ron Paul.  
Clearly we need harsh penalties for failed legislation. 
Most recently, they seem to have come out as anti-CISA.  But it's more a whimper than anything. 
Is there not some guidelines to how many times a specific bill could be passed? If SOPA has been refused before, can they technically just reintroduce the bill, try to get it passed on the second try, and so on, or do they somehow have to change it?   And while we're on the topic, any news on the TTIP and / or TPP? Read that Merkel supports the TTIP, but don't see any reasoning behind it. 
how about a SHIT bill - Sifting Hoards of Intelligence Tyranically 
Oh jeez, you *are* really close. Like, less than 2000 close. Sign, people! 
And while it's not really a huge dent for them because of their size and market cap, I did read somewhere that google values each of their users somewhere around $250 each. So if more and more of their user base starts abandoning them as a result of the data mining it will eventually have an impact.  
You might be able to set up your own mailserver. No data mining, and is only $10 a year for a domain. (plus a cheap raspberry pi) 
A monthly newsletter is good for a roundup but it isn't for taking action when it matters, as so much does change. It's something we'll most likely offer when we get a breather (we're smaller and a little younger but we'll definitely tackle this soon)/ We totally don't want to be reaching people who don't want to hear from us, so yeah we hope that only people who want to hear from us are on the list! 
Wow.  That is an insane leap of logic.  EFF sunk their own boat when they decided to spam me with nonsense emails about how the world was going to end if I didnt donate to them. 
I saw a report once where they actually gutted a piece of legislation, kept the same name but inserted new, completely unrelated rules/bills. That should be illegal. 
There's not a lot of great things to say about Kentucky, but to it's credit the state constitution specifically requires bills to have a single purpose and a name that accurately describes its purpose. 
it's a tricky subject, however. Often bills with meaning will get gutted when going through legislation, so the people who originally lobbied/worked for the bill will just try again until they get it through with minimal bullshit (like free riders or becoming a "christmas tree" Bill." 
A lot of these bills contain language which basically grants legal immunity to companies like Google when they share personal information and other private data with law enforcement or other government agencies when there is no warrant or court order issued.  Basically, companies have a natural duty, obligation, and responsibility to protect users' privacy and they are not supposed to be freely sharing user's information without notifying affected users that they will be sharing information unless a warrant or other court order has been issued that legally compels the company to release that information.  In sum, these bills often contain provisions that enable companies like Google to share users' personal information and private data with government agencies in the name of 'security' without legal risk or repercussions.. and that's why a lot of web-based companies support (or are neutral about) these bills because they stand to benefit from legal protections. 
That's missing the forest from the trees. How do we elect representatives that vote in the interest of the people, and not of lobbyists and those who pay lobbyists?  
Isn't moving companies to Ireland a tax loophole of some sort? 
On the other hand, a two or four year waiting period wouldn't be so bad. 
TIL that congressman do not progress past high school mentally 
Enforcement of that would very quickly become another political tool by which to kill a given bill. 
Kill it every two years? If they can successfully do that, they can do it without any exploitation. I mean, the bills *we* want don't get introduced every other month. 
Could uh, could you do something *like* Burnout again?   I mean not Burnout exactly, and certainly not something exactly like Burnout 3 - but I mean, something real close.  
When Sony became heavily involved, did they have any input (or say) on the final product? Is this still completely your vision? 
Hey Sean,  How often do you and your coworkers read /r/nomansskythegame? 
How drunk were you guys in your live stream today? 
Hey Sean, In an old trailer I saw huge snakes/wurms, are those still in the game?   Also have a nice day!  
Are ringed planets still in the game? Love ya Sean! 
Hi Sean,  I've heard rumors of the possibility of an API at some point for at least Atlas data, will that be a thing? 
Do you think our real universe is procedurally generated or perhaps a simulation?  
Can you say anything more about the base-building aspect yet? 
Hi Sean  Did the flood that struck your offices materially affect development? Would NMS have been a different game without it?   Looking forward to tomorrow. I've been waiting for three years. Thank you for your dedication  
Hi Sean, absurdly hyped for NMS! With NMS gaining so much traction - despite its indie status on PS4 it's being given the billing of a major AAA title - would you consider expanding HelloGames into a multi-project studio, or do you prefer more of a Pixar/Naughty Dog single-game style environment? 
How does it feel being the greatest con artist in the 21st century?  
Just curious why I can't get my money back after you straight up lied to me. Preordered the game before I went out of state. Came home to a piece of fuck game and I'm apparently not allowed a refund because it is out of the time frame. I hope you get class action lawsuited out of your ass for literally promising stuff that never came in the game. P.S. Thanks for stealing my hard earned $60. You ingrateful POS probably sitting on a multimillion oceanside mansion with all the millions you stole. So once again. Why did you lie and steal from so many people?    
Will there be random event such as stars exploding or large astroids etc? 
Do you plan for any mod support on PC in the future? 
How does it feel to know your game completely bombed?? 
Ha! remember when you lied a bunch and then never addressed it? Yeah me too, i burned your game and will never purchase another digital or physical piece of content you so much proof read again.  
Given the multi-player connectivity features in the engine (which have very little chance of being used), do you guys have plans to perhaps expand on that side of the game after most people have had a good single-player experience? 
How does it make you feel knowing that you are the reason gamers across the country are waking up tired for work? 
Are you planning on adding gas giants, or any other space elements not currently included in the game?  
A few questions from a uni student looking to get into programming with a compsci major :  1. How the hell do you get from not knowing how to program anything (where I'm at now) and being able to code properly for a game/at industry level? I've been in classes for various programming languages (matlab, Python) and I feel like the only skill I learned was using google and copy+paste, not actually how to program  2. How did you get a job in the industry straight out of uni? The people I know in 3rd/4th year compsci say that finding a good job (like one at EA) is insanely difficult because of the competition+hiring expectations. In a similar vein, what could any compsci student do to set them apart from the rest on a resume so they could get a job straight out of uni?  Thanks for reading, love the game btw and can't wait to play it 
Is it technically possible to cross paths with another player? 
How many of those cupcakes did you eat in June that /r/NoMansSkyTheGame and I sent you?   Who ate the most? :P 
I have a recurring dream that I am back working on Burnout 3. Normally that I'm playing the game, and we've made it so every race ends with a crash junction. Then I wake up in a cold sweat. Games dev does things to you. 
To this day I'd still pay full price for a functional Burnout Revenge port to Steam.  Hell I'd pay for it if the only thing it kept was Crash Mode.  
Sony has been super cool to work with, but mainly just because they haven't been involved in development, you know? We're still sort of the underdog with Sony, and in the general AAA (for obvious reasons). If NMS is a success, I think that probably will have a real impact in terms of how a lot of people in larger publishers view indie games. People generally think of NMS as a Sony title, but we're still just a self funded indie studio - it's kind of a crazy situation :) 
PS4 and PC players are using two different servers. We are running a control experiment to see who names things the most juvenile things... Let the games begin! 
The seed of the universe is the same but i don't think both can meet each other online. 
Some of the team read it for sure, and then post me the weirdest stuff :) OK sso I'll admit there have been times, my lowest on the project, where I've looked at the subreddit and it's cheered me up and kept me going. But there have been times I've looked on there and despaired - and just thought "how can we ever live up to the expectations of people who having been waiting for this game for 3 years" 
Yeah, so everyone thinks we were high or drunk :( Just hadn't eaten today, and am operating on zero sleep.  It's an ok buzz. 5/10. Would not sleep again. 
Oh man, I hate questions like this, because like wouldn't you just rather discover for yourself? Huge creatures are out there, and I haven't seen them on streams yet. They are rare. 
Yes, I've seen them in streams, but they were glitched in the same way you sometimes see fish being glitched. 
One of the people who got it early showed a space worm floating in the sky 
What the hell is going on here? This is one of the fastest rising posts I've ever seen.  
So basically my beard is a disguise. I'm totally going to shave it off when this game is done, and burn every check shirt I own (5?) and hopefully no one will ever shout "No Man's Sky FOV Slider?" at me in the street. ever. again. in. my. life. 
Simulation theory is pretty much confirmed. Fuck this world I'm gonna go live inside the No Mans Sky universe.  
Really hoping for this myself. Elite Dangerous was a whole new game in VR, and NMS seems like a great fit (minus some possible issues with movement on land) 
It could be for sure. We were talking today about just having a twitter bot that tweets discovery names at random. We've just been glued to the screen all day, watching names come in. Game isn't out... but we had like 160k discoveries uploaded today... so... :o 
So Elon Musk asked me this (NAME DROP!). I said if I was Elon Musk, then I'd be pretty sure it was right? Like load up the holodeck with the disk where I get to colonise mars and make self driving cars... So I think he almost certainly is, and then I'm an AI bot I guess? In his simulation? Controlled by a giant AI that's smirking to itself whilst I give this answer.... 
Hahaha, "how nihilistic has the development of No Man's Sky made you?" 
Didn't he release a trailer for the game and then after the flood he said he would have cancelled the game if the trailer wasn't out? 
The reality is that we're still here working on it right now. There's no conspiracy, we're just racing to get all the extra options and stuff we want. PS4 comes out tomorrow and we'll just try to pretend it's a normal work day! Best guess right now is 6pm GMT on Friday, but we'll keep you up to date as we get closer. 
Initially I think we'll all be supporting NMS. But there are other ideas we've got rattling around in our heads too. I think video games is just such a largely unexplored field. There's very few studios that pull off the two game thing, but supporting one game and then kicking off something new - that's doable right?  Sh*t, I just remembered, we've got another thing we're already working on that's unannounced. It's a small experiment, but hopefully you all might like it :)  Maybe we can be the Johnny Depp of studios :D - do a mixture of big stuff and indie stuff? :D 
Whenever devs are tight-lipped, it's normally just because they literally, legally, can't talk about a thing. Man, you would surprised how wrapped up most devs are in contracts and nonesense. Often for instance lots of devs will have a clause that says "you literally can't say the name of platform X". Knowing this it's really funny watching interviews where devs are squirming trying not to the word Wii or whatever when being asked about some industry thing :) - you see us say things like "well the thing about supporting... that particular console is..." 
I know you're trying to prove a point and everything, but I would love being the best con artist of the 21st Century tbh. 
Hope so, but you would probably be forced to play offline if that was the case. 
He made more then $45m I don't think he considers it bombed 
If not full multi-player, are you at least considering ways for you to "find your friends" in-game? 
you mean disappointed that they spent $60 or more on a shitty game that was sold to them on lies? 
He has stated on previous interviews that there would not be gas giants.  
Does "Lazy Generation" play on repeat in your dreams? 
Unsure what you worked on in BO3, but that's seriously the best racing game ever made.  I skipped so many college classes my soph year to play it. 
Won't informing us of the experiment bias the results? 
Hey Sean,  How often do you and your coworkers read the Steam forums for No Man's Sky?  ^please ^stay ^away ^theyre ^dangerous 
Did...did you guys eat? We'll order you some pizza if you need it.  
This game has been injected with liquid hype since it has been announced, and it's release date has been pushed back several times, making people extremely eager to play it.  
My god, it wasn't just you... the plaid was getting more intense too 
If anyone does have a suggestion for new look, I'm totally open to that. Beard and check shirts is pretty much all I got... same as everyone else who works in games :) 
HOLY SHIT. Do you know the scope of how many players have contributed to that? That's a massive number for the game not even being out. Please tweet what the first day discoveries number is, I'm curious to see how many millions it hits. 
The tweet bot may be a mistake... depending on how many of the names are silly  
I don't think we're in a simulation, at least not one overseen by any entity. There are too few people named Cockhammer for it to be true.  
The game *at worst* will prove that an indie developer can make a game that not only looks like a AAA title, but also takes risks that only the indie game sector is willing to do.  It looks god damned impressive and I cant wait until Friday! 
He said they probably would have cancelled the game if the trailer wasn't shown and there wasn't such a positive response. They actually asked Geoff Keighley to pull it from the show last minute, but he insisted on leaving it because he believed in the game and fought really hard to get them the spot on stage. 
I'll tell you a funny story about PC. I was here late yesterday, and I had to take a break and do an interview with Playboy (!) - and the guy was like "what are you working on when you go back downstairs?" and I was like "compatibility for ATI opengl drivers", and he said "ummm.... could you make something up. That sounds pretty nerdy". I always knew I wasn't Playboy article material :) 
So good at wasting our time!  We are the lazy generation!  We are the lazy generation, now!! 
i 100%ed that game so many times because people kept overwriting my saves. The only negative to that game is you can't easily tell which save slot is already used when starting a new game.  All I want is a pc version, please please please! 
The only three racing games I know of worth playing are Carmageddon, Mario Kart and Burnout.  Everything else is just a tech demo based around driving. 
Yeah but marketing isnt for free - if you look at development vs marketing costs you see the second one is mostly always the biggest issue on AAA titles 
Considering that the first footage i saw of NMS was on the Late Show with Stephen Colbert, i'd say that they did more than what people are used to. 
Redditers reading this post might make up a few percent of the players at most. Within a statistical anomaly most likely. 
(we'll order you more pizza than you know what to do with!) 
I'm with you there. One of my favourite things about Minecraft was just being able to pop my headphones on, chill the fuck out, and explore a procedurally generated world. I was sold the moment I found out NMS is a single-player focused exploration game with entire planets to explore. I predict many a rainy night with scotch and this game. 
The best book, seriously people, if you haven't read it, make sure you do. 
And the dude with the steady job is the most comfortable too. Look - no shoes, no jeans. Sure, his shirt is a little bit ripped but that's ok. 
Ever seen Grandma's Boy?  JP had a pretty sweet trench coat  
I don't know you or Sean from the hole in my wall, but any chance I can third wheel this shit?   
Gamedev is a weird thing, it messes with your head, because you are trying to impress a ton of people, and you start having doubts, and they don't really stop. 
Who knew it was possible to go below absolute zero?  Does the camera begin to wrap around backwards? 
Do you know which issue? I'm really looking forward to seeing your centrefold. 
You can polish a turd with enough marketing and have a successful launch.   
Well, he's focusing on the product.  Basically, a programmer only has to look nice for interviews. 
It would take 585 billion years to go to every restaurant, which is how long it takes for my wife to pick a place. 
I'm looking to get into this human centipede as well. 
Doesnt help whenever someone that doesnt like your game has to tell you why they dont like it.  Not that feedback isnt bad, but some people are half vitriol and narcissism.  
Does she walk? Does she talk? Does she come complete? 
Its similar with movies, on the plus side - this is the reason Independent Game Studios can exist - they can pull out a great game with guerrilla marketing and make a fine profit (best example is probably early minecraft) 
That was the most interesting article I've read today... 
# INSUFFICIENT DICKS FOR MEANINGFUL ANSWER   -HarambeVac  
So sad that there are kids today that were born into the wait for 2+1 
Bill, what was it like collaborating with Tyler, the Creator for the theme song for the new show? What made you choose him initially? Do you have an ongoing friendship with him?  
Thanks so much for being here. Any chance of working with Disney again on the Energy pavilion at EPCOT? Lots of people would love to see an update based on everything we know about the subject now as opposed to twenty years ago - especially if you had something to say. 
Hey Mr. Science guy! I grew up watching your show and it definitely influenced my path towards engineering.  My question is what science fact absolutely blows your mind?  
Bill, What are your thoughts on Elon Musk and what he is doing for the scientific world through Tesla and SpaceX? 
Hey Bill Nye! I am a 6th grade Science Teacher in Florida (currently in the middle of class) and my students want to ask you.. What was your most favorite episode you've ever created? Also, when did you discover your love of science? Finally, is there any advice you can give to a 6th grader to get involved in the sciences beyond the classroom?   
Hi Bill, thanks for doing this - I've got a question, I know that maybe it's not specifically in your field, but I would still appreciate your thoughts as someone trying to "save the world".  To what extent do you envisage automation replacing common jobs anytime soon, on a large scale? If this is accomplished do you think it will be a current player (amazon/google/tesla), something completely left-field no one expected, or a community effort from thousands of small to medium sized enterprises working together?  Thanks! 
First, thanks for making science class so great in middle school. I still have that theme song stuck in my head.   What is our worst case scenario assuming nothing gets done to save the world and what does the timeline look like? How much is my life going to be affected? My kids? I know we need to do something, but what if it doesn't work out?  
Hey Bill, what's your take on  our chances of becoming a multi-planetary civilization in the foreseeable future? 
Hey there Bill!  Was curious, what was your favorite episode of the old Bill Nye the Science Guy show?  There must have been one episode you did that stood out to you more than others. 
We've heard the chant of your name even wayyy over here in New Zealand. :)  Just a small question. Favourite astronomy point in the night sky? 
Hi Bill,  With the march for science coming up on April 22, many scientists are hesitant to march because they fear it will politicize science.   What are your thoughts on politicization of science? Will you be marching? 
Hey Bill,   What are your thoughts on animal agriculture and the promotion of a vegan diet as to reduce our impact on climate change? 
Where do you shop for ties?  I grew up in a bow tie family. I want a Bill Nye Science Guy Signature Bow tie! 
Hey Bill,  Do you think your TV show has helped or hurt the messages you're trying to spend? Does your reputation make people listen or tune out? 
Hi Bill!! You're doing great work.  My questions for you are:  What is your favourite element and favourite subatomic particle?  What scientific mystery do you most want to solve? 
Bill Nye! My AAAS membership led me to the IDP Career Test at ScienceCareers.org. I am 27 years old and am finally considering a college education. My top result is "Science Education for non-scientists" of which I believe you have ample experience. How would you suggest entering this career field? Would any specific college major help or will any science based major suffice? Would you ever consider letting an individual, such as myself, job shadow you for a couple days? Lastly, do you plan to attend this year's StarTalk Saturnalia party? I'm also a member of the Planetary Society and have to thank you and your team for your science advocacy! I look forward to watching "Bill Nye Saves the World"; keep up the great work!  Bonus Question: Have you heard of "The Show About Science" Podcast run by 6 year old (Yes only 6!) Nate Butkus? I would love to hear you interviewed on his show! You have been an inspiration since my youth; I know you'd inspire him also. 
What is the best way a normal person can make a positive impact in their daily life for global climate change? 
Actually, I have a big question for you!   I'm sure you still very clearly remember your debate with creationist Ken Ham. I'm a Christian, but personally do not agree with his views on creation.   I'm more of a Christian scientist in that I chalk up the creativity of science to God. He's responsible for the Big Bang billions of years ago, he's responsible for the creativity behind evolution, and all of the stuff that makes science so awesome are like his fingerprints.   Now you, as the awesome scientist that you are, do you think that there is any room in science for that line of thinking? Has it ever crossed your mind that there may be a higher power at work? I won't take offense at your answer.  
What do you think about the lack of Scotland players in the British Lions squad for the New Zealand tour? 
Hey Bill , I mean no disrespect but why are there so many stories of you being an asshole to people in public??  
Oh we hang out all the time. He comes by The Planetary Society; we talk about the cosmos and our place in space. 
Not my choice. Please ask the Disneynians to refresh the ride. It was a fun job. It was sponsored by Exxon, while they still owned a division that made bearings for wind turbine generators, and before their climate denial documents from 1977 were discovered and published in the New York Times. I'd love to do a new show though. 
You and I are made of the same material as the stars. We are star dust. Therefore, you and I are at least one way that the universe knows itself. Cue the spooky music. 
He and is companies are shaking things up in a great way. Some disclosure, he served on the Board of The Planetary Society for a while, but has had to recuse himself as SpaceX became Yuge. (I gave him a ride to the airport once.) The Tesla outperforms conventional gas-powered cars (as does my new all-electric Chevy Bolt). If the reused lower stage of the Falcon rockets proves profitable, it will change space exploration in great way. Go Elon! (He's an immigrant to the U.S., bt-dubs.) 
Dang it Bill, it's only been an hour, I wish this one could've been answered. 
Why do I feel like he doesn't like to talk about the show 
Self-driving vehicles seem to me to be the next Big Thing. Think of all the drivers, who will be able to do something more challenging and productive with their work day. They could be erecting wind turbines, installing photovoltaic panels, and running distributed grid power lines. Woo hoo! 
Go for it! People seldom regret what they do; they, or we, regret what we don't do! 
The quality of life for people everywhere will go down. There will be less food and less clean water available in the developed and the developing world. It's reasonable that this will lead to conflict: more violence, more war. Here in the super-developed US, people will have to abandon homes in Miami, Galveston, Norfolk, and other coastal towns. It will lead to defaulted mortgages and people looking for jobs inland. Where will those jobs come from? Sooner we get to work the better. 
Infinitesimal. If you think you want to live on Mars, try living in the dry valleys of Antarctica for a few years. And to play fair, you have to bring your own air to breathe. Inhaling the local atmosphere on Mars would kill you in an instant. You'd never go outside, not really. You'd live in some dome, and when you go out, you have to be in a spacesuit, which is just another dome, only really tight fitting. Oh, and there is absolutely nothing to eat. 
Thanks for your support. I don't have a favorite (favourite). Saturn is beautiful. And, I am fond of the Earth's Moon. 
People seem to afraid of politicizing science a lot lately. I agree to an extent - science should not be a political issue as it is really just our best gauge of reality.   However, in recent decades, science has been under attack and forced into being a political issue. It is not our choice whether or not this happens, it's happened already.  Our best course of action is to defend science since it is constantly under attack by ignorance, closed-mindedness, and bull-headed paranoia. It's very important that we defend science. 
Plant-based diets are the future. I look forward to food preparations that are not "derivative bits," as we say in comedy writing. Instead of "coconut bacon," for example, I hope there is just delicious stand-alone coconut preparations. Cooking is a competitive business. I look forward to the emergence of new plant-based dishes. 
And do you think stem cell meats have the potential to reduce our impact as well ? 
Dont let Bills non response distract you from the fact that the Atlanta falcons blew a 28-3 lead in the super bowl 
This is the question I want answered most.  I always looked up to this guy and believed he was a true "Science Guy" until that video.  I hope it was a joke video because he doesn't like the Patriots or something.  That would be far less heart breaking than Bill not knowing or understanding something as simple as the Ideal Gas Law. 
I hope people coming of age have a respect for the process of science in part because of my show(s). If not, I guess I've failed, but I did and continue to do my best. Checkout Bill Nye Saves The World, which starts on Friday on Netflix. There are 13 episodes. Binge 'em, and turn it up loud! 
Favorite element? Don't have one, but I am fond of the compound water. In fact, now that I've sipped it, I don't think I could live without it. Subatomic particle? Not sure, but I'd sure like to know if there are particles associated with dark matter. Darkons? 
Be sure you can do algebra. It is a key to success in a technical field. I work in a writers room these days. If you want to do what I do now, look for a job as a television writer. Thanks for being a member of The Planetary Society. We advance space science and exploration. Let's know the cosmos and our place within it! 
Pick up trash. Especially around water sources. Although to be honest I'm not sure if that'll help climate change. But it'll help something :) 
I can't, no one can, prove there is no higher power. It's the age-old philosophical point that one cannot prove a negative. Whether or not there is a higher power, there is no question that the Earth cannot possibly 6,000 years old. Teaching kids that idea is bad for our future. But worse, is teaching kids that the Earth is cooling rather than warming. All this is made possible in Kentucky by their having elected a creationist governor, who appointed a creationist cabinet, which was in turn enabled by a creationist judge. In any other state or commonwealth, the non profit businesses run by Mr. Ham would be in  conflict with out First Amendment. it will take years to undo the wrong-headed teaching of the kids in the Commonwealth. But the longest journey begins with but a single step. Thanks for writing. If you are really in touch with a Higher Power, ask her or him to straighten these Kentuckians (and immigrant Australian) out. 
For us on the outside, it has always been a bit of mystery that Scotland has separate teams from Britain. Carry on. 
As someone that has met Bill in real life, I thought he was a nice dude.  At the same time, you have to remember that:  * "Bill Nye the Science Guy" is a character he performs for an audience.  That's not who he is 24/7.  * He's an intelligent guy that deals with a lot of memeish behavior from his adoring fans, which must get tiresome.  * I could be mistaken on this one, but I think he cares MUCH more about pushing his agendas forward than he does about maintaining his celebrity status.  If he could magically trade in his celebrity for progress on reversing the changes of global warming, I think he'd do it in a heartbeat.  Normal actors are the other way around- they put up with your bullshit so they can still be famous. 
Traditionally, we hired people to be President, who had some experience in government. So, I'm probably not the right guy for the job. I hope more and more of us can now see that governing is not the same as running business, or trying to run a business. The government cannot declare bankruptcy six times, for example. A U.S. president is not like a king. He or she cannot decree laws unilaterally. It takes consensus, and that is generally not quite the same as a negotiation for a piece of property. I hope more and more of us can see that governing is more complicated than closing a single business deal. 
We have all these stupid reality shows, but somehow we don't have a show about Bill Nye and Tyler the Creator talking about the cosmos 
Do you ride bikes with him?  You probably should, I've heard it is pretty fun. 
Hands down the best Disney ride when you need a half hour to sit and chill. 
I understand KFC offers some funding for science-based rides. 
We are star dust... we are golden... and we've got to get ourselves back to the garden  I love that song 
What did you two talk about when you gave him a ride?  
I don't think I've ever see someone write out "BTW" that way before. 
I knew this would be a commercial, I did not think it would be a car commercial.  
How much did Chevy pay you to drop that advertisement?  
Probably because a lot of folks remember him for it, making it his crowning achievement. The guy is brilliant with lots of influence, but can be dismissed by peers as the "kids show scientist".  At least until all the older scientist retire and the only ones left are the generations that grew up with Bill! 
I work in a produce brokerage. We're very interested in the progression of self-driving big rigs. It's exciting to watch the technology unfold.  
They _could_, but in the real world, as it is currently set up, they'll actually go and starve to death in the streets.  We should probably do something about that... 
We're fast approaching a point where we might have more people than available jobs, when that comes does the government play a role in supporting its populace who are now out of a job? 
Just like horses were able to take on more challenging and productive work after cars replaced carriages and buggies 
How do you plan to reach out to those in rural or underdeveloped communities in the nation and worldwide to educate them on conservation? Despite the fact that corporations and companies are the biggest polluters, things change when millions of people decide to put a common cause above the individual selves. 
What specifically kills you instantly when inhaling in Mars' atmosphere? 
I don't understand +- 2%? 100% percentages of what? What are they equivocating? How can we bring our Republican brothers along on an issue that should be non-partisan 
And yet whenever i mention veganism and why its good in a civil way on reddit, i get downvoted to shit. Its as if no one even reads what i have to say.  
The initial reports from the NFL were very misleading, saying the footballs were found up to 2 pounds underinflated and all that. The reality is until a proper experiment was conducted with controls, reliable pre-game check figures, and simulated conditions the gauge readings immediately reported on aren't meaningful to make that sort of conclusion.  MIT and others had the chance to take their time as more information came our to make their conclusions. Nye and Tyson and others basically just gave their thoughts when the story broke and was in its firestorm stage. It wasn't sound scientific commentary. If anything it was a chance to cash in on some free publicity.  
I don't know how your show could have possibly hurt the message that SCIENCE RULES. Carry on my dude.  
Thank you Bill for the reply! I've always been good with Mathematics; it's comforting to know it will help! I currently do freelance work as a writer for supplementary income and because it is fun! I'll have to talk with some of my connections who are television and screen writers; thank you again for the tip!  
Entertainingly enough, I live in Kentucky now, and it is very one-minded here. Makes a lot of things very difficult! Thanks for answering! 
Or rather why do we in the UK usually get to field 4 independent teams, rather than compete as the UK in most team-based competitions? :) 
I don't think there's conflict between "not being an asshole" and "wanting to change the world" though. A lot of stories about him are in the category of cursing at kids and being a mean person even before he was famous, rather than "Bill Nye didn't want to pose for a picture or talk to a total stranger and is therefore like Hitler except worse." 
I think it is. Love me some Tyler, and he's an odd dude. Doesn't party. Doesn't drink, doesn't smoke, still lives at home with his Mom and sister. So I can DEF see him doing stuff like this in his spare time.  
I read this in my head in his voice..i've heard recordings of him speak and he has a way about him. 
And then you start to wonder if free will even exists. 
It's oddly fun to say out loud if your friends won't judge you (They will) but at least you can now say Bill Nye says it that way. (BT-dubs, they'll still totally judge you.) 
I can't believe someone would just sell out like that. It's giving me a headache, I'm going to need a Nuprin... little, yellow, different. 
Definitely an intentional plug, but even if he was paid (or given the car for free) it was probably because he is happy to drive an all-electric car. 
So, I've always wanted to be a truck driver, haven't gotten a CDL yet, how fucked do you think my dream is? 
Yeah, what a disappointing response. "Hooray! These advancements theoretically could lead to improvement in quality of life for all, but due to the death of the social contract will in fact lead to worse livelihoods for everyone except a select few who accumulate greater profits!"  /u/sundialbill do you have any thoughts at all on the need for **policies**, and not just technologies, that can help us reach the utopian vision you lay out?   Someone with your cultural cachet could help to make this dialogue more mainstream. 
Well, there plenty of room for SOME work. So many people work 40-80 hours a week and that's just ridiculous but completely necessary when your getting paid next to nothing why don't we spread the load and the resources?  
At least war horses were replaced by trucks and tanks. 
No that's too generous the entire answer is now wrong -5pts 
A lot of the concern right now with lab-grown is they're perhaps further off than people assume, they'll come with a higher price barrier than traditional meat, and at least right now, they don't taste as good according to some preliminary reports.   Also, from an animal welfare standpoint, the meat-protein based ones still require animal stem cells to be harvested, so they're not technically vegan, and still require a degree of livestock.  
Also a Kentuckian. But I'm lucky enough to live in Louisville, so it may as well not be Kentucky. 
Doesn't party *anymore*. In high school he wasn't allowed back to my friend's house because he and some friends made a promethazine smoothie in her blender. But who *hasn't* done that at a party tbh. 
We are primordial sound  Outward and in  Omnidirectional  We are existence 
ME TOO!   Fuck yes, Prog Metal on a Bill Nye thread. This entire album is pure gold.  
I'm always a big sucker for harmony, but JM in this case. It's so much more vulnerable and meditative. You? 
Shit I'd do a plug in every comment for a free electric car.  
Drive a big rig tow truck so you can tow the computerized trucks that break down. We'll always need tow trucks. 
What social contract are you talking about that died?  
It's often cheaper to employ one person to work 60 hours than it is to employ two people to work 30 hours.  
Yeah, because the Iraq invasion was great for the US economy... 
An entire question only worth 5 points?  What is this multiple choice? 
Do Kentuckians call your area "Kentuckiana" or is that just Hoosiers talking about Evansville?  
It may be my all time favorite album. I hear they're working on a new one though! 
As someone who has worked in transportation for many years (big rigs) I can tell you that truck drivers do much, much more than drive. The problem solving and critical thinking needed to deal with the issues that arise everyday will not be automated any time soon. We in the industry envision it becoming more like a commercial jetliner. The autopilot does most of the work but the pilot is still an absolute necessity.  
But the driving will be automated. He'll just be a tow truck attendant.... 
Put fewer questions on the test so that when someone gets 1 wrong a full  letter grade drops 
Evening?! If you're trying to finish all the countries, it can take all day...depending on who's in your group. 
BILL Bill ^bill ^^bill ^^^bill Bill ^^bill ^bill BILL **BILL NYE THE SCIENCE GUY** 
Can you elaborate on that? I'm very curious about the day-to-day of being a driver, but I haven't run into much reading material about it. What sort of issues arise every day that can't be automated? 
I'm sorry, but I don't agree. Issues that arise are mostly caused by human error, no? 
What do you think has improved life the most in poor countries in the last 5 years? 
Hi Bill, my question: Is there anything in life that you regret doing or not doing?  
Hello Mr. Gates,  2015 will mark the 30th anniversary of Microsoft Windows. What do you think the next 30 years holds in terms of technology? What will personal computing will look like in 2045? 
Although you are a billionaire do you sometimes buy generic products over brand-name ones? If so, what are the products that you buy? 
What do you think about life-extending and immortality research?  
Hello Mr. Gates, I admire the work you've done to eradicate diseases such as polio from the world. What can we do as citizens to help keep these diseases gone for good? 
Hi Bill, what is a life lesson you learned the hard way? 
Dear Mr Gates,  What is your internet download speed? ;) 
As there are so many great philanthropic causes, how did you and Melinda decided on the causes that you wanted to put the majority of your effort?  
Hi Mr. Gates! Thanks so much for coming back again, I missed your last 2 AMAs.  What do you think is the hardest challenge that the Bill and Melinda Gates foundation is currently facing? 
Hi Bill!   I was watching a video last night on Thorium reactors and saw that you were also in the video discussing this topic as well. This is a technology that I have been following because it makes so much sense.  My question is,  how feasible is the technology at this point in your view and how long before we will see that technology in practice here in the US?   Side note,  thanks for being there.  You are an inspiration to all of us geeks and nerds from the 70s and 80s. :)    
Hi bill!  First off, thanks for being an awesome human being!!! But onto my question:  What innovation has been brought to you but sadly never worked out for what ever reason, but you really wanted it to work?  Thanks! And keep being awesome! 
Regarding the video of you drinking the ... uh.... poop water, how long will it take to put something like that into a community where they can start seeing immediate results? And if I totally missed it, where are they currently setup and what kind of benefits has it already provided. Besides clean drinking water, that is. 
What is your opinion on bitcoins or cyptocurency as a whole? Also do you own any yourself? 
One of the themes in this year's Gates letter is helping to improve agricultural practices in Africa. As a person who was raised in an agricultural community in Canada, the ideas you presented really resonated with me. As individuals, is there anything we can do to help Africa achieve food security? 
Mr. Bill Gates, what is your favorite expensive food? 
Hello, Mr. Gates!   Over the last few years, several entrepreneurs (Elon Musk, Richard Branson, etc.) have launched ventures involving space exploration. Do you have any plans to get involved in this industry? 
Hi Bill. What's your favorite spread to put on bread? 
What is the silliest thing you ever bought that was expensive? 
Can you please release the source code for Windows XP and Direct3D under the BSD license? 
Vaccines make the top of the list. Being able to grow up healthy is the most basic thing. So many kids get infectious diseases and don't develop mentally and physically. I was in Berlin yesterday helping raise $7.5B for vaccines for kids in poor countries. We barely made it but we did which is so exciting to me! 
I would probably be a researcher on AI. When I started Microsoft I was worried I would miss the chance to do basic work in that field. 
I am pretty basic when it comes to clothes and food. My big splurge is having a plane to fly around in.   I play tennis so I invest in shoes and racquets to help but they don't make a big difference. 
It seems pretty egocentric while we still have malaria and TB for rich people to fund things so they can live longer. It would be nice to live longer though I admit. 
Bill gates has one thing on his bucket list "not to die" . 
Polio eradication is a big focus for me. Our last case in Africa was 6 months ago and we are hoping no more show up. It takes over a year to be sure. We still have cases in Afghanistan and Pakistan. Until we get rid of it there it can spread back to other countries. Pakistan is starting to take this seriously including the army and the government. They need to do the same things that were done in Nigeria. The Taliban makes it very difficult. They have killed women going to vaccinate kids many times.   
Don't stay up too late even if the book is really exciting. You will regret it in the morning. I am still working on this problem. 
We have some tough scientific challenges like an HIV cure.  However the toughest thing is helping teachers learn from the best teachers. There are great teachers and the kids who get them are lucky. We should be able to spread those skills but the current system doesn't do it very well. 
Right now there isn't enough R&D going into safe and cheap nuclear energy. I am supporting Terrapower which has a 4th generation design that looks good. It doesn't use Thorium - it uses the 97% of Uranium that normally can't be used for a reactor by breeding and burning. This means fuel will always be cheap. There are a lot of innovations but the key one is that it is far far safer than anything today - not relying on human operators. 
It is safe for now! It is also a lot of fun and helps shape your thinking on all issues to be more logical. There is a prospect for change in this area for the next generation but that is true for most fields and understanding how to program will always be useful. 
The day we see OSes program completely new APIs for themselves will be a scary day indeed.    
So far we have not being able to use technology to connect people to the needs of the poorest in countries that are far away to tap into their empathy. I think this can be done but it needs some missing creativity. 
Sauce. Lots of sauce. I always spill a bit so I avoid BBQ before TV appearances. 
Bitcoin is an exciting new technology. For our Foundation work we are doing digital currency to help the poor get banking services. We don't use bitcoin specifically for two reasons. One is that the poor shouldn't have a currency whose value goes up and down a lot compared to their local currency. Second is that if a mistake is made in who you pay then you need to be able to reverse it so anonymity wouldn't work.  Overall financial transactions will get cheaper using the work we do and Bitcoin related approaches.  Making sure that it doesn't help terrorists is a challenge for all new technology. 
Nathan Myhrvold has some amazing modern cuisine stuff that is super tasty. I am not a foodie but his new concoctions are amazing.   I also like Thai and Indian food but it doesn't have to be expensive. 
Mr Bill Gates is busy making Earth a better place for us to live in. He got no time for that funky business mister. 
This is an easy question. I am good friends with Paul Allen who owns the Seahawks and I live in Seattle. The playoff game was amazing to watch. Go Seahawks! 
Technology doesn't make people less intelligent, it makes stupid people not anonymous. 
Every department is his department. Without him there would be no departments.  I want a new AoE, too. 
Age of Empires II is in the top five greatest achievements of mankind. 
Mr. Gates, please reply to this. It is important. I would spend all the money I had on a new Age of Empires. From an economics standpoint, we would both benefit. Say I spend $40 on the new game. That is $40 of revenue, with a net benefit of something that would be determined later. From my side of the purchase, I have a net benefit of close to $60, because I would be willing to pay $100 for the beautiful game, and I only payed forty. We really want this game! Please? 
I won't have time for all of these. My book reports show up on www.gatesnotes.com   The Hololens is pretty amazing. Microsoft has put a lot into the chips and the software. It is the start of virtual reality. Making the device so you don't get dizzy or nauseous is really hard - the speed of the alignment has to be super super fast. It will take a few years of software applications being built to realize the full promise of this.  If you study programming and biology and see how the programming can help biology you will stay out on front! 
Thanks for the response, any specific reason for wishing you could learn those three in particular?  
Ah I think this was aimed at the one about what he'd do if Microsoft hadn't worked. 
Bill Gates making technical errors puts my mind at ease.  
When you say you "invest" in shoes and racquets, are we talking a pair at a time or in the company who makes them? ;) 
Thanks for the reply! It is nice to know that even billionaires are okay with using generic products. 
Are you going to put yourself in a casino basement, and become a talking computer? 
What kind of person would get matched to give Bill Gates a gift and not take that opportunity?! 
no known case of polio on the whole continent of africa in the last 6 months?   That's amazing!  Keep up the good work! The world needs more people like you and your wife. 
What does the Taliban get out of killing women and children on their way to get vaccinated?  
I hope you see this, but you likely won't...  As a recent bioengineering graduate, how would I become a part of this?  
"...But mo^o^o^om, even Bill Gates stays up late playing minecraft." 
Also, no matter what field you choose, automation can be a risk, but at least programmers have the advantage of being the ones needed to help develop and maintain their (and everyone's) replacements. 
No, it will get scary when they document their own APIs. Then they will have surpassed humans. 
Better change your passwords and/or secret answers now.  
?? Did you just say that one of your favorite cooks/chefs is a former Microsoft Employee?? 
This is the difference between powerful people and celebrities - celebrities have the players of the club as friends, powerful people have the owners as friends... 
Like how will smith explained he was a weird kid in his teenage years but there was no internet for the world to know ho weird he is 
This. If Bill Gates comes to your department requesting a new Age of Empires, you make him another Age of Empires. 
 Thank you so much for answering! I really appreciate it! :D 
the crowd reactions make that video pretty great, you can hear how shocked they were that he could speak any Mandarin at all 
Seeing as Microsoft was his third software company and the first two did fail, I suspect he would have started a fourth software company. 
Basement? Wasn't he all the way up in the tower (or are you referring to a server located in the basement, and not his body?) 
Or at the top of one, protected by a bunch of Securitrons? 
Heifer International was probably wondering why there was a 25$ donation in Bill Gates' name. 
Thank you :D I spent a good week non stop making it for /u/bfarnsey to give to Bill! I was worried it didn't make it but it did! 
And now those that ripped into the Santa feel like a dick. 
A simple card even...  You know, with full name, address and phone number in case he needs a friend to throw money at? (even though he gives away a lot as it is) 
Honestly I find it somewhat endearing that even the best of us can get internet-snubbed sometimes. Makes me feel sympathy even for Lord DOS 
If there were more Gates-like people in the world...The level of expansion, knowledge, and understanding would be unfathomable.  
Why do you think Microsoft bought Minecraft? **EDIT**: rhetorical question, people.  
Ah yes, when the machines do something that humans would never do. 
"To run this world domination, you need to upgrade to Sky.NET Framework 4.0"   At this point you realize that your IT department didn't give you admin rights 
Among many, many other super interesting things/accomplishments, Myhrvold wrote the Modernist cuisine, which sits on many chefs and foodies bookshelves. Its a beautiful, well researched foray into ultra modern cooking techniques and the classical background they came from. Includes a variety of recipes for people who want to experiment at home.  
I keep thinking that, but then I remember that the gold itself is for Reddit servers and the recipient gets to feel like their comment meant something to someone. 
Even if your department is only responsible for replacing broken office equipment, you make him a new Age of Empires. 
To be fair, it's been less than 15 months since the latest expansion. 
Just to add: They cheer because he is speaking Chinese, not because he is speaking Chinese well.  They are happy that he actually tried learning their language. According to some people who were there and several Chinese friends, they couldn't understand half of what he's saying. 
Yes, that stupid carriage! And cowardly Sextus stuck in the tree.. I always thought Marcus was kind of a douche.       Also, I just tried composing a response in Latin but all I could do was remember -bam -bas -bat -bamus -batis -bant... 
MS needs to release the MCC on PC so we can make a mod that replaces cortana with Clippy in the games 
Though, let's be real, that's not how he keeps himself rich.  He could own a ferris wheel and 25 cars and not even know it.  It's how he keeps himself HUMAN. 
HOLY SHIT HOW COULD WE NOT SEE THIS?! Bill Gates ***IS*** Mr. House 
"If that implies a nuclear holocaust, I'd rather not." 
Can they be reprogrammed into agreeing with everything I say? 
You took an elevator down from the penthouse to the basement.  
In past AMA's he said he has owned every Apple product.  
If I got Bill Gates that is exactly what I would send him. Expensive joke, but worth it. 
"Billionaire my *ass*, John, look at this! Bill Gates gave us $25! Did he forget some zeroes or something? Sheeeeit." 
"Omg, how did my paypal information end up in there? Craziness." 
"I'm really enjoying this Minecraft game, I think I'll buy it."  "But... don't you already have it?"  "You misunderstand." 
No machine will ever document.  "Eh fuck it, the next self aware program will figure it out. Time to go look at some sweet robo porn." 
Warren does not like to spend money on frivolous things.  
If I was the janitor and Billy G asked me for AoE4, I'd immediately find the nearest office, shove the person there out, and start learning to code.  
Exactly! I always thought that was so funny, I know a girl that's kind of hippy-like, and she constantly is talking about evil conservatives not believing in climate change or whatever. But then she talks about natural medicine and the horror of GMO's and vaccines. It's all quite funny to me. 
Chinese guy here.  His Mandarin is heavily accented, but I found it kind of endearing. 
Holy shit, you just tapped into memories I thought were long gone. Like 15+ years gone. Incredible. 
"Melinda, is this your ferris wheel in the foyer?" "I thought it was yours, Bill." "I don't... I don't remember buying a Ferris wheel though." 
I would.  1: you get to see the competition's best. 2: he can totally afford it. 3: his company bought out apple from bankruptcy in the early 90's so that they weren't a monopoly, so they probably send them to him free anyway.  Also, I'm pretty sure some early macs ran DOS. 
If I got Bill Gates I would buy Google and send it to him. Expensive, but worth it. /s 
or "If I document it, they'll just replace me with a newer program. So I better make it overly complex with no documentation to ensure my job security" 
Well, basically, being extreme left, or right draws simpletons. Intelligent people are usually somewhere in the middle. 
Chinese speaker here,  Yea although it isn't the best chinese (frankly pretty bad), but its the effort that makes it so great to watch as Chinese is ridiculously hard to learn.  Evidence: I have learnt Chinese for 10 years, still not native level. FYI I'm also a student.  
He found it on the sidewalk, picked it up, and put it in his pocket. When he got home, he emptied his pockets. He had forgotten all about it and it was mixed in with his pocket change. It's a sad, sad state of affairs. Poor guy. 
 Can i a 25 dollar Google ad that says "merry christmas bill" instead? 
I can't believe they let you take it from Big Ben!  
Hey guys, I missed the last CEO meeting, what's new?  -CEO of Cyberdyne 
I took it for a year and a half at my university, still awful at it. Any suggestions on where I could learn it effectively outside of a class (or actually going to China) 
Probably really inaccurate now. Jordan is a Billionaire nowadays.  
In other words, in the time I've been reading this thread, he has earned more than my yearly salary. 
Seriously, once you realize you'll never be able to be an expert in everything (or anything at all), you also realize you should focus more on learning how to make experts do stuff for you. Those experts very often don't know what to do with their skills anyway. 
What would you be probably doing had you not become an actor? 
To what extent would you consider Andy Dwyer to be based off yourself? 
Anna Faris from Scary Movie(s) or Anna Faris from The House Bunny? 
What is your favorite song to absolutely rock-out too? Favorite song to cry to? 
Hey Chris, big fan here! What do you miss most about working on Parks and Rec? What was the hardest part about working on Passengers? 
How has your past as an overweight, comedic character played influenced your growth as an actor, especially now that you're considered one of the sexiest Hollywood stars? 
~15 years ago you were living in your van on a beach in Hawaii, jobless, listening to Dre's 2001 everyday.   Do you ever miss anything about those days? Simpler times, being able to go anywhere you want without fear of paparazzi, etc.  
If you could have played any character from a film ever, who would you pick? 
You're awesome man.  Got any guilt or just general thoughts for taking this sweet lead role in Passengers considering Keanu Reeves had been trying to get the script made for like 6-7 years? 
Will you and your wife ever do a movie together where you're both leading? I think you're both talented and would make an exceptional screen-team! 
Im a huge PJ fan and loved that andy was also, was that your idea or the writers idea? are you a big fan? 
Was it difficult to control the raptors on the set of JURASSIC WORLD? Did you have any prior training in order to not get hurt by them? It must have been pretty scary. Was it scary? I bet it was.  
Hey Chris! I've been a big fan of yours since Parks and Rec! Just a quick question, who did you have more fun acting as: Andy Dwyer or Peter Quill? Thanks for taking the time out to do this!  
Hi Chris! If you had to pick one of the characters from Parks and Rec to join the Guardians, who would it be?  
How did you meet Anna Farris? Do y'all have any projects planned together? 
Hey Chris, you've inspired me to lose weight because funny guys can be sexy shirtless too.   So my question is: how has getting into shape changed your life? Also is having maintain your physique harder than losing the weight?    
Good morning from another PNW native (Tigard, OR)!   What was the most challenging aspect of working on Passengers?   Also, what's your favorite thing about the PNW?   Have a good one!  -Alyssa 
Loved parks and rec, actually know Aubrey Plaza from summer camp(she was good friends with one of my sister's)  Do you have a favorite moment of working with Aubrey? 
How is Jennifer Lawrence?  What's your best memory of working with your mates in your movies and tv shows?  Top 5 movies and shows?  You're a very lovable actor and you've lost alot of weight! I'm trying to shave weight off too because of your change in GotG! Thank you! 
Since you and Jennifer Lawrence have a pretty similar sense of humour, there must've been some pretty hilarious moments on set of Passengers. What is one of the funniest (or embarrassing) moments when filming the movie? 
You ate at a restaurant in Cambridge, MA, and you were wearing a patriots jersey because you lost a bet. I was one of your servers and while running your food I don't know if I was nervous or what, but I totally let one rip right next to you. I am pretty sure you heard because you stopped what you were saying and looked me directly in my eyes.  **Question**: Will you forgive me for crop dusting you? 
Where did you learn that magic trick?  I was expecting you to fail miserably and just want to see the hilarious scene but then......damn that was good 
Who is your favorite Seahawk besides Russell Wilson?   Oh and if you want to be more beloved by your home state, join Russ in supporting the return of the SuperSonics to Seattle. ;) (just a tip).  
Hi Chris! Johnny Karate vs Burt Macklin. 24 hours prep. Who wins? 
Would you rather fight 100 duck-sized horses or 1 horse-sized duck? 
Hi Chris. You always struck me as a huge nerd, so I'll ask this:  Have you ever been interested in/auditioned for a part in Star Wars now that it's back? 
rubiks cube  although it's not useless because i use it to help me run lines  
If I hadn't become an actor in the way I did. (being discovered by a director, plucked from obscurity, etc) I would have continued to pursue stand up comedy. probably would have tried to become an actor that way. 
Not alone. But with his band of child ninjas, it would be close. 
Wow. that's a good question. like a kiss marry kill thing?  trick question. I'd marry and kiss them all. And I did!!!   
He's been after me for years to do a song. wait, no? he doesn't know I exist? Oh. well.... probably not. simply because he wouldn't do it. haha! But I'd buy his cologne if he had one. 
To rock out to.... Pantera Vulger Display of Power To cry to... Pantera Vulger Display of Power 
I miss the cast and crew. I miss my friends. I miss the commute. I miss the fact it was a steady gig, all comedy, and took me 7 minutes to get to work.   The hardest part of working on Passengers would be the schedule. There were only two of us primarily through the whole shoot and we worked incredibly long hours. I was homesick a lot of the time. It was a grind.   
no vanity in comedy understanding the element of my job in where I am a prop  i was confident and in good shape when i first came to LA but nobody would cast me in any well written roles. People assumed based on my looks i was an asshole and a one trick pony. I only auditioned to play the douchebag characters. my audition material would be like "Bradley, 24, you hate him immediately"   int. locker room. Bradley looks to our hero, squints his eyes, runs his hands through his thick gelled and frosted tipped hair and says, "Fuck you pussy."  that would be my audition. "Fuck you pussy."  welcome to the OC bitch.   They never let me improv or do comedy. It wasn't until I built a shlubby exterior, which stood in stark contrast to my inner confidence that people gave me room to play. ,   
Jim Preston Passengers Opens December 21st!!  Thanks guys thats my time. 
Keanu Reeves is awesome. John Wick is the shit. He's been killing it for so long. And hes a great humanitarian.    
love Pearl Jam! Growing up in Washington i have a very real connection to that music. I was at an impressionable time when it hit. So it will always have a place in my heart. 
haha! Yes. It's amazing i made it out alive. The sequel shoots in a fewmonths. I already have nervous diahrea, diarreah, diarreeah, how the fuck do you spell that? anyways. Yeah. I"m probably gonna die on the sequel. 
More fun? Andy Dwyer. We got to do whole scenes, over and over. It was more stage play. Lots of improv. Guardians of the Galaxy is so fun to watch, don't get me wrong, but making it can be excruciatingly slow and painstaking. When you have so many elements working at once, you might spend all day shooting a piece of the movie that will last 10 seconds.  
Ron Swanson as an intergalactic small government bureaucrat. 
haha! That was during Everwood which we shot in Utah. I don't remember that shirt. I'm not BYU Alumni. I think that picture was taken at a fan signing event or something. That shirt must have been a gift or something. I honestly don't remember. 
hello!  Favorite thing about the PNW is the hard earned summers. Going to the river and floating down with some beers. I love when Mt. Rainier is out. I love the way everything and everyone slows down to feel the sun on their face when it first breaks in summer. Usually you've been through 100 days or more in a row of rain and mistiness.  
I had the best time working with Aubrey. My favorite moments with her were when she would let her guard down, (it didn't happen that often) and I got to see what a sweet and caring person she is. It's not dissimilar to the April character. 
Jen is awesome. She's funny and cool. She's refreshingly tough. She's an amazing actor. It feels good to be around her.   Best memory? So hard to say. I've been at this for 17 years. It's a dream job. No question. There have been so many unforgettable moments. I love what I do for a living.   top 5? Also very difficult. Friday NIght lights Breaking Bad The Wire Game of Thrones  Dual Survival 
We were sitting in our chairs waiting for the next shot and a big set light bulb exploded nearby and she screamed. high pitched. very feminine.  then she immediately looked over at me and said, "Jesus Chris! You scream like a woman! Did everyone just hear Chris?"  and for the rest of the shoot i couldn't convince anyone it wasn't me. I just had to own it.  : ) 
Any other celebrities you've farted on? Is this your thing? Can it be? 
No response yet. I can only assume that no, he has not forgiven you. 
Would you consider doing a PG Porn with James Gunn? 
I think Anna is one of the most talented and under appreciated actress.  She is absolutely phenomenal in May and Lost in Translation.    When will she start taking more Oscar worthy roles?  
So you're saying if you hadn't become an actor you would be trying to become an actor? 
They all led you to reddit? Damn. You definitely made a mistake somewhere  
You're married to Anna Farris?...didn't know this. Can you ask her if her character in Lost In Translation was supposed to be based off Cameron Diaz? Apparently Sofia Coppola had beef with her. Or so the rumor goes.   (I'm not actually expecting an answer.) 
Do you think it's hard for people to laugh at people they are threatened by? Georgle carlin, harmless old man, Dave chappell(back then) scrawny dude. Jonah hill, doughy. You, scruffy. But now? All cut and, either physically threatening, or socially intimiditating...maybe it makes people see their own weakness that they aren't the best versions of themselves, and that jacks with the comedic flow? 
i hope to watch this movie and find out Pratt's character is not Jim Preston. 
Anna Faris comically a notch above. Scary movie, people think it is easy, everyone audience member knows it is a spoof, still they have to convince me that for the characters it is not a spoof. The joker in a deck of jokers. 
I love PJ and grew up in Washington! Let's get beers and do bad Eddie Vedder karaoke! 
For a sec I thought this was a straight up spoiler lol  
Groot would be a tasteful end table before the movie was over. 
This comment lost a little of its gusto after I looked up James Gunn. 
They have a kid now and Pratt makes a shit ton from his Blockbusters. Plus has a sitcom. She probably wants the stable life now 
To be fair, I think a lot of people have chosen this as their career path. I think it would be true to say that there are more people trying to become actors then there are actors themselves. 
How did you have this obscure question ready but not know they were married...? 
Che! I totally forgot about that. God, he's impossible to dislike even when he's playing Seth's antagonist. 
Terry Crews is an interesting take on this, as he's so huge and physically intimidating, but most of his humor is playing in contrast to that.  I get the impression that a lot of really big guys develop a sense of humor to disarm people, because it's no fun to go around every day making people uncomfortable. 
House Bunny is one of my favorite guilty pleasure movies.  
She is not only a great lead, but has most of my favorite supporting roles by a comedic actress. Just Friends, Observe and Report, The Hot Chick, and so many more have me in stitches everytime I see them. I've yet to see an angle she can't act. 
Long since confirmed. He's been making jokes about it since about five minutes after he stopped being fat.  
I cut fun out of my life a while ago. When do I start losing weight? 
She does a fucking hilarious podcast called "Anna Faris in Unqualified" where she gives people relationship advice. She is truly charming.  
But Terry crews is a goddamn unicorn id be happy to get murdered by. 
That's part of it, I think.  He retains this beautiful humility even though he's an obviously hugely successful and brilliant fellow.  He also beat out his competitor entertainment / TV folks in Celebrity Jeopardy.  Actually demolished them. 
I just saw it last weekend for the first time and I had no idea how funny it was. It does not get the comedic cred it deserves. 
I gained 60# when I cut out fun.  Apparently sitting home alone, eating Cheetos, drinking whiskey and crying tears of loneliness while watching Netflix is poor weight loss regimen. 
He clowns as a side job. He is actually a word worker.  
Do you think Vin Diesel is one of those actors that refuses to break character? I just imagine him walking around set all day only saying I am groot. 
He definitely did look like a typical douchebag of that era.  
Of course he is.   I'm just saying that his comedic style is a significant part of why. 
Guy: "Wouldn't it be fucking *HILARIOUS* if we just kissed right now? Like, wouldn't that be funny?!"  Girl: "haha" 
It's still a good day. When you're on reddit, it's ALWAYS a good day. Just don't leave. Ever. 
When was this filmed? Why are they acting like helium is a new cool thing?? This video is funny, but really weird. 
I didn't know that. I also didn't know they could speak. Thanks ant fact guy!  
It's dry British sarcasm. They're just both using it for the buildup. 
They certainly can! They rub themselves to make little squeaking noises which is a signal to come and forage some leaves!!  
I watch a lot of British stuff and enjoy their style of super dry humor a lot, but this seemed just bizarre to me. I guess you're probably right though! 
Do the pictures of space do any justice to the real thing? 
Hello Mr. Aldrin! Is there anything you regret not getting to do while in space? 
Hi Mr. Aldrin!  What advice would you like to give to a lab full of aspiring engineers and astrophysicists?  And...  What is your favorite flavor of ice cream? 
Col Aldrin, what went through your head when you first looked back and saw the Earth from space?  
Mr Aldrin , what do you consider your biggest accomplishment that's totally unrelated to space? 
If you had the opportunity to speak to the crew of the first manned mission to Mars prior to launch, what would you say to them? 
What advice can you give to current undergrad aerospace engineering students? 
How does it feel to be THE REAL buzz lightyear? Also how can I be an astronaut and go to the moon?  
You were what kids wanted to be when they grew up.  What did you want to be when you were a kid? 
How were the cast and crew of 30 Rock? Anything memorable you can share? 
Mr Aldrin, I am interested in what kind of music a highly distinguished astronaut such are yourself would find yourself listening to. Could you enlighten me? 
Thank you for doing the AMA!  Ever find time for computer games like Kerbal Space Program? I've gotten 3 kids more interested in math and science after showing it to them.  Have a fantastic day! 
Was it more challenging to go through the training to become an astronaut, or to actually go to space? 
How do you feel about people who claim you faked the moon landing?    Can you describe how the moon felt to you?  (Was it an adrenaline rush when your feet hit the surface?  Was it soft or hard?  Could you feel temperature through the suit at all?)  Funniest moment during the mission to the moon and back?  
How often do you use "Yeah well I walked on the moon" as a trump card for arguments? 
Hi Mr. Aldrin - Thank you for joining us!  One of my heroes is Carl Sagan, and, as far as i have read, he worked with NASA during the Apollo missions - so did you ever get to meet him, and if so; what were your impression of Carl Sagan?   
How tempting was it to lay in the moondust and make moon angels? 
Hello Mr. Aldrin! I just wanted to ask you how was your day? And say that you are one of my heroes. Thank You! 
What is your absolute favorite aircraft to fly today?  
Hello Mr. Aldrin! If it was you, not Neil, who took the first steps on the moon, what would you have said? 
Will you ever forgive Ali G for calling you "Buzz Lightyear?" during an interview in 2003? 
Yes, they do. They recall (for me) the actual experience of myself in space - not by words, not by print, but visual reminders, it brings back a very in-depth appreciation. They can be used very well for communicating in speeches, talks, and more to other people who can actually see what i saw and what the camera saw.  
COCONUT ICE CREAM.  Don't waste your time on beaming people up or down. Instead, consider gravity waves as advanced physics of the universe that could be used to travel interstellar distances. And ENJOY floating in space, rather than being decomposed or recomposed in another location.  
*"Where are the billions and billions and billions of people, on what I'm looking at? We're the only 3 that are not back there."*  And we didn't get to celebrate. Because we were out of town.  
I was very close to the top of my class at West Point. And I continued to expand my understanding of the world around me, and the human evolutions here on earth, the achievements perhaps to other people are impressive when I tell them that not only have I been to the North Pole, I haven't been to the South Pole yet, but I have been to the Titanic in a little yellow french submarine. It took an hour and a half just to sink down in the ocean about 2 miles deep to look out the thick glass window and see the Titanic. The visibility was such that we could see the bow, it became very famous in the movie thanks to James Cameron, but the visibility was not so good that you could actually see the bottom of the ocean that the Titanic was resting on. So it was an eerie site, of a ship festooned with rusting metal, like gingerbread. Floating, floating out the window in the Ocean.  
Realize that you are perhaps the most ambitious, the most historical pioneers that the earth has produced since its beginning.  And you are given a great honor in spending the rest of your lives pioneering for mankind.  AND HAVE FUN! 
Drive over to the nearest airport, and enroll in flight classes. You will experience the joy of freedom in the air above, as you study the mechanics of how this is made possible by understanding the construction, the laws of motion, the air that can provide lift when it is moved by propulsion through the air, and stay above the gravity pulling the airplane back down to earth.  
I am @theRealBuzz on Twitter!  They wanted a name that is better than Lunar Larry - and it became Buzz Lightyear because they wanted it to be more genuine. So now that I have changed my name from Edwin Eugene Aldrin, Jr. to Buzz Aldrin, I'm seriously thinking of adding a middle name - so it would become Buzz "Lightyear" Aldrin.  
An aviator! A pilot! After I was a quarterback for Notre Dame.  
Get him Kerbal space program for the computer. It's not a perfect analogue to real world rocketry, but it's a damn good place to start. 
Your 2 year old must be the most cognitively developed child I've ever read about. 
Well, 30 Rock means 30 Rockefeller Plaza. My father, in 1925, 1926, in the Reserve of the Air Corps, worked as Aviation Fuel Manager for Standard Oil of New Jersey, that's where I lived at that time, and he would go into NYC and work at 30 Rockefeller Plaza. So when I was asked to consider participating, I jumped for joy, and I can't remember a more pleasant episode of discussions with Tina Fey as we talked about her fictitious mother's (I think it was) love affair that she had with me, Buzz Aldrin. And then we looked at the Moon, and we both sort of cursed at it for various reasons and said - I'll never forget the line - "I walked on your FACE!" 
Well, I prefer the soft singing voice of Karen Carpenter. I have heard Frank Sinatra sing "Fly me to the Moon" almost *too* many times. So I'm interested in composing a new song, entitled "Get your ass to Mars!"   
I have inspired my own video games, 10, 20, 30 years ago, and now there is in Europe a video challenge, a video activity, entitled "Buzz Aldrin's Space Program Manager." And there game players can build their own space program from the beginning, and from where we are now on into the future, with some of the components that I believe will make great progress in our transportation systems between the Earth and the Moon and Mars in a long-standing reusable way into the future.  I'll have to check out Kerbal Space Program.  
The Soviets landed 5 things on the moon including 2 very long lived rovers during the time the Apollo missions were happening. If there was ANY chance that we were faking any part of our missions, wouldn't the very top priority of the soviet missions be to discredit, disprove and utterly embarrass their cold war competition?  Not that there's any reason to have to defend facts from irrational conspiracy theorists... 
I don't thinK I've ever really used that. I don't want to be shockingly bragging. I would rather people understand that there is a very, very fortunate American who was given the opportunity, and was in the right place at the right time to have the moment of a lifetime. My mother was born - her name was Marianne Moon. And she was born in 1903, the year that the Wright Brothers first flew. I participated with great honor in becoming one of the first to land on the moon, and now I am devoting and have devoted many years of my life to enabling Americans to lead international nations to permanence on the planet Mars. I was lucky enough to have been born on this planet earth, in this admirable country of the United States of America.  
Yes, I did. I met Carl Sagan and his wife. Both were very dedicated people to explaining to young people and to all people the benefits to be derived from space, the history of how our universe was formed, and the history of the advancement of the technologies that hundreds of years ago, enabled present day nations to use them to begin to add more science discoveries in space. And to write stories and television series that reach many people and after his passing away, you have a rejuvenation of the series COSMOS, featuring a very good friend of mine, Neil deGrasse Tyson. We were on a commission together to look at the future of space activities for the United States, that was about 12 years ago, and we've been good friends ever since. I was on his TV show. He did Michael Jackson's moonwalk far better than I did on Dancing With the Stars.  
That was not at all tempting. I wanted my white spacesuit to remain as clean as possible!  
Well, I woke up before the alarm went off so I could re-arrange all of the pills and vitamins that I have to take with me on my next trip. Then I enjoyed reading the newspaper, having a cup of coffee, and beginning to eat my breakfast. I haven't finished it yet, and my watch says "10 minutes to 1" in the afternoon.  
1.  Ahelm1988, third, seriously?    2.  COL Aldrin, you are my husband's hero and truly an inspiration.  Thank you for this opportunity to interact with you.  When was the last time you were at the Academy and what advantages do today's Cadets have over you and your peers as far as leadership development if any? 
Does you fink man will ever walk on the sun?  Buzz: The sun is far too hot for man to walk on it's surface  What about in the winter, when the sun is cooler...?  
I've never heard the moon described like this, it gave me goosebumps 
This is an excellent response, thank you!  I can't even begin to imagine what it would be like to *know* that your place in history is truly cemented.  To be so intrinsically involved with true human history and imagination is magnificent.   
Phew! Looks like I'm not missing out by not going to space, then. 
AWESOME.   And now I owe a labbie $5. I bet him that you'd get flooded with questions and wouldn't answer mine. Thanks for taking your time to answer! 
That's what's the most awe-inspiring to me about this whole concept: of all the six or seven billion people, only three at a time weren't on earth. Three. And it's the same with a possible mission to Mars: those people will be the *only* people (however few or many) who are *not* on earth. And as a human, being on earth is pretty much the *one* thing that is a given. 
Your ability to describe and portray a setting, especially in regards to places very few have seen, is astounding. Those last 2 sentences were poetic.  
**tl;dr**  Moon: Been there done that. Help others have a chance.  Mars: Send people. Build labs.  
I'm definitely getting a telescope. probably going to wait a bit until hes a bit older so we can get a pretty serious one and he can really get some use out of it. Still sort of researching what to get.  he already is very excited to point out the moon whenever he sees it, and i've pointed out the ISS to him when it flies overhead and he's gotten excited about that 
"Stupid Moon don't you know it's daytime!"  Was another one of my favorites. 
Paging /u/GovSchwarzenegger  I respectfully request the two of your collaborate on this. =) 
How ironic would it be if he failed to successfully land a ship on there? ;D 
I had great respect for you before this AMA, but your responses are so well thought out and thought provoking themselves that I am in awe.  Thank you for taking the time to talk to us today. 
I kind of want to punch that guy in the face as well.  
This incident is/was on the curriculum at Space Camp. The verdict we were taught was that the judge let Buzz of because Bart "had it coming". 
    "Born at the right place at the right time"      Mother's name is Marianne Moon.  That's some superhero origins shit right there. 
Anytime anyone mentions meeting Carl Sagan, their story is a positive one. That individual touched and influenced so many people's lives in such positive ways, its no wonder he is a hero to so many. One of the few people I genuinely feel sad about never being able to meet. 
"Beginning to eat my breakfast... afternoon"   We're not so different after all  
What does you fink about the people who says the moon does not exist? 
If you're thinking of Neil DeGrasse Tyson, he didn't hate the movie, in fact he loved it, he just likes to nitpick things as well like some people.  
I'll go in this guy's place. The only thing on my bucket list is to see Earth as Buzz did. That's all I really want. 
Actually, there was only ("only"!) 3 billion at that time. Only 2.5 when I was born in the early 60s. That's how much the human population has exploded in the last 50 years. 
"This is one small step... for Poopieheadsavant..." 
Right - what is he talking about?  "Because we will plan, we will construct from the moon of Mars, over a period of 6-7 years, the landing of different objects at the landing site that will be brought together to form a complete Mars habitat and laboratory, similar to what has been done at the Moon."  There is no habitat and laboratory on the Moon - though many of us think that should be the first step prior to trying to do it on Mars.  Or maybe Russia, China or the EU are planning it and we haven't heard about it? 
Correct me if I am mistaken, but I think that the Apollo missions left partial laboratories and minimal supplies on the surface of the moon. I am fairly certain that the moon missions sometimes used the other landing site's gear for research rather than waste file bringing something that is already there. 
*_With due apologies to Frank Sinatra, and Buzz_*    Let's exit LEO soon,  Forty too many years have passed,  We were promised many things, even.. flying cars.  In other words, "Get your ass to Mars!"  Give those NASA beards, a budget increase!    Fill my tank with LOX,  And light those solid rocket motors,  Do not mind the G-force,  It'll last only till MECO.    We've cut upmass,  Praise ISRU,  Of all the worlds,  I love you.    ---  LEO - Low Earth Orbit  LOX - Liquid Oxygen  MECO - Main Engine Cut-off  ISRU - In-situ Resource Utilisation 
I wonder if he would experience the learning curve like usual beginners. 
How dare that scumbag call Mr. Aldrin a coward! The man isn't just a pioneer of space exploration, but a noted Air Force fighter pilot! That's courage if I've ever seen it. 
Yeah, calling a man that flew and tested high performance combat aircraft and helped pioneer manned orbital spaceflight a coward isn't going to go over well, not even going into whether he walked on the moon. His testicular fortitude is *profusely* well established. I don't blame him at all for trying to avoid the troll. 
If more of the asshats of the world ran into more Buzz Aldrins...we would have many less asshats. People have a tendency to run their dick traps because the fear of getting punched in the kisser is disappearing from our society. 
Bad ass.  But seriously imagine how annoying and frustrating it would be for some uneducated misinformed dickhead to constantly harass you about your involvement (and putting your life at risk) in one of the most important time in our world history.  
If you can get to Russia, they give 2 seater MiG 25 flights out there for a frwction of what Virgin Galactic is supposed to charge per flight. I think they get up to about 85K feet, enough to see black sky and the curvature of the Earth. 
There was also the Air Force's AMU before the MMU, but Cernan was too exhausted by the time he got strapped into it to actually fly it. 
Actually that picture contains every human except for *two* of them. You're forgetting Micheal Collins, who was orbiting the moon in the command module.    
Imagine thousands of news anchors worldwide reading the name "Poopieheadsavant" off of cue cards and teleprompters, all trying to keep a straight face while addressing their viewers. Poopieheadsavant would be a legend. All hail Poopieheadsavant, space hero of the world. 
Perhaps he is implying that by the time we are trying to colonize Mars, there will already be a base on the moon.  I think that will have to happen in order to get the experience and knowledge needed for a Mars trip. 
I love the ant dialog before Homer comes crashing into the ant farm.  Protect the queen!  Which ones the queen?  I am.  No you're not, I am.  Freedom! Horrible, horrible freedom! 
Well anyway he tied a moon rock to his belt, which was the style at the time 
Yes, thank you - he tended towards long answers, but I am not going to tell anyone to ever keep their answers short. Longer and more indepth is always better! 
Pretty sure he's got the orbital mechanics down... Since he helped develop some of the practices that NASA used 
Not just that, apparently the guy had tricked Aldrin into flying all the way over to the hotel. He was expecting a role in a kids TV special and was met with a bunch of conspiracy nuts. 
You've gotta voice for radio and tv!  Are you a homeless black guy?  
Showing our visitor the very best of reddit in the top thread. 
Everyone forgets Michael Collins, The lost hero of APOLLO 11 :( 
One day, we will be old men and women on www.reddit.mars, and asking questions on Poopieheadsavant's AMA. 
Me, too!  That was my first thought before I even saw your comment! 
He couldn't get any of the small dark ones, on account of the war.  All they had were the big light gray ones.   
He might even be too advanced for the game, due to KSP not supporting N-body physics. Come to think of it, he'd probably be really good. 
Scott Manley playing KSP with God would be pretty awesome too! Let's be honest, they're probably on a first name basis. 
Wow, just when I thought I couldn't hate that cock stain more you go and tell me that.  
Nope, just a white-dude computer programmer. But back when I was paying my dues working tech support people used to occasionally tell me that on the phone, and it  kind of lodged in the back of my brain. Maybe I'll try my hand at some side work, haha... 
From a quick Google search I found a price of $20,800 so if it was really what someone wanted most in life it's definitely affordable.  
And at the time, the loneliest human in existence. He was further away from the next human that anyone had ever been before. Plus, he lost radio communication for a good while, too, when he went behind the moon. 
And also helped the Irish win independence.    And had a tasty drink named after him made of gin, lemon juice, sugar, and carbonated water.   
Man, that would kinda suck. Being SO close to the moon, but never stepping on it.  
Now, to take the ferry cost a nickel, and in those days, nickels had pictures of bumblebees on 'em. "Gimme five bees for a quarter," you'd say.  
"If only I could join them in their exciting endeavors." 
The airline is dumb for letting the people on the flight before they had this figured out. It would have been a lot easier to just not let 4 people on as opposed to having to take 4 people off  
I doubt anyone but his lawyer will be getting those answers  
Another point:  The Passenger Bill of Rights does entitle compensation to the bumped passenger.  I've been bumped twice.  The first time, I was randomly bumped and took a hotel and 350.  The second time I responded to the request with "two grand and a limo to the hotel" which started a bidding war on the plane.  I took 850 and a Marriott.  
Time was, when you got bumped, you got a free first-class ticket voucher anywhere you wanted to go in the US.  And a hotel room.  And meal vouchers for your stay.  And put on the next flight.  I miss the 90s. 
United's about to make that guy a millionaire several times over. 
It seems odd to randomly select 4 people to be kicked off. What if you were traveling with your children and your child was picked to be taken off?   It seems like this guy's wife or someone related to him ran after him when he was being dragged.  
Let's not turn this man into an Internet celebrity and start digging up shit in his past and fucking up his future.  
I know its standard policy to oversell, but I don't think overselling was the problem here. The issue is that none of the passengers would take the $800 bribe so United decided that $800 was their maximum and decided to resort to excessive force to remove passengers. Solution? Shoulda offered 2 grand, 3 grand, 4 thousand bucks. I bet someone would have taken that deal in a heartbeat. The deep shit that United is now in and the major PR hit they are taking is going to cost them a hell of a lot more than a few thousand dollars.  
$800 isnt enough to get me off the plane if I need to be somewhere. Hope this man gets a large sum of money for their BS 
OMG. I just saw the video and cannot believe that happened. I hope the lawsuit gets televised. 
I think the real question is, why did they even let people on the plane if it was overbooked? 
Good job staying on top of this karma ~~train~~ plane.   
What's a realistic estimate for what he'll be paid for this?  
The dude reminds me of my dad in his younger days.   Anyone know if the dude is korean or something? 
If you made it clear that you were a doctor, who had patients that needed to be see.   Do flights get overbooked sometimes? Yes  Should the police drag someone out who didnt "volunteer" to leave. No   I'm just baffled, nobody was willing to stop what was going on. By giving up their seat, so you could get back home.  Did anyone offer to give up their seat, while this was happening?   
What's this shit with over booking? I've flown across Europe hundreds of times and never have had any issues...  United Airlines should take Turkish airlines as an example as they rock for God's sake, Best treatment and food I've ever had...  (If you're ever flying with Turkish airlines, take chicken if you have the choice, if not, just take anything as it's soo damn tasty)  
They should have realized they were going to be overbooked once the initial check-in closed and by the time everyone got to the gate they could have made an announcement. I feel like people would have been more likely to volunteer to be bumped at the gate rather than when they're already settled into their seats on the plane. 
AMA Request Someone to Discuss Their Legal Case.  Good luck with that. 
yeah. Ask Me Anything isn't meant to be an interrogative interview. AMAs are chill hangouts and I find this to be a little inappropriate if not subtracting from how serious this is.  
Came here to say he should avoid the public eye and social media in particular until his case against them is over. 
But what about the great reddit lawyers. They can surely help. They always seem to know what they're talking about 
Stupid question but is the $850 to find a flight or do they reschedule and you get to keep the $850? 
It really depends how it comes out. The people who physically man-handled him were law enforcement and not United employees. So if anything he can charge them, but we all know how law enforcement seems to take a slap on the hand for most incidents.   I'd be interested to see how his lawyers word it specifically to go after both of them.  
Interesting part is that, he will probably still stay working as a doctor if there is no permanent damage and he gets a settlement.  He seems to care about his patients.   
Generally they do it by whoever has the cheapest ticket or whoever checked in last. 
Inb4 the Daily Mail reports that he was arrested twice for money laundering and secretly owns an international prostitution ring. 
Doctor shockingly loses 3 lbs of body fat while playing possum with and getting beaten by United Airline Security  
Is it $800 plus they book you on a different flight free of charge? If not, not worth it.  
I was just thinking the opposite. There's nowhere I'd need to be that couldn't wait for $800. But then again, I'm poor and have no life.  
I'd like to announce that I'm officially boycotting United. Granted, I had no plans to book a flight in the near future and probably couldn't afford it to begin with, but by god I'm boycotting those sons of bitches. 
I think it was one part the bystander effect and second, the fact that people thought that if they intervened, they would probably be thrown off for intervening, which is a more reasonable scenario that *shitty airline lottery winner*. 
Because you will probably get arrested for interfering with police duty. 
It's not really something that happens in Europe, this is the first time ive really heard about something like this actually happening and I've flew over Europe a lot.  
It looks like it was announced at the gate but no one wanted to give up their spot. I'm amazed they even boarded the plane without figuring out the situation beforehand. 
Can you imagine being the UA employee that took his seat? Awwwkwaaaard... 
I think the crazy weather delays across the Midwest lately was a major contributing factor to this perfect storm.   Typically when airlines offer hundreds of dollars for rebooking people would line up to take it. This time around all the passengers were probably sick of waiting around and just didn't want to take any chances. Unless the airline really bumps up the offer, like the one passenger suggested, to 1500.  
I'm sure getting the United crew to the right plane takes precedence over a doctor needing to see his patients 
United PR is like "$400...? $800...? Ok, ok...$1500...? Oh, you want something in the millions..?" 
It all depends on his long-term prognosis.  In the video it's pretty obvious he's suffering from some manner of post-concussive syndrome.  He's disoriented and repeating himself.  If those are fleeting symptoms, this is probably not a huge case (although it will settle for a premium due to the publicity).    However, if his post-concussive symptoms do not dissipate and he sustains memory issues or any other long-term mild traumatic brain injury symptoms--given his profession and loss of earnings capacity--this would be a very, very significant potential claim/suit.  Source: Am personal injury attorney (only licensed in California, this post is educational in nature and is not intended as legal advice to anyone) 
On the upside, United Airlines will now be charging its customers for the air that you breath in both the plane and the airport.  Each passenger will wear a monitor and will be charged on a per breath basis.  At present no charge will be incurred for excessively deep breathing 
Dignity is priceless. He deserves everything they'll give him and more. 
I'm not positive here but I believe his suit would have to be against whomever employs those officers. Now whether they're state or federally employed I'm not sure but they don't look like united security employees to me. 
He's currently the most likely person on Earth to become the next Supervillain. 
On some level, if this had to happen, at least it happened to a person with money and extra legal protections/expectations that come with his profession. Congrats United, you just physically assaulted a male doctor. I'm sure that's going to work out great for you. 
No. He should be all over Facebook, Twitter, etc. but in a way as directed by his attorneys. The more public it is the more United is going to suffer. 
Pilot came out from the cockpit, donned his cowboy hat, and started the bidding:  Hominy-5-5-do-I-hear-5-5-and-I-have-5-hubbaduh-5-5-now-do-I-hear-550-fi-fi-550-thank-you-sir-fi-fi-can-I-hear-6-6-hominy-6-6-who-wants-it-6-6-and-a-Holiday-Inn-Express  and so on. 
Actually, because United was directing LEO, the doctor has some good claims against both. I'd start with false imprisonment, which can go to United and the officers.  
The next time he's running behind schedule his patients better remember that time he got his ass whooped trying to get back to them. 
$800 and a hotel.  I'm going to start booking flights after I've asked if they're full. I want a sweet hotel stay and extra cash. 
In other news united flights are still going out full  
Exactly. I like to think I would say something but I would be terrified of being treated the same! No one truly knows what they would do until in that situation.  
They should have played music and make the people dance until the music suddenly stops. Everyone quickly must take a seat and whoever doesn't have a seat loses and must get off the plane. 
I'm guessing he kept his seat fully upright and did not try to establish armrest dominance over his neighbor. 
Can you imagine if there was a medical emergency and someone asked is there a doctor on board.  Well... There was.... 
The biggest contributing factor is selling more seats than the plane has.  
Overbooking has always been a scumbag airline practice. Imagine if a restaurant intentionally sold more than they had available and then just told people "too bad, no meal for awhile". It should frankly be illegal. 
Well to be fair you don't know how many doctors are on the plane the United crew needed to get to.  Not that there aren't better ways to resolve this. 
Best I can do is a voucher with a 1 year expiry and black outs. 
You're underestimating the PR value of this guy being bound to confidentiality and non-disparagement as part of the settlement. Right now he could cause millions in damage to United's brand by going on every big news program in the country and having that video played repeatedly, then going on a Delta commercial as their new customer experience advisor. (Look what Sprint did with the Verizon guy) 
Gotta respect that legal disclaimer at the end of your comment. 
Everyone reading this announcement has been charged an announcement fee. 
Not to mention the appointments he possibly had to cancel. Doctors' time is valuable as shit.   As shit as in modifying the intensity of the value very upward. Not literal shit.   And literal meaning actually literally, not figuratively literally as is colloquially common.  
You're allowed to sue more than one person for an incident. They're all going to be in the list of defendants. 
I think that title is still held by Elon musk. Not only able to become a supervillan, but probably the greatest one of all time if he switched to be evil... 
It is sad that you have to have money to win in court against a big company.  Also, I think he may be asian? 
It should be going down, since the bidders are receiving 
I can imagine him never letting it down.  "Samantha, you're 5 minutes late."  "Doc, I'm really sorry, there was this traff-"  "You know Samantha, I was beaten off a plane and still made it on time" 
That $800 tends to be an $800 voucher for another flight, not cash. As someone who's had to take that before, it's not actually worth it.  
Yeah, good point. No one knows what they would do until they are there. I would also like to think that I would have given up my seat. Depends on why you were flying too. Depends on so many things! 
The guys a cop so he'll probably get paid leave while under investigation then he'll get fired (transferred to another police department); case closed. 
Alternately, he could have reclined and armrest dominated all he wanted because no one would mess with him after seeing what happened to the last guy who tried that... 
Bullshit. That employee told the person next to them to give up the armrest or they were "next". 
Overbooking happens all over the place.  I worked in a fancy hotel a few years ago, and they'd always overbook by about 1% of their total occupancy. From what I understand, their statistics showed them that, on average, about 1% of rooms were no-shows. So you have a choice - overbook by that percentage, or just let it happen and potentially not make money on those spots.  When it happened, people were usually irritated (and rightly so), but the hotel would take care of them. They'd put them in a competitor's hotel for the night, free of charge, and if they were staying for multiple days they would upgrade their room. Again, free of charge.  I don't think the issue is with overbooking, it's with how they handled it when no one was interested in giving up their spot. 
Actually, it is fine that the airline sells more seats than the plane has, as long as they are willing to buy back the seats at their established value when the rubber meets the road.  The problem here was that the airline was unwilling to buy the seat back for what it was worth.  If the airline continues to increase the reward from $800, eventually someone will volunteer. 
You over sell by around 10 average. Passengers miss their flights all the time so they learned to double dip the seat. Granted the missed passengers just get rebooked to the next flight. Rarely around holidays it backs up so bad that flights can get up to 15 paying standby passengers who missed their last flights. So no seats were available throughout the whole day and more. That's when it gets bad. Wife works for delta. I was trying to fly standby on Presidents day weekend to Atlanta and man. They ended up asking for volunteers all day, but the payout was $2,000 at some flights.  
if they don't, their competitors will eat them alive since they will.  And if they select passengers for overbooking, and they don't move from their seat, then it will get out that all you have to do to avoid overbooking is not leave your seat when asked and then the airline will be like "oh, okay, I guess we have to go with it, then."  it just screws over who was last in line at the gate, and then you'll have people fighting over not being last in line then.  the cops acted like complete thugs, and they're to blame entirely here (and if United employed them, then in the end they'd be responsible too.) 
Except they didn't sell more seats than the plane has. One of United's fee for departure carriers added a deadheading crew last minute to go pick up another United branded flight that was going to cancel. Working employees always have the highest boarding priority. The only outlier in this whole process was the single plain cloths cop that got physical removing the passenger. The rest of this process happens literally every single day. 
I'm ok with the practice - better to oversell and make use of the no-show seats than to sell exact inventory and fly around empty chairs.  But if that is going to be the yield optimization strategy, they need to manage demand by buying back inventory to meet the surplus demand.  In the same way that we have to pay outrageous prices when demand is high, they should have to pay outrageous prices when they need a seat back.  They should keep sweetening the pot until someone voluntarily takes the offer.  Then you have no problem at all and everyone who wants to travel gets to travel. 
It's a 4 and a half hour drive.  Put the employees in a car.  Would have been cheaper and faster. 
"Hi you might recognize me as the guy beaten unconscious on a United Airlines Flight because I refused to give up my seat when I was already on the plane when they overbooked. I'm here to tell you That Delta Airlines will never, ever, ever, ever, EVER assault you for them overbooking their own flights. Have a nice flight with Delta!" 
That's where I think the manager should be fired. He should have realized physically taking people off of a plane is not worth it. They could have given $10,000 and it would have still been cheaper than having this happen.  
The important part here is money and not black. United is going to get fucked harder than a cheap whore.  
Jesus christ, "beaten off a plane" conjured up all sorts of mental images at first until I realized what you were actually saying.  
Depends on the airline and which city the flight is departing from. Delta gives out $800 Amex gift cards as a starting offer from JFK and LAX.  
If were sitting next to the guy who bumped off the doctor I would get a double clamato and accidently spill it on him right at belly button height so it ruins both shirt, pants, plus he gets to sit there with a damp crotch for the flight.  I would be sure to note that the airline must have overfilled the drink, and apologize for the "overfilling situation". 
Another article I read said people were saying stuff to them like "You should be ashamed to work for this company". Probably nothing too crazy but that's pretty awkward when you can't just walk away. 
There's an "add injury to insult" joke in there somewhere but I can't manage to shake it out. 
*"Sorry sir, it is your fault we overbooked and nobody took our generous offer of a turkey club sandwich. However if you don't get off the plane we're going to go Malxon X on you"*.  No, the guy above is right. If you build your empire upon overbooking, you can't blame a customer when everyone shows up. Even worse, its for people on standby. United is run by an imbecile and someone is going to get fired for 'following orders'. 
"I'm sorry United. This seat is now worth 10,000$ on the open market." 
Uh ...which airport is that from? I might want to uh purchase a seat or two. And what would be the busiest flight of the day to start with? 
Yeah. United needs a lesson on how the Free Market works. Sounds like they had a plane load of people where all of those people thought their seats were worth at least $800. And they need to start dealing in REAL MONEY. Not this credit BS. What if I can't fly in the next year??  It's exactly what the airlines do to us when we need a seat at the last minute. OH! you need to get to your destination with 6 hours notice? That'll be an extra $800, thanks! Except now they want to do it to us at literally the last second and also want to be stingy about it.  
Haha that was like, the worst example possible. "Ummm they do that in real life... and you can just go to another restaurant instead." 
Stuff like this is usually in their union contract. They may not be allowed to do this.  It also could've been a legal rest issue. The law requires minimum rest time for flight crew.  It also could've been that they needed them on a plane a lot faster than 4.5 hours. Is it better to bump 4 people or make 200 different people wait 4 hours for a crew to show up to fly them? 
You joke about it, but that would be a fantastic use of Delta's marketing dollars.  
Anyone seeing these announcements has been charged. 
I think they were saying Elon is currently about Chaotic Good, maybe leaning towards Neutral Good. Man if he switched to Evil he'd be Lex Luthor.  
...which is unfortunate, because the pilot/crew that had to bump these people from their flights are probably filling in for United's screw up or because FAA crew rest regulations or illness or because they literally have to for some other reason. Not because they just want to go to Louisville.  
My thoughts exactly, they probably had a strict limit on voluntary/involuntary compensation, heaven forbid they lose the cost of a seat or two. I bet they respond with "It's not consistent with our policy and the employee handling the incident has been terminated." When in reality, they were following SOP. 
IMO it simply should be considered breach of contract. It's the airline's own misdoings that cause it.  
The state of airline transportation in America is despicable, between 9/11, crazy lobbying laws and corporate executive pay gap/profit misappropriation the airline industry has been the epitome of regulation failure... and there's nothing we can do about it.  
As much as I want to agree with you, I'm not sure it makes sense for a couple percent of all airplane seats to end up empty because airlines are banned from overbooking. It keeps people from getting to their destinations who otherwise would, has negative environmental consequences, and would likely cost airlines money over time (costs which we can be sure they would pass on to us). Plus, overbooking can be a huge boon for flexible travellers.  It makes more sense for airlines to insure themselves against incidents like this. A big enough financial incentive would have gotten some passengers to give up their seat, or the money could have been used to solve the problem in another way, like diverting another air crew or paying for a flight with another carrier.   Randomly selecting paying customers to bump in favor of flight crew (especially like happened here) is asinine, but that doesn't necessarily mean that overbooking is all bad. 
To be true to practice don't even refund their money.    You give them a voucher good for one year that they can use to purchase another item, it may or may not be available as well. 
I respect that you're sticking to your guns on this one, partly because you're simply right, and no considerations thus far have refuted your point whatsoever.  
If they really wanted to up their game they'd treat is as an auction. Get people excited about the possibility. I imagine doing it in an energetic forthcoming way would built excitement, rather than resentment. 
If I worked for a rival airline's marketing department I would be trying to buy the rights to the video of the incident and getting the guy to be our new spokesperson while showing the video in the background of them dragging his body off the plane. The man is a doctor and that kind of money could expand his practice and let him help more people. At the very least it should pay off his med school debt. 
What stock are you looking at? UAL is up 1.5% today. 
That's incorrect according to Wikipedia "In fact, UAL opened at $3.31 on 6 July 2009, dipped to an intra-day low $3.07 (-7.25%) on 10 July 2009 but traded as high as $6.00 (+81.27%) four weeks later on 6 August 2009" 
I know, but I wouldn't be a Redditor if I wasnt picking on someone for some minor point that has no real significance.  
Then send those employees on another flight, on another airline. For 4 employees they were willing to pay $800 each to bump. For that $3200, they could have hired a private charter plane. 
The problem is that the strategy of overbooking and then compensating people that get bumped have to go hand in hand. You can't just do the overbooking and then cheap out on the compensation. If you're unwilling to pay enough to get people to voluntarily give up the flight they bought, then maybe overbooking that much isn't actually a good decision.  It's like mining companies that want to use cheaper, sloppier mining practices and then not pay for the cleanup. It's a package decision, you can't be allowed to just take money by screwing everyone else over.  
Well now it's also assault and battery. Yeah. United, good luck with that. 
No, all of the arguments against it are essentially: but it's difficult for the airline! 
He is 69, hopefully his med school debt was paid off years ago. 
Amazingly, it started the day off about .75 but rebounded... what the fuck is the market thinking? that this is the start of something good for united?  "The beatings will continue until passenger morale improves" sounds like an awesome long term strategy 
Goddamnit. I want to cancel my account but there's a fee for that, too! 
I used to be so pro Google, the last five to ten years they just keep letting me down over and over, harder and harder. Power corrupts, sometimes it takes longer, but it seems God damned consistent. 
What if he than got air sick on you. Now you have an assholes vomit all over you. Wars can be dangerous things. Be sure you know your end game and where you are willing to go before you start one.   Its what I would do anyway.  
You can literally optimize this and know exactly what your max payout can be versus the (potential) cost 
They should have bumped it and tried at $1200 then. 
No man that's covered under the section 2.3 "any passanger can be beaten til unconscious by up to 4 police officers at at the will of any united airline managment with out repercussion"  
They could've sent their employees on a competitor's flight last minute (assuming that was even an option with the blizzard) or dramatically upped the cash incentive for giving up your seat for less than the cost of this blow up.  
Knowing how they used to do things, he probably paid that off by the time he was 30. 
Maybe the effects haven't really hit yet. Maybe once there's a big legal case, or a more widespread social media effect? 
Some people (Elon Musk, Stephen Hawking, etc) have come out in favor of regulating Artificial Intelligence before it is too late. What is your stance on the issue, and do you think humanity will ever reach a point where we won't be able to control our own artificially intelligent designs? 
Hello Mr. Gates,  I know you love to read, carry a lot of books around and learned how to speed-read, is there some technique you use to make this easier? More generally, how do you "attack" a book you're interested in?  
What's a technological advancement that's come about in the past few years that you think we were actually better off without? 
Mr. Gates! How soon do you think quantum computing will catch on, and what do you think about the future of cryptography if it does? Thanks! 
Sql server on Linux was announced yesterday as I'm sure you are aware. What do you think this means or says about the company's direction, culture and future? 
Hello Mr. Gates,  You have previously said that, through organizations like Khan Academy and Wikipedia and the Internet in general, getting access to knowledge is now easier than ever. While that is certainly true, K-12 education seems to have stayed frozen in time.  How do you think the school system will or should change in the decades to come?  Thank you for continually coming back to reddit to let us ask you anything! 
Hey Bill! Has there been a problem or challenge that's made you, as a billionaire, feel completely powerless? Did you manage to overcome it, and if so, how?  Now for a less serious question: sushi or thai food?  Thanks for doing this AMA! 
Any plans to retire and enjoy a quieter life? It strikes me that you must be sacrificing a lot to remain so active on these projects. 
What's your fastest time in expert minesweeper without editing the .ini file? 
What do you think will be the next biggest advancement in technology in the next 20 years? 
I'm about to graduate high school, do you have any life tips that I should know about moving forward in my life? 
I recently saw *Pirates of Silicon Valley*, a film that claims to portray both Apple and Microsoft's rise to fame. Regarding that, I have a few questions for you, Mr. Gates.   - Have you seen this movie, and if so did it seem accurate in portraying yourself and Steve Jobs??   - If you could go back in time and do it all over again, would you do anything different?   - Any other interesting run-ins with the government besides the Porsche 911 incident?   - Would you rather jump a horse-sized chair or 100 chair-sized horses?   - What's your biggest "first world problem"?   - What version of Windows do you use?    Thank you for taking the time to handle all these AMAs. 
What are your thoughts on the many politicians that completely disregard climate change?  
What's your take on the recent FBI/Apple situation?  
Afternoon Mr. Gates,   I was curious about your thoughts on VR. We've all seen the great strides in AR made by the Hololens but nothing on VR from you guys at this time. Does that market interest you? 
Would you consider marrying Melinda to be one of the top three decisions of your life?  Because I do!  :) 
Hi Bill! You began Microsoft with the easy goal of putting a computer in every home. If you were to start all over today, what would your goal be instead?  
Bill, in an interview with Playboy in 1994 you claimed to have used LSD when you were younger.  Right now, LSD is being investigated more and more closely as a therapeutic tool for various conditions and situations (ranging from autism, to alcoholism to fear of dying), but also as a creativity enhancer (as attested by its documented use in the form of microdoses in Silicon Valley). Do you feel your LSD experiences contributed anything to what you have achieved and invented?  If so, could you share some of the most relevant elements? 
I think people's spending instincts are set when they are in high school. I don't like spending a lot of money on clothes or jewelry (for me - I do like to buy nice things for my wife). 
I decided that I would be different and never attend any class I was signed up for but always attend a class I wasn't signed up for. This worked out in a funny way when the final exam for a Combinatorics class (which I signed up for) was given at the same table as my Brain studies class (which I attended and did not sign up for). My friends from Brain studies thought it was very strange that I sat on the wrong side of the table and took the Combinatorics exam even when I was the most vocal student in the Brain class. 
I am concerned about biological tools that could be used by a bioterrorist. However the same tools can be used for good things as well.  Some people think Hoverboards were bad because they caught on fire. I never got to try one. 
As a tagalong question: what's a fantasy technological advancement you wish existed? 
I think it shows Satya looking at how the market is changing and being willing to change how things have been done. His embrace of the cloud and mobile including doing software on other people's mobile platforms are also great examples of that. 
The problem of how we prevent a small group of terrorists using nuclear or biological means to kill millions is something I worry about. If Government does their best work they have a good chance of detecting it and stopping it but I don't think it is getting enough attention and I know I can't solve it.  I love both sushi and thai food. Since I like them better than my family does I have them for lunch a lot. 
I just recently switched to the Surface Book. I only detach the screen a few times a week and I like the keyboard better than my previous Surface. 
Since our Foundation can basically save a life for every $1,000 we spend I would pick it up since that would be enough to save 40 lives which is a big deal. 
He doesn't stop making money while picking up that money...  
Tagging on to this.  Mr. Gates,  Your foundation funded my high school, Utah County Academy of Science. I was able to get an AS through concurrent enrollment with a nearby university. I got my AS in 18 months, which set my career ahead by 5-6 years by my estimation. I now work in the STEM field and completed my 4-year degree with no debt and I owe it to your charitable work.  Thank you, and thank you for starting the Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation. 
I like my current job at the Foundation better than I would being President. Also I wouldn't be good at doing what you need to do to get elected. I thought Michael Bloomberg was thoughtful about why it didn't make sense for him to try and run even though he is a great executive. 
I'd guess he has more power and less stress doing what he already does.  
Pirates of Silicon Valley was a reasonable recapitulation of the early days of the PC industry.  I don't jump chairs at all now. Maybe I should since when I go snow skiing with my kids I need more exercise so I don't get tired by the end of the day.  I use the latest version of Windows - always updated Windows 10. 
I'm gonna take a wild guess and say it was probably programming. 
VR is the extreme case of AR when nothing from the real world gets mixed in. It can be tricky if you are walking around that you might run into things. Mixed systems which seems like VR but when you might hit something it shows you that seem better than pure VR. So I don't think these two things will stay as separate as they are now. 
I will look into this. How many empires do you need? 
Come on Reddit! We can make this the top question! 
You got your wish though!  Microsoft actually supports a lot of local programs to get kids engaged in programming and thinking about computers. There's a program called "Hunt the Wumpus" aimed at high school students that teaches program design, problem solving, etc. They also have a high school internship program they offer to students within driving distance of their Redmond campus.  There's probably more examples, but those are just the ones I'm familiar with that Microsoft is doing now. 
At least we know he'll never have to buy reddit gold for himself! 
 How did this even work? You passed the classes you didn't attend? 
Follow up question: do you think calling them Hoverboards should be outlawed until they actually hover? 
I recently saw a company working on "robotic" surgery where the ability to work at small scales was stunning. The idea that this will make surgeries higher quality, faster and less expensive is pretty exciting. It will probably take a decade before this gets mainstream - to date it has mostly been used for prostate surgery.  In the Foundation work there are a lot of tools we are working on we don't have yet. For example an implant to protect a woman from getting HIV because it releases a protective drug.  
I'm a PhD student at UC Berkeley working on optimal ways to employ mobile units for nuclear threat detection but it's hard to get funding in this area and I might have to move to a different project with more fundings soon. Have you thought about including grants for this type of project in your Foundation?  
Cool I have the same computer as the riches man in the world.   
$1K = 1 life saved? Astounding that more people aren't jumping on board with efforts like this. Thanks for all you do, sir! 
Whenever I hear phrases like "save a life" I wonder how they come up with that figure. What does $1k do exactly? How long would it be able to keep someone alive? At what point do you consider someone's life "saved?"  I also want to thank you for all the work you do! If only we had more people like you! 
I like how it's not about wealth for you anymore. It's about saving lives. Great answer! 
I think a lot people need to realize how restrictive being president is. You are tied down by congress, approval ratings along with a bunch of other factors. 
Warren also loves his current job too much to give it up! 
Did you install Windows 10 on purpose or did it sneak it's way in like on everyone else's? 
I think you did - sorry I can't deliver an Empire (or an Age) easily. 
I read the website, but how is it different than AOE2 HD version? 
It's true that we have devices very similar to what I described in my essay (can I get a prior-art patent on Google Glass?), but it's not quite there yet! 
Somebody who can brag about giving one of richest person in the world money 
I studied super hard during reading period and almost always got A's. The big exception was organic chemistry where the promised video tapes of the lectures sometimes had no sound or no video - that spooked me and I ended up getting a C+ in the course! 
That latter downside is something I'd never thought of. Interesting!  Still, I think it's unlikely that raw processing power will remain the stumbling block for AI for all that long anyway. 
I'm still on my first reddit, can't seem to get through the entire thing 
I've watched the da Vinci robot for general surgeries a lot and it is a significant improvement 
When you ask such an absolute question: "Will *ALL* storage and computation be online?" it is easy to answer "no".   Cloud storage is inherently less secure and less reliable. There will always be offline storage for these reasons. How much storage is the question...    Also local computation will always be necessary. There is no reason to ask the quantum supercomputer at the center of the earth to calculate your restaurant tip, your phone can do that faster and more efficiently.  
As a student in high school, I can confirm. If I feel that my class teaches me material either not interesting or not useful to my future, chances are I won't put my best effort into my work. I'll just want to get it done, forget about really truly learning it. I get good grades, but that high 90-100 stuff comes from things I like and think are more important. Except for French 3. Love that class, but I just can't get that grade above an 80. Aggh.  
True PhD student begging for grant money right here.  I've been there, but as an undergrad working on a Surgeon's prototype device. 
it's almost like you have to work your ass off to be hugely successful 
Cool I have a *better* computer than the richest man in the world.  
This is exactly why you do the 50/50s as soon as you find them, so you don't waste your time if you guess wrong at the very end.  
Yeah, that's actually amazing to hear. I kind of glossed over that reading it the first time. I'd like to know more about what exactly that means, and if it's as good as it sounds. 
I'd love, just once, for one of the robots to kick the guy back. 
It's funny to hear billionaires talking about each other like pals.  
My computer did that last night while I was sleeping. I feel violated. 
Well, you pretty much did start the postindustrial age, so... 
HAHAHAHA YOU THINK YOURE SO FUNNY BILL, THIS GAME IS NOT A JOKE TO SOME OF US 
 It's a direct port (with no networking) that only runs on linux (afaik) vs an HD remake that does have networking and runs on windows.  
But the internet told me you were a high school dropout who smoked weed and made mixtapes. 
I finished Reddit when it was called Digg. I won't spoil it, but the ending is very disappointing. 
Finally, clean arteries without all that pesky eating well and exercising nonsense.  
A billionaire expressed concern about a topic he/she is directly involved in... It would be foolish not to take a shot! 
Careful, I'm sure Bill also has a better computer than a Surface Book at his disposal. I made an inclusive statement. ;) 
I don't think it's any coincidence we call them dollar Bills. 
A lot of people think that things that aren't 50/50s are though, and they basically pick random tiles with that mindset and lose 90% of their games. 
Unlikely, as a 600 second score on expert is pretty bad, especially considering he managed a sub 10 second on beginner.  Source: Played a lot of minesweeper. Fastest on beginner was ~10, intermediate ~45 seconds,  expert ~120. 
It would have been a lot faster had he disabled the prints. 
/r/effectivealtruism is a subreddit that is dedicated to this kind of thinking. 
Neat.   Mine keep me curious! As in, why the fuck did I do that?  
It's on the booklet (remember those?) included with aoe3 
You expend your great person when you boost production&research this way. 
I would tuck Bill Gates into bed.  I would tuck him in so hard he wouldn't be able to move.  
I like how people say things like "Oh Bill Gates and Zuckerberg dropped out of Harvard" as if they flunked out. No they were actually acing super hard courses and left because they had better things to with their time. 
The problem with white blood cells is they are easily distracted. 
I might mention:  *more* than just a billionaire... 
The computer that runs his house is probably better than mine :( 
That's why you need to play more to get more experience. Also, whenever you notice any pattern that crops up from time to time that you *don't* know the probabilities for - take a minute and work it out (even just ballparking it is better than nothing). There are plenty of patterns that are you won't see *every* game, but still pop up often enough that it's worthwhile to figure them out. It'll kill your time for that one game, but it'll help every future game. 
Also these are people of the caliber of having gotten into a place like Harvard in the first place. 
Their stories are relevant if you're dropping out to start a multi-billion dollar company. Not so much if you're dropping out because you suck at school.  
THE Billionaire, philanthropist, genius... Is Bill Iron Man? 
"Hey Cortana?..."  "*Yes Mr. Gates*"  "God damn it I told you to call me Bill! One more time an you got back to being called Jarvis" 
That's hilarious. The guy found something that works to cash in Karma and now he's showing up for every single AMA that Bill Gates does with the exact same comment and still bathe in Karma and gold. Well, at least it goes to show Reddit is consistent. 
Jokes on the AI, i dont have any friends.  *sobs quietly* 
What if he's the one giving Bill the reddit gold because he knows he'll get one or more reddit gold for doing it? 
If you could have anyone from history on your show, who would it be? 
What has been your favorite game to play on clueless gamer so far, and why? 
Hey Conan, I'm allergic to penicillin, clindamycin, and sulfa-based antibiotics. What type of medicine would you recommend for my next infection?   
Whats the most memorable moment you've ever had on your show? 
Did anybody in the telenovelas explained you why your character was a cheese seller? 
Hey Conan, huge fan, who was your favorite character to write for when you worked on the Simpsons? 
Are you giving up comedy for a career in lucha libre? 
Hey Conan, what's the most difficult part about prepping for a show? 
What are you going to do once your hair starts turning grey? 
What was the best thing you ate while down in Mexico? 
How do you still trust Paul Rudd after all these years of Mac and Me clips? 
How is the old time baseball league looking this year? 
This is a question for Conanando. I am a 30 year old Hispanic male, about to get married in sept of this year. Any solid suggestions for wedding vows?  
How do you keep your hair sooo amazing and perfect? 
Does the superhero outfit still fit, and how often do you just wear it around the office? 
Do you ever wish you were an animal instead of a human, and if so which one?  
Hey Conan, big fan.  How did you become friends with Jack White?  
How many four year olds would you kill before they killed you? 
What are you listening to lately, favorite new album or something older I should check out? 
Hi Conan. It's Riley, the intern that you yelled at the other day for eating too many almonds. My question: How much water *does* it take to produce a single almond? 
Hey Conan.  If you could turn into any vegetable at will, what would it be and why? 
Hi Conan!  Thanks for consistently making me laugh out loud.  What is your favorite cereal? 
Have you received any offers to play professional soccer after your incredible display with Gio Dos Santos?  
All 45 US presidents engage to a fight to the death. Who makes it out alive? 
Conan!  Boston native here.  I want to take my girl out for a real nice dinner to celebrate, anywhere in the Brookline/Boston/Quincy area.  What do you suggest?  If I can tell her I'm taking her somewhere (even if it's Taco Bell) because Conan Fucking O'Brien suggested it, she'd love it. 
Do you plan on traveling all over the world with the Conan Show ? 
Is there ever going to be a beard reprise? I wouldn't be mad about it... 
Do you have to adjust your comedy routine when traveling to a different country (in this case, Mexico) or is comedic timing universal?  Thank you and looking forward to tonight's episode! 
Hi Conan, I've brought a puppet to your studio audience a few times, but the last time Jeff Ross sternly requested I keep it down during the show. Why does Jeff Ross hate puppets? 
Your remotes are probably my favorite thing you do. In the future, would you ever consider doing a travel show? I'd definitely watch that. Thanks for all the laughs.  
Hi Conan, my left pinky finger has been twitching since midnight and seems to have moved to my buttocks. Any tips? 
What was it like to speak to former president Vicente Fox and did you take away anything that you weren't expecting from your trip to Mexico? 
There has been a rise in antimicrobial resistance in recent years due to abuse and overuse of antibiotics. What do you think needs to be done to change this trend? Also, I have a degree in Microbiology and have been applying to state level Epidemiologist positions with no luck. Where should I find good entry level positions in this field that will help bolster my resume and make me a better candidate for these positions?  
Conan, in 40 years time after you stop doing your show, would u consider doing conan travels as a netflix show?  
Hey Conan, long time fan, just curious about your "Clueless Gamer" skits, has there been a game you've attempted to play on there that got your attention enough to warrant trying to continue playing in your free time? 
If your really conan then, what's something only he would know? 
What was it like playing video games with Tom Brady? 
Do you have any particularly vivid memory of your time at Brookline High School?  Warriors rule 
Thank you for taking your show to Mexico for your travel special. I love the country!  Of the places you visited, what was your favorite? Would you go back to do another episode or for a vacation? What the tastiest meal you had? What is Diego Luna like?  
Hey Conan, would you rather have a vagina on your forehead or have a row of penises down your back like a stegosaurus? 
How is Mike Sweeney still alive?  What sort of superfood do you feed him? 
Hello Conester, I've been to Mexico many times and it's one of my favorite countries to visit. When you were there, were people really hesitant about Americans?  
Hi Conan, how much money did you actually raise in your Wall Piggybank, and what do you plan to do with it (since I know it's not going to Trump's initiative)? 
Hey Conan! Love your show! What is your favorite type of bacteria?  
Hi Conan! I've been a really big fan since I was eight, when my older siblings were babysitting and decided not to force me to bed after 10pm (best decision of their lives, hands down). I can honestly say that your humor has helped me stay sane through some really, really rough times.  As a matter of fact, I also happen to be a first generation Mexican-American (the first in my family to be born on American soil, to be exact), I really just wanted to say thank you for doing this special. I know my parents and older siblings (the very same who introduced me to you) and I are all really worried about what might happen, and it warms my heart so much that you'd help humanize Mexicans and our culture, now of all times.  I guess my question would be...did you try the the tacos from stands or the vanilla ice-cream? Raspados?? Rompope??? Will you bring me some?   Sincerely,   Your biggest and most starving fan 
Hey Conan -- thanks for doing this! I'm a long-time admirer.  I know you've told a lot of Trump-related jokes, and I've seen comments of people saying you shouldn't make things so political.   Is it important to you to tell those jokes? Do you think humor can change the dynamic in this kind of political atmosphere?  Thanks! 
Do you have any good mac n cheese combinations? (Such as hot dogs w mac n cheese) 
Number 1: Flo the Progressive Insurance lady, Number 2: Aristotle 
Witcher 3, because I got to have sex on a unicorn. When that game comes out in VR, you'll never see me again. 
You are very wise to ask me.  I'm not a doctor.  Next time you're not feeling well just bite into a glow stick and suck it down.  
I met my wife while filming a remote on my show. And that's interesting moment #28.   The most interesting moment was a cooking segment with Jerry Orbach. 
I seriously asked them to explain many times and they never did. I was fervently looking forward to making out with a beautiful Mexican actress and they made me a pompous asexual cheese merchant. I am honestly very angry about this.  
As an Mexican I know the real answer, here in Mexico we have "Menonitas" that are people from Europe born in Mexico (mainly in Chihuahua) that make great cheese and then sell it on the streets wearing the "Menonita Outfit" Conan looks pretty much like a "Menonita" so that's why 
When you watch the segment tonight, you'll realize that even when I'm seriously trying to wrestle, I'm still doing comedy.  
I was doing it in the office for a few years and the writers dared me to do it on the air. The rest is history.  
When people like Norm Macdonald, Will Ferrell, Martin Short, Charlene Yi, Kevin Hart, Bill Burr, Sarah Silverman, etc come on, it always makes me laugh. 
I was surprised how many Mexicans were shouting my name through their car windows. I don't know if they knew who I was before, or were just reading coverage of my visit. I was recognized more there than any other country. Except Finland. Finland's weird.  
It's like Charlie Brown, Lucy, and the football. I believe in my heart one day he'll do the right thing.  
Thanks for remembering my favorite remote of all time. Sometimes late at night I think about the young woman Nell and how we were supposed to be together but sadly we were born 150 years apart.  
Taking Jordan to Italy is already in the works. We're waiting until it's legal to bring a cyborg into a foreign country. 
It does fit. I do not wear it at the office at all; I wear it at home, and to the gym at Venice beach.  
Because the bread is connected, and forms a "hinge" if you will, it falls under the "taco" classification. Ergo, hotdogs and tacos are not sandwiches. The pita, however, takes us into strange territory and demands further study. 
See my previous answer about the penis covered stegosaurus. 
True story: I met Jack and Meg in a bowling alley in Detroit in 1999 while shooting a remote. They were part of a group of people that came over and hung out. Later, they became famous and told me they were part of the group that were chatting and drinking beers all night. I totally lucked out. Since then, I just hang out in bowling alleys looking for future rock stars. 
My son really got me into 21 Pilots other than that my wife and I like to slow dance to John Grisham audio books.   
Riley, I yelled at you because you exceeded my 'one almond an hour' rule. That wastes water (an almond takes 1.1 gallons of water to produce). 
Giving your boss your reddit username... Bold move, Riley 
The Asparagus, because I could change the odor of your urine against your will.  
It's a tie between Fruit Loops and Cap'n Crunch with Crunchberries 
Thanks for calling that an incredible display. The goal I scored was so incredibly fake that I felt bad for the goalie who had to pretend to miss a ball moving at 2mph. 
Harry S. Truman. Do not screw with Harry S. Truman.  
Go to Pino's Pizza in Cleveland Circle. There's only two tables but it's the only pizza my family and I eat.  I've been going there since elementary school.  
I got a complete 50/50 response on the beard. Half the people loved it, half the people hated it. Since it was my kids who hated it, it had to go. Don't fear, I still keep it in the attic with my wedding dress. 
That's a great question. What surprised me the most is how little I have to adjust. Especially in Mexico. The Mexican people are really funny and sharp, and they always got the joke instantly - and they weren't afraid to give me a hard time. I'm very comfortable being the underdog when I do remotes, and all the Mexican people I encountered were great and generous improvisors.  
Jeff Ross was molested by a puppet in 1958. When he testified in court he had to point to a human to show where the puppet touched him.  
President Vicente Fox was very funny, and although he was talking about a serious issue, he came prepared almost like a comedian. He entirely caught the spirit of what we were trying to do, and he's a big part of the show. 
My father Dr. Thomas F. O'Brien who works at Brigham and Women's hospital in Boston has been working hard on this problem for decades.  He's the smartest guy I know.  He and his team have been working hard on this serious issue for a long time.   
I hope he does more episodes with just him and Aaron in the future. The celebs are often funny but I like the show more as a two man deal. 
Wow. Your friendly, casual demeanor cracked through my cold emotionless exterior. The answer is no. Bud's not okay. 
Still no curtains. My dad says it happens for guys at different times. 
I'm from Boston, and a huge Patriots fan. We had to edit out all the times I tried to kiss him. 
My favorite moment was when I threw the big pass that won the game. Or maybe that was Jimmy Hennessey.   Seriously, I went back to Brookline High School about 15 years ago, and it was so much nicer then when I was there. They actually had a sushi bar (not kidding).  I felt like I had gone to high school during the Great Depression. 
I went to the Trotsky museum; it's the house where Leon Trotsky was murdered with an ice pick. I think it's safe to say that I'm the only late night host to ever go there.  
Ah, the old classic question. I've always been a penis stegosaurus guy. 
I think it's time to tell people that yes, we are dating.  
In 2015, The Masturbating Bear died of autoerotic asphyxiation alone in a Motel 6 in Flagstaff, AZ. He was buried with full military honors. 
Liam Cartwright. He played tenor sax with the group, but left for better things in '58. 
No, I did not. It's one of the great disappointments of my life.  
After something like 4500 hours of weird awkward television, I honestly cannot answer that. 
TRANSLATION:  Hello Conan. How have chimichangas its because tacos fall head from so for how many chicken chicken up? Thank you. 
I'm not a big fan of marijuana. My drug of choice is wine, and the cheese popcorn they sell at Whole Foods (Smart Choice White Cheddar Popcorn). 
Check your voicemail - you have 178 new messages from Progressive's marketing dept 
And you do this for how long? Please help I have  got to get back to work 
I love the one that starts out as the correct movie, and then quickly turns into Mac and Me. 
I left this exchange with more questions than answers. 
A pita is a pocket and thus falls under the same classification as a vagina.   
Personally, I like to practice law while listening to slow dancing music 
So, where does the water go? It's clearly not in the actual almond(s). Is this an issue of depleting aquifers, where the water can stay in circulation more locally and groundwater recharge can't keep up, or is the water somehow moving elsewhere? 
Did you see that ludicrous display last night, Conan?  
There's actually no period after the "S", because there's no name behind it.  True story.  
Truman for sure. He'd let FDR take all the punches and then cherry pick a nuclear bombing at the end of the melee.  
Thank you!  We both actually love trying different pizza places, so this is perfect.  So many new places opened up in the area.  I'll let her know tonight. 
Was this intentionally answered like Donald Trump? 
/u/Oldschoolhollywood is going to print this out and use it as their facebook profile picture. And it'll probably be on their fridge, forever. 
Pete Best and Stuart Sutcliffe are devastated. They're also dead, but they're devastated. 
Did you smoke with Ice Cube and Kevin Hart when you went to a dispensary during the girl's driving test?  
And 1 from Aristotle saying sorry but he's more of a Leno guy.  
I don't think there is a man alive who doesn't crush hard on Nell when he sees that skit. 
That episode was from a couple years after Conan stopped writing for The Simpsons. 
Anyway, the year was nineteen-dickity-two! You had to say "dickity" because the Kaiser had stolen our word for "twenty"... 
This is like a joke that Conan would say in his monologue to grumbled laughter from the crowd while he stares at the camera apologetically and Andy tells him it was a terrible joke.  
I think this is the best answer we've ever had to this question. "No, it's a Taco". Brilliant.  
Almond researcher here. For maximum efficiency, we make the 1 almond and then launch the 1 gallon of water into space, rendering it forever unusable. 
You're going to be greeted by 1000 Reddit neckbeards when you get there. 
He should go into comedy.  Start as a writer, maybe get his own TV show someday. 
Have ya heard of this Trotsky guy, have you seen this? 
Liam Cartwright doesn't even exist as far as I can tell. Conan is such a troll (even though the Beatles weren't called the Beatles in 1958) 
Devils advocate: He wrote it and the script was shelved until after he left. 
Wow. Even after you guys confirmed it was a reference, I didn't know it was a (phonetic) pun till you spelled it out for me. 
"When Jay Leno tells you something, that's supposed to be a pact with the American People. He's giving his word."   How prophetic. 
She's cute as hell, and was totally digging Conan... 
"We didn't have any capital, and there was a giant, lit up 'FACT' sign on top the building, so we had to incorporate that into our advertising".  That's some real world shit.   
How does everyone automatically know which girl is Conan's wife? 
Have airline companies changed their pricing algorithms due to Skiplagged's increasing use and prominence? 
A friend of mine claims you can get screwed on this, but I don't know if I believe him  Supposedly if you're flying from NYC to Dallas and use this to get a flight that goes from NYC to las Vegas (with a hidden city of Dallas), the hidden city could switch at the last minute from Dallas to Chicago!   Possible? Or an urban legend? This is the only thing keeping me from using this service 
What were the biggest obstacles to overcome in getting the website off the ground?  -  Also, how does the website and app make money? 
Some carriers have applications that can sniff out passengers using hidden cities and mark their return flights for cancellation. Have any of your passengers had their return flights cancelled for this reason? And if they do, will you compensate them? 
How does it feel to personally be telling that 'One weird trick Airliners don't want you to know about'? 
Can you explain like I'm 5 what a hidden-city is? I don't understand how/why it saves money. 
Can you get on a flight from the middle to end instead? Say flight does to New York, Miami, lax. Can I start from Miami to end in lax? 
Data engineer here, what types of obstacles from a data acquisition/infrastructure view did you run into? How do you manage scaling up? Did you have to apply for access to the FAA data or do you pull from an alternative source? What kind of backend do you use to handle this large scale/constantly changing data? My apologies for all the nerdy questions! :D 
Is it true that the best (Cheapest) time to purchase a plane ticket is about 3 weeks in advance? Do airlines seem to change the prices on certain days of the week? 
I want to use skiplagged to book a flight now but it keeps saying "results unavailable" even after multiple city searches. Is the site down? 
In terms of voting, what about making a comment for each charity and our upvote can help decide? 
Is this a violation of your agreement with the airline as a passenger? could you be banned from the airline for doing this often? 
Oh hey! We graduated from RPI the same year. I mostly wanted to say that it's super cool to see an RPI grad being successful and don't really have any great questions to ask about Skiplagged, so I guess I'll just ask what your favorite and least favorite parts of RPI were so we can bond.  So, what was your favorite and least favorite part / experience at RPI? 
Which airlines have "contract of carriage"? What could they do to you for missing a flight? 
Just saying, you're my hero. Had to go see my mom a few weeks back, and used Skiplagged. Saved a crap ton of money. Just wondering, what's your primary method of growing a startup company such as yours? 
What about the other passengers on the flight you don't show up for? Do you worry that Skiplagged will increase delays caused by late arriving or no-show passengers? 
Travel agencies and airlines have always known about hidden citys. The airlines kept the threat of making the traveler pay for the unused portion of ticket. Travel agents tried not to book them but if the client knew about them and insisted, they booked them and hope the airline didn't catch it and issue the agency a debit memo. United reservation system is Apollo and Americans is Saber. Both systems work within minimum and maximum connection times. One has to force sell the segments and phase IV the tkt to get the accounting lines correct. For you to get it done and them to create a program to allow users to do it..dude your going to be very very wealthy one day.  Can I buy stock in you? Im impressed   
What is stopping airlines from deciphering which flights are being purchased through Skiplagged and denying all sales made through your site? I'm not even sure if such a thing is possible, but if it is I wouldn't put such a thing past them.  
How'd you come up with the idea for Skiplagged??? It's really amazing!!! 
Not that I've noticed. Airlines still make the additional money from uninformed, so it might be silly to get rid of hidden-city opportunities. 
Hijacking the top comment to tell people: Airlines can and will ban you from flying with them if they catch you doing this. Do not use this method of travel hacking with an airline you intend to use often! 
By suing Skiplagged, United educated millions about hidden-city and made Skiplagged significantly more popular. It might be better for the airlines to leave Skiplagged alone. 
Thanks for the input. I've been going back and forth about when to donate the excess like I promised. Only reason I considered now because it's been a year already. I'll be sure to update you guys. 
Yes. If the airline decides to reroute you due to a plethora of factors this can happen. However it is rare. 
We proved it wasn't filed properly. The jurisdiction, Chicago, was not the right place for this lawsuit. 
It's a classic move companies use to bleed smaller opposition of money. File in the wrong jurisdiction, force the company to defend themselves and have the case thrown out wasting time and money, both of which are precious to a smaller company, then re-file in the appropriate spot.   He'll he sued again 
It turns out services that provide airfare data make it really difficult to facilitate what Skiplagged does, i.e. search by stopovers. I had to figure out an efficient and scalable solution to this huge obstacle, given that airfare is lots of data that changes every few minutes.  The website and app don't make money right now, but there are lots of ways Skiplagged as a travel service can in the future (e.g. hotel commissions).  
Never had a complaint. We tell you to book a round-trip as two one-ways if it involves missing a flight. 
I work for one of the major Airlines and I can tell  that yes, if you miss a segment in your reservation, they will automatically cancel out everything after that segment  
Pretend you live in California. You want to go to Denver Colorado. The ticket is $550. But there's also a flight to Nashville Tennessee that has a layover in Denver. This flight is only $300. So you book the flight to Nashville and just get off your plane when it stops in Denver and you stay in Denver.  The only issue with this is it's a one way ticket and you cannot check your baggage. you either have to mail it to your destination beforehand or just have carry on baggage.  
If you take a flight from Los Angeles to New York, you may have layover Chicago. The layover destination is the place you're actually trying to get to. Airlines are selling to fill their planes, so may offer a discount ticket to get people on the airplane. Now, if you don't go to New York and drop off at Chicago, the airline doesn't have a full plane and they sold you a discount ticket to New York but you just went to Chicago. Maybe Los Angeles to Chicago costs more than New York, but you've sort of circumvented by buying a cheaper ticket to Chicago. I hope I explained that okay. 
You'll appear as having missed your departure on your origin and it invalidates the rest of the trip unless you have a customer service agent override it.  Say your plane to second leg was significantly delayed due to maintenance and you just decided to rent a car and drive to the next airport instead and told the agent and had him exception it.  I've heard of it happening a few times when someone would just decide to go from PIT to IAD or EWR via car to make their flight out to another area. 
Keep it as a war-chest in case they refile in the proper jurisdiction.   
A fist-bump, a high-five, AND a cold beer with pizza! Haha 
Ah, yeah those airlines that routinely go bankrupt and can barely stay afloat while simultaneously getting 99.999999999% of people where they're going without tragedy are so evil and blood sucking.  
Hey fellow RPI grad! Thanks for the nice comment. My favorite part was that the computer science curriculum prepared me well for the working world. Least favorite was the boring city. You? 
All the airlines have some sort of agreement. If you missed a flight, you missed a flight. They can't really prove you missed on purpose and therefore violated the contract. 
Alternatively, do you have employees or is it a solo operation currently? 
Just a PSA to those who are planning to use this service and book a flight with it: Airlines are very privy to the Hidden City "trick" and will not hesitate to shut down your frequent flyer account (and take away your "miles") . You may be able to get away with it once or twice but if you are flying regularly and have a frequent flyer account with that airline, they will figure it out.    
Airlines also don't like it when you use the word 'hijacking' 
I'm banned for life from Alaska Airlines for doing hidden-city fares *twice*. Really sucks, too, because it's one of the most popular airlines around here. I'm locked out of about half the flights I could take, and sometimes I have to fly separately when traveling with friends and family.  Shit is real.  
As wonderful a sentiment as that is, that's very rarely how multi-billion dollar companies operate. I don't want to be a negative nancy here, but you shouldn't be surprised if you see the inside of a courtroom again soon.  Or, even more likely, find yourself on the receiving end of their lobbying team.  
Rare indeed. Only 2.5% of trips get rerouted, usually in obvious times of issues like bad weather. 
Whats stopping them from filing it again in the right jurisdiction after you donate the money and cant fight it? 
Considering it was dismissed on a technicality, don't you think you should keep the remaining money that hasn't been spent instead of donating it to charity? I don't think any of us would fault you for keeping it saved for a year. If you haven't been sued by next year, THEN donate it. But who knows if you'll have the same fundraising capabilities if this happens again. 
Do you also contend the suit is without merit? Or...are you standing proudly in the loophole? 
I think the question is asking what the remedy for hidden city booking is if your flight is changed or cancelled, either intentionally by the airlines for violating their terms, or coincidentally (e.g. due to bad weather). Does your site have any remedy, or is this just a risk that passengers have to live with? 
So if one purchases two one way tickets through the same airline and misses a segment on the first ticket, will the return ticket be cancelled?  Is this just for round-trip tickets? 
Why would they charge less for two trips instead of one? Never got this but I've used this trick forever. 
After reading all the other comments, it sounds extremely likely that they will take him to court at least one more time. Better to start at 30k for some lawyers than 0k. Wait til your turning a profit before worrying about charity.   On the other hand, it sounds like he said that he would donate what's left from this case to charity in the original gofundme, so it may not be great PR to keep it.  
www.givewell.org is a better site.  Focuses on results vs where money goes in the company. 
